BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2023, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2021 c 332 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($1,523,000))

$815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($32,378,000))

$31,343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($33,901,000))

$32,158,000

Sec. 1002. 2021 c 332 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,750,000))

$1,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($9,128,000))

$8,983,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,878,000))

$10,746,000

Sec. 1003. 2021 c 332 s 1015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The ((reappropriations))appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriations))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020. Section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020 is set forth in full below, except that new language is added to subsection (1)(f)(x) of this section, which supersedes the requirements of subsection (1)(f)(x) in section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

(1) $83,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $19,631,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $8,658,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than 15 years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income;

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation and $1,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract directly with YouthCare Service Center to purchase the 1534 Broadway site from Capitol Hill Housing in order for YouthCare Service Center to develop a youth community center.

(f) $25,506,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) Spokane Housing Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .$1,500,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) Parkview Apartments Affordable Housing. . . .$100,000

(viii) Supported Housing and Employment (Longview). . . .$129,000

(ix) $2,000,000 is provided solely for homeownership assistance for low-income households displaced from their manufactured/mobile homes due the closure or conversion of a mobile home park or manufactured housing community in south King county. $1,500,000 of this amount in this subsection is provided solely for low-income residents displaced from the Firs Mobile Home Park located in SeaTac.

(x) $7,500,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $200,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a 25 year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection (1)(f)(x) must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $4,500,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection (1)(f)(x) is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection (1)(f)(x). $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Shelton can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Orting can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded.

(xi) $7,290,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $4,290,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(xii) $1,500,000 is provided solely for Valley Cities modular housing project in Auburn.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (f) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) Ten percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) Ten percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) Five percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities; and

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,716,000))

$6,246,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$24,810,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$1,578,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($32,104,000))

$32,634,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($79,386,000))

$78,856,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($111,490,000))

$112,990,000

Sec. 1004. 2021 c 332 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$10,954,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,000,000))

$11,954,000

Sec. 1005. 2021 c 332 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 413, Laws of 2019, except that funding may not be provided for an aluminum smelter restart project in Whatcom county as this project is transitioning to the 2021-23 Clean Energy V - Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148) project pursuant to section 1011 of this act.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,362,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($29,402,000))

$27,002,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($34,764,000))

$32,364,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($46,100,000))

$43,700,000

Sec. 1006. 2021 c 332 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,700,000))

$1,884,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($26,200,000))

$25,379,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($27,900,000))

$27,263,000

Sec. 1007. 2021 c 332 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$999,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$3,062,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,999,000))

$4,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($11,501,000))

$11,404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($15,500,000))

$15,465,000

Sec. 1008. 2021 c 332 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
(($1,500,000))

$1,839,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($29,500,000))

$29,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($5,520,000))

$5,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,020,000

Sec. 1009. 2021 c 332 s 1055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,105,000))

$1,106,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($1,280,000))

$1,281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($20,000))

$19,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,300,000

Sec. 1010. 2021 c 332 s 1063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Library Capital Improvement Program (LCIP) Grants (40000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a local library capital improvement grant program for the following list of projects:

City of Colville. . . .$264,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries (Langley). . . .$700,000

Stevens County Rural Library District (Loon Lake). . . .$649,000

Stevens County Rural Library District (Chewelah). . . .$90,000

North Olympic Library System (Sequim). . . .$2,000,000

Spokane County Library District (Spokane Valley). . . .$2,000,000

Jefferson County Rural Library District (Port Hadlock). . . .$285,000

Stevens County Rural Library District (Northport). . . .$50,000

North Central Regional Library (Wenatchee). . . .$798,000

City of Seattle. . . .$1,889,000

Pend Oreille County Library District (Metaline Falls). . . .$40,000

Upper Skagit Library District (Concrete). . . .$209,000

City of Cashmere. . . .$14,000

Town of Coulee City. . . .$760,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Fort Vancouver Regional Library Foundation (Woodland). . . .$2,000,000

City of Mount Vernon. . . .$2,000,000

((Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,100,000))

Camas Library Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000

Ephrata Public Library (Ephrata). . . .$91,000

Lake Stevens Early Learning Library (Lake Stevens). . . .$2,000,000

(2) The department must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist libraries operated by governmental units, as defined in RCW 27.12.010, in acquiring, constructing, repairing, or rehabilitating facilities.

(3) The department must establish a committee to develop the grant program criteria and review proposals. The committee must be composed of five members as provided in this subsection. The committee must include: (a) A representative from the department of commerce; (b) a representative from the department of archaeology and historic preservation; (c) the state librarian; (d) a representative from a library district; and (e) a representative from a municipal library.

(4) The department must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications. The department must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with the committee established in subsection (3) of this section, using objective criteria. The ranking of projects must prioritize library district facilities listed on a local, state, or federal register of historic places and those located in distressed or rural counties. The evaluation and ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets that applicants propose to apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(5) The department must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature by October 1, 2022, for inclusion in the department of commerce's 2023-2025 biennial capital budget request. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. Individual grants may not exceed $2,000,000. The total amount of recommended state funding for the projects on a biennial project list may not exceed $10,000,000.

(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

(7) The department must assist grant recipients under this section to apply for applicable competitive federal grant funding and, upon receipt of any such funding, an equal amount of the state building construction account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($17,704,000))

$16,604,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($47,704,000))

$46,604,000

Sec. 1011. 2021 c 332 s 1064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Clean Energy V - Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burdens.

(2) The 2021 state energy strategy must guide the department in the design of programs under this section, using an equity and environmental justice lens for program structure and participation. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's existing strengths in communities, aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology (particularly data center infrastructure, artificial intelligence and machine learning), grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(3) Subject to the availability of funds, the department must reconvene an advisory committee to support involvement of a broad range of stakeholders in the design and implementation of programs implemented under this section to encourage collaboration, leverage partners, and engage communities and organizations in improving the equitable distribution of benefits from the program.

(4) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(5) During project solicitation periods for grants funded with this appropriation, the department must maintain a list of applicants by grant program that scored competitively but did not receive a grant award due to lack of available funding. These applicants must be considered for funding during future grant award cycles. If the department submits a 2022 supplemental budget request for this program, the request must include a list of prioritized projects by grant type.

(6)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past 24 months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(7) The requirements in subsections (4) and (6) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(8) $17,594,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants.

(a)(i) $11,000,000 is provided solely for projects that: Advance community resilience, clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources and sustainable microgrids; and support state decarbonization goals pursuant to the clean energy transformation act, including requirements placed upon retail electric utilities.

(ii) Projects must be implemented by community organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state (retail electric utilities). Projects submitted by applicants other than retail electric utilities must demonstrate partnership with their load serving entity to apply. Priority must be given to:

(A) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and

(B) Projects that demonstrate partnerships between eligible applicants in applying for funding, including utilities, public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations.

(iii) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, develop program guidelines that encourage smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding. Where suitable, this may include funding for projects consisting solely of planning, predesign and/or predevelopment activities.

(iv) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(b) $3,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Public Utility District No. 1 of Lewis county for land acquisition and construction of the Winlock Industrial Park and South County Substation and Transmission facility, located on North Military Road in Winlock.

(c) $3,044,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Klickitat County Public Hospital District #1 for the Electrical Upgrade and Smart Grid project at the Klickitat Valley Health Hospital in Goldendale.

(9) $10,830,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants must be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies, focusing on areas that help develop technologies to meet the state's climate goals, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains. The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, recycling energy system components, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(a) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants.

(b) $4,800,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory for a renewable energy platform to support ocean energy research and development testbeds for the Marine and Coastal Research Laboratory in Sequim.

(c) $1,030,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Chelan County Public Utility District for the hydroelectric turbine hub project at Rocky Reach dam near Wenatchee.

(10)(a) $2,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies by households, or for the benefit of households, with high energy burden or environmental health risk now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that must provide matching private capital and administer the loan fund. The department shall select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(11) $5,550,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to demonstrate innovative approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a)(i) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants, prioritizing projects that:

(A) Demonstrate meaningful and enduring benefits to communities and populations disproportionately burdened by air pollution, climate change, or lack of transportation investments;

(B) Beneficially integrate load using behavioral, software, hardware, or other demand-side management technologies, such as demand response, time-of-use rates, or behavioral programming;

(C) Accelerate the transportation electrification market in Washington using market transformation principles; or

(D) Develop electric vehicle charging and hydrogen fueling infrastructure along highways, freeways, and other heavily trafficked corridors across the state to support long-distance travel.

(ii) Projects must be implemented by local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state, or state agencies. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department shall consult and coordinate with the Washington state department of transportation on project selection and implementation. The department shall also coordinate with other state agencies that have other electrification programs, in order to determine to optimally accomplish each agency's respective policy and program goals.

(iii) Projects must be related to on-road end-uses and nonmaritime off-road uses.

(iv) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(A) Battery electric vehicle supply equipment;

(B) On-site generation or storage, where the technology directly supplies electricity to the electric vehicle supply equipment;

(C) Electric grid distribution system infrastructure upgrades, where the upgrade is needed as a result of the installed electric vehicle supply equipment;

(D) Hydrogen refueling station infrastructure that:

(I) Dispenses renewable hydrogen or hydrogen produced in Washington with electrolysis; and

(II) Aligns with the 2021 state energy strategy's recommended uses of hydrogen in the transportation sector.

(v) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for federally recognized tribal governments and for local governments in rural communities, for projects aligning with the above objectives and addressing electric vehicle supply infrastructure gaps in rural communities.

(b) $2,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Lewis Public Transportation Benefit Area to construct a hydrogen fueling station that dispenses renewable hydrogen or hydrogen produced in Washington with electrolysis for electric vehicles at Exit 74 on Interstate 5, near Chehalis.

(12)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of building electrification projects that advance the goals of the 2021 state energy strategy to demonstrate grid-enabled, high-efficiency, all electric buildings.

(b) The program may include, but is not limited to: Shifting from fossil fuels to high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment, control systems that enable grid integration or demand control, and on-site renewable generation and efficiency measures that significantly reduce building energy loads.

(c) Preference must be given to projects based on total greenhouse gas emissions reductions, accelerating the path to zero-energy, or that demonstrate early adoption of grid integration technology.

(d) Program funding may be administered to entities also receiving incentives provided according to RCW 19.27A.220 for buildings covered by the state energy performance standard, RCW 19.27A.210.

(e) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purpose of supporting the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels through the installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment.

(13) $4,924,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for maritime electrification grants.

(a) $4,450,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Northwest Seaport Alliance to upgrade the reefer plug capacity at the Port of Seattle's Terminal 5, located in west Seattle.

(b) $474,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Skagit County Public Works Department for electric ferry charging infrastructure in Anacortes.

(14) $4,900,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop targeted rural clean energy innovation projects as provided in this subsection (14).

(a) $150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop targeted rural clean energy strategies informed by rural community and business engagement, outreach, and research. The department must convene a rural energy work group to identify investments, programs, and policy changes that align with the 2021 state energy strategy and increase access to clean energy opportunities in rural communities and agricultural and forestry management practices. The group must identify existing federal funding opportunities and strategies to leverage these funds with state capital investment. By June 30, 2022, the department shall report recommendations and findings from the rural energy work group to the office of financial management, the governor, and the appropriate legislative committees and present a strategic plan for state rural clean energy investment.

(b) $4,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for rural clean energy innovation grants.

(i) The department must award at least 40 percent of the funding to projects that enhance the viability of dairy digester bioenergy projects through advanced resource recovery systems that produce renewable natural gas and value-added biofertilizers, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and improve soil health and air and water quality.

(ii) Grants may also be awarded to other clean energy innovation projects in rural communities, including, but not limited to, projects that enhance energy efficiency, demand response, energy storage, renewable energy, beneficial electrification, resilience, organic waste management, and biological carbon sequestration.

(iii) Grants may fund project predevelopment, research, and development, pilot projects, strategic implementation, field trials, and data dashboards and tools to inform rural project development.

(c) The department is encouraged to make 20 percent of the funds under (b) of this subsection (14) to tribal governments, designated subdivisions, and agencies.

(d) If a grant is awarded to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(15) $10,072,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of an aluminum smelter restart project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of 750,000 tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create aluminum manufacturing jobs located in Whatcom county.

(16) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Grant county public utility district for expenses related to public infrastructure development benefiting for a solar manufacturing facility in central Washington.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($53,798,000))

$63,798,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,072,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($56,298,000))

$76,370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($156,298,000))

$176,370,000

Sec. 1012. 2021 c 332 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Weatherization Plus Health (40000150)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington State University, shall make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature on strategies to expand and align the weatherization program and the rural rehabilitation loan program. The department shall report the recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by November 1, 2022. The recommendations must include strategies to:

(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard to reach market segments;

(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;

(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with non-profit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and

(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.

(3) If funding from this appropriation is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(4) $69,766,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded for the weatherization assistance program in section 40551 of P.L 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$69,766,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$79,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$50,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($60,000,000))

$129,766,000

Sec. 1013. 2021 c 332 s 1068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000153)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($129,903,000))$55,229,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $74,674,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation, and $20,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness, people with developmental disabilities, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of these funds to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(a) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium "first-time home buyer" also includes:

(i) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(ii) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and who has only owned a home with a spouse;

(iii) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(iv) An individual who has only owned a property that is discerned by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(b) $5,000,000 of the appropriation provided in this subsection (1) is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities, which shall include the following list of projects:

FFC Homes Olympia (Olympia). . . .$827,000

FFC Homes Kent (Kent). . . .$1,030,000;

(c)(i) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(ii) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(iii) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(A) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than 15 years old;

(B) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(C) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(D) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(E) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(2) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grant awards for the development of community housing and cottage communities to shelter individuals or households experiencing homelessness.

(a) $8,775,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grant awards. This funding must be awarded to projects that develop a minimum of four individual structures in the same location. Individual structures must contain insulation, electricity, overhead lights, and heating. Kitchens and bathrooms may be contained within the individual structures or offered as a separate facility that is shared with the community. When evaluating applications for this grant program, the department must prioritize projects that demonstrate:

(i) The availability of land to locate the community;

(ii) A strong readiness to proceed to construction;

(iii) A longer term of commitment to maintain the community;

(iv) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, case management and employment support services to the tenants;

(v) Access to employment centers, health care providers, and other services; and

(vi) A community engagement strategy.

(b) $1,225,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for Eagle Haven Cottage Village located in Bellingham.

(3)(a) $11,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bellwether Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Didgwalic Transitional Housing (Anacortes). . . .$4,500,000

Redondo Heights TOD (Federal Way). . . .$3,000,000

(b) $3,497,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Habitat for Humanity (North Bend). . . .$250,000

Manette Affordable Housing Project (Bremerton). . . .$515,000

OlyCAP Port Townsend Affordable Housing and Child

(Port Townsend). . . .$412,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$515,000

Willapa Center (Raymond). . . .$1,805,000

(4) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(5) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following reporting requirements:

(a) By June 30, 2023, the department must report on its website the following for every previous funding cycle: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to 80 percent of the area median income, up to 50 percent of the area median income, and up to 30 percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2021, and continuing annually, the department must provide the legislature with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

(6) $100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of social and health services to complete a study of the community-based housing needs of adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services shall collaborate with appropriate stakeholders and the department in completing this study and the study shall:

(a) Estimate the number of adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are facing housing insecurity;

(b) Make recommendations for how to improve housing stability for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are facing housing insecurity;

(c) Make recommendations for how to increase the capacity of developers to support increasing the supply of housing that meets the needs of the intellectual and developmental disabilities population; and

(d) Be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(7) The legislature finds that there are insufficient data sources to identify adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities facing housing insecurity in Washington state and that the absence of reliable data limits the ability for the legislature to make informed decisions that will improve the outcomes of these individuals. The legislature further finds that reliable, current information about the unmet housing needs of this population will position Washington state to leverage community-based partnerships and funding to establish greater housing choice and increased community integration of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,597,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($141,403,000))

$66,729,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$74,674,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$175,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$620,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$795,000,000

Sec. 1014. 2021 c 332 s 1071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this section, the appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire or rent real property for a rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, drop-in center, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Amounts provided in this section may be also used for renovation and building update costs associated with establishment of the acquired or rented facilities. For youth housing, drop-in centers, and shelter projects, renovation of existing properties is an allowable activity. The department may only approve funding for projects resulting in increased shelter or housing capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service.

(2) Funds may also be used for permanent financing for real estate acquired using other short term acquisition sources. To expand availability of permanent housing, financing of acquisition of unoccupied multifamily housing is a priority. Funds must also be provided specifically for the city of Seattle to move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into safe spaces, including, but not limited to, tiny homes, hotels, enhanced emergency shelters, or other rapid housing alternatives.

(3) While emphasizing the rapid deployment of the amounts appropriated under this section to alleviate the immediate crisis of homelessness throughout the state, the department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, ((which may include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant,)) during which time the property must be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant. The criteria must include:

(a) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(b) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(c) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds or units; and

(d) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants throughout the end of the grant contract.

(4) The department must provide a progress report on its website by December 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, housing units, and anticipated completion date.

(5) The funding provided under this section is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050. The department of commerce shall dispense funds to the city of Seattle and other qualifying applicants within 45 days of receipt of documentation from the applicant for qualifying uses and execution of any necessary contracts with the department in order to effect the purpose of rapid deployment of funds under this section.

(6) If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection (6), "greatest public benefit" must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The greatest number of accommodations or increased shelter capacity that will benefit extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, and youth experiencing homelessness.

(b) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(c) The scarcity of the affordable housing or shelter capacity applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units or shelter capacity in the same geographic location; and

(d) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(7) $900,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the public building conversion pilot program. The pilot program must be implemented in Grays Harbor county in collaboration with Community House on Broadway, in partnership with CORE Health.

(a) The appropriation may be used only for costs related to rehabilitation, retrofitting, and conversion of the publicly owned building for use as housing for homeless persons.

(b) The appropriation may not be used for staffing or maintaining buildings converted to housing for homeless persons. Costs for staffing and maintenance must be borne by the county or the contractor.

(c) In the contract for the pilot program, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(d) The pilot program should help inform the development of a public building conversion grant program to encourage counties to convert unused, publicly owned buildings into housing for homeless persons. The department must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022, regarding the establishment of the pilot program and any recommendations related to implementation of a public building conversion grant program.

(8) (($17,800,000))$17,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

$5,000,000 for the Tacoma Housing Authority affordable housing acquisition;

$4,000,000 for the Keiro nursing home acquisition in Seattle;

$1,500,000 for the Parkland/Spanaway homeless shelter;

(($300,000 for the Concord apartments acquisition in Seattle;))

$2,000,000 for the ((Eastgate supportive housing))Illahee Affordable Housing in Bellevue; and

$5,000,000 for the City of Seattle for the acquisition of the Clay Apartments in partnership with a low-income housing provider.

(9)(a) (($7,903,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal))$7,903,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the following list of youth housing projects identified by the office of homeless youth protection and prevention programs:

FYRE's Village: Housing Stability for Young Adults

(Omak). . . .$3,350,000

NWYS Young Adult Shelter Services (Bellingham). . . .$438,000

OlyCap Pfeiffer House (Port Townsend). . . .$127,000

Ryan's House for Youth Campus (Coupeville). . . .$1,015,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$773,000

Volunteers of America Crosswalk 2.0 (Spokane). . . .$2,200,000

(b) If funding provided in (a) of this subsection needs to be reallocated, the department shall consult with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to identify other eligible youth housing projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($90,000,000))

$64,700,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$30,435,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$55,435,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($120,435,000))

$120,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($120,435,000))

$120,135,000

Sec. 1015. 2021 c 332 s 1075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Adams County Property/Evidence Processing Facility

(Othello). . . .$900,000

Amara 29 Acre Opportunity in Pierce County (Tacoma). . . .$246,000

American Lake Park ADA Improvement Project (Lakewood). . . .$258,000

American Legion Building Renovation (Goldendale). . . .$262,000

American Legion Veterans Housing & Resource Ctr (Raymond). . . .$88,000

Arlington Innovation Center (Arlington). . . .$372,000

Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$552,000

Aurora Commons Acquisition (Seattle). . . .$2,500,000

Ballinger Park - Hall Creek Restoration

(Mountlake Terrace). . . .$824,000

Battle Ground HealthCare Free Clinic Relocation

(Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue High School Automotive Dynamometer Install

(Bellevue). . . .$277,000

Bigelow House Museum Preservation (Olympia). . . .$52,000

BIPOC Artist Installation at Kraken Training Center

(Seattle). . . .$155,000

Brewery Park Visitor Center (Tumwater). . . .$1,200,000

Bridges To Home (Shoreline). . . .$2,000,000

Camp Kilworth - YMCA Day Camp/Environmental Educ

(Federal Way). . . .$1,030,000

Campus Towers Roofing Project (Longview). . . .$301,000

Capitol Theatre Curtains/Soft Goods Replacement (Yakima). . . .$250,000

Central Klickitat County Parks Improvements (Goldendale). . . .$25,000

Chehalis Centralia Steam Locomotive Repair/Restore

(Chehalis). . . .$123,000

Children's Village Neurodevelopmental Center Expansion

(Yakima). . . .$750,000

City of Wenatchee Community Center (Wenatchee). . . .$2,500,000

Civic Park Mika's Playground (Edmonds). . . .$258,000

Clallam Joint Emergency Services (Port Angeles). . . .$1,200,000

Class A Biosolids Dryer (Yelm). . . .$850,000

Clemans View Park (Naches). . . .$442,000

Coastal Community Action Program Service Ctr (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Communications Tower (Ocean Shores). . . .$77,000

Community Action Resource and Training Center (Omak). . . .$400,000

Community Multi-Use Center (Carnation). . . .$1,030,000

Cornforth Campbell Demolition & Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$330,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$846,000

Coulon North Water Walk Repair and Enhancement

(Renton). . . .$1,339,000

Coupeville Boys & Girls Club (Coupeville). . . .$1,030,000

Cow Skull Creek and Rushingwater Creek Acclimation Ponds

(Orting). . . .$690,000

Craft Beverage Lab & Instrumentation (Tumwater). . . .$773,000

Cross Park Trail and Picnic Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

CSML Food Bank Facility (Moses Lake). . . .$1,900,000

Cultural Anchor Village (Tukwila). . . .$1,500,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$85,000

Dawson Place Facilities (Everett). . . .$258,000

Day/Night House Exhibit Rebuild - Design Phase

(Seattle). . . .$300,000

Daybreak Star Indian Cultural Center (Seattle). . . .$2,600,000

Delridge Wetland Park (Seattle). . . .$244,000

Des Moines North Marina Bulkhead Replacement Ph II

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Doris Morrison Learning Center (Greenacres). . . .$1,030,000

Downtown Puyallup Redevelopment Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Downtown Revitalization (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Duffy's Pond Pathway Completion (Kennewick). . . .$38,000

Early Learning Facility Project for Licensed Childcare

(Hoquiam). . . .$721,000

East County Family Resource Center Renovation

(Washougal). . . .$721,000

Edmonds Marsh Restoration (Edmonds). . . .$258,000

Edmonds Waterfront Center (Edmonds). . . .$250,000

Ejido Farm Project (Everson). . . .$200,000

Ellensburg Masonic Temple (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,500,000

Ephrata Rec Center Upgrade (Ephrata). . . .$621,000

Esther's Home (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Extruded Curb Improvements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

Family Engagement Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Felts Field Gateway Project (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Ferry County Airport Runway Lighting System (Republic). . . .$450,000

Flag Plaza Redevelopment (Kennewick). . . .$46,000

FOE Meeting and Dance Hall (Puyallup). . . .$77,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$1,236,000

Franklin Pierce Farm Agricultural Resource Center

(Tacoma). . . .$3,900,000

Frontier Park - Goat Barn Roof (Graham). . . .$89,000

Frontier Park-Horse Arena Cover (Graham). . . .$1,811,000

Garfield Pool Upgrade (Garfield). . . .$500,000

Gas Station Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Gold Mountain Communications Zone - Upgraded Telecomm

(Bremerton). . . .$835,000

Granger Historical Society Museum (Granger). . . .$300,000

Green Lake Community Boathouse (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Grounds Improvement Proposal (Ritzville). . . .$150,000

Health Care Kiosk Deployment (Federal Way). . . .$75,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Infrastructure Predesign

(Chelan). . . .$150,000

Immigrant and Refugee Community Hub (Tukwila). . . .$960,000

Island County Criminal Justice Renovation (Coupeville). . . .$600,000

IT3 Discovery Center (Ridgefield). . . .$1,350,000

Japanese Gulch Daylighting (Mukilteo). . . .$206,000

Jim Kaemingk Sr. Trail (Lynden). . . .$200,000

Joya Child & Family Development Center (Spokane). . . .$1,200,000

JV Memorial Pool Roof (Oak Harbor). . . .$250,000

Kitsap Lake Park Renovation & Accessibility (Bremerton). . . .$258,000

Kittitas Valley Healthcare Laboratory Services Reno

(Ellensburg). . . .$397,000

La Center City Hall Improvements (La Center). . . .$1,236,000

Lake Lawrence Fire Station (Yelm). . . .$515,000

Lake Sacajawea Renovation Project (Longview). . . .$900,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase 3 (Lake Stevens). . . .$2,100,000

Lakefront Property Acquisition (Lake Forest Park). . . .$432,000

LASA Client Services Center (Lakewood). . . .$515,000

Leavenworth Ski Hill ADA Restroom (Leavenworth). . . .$52,000

Lewis County Public Safety Radio Infrastructure

(Chehalis). . . .$129,000

Lewis County Youth Services Renovation and Addition

(Chehalis). . . .$824,000

LGBTQ-Affirming Senior Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Links to Opportunity (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

Little League Field Improvement (Federal Way). . . .$200,000

Longview Hospice Care Center Renovation (Longview). . . .$765,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$245,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$500,000

Maddie's Place (Spokane). . . .$644,000

Madrona Day Treatment School (Bremerton). . . .$321,000

Magnuson Park Hangar 2 (Seattle). . . .$1,130,000

Main Street Phase 2 (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$1,200,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$1,670,000

Martin Luther King Center Improvements (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Mary's Place Shelter Renovation (Burien). . . .$352,000

Marysville Trail Connector (Marysville). . . .$515,000

Mason County Veterans Memorial Hall Refurbishment

(Shelton). . . .$62,000

McKinney Center Renovations (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Meadowglen Community Park (Spokane). . . .$77,000

Medical Examiner's Facility Upgrades (Spokane). . . .$600,000

Miller Park (Yakima). . . .$642,000

MLK Community Center Roof Replacement (Spokane). . . .$1,380,000

Moses Lake Business Incubator (Moses Lake). . . .$1,313,000

Mountain Rescue Center (North Bend). . . .$222,000

Nelson Dam Removal Project (Naches). . . .$1,325,000

New Ground Kirkland (Kirkland). . . .$258,000

Next Chapter Morgan Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$16,000

NJROTC/NNDCC Program Peninsula School District

(Gig Harbor). . . .$170,000

North Bend Depot Rehab (North Bend). . . .$151,000

North Clear Zone Land Acquisition (Lakewood). . . .$1,400,000

North Creek Trail (Bothell). . . .$618,000

North Seattle Boys & Girls Club Safety Upgrades

(Seattle). . . .$361,000

Northwest Kidney Centers Clinic (Port Angeles). . . .$900,000

Ocean Beach Medical Group - Ilwaco Clinic (Ilwaco). . . .$309,000

Panther Lake Community Park (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Patterson Park Preservation & Upgrade (Republic). . . .$300,000

Pedestrian Overcrossing Replacement (Kalama). . . .$2,250,000

Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$1,698,000

Perry Technical Institute Auditorium Renovation

(Yakima). . . .$1,550,000

Peter Kirk Community Center Roof and Retrofitted Emerg

(Kirkland). . . .$773,000

Phase 1 Master Plan - COVID Mitigation (Lake Stevens). . . .$103,000

Phase 1 of Trails Plan Improvements (Issaquah). . . .$251,000

Planning & Upgrades Edmonds Boys & Girls Club (Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Point Hudson Breakwater (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Police Station Renovations - City of Duvall (Duvall). . . .$107,000

Port of Olympia Marine Center (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Port of Vancouver Waterfront T1 Building Demo/Deconst

(Vancouver). . . .$1,000,000

Port Susan Trail (Stanwood). . . .$742,000

Port Townsend Affordable Housing Development

(Port Townsend). . . .$1,400,000

Proclaim Liberty Affordable Housing (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

Project Chairlift: Lifting Up Washington ((State Chair

1)) (Mead). . . .$750,000

Pts of Ilwaco/Chinook Nav Infrastructure

(Ilwaco & Chinook). . . .$634,000

Public Pavilion for Shoreline Park (Shoreline). . . .$361,000

Puyallup Recreation Center (Puyallup). . . .$1,030,000

Puyallup Valley Cultural Heritage Center (Puyallup). . . .$335,000

Rainier View Covered Court (Sumner). . . .$245,000

Ramstead Regional Park (Everson). . . .$1,500,000

Redmond Senior and Community Center (Redmond). . . .$1,250,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$900,000

Replacement Hospice House (Richland). . . .$900,000

Resource Center Planning (Pasco). . . .$250,000

Ridgefield I-5 Pedestrian Screen (Ridgefield). . . .$335,000

Ridgefield YMCA (Ridgefield). . . .$258,000

Ridgetop DNR Trust Land Purchase (Silverdale). . . .$2,050,000

Ritzville Downtown Improvements (Ritzville). . . .$105,000

Sargent Oyster House Restoration (Allyn). . . .$344,000

School Based Health Care Clinic (Tacoma). . . .$750,000

SE 168th St. Bike Lanes/Safe Crossings (Renton). . . .$500,000

Seattle Aquarium Expansion (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Kraken Multisport Courts (Seattle). . . .$103,000

Selah-Moxee Irrigation District (Moxee). . . .$300,000

Seminary Hill Natural and Heritage Trail Project

(Centralia). . . .$52,000

Sheffield Trail (Fife). . . .$1,030,000

Shipley Senior Center (Sequim). . . .$463,000

Shoreline Parks Restrooms (Shoreline). . . .$412,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Seattle). . . .$309,000

Silver Crest Park (Mill Creek). . . .$90,000

Skabob House Cultural Center Art Studio (Skokomish). . . .$500,000

Skagit County Morgue (Mount Vernon). . . .$139,000

Sky Valley Teen Center (Sultan). . . .$773,000

Snohomish County Food and Farming Center (Everett). . . .$2,550,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activity Center (North Bend). . . .$361,000

Soap Lake City Hall Reactivation (Soap Lake). . . .$157,000

SoCo Park (Covington). . . .$1,300,000

South Bend School Multi-Use Field Upgrades (South Bend). . . .$361,000

South Kitsap Community Events Center (Port Orchard). . . .$1,236,000

South Kitsap HS Phys Ed Support (Port Orchard). . . .$15,000

Southwest Washington Grain Project (Chehalis). . . .$1,750,000

Spokane Public Radio (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Spokane Valley Boys & Girls Club (Spokane Valley). . . .$1,030,000

Spokane Valley Fairgrounds Exhibition Center

(Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000

Sprinker Recreation Center Outdoor Improvements

(Tacoma). . . .$400,000

Squire's Landing Park Waterfront & Open Space Access Pr

(Kenmore). . . .$927,000

Steilacoom Tribal Cultural Center (Steilacoom). . . .$814,000

Stonehenge Memorial Public Restroom Project (Maryhill). . . .$129,000

Sultan Basin Park Design (Sultan). . . .$26,000

Sumas Sidewalks and Trails (Sumas). . . .$75,000

Teaching & Commercial Kitchen (Kent). . . .$515,000

The Campaign for Wesley Des Moines (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

The Eli's Park Project (Seattle). . . .$900,000

The Ethiopian Village (Seattle). . . .$515,000

The Hilltop (Tacoma). . . .$1,545,000

The Landing (Redmond). . . .$258,000

The Millworks (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000

The Podium (Spokane). . . .$774,000

The Way Station (Bellingham). . . .$4,050,000

Therapeutic Play Spaces (Spokane). . . .$108,000

Tiny Homes (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Together Center (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000

Toppenish Junior Livestock Facility Planning (Toppenish). . . .$21,000

Trails End Community Meeting Space (Tumwater). . . .$155,000

Treatment Plant Remodel (Duvall). . . .$742,000

Turf Field Lighting (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Turning Pointe Youth Advocacy Addition (Shelton). . . .$82,000

Twisp Civic Center (Twisp). . . .$1,500,000

United Way of King County Building Restoration

(Seattle). . . .$566,000

University Heights Center Renovation (Seattle). . . .$595,000

Upper Kittitas County Medic One - Station 99 (Cle Elum). . . .$784,000

Vaughn Library Hall Restoration (Vaughn). . . .$103,000

Wards Lake Park Improvement Project (Lakewood). . . .$258,000

Water Efficiency Improvements (Royal City). . . .$193,000

Wenas Creek Screening, Passage Engineering Design

(Selah). . . .$150,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$1,881,000

Whatcom County Integrated Public Safety Radio System

(Bellingham). . . .$400,000

Woodland Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$600,000

Yakima County Fire Communications Radio Repeaters

(Yakima). . . .$103,000

Yakima Valley Fair (Grandview). . . .$235,000

Yelm Senior Center Repairs (Yelm). . . .$36,000

Youth Resource Center (Federal Way). . . .$82,000

(b) The funding for the Magnuson Park Historic Hanger 2 (Seattle) project is contingent on the contribution of at least $6,000,000 for the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence. If the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence has not certified to the department of commerce that the project has secured at least $6,000,000 in total funding for the capital phase of the project by July 31, 2022, the funds in this subsection (8)(b) shall lapse. The lapse date of July 31, 2022, must be extended to the same extent that the city of Seattle grants an extension, if any, beyond that date for the same project, provided that no further extension may be granted past July 31, 2023. The Magnuson Park Center For Excellence must ensure that the long-term lease with Seattle Parks and Recreation stipulates meaningful public benefits that prioritize low-income, black, indigenous, and people of color youth and families of the Magnuson park and neighborhood and Northeast Seattle. The lease must include provisions to proactively recruit and provide no-cost access to the residents as well as the creation of a scholarship fund dedicated to the residents for the center's events and programming. Additional public benefits to improve accessibility for Magnuson Park residents must be considered in the lease negotiations.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$160,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants Authority (40000246)

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Rural Broadband (40000250)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Broadband (40000251)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Rapid Capital Housing (40000260)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $289,528,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to organizations eligible to receive assistance under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire or rent real property for a rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Amounts provided in this section may also be used for renovation and building update costs associated with establishment of the acquired or rented facilities. For youth housing and shelter projects, renovation of existing properties is an allowable activity. The department may only approve funding for projects resulting in increased shelter or housing capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service. New construction that fits the federal funding timeline is an eligible activity. Funds must be reasonably allocated to each of the health care authority 10 regional service areas, with at least one project in each area. Of the amounts in this section:

(a) $252,028,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing projects that will rapidly move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness from unsanctioned encampments, the public right-of-way, or public spaces into safe and habitable spaces, including, but not limited to, permanent housing, tiny homes, hotels, enhanced emergency shelters, or other rapid housing alternatives and permanent supportive housing and case management services to persons with chronic mental illness. New construction of high-quality low-income housing projects that are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing, and that fits the federal funding timeline is an eligible activity.

(b) $37,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing projects in rural areas as defined by the department under RCW 43.185.050 and underserved communities with the goal of maximizing the investment and increasing the number of supportive housing units in rural, underserved communities.

(2) $172,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for Building Transitional Tiny Homes for the Homeless (Seattle).

(3) $300,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract and work with a professional real estate broker to identify opportunities for rapid acquisition or conversion of properties.

(4) Amounts appropriated under this section may also be used for permanent financing for real estate acquired using other short-term acquisition sources. To expand availability of permanent housing, financing of acquisition of unoccupied multifamily housing is a priority.

(5) The department must provide a progress report on its website by December 30, 2023. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, housing units, and anticipated completion date.

(6) The funding provided under this section is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(7) The department shall prioritize proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department. For purposes of this subsection (6), "greatest public benefit" must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The rapid transition of people encamped on the public rights-of-way to transitional and more permanent housing solutions;

(b) The greatest number of accommodations or increased shelter capacity that will benefit extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, and youth experiencing homelessness;

(c) Whether the project has local funding commitments and rental assistance;

(d) The scarcity of the affordable housing or shelter capacity applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units or shelter capacity in the same geographic location; and

(e) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(8) The department must ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. All expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section must be incurred by December 31, 2024.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$290,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$290,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000261)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $71,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for the production and preservation of affordable housing units that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness, people with developmental disabilities, farmworkers, people who are experiencing homelessness, people in need of permanent supportive housing, class members of Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., and first-time home buyers. The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of these funds to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(a) $50,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for affordable housing production, which must include the following list of projects:

Sno Valley Senior Housing (Carnation). . . .$309,000

Boat Street (Lakewood). . . .$464,000

Mary's Place Burien Project Shelter

Replacement (Burien). . . .$3,000,000

Skyway Affordable Housing and Early Learning (Skyway). . . .$500,000

Highland Village Phase 2 (Airway Heights). . . .$3,000,000

FFC Homes XXINC (Blaine). . . .$381,000

Oxford Housing Program (Lacey). . . .$515,000

YouthCare Workforce Development Center (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

(b) $21,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for affordable housing preservation projects, which must include:

(i) $2,500,000 for Squire Park Plaza Affordable Housing Preservation (Seattle); and

(ii) $309,000 for South Park Riverside Affordable Housing Preservation (Seattle).

(2) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects under this section during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium "first-time home buyer" also includes:

(a) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(b) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and who has only owned a home with a spouse;

(c) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable rules and regulations; and

(d) An individual who has only owned a property that was considered by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(3) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(4) The department must ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. All expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section must be incurred by December 31, 2024.

(5) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following reporting requirements:

(a) By June 30, 2023, the department must report on its website the following: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to 80 percent of the area median income, up to 50 percent of the area median income, and up to 30 percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(b) The department must continue to provide the fiscal committees of legislature and the office of financial management with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. The cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$71,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Habitat for Humanity Affordable Housing (92001299)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $11,850,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $12,500,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with Habitat for Humanity for the production of affordable housing units that serve and benefit low-income persons and families throughout the state.

(2) $650,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Yakima Valley Partners Habitat for Humanity.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,500,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$12,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to expand and establish new capacity for 23-hour crisis triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities with capacity up to 16 beds, and youth residential crisis triage and stabilization facilities, that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease. Eligible grantees are limited to nonprofit or for-profit businesses, public entities, and tribes, that are also community hospitals or other community-based behavioral health providers. Facilities of less than 16 beds are permitted, but the department shall consider, as a factor in awards, the economies of scale created by facilities with higher numbers of beds and the operational costs and funding sources available to the applicant.

(b) The department shall work with the department of health, health care authority, and other relevant agencies to ascertain the areas of Washington with the most acute behavioral health crisis needs using emergency department data and other data available and shall ensure that these areas receive grants to help facilitate placement and construction of facilities in an expeditious manner.

(c) The department shall ensure that there is equitable distribution of these projects across the state, relative to need, and shall work affirmatively with all behavioral health administrative services organizations regions, with the goal that all areas of the state are adequately served.

(2) Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased crisis triage and stabilization capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(3) $12,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants for at least two residential crisis triage and stabilization facilities for youth. These facilities must increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, depression, suicidality, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors.

(4)(a) $12,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the King County Crisis Walk-In/Stabilization; and

(b) $12,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Lynnwood Community Recovery Center (Lynnwood).

(5) The department must provide a progress report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 30, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date.

(6) The department must ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. All expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section must be incurred by December 31, 2024.

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$86,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$86,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation provided in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

57th Avenue Sewer Project (University Place). . . .$100,000

Accessibility and Upgrades for WHO (Vancouver). . . .$283,000

Anacortes Family Center (Anacortes). . . .$50,000

Ballard Boys & Girls Club Teen Ctr Remodel &

Expansion (Seattle). . . .$241,000

Black Diamond Community Skatepark (Black Diamond). . . .$85,000

Burton Water Company Cooperative Conversion (Vashon). . . .$26,000

Children's Therapy Center (Tacoma). . . .$225,000

City of Yelm Dog Park (Yelm). . . .$50,000

Columbia Basin Dive Rescue's New Boat (Richland). . . .$270,000

Community Boating Center for All - Magnuson Park

(Seattle). . . .$77,000

Darrington Wood Innovation Center (Darrington). . . .$1,500,000

Des Moines 223rd Green Street Planning (Des Moines). . . .$309,000

East Blaine Water Pump Station (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Edmonds Boys & Girls Club Feasibility Study (Edmonds). . . .$206,000

Electrical & Safety Upgrades at N Seattle Boys &

Girls (Seattle). . . .$304,000

Eli's Park Project (Seattle). . . .$140,000

Felts Field Gateway Project (Spokane). . . .$200,000

Fircrest Campus Master Plan (Shoreline). . . .$300,000

Flooring Replacement Kirkland Boys & Girls Club

(Kirkland). . . .$53,000

Frontier Park Goat Barns (Graham). . . .$70,000

GH Senior Center Office/Education Container

(Gig Harbor). . . .$60,000

Granger Historical Society New Museum Project

(Granger). . . .$100,000

Handicap Accessibility and Education Support

(Waitsburg). . . .$41,000

Harper Estuary Restoration and Bridge Construction

(Port Orchard). . . .$100,000

Historic Neptune Theatre HVAC Upgrade (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Historic Paramount Theatre HVAC Upgrade (Seattle). . . .$198,000

HVAC Upgrade with New System and Heat Pumps

(Shelton). . . .$250,000

Illahee Preserve 'Homestead, Ph 1' Acquisition

(Bremerton). . . .$150,000

Interfaith Family Shelter Building Acquisition

(Everett). . . .$300,000

Island County Jail Intake Body Sensor (Coupeville). . . .$200,000

Jim Kaemingk Sr. Trail Missing Link (Lynden). . . .$300,000

Kiwanis Park Playground Accessibility Upgrades

(Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Lake Boren Park Fishing Dock and Viewing

Platform (Newcastle). . . .$62,000

Lake Wilderness Lodge Emergency Generator

(Maple Valley). . . .$215,000

Lewis County Regional Tennis and Wrestling

Facility (Chehalis). . . .$300,000

Library Commons Project (Mount Vernon). . . .$4,000,000

Logistics Facility (Vancouver). . . .$160,000

Luther Burbank Pk Waterfront Activity Center

(Mercer Island). . . .$85,000

Mukai's Fruit Barreling Plant (Vashon). . . .$50,000

Naches Rearing Pond (Naches). . . .$50,000

Newman Lake Milfoil Wash Station (Newman Lake). . . .$100,000

Nondestructive Weld Testing (Sunnyside). . . .$30,000

North Creek Trail (Bothell). . . .$300,000

Northwest Kidney Centers - Port Angeles Clinic

(Port Angeles). . . .$235,000

ODMF Multicultural Village (Kent). . . .$50,000

Pedestrian Boardwalk May Creek Trail (Renton). . . .$258,000

Pipe Lake Water Quality Improvement Project

(Covington). . . .$319,000

Planning Land Acquisition for Veteran Rites (Tacoma). . . .$46,000

Port Gamble Forest Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$300,000

Port Marine Transportation Infrastructure

(Friday Harbor). . . .$258,000

Port of Mattawa Event Center (Mattawa). . . .$125,000

Public Electric Vehicle Infrastructure (Lacey). . . .$103,000

Pump Station Modernization: Design and Permitting

(Mount Vernon). . . .$100,000

Puyallup Elks 1450 Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$300,000

Rejuvenation Community Day Center & Shower/Laundry

(Bremerton). . . .$250,000

Rimrock Grange Renovation (Washtucna). . . .$105,000

Rotary Morrow Community Park (Poulsbo). . . .$50,000

SE 41st Street Project (Washougal). . . .$300,000

Serving the Community Through Capital Improvements

(Walla Walla). . . .$259,000

Skokomish Water Line Extension (Skokomish). . . .$50,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,100,000

Snohomish Teen Center Addition (Snohomish). . . .$300,000

South Area Commercial Sewer Infrastructure Ext.

(Airway Heights). . . .$300,000

South King County Business Hub (Tukwila). . . .$300,000

South Sound Innovation and Education Center

(Federal Way). . . .$300,000

Steilacoom Electrical Charging Station Project

(Steilacoom). . . .$50,000

The Tacoma Recovery Cafe Site Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$400,000

Titlow Park Hidden Beach Bridge Replacement (Tacoma). . . .$50,000

Toppenish Hospital (Toppenish). . . .$2,000,000

Town Center to Burke-Gilman Trail Connector

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$103,000

Town of Naches Mobile Stage (Naches). . . .$250,000

Transitions (Spokane). . . .$103,000

Tubman Health Clinic (Seattle). . . .$4,500,000

VOA Veteran Transitional Housing Energy Efficiency

(Spokane). . . .$195,000

WA Soldiers Home Cemetery Road Pavement Project

(Orting). . . .$180,000

Wastewater Lift Stations Improvements/Upgrades

(Concrete). . . .$300,000

Weld Collaborative Reintegration Resource (Seattle). . . .$775,000

Wenatchee City Pool Repairs (Wenatchee). . . .$300,000

Western Pond Turtle Recovery - Nest Hill (Lakewood). . . .$100,000

Westport Marina Gear Yard (Westport). . . .$300,000

Whelan Community Building (Pullman). . . .$153,000

White Center Food Bank Grow2Give Relocation

(Seattle). . . .$200,000

Wilkeson Water Treatment System (Wilkeson). . . .$300,000

Willows Road Pedestrian Safety Connection

(Kirkland). . . .$206,000

Yakima Canyon Interpretive Center (Ellensburg). . . .$150,000

Youth Achievement Center (Seattle). . . .$500,000

YVT Bucket Truck (Yakima). . . .$70,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ports Infrastructure (40000278)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to eligible public port authorities established under Title 53 RCW that handle more than $1,000,000,000 worth of marine cargo exports per year as reported by the United States census bureau for capital projects or asset preservation.

(2) $7,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Terminal and Warehouse Upgrades (Port of Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Pier 66 Shore Power (Port of Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Off Dock Container Yard (Port of Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

Sediment Dredging (Port of Clarkston). . . .$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,500,000

Sec. 1025. 2021 c 332 s 1048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Library Capital Improvement Program (91001239)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,000,000))

$6,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,838,000))

$6,559,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,838,000

Sec. 1026. 2021 c 332 s 1052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($31,088,000))

$31,045,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,088,000))

$32,045,000

Sec. 1027. 2021 c 332 s 1084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Food Banks (91001690)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

FISH Community Food Bank and Food Pantry

(Ellensburg). . . .$1,545,000

Gig Harbor Peninsula FISH New Facility

Construction (Gig Harbor). . . .$2,050,000

Hunger Solution Center Cold Storage Expansion

(Seattle). . . .$827,000

Issaquah Food Bank Expansion (Issaquah). . . .$1,030,000

La Center Community Center Repairs and

Improvements (La Center). . . .$515,000

Northwest Harvest (Yakima). . . .$3,200,000

Port Angeles Food Bank (Port Angeles). . . .$1,050,000

Puyallup Food Bank Capital Campaign (Puyallup). . . .$257,000

White Center Food Bank Relocation (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,304,000))

$11,504,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,304,000))

$11,504,000

Sec. 1028. 2021 c 332 s 1085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Infrastructure Projects (91001687)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund, all expenditures of amounts appropriated in this section must be incurred by December 31, 2024.

(9) ((The))$23,866,000 of the state building construction account—state and $88,384,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—state appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the following list of projects:

Airway Heights Water Resources Replacement (Airway

Heights). . . .$14,950,000

Anderson Road Project Design (Chelan). . . .$258,000

((Belfair Water Reclamation Facility (Belfair). . . .$500,000))

Boat Haven Stormwater Improvement (Port Townsend). . . .$2,050,000

Centralia School District - Gemini & LTE

(Centralia). . . .$1,529,000

Cheney Purple Pipe Project (Cheney). . . .$11,050,000

City of Fircrest Water Meter Replacement

(Fircrest). . . .$171,000

City of Ilwaco – Drinking Water Source Protection

(Ilwaco). . . .$721,000

Crusher Canyon Sewer Line (Selah). . . .$1,000,000

Dryden Wastewater Improvement Project (Dryden). . . .$1,030,000

Fall City Waste Management System (Fall City). . . .$6,500,000

Fry Creek Pump Station (Aberdeen). . . .$8,975,000

Index Phased Water Line Replacement (Index). . . .$1,351,000

Lacamas Lake Management Plan (Camas). . . .$155,000

Leach Creek Interceptor Extension (University

Place). . . .$2,100,000

Louis Thompson Road Tightline (Sammamish). . . .$3,000,000

Malaga Industrial Park Waterline Extension

(Malaga). . . .$1,545,000

((Malden USDA Water (Malden). . . .$247,000))

Mill Creek Flood Control Channel (Walla Walla). . . .$1,545,000

NE 92nd Avenue Pump Station & Force Main (Battle

Ground). . . .$2,050,000

New Well for the Community of Peshastin (Peshastin). . . .$1,100,000

Omak Water Reservoir (Omak). . . .$4,300,000

Othello Water Conservation System (Othello). . . .$515,000

Packwood Sewer System (Packwood). . . .$8,050,000

PFAS Treatment at City of DuPont Water Wells

(DuPont). . . .$5,950,000

Port Hadlock Wastewater Facility (Port Hadlock). . . .$20,175,000

Port of Mattawa Wastewater Infrastructure

(Mattawa). . . .$618,000

Reservoir No. 2, Water Supply & Distribution

(Bridgeport). . . .$3,200,000

Shelton: Well 1 Water Main (Shelton). . . .$2,050,000

Skamania County Well Installation (Stevenson). . . .$52,000

Vader Wastewater Treatment Plant Improvements

(Vader). . . .$1,850,000

Wallula Dodd Water System Ph2 (Wallula). . . .$2,050,000

Wanapum Indian Village Fiber infrastructure

Project (Mattawa). . . .$155,000

Water Main Infrastructure Extension Project

(George). . . .$155,000

WWTP Reclaimed Water (Shelton). . . .$2,050,000

(10) $747,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Belfair Water Reclamation Facility (Belfair). . . .$500,000

Malden USDA Water (Malden). . . .$247,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,866,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$747,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery

Account—Federal
. . . .
(($112,997,000))

$88,384,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$112,997,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,997,000

Sec. 1029. 2021 c 332 s 1086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to the statewide broadband office for qualifying broadband infrastructure projects.

(b) Unless otherwise stated, eligible applicants for grants awarded under subsections (2) and (3) of this section are:

(i) Local governments, including ports and public utility districts;

(ii) Federally recognized tribes;

(iii) Nonprofit organizations;

(iv) Nonprofit cooperative organizations; and

(v) Multiparty entities comprised of a combination of public entity members or private entity members. A multiparty entity cannot be solely comprised of private entities.

(c) Projects receiving grants under this section must:

(i) Demonstrate that the project site is under the applicant's control for a minimum of 25 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease; and

(ii) Commit to using the infrastructure funded by the grant for the purposes of providing broadband connectivity for a minimum of 25 years.

(d) Unless otherwise stated, priority must be given to projects:

(i) Located in unserved areas of the state, which for the purposes of this section means areas of Washington in which households and businesses lack access to broadband service of speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload;

(ii) Located in geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment of broadband infrastructure to achieve the state's broadband goals, as provided in RCW 43.330.536, identified with department and board mapping tools; or

(iii) That construct last mile infrastructure, as defined in RCW 43.330.530.

(e) Unless otherwise stated, appropriations may not be used for projects where a broadband provider currently provides, or has begun construction to provide, broadband service to end users in the proposed project area at speeds equal to or greater than the state speed goals provided in RCW 43.330.536.

(f) The appropriations must be used for projects that use a technology-neutral approach in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents.

(g)(i) The statewide broadband office must act as fiscal agent for the grants authorized in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(ii) No more than 1.5 percent of the funds appropriated for the program may be expended by the statewide broadband office for administration purposes.

(2)(a) $50,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the statewide broadband office to award as grants to eligible applicants as match funds to leverage federal broadband infrastructure program funding.

(b)(i) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "state broadband infrastructure funders" are the state broadband office, the public works board, and the community economic revitalization board.

(ii) The statewide broadband office must develop a project evaluation process to assist in coordination among state broadband infrastructure funders to maximize opportunities to leverage federal funding and ensure efficient state investment. The project evaluation process must help determine whether a project is a strong candidate for a known federal funding opportunity and if a project can be packaged as part of a regional or other coordinated federal grant proposal. The state broadband infrastructure funders are encouraged to enter into a memorandum of understanding outlining how coordination will take place so that the process can help with a coordinated funding strategy across these entities.

(3)(a) (($260,003,000))$157,385,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation ((and $16,000,000)), $118,360,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation, and $50,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to eligible applicants for qualifying broadband infrastructure projects.

(b)(i) Projects that receive grant funding under this subsection (3) must be eligible for funds under section 9901 of the American rescue plan act.

(ii) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and coronavirus capital projects account, all expenditures of amounts appropriated in this subsection (3) must be incurred by December 31, 2024.

(c)(i) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this subsection is provided for broadband equity and affordability grants.

(ii) Grants must be provided to eligible applicants located in areas:

(A) With existing broadband service with speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload; and

(B) Where the state broadband office, in consultation with the department of equity, determine that access to existing broadband service is not affordable or equitable.

(iii) Eligible applicants for grants awarded under this subsection (3)(c) are:

(A) Local governments, including ports and public utility districts;

(B) Federally recognized tribes;

(C) Public school districts;

(D) Nonprofit organizations; and

(E) Multiparty entities comprised of public entity members to fund broadband deployment.

(d) $258,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))state building construction account—state appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the Precision Agriculture and Broadband pilot project.

(4) By January 30, 2022, and January 30, 2023, the statewide broadband office must develop and submit a report regarding the grants established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of projects approved for grant funding in the preceding fiscal year;

(c) The total amount of grant funding that was disbursed during the preceding fiscal year;

(d) The total amount of funds obligated and timing of when the funds were obligated in the preceding fiscal year; and

(e) For projects funded in the prior biennium, the outcomes achieved by the approved projects.

(5) For eligible applicants providing service outside of their jurisdictional boundary, no more than three percent of the award amount may be expended for administration purposes.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$50,258,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery

Account—Federal
. . . .
(($260,003,000))

$157,385,000

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
(($16,000,000))

$118,360,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$326,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$326,003,000

Sec. 1030. 2021 c 332 s 1087 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Community Relief (92000957)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($500,000))$300,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Communities of Concern Commission for development of a list of community-led capital projects that serve underserved communities. Eligible expenses include costs incurred by the Communities of Concern Commission in conducting outreach, developing an application process, providing technical assistance, assisting project proponents with project readiness, and assisting the department with identifying barriers faced in accessing capital grant programs. The department must present the list prepared by the Communities of Concern Commission to the fiscal committees of the legislature for consideration for funding in the 2022 supplemental capital budget with the list of identified projects. (($2,500,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) shall remain in unallotted status for purposes of legislative review of the joint list prepared by the Communities of Concern Commission and the department until the legislature appropriates funds for these projects in the budget process. The legislature retains the right to review and consider all such funding as it does with other requests for project funding.))Following the development and submission of the list of community-led capital projects, the Communities of Concern Commission, in consultation with the department, may use up to $250,000 of the appropriation in this section to fund predevelopment designs leading to the development of community-led capital projects that serve underserved communities. The intent of the legislature is to only provide funding in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in order to inform the department's comprehensive equity review required in the operating budget and allow the opportunity for the department to implement the steps necessary to improve equitable delivery of all of their capital grant programs. The department must submit an interim report to the legislature by December 31, 2021, on the barriers identified and lessons learned through projects identified through this section and in section 1093 of this act and the connection to the equity review required in the operating budget.

(2)(a) ((The))$2,500,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the following list of Communities of Concern Commission projects:

Community to Community, Ejidos Cooperative Farm

(Everson). . . .$250,000

Foundation for Homeless & Poverty Management, Community

Rejuvenation Center (Bremerton). . . .$1,200,000

Northwest Native Canoe Center (Seattle). . . .$800,000

FAME/Equity Alliance Washington, FAME Plaza (Seattle). . . .$25,000

Lummi Stepping Stones/Lhaq'temish Foundation, Eagle

Haven Cottage Village (Bellingham). . . .$225,000

(b) $11,950,000 of the appropriations((is))are provided solely for the following list of projects:

?al?al (means "Home" in Lushootseed) (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Asberry Historic Home Site Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$919,000

Be'er Sheva Park Improvements and Shoreline Restoration

(Seattle). . . .$500,000

Cham Community Center (CCC) (Seattle). . . .$515,000

((Communities of Concern Commission (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000))

Elevate Youngstown Capital Project (Seattle). . . .$515,000

Feast Collective Capital Request (Spokane). . . .$103,000

Feeding Change Campaign (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Khmer Community Center & Cultural Hub (Seattle). . . .$309,000

Martin Luther King Jr. Park Community Pool

(Yakima). . . .. . . .$1,000,000

Neighborhood House Early Learning Facilities (Seattle). . . .$2,050,000

North Seattle Social Services Hub (Seattle). . . .$300,000

Shiloh Baptist Housing Development Project (Tacoma). . . .$2,100,000

Skyway Resource Center Renovation Project (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Wadajir Residences & Souq (Tukwila). . . .$1,339,000

(b) For the Asberry Historic Home Site Acquisition, the department must work with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and the grantee to develop a historic preservation easement. The easement must be held through the department of archaeology and historic preservation and must be placed on the title in perpetuity.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($13,150,000))

$14,150,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$500,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,650,000))

$14,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($13,650,000))

$14,950,000

Sec. 1031. 2021 c 332 s 1092 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Work, Education, Health Monitoring Projects (91001686)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) $926,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Camp Waskowitz Restrooms (North Bend). . . .$250,000

Mary's Place Burien Shelter COVID Updates

(Seattle). . . .$550,000

Nordic Heritage Museum HVAC Renovation (Seattle). . . .$26,000

Sherwood COVID Mitigation (Lake Stevens). . . .$100,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$926,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$926,000

Sec. 1032. 2021 c 332 s 1094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning COVID-19 Renovation Grants (91001681)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,500,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund to provide grants to early learning facilities for emergency renovation and remodeling changes in response to the public health emergency with respect to the coronavirus disease.

(2) The grants may not be used for operating expenditures, but must be used for capital needs to:

(a) Support increased social distancing requirements;

(b) Support increased health and safety measures;

(c) Provide increased outdoor space; or

(d) Increase or preserve early learning slots within a facility or community.

(3) Grant recipients must meet the requirements in RCW 43.31.575.

(4) Up to four percent of the funding in this appropriation may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$8,500,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (92001277)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $6,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 15-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) $752,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for a competitive process to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health community services.

(6) $9,248,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Evergreen Health Monroe (Monroe). . . .$4,275,000

Red Road Clean and Sobering House (Renton). . . .$773,000

Evergreen Recovery Centers Residential Treatment

(Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Seattle Clinic at Evergreen Treatment (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Center (Kennewick). . . .$1,500,000

NE Spokane Community Behavioral Health Center

(Spokane). . . .$700,000

(7) $6,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for Cascade Hall (Seattle).

(8) The department must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(9) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(10) The department must provide a progress report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 30, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$6,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Dental Capacity Grants (92001175)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding in this section is provided solely for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities that provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increased efficiency in dental access. Projects funded in this section must maintain dental services for a period of at least 10 years.

(2) $4,963,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Community Health Care (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Family Health Center (Omak). . . .$2,500,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Bremerton). . . .$463,000

Yakima Valley Farmworkers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$500,000

(3) $300,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the NEW Health CHC Dental Capital Expansion (Newport).

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,963,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,263,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Early Learning Facilities (92001174)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,227,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for early learning facility grants to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for an early learning facility grant.

(2) $1,773,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Early Learning Classrooms at Logan Elementary

(Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Laurel Forest Childcare Center (Bellingham). . . .$773,000

(3) $4,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for Rainier Valley Early Learning Center (Seattle).

(4) The department shall, in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families, prepare a report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the geographical diversity of early learning facilities grants. The report must be submitted by December 1, 2022, and must provide the following information:

(a) Geographical disbursement of school district early learning grants, early learning grants to eligible organizations, and early learning grants provided by a nongovernmental private-public partnership contracted by the department, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections childcare program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant;

(b) Disbursement of early learning grants to providers in rural and nonrural counties, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections childcare program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant; and

(c) Disbursement of early learning grants to providers by type of provider, including school district, childcare center, licensed family home, or other, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$27,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$31,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Inflation and Contingency (92001176)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,109,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for inflationary cost increases of materials for the 2022 Local and Community Projects (40000230), 2021-23 Community Relief Projects (92000957), and the 2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266).

(2) $1,891,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

GenPride LGBTQ+ Senior Community Center (Seattle). . . .$530,000

Kitsap Humane Society Veterinary Lifesaving

Center (Silverdale) . . . .$258,000

Marina View Building Renovation (Olympia). . . .$103,000

Point Hudson Breakwater Project (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Broadband Office (92001178)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $55,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $15,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants awarded for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) and the state share of the nonfederal match. If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$55,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Program (92001179)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,869,000 of the energy efficiency revolving loan capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded for the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization program in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Capital

Account—State
. . . .
$1,869,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,869,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

State Energy Program (92001180)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $9,343,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded for the state energy program grant in section 40109 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$9,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,343,000

Sec. 1040. 2021 c 332 s 1089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Child Care Minor Renovation Grants (92001109)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(($10,000,000))$28,522,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to childcare providers for minor renovations and small capital purchases and projects. The grants are intended to support childcare providers so that they may maintain operations or expand operations during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(1) The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to conduct outreach to licensed family homes to ensure they are made aware of the grant opportunity.

(2) The department shall give priority to projects that make minor renovations without adding capacity and are therefore ineligible for the early learning facilities program.

(3) All grants provided in this section must be awarded by September 30, ((2022))2023.

(4) Of the amounts provided in this section, no more than four percent may be retained by the department for administrative purposes.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$28,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$28,522,000

Sec. 1041. 2021 c 332 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that no funding may be directed to the Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside) as this project is transitioning to Toppenish Hospital (Toppenish) pursuant to section 1023 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($42,896,000))

$40,896,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$87,441,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($130,337,000))

$128,337,000

Sec. 1042. 2021 c 332 s 1082 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Substance Use Disorder Recovery Housing (91001675)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for an agreement with Catholic Community Services/Catholic Housing Services to fund a master planning process for the development of a family-centered drug treatment and housing program in western Washington that supports families staying together while they recover from addiction and rebuild their lives. Housing developers, service providers, and other stakeholders must be included in this master planning process.

(2) The master planning process under this section must model the project to be developed after Rising Strong in Spokane and must include units for families that are experiencing substance use disorder and that are involved in the child welfare system. The site must include living quarters for families, space for services, play areas for children, and space for child care. The program services located at the site must include, but are not limited to, case management, counseling, substance use disorder treatment, and parenting skills classes. The site must be located in King County, or located near King county, to provide services to families in the western area of the state.

(3) Phase two of the planning process must: Further define the community needs; work with the department, the health care authority, and the department of children, youth, and families in identifying a sponsoring agency or organization and service partners; make preferred site recommendations; determine the project budget and establish the model and sources for funding the program located in the facility, including the conditions for sustainable funding; and include additional components identified by Catholic Community Services/Catholic Housing Services or its consultants needed to prepare for a 2023-2025 biennium capital construction request. The master plan developed under this section must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, ((2021))2022.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

Sec. 1043. 2021 c 332 s 1095 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with Cowlitz county to acquire land and rights of way along the Cowlitz river for the United States army corps of engineers to dredge. The land is necessary for dredged material deposit sites for the Mt. St. Helen's flood protection project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

Sec. 1044. 2021 c 332 s 1096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to cover staffing and support costs of the facilities oversight team.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,769,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,440,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,819,000

Sec. 1045. 2021 c 332 s 1097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to cover staffing and support costs of the capital budget team.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$1,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,260,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Inflation and Contingency Fund (92001124)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for inflationary cost increases of materials for state agency projects funded in an omnibus capital appropriations act that are currently active in the construction phase. Projects in the design phase are not eligible and must submit a budget decision package for the 2023 legislative session. The office of financial management shall allocate funds based on project necessity.

(b) $10,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for the construction costs of the University of Washington behavioral health hospital due to materials inflation and delay.

(2) To be eligible for funds from this inflation and contingency fund, a request letter signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include:

(a) A statement describing the unexpected costs;

(b) The ways the agency has already mitigated project costs; and

(c) The identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.

(3) For requests during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting these funds from the office of financial management.

(4) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the fiscal committees of the legislature as inflation and contingency funds are approved, including the approved funding level by fund type, and a copy of all the materials submitted in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) The office of financial management must report quarterly, beginning October 1, 2022, on the funding approved by agency, by project number, and type of funds authorized, to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$29,513,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$39,513,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,513,000

Sec. 1047. 2021 c 332 s 1104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,416,000))

$2,983,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,586,000))

$3,153,000

Sec. 1048. 2021 c 332 s 1114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Temple of Justice HVAC, Lighting & Water Systems (92000040)

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) To assist in funding this project, the department must work with the office of financial management to access federal funding for the total project cost.

(b) If the agency receives more than $26,000,000 in federal funds, an amount of the state building construction account—state appropriation equal to the additional federal funds must be placed in unallotted status.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "additional federal funds" means the difference between the total amount of federal funds received under (a) of this subsection and $26,000,000.

(2) The department must:

(a) Submit the final predesign to the office of financial management by June 1, 2021;

(b) Submit the final energy services proposal to the senate ways and means committee and the house capital budget committee prior to the department starting the design phase; and

(c) Start design by August 31, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$30,000,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$26,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$47,887,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,952,000

Sec. 1050. 2021 c 332 s 1120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Snohomish Readiness Center (30000930)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($3,562,000))

$4,349,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,188,000))

$1,566,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,750,000))

$5,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,750,000))

$5,915,000

Sec. 1051. 2021 c 332 s 1121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Anacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,551,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,551,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($75,000))

$74,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($7,252,000))

$7,251,000

Sec. 1052. 2021 c 332 s 1123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2019-21 Biennium (40000037)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,200,000))

$2,243,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$109,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($22,309,000))

$22,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($691,000))

$648,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,000,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000014)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$735,000

Sec. 2002. 2021 c 332 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
(($425,000))

$612,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
(($425,000))

$612,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($850,000))

$1,224,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,084,000))

$2,710,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

Sec. 2003. 2021 c 332 s 2006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,358,000))

$2,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($27,832,000))

$27,749,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,190,000

Sec. 2004. 2021 c 332 s 2012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign the intermediate care facility of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention. It is also the intent of the legislature to concentrate the footprint of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center on the northern portion of the property. As a result, $7,750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for design of a 120-bed nursing facility.

(2) $2,243,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to relocate the adult training program to a different location on the Fircrest Rehabilitation Center campus. The department must consider the proposal to redesign the facility as a short-term crisis stabilization and intervention when devising options for relocation of the adult training program and submit a report of these options to the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(3) The department must seek input from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including the residents at Fircrest and their families or guardians, in design of a nursing facility.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$58,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($242,000))

$184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,235,000

Sec. 2005. 2021 c 332 s 2014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,227,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,450,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,173,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,850,000

Sec. 2006. 2021 c 332 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,234,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$36,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,270,000))

$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Campus: HVAC Units Replacement (30003586)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

Sec. 2008. 2021 c 332 s 2046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000569)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to complete a comprehensive review and plan of the water system on the Fircrest campus.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,755,000))

$3,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$13,750,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,505,000))

$16,930,000

Sec. 2009. 2021 c 332 s 2047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000571)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,950,000))

$9,480,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,845,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,795,000))

$11,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($29,795,000))

$32,325,000

Sec. 2010. 2021 c 332 s 2048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Transitional Care Center-Main Building: Patient Rooms Cooling (40000574)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$2,335,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-ICF Cottages: HVAC and Water Heater Improvements (40000946)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: CMS Certification (40000948)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$440,000

Sec. 2013. 2021 c 332 s 2050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: Roofing Replacement (40000589)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,285,000))

$5,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,285,000))

$5,035,000

Sec. 2014. 2021 c 332 s 2062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($5,115,000))

$5,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$585,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,700,000))

$6,000,000

Sec. 2015. 2021 c 332 s 2063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$4,933,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$196,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$66,519,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,648,000

Sec. 2016. 2021 c 332 s 2065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2034, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($38,529,000))

$48,390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($69,609,000))

$69,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,138,000))

$118,000,000

Sec. 2017. 2021 c 332 s 2066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$1,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,858,000))

$3,538,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,858,000))

$5,000,000

Sec. 2018. 2021 c 332 s 2068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
(($31,000,000))

$33,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$1,303,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

Sec. 2019. 2021 c 332 s 2069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2068, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($750,000))

$1,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($21,000))

$120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($771,000))

$1,500,000

Sec. 2020. 2021 c 332 s 2071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

E-wing Remodel to a Molecular Laboratory (40000032)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$216,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,179,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,395,000

Sec. 2021. 2021 c 332 s 2072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Replace Air Handling Unit (AHU) in A/Q-wings (40000034)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,894,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,894,000

Sec. 2022. 2021 c 332 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
(($34,000,000))

$97,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($34,000,000))

$97,000,000

Sec. 2023. 2021 c 332 s 2076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Construction Loans - State Match (40000051)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of health must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$14,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$14,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2022 Small and Disadvantaged Communities DW (92000031)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Generator for New Central Boiler Plant (40000053)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Improve Critical Water Infrastructure (40000058)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$70,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2023 DWSRF Preconstruction Loans (40000059)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

Sec. 2028. 2021 c 332 s 2080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($250,000))

$441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($162,000))

$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($412,000))

$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Transitional Housing Capital Improvements (40000066)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,400,000

Sec. 2030. 2021 c 332 s 2082 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

DVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is granted federal expenditure authority in anticipation of the receipt of federal competitive grant funding for which it is eligible to apply under section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(2) Funding appropriated in this section must be used for projects in the following priority order:

(a) The WVH HVAC Retrofit project (40000006); and

(b) Minor works projects that meet the requirements set forth in section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(3) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section must be used as state match funds to leverage the federal funding described in subsection (1) of this section. Any amount that exceeds the level of state match funds required to maximize the federal funding opportunity must be placed in unallotted status.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$24,515,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,584,000))

$10,884,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,099,000))

$35,399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($33,099,000))

$35,399,000

Sec. 2031. 2021 c 332 s 2084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$9,174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,600,000))

$426,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,600,000

Sec. 2032. 2021 c 332 s 2085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$181,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,800,000))

$1,619,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,762,000

Sec. 2033. 2021 c 332 s 2086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000400)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,250,000))

$1,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$2,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,275,000

Sec. 2035. 2021 c 332 s 2095 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Support Building HVAC Replacement (40000379)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$4,646,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,646,000

Sec. 2036. 2021 c 332 s 2104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Sewer System HABU (Highest and Best Use) (40000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2103, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($500,000))

$720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($300,000))

$80,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Inpatient Psychiatric Unit (40000413)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

AHCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$791,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000416)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island Passenger Ferry Replacement (40000418)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$611,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$611,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island Transport Barge Replacement (40000419)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

Sec. 2042. 2021 c 332 s 2106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Unit Six Roof Replacement (92000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($650,000))

$786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($277,000))

$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$927,000

Sec. 2043. 2021 c 332 s 2107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: AC for MSU (92000039)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,000))

$99,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,296,000))

$1,509,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Utilidor Mechanical and Electrical System Repair (91000432)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,977,000

Sec. 2045. 2021 c 332 s 2102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000254)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($11,800,000))

$10,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,833,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,633,000))

$71,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. 2021 c 332 s 2093 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2021 c 332 s 3071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
(($31,504,000))

$31,542,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($8,496,000))

$8,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

Sec. 3002. 2021 c 332 s 3084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000337)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$225,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($75,000,000))

$108,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($300,000,000))

$333,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,500,000,000))

$1,533,000,000

Sec. 3003. 2021 c 332 s 3086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 State Match - Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000339)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($75,000,000))

$78,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Pacific Wood Treating Site Cleanup – Cleanup Settlement Account (40000464)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,326,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (40000465)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Failing Main Electrical Service Panel (40000467)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Community-Based Public-Private Stormwater Partnership (40000470)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to establish a community-based public-private partnership stormwater pilot program, using the Washington state stormwater community-based public-private partnership feasibility assessment as a guide. The department must work with partner agencies to develop local capacity and attract private investment.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000473)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$200,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

Sec. 3009. 2021 c 332 s 3112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to administer a pilot grant program for water banking strategies to meet local water needs.

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for qualified applicants located within the Methow River Basin.

(2)(a) Grant awards may only be used for:

(i) Development of water banks in rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5);

(ii) Acquisition of water rights appropriate for use in a water bank including all costs necessary to evaluate the water right for eligibility for its intended use; and

(iii) Activities necessary to facilitate the creation of a water bank.

(b) For applicants located outside of the Methow River Basin, grant awards may only be used for the development of water banks in rural counties that have the headwaters of a major watershed within their borders and only for water banking strategies within the county of origin. For purposes of this section, "major watershed" has the same meaning as shoreline of statewide significance in RCW 90.58.030(2)(f)(v) (A) and (B).

(3) Grant awards may not exceed $2,000,000 per applicant.

(4) For the purposes of a grant pursuant to this section, a water bank must meet water needs, which include, but are not limited to, agricultural use and instream flow for fish and wildlife. The water bank must preserve water rights for use in the county of origin and for permanent instream flows for fish and wildlife through the primary and secondary reaches of the water right.

(5) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, an applicant must:

(a) Be a public entity or a participant in a public-private partnership with a public entity;

(b) Exhibit sufficient expertise and capacity to develop and maintain a water bank consistent with the purposes of this appropriation;

(c) Secure a valid interest to purchase a water right;

(d) Show that the water rights appear to be adequate for the intended use; and

(e) Agree to have one-third of any water right purchased with the funds appropriated under this section to have its purpose of use changed permanently to instream flow benefiting fish and wildlife.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness and Response Account—

State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Stormwater Projects (92000195)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in the section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

6PPD Tire-Wear Particle Stormwater Project

Partnership (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Port of Port Angeles Stormwater Project

(Port Angeles). . . .$855,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$4,855,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,855,000

Sec. 3011. 2021 c 332 s 3129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,137,000))

$4,026,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,337,000))

$4,226,000

Sec. 3012. 2021 c 332 s 3130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,914,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,024,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,938,000))

$8,008,000

Sec. 3013. 2021 c 332 s 3133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($142,000))

$128,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,080,000))

$1,066,000

Sec. 3014. 2021 c 332 s 3134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Repair Failing Bridge (30000876)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($193,000))

$191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($248,000))

$246,000

Sec. 3015. 2021 c 332 s 3136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,023,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,268,000))

$1,748,000

Sec. 3016. 2021 c 332 s 3138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

Parkland Acquisition Account—State
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,245,000))

$12,745,000

Sec. 3017. 2021 c 332 s 3143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($397,000))

$392,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,000))

$495,000

Sec. 3018. 2021 c 332 s 3147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,605,000))

$1,718,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($300,000))

$187,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

Sec. 3019. 2021 c 332 s 3149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Preservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,139,000))

$1,196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,308,000))

$3,251,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,447,000

Sec. 3020. 2021 c 332 s 3151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascade Trail - Crab Creek Trestle Replacement (40000162)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$79,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$2,281,000

Sec. 3021. 2021 c 332 s 3154 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Saint Edward Maintenance Facility (40000218)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,199,000))

$2,524,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,199,000))

$2,524,000

Sec. 3022. 2021 c 332 s 3164 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($637,000))

$785,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($41,363,000))

$41,215,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,000,000

Sec. 3023. 2021 c 332 s 3165 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($616,000))

$843,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($132,000))

$464,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($2,189,000))

$2,647,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
(($470,000))

$494,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,407,000))

$4,448,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($61,593,000))

$60,552,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

Sec. 3024. 2021 c 332 s 3168 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($903,000))

$3,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($69,097,000))

$66,343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

Sec. 3025. 2021 c 332 s 3171 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($1,181,000))

$1,563,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($2,910,000))

$2,814,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($3,268,000))

$3,085,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
(($1,345,000))

$117,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($8,704,000))

$7,579,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,619,000))

$47,744,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,323,000

Sec. 3026. 2021 c 332 s 3173 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
(($49,000))

$137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($14,161,000))

$14,073,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,210,000

Sec. 3027. 2021 c 332 s 3178 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($82,000))

$670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,918,000))

$7,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

Sec. 3028. 2021 c 332 s 3183 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($160,000))

$204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,840,000))

$4,796,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

Sec. 3029. 2021 c 332 s 3184 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$32,369,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,642,000))

$6,231,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($34,011,000))

$38,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($32,202,000))

$27,613,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,213,000

Sec. 3030. 2021 c 332 s 3185 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2017-42, developed July 20, 2017, and LEAP capital document No. 2018-6H, developed January 3, 2018.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($5,860,000))

$5,002,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($12,592,000))

$12,878,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($12,474,000))

$14,248,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($30,926,000))

$32,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($49,074,000))

$47,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

Sec. 3031. 2021 c 332 s 3187 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
(($895,000))

$2,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($12,300,000))

$10,204,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,195,000

Sec. 3032. 2021 c 332 s 3188 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,302,000))

$1,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,775,000))

$2,555,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,077,000

Sec. 3033. 2021 c 332 s 3189 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2018-9H, developed March 5, 2018.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$884,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,732,000))

$4,013,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,616,000))

$4,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($8,669,000))

$7,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,285,000

Sec. 3034. 2021 c 332 s 3190 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($16,640,000))

$20,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($23,360,000))

$19,237,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

Sec. 3035. 2021 c 332 s 3195 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,769,000))

$5,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,731,000))

$6,710,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

Sec. 3036. 2021 c 332 s 3197 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3200, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($6,880,000))

$6,687,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($20,349,000))

$25,791,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($28,025,000))

$24,390,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($55,254,000))

$56,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($29,746,000))

$28,132,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$85,000,000

Sec. 3037. 2021 c 332 s 3201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amounts reappropriated in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital documents No. 2020-467-HSBA, developed February 25, 2020, and No. 2020-467-HB, developed February 14, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,597,000))

$7,833,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,403,000))

$4,167,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

Sec. 3038. 2021 c 332 s 3221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000035)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in ((LEAP capital document No. RCO-5-HB-2021))OFM capital document 2022-1, developed ((April 15, 2021))December 16, 2021.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the appropriation.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$107,180,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$133,975,000

Sec. 3039. 2021 c 332 s 3229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($152,000))

$622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($11,033,000))

$10,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,185,000

Sec. 3040. 2021 c 332 s 3230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Upper Quinault River Restoration Project (91000958)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,359,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$641,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$4,000,000

Sec. 3041. 2021 c 332 s 3232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3049, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($132,000))

$497,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,859,000))

$8,050,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($5,991,000))

$8,547,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($28,790,000))

$26,234,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,781,000

Sec. 3042. 2021 c 332 s 3218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000029)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-3.1-HB-2021, developed April 15, 2021.

(2) The aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following project:

Dash Point Park and Pier (Tacoma). . . .$418,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$418,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,100,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$9,518,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($45,500,000))

$45,918,000

Sec. 3043. 2021 c 332 s 3253 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($350,000))

$270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($400,000))

$320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Farmland Protection and Land Access (92000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Voluntary Stewardship Program (92000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

Sec. 3046. 2021 c 332 s 3254 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3063, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,387,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($13,108,000))

$13,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($36,000,000))

$48,616,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($51,495,000))

$66,394,000

Sec. 3047. 2021 c 332 s 3255 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$350,000))

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,923,000))

$2,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,673,000))

$4,888,000

Sec. 3048. 2021 c 332 s 3273 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($577,000))

$504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,671,000))

$12,598,000

Sec. 3049. 2021 c 332 s 3274 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($300,000))

$252,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,606,000))

$3,102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,906,000))

$3,354,000

Sec. 3050. 2021 c 332 s 3281 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Toutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to purchase fee-title and/or easements as ((part of))necessary for sediment abatement, fish release and collection sites, and for project obligations related to the state's participation in design review and design cost share of the fish collection facility.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for project obligations related to modular housing replacement.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,371,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Klickitat WLA - Simcoe Fencing (40000161)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

Sec. 3052. 2021 c 332 s 3292 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($520,000))

$519,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($680,000))

$679,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational Fishing Access on the Grande Ronde River (92000051)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to develop or establish an alternative recreational access point for anglers along the Grande Ronde river with the express purpose of alleviating tensions between property owners who own river frontage and the general public who may interfere with the owners' private enjoyment of their property. The department may not develop access requiring expenditure of state moneys that interferes with an owner's private property rights and may not develop access to easement 106165 or easement 113860 in Anatone, Washington, commonly referred to as the Dreamz Road easements.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upper Indian Creek Fish Screen Removal (92001248)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000

Sec. 3055. 2021 c 332 s 3298 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Structurally Deficient Bridges (40000086)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the following projects: (a) The Naked Falls/Stebbins Creek bridge replacement in Skamania county; (b) the Shale Creek timber bridge repair in Jefferson county; ((and)) (c) the Coal Creek bridge replacement in Clallam county; (d) the Shale Creek concrete bridge repair in Jefferson county; (e) the 5970 #1 bridge replacement in Pacific county; (f) the Rock Creek bridge replacement in Skamania county; (g) the EF Dickey River bridge design in Clallam county; (h) the Steep Creek bridge replacement in Skamania county; (i) the Sollecks High bridge repair in Jefferson county; (j) the 5973 bridge replacement in Pacific county; (k) the Cedar Creek bridge repair in Grays Harbor county; (l) the Arvid Creek bridge replacement in Jefferson county; (m) the Susie Creek bridge repair in Jefferson county; (n) the YR-Jones bridge replacement in Yakima county; (o) the Middle Creek railcar bridge replacement in Pend Oreille county; and (p) the Butler Mill bridge replacement in Grays Harbor county.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,050,000

Access Road Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$2,250,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,050,000))

$13,300,000

Sec. 3056. 2021 c 332 s 3305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($107,000))

$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$108,000

Sec. 3057. 2021 c 332 s 3306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (40000034)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3281, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,675,000))

$1,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,725,000))

$4,704,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,400,000

Sec. 3058. 2021 c 332 s 3308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway (40000038)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,220,000))

$1,305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($636,000))

$551,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,856,000

Sec. 3059. 2021 c 332 s 3313 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities 2019-21 (40000046)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($295,000))

$527,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,705,000))

$1,473,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 3060. 2021 c 332 s 3317 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Grouse Ridge Fish Barriers & RMAP Compliance (40000056)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,210,000))

$3,217,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($35,000))

$28,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,975,000

Sec. 3061. 2021 c 332 s 3319 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Minor Works Preservation (40000070)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $205,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for communication site preservation and repairs.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,183,000))

$3,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,183,000))

$3,122,000

Sec. 3062. 2021 c 332 s 3328 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rural Broadband Investment (40000082)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for installation of new communication towers at Ellis Peak, Striped Peak, and Paradise Peak.

(2) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for communication tower upgrades at Blyn Mountain and Capitol Peak.

(3) $20,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a new generator in Okanogan county.

(4) $5,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a utility connection project in Clallam county.

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Whiteman Cove Barrier Removal (92000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $70,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to complete the final design and permitting of the fish barrier removal project at Whiteman Cove.

(2) $1,400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the YMCA Camp Coleman cabin preservation and system upgrades at Whiteman Cove.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,470,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Crime Laboratory I-5 Corridor Consolidated Facility (30000290)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign.

(2) The predesign must include:

(a) An assessment of current forensic services operations, including volumes processed by sample type (e.g., DNA, material analysis, firearms, latent prints), locations from which evidentiary samples and materials were sent to the lab, how samples are processed, how results are delivered, and other duties conducted by forensic services staff as part of their operations that impact availability for forensic analysis including, but not limited to, evidence collection and testimony;

(b) An evaluation of a consolidated lab model compared to distributed lab models, including an examination of advantages and disadvantages associated with each model, which model is preferred, and why. The evaluation should include an analysis on the impacts of the factors listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, including the impacts on the delivery of samples and materials to the lab and staffing impacts, including for responsibilities such as testimony and evidence collection;

(c) An evaluation of state-owned compared to leased lab approach, including costs associated with each approach, the anticipated source of funds for each option, which approach is preferred, and why; and

(d) A projected volume of evidentiary samples able to be processed in the preferred alternative and a comparison to the current processing model.

(3) The predesign must align with the most recent master plan.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$333,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$333,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2021 c 332 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($385,701,000))

$385,645,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($387,230,000))

$387,174,000

Sec. 5002. 2021 c 332 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers - Minor Works (30000187)

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—Bonds—State
. . . .
(($521,000))

$512,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$2,991,000

Sec. 5003. 2021 c 332 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The reappropriation is subject to provisions of section 5002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.))

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for grant funding to the Bremerton school district to complete design and begin construction of a new career and technical education facility at the West Sound technical skills center in Bremerton.

(2) In coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Bremerton school district's West Sound technical skills center must: (a) Ensure the career and technical programs planned for in the design and renovation of the skills center support high-demand and high-wage sector program needs; (b) ensure that space needs are reasonable and appropriate for the programs planned and enrollment projections; (c) evaluate the proposed project budget using value engineering and life-cycle cost analysis techniques; and (d) use this information to inform the proposed design.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve the skill center programs, design, and budget before requesting allotment of construction phase funding.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$274,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .

$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$226,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$20,343,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,000))

$50,843,000

Sec. 5004. 2021 c 332 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Construction Assistance Program (40000034)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($727,780,000))$537,824,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) $2,836,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

(3) $20,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for the Sunnyside School District for the transfer of the Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite Campus and its related property and equipment.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($702,657,000))

$505,306,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($24,959,000))

$29,374,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$6,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($730,616,000))

$540,680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,899,490,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,630,106,000))

$4,440,170,000

Sec. 5005. 2021 c 332 s 5018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000039)

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for a modernization grant to the Mount Adams school district to complete the replacement of Harrah Elementary School.

(2)(a) (($21,795,000))$33,795,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation ((and $12,000,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation in this section are))is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts with total enrollments of 1,000 students or less with significant building system deficiencies and limited financial capacity as approved by the superintendent of public instruction's small district modernization grant advisory committee.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee, to the legislature by January 15, 2023. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $5,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources.

(3) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts with enrollments of 1,000 students or less interested in seeking modernization grants. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for school districts with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $5,000,000 or less.

(4)(a) $4,218,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state tribal compact schools. The superintendent may prioritize planning grants for state tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a prioritized list of state-tribal compact school modernization projects to the legislature by January 15, 2023. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the planning grant amount; and (iii) estimated total project costs.

(5) The appropriated funds in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1.1-CD-2021, developed April 15, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($30,113,000))

$42,113,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$12,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$42,113,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$290,592,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$332,705,000

Sec. 5006. 2021 c 332 s 5019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000040)

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations: In addition to the conditions and limitations specified in section 7019 of this act, no skill center shall receive funding for more than two minor works projects within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,556,000))

$3,388,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,832,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,388,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,388,000

Sec. 5007. 2021 c 332 s 5023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School District Health and Safety (40000052)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $643,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and (($1,357,000))$3,057,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $965,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation((, $2,035,000))and $3,228,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation((, and $1,193,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation)) in this section are provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $200,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $322,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and $678,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,193,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,930,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,070,000))

$6,963,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,193,000))

$8,893,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$52,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($59,193,000))

$60,893,000

Sec. 5008. 2021 c 332 s 5038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Distressed Schools (92000917)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a 12-classroom addition at Green Lake Elementary School in Seattle public schools.

(2) $940,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Healthy Schools pilot to reduce exposure to air pollution and improve air quality in schools.

(3) $772,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a school-based health center at Spanaway Middle School.

(4) $13,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Almira school district to replace the Almira elementary school destroyed by fire. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds for this use.

(5) $2,600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the completion of a two-classroom early learning addition at the John Muir Elementary School in Seattle public schools.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,712,000))

$24,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,712,000))

$24,312,000

Sec. 5009. 2021 c 332 s 5039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

(2)(a) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the North Beach school district to complete needed seismic safety retrofits to the Pacific Beach elementary school gymnasium project as approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction's school seismic safety retrofit committee. With approval of the committee, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may allow funding to be used by the North Beach school district to replace and relocate the Pacific Beach elementary school campus and its facilities.

(b) Nothing in (a) of this subsection prohibits the North Beach school district from being eligible for the school seismic safety grant program in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5933 (seismic safety).

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,190,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,561,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($13,240,000))

$21,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Seismic Safety Grant Program 5933 (92000923)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $115,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5933 (school seismic safety grant program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$115,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$515,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2022 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (92000925)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,594,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

SD Brewster School District. . . .$933,000

SD Oroville School District. . . .$1,661,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,594,000

Sec. 5012. 2021 c 332 s 5044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($34,300,000))

$32,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Clean Energy Testbeds (40000098)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $7,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded for battery and energy research, development, and demonstration projects under P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). If awards are not received by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

Sec. 5014. 2021 c 332 s 5051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$15,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($13,988,000))

$13,912,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,988,000

Sec. 5015. 2021 c 332 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$1,142,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,658,000))

$7,116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,258,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Pullman Student Success Center Phase 1 (40000339)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 5017. 2021 c 332 s 5070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($69,200,000))

$66,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,200,000))

$69,690,000

Sec. 5018. 2021 c 332 s 5083 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Health Education (40000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($55,505,000))

$57,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($60,505,000))

$62,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Grid Security (40000121)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$754,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$754,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Health and Counseling Center (30000614)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,362,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,742,000

Sec. 5021. 2021 c 332 s 5093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Preservation (40000034)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($3,580,000))

$2,580,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,945,000))

$2,945,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$77,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,025,000

Sec. 5022. 2021 c 332 s 5094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab II HVAC Upgrades (40000047)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$4,000,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Recreation and Athletic Center Critical Repairs (40000082)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Emergency Dispatch & Communication System Replacement (40000084)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 5025. 2021 c 332 s 5096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (91000031)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$107,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,966,000))

$4,859,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,866,000

Sec. 5026. 2021 c 332 s 5101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5089, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The University may pursue the living building challenge petal certification for this project instead of the LEED silver certification required by RCW 39.35D.030.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$51,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$52,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($53,000,000))

$54,500,000

Sec. 5027. 2021 c 332 s 5104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2021-23 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000911)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,500,000))

$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($13,000,000))

$14,500,000

Sec. 5028. 2021 c 332 s 5107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program 2021-2023 (30000918)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$8,500,000

Sec. 5029. 2021 c 332 s 5111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,186,000))

$6,579,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,986,000))

$8,379,000

Sec. 5030. 2021 c 332 s 5112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,777,000))

$4,731,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,177,000))

$9,131,000

Sec. 5031. 2021 c 332 s 5115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Preservation - Minor Works 2021-23 (40000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,500,000))

$4,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,298,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,798,000))

$12,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Complete HVAC Controls Replacement (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Garage and Emergency Exit Spalling Concrete Remediation (40000053)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$901,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$901,000

Sec. 5034. 2021 c 332 s 5153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (40000169)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,826,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,627,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($33,074,000))

$32,587,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($38,527,000))

$38,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure (40000431)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Olympic South Asbestos Abatement and Restoration (40000516)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,579,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$6,580,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,159,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,159,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College at New Bethel High School (92000036)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,200,000

Sec. 5038. 2021 c 332 s 5170 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Yakima Sun Dome Reflectors (92000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($80,000))

$66,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$588,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. 2021 c 332 s 5024 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART 6

RESERVED

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 7001. 2021 c 332 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are (($46,768,901))$46,810,631 for the 2021-2023 biennium, (($314,662,796))$324,599,260 for the 2023-2025 biennium, and (($447,088,148))466,702,535 for the 2025-2027 biennium.

Sec. 7002. 2021 c 332 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $119,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,706,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $115,700,000 plus costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor College for up to $3,200,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student services and instructional building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $3,128,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an allied health, science, and manufacturing replacement building.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a health education building.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bates Technical College for up to $1,350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and facilities.

(7) The department of ecology: ((Submit a financing contract proposal to fully fund the Lacey headquarters parking garage preservation project, including financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, in the department's 2022 supplemental capital budget request))Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,797,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Lacey headquarters parking garage preservation project.

Sec. 7003. 2021 c 332 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Executive Order No. 21-02, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective ((November 10, 2005))April 7, 2021. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of projects on cultural resources and historic properties proposed in state-funded construction or acquisition projects, including grant or pass-through funding that culminates in construction or land acquisitions. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated early in the project planning process, prior to construction or taking title.

Sec. 7004. 2021 c 332 s 7020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to

(($5,500,000))$9,000,000 for fiscal year 2022 and up to $5,500,000

for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$14,500,000

(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For

transfer to the water pollution control revolving

account, up to $7,500,000 for fiscal year 2022 and

up to (($7,500,000))$10,500,000 for fiscal year

2023
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$18,000,000

(3) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the statewide broadband account, up to $7,000,000 for fiscal year 2022 and up to $7,000,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$14,000,000

Sec. 7005. 2021 c 332 s 7041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of enterprise services shall convene a construction industry work group to recommend how to apply successful carbon reduction strategies, incorporate necessary parameters of design and construction considerations, and allow for efficient and cost effective state construction projects. The work group must be comprised of construction industry professionals as recommended by a leading association on Washington business in design, specification, construction, and material supply and construction professionals that have successfully realized real and measurable results. The work group must also include a representative from the department of enterprise services, representatives from environmental groups, and someone of applicable expertise from the Washington academy of sciences.

(2) The work group shall identify and recommend carbon reduction strategies and environmental product declaration principles to successfully apply in state construction projects and:

(a) Clarify the definition of environmental product declaration to ensure that environmental product declarations (EPD) are applied properly, consistently, and as intended and provide a baseline of understanding based on accepted metrics to obtain measurable results for state construction projects;

(b) Suggest a pilot project or project review to apply construction industry recommendations and create an education and standards brief that accompanies the report required under subsection (3) of this section;

(c) Outline the environmental project review data collection process in functional detail and use existing data gathering resources such as EC3; and

(d) Identify measurable outcome criteria to establish a project baseline summary for use during design from estimated project material quantities using industry average environmental product declarations.

(3) The work group shall provide their recommendations in a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((January 1, 2022))June 30, 2022.

(d) Identify measurable outcome criteria to establish a project baseline summary for use during design from estimated project material quantities using industry average environmental product declarations; and

(e) Identify sustainable and low-carbon emitting building materials, including but not limited to, aggregate and recycled concrete materials, as described in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The work group shall provide their recommendations in a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

(4)(a) The legislature continues to prioritize Washington state's sustainability goals and reaffirms its determination that recyclable construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled. The legislature further finds that the reuse of construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials into construction projects is known to:

(i) Reduce the need for consumption of new construction aggregate materials and conserves existing aggregate resources;

(ii) Encourages reuse and recycling, reduces waste, and discourages landfilling of readily available natural resources;

(iii) Reduces truck trips and related transportation emissions; and

(iv) Reduces greenhouse gases related to the construction of state funded construction projects, reduce embodied energy, and improve and advance the sustainable principles and practices of Washington state.

(b) These recyclable materials have well established markets, are substantially a primary or secondary product of necessary construction processes and production, as a commodity substantially meets widely recognized international, national, and local standards and specifications, and are managed as an item of commercial value.

Sec. 7006. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2020 c 168 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The state drought preparedness and response account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and all cost recovery revenues collected under RCW 43.83B.410(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used for drought preparedness and response activities under this chapter, including grants issued under RCW 43.83B.415. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the state drought preparedness and response account created in RCW 43.83B.430 for activities related to water banking.

Sec. 7007. RCW 43.155.050 and 2021 c 334 s 979 and 2021 c 332 s 7031 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the aviation revitalization board. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for projects identified in section 1028 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. The state board for community and technical colleges was tasked by the legislature in section 7038, chapter 332, Laws of 2021 to report on alternative methods of prioritizing and presenting the list of requested capital projects for community and technical colleges in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The state board for community and technical colleges shall implement for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium the report's option of a single prioritized request with minor projects above major projects and with all of the funding needed for design and construction included in a single biennium. However, in recognition of the transition to this new prioritized request method, projects that received funding for design only in the 2019-2021 or 2021-2023 fiscal biennia must receive priority over new major project requests in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. The energy efficiency revolving loan capitalization account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the state from the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization grant program created in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) must be deposited into the account. The account may also receive legislative transfers and appropriations and all other revenues directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to make grants or loans, and to provide technical assistance, to conduct energy audits and to implement audit strategies to increase the energy efficiency of residential and commercial buildings and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---