BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.323 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to amounts received by the Washington health benefit exchange established under chapter 43.71 RCW.

(((2) This section expires July 1, 2023.))

--- END ---