BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the benefit of computer science and computational thinking in education, not only with respect to educational development, but also in cultivating the skills needed to compete and excel in our state's career landscape. The legislature also recognizes the heightened importance of providing access to computer science education to youth in secure facilities, where access to innovative and engaging learning experiences can: (1) Build in-demand skills to prepare students for future employment; (2) help students transition back to their communities following incarceration; and (3) prevent recidivism. However, the legislature understands that state long-term juvenile institutions have unique environmental and facility limitations that affect the ability to deliver some components of computer science instruction in a secure manner. Therefore, the legislature intends to require school districts that operate institutional education programs in state long-term juvenile institutions to provide access to computer science courses, while allowing the flexibility to adjust curriculum and instructional activities when necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.190 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, each school district operating an institutional education program for youth in state long-term juvenile institutions must provide an opportunity to access an elective computer science course in accordance with RCW 28A.230.300.

(2) If, due to facility or technology security limitations, a school district cannot provide a computer science course that is fully aligned with all state computer science learning standards, the school district must adapt the course curriculum and instructional activities to align with as many state computer science learning standards as possible.

(3) Each school district operating an institutional education program for youth in state long-term juvenile institutions must annually report the following information to the office of the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) Data indicating the number of students who enrolled in a computer science course in the prior school year, disaggregated by gender, race, ethnicity, and age;

(b) A brief description of each computer science course and whether the course is fully aligned to state computer science learning standards; and

(c) A brief description of any facility or technology security limitations that prevent the school district from offering a course fully aligned with state computer science learning standards, and the actions the district is taking to address those limitations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2022, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---