BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that it is important for the proper management of the fish and wildlife of this state to have a fully qualified and confirmed fish and wildlife commission who represent the broad interests of the state of Washington. There are currently vacancies on the board and it has become clear that a contingency process for appointment is necessary to ensure that the commission is fully functional. The legislature finds that the leadership of the two largest caucuses are qualified and capable of appointing appropriate members to the commission when there has been a significant delay.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.04.030 and 2001 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered voters of the state. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint with the advice and consent of the senate three registered voters to the commission to serve for terms of six years from that January or until their successors are appointed and qualified. No commissioner may serve without reappointment or replacement. The reappointment or replacement must occur prior to the end of the next legislative session.

(2) If a vacancy occurs on the commission prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a registered voter within ((sixty))60 days to complete the term. If the governor fails to fill the vacancy within 60 days, the chair of each of the two largest caucuses of the senate and the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives must appoint a registered voter within 60 days to complete the term. Three members shall be residents of that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and three shall be residents of that portion of the state lying west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. Three additional members shall be appointed at large. No two members may be residents of the same county. The legal office of the commission is at the administrative office of the department in Olympia.

--- END ---