BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person is guilty of presenting a false vaccination document if, with the intent to defraud, the person exhibits, displays, or otherwise offers as genuine a document or other writing which falsely purports to be verification issued by a governmental agency of a person having received one or more doses of a vaccination against COVID-19 at any retail or service establishment open to the public or public space that requires proof of vaccination against COVID-19 as a condition of entry.

(b) Presenting a false vaccination document is a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

(2) A person who knowingly sells, offers or exposes for sale, or otherwise transfers, or possesses with the intent to sell, offer or expose for sale, or otherwise transfer, a document, printed form, or other writing which falsely purports to be a verification issued by a governmental agency of a person having received one or more doses of a vaccination against COVID-19 is guilty of a class C felony.

--- END ---