BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.08.012 and 2015 c 70 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a board, known as the "Washington state liquor and cannabis board," consisting of ((three))five members, to be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, who shall each be paid an annual salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The governor may, in his or her discretion, appoint one of the members as chair of the board, and a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the board.

(2) In addition to the members of the board, there shall be four nonvoting ex officio members from the legislature consisting of:

(a) Two members of the senate, one from the majority political party and one from the minority political party, both to be appointed by the president of the senate; and

(b) Two members of the house of representatives, one from the majority political party and one from the minority political party, both to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(3) Appointments under subsection (2) of this section must be for the term of two years or for the period in which the appointee serves as a legislator, whichever expires first. Ex officio members may be reappointed.

(4) Vacancies must be filled in the same manner as original appointments are made.

(5) Ex officio members who collect data deemed essential to future legislative proposals and exchange information with the board are deemed engaged in legislative business while in attendance upon the business of the board and are limited to allowances provided in RCW 44.04.120, to be paid from the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as being expenses relative to board business.

--- END ---