BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. 2021 c 324 s 1 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 10.120.010 (Definitions) and 2021 c 324 s 2;

(2) RCW 10.120.020 (Permissible uses of force) and 2021 c 324 s 3;

(3) RCW 10.120.030 (Policies for use of force and de-escalation tactics) and 2021 c 324 s 4;

(4) RCW 43.101.450 (Violence de-escalation training) and 2021 c 324 s 6, 2019 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 940), & (2018 c 11 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8); and

(5) RCW 43.101.490 (Basic training) and 2021 c 324 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW to read as follows:

If after notice of the intention to arrest the defendant, he or she either flee or forcibly resist, the officer may use all necessary means to effect the arrest.

--- END ---