BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A governmental entity may not require a person to present proof that the person has received a vaccine of any kind or nature in order to be permitted to access a public place.

(2) As used in this section:

(a) "Governmental entity" means any unit of state or local government including, but not limited to, the governor, state agencies, counties, cities, towns, and special districts.

(b) "Public place" means any site accessible to the general public for business, entertainment, or another lawful purpose. A "public place" includes, but is not limited to, the front, immediate area, or parking lot of any store, shop, restaurant, tavern, shopping center, or other place of business; any public building, its grounds, or surrounding area; or any public parking lot, street, right-of-way, sidewalk, public park, or other public grounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---