BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, shall provide coverage for medically necessary donor human milk for inpatient use when ordered by a licensed health care provider with prescriptive authority or an international board certified lactation consultant certified by the international board of lactation consultant examiners for an infant who is medically or physically unable to receive maternal human milk or participate in chest feeding or whose parent is medically or physically unable to produce maternal human milk in sufficient quantities or caloric density or participate in chest feeding, if the infant meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) An infant birth weight of below 2,500 grams;

(b) An infant gestational age equal to or less than 34 weeks;

(c) Infant hypoglycemia;

(d) A high risk for development of necrotizing enterocolitis, bronchopulmonary dysplasia, or retinopathy of prematurity;

(e) A congenital or acquired gastrointestinal condition with long-term feeding or malabsorption complications;

(f) Congenital heart disease requiring surgery in the first year of life;

(g) An organ or bone marrow transplant;

(h) Sepsis;

(i) Congenital hypotonias associated with feeding difficulty or malabsorption;

(j) Renal disease requiring dialysis in the first year of life;

(k) Craniofacial anomalies;

(l) An immunologic deficiency;

(m) Neonatal abstinence syndrome;

(n) Any other serious congenital or acquired condition for which the use of pasteurized donor human milk and donor human milk derived products is medically necessary and supports the treatment and recovery of the child; or

(o) Any baby still inpatient within 72 hours of birth without sufficient human milk available.

(2) Donor human milk covered under this section must be obtained from a milk bank that meets minimum standards adopted by the department of health pursuant to section 4 of this act.

(3) A health plan may not require an enrollee to obtain prior authorization to receive coverage for donor human milk as required under this section.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Donor human milk" means human milk that has been contributed to a milk bank by one or more donors.

(b) "Milk bank" means an organization that engages in the procurement, processing, storage, distribution, or use of human milk contributed by donors.

(5) The commissioner may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.017 and 2021 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, section 1 of this act, and chapter 48.49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall provide coverage under this chapter for medically necessary donor human milk for inpatient use when ordered by a licensed health care provider with prescriptive authority or an international board certified lactation consultant certified by the international board of lactation consultant examiners for an infant who is medically or physically unable to receive maternal human milk or participate in chest feeding or whose parent is medically or physically unable to produce maternal human milk in sufficient quantities or caloric density or participate in chest feeding, if the infant meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) An infant birth weight of below 2,500 grams;

(b) An infant gestational age equal to or less than 34 weeks;

(c) Infant hypoglycemia;

(d) A high risk for development of necrotizing enterocolitis, bronchopulmonary dysplasia, or retinopathy of prematurity;

(e) A congenital or acquired gastrointestinal condition with long-term feeding or malabsorption complications;

(f) Congenital heart disease requiring surgery in the first year of life;

(g) An organ or bone marrow transplant;

(h) Sepsis;

(i) Congenital hypotonias associated with feeding difficulty or malabsorption;

(j) Renal disease requiring dialysis in the first year of life;

(k) Craniofacial anomalies;

(l) An immunologic deficiency;

(m) Neonatal abstinence syndrome;

(n) Any other serious congenital or acquired condition for which the use of pasteurized donor human milk and donor human milk derived products is medically necessary and supports the treatment and recovery of the child; or

(o) Any baby still inpatient within 72 hours of birth without sufficient human milk available.

(2) Donor human milk covered under this section must be obtained from a milk bank that meets minimum standards adopted by the department of health pursuant to section 4 of this act.

(3) The authority may require an enrollee to obtain expedited prior authorization to receive coverage for donor human milk as required under this section.

(4) In administering this program, the authority must seek any available federal financial participation under the medical assistance program, as codified at Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now available or may become available.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Donor human milk" means human milk that has been contributed to a milk bank by one or more donors.

(b) "Milk bank" means an organization that engages in the procurement, processing, storage, distribution, or use of human milk contributed by donors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall adopt standards for ensuring milk bank safety. The standards adopted by the department must, at a minimum, consider the clinical, evidence-based guidelines established by a national accrediting organization. The standards must address donor screening, milk handling and processing, and recordkeeping. The department shall also review and consider requiring additional testing standards, including but not limited to testing for the presence of viruses, bacteria, and prescription and nonprescription drugs in donated milk.

--- END ---