BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.670 and 1999 c 40 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the Washington state patrol a bureau of forensic laboratory services system which is authorized to:

(a) Provide laboratory services for the purpose of analyzing and scientifically handling any physical evidence relating to any crime.

(b) Provide training assistance for local law enforcement personnel.

(c) Provide all necessary toxicology services requested by all coroners, medical examiners, and prosecuting attorneys.

(2) The bureau of forensic laboratory services shall assign priority to a request for services with due regard to whether the case involves criminal activity against persons. The Washington state forensic investigations council shall assist the bureau of forensic laboratory services in devising policies to promote the most efficient use of laboratory services consistent with this section. The forensic investigations council shall be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget and shall approve the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget prior to its formal submission by the state patrol to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

(3) The bureau of forensic laboratory services, in consultation with the Washington state forensic investigations council, must adopt rules by April 1, 2023, for the state toxicology laboratory, as defined in RCW 43.103.020, requiring the laboratory to:

(a) Conduct sampling and testing for contamination in the laboratory and its other work areas not less than annually per fiscal year; and

(b) Coordinate a periodic environmental sampling by the national institute of standards and technology of the United States department of commerce to include a corrective action report for noted deficiencies.

(4) The bureau of forensic laboratory services shall complete an annual report of the environmental sampling findings and provide this report to the Washington state forensic investigations council for review to be shared with the senate law and justice committee and the house public safety committee.

--- END ---