BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that breast cancer is the most frequently diagnosed cancer and the second leading cause of cancer death among women in Washington. Early detection is key to decreasing morbidity and mortality associated with breast cancer. Women with risk factors that place them at higher than average risk for developing breast cancer benefit from increased access to screening, including supplemental screening using magnetic resonance imaging.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

For large group health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, a health carrier shall provide coverage without cost sharing for supplemental magnetic resonance imaging breast cancer screening for high-risk women as an adjunct to mammography consistent with clinical guidelines, criteria, or treatment recommendations adopted by the American cancer society.

--- END ---