BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning May 1, 2023, the owner of a vehicle as described in subsection (2) of this section that is making an application for an initial registration or vehicle registration renewal may opt to do so under a quarterly or semiannual basis.

(2) The optional alternative periodic registration system specified in subsection (1) of this section that allows the ability of a vehicle owner to enter into a quarterly or semiannual registration is limited to vehicles registered in the geographic boundaries where a regional transit authority is imposing a motor vehicle excise tax under chapter 82.44 RCW as of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---