BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.32.0351 and 2007 c 269 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state dental quality assurance commission is established, consisting of ((sixteen))seventeen members each appointed by the governor to a four-year term. No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. ((In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, members of the previous boards and committees regulating these professions be appointed to the commission.)) Members of the commission hold office until their successors are appointed. ((The governor may appoint members of the initial commission to staggered terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all))All members shall be appointed to full four-year terms. Twelve members of the commission must be dentists, two members must be expanded function dental auxiliaries licensed under chapter 18.260 RCW, and ((two))three members must be public members.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.32.0355 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

Members must be ((citizens of the United States and)) residents of this state. Dentist members must be licensed dentists in the active practice of dentistry for a period of five years before appointment. Of the twelve dentists appointed to the commission, at least four must reside and engage in the active practice of dentistry east of the summit of the Cascade mountain range. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.52.040 and 2011 c 336 s 488 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of nursing home administrators shall consist of ((nine))eleven members appointed by the governor. ((Four))Six members shall be persons licensed under this chapter who have at least four years actual experience in the administration of a licensed nursing home in this state ((immediately preceding appointment to the board and who are not employed by the state or federal government)). At least one, but not more than two, of the six administrator members shall be an administrator of an assisted living facility or a continuing care retirement community.

((Four))(2) Three members shall be representatives of ((the health care professions))one or more of the following:

(a) Licensed health care professionals providing medical or nursing services in nursing homes who are privately or self-employed; ((or shall be persons employed by))

(b) Faculty or administrators of educational institutions who have special knowledge ((or expertise in the field of health care administration, health care education or long-term care or both, or care of the aged and chronically ill.

One member))of health care education, long-term care, or care of the aged or elderly; or

(c) Persons currently employed in areas related to the long-term care field including, but not limited to, pharmacy, home health, adult family homes, or therapy services.

(3) Two members shall be ((a))members of the health care consuming public who are residents of ((a)) nursing homes or ((a)) family members of ((a resident))nursing home residents or ((a)) persons eligible for medicare. No member who is a nonadministrator representative shall have any direct or family financial interest in nursing homes while serving as a member of the board. The governor shall consult with and seek the recommendations of the appropriate statewide business and professional organizations and societies primarily concerned with long-term health care facilities in the course of considering his or her appointments to the board. ((Board members currently serving shall continue to serve until the expiration of their appointments.))

Sec. 4. RCW 18.52.050 and 1992 c 53 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Members of the board shall be ((citizens of the United States and)) residents of this state. All administrator members of the board shall be holders of licenses under this chapter. The terms of all members shall be five years. Any board member may be removed for just cause including a finding of fact of unprofessional conduct or impaired practice. The governor may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term. No board member may serve more than two consecutive full terms((, whether full or partial)). Board members shall serve until their successors are appointed. Board members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. The board may elect annually a chair and vice chair to direct the meetings of the board. The board shall meet at least four times each year and may hold additional meetings as called by the secretary or the chair. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.74.020 and 2007 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board of physical therapy is hereby created. The board shall consist of ((six))seven members who shall be appointed by the governor. ((Of the initial appointments, two shall be appointed for a term of two years, two for a term of three years, and one for a term of four years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four years. Four))Five members of the board shall be physical therapists licensed under this chapter and residing in this state, shall have not less than five years' experience in the practice of physical therapy, and shall be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. One member shall be a physical therapist assistant licensed under this chapter and residing in this state, shall not have less than five years' experience in the practice of physical therapy, and shall be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. The ((sixth))seventh member shall be appointed from the public at large, shall have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services, and shall not be or have been a member of any other licensing board, a licensee of any health occupation board, an employee of any health facility nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision of health services at any level of responsibility. In the event that a member of the board for any reason cannot complete his or her term of office, another appointment shall be made by the governor in accordance with the procedure stated in this section to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve for more than two ((successive))consecutive full four-year terms.

The secretary of health shall furnish such secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as the board may require. Each member of the board shall, in addition to travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.74.027 and 1983 c 116 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall elect from its members a chairperson and vice chairperson-secretary, who shall serve for one year and until their successors are elected. The board shall meet at least once a year and upon the call of the chairperson at such times and places as the chairperson designates. ((Three members constitute a quorum of the full board for the transaction of any business.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. Meetings of the board shall be open and public, except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.92.021 and 2007 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a Washington state veterinary board of governors ((consisting))reflecting the diverse practice of animal medicine, including large animal, small animal, and specialty practice, as well as diverse types of employment and practice ownership including sole proprietorships, partnerships, and corporations. The board shall consist of ((seven))nine members, ((five))six of whom shall be licensed veterinarians, one of whom shall be a licensed veterinary technician ((trained in both large and small animal medicine)), one of whom shall be a licensed veterinarian or a licensed veterinary technician, and one of whom shall be a ((lay)) member of the public.

(2)(a) The licensed members shall be appointed by the governor. At the time of their appointment the licensed members of the board must be actual residents of the state in active practice as licensed practitioners of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, or employed as a licensed veterinary technician, as applicable((, and must be citizens of the United States)). Not more than ((one))two licensed veterinary members shall be from the same congressional district. The board shall not be deemed to be unlawfully constituted and a member of the board shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the remainder of the member's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.

(b) The terms of the ((first licensed)) members ((of the board)) shall be ((as follows: One member for five, four, three, two, and one years respectively. Thereafter the terms shall be for)) five years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(c) ((The lay member shall be appointed by the governor for a five year term and until the lay member's successor is appointed.

(d))) A member may be appointed to serve ((a second term, if that term does not run consecutively))two consecutive full terms.

(((e)))(d) Vacancies ((in))on the board shall be filled by the governor, the appointee to hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) ((The licensed veterinary technician member is a nonvoting member with respect to board decisions related to the discipline of a veterinarian involving standard of care.

(4))) Officers of the board shall be a chair and a ((secretary-treasurer))vice chair to be chosen by the members of the board from among its members.

(((5) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum at meetings of the board.))(4) A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.92.040 and 1991 c 3 s 240 are each amended to read as follows:

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.70.250))43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. No expense may be incurred by members of the board except in connection with board meetings without prior approval of the secretary.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.108.020 and 1991 c 3 s 253 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state board of massage is ((hereby)) created. The board shall consist of ((four))seven members who shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four years each. ((Members))All members shall be residents of this state ((and shall have not less than three years experience in the practice of massage immediately preceding their appointment and shall be licensed under this chapter and actively engaged in the practice of massage during their incumbency.

In addition to the members specified in this section, the governor shall appoint a consumer member of the board, who shall serve for a term of four years. The consumer member of the board shall be an individual who does not derive his or her livelihood by providing health care services or massage therapy and is not a licensed health professional. The consumer member shall not be an employee of the state nor a present or former member of another licensing board)). Five members shall be massage therapists licensed under this chapter with at least three years' experience in the practice of massage immediately preceding their appointment and shall at all times during their terms remain licensed massage therapists.

One member shall be a consumer whose occupation does not include the administration of health activities or the provision of health services and who has no material financial interest in the provision of health care services.

One member shall be a massage educator or massage school owner with at least three years' experience in the teaching or administration of direct student learning of the practice of massage. The educator or school owner member is not required to be a licensed massage therapist. The member shall recuse themselves from any board deliberations or decision making involving the school or educational program with which the member is professionally affiliated.

In the event that a member cannot complete ((his or her))their term of office, another appointment shall be made by the governor in accordance with the procedures stated in this section to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve more than two successive full terms ((whether full or partial)). The governor may remove any member of the board for neglect of duty, incompetence, or unprofessional or disorderly conduct as determined under chapter 18.130 RCW.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

The board may annually elect a chairperson to direct the meetings of the board. The board shall meet as called by the chairperson or the secretary. ((Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.83.035 and 1989 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created the examining board of psychology which shall examine the qualifications of applicants for licensing. The board shall consist of ((seven))nine psychologists and two public members, all appointed by the governor. The public members shall not be and have never been psychologists or in training to be psychologists; they may not have any household member who is a psychologist or in training to be a psychologist; they may not participate or ever have participated in a commercial or professional field related to psychology, nor have a household member who has so participated; and they may not have had within two years before appointment a substantial financial interest in a person regulated by the board. Each psychologist member of the board shall ((be a citizen of the United States who has))have actively practiced psychology in the state of Washington for at least three years immediately preceding appointment and who is licensed under this chapter. Board members shall be appointed for a term of five years, except that the terms of the existing appointees shall be adjusted by the governor so that no more than two members' terms expire each year with all subsequent appointments for a five-year term. Upon the death, resignation, or removal of a member, the governor shall appoint a successor to serve for the unexpired term. The board shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.83.045 and 1991 c 3 s 195 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall meet at least once each year and at such other times as the board deems appropriate to properly discharge its duties. All meetings shall be held in Olympia, Washington, or such other places as may be designated by the secretary. Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum, except that oral examinations may be conducted with only three psychologist members. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.83.051 and 1984 c 287 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.64.001 and 2013 c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a state pharmacy quality assurance commission consisting of fifteen members, to be appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate. Ten of the members shall be designated as pharmacist members, four of the members shall be designated a public member, and one member shall be a pharmacy technician.

Each pharmacist member shall be a ((citizen of the United States and a)) resident of this state, and at the time of his or her appointment shall have been a duly registered pharmacist under the laws of this state for a period of at least five consecutive years immediately preceding his or her appointment and shall at all times during his or her incumbency continue to be a duly licensed pharmacist: PROVIDED, That subject to the availability of qualified candidates the governor shall appoint pharmacist members representative of the areas of practice and geographically representative of the state of Washington.

The public member shall be a ((citizen of the United States and a)) resident of this state. The public member shall be appointed from the public at large, but shall not be affiliated with any aspect of pharmacy.

Members of the commission shall hold office for a term of four years, and the terms shall be staggered so that the terms of office of not more than two members will expire simultaneously on the third Monday in January of each year.

No person who has been appointed to and served for two four year terms shall be eligible for appointment to the commission.

Each member shall qualify by taking the usual oath of a state officer, which shall be filed with the secretary of state, and each member shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

In case of the resignation or disqualification of a member, or a vacancy occurring from any cause, the governor shall appoint a successor for the unexpired term.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.64.003 and 2013 c 19 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Members of the commission shall meet at such places and times as it shall determine and as often as necessary to discharge the duties imposed upon it. The commission shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its members. A majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. The commission is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. Each member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.64.005 and 2013 c 19 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Regulate the practice of pharmacy and enforce all laws placed under its jurisdiction;

(2) Prepare or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading of, examinations for applicants for pharmacists' licenses;

(3) Establish the qualifications for licensure of pharmacists or pharmacy interns;

(4) Conduct hearings for the revocation or suspension of licenses, permits, registrations, certificates, or any other authority to practice granted by the commission, which hearings may also be conducted by an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW or a presiding officer designated by the commission. The commission may authorize the secretary, or their designee, to serve as the presiding officer for any disciplinary proceedings of the commission authorized under this chapter. The presiding officer shall not vote on or make any final decision in cases pertaining to standards of practice or where clinical expertise is necessary. All functions performed by the presiding officer shall be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(5) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any hearing, or disciplinary proceeding held under this chapter or any other chapter assigned to the commission;

(6) Assist the regularly constituted enforcement agencies of this state in enforcing all laws pertaining to drugs, controlled substances, and the practice of pharmacy, or any other laws or rules under its jurisdiction;

(7) Promulgate rules for the dispensing, distribution, wholesaling, and manufacturing of drugs and devices and the practice of pharmacy for the protection and promotion of the public health, safety, and welfare. Violation of any such rules shall constitute grounds for refusal, suspension, or revocation of licenses or any other authority to practice issued by the commission;

(8) Adopt rules establishing and governing continuing education requirements for pharmacists and other licensees applying for renewal of licenses under this chapter;

(9) Be immune, collectively and individually, from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed as members of the commission. Such immunity shall apply to employees of the department when acting in the course of disciplinary proceedings;

(10) Suggest strategies for preventing, reducing, and eliminating drug misuse, diversion, and abuse, including professional and public education, and treatment of persons misusing and abusing drugs;

(11) Conduct or encourage educational programs to be conducted to prevent the misuse, diversion, and abuse of drugs for health care practitioners and licensed or certified health care facilities;

(12) Monitor trends of drug misuse, diversion, and abuse and make periodic reports to disciplinary boards of licensed health care practitioners and education, treatment, and appropriate law enforcement agencies regarding these trends;

(13) Enter into written agreements with all other state and federal agencies with any responsibility for controlling drug misuse, diversion, or abuse and with health maintenance organizations, health care service contractors, and health care providers to assist and promote coordination of agencies responsible for ensuring compliance with controlled substances laws and to monitor observance of these laws and cooperation between these agencies. The department of social and health services, the department of labor and industries, and any other state agency including licensure disciplinary boards, shall refer all apparent instances of over-prescribing by practitioners and all apparent instances of legend drug overuse to the department. The department shall also encourage such referral by health maintenance organizations, health service contractors, and health care providers.

Sec. 16. RCW 18.64.310 and 2013 c 19 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Establish reasonable license and examination fees and fees for services to other agencies in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. In cases where there are unanticipated demands for services, the department may request payment for services directly from the agencies for whom the services are performed, to the extent that revenues or other funds are available. Drug-related investigations regarding licensed health care practitioners shall be funded by an appropriation to the department from the health professions account. The payment may be made on either an advance or a reimbursable basis as approved by the director of financial management;

(2) Employ, with confirmation by the commission, an executive officer, who shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW ((and who)). The executive officer shall be a pharmacist licensed in Washington((, and))or shall be licensed as a pharmacist in Washington within 180 days of hire. The executive officer shall employ inspectors, investigators, chemists, and other persons as necessary to assist it for any purpose which it may deem necessary;

(3) Investigate and prosecute, at the direction of the commission, including use of subpoena powers, violations of law or regulations under its jurisdiction or the jurisdiction of the commission;

(4) Make, at the direction of the commission, inspections and investigations of pharmacies and other places, including dispensing machines, in which drugs or devices are stored, held, compounded, dispensed, sold, or administered to the ultimate consumer, to take and analyze any drugs or devices and to seize and condemn any drugs or devices which are adulterated, misbranded, stored, held, dispensed, distributed, administered, or compounded in violation of or contrary to law. The written operating agreement between the department and the commission, as required by RCW 43.70.240 shall include provisions for the department to involve the commission in carrying out its duties required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may appoint members of panels of at least three members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission including, but not limited to, licensing, disciplinary, and adjudicative actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 18.59 RCW to read as follows:

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Sec. 19. RCW 18.59.120 and 2011 c 336 s 492 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established a board of occupational therapy practice. The board shall consist of five members appointed by the governor, who may consider the persons who are recommended for appointment by occupational therapy associations of the state. The members of the board shall be residents of the state. Four of the members shall have been engaged in rendering services to the public, teaching, or research in occupational therapy for at least five years immediately preceding their appointment. Three of these four board members shall be occupational therapists who shall at all times be holders of licenses for the practice of occupational therapy in the state, ((except for the initial members of the board,)) all of whom shall fulfill the requirements for licensure under this chapter. At least one member of the board shall be an occupational therapy assistant licensed to assist in the practice of occupational therapy, except for the initial member appointed to this position, who shall fulfill the requirements for licensure as a occupational therapy assistant under this chapter. The remaining member of the board shall be a member of the public with an interest in the rights of consumers of health services.

(2) ((The governor shall, within sixty days after June 7, 1984, appoint one member for a term of one year, two members for a term of two years, and two members for a term of three years.)) Appointments ((made thereafter)) shall be for three-year terms, but no person shall be appointed to serve more than two consecutive full terms. Terms shall begin on the first day of the calendar year and end on the last day of the calendar year or until successors are appointed, except for the initial appointed members, who shall serve through the last calendar day of the year in which they are appointed before commencing the terms prescribed by this section. The governor shall make appointments for vacancies in unexpired terms within ninety days after the vacancies occur.

(3) The board shall meet during the first month of each calendar year to select a chair and for other purposes. At least one additional meeting shall be held before the end of each calendar year. Further meetings may be convened at the call of the chair or the written request of any two board members. ((A majority of members of the board constitutes a quorum for all purposes.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public, except that the board may hold closed sessions to prepare, approve, grade, or administer examinations or, upon request of an applicant who fails an examination, to prepare a response indicating the reasons for the applicant's failure.

(((4) Members of the board shall receive compensation in the amount of fifty dollars for each day's attendance at proper meetings of the committee.))

Sec. 20. RCW 18.30.050 and 2002 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state board of denturists is created. The board shall consist of seven members appointed by the secretary as follows:

(a) Four members of the board must be denturists licensed under this chapter, except initial appointees, who must have five years' experience in the field of denturism or a related field.

(b) Two members shall be selected from persons who are not affiliated with any health care profession or facility, at least one of whom must be over sixty-five years of age representing the elderly.

(c) One member must be a dentist licensed in the state of Washington.

(2) The members of the board shall serve for terms of three years. ((The terms of the initial members shall be staggered, with the members appointed under subsection (1)(a) of this section serving two-year and three-year terms initially and the members appointed under subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section serving one-year, two-year, and three-year terms initially. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments are made.)) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacant position.

(3) No appointee may serve more than two consecutive terms.

(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) A member of the board may be removed for just cause by the secretary.

Sec. 21. RCW 18.30.060 and 1995 c 1 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall elect a chairperson of the board annually. The same person may not hold the office of chairperson for more than three years in succession.

(2) ((A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for all purposes, and a majority vote of the members voting governs the decisions of the board.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 22. RCW 18.36A.150 and 2011 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created the board of naturopathy consisting of seven members appointed by the governor to four-year terms. Five members of the board shall be persons licensed under this chapter and two shall be members of the public. No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Members hold office until their successors are appointed. ((The governor may appoint the initial members of the board to staggered terms from one to four years. Thereafter, all))All members shall be appointed to full four-year terms.

(2) The public members of the board may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering services regulated under this chapter, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of services regulated under this chapter.

(3) The board shall elect officers each year. The board shall meet at least twice each year and may hold additional meetings as called by the chair. Meetings of the board are open to the public, except that the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The department shall provide secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as required by the board.

(4) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

(6) The board may appoint members to panels of at least three members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the board.

(7) The board may adopt such rules as are consistent with this chapter as may be deemed necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(8) The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office. Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of the board has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, he or she shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the cause for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall immediately send a certified copy of the order of removal and statement of causes by certified mail to the last known post office address of the member. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.

Sec. 23. RCW 18.54.030 and 2011 c 336 s 489 are each amended to read as follows:

The initial composition of the optometry board includes the three members of the examining committee for optometry plus two more optometrists to be appointed by the governor.

The governor must make all appointments to the optometry board. Only optometrists who are ((citizens of the United States,)) residents of this state, having been licensed to practice and practicing optometry in this state for a period of at least four years immediately preceding the effective date of appointment, and who have no connection ((with any school or college embracing the teaching of optometry or)) with any optical supply business may be appointed.

((The governor may set the terms of office of the initial board at his or her discretion, to establish the following perpetual succession: The terms of the initial board include one position for one year, two for two years, and two for three years; and upon the expiration of the terms of the initial board, all))All appointments are for three years.

In addition to the members specified in this section, the governor shall appoint a consumer member of the board, who shall serve for a term of three years.

In the event that a vacancy occurs on the board in the middle of an appointee's term, the governor must appoint a successor for the unexpired portion of the term only.

Sec. 24. RCW 18.54.060 and 1963 c 25 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((Three members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the board))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 25. RCW 18.54.130 and 1984 c 287 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

Members of the board are entitled to receive their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Each member of the board will also be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Sec. 26. RCW 18.35.150 and 2014 c 189 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created hereby the board of hearing and speech to govern the three separate professions: Hearing aid specialist, audiology, and speech-language pathology. The board shall consist of eleven members to be appointed by the governor.

(2) Members of the board shall be residents of this state. Three members shall represent the public and shall have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services, and shall not be or have been a member of, or married to a member of, another licensing board, a licensee of a health occupation board, an employee of a health facility, nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision of health services at any level of responsibility. Two members shall be hearing aid specialists who are licensed under this chapter, have at least five years of experience in the practice of hearing instrument fitting and dispensing, and must be actively engaged in fitting and dispensing within two years of appointment. Two members of the board shall be audiologists licensed under this chapter who have at least five years of experience in the practice of audiology and must be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. Two members of the board shall be speech-language pathologists licensed under this chapter who have at least five years of experience in the practice of speech-language pathology and must be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. One advisory nonvoting member shall be a speech-language pathology assistant certified in Washington. One advisory nonvoting member shall be a medical physician licensed in the state of Washington.

(3) The term of office of a member is three years. ((Of the initial appointments, one hearing aid specialist, one speech-language pathologist, one audiologist, and one consumer shall be appointed for a term of two years, and one hearing aid specialist, one speech-language pathologist, one audiologist, and two consumers shall be appointed for a term of three years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be made for expired terms.)) No member shall be appointed to serve more than two consecutive terms. A member shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed. The governor shall either reappoint the member or appoint a successor to assume the member's duties at the expiration of his or her predecessor's term. A vacancy in the office of a member shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(4) The chair shall rotate annually among the hearing aid specialists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, and public members serving on the board. In the absence of the chair, the board shall appoint an interim chair. In event of a tie vote, the issue shall be brought to a second vote and the chair shall refrain from voting.

(5) The board shall meet at least once each year, at a place, day and hour determined by the board, unless otherwise directed by a majority of board members. The board shall also meet at such other times and places as are requested by the department or by three members of the board. ((A quorum is a majority of the board. A hearing aid specialist, speech-language pathologist, and audiologist must be represented.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. Meetings of the board shall be open and public, except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.

(6) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240))43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The governor may remove a member of the board for cause at the recommendation of a majority of the board.

Sec. 27. RCW 18.57.003 and 2017 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created an agency of the state of Washington, consisting of eleven individuals appointed by the governor to be known as the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery.

On expiration of the term of any member, the governor shall appoint for a period of five years a qualified individual to take the place of such member. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which such member is appointed or until a successor shall have been appointed and shall have qualified. Initial appointments shall be made and vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.

Each member of the board shall be ((a citizen of the United States and must be)) an actual resident of this state. Two members must be consumers who have neither a financial nor a fiduciary relationship to a health care delivery system, one member must have been in active practice as a licensed osteopathic physician assistant in this state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment, and every other member must have been in active practice as a licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon in this state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment.

The board shall elect a chairperson((, a secretary,)) and a vice chairperson from its members. Meetings of the board shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the board shall determine and at such other times and places as the board deems necessary.

((An affirmative vote of a simple majority of the members present at a meeting or hearing shall be required for the board to take any official action. The board may not take any action without a quorum of the board members present. A simple majority of the board members currently serving constitutes a quorum of the board.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Any member of the board may be removed by the governor for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or upon written request of two-thirds of the physicians licensed under this chapter and in active practice in this state.

Sec. 28. RCW 18.57.003 and 2020 c 80 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created an agency of the state of Washington, consisting of eleven individuals appointed by the governor to be known as the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery.

On expiration of the term of any member, the governor shall appoint for a period of five years a qualified individual to take the place of such member. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which such member is appointed or until a successor shall have been appointed and shall have qualified. Initial appointments shall be made and vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.

Each member of the board shall be ((a citizen of the United States and must be)) an actual resident of this state. Two members must be consumers who have neither a financial nor a fiduciary relationship to a health care delivery system, and every other member must have been in active practice as a licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon in this state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment.

The board shall elect a chairperson((, a secretary,)) and a vice chairperson from its members. Meetings of the board shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the board shall determine and at such other times and places as the board deems necessary.

((An affirmative vote of a simple majority of the members present at a meeting or hearing shall be required for the board to take any official action. The board may not take any action without a quorum of the board members present. A simple majority of the board members currently serving constitutes a quorum of the board.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Any member of the board may be removed by the governor for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or upon written request of two-thirds of the physicians licensed under this chapter and in active practice in this state.

Sec. 29. RCW 18.22.014 and 2020 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall meet at the places and times it determines and as often as necessary to discharge its duties. The board shall elect a chairperson((,))and a vice chairperson((, and secretary)) from among its members. Members must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 in addition to travel expenses provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. ((A simple majority of the board members currently serving constitutes a quorum of the board.))A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Sec. 30. RCW 18.200.060 and 1997 c 285 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary has the authority to appoint an advisory committee to further the purposes of this chapter. The secretary may consider the persons who are recommended for appointment by the orthotic and prosthetic associations of the state. The committee is composed of five members, one member initially appointed for a term of one year, two for a term of two years, and two for a term of three years. Subsequent appointments are for terms of three years. No person may serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms. Members of the advisory committee must be residents of this state ((and citizens of the United States)). The committee is composed of three individuals licensed in the category designated and engaged in rendering services to the public. Two members must at all times be holders of licenses for the practice of either prosthetics or orthotics, or both, in this state, except for the initial members of the advisory committee, all of whom must fulfill the requirements for licensure under this chapter. One member must be a practicing orthotist. One member must be a practicing prosthetist. One member must be licensed by the state as a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, specializing in orthopedic medicine or surgery or physiatry. Two members must represent the public at large and be unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the profession being credentialed but, to the extent possible, be consumers of orthotic and prosthetic services. The two members appointed to the advisory committee representing the public at large must have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services and must not be or have been a licensee of a health occupation committee or an employee of a health facility, nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision of health services at any level of responsibility.

(2) The secretary may remove any member of the advisory committee for cause as specified by rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) The advisory committee may provide advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the secretary, such as applications for licenses.

(4) The advisory committee may be requested by the secretary to approve an examination required for licensure under this chapter.

(5) The advisory committee may be requested by the secretary to review and monitor the exemptions to requirements of certain orthoses and prostheses in this chapter and recommend to the secretary any statutory changes that may be needed to properly protect the public.

(6) The advisory committee, at the request of the secretary, may recommend rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, relating to standards for appropriateness of orthotic and prosthetic care.

(7) The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the secretary and hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the secretary. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A majority of the members currently serving constitute a quorum.

(8) Each member of an advisory committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committees shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of their committees.

(9) The secretary, members of advisory committees, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 31. RCW 18.25.0165 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

Members must be ((citizens of the United States and)) residents of this state. Members must be licensed chiropractors for a period of five years before appointment. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

Sec. 32. RCW 18.79.070 and 2005 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state nursing care quality assurance commission is established, consisting of fifteen members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms. The governor shall consider nursing members who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state. No person may serve as a member of the commission for more than two consecutive full terms.

(2) There must be seven registered nurse members, two advanced registered nurse practitioner members, three licensed practical nurse members, and three public members on the commission. Each member of the commission must be a ((citizen of the United States and a)) resident of this state.

(3)(a) Registered nurse members of the commission must:

(i) Be licensed as registered nurses under this chapter; and

(ii) Have had at least three years' experience in the active practice of nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of appointment.

(b) In addition:

(i) At least one member must be on the faculty at a four-year university nursing program;

(ii) At least one member must be on the faculty at a two-year community college nursing program;

(iii) At least two members must be staff nurses providing direct patient care; and

(iv) At least one member must be a nurse manager or a nurse executive.

(4) Advanced registered nurse practitioner members of the commission must:

(a) Be licensed as advanced registered nurse practitioners under this chapter; and

(b) Have had at least three years' experience in the active practice of advanced registered nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of appointment.

(5) Licensed practical nurse members of the commission must:

(a) Be licensed as licensed practical nurses under this chapter; and

(b) Have had at least three years' actual experience as a licensed practical nurse and have been engaged in practice as a practical nurse within two years of appointment.

(6) Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the governor appoint the existing members of the board of nursing and the board of practical nursing repealed under chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. The governor may appoint initial members of the commission to staggered terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed to full four-year terms. Members of the commission hold office until their successors are appointed.

When the secretary appoints pro tem members, reasonable efforts shall be made to ensure that at least one pro tem member is a registered nurse who is currently practicing and, in addition to meeting other minimum qualifications, has graduated from an associate or baccalaureate nursing program within three years of appointment.

Sec. 33. RCW 18.71.015 and 2019 c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington medical commission is established, consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state of Washington under this chapter, two individuals who are licensed in the state of Washington as physician assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, and six individuals who are members of the public. At least two of the public members shall not be from the health care industry. Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in the state must be represented by at least one physician member of the commission. The terms of office of members of the commission are not affected by changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor((. Members of the initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms of one to four years)), and ((thereafter)) all terms of appointment shall be for four years. The governor shall consider such physician and physician assistant members who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state. ((In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the board of medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under section 336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.)) No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed.

Each member of the commission must be ((a citizen of the United States, must be)) an actual resident of this state, and, if a physician or physician assistant, must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state for at least five years.

The commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the commission determines and at such other times and places as the commission deems necessary. A majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to pass any measure. The commission may appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.

Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member.

Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.

The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.

Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed members of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34. Section 27 of this act expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35. Section 28 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022.

--- END ---