BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The semiquincentennial committee is established with members as provided in this subsection:

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(c) The lieutenant governor, or their designee;

(d) The secretary of state, or their designee;

(e) The superintendent of public instruction, or their designee;

(f) The director of the governor's office of Indian affairs, or their designee;

(g) The director of the Washington state historical society, or their designee;

(h) The director of the eastern Washington state historical society, or their designee;

(i) The director of the department of archaeology and historic preservation, or their designee;

(j) The director of Washington state parks, or their designee;

(k) The director of the department of commerce, or their designee;

(l) The director of the Washington state arts commission, or their designee;

(m) One member selected by the commission on African American affairs;

(n) One member selected by the commission on Asian American affairs;

(o) One member selected by the commission on Hispanic affairs;

(p) One member selected by the LGBTQ commission;

(q) One member selected by the women's commission;

(r) One member representing humanities Washington, appointed by the governor.

(2) The committee may invite additional persons it deems necessary to serve as honorary members of the committee.

(3) The lieutenant governor shall serve as chair of the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The semiquincentennial committee shall coordinate and provide guidance for Washington's official observance of the 250th anniversary of the founding of the United States, as marked by the Declaration of Independence in 1776.

(2) The committee may:

(a) Cooperate with national, regional, statewide, and local entities promoting the semiquincentennial;

(b) Assist, plan, or conduct semiquincentennial events;

(c) Support, plan, or produce educational resources and programs related to the semiquincentennial;

(d) Engage in or encourage fundraising activities including revenue-generating enterprises, as well as the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations;

(e) Coordinate interagency participation in the observance;

(f) Create subcommittees comprised of committee members, honorary members, and community members to further the goals of the committee; and

(g) Perform other related duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The semiquincentennial committee is attached to the Washington state historical society for administrative purposes. Accordingly, the society shall:

(a) Direct and supervise the budgeting, recordkeeping, reporting, and related administrative and clerical functions of the committee;

(b) Include the committee's budgetary requests in the society's departmental budget;

(c) Collect all nonappropriated revenues for the committee and deposit them in the proper fund or account;

(d) Provide staff support for the committee; and

(e) Print and disseminate for the committee any required notices, rules, or orders adopted by the committee.

(2) The Washington state historical society may employ personnel, contract for services, and receive, expend, and allocate gifts, grants, and donations on behalf of the committee. The society shall expend and allocate any appropriations authorized by the legislature to carry out the purposes of the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The semiquincentennial account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only to finance the activities of the semiquincentennial committee. Only the lieutenant governor and the director of the Washington state historical society may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The semiquincentennial committee shall submit a yearly report of its activities to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act expires June 30, 2027.

--- END ---