BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) A legislative work group is established to study and make recommendations on a monument on the capitol campus to honor service members who died in the global war on terror. The work group membership shall be composed of:

(i) The secretary of state or his or her designee;

(ii) One member from each of the four major caucuses of the legislature;

(iii) The director of the department of veterans affairs or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the Washington state parks and recreation commission or his or her designee;

(v) The director of the department of enterprise services or his or her designee;

(vi) The director of the Washington state military department or his or her designee;

(vii) The state archivist or his or her designee;

(viii) A representative of the capitol campus design advisory committee that is not the secretary of state or a legislative member already designated to be part of the work group; and

(ix) Two representatives from veterans organizations appointed by the secretary of state.

(b) The work group shall choose two cochairs from among its membership. The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the work group before July 15, 2022.

(2) The work group shall:

(a) Provide the names of the recommended individuals to be honored at the memorial;

(b) Recommend locations where the memorial could be constructed on the capitol campus and provide any permit requirements or other restrictions that may exist for each location;

(c) Provide potential draft designs that could be used for the memorial;

(d) Provide information regarding the anticipated funding needed for:

(i) The design, construction, and placement of the memorial;

(ii) Any permits that may be required;

(iii) Anticipated ongoing maintenance cost for the memorial based on potential materials used and historical maintenance of other memorials on campus; and

(iv) An unveiling ceremony or other expenses that may be necessary for the memorial;

(e) Make recommendations regarding the funding sources that may be available, which may include solicitation of private funds or a method for obtaining the necessary funds; and

(f) Make recommendations regarding an agency, committee, or commission to coordinate the design, construction, and placement of a memorial on the capitol campus.

(3) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the senate committee services, the house of representatives office of program research, and staff of the office of the secretary of state.

(4) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) The work group shall submit a report of its recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2023.

(6) This section expires November 1, 2024.

--- END ---