BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.210.080 and 2007 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The attendance of every child at every public and private school in the state and licensed day care center shall be conditioned upon the presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance at a particular school or center, of proof of either (a) full immunization, (b) the initiation of and compliance with a schedule of immunization, as required by rules of the state board of health, or (c) a certificate of exemption as provided for in RCW 28A.210.090. The attendance at the school or the day care center during any subsequent school year of a child who has initiated a schedule of immunization shall be conditioned upon the presentation of proof of compliance with the schedule on the child's first day of attendance during the subsequent school year. Once proof of full immunization or proof of completion of an approved schedule has been presented, no further proof shall be required as a condition to attendance at the particular school or center.

(2) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if, pursuant to RCW 28A.210.140, the state board of health adds COVID-19 vaccination to the requirements for full immunization, the attendance of a child in a public or private school shall not be conditioned upon proof of vaccination for COVID-19 unless the school district affirmatively adopts the COVID-19 vaccination requirement for that district.

(3)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public and private school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with information about meningococcal disease and its vaccine at the beginning of every school year. The information about meningococcal disease shall include:

(i) Its causes and symptoms, how meningococcal disease is spread, and the places where parents and guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their children; and

(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for meningococcal disease and where the vaccination can be received.

(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the department of health or the school to provide meningococcal vaccination to students.

(c) The department of health shall prepare the informational materials and shall consult with the office of superintendent of public instruction.

(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.

(((3)))(4)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with information about human papillomavirus disease and its vaccine at the beginning of every school year. The information about human papillomavirus disease shall include:

(i) Its causes and symptoms, how human papillomavirus disease is spread, and the places where parents and guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their children; and

(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for human papillomavirus disease and where the vaccination can be received.

(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the department of health or the school to provide human papillomavirus vaccination to students.

(c) The department of health shall prepare the informational materials and shall consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.

(((4)))(5) Private schools are required by state law to notify parents that information on the human papillomavirus disease prepared by the department of health is available.

--- END ---