BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that equitable public policy discussions should include individuals directly impacted by that policy. In order to do so, the legislature supports removing barriers to that participation. The legislature finds that asking community members with lower financial means to volunteer their time and expertise while state employees and representatives of advocacy organizations receive compensation from their respective agency or organization for their time and experience ultimately hinders full and open public participation. As a result, the legislature finds that removing financial barriers for those individuals fosters increased access to government and enriches public policy discussions and decisions, ultimately leading to more equitable and sustainable policy outcomes.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.03.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 55 and 2011 c 5 s 902 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any part-time board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group which is established by the executive, legislative, or judicial branch to participate in state government and which functions primarily in an advisory, coordinating, or planning capacity shall be identified as a class one group. Unless otherwise identified in law, all newly formed and existing groups are a class one group.

(2) Absent any other provision of law to the contrary, no money beyond the customary reimbursement or allowance for expenses may be paid by or through the state to members of class one groups for attendance at meetings of such groups, except as provided in this subsection.

(a) Subject to available funding, an agency may provide a stipend to individuals who are low income or have lived experience to support their participation in class one groups when the agency determines such participation is desirable in order to implement the principles of equity described in RCW 43.06D.020, provided that the individuals are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings.

(b) Stipends shall not exceed $200 for each day during which the member attends an official meeting or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group.

(c) Individuals eligible for stipends under this section are eligible for reasonable allowances for child and adult care reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 in addition to stipend amounts.

(d) Nothing in this subsection creates an employment relationship, or any membership or qualification in any state or other publicly supported retirement system, for this or any other title due to the payment of a stipend, lodging and travel expenses, or child care expenses provided under this section where such a relationship, membership, or qualification did not already exist.

(e) As allowable by federal and state law, state agencies will minimize, to the greatest extent possible, the impact of stipends and reimbursements on public assistance eligibility and benefit amounts.

(3)(((a) No person designated as a member of a class one board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under RCW 43.03.049.)) Class one groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one location only when necessary or required by law.

(((b)))(4) Class one groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting formats that do not require travel.

(5) For purposes of this section, "low income" means an individual whose income is not more than 400 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.802 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group established by statute or executive order, the superintendent of public instruction may appoint advisory groups on subject matters within the superintendent's responsibilities or as may be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the federal department. The advisory groups shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the superintendent may determine.

Members of advisory groups under the authority of the superintendent may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Except as provided in this section or as authorized by RCW 43.03.220, members of advisory groups under the authority of the superintendent are volunteering their services and are not eligible for compensation. A person is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group if the person (1) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, as a certificated employee of a local school district; (2) is participating as part of their employment with the local school district; and (3) the meeting or duties are performed outside the period in which school days as defined by RCW 28A.150.030 are conducted. The superintendent may reimburse local school districts for substitute certificated employees to enable members to meet or perform duties on school days. A person is eligible to receive compensation from federal funds in an amount to be determined by personal service contract for groups required by federal law.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.03.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of financial management shall prescribe reasonable allowances to cover reasonable and necessary subsistence and lodging expenses for elective and appointive officials and state employees while engaged on official business away from their designated posts of duty. The director of financial management may prescribe and regulate the allowances provided in lieu of subsistence and lodging expenses and may prescribe the conditions under which reimbursement for subsistence and lodging may be allowed. The schedule of allowances adopted by the office of financial management may include special allowances for foreign travel and other travel involving higher than usual costs for subsistence and lodging. The allowances established by the director shall not exceed the rates set by the federal government for federal employees. However, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the allowances for any county that is part of a metropolitan statistical area, the largest city of which is in another state, shall equal the allowances prescribed for that larger city.

(2) Those persons appointed to serve without compensation on any state board, commission, or committee, if entitled to payment of travel expenses, shall be paid pursuant to special per diem rates prescribed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section by the office of financial management.

(3) The director of financial management may prescribe reasonable allowances to cover reasonable expenses for meals, coffee, and light refreshment served to elective and appointive officials and state employees regardless of travel status at a meeting where: (a) The purpose of the meeting is to conduct official state business or to provide formal training to state employees or state officials; (b) the meals, coffee, or light refreshment are an integral part of the meeting or training session; (c) the meeting or training session takes place away from the employee's or official's regular workplace; and (d) the agency head or authorized designee approves payments in advance for the meals, coffee, or light refreshment. In order to prevent abuse, the director may regulate such allowances and prescribe additional conditions for claiming the allowances.

(4) Upon approval of the agency head or authorized designee, an agency may serve coffee or light refreshments at a meeting where: (a) The purpose of the meeting is to conduct state business or to provide formal training that benefits the state; and (b) the coffee or light refreshment is an integral part of the meeting or training session. The director of financial management shall adopt requirements necessary to prohibit abuse of the authority authorized in this subsection.

(5) The director of financial management shall prescribe reasonable allowances to cover reasonable and necessary child and adult care expenses incurred by members of a class one board, commission, council, committee, or similar group while attending an official meeting or performing statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group.

(6) The schedule of allowances prescribed by the director under the terms of this section and any subsequent increases in any maximum allowance or special allowances for areas of higher than usual costs shall be reported to the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate at each regular session of the legislature.

(((6)))(7) No person designated as a member of a class one through class three or class five board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund((. Exceptions may be granted)), unless authorized under RCW 43.03.220 or granted an exception under RCW 43.03.049.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.03.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever it becomes necessary for elective or appointive officials or employees of the state to travel away from their designated posts of duty while engaged on official business, and it is found to be more advantageous or economical to the state that travel be by a privately-owned vehicle rather than a common carrier or a state-owned or operated vehicle, a mileage rate established by the director of financial management shall be allowed. The mileage rate established by the director shall not exceed any rate set by the United States treasury department above which the substantiation requirements specified in Treasury Department Regulations section 1.274-5T(a)(1), as now law or hereafter amended, will apply.

(2) The director of financial management may prescribe and regulate the specific mileage rate or other allowance for the use of privately-owned vehicles or common carriers on official business and the conditions under which reimbursement of transportation costs may be allowed. The reimbursement or other payment for transportation expenses of any employee or appointive official of the state shall be based on the method deemed most advantageous or economical to the state.

(3) The mileage rate established by the director of financial management pursuant to this section and any subsequent changes thereto shall be reported to the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate at each regular session of the legislature.

(4) No person designated as a member of a class one through class three or class five board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund((. Exceptions may be granted)), unless authorized under RCW 43.03.220 or granted an exception under RCW 43.03.049.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An agency exercising its authority to provide stipends under RCW 43.03.220(2) must report to the Washington state office of equity not later than August 30, 2023, as follows:

(a) A brief description of the groups for which stipends have been made available;

(b) An accounting of the stipends provided; and

(c) An analysis of whether and how the availability of stipends has reduced barriers to participation and increased the diversity of group participants.

(2) The Washington state office of equity shall:

(a) Compile and analyze the information received from agencies under this section;

(b) Consult with stakeholder communities; and

(c) Prepare a report to the governor and legislature by August 30, 2024. The report must include an overall evaluation of the stipend process authorized in RCW 43.03.220(2), recommendations for improving the process, and recommendations to further decrease barriers to participation and increase the diversity of group applicants.

--- END ---