BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.86.050 and 2021 c 302 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account is created in the state treasury. ((All receipts from the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line tax imposed pursuant to this chapter must be deposited into the account))The account is funded through state general fund appropriations. Moneys may only be spent after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for (a) ensuring the efficient and effective routing of calls made to the 988 crisis hotline to an appropriate crisis hotline center or crisis call center hub; and (b) personnel and the provision of acute behavioral health, crisis outreach, and crisis stabilization services, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, by directly responding to the 988 crisis hotline.

(3) Moneys in the account may not be used to supplant general fund appropriations for behavioral health services or for medicaid covered services to individuals enrolled in the medicaid program.

Sec. 2. 2021 c 302 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the department of health and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The sum of $23,016,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023, from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund. The amount in this subsection is provided solely for the department to route calls to and contract for the operations of call centers and call center hubs. This includes funding for operations, training, and call center information technology and program staff.

(2) The sum of $1,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023, from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund. The amount in this subsection is provided solely for the department to contract for the development and operations of a tribal crisis line.

(3) The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are each appropriated: $189,000 from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023; and $80,000 from the state general fund—federal account for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the department to provide staff support necessary to critically analyze the planning, development, and implementation of technology solutions to create the technical and operational plan pursuant to section 109 of this act.

(4) The sum of $420,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023, from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund. The amount in this subsection is provided solely for the department to participate in and provide support to the committee created in section 103 of this act.

Sec. 3. 2021 c 302 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the state health care authority and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The following sums, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are each appropriated: $770,000 from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023; and $326,000 from the state general fund—federal account for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the authority to provide staff and contracted support necessary to critically analyze the planning, development, and implementation of technology solutions to create the technical and operational plan pursuant to section 109 of this act.

(2) The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are each appropriated: $644,000 from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023; and $127,000 from the state general fund—federal account for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the authority to participate in and provide support to the committee created in section 103 of this act.

(3) The following sums, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are each appropriated: $381,000 from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023; and $381,000 from the state general fund—federal account for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the authority to fulfill its duties as described in section 102(8) of this act. This includes funding for collaboration with managed care organizations, county authorities, and behavioral health administrative services organizations related to crisis services, and the development of processes and best practices for crisis services.

Sec. 4. 2021 c 302 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The sum of $200,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023, from the ((statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account))state general fund to the office of financial management and provided solely to provide staff and contracted services support to the committee created in section 103 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.86.020 (Tax imposed) and 2021 c 302 s 202;

(2) RCW 82.86.030 (Collection of tax) and 2021 c 302 s 203; and

(3) RCW 82.86.040 (Payment and collection) and 2021 c 302 s 204.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---