BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall hire two permanent, full-time employees to regularly review and maintain the no-paid services caseload. This includes, but is not limited to, updating the no-paid services caseload to accurately reflect a current headcount of eligible individuals and identifying the number of individuals contacted who are currently interested in receiving a paid service from the developmental disabilities administration and if the individual would like services now or within the next year. Beginning December 1, 2022, the department shall annually report this information to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(2) A client on the no-paid services caseload shall receive case resource management services. The case resource manager's duties include: (a) Contacting and responding to the client to discuss the client's service needs, and (b) explaining to the client the service options available through the department or other community resources.

--- END ---