BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.12.085 and 2019 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall adopt rules to liberalize bag limits for bass, walleye, and channel catfish in all anadromous waters of the state in order to reduce the predation risk to salmon smolts.

(2) The commission must adopt rules limiting bag limits for warm water game fish according to scientific studies that are in the best interest of the warm water species in nonanadromous waters currently supporting fishable quantities of said species with the intent to maintain healthy and vibrant long-term fisheries. Limits proposed in excess of five fish per day must be accompanied by the results of an appropriate scientific study supporting the need for the higher limits and must be monitored until the need is no longer necessary.

--- END ---