BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department shall replace the offender management network information system at the department with a more efficient and technologically advanced system.

(b) The department shall conduct a feasibility study on replacing or modernizing the offender management network information system, and identify the sequence of steps and schedule for replacing or modernizing the system, including replacing or modernizing a particular module or function of the system as an initial step to replacing or modernizing the entire offender management network information system. The department shall update business and technical requirements and use a competitive request for a proposal process to replace the offender management network information system under this section.

(c) The department shall leverage existing resources, development plans, and funding to continue to advance any progress already made in replacing or modernizing the offender management network information system.

(2)(a) The department shall update business and technical requirements and use a competitive request for proposal process to implement a comprehensive electronic health records system at the department.

(b) The comprehensive electronic health records system implemented by the department shall be able to communicate with information and data systems used by managed care organizations, the department of health, and local jails for purposes of care coordination activities.

(c) The department shall leverage existing resources, development plans, and funding to continue to advance any progress already made in implementing a comprehensive electronic health records system.

(3) By December 1st each year, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature with updates on progress made towards replacing the offender management network information system and implementing a comprehensive electronic health records system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2022, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---