BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The health care authority shall work with managed care organizations to implement a seven percent average rate increase in reimbursement for provision of covered inpatient, residential, or outpatient behavioral health services to medicaid clients by licensed and certified community behavioral health agencies, for the purpose of improving employee recruitment and retention, in comparison to rates established in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, to be effective July 1, 2022. The authority may employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure funding provided to managed care organizations under this subsection is used for the intended purpose, and shall verify that funds appropriated are used for their intended purpose pursuant to the process established under RCW 71.24.885.

(2) The health care authority shall require managed care organizations to track and report to the authority how funds provided under subsection (1) of this section are used by community behavioral health agencies to improve employee recruitment and retention, including data on vacancy rates, turnover metrics, and wage growth in community behavioral health agencies. The authority shall require basic auditing of these expenditures. The authority shall report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature annually by December 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of $10,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, from the general fund to the state health care authority for the purpose of providing bridge funding to community behavioral health agencies participating in federal certified community behavioral health clinic expansion grant programs to sustain their continued level of operations following expiration of federal grant funding during the planning process for adoption of the certified community behavioral health clinic model statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires June 30, 2024.

--- END ---