BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.343.400 and 1987 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each member of the board of directors of a school district may receive compensation ((of fifty dollars per day or portion thereof))not to exceed the amounts provided in subsection (2) of this section, for attending board meetings and for performing other services on behalf of the school district((, not to exceed four thousand eight hundred dollars per year,)) if the district board of directors has authorized by board resolution, at a regularly scheduled meeting, the provision of such compensation. A board of directors of a school district may authorize such compensation only from locally collected excess levy funds available for that purpose, and compensation for board members shall not cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.

(2) A member of the board of directors of a school district may receive compensation either at a daily amount of $50 per day or a portion thereof not to exceed $5,000 per year, or up to the following amount:

(a) $5,000 per year if the district has a total student enrollment of fewer than 2,500 students;

(b) $10,000 per year if the district has a total student enrollment of 2,500 students or more but fewer than 6,250 students;

(c) $15,000 per year if the district has a total student enrollment of 6,250 students or more but fewer than 10,000 students;

(d) $20,000 per year if the district has a total student enrollment of 10,000 students or more but fewer than 20,000 students;

(e) $25,000 per year if the district has a total student enrollment of 20,000 students or more but fewer than 30,000 students;

(f) $30,000 per year if the district has a total student enrollment of 30,000 or more students.

(3) Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the director's election and before the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(4) The compensation provided in this section shall be in addition to any reimbursement for expenses paid to such directors by the school district.

(5) The dollar thresholds for salaries and per diem compensation established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1, 2023, based upon changes in the inflationary index during that time period. For the purposes of this section, the office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

(6) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Inflationary index" means, for any school year, the implicit price deflator for that fiscal year, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of economic analysis, United States department of commerce.

(b) "Total student enrollment" means the three-year rolling annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment, based on the prior school year.

--- END ---