BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds there are health risks associated with COVID-19 vaccines that the public should be aware of in order to make informed personal health care decisions related to vaccination. Although effective against the virus, the vaccines also carry associated health risks especially in those with a history of allergic reactions to vaccine ingredients. Therefore, the legislature intends to require providers of the COVID-19 vaccines to inform vaccine recipients of the potential health risks of the COVID-19 vaccines at the time of vaccination to empower citizens to make informed decisions about their health care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Before administering a COVID-19 vaccine, a health care provider licensed under this title must inform the patient in writing:

(a) Of all potential adverse reactions to the vaccine identified by centers for disease control and the food and drug administration, including, but not limited to:

(i) Pain, redness, or swelling at the injection site;

(ii) Tiredness;

(iii) Headache;

(iv) Muscle pain;

(v) Chills;

(vi) Fever;

(vii) Nausea;

(viii) An increased risk of blood clots for certain populations; and

(ix) An increased risk of heart inflammation for certain populations.

(b) That adverse reactions to COVID-19 vaccines can pose the risk of death; and

(c) That the first COVID-19 vaccines available in the United States were approved by the food and drug administration under an emergency use authorization.

(2) Before receiving the vaccine, the patient must certify in writing that the information required to be provided under this section has been provided and that they consent to receiving the vaccine.

(3) Any provider who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of unprofessional conduct and may be subject to penalties pursuant to this chapter.

--- END ---