BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature may convene a special legislative session as follows:

(1) Members of the house of representatives or senate may present a proposed resolution for the convening of a special legislative session. A resolution calling for convening a special legislative session must be signed by at least one-third of the members of either house. If the signatories are members of the house of representatives, the resolution must be presented to the speaker of the house of representatives. If the signatories are members of the senate, the resolution must be presented to the lieutenant governor. The resolution shall set forth the date and time for convening the session, the duration of the session which shall not exceed 30 days, together with the purpose or purposes for which the session is called.

(2) The authority to place a resolution convening a special legislative session before the legislature is vested in the lieutenant governor or the speaker of the house of representatives.

(3) Upon the speaker of the house of representatives' receipt of a resolution convening a special legislative session, a vote of the house of representatives shall be taken on such resolution.

(4) Upon the lieutenant governor's receipt of a resolution convening a special legislative session, a vote of the senate shall be taken on such resolution.

(5) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall conduct the vote on the resolution by secure visual meeting technology of the members of their respective houses. At least 72 hours' notice must be provided before a vote on the resolution. The results of such vote shall be transmitted to the members of the legislature and shall be a public record and shall be entered upon the journal of the house of representatives and senate at the convening of the next legislative session.

(6) If two-thirds of the members elected or appointed to the chamber initially considering the resolution vote in favor of the resolution, then the resolution shall be transmitted to the other chamber.

(7) Upon receipt of a resolution from the other chamber of the legislature, the speaker of the house of representatives or the lieutenant governor shall cause a vote to be taken on the resolution in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsection (5) of this section.

(8) If two-thirds of the members elected or appointed to the second chamber considering the resolution vote in favor of the resolution, a special legislative session shall be convened in accordance with the resolution.

--- END ---