BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, a health carrier shall provide coverage without prior authorization for an annual mental health wellness exam of up to 60 minutes provided by a qualified mental health care provider.

(2) A mental health wellness exam may include, but is not limited to, a behavioral health screening, education and consultation on healthy lifestyle changes, referrals for ongoing treatment, and mental health services and supports.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified mental health care provider" means:

(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW or osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW who has a board certification in psychiatry or other behavioral health care area;

(b) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW with training in psychiatry or mental health;

(c) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW with training in psychiatric nursing;

(d) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; or

(e) A social worker, marriage and family therapist, or mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.017 and 2021 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, section 1 of this act, and chapter 48.49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall provide coverage under this chapter without prior authorization for an annual mental health wellness exam of up to 60 minutes provided by a qualified mental health care provider.

(2) A mental health wellness exam may include, but is not limited to, a behavioral health screening, education and consultation on healthy lifestyle changes, referrals for ongoing treatment, and mental health services and supports.

(3) In administering this program, the authority shall seek any available federal financial participation under the medical assistance program, as codified in Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's health insurance program, as codified in Title XXI of the federal social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now available or may become available.

(4) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified mental health care provider" means:

(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW or osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW who has a board certification in psychiatry or other behavioral health care area;

(b) A physician assistant license under chapter 18.71A RCW with training in psychiatry or mental health;

(c) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW with training in psychiatric nursing;

(d) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; or

(e) A social worker, marriage and family therapist, or mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

--- END ---