BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any drive-up service open to motor vehicle traffic, whether publicly or privately operated, must allow other multimodal transportation alternatives to access the services. However, if it is determined that a traffic safety hazard exists by mixing motor vehicle traffic with nonmotor vehicle traffic within the same lane, an alternative lane or lanes must be made available for other multimodal transportation alternatives.

(2) For purposes of this section, "other multimodal transportation alternatives" include access for bicyclists, pedestrians, and other nonmotor vehicle modes of transportation.

--- END ---