BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the Arthur Anderson and Raymond Mitchell tow operators safety act.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.184 and 1961 c 12 s 46.37.184 are each amended to read as follows:

All fire department vehicles in service shall be identified by red lights of an intermittent flashing type, visible from both front and rear for a distance of ((five hundred))500 feet under normal atmospheric conditions. Such red flashing lights shall be well separated from the headlights so that they will not black out when headlights are on. Such red flashing lights shall be in operation at all times when such vehicle is on emergency status. Fire department vehicles may also operate rear facing blue lights for use only at the scene of an emergency. The combination of red and blue lights may be used only at the scene of an emergency.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.37.196 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

All emergency tow trucks shall be identified by an intermittent or revolving red light capable of 360((°))degree visibility at a distance of five hundred feet under normal atmospheric conditions. ((This intermittent or revolving red light shall be used only at the scene of an emergency or accident, and it will be unlawful to use such light while traveling to or from an emergency or accident, or for any other purposes.))The emergency tow trucks may also operate rear facing blue lights for use only at the scene of an emergency or accident. The red lights may be used when the tow truck is reentering the roadway from the scene of an emergency or accident for a reasonable distance to reach operating speed from the scene, and the combination of red and blue lights may be used only at the scene of an emergency or accident. It is unlawful to use the combination of lights when traveling to or from the scene of an accident or for any other purpose.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.212 and 2019 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An emergency or work zone is defined as the adjacent lanes of the roadway ((two hundred))200 feet before and after:

(a) A stationary authorized emergency vehicle that is making use of audible and/or visual signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.190;

(b) A tow truck that is making use of visual ((red)) lights meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.196;

(c) Other vehicles providing roadside assistance that are making use of warning lights with ((three hundred sixty))360 degree visibility;

(d) A police vehicle properly and lawfully displaying a flashing, blinking, or alternating emergency light or lights; or

(e) A stationary or slow moving highway construction vehicle, highway maintenance vehicle, solid waste vehicle, or utility service vehicle making use of flashing lights that meet the requirements of RCW 46.37.300 or warning lights with ((three hundred sixty))360 degree visibility.

(2) The driver of any motor vehicle, upon approaching an emergency or work zone, shall:

(a) On a highway having four or more lanes, at least two of which are intended for traffic proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle, proceed with caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, and, if the opportunity exists, with due regard for safety and traffic conditions, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change or moving away from the lane or shoulder occupied by an emergency or work zone vehicle identified in subsection (1) of this section;

(b) On a highway having less than four lanes, proceed with caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, and, if the opportunity exists, with due regard for safety and traffic conditions, and under the rules of this chapter, yield the right-of-way by passing to the left at a safe distance and simultaneously yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the highway; or

(c) If changing lanes or moving away would be unsafe, proceed with due caution and continue to reduce the speed of the vehicle to at least ((ten))10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit, except for when the posted speed limit exceeds 60 miles per hour or more, then reduce the speed of the vehicle to 50 miles per hour or lower.

(3) A person may not drive a vehicle in an emergency or work zone at a speed greater than the posted speed limit or greater than what is permitted under subsection (2)(c) of this section.

(4) A person found to be in violation of this section, or any infraction relating to speed restrictions in an emergency or work zone, must be assessed a monetary penalty equal to twice the penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110. This penalty may not be waived, reduced, or suspended.

(5) A person who drives a vehicle in an emergency or work zone in such a manner as to endanger or be likely to endanger any emergency or work zone worker or property is guilty of reckless endangerment of emergency or work zone workers. A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The department shall suspend for ((sixty))60 days the driver's license, permit to drive, or nonresident driving privilege of a person convicted of reckless endangerment of emergency or work zone workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall develop an appropriate training module relating to the requirements of RCW 46.61.212, for inclusion in all new driver training curricula.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall provide each driver's license, identicard, instruction permit, intermediate license, and commercial driver's license applicant with written materials regarding the contents and requirements of RCW 46.61.212, the slow down and move over law, at the completion of the applicant's licensing transaction.

(2) The department shall place signage in each of the licensing service offices that provide background on the written materials that the applicant will receive regarding the slow down and move over law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall substantially increase the use of roadway signage and electronic display sign boards along roadways in the state to reflect the requirements and penalties associated with a violation of RCW 46.61.212.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. By January 31, 2023, the department of licensing and the Washington traffic safety commission, working independently or in collaboration or both, shall develop a statewide public awareness campaign to inform and educate Washington citizens about the slow down and move over law, RCW 46.61.212. The educational campaign must include the use of public service announcements and written and digital informative and educational materials distributed by all reasonable means possible. The department of licensing and the Washington traffic safety commission, working independently or in collaboration or both, shall develop the public awareness campaign using all available resources, as well as federal and other grant funds that may, from time to time, become available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 5 of this act takes effect October 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 6 of this act takes effect October 30, 2022.

--- END ---