BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 2022, the authority shall ensure the periodicity schedules for the early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment benefit provided under this chapter are aligned with the bright futures guidelines of the American academy of pediatrics or a comparable standard.

--- END ---