BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes clarity is necessary following the passage of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310, codified as chapter 10.120 RCW. The legislature recognizes and finds that RCW 10.120.020 did not prohibit investigatory detentions, known as Terry stops, or pat downs when, under the totality of the circumstances, such are authorized by law and of a reasonable scope and duration. It is the intent of the legislature in RCW 10.120.020 that peace officers will use the least amount of physical force necessary under the circumstances. The legislature intends to address the need for a definition of "physical force" in order to aid the attorney general's office in developing and publishing model policies to help implement chapter 10.120 RCW. This definition is needed to assure that there is a uniform and consistent meaning applied throughout the state and that the criminal justice training commission is providing training to that definition. It is the fundamental duty of law enforcement to preserve and protect all human life.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.120.010 and 2021 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Law enforcement agency" includes any "general authority Washington law enforcement agency" and any "limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(2) "Less lethal alternatives" include, but are not limited to, verbal warnings, de-escalation tactics, conducted energy weapons, devices that deploy oleoresin capsicum, batons, and beanbag rounds.

(3) "Necessary" means that, under the totality of the circumstances, a reasonably effective alternative to the use of force does not appear to exist, and that the amount of force used was a reasonable and proportional response to effect the legal purpose intended or to protect against the threat posed to the officer or others.

(4) "Peace officer" includes any "general authority Washington peace officer," "limited authority Washington peace officer," and "specially commissioned Washington peace officer" as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020; however, "peace officer" does not include any corrections officer or other employee of a jail, correctional, or detention facility, but does include any community corrections officer.

(5) "Physical force" means any act likely to cause physical pain or injury or any other act exerted upon a person's body to compel, control, constrain, or restrain the person's movement. "Physical force" does not include pat downs, incidental touching, verbal commands, or compliant handcuffing where there is no physical pain or injury.

(6) "Totality of the circumstances" means all facts known to the peace officer leading up to, and at the time of, the use of force, and includes the actions of the person against whom the peace officer uses such force and the actions of the peace officer.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.120.020 and 2021 c 324 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided under this section, a peace officer may use physical force against a person when necessary to:

(i) Protect against criminal conduct where there is probable cause to make an arrest; ((effect))

(ii) Effect an arrest; ((prevent))

(iii) Prevent an escape as defined under chapter 9A.76 RCW;

(iv) Effect an investigative detention with less than probable cause if the peace officer has reasonable and articulable facts that point towards criminal activity, including when, under the totality of the circumstances, the situation escalates so that there are now facts sufficient to effectuate an arrest, whether or not an arrest is carried out; or ((protect))

(v) Protect against an imminent threat of bodily injury to the peace officer, another person, or the person against whom force is being used.

(b) A peace officer may use deadly force against another person only when necessary to protect against an imminent threat of serious physical injury or death to the officer or another person. For purposes of this subsection (1)(b)((:

(i) "Imminent)), "imminent threat of serious physical injury or death" means that, based on the totality of the circumstances, it is objectively reasonable to believe that a person has the present and apparent ability, opportunity, and intent to immediately cause death or serious bodily injury to the peace officer or another person.

(((ii) "Necessary" means that, under the totality of the circumstances, a reasonably effective alternative to the use of deadly force does not exist, and that the amount of force used was a reasonable and proportional response to the threat posed to the officer and others.

(iii) "Totality of the circumstances" means all facts known to the peace officer leading up to and at the time of the use of force, and includes the actions of the person against whom the peace officer uses such force, and the actions of the peace officer.))

(2) A peace officer shall use reasonable care when determining whether to use physical force and when using any physical force against another person. To that end, a peace officer shall:

(a) When possible, exhaust available and appropriate de-escalation tactics prior to using any physical force, such as: Creating physical distance by employing tactical repositioning and repositioning as often as necessary to maintain the benefit of time, distance, and cover; when there are multiple officers, designating one officer to communicate in order to avoid competing commands; calling for additional resources such as a crisis intervention team or mental health professional when possible; calling for back-up officers when encountering resistance; taking as much time as necessary, without using physical force or weapons; and leaving the area if there is no threat of imminent harm and no crime has been committed, is being committed, or is about to be committed;

(b) When using physical force, use ((the least))a proportional amount of physical force necessary to overcome resistance under the circumstances. This includes a consideration of the characteristics and conditions of a person for the purposes of determining whether to use force against that person and, if force is necessary, determining the appropriate and least amount of force ((possible))reasonable to effect a lawful purpose. Such characteristics and conditions may include, for example, whether the person: Is visibly pregnant, or states that they are pregnant; is known to be a minor, objectively appears to be a minor, or states that they are a minor; is known to be a vulnerable adult, or objectively appears to be a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020; displays signs of mental, behavioral, or physical impairments or disabilities; is experiencing perceptual or cognitive impairments typically related to the use of alcohol, narcotics, hallucinogens, or other drugs; is suicidal; has limited English proficiency; or is in the presence of children;

(c) Terminate the use of physical force as soon as the necessity for such force ends;

(d) When possible, use available and appropriate less lethal alternatives before using deadly force; and

(e) Make less lethal alternatives issued to the officer reasonably available for their use.

(3) A peace officer may not use any force tactics prohibited by applicable departmental policy, this chapter, or otherwise by law, except to protect his or her life or the life of another person from an imminent threat.

(4) Nothing in this section prevents a law enforcement agency or political subdivision of this state from adopting policies or standards with additional requirements for de-escalation and greater restrictions on the use of physical and deadly force than provided in this section.

--- END ---