BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city is not required to adopt or enforce, or may waive, any state or local building codes applicable to temporary shelters. For purposes of this section, "temporary shelter" means a use sited in a new or existing structure or modular structure that provides temporary sleeping and shelter accommodations for persons experiencing homelessness; such use may include common areas for food preparation, showers, or other commonly used facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

A code city is not required to adopt or enforce, or may waive, any state or local building codes applicable to temporary shelters. For purposes of this section, "temporary shelter" means a use sited in a new or existing structure or modular structure that provides temporary sleeping and shelter accommodations for persons experiencing homelessness; such use may include common areas for food preparation, showers, or other commonly used facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

A county is not required to adopt or enforce, or may waive, any state or local building codes applicable to temporary shelters within an urban growth area. For purposes of this section, "temporary shelter" means a use sited in a new or existing structure or modular structure that provides temporary sleeping and shelter accommodations for persons experiencing homelessness; such use may include common areas for food preparation, showers, or other commonly used facilities.

--- END ---