BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.87.020 and 2021 c 196 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adjusted capital gain" means federal net long-term capital gain:

(a) Plus any amount of long-term capital loss from a sale or exchange that is exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter, to the extent such loss was included in calculating federal net long-term capital gain;

(b) Plus any amount of long-term capital loss from a sale or exchange that is not allocated to Washington under RCW 82.87.100, to the extent such loss was included in calculating federal net long-term capital gain;

(c) Plus any amount of loss carryforward from a sale or exchange that is not allocated to Washington under RCW 82.87.100, to the extent such loss was included in calculating federal net long-term capital gain;

(d) Less any amount of long-term capital gain from a sale or exchange that is not allocated to Washington under RCW 82.87.100, to the extent such gain was included in calculating federal net long-term capital gain; and

(e) Less any amount of long-term capital gain from a sale or exchange that is exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter, to the extent such gain was included in calculating federal net long-term capital gain.

(2) "Capital asset" has the same meaning as provided by Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1221 of the internal revenue code and also includes any other property if the sale or exchange of the property results in a gain that is treated as a long-term capital gain under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1231 or any other provision of the internal revenue code.

(3) "Federal net long-term capital gain" means the net long-term capital gain reportable for federal income tax purposes determined as if Title 26 U.S.C. Secs. 55 through 59, 1400Z-1, and 1400Z-2 of the internal revenue code did not exist.

(4) "Individual" means a natural person.

(5) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of July 25, 2021, or such subsequent date as the department may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this chapter.

(6) "Investment management services" means providing a substantial quantity of any of the following services to a partnership, S corporation, or other entity as a partner thereto:

(a) Advising as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling a specified asset;

(b) Managing, acquiring, or disposing of a specified asset;

(c) Arranging financing with respect to acquiring specified assets; or

(d) Any activity in support of any of the services described in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(7) "Long-term capital asset" means a capital asset that is held for more than one year.

(((7)))(8) "Long-term capital gain" means gain from the sale or exchange of a long-term capital asset.

(((8)))(9) "Long-term capital loss" means a loss from the sale or exchange of a long-term capital asset.

(((9)))(10) "Real estate" means land and fixtures affixed to land. "Real estate" also includes used mobile homes, used park model trailers, used floating homes, and improvements constructed upon leased land.

(((10)))(11)(a) "Resident" means an individual:

(i) Who is domiciled in this state during the taxable year, unless the individual (A) maintained no permanent place of abode in this state during the entire taxable year, (B) maintained a permanent place of abode outside of this state during the entire taxable year, and (C) spent in the aggregate not more than 30 days of the taxable year in this state; or

(ii) Who is not domiciled in this state during the taxable year, but maintained a place of abode and was physically present in this state for more than 183 days during the taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "day" means a calendar day or any portion of a calendar day.

(c) An individual who is a resident under (a) of this subsection is a resident for that portion of a taxable year in which the individual was domiciled in this state or maintained a place of abode in this state.

(((11)))(12) "Specified asset" means certain securities, interests in partnerships, commodities, or options or derivatives contracts.

(13) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as determined under the internal revenue code.

(((12)))(14) "Taxpayer" means an individual subject to tax under this chapter.

(((13)))(15) "Washington capital gains" means an individual's adjusted capital gain, as modified in RCW 82.87.060, for each return filed under this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.87.040 and 2021 c 196 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2022, an excise tax is imposed on the sale or exchange of long-term capital assets. Only individuals are subject to payment of the tax, which equals seven percent multiplied by an individual's Washington capital gains, except as provided in (b) of this subsection (1).

(b) The tax on an individual's Washington capital gains derived primarily as compensation for investment management services is subject to a rate of 14 percent.

(2) The tax levied in subsection (1) of this section is necessary for the support of the state government and its existing public institutions.

(3) If an individual's Washington capital gains are less than zero for a taxable year, no tax is due under this section and no such amount is allowed as a carryover for use in the calculation of that individual's adjusted capital gain, as defined in RCW 82.87.020(1), for any taxable year. To the extent that a loss carryforward is included in the calculation of an individual's federal net long-term capital gain and that loss carryforward is directly attributable to losses from sales or exchanges allocated to this state under RCW 82.87.100, the loss carryforward is included in the calculation of that individual's adjusted capital gain for the purposes of this chapter. An individual may not include any losses carried back for federal income tax purposes in the calculation of that individual's adjusted capital gain for any taxable year.

(4)(a) The tax imposed in this section applies to the sale or exchange of long-term capital assets owned by the taxpayer, whether the taxpayer was the legal or beneficial owner of such assets at the time of the sale or exchange. The tax applies when the Washington capital gains are recognized by the taxpayer in accordance with this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this chapter:

(i) An individual is considered to be a beneficial owner of long-term capital assets held by an entity that is a pass-through or disregarded entity for federal tax purposes, such as a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, or grantor trust, to the extent of the individual's ownership interest in the entity as reported for federal income tax purposes.

(ii) A nongrantor trust is deemed to be a grantor trust if the trust does not qualify as a grantor trust for federal tax purposes, and the grantor's transfer of assets to the trust is treated as an incomplete gift under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2511 of the internal revenue code and its accompanying regulations. A grantor of such trust is considered the beneficial owner of the capital assets of the trust for purposes of the tax imposed in this section and must include any long-term capital gain or loss from the sale or exchange of a capital asset by the trust in the calculation of that individual's adjusted capital gain, if such gain or loss is allocated to this state under RCW 82.87.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2023.

--- END ---