BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each retail outlet must report any attempt or incident of robbery in the first or second degree at the retail outlet to the board within 10 days of the attempt or incident.

(2) The board's chief enforcement officer must regularly consult with the Washington state patrol to provide details of attempts or incidents of robbery in the first or second degree of a retail outlet and to discuss any evidence that indicates a pattern of, or coordinated effort by, a criminal enterprise.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.832 and 2013 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In a criminal case where((:

(1)))the defendant has been convicted of robbery in the first degree or robbery in the second degree((;)) and

(((2)))there has been a special allegation pleaded and proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed a robbery of:

(1) A pharmacy as defined in RCW 18.64.011(((21))); or

(2) A cannabis retail outlet, licensed under chapter 69.50 RCW, and the defendant committed the robbery as a premeditated act in concert with another individual or individuals;

the court shall make a finding of fact of the special allegation, or if a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to the special allegation.

--- END ---