BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to funding appropriated specifically for this purpose, the department shall:

(1) Create a plan to relocate each person currently residing in a residential habilitation center to a community-based setting. The plan must be submitted to the legislature no later than December 1, 2023; and

(2) Reduce the number of persons living in the residential habilitation centers listed in RCW 71A.20.020(1) by at least 20 percent at scheduled intervals until the populations of each facility have reached zero. The first decrease must be completed by June 30, 2025. The second decrease must be completed by June 30, 2026. The third decrease must be completed by June 30, 2027. The fourth decrease must be completed by June 30, 2028. The fifth and final decrease must be completed by December 31, 2028. Any proceeds realized from the closure shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 71A.20.170.

--- END ---