BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

Information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs pursuant to the statewide city and county jail booking and reporting system created in RCW 36.28A.040, the statewide automated victim information and notification system created in RCW 36.28A.040, or any other program used for the purposes of notifying individuals of a person's custody or supervision status, upcoming hearing, case disposition, or service of a protection order are exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---