BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 15.140 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, no person may knowingly sell or offer for sale any product that is marketed or labeled as a "CBD product" unless the product contains within 33 percent of the amount of CBD claimed on the label.

(b) Such a representation can be made orally or in writing, or by display of a sign, mark, insignia, or simulation.

(2) A violation of this section constitutes a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "CBD product" has the same meaning as "CBD product" as defined in RCW 69.50.101(e).

(4) This section does not apply to products sold at a retail outlet licensed under RCW 69.50.325.

--- END ---