BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 81.53 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Railroad companies shall not block a railroad grade crossing, upon the request of law enforcement or other emergency services personnel, or when any member of the crew becomes aware that the crossing is being approached by a law enforcement or other emergency services vehicle with its emergency lights flashing or that such a vehicle is stopped with its emergency lights flashing at the crossing blocked by the train.

(2) A railroad grade crossing must be cleared by the fastest available method so long as the train movement will not violate rules issued by the federal railroad administration.

(3) A railroad that violates this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 81.04.380.

--- END ---