BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) On an annual basis, the department shall track and count the number of salmon in Washington taken each year by the following:

(a) The operation of dams on the Snake river; and

(b) Animal predators, such as birds and pinnipeds.

(2) Beginning in 2023, the department shall submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature documenting the information collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---