BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2017 c 246 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

This act expires June 30, ((2022))2027.

Sec. 2. 2018 c 214 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act expires June 30, ((2022))2027.

Sec. 3. 2018 c 214 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30, ((2022))2027.

--- END ---