BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the COVID-19 pandemic, and the nearly year-long absence from in-person learning that resulted, has taken a significant toll on the academic progress of K-12 students. Due to reduced instructional time, disruption to core educational services, and isolation from support staff and peers, many students have suffered learning loss. To combat this learning loss, the legislature intends to establish a K-12 intensive tutoring grant program so that schools and school districts may offer one-on-one tutoring support to students. Studies show that one-on-one tutoring is one of the most successful and cost-effective education interventions that addresses both the academic and social needs of students. Through the use of these innovative tutoring services, schools and school districts can provide access to personalized supports that address each student's unique needs and restore academic progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a K-12 intensive tutoring grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to provide funding for schools and school districts to recruit, train, and hire tutors to provide one-on-one tutoring services to K-12 students experiencing learning loss as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.

(2) Tutors must receive training in proven tutoring models to ensure their effectiveness in addressing learning loss. Upon completing training, tutors may serve the following students:

(a) Tutors enrolled in high school may tutor students enrolled in elementary school;

(b) Tutors enrolled in college may tutor students enrolled in middle school;

(c) Tutors who graduated from a 2-year or 4-year college program within the last two years may tutor students enrolled in high school.

(3) School districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools may apply for K-12 intensive tutoring grants.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the grant program established under this section.

(5) Grants awarded under this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.

--- END ---