BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No state agency or political subdivision of the state may enact or issue a rule, ordinance, order, or policy that would result in an individual being required to submit to vaccination or immunization despite his or her religious, philosophical, or personal objections.

(2) No state agency or political subdivision of the state may take any other action that would result in an individual being required to submit to vaccination or immunization despite his or her religious, philosophical, or personal objections including, but not limited to, requiring vaccination or immunization as a condition of employment or contracting with the state agency or political subdivision.

(3) Any rule, ordinance, order, policy, or action enacted, issued, or taken in violation of this section is null and void as against the public policy of the state.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.210.090 and 2019 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any child shall be exempt in whole or in part from the immunization measures required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 upon the presentation of any one or more of the certifications required by this section, on a form prescribed by the department of health:

(a) A written certification signed by a health care practitioner that a particular vaccine required by rule of the state board of health is, in his or her judgment, not advisable for the child: PROVIDED, That when it is determined that this particular vaccine is no longer contraindicated, the child will be required to have the vaccine;

(b) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the religious beliefs of the signator are contrary to the required immunization measures; or

(c) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the signator has either a philosophical or personal objection to the immunization of the child. ((A philosophical or personal objection may not be used to exempt a child from the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine.))

(2)(a) The form presented on or after July 22, 2011, must include a statement to be signed by a health care practitioner stating that he or she provided the signator with information about the benefits and risks of immunization to the child. The form may be signed by a health care practitioner at any time prior to the enrollment of the child in a school or licensed day care. Photocopies of the signed form or a letter from the health care practitioner referencing the child's name shall be accepted in lieu of the original form.

(b) A health care practitioner who, in good faith, signs the statement provided for in (a) of this subsection is immune from civil liability for providing the signature.

(c) Any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child who exempts the child due to religious beliefs pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section is not required to have the form provided for in (a) of this subsection signed by a health care practitioner if the parent or legal guardian demonstrates membership in a religious body or a church in which the religious beliefs or teachings of the church preclude a health care practitioner from providing medical treatment to the child.

(3) For purposes of this section, "health care practitioner" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.210.090 and 2020 c 80 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any child shall be exempt in whole or in part from the immunization measures required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 upon the presentation of any one or more of the certifications required by this section, on a form prescribed by the department of health:

(a) A written certification signed by a health care practitioner that a particular vaccine required by rule of the state board of health is, in his or her judgment, not advisable for the child: PROVIDED, That when it is determined that this particular vaccine is no longer contraindicated, the child will be required to have the vaccine;

(b) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the religious beliefs of the signator are contrary to the required immunization measures; or

(c) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the signator has either a philosophical or personal objection to the immunization of the child. ((A philosophical or personal objection may not be used to exempt a child from the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine.))

(2)(a) The form presented on or after July 22, 2011, must include a statement to be signed by a health care practitioner stating that he or she provided the signator with information about the benefits and risks of immunization to the child. The form may be signed by a health care practitioner at any time prior to the enrollment of the child in a school or licensed day care. Photocopies of the signed form or a letter from the health care practitioner referencing the child's name shall be accepted in lieu of the original form.

(b) A health care practitioner who, in good faith, signs the statement provided for in (a) of this subsection is immune from civil liability for providing the signature.

(c) Any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child who exempts the child due to religious beliefs pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section is not required to have the form provided for in (a) of this subsection signed by a health care practitioner if the parent or legal guardian demonstrates membership in a religious body or a church in which the religious beliefs or teachings of the church preclude a health care practitioner from providing medical treatment to the child.

(3) For purposes of this section, "health care practitioner" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.216.690 and 2019 c 362 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a child day care center licensed under this chapter may not allow on the premises an employee or volunteer, who has not provided the child day care center with:

(a) Immunization records indicating that he or she has received the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine; or

(b) Proof of immunity from measles through documentation of laboratory evidence of antibody titer or a health care provider's attestation of the person's history of measles sufficient to provide immunity against measles.

(2)(a) The child day care center may allow a person to be employed or volunteer on the premises for up to thirty calendar days if he or she signs a written attestation that he or she has received the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine or is immune from measles, but requires additional time to obtain and provide the records required in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section.

(b) The child day care center may allow a person to be employed or volunteer on the premises if the person provides the child day care center with ((a)):

(i) A written certification signed by a health care practitioner, as defined in RCW 28A.210.090, that the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine is, in the practitioner's judgment, not advisable for the person. This subsection (2)(b)(i) does not apply if it is determined that the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine is no longer contraindicated;

(ii) A written certification signed by the employee or volunteer that the religious beliefs of the employee or volunteer are contrary to measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine; or

(iii) A written certification signed by the employee or volunteer that the employee or volunteer has either a philosophical or personal objection to the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine.

(3) The child day care center shall maintain the documents required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section in the person's personnel record maintained by the child day care center.

(4) For purposes of this section, "volunteer" means a nonemployee who provides care and supervision to children at the child day care center.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.06.220 and 2019 c 472 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor after proclaiming a state of emergency and prior to terminating such, may, in the area described by the proclamation issue an order prohibiting:

(a) Any person being on the public streets, or in the public parks, or at any other public place during the hours declared by the governor to be a period of curfew;

(b) Any number of persons, as designated by the governor, from assembling or gathering on the public streets, parks, or other open areas of this state, either public or private;

(c) The manufacture, transfer, use, possession or transportation of a molotov cocktail or any other device, instrument or object designed to explode or produce uncontained combustion;

(d) The transporting, possessing or using of gasoline, kerosene, or combustible, flammable, or explosive liquids or materials in a glass or uncapped container of any kind except in connection with the normal operation of motor vehicles, normal home use or legitimate commercial use;

(e) The sale, purchase or dispensing of alcoholic beverages;

(f) The sale, purchase or dispensing of other commodities or goods, as he or she reasonably believes should be prohibited to help preserve and maintain life, health, property or the public peace;

(g) The use of certain streets, highways or public ways by the public; and

(h) Such other activities as he or she reasonably believes should be prohibited to help preserve and maintain life, health, property or the public peace.

(2) The governor after proclaiming a state of emergency and prior to terminating such may, in the area described by the proclamation, issue an order or orders concerning waiver or suspension of statutory obligations or limitations in the following areas:

(a) Liability for participation in interlocal agreements;

(b) Inspection fees owed to the department of labor and industries;

(c) Application of the family emergency assistance program;

(d) Regulations, tariffs, and notice requirements under the jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation commission;

(e) Application of tax due dates and penalties relating to collection of taxes;

(f) Permits for industrial, business, or medical uses of alcohol; and

(g) Such other statutory and regulatory obligations or limitations prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules, or regulations of any state agency if strict compliance with the provision of any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency, unless (i) authority to waive or suspend a specific statutory or regulatory obligation or limitation has been expressly granted to another statewide elected official, (ii) the waiver or suspension would conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, ((or)) (iii) the waiver or suspension would conflict with the rights, under the First Amendment, of freedom of speech or of the people to peaceably assemble, or (iv) the waiver or suspension would result in an individual being required to submit to vaccination or immunization despite his or her religious, philosophical, or personal objections. The governor shall give as much notice as practical to legislative leadership and impacted local governments when issuing orders under this subsection (2)(g).

(3) In imposing the restrictions provided for by RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270, the governor may impose them for such times, upon such conditions, with such exceptions and in such areas of this state he or she from time to time deems necessary.

(4) No order or orders concerning waiver or suspension of statutory obligations or limitations under subsection (2) of this section may continue for longer than thirty days unless extended by the legislature through concurrent resolution. If the legislature is not in session, the waiver or suspension of statutory obligations or limitations may be extended in writing by the leadership of the senate and the house of representatives until the legislature can extend the waiver or suspension by concurrent resolution. For purposes of this section, "leadership of the senate and the house of representatives" means the majority and minority leaders of the senate and the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives.

(5) Any person willfully violating any provision of an order issued by the governor under this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2) Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022.

--- END ---