BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) For the liquor licenses and endorsements issued under the sections identified in (b) of this subsection, and that are subject to annual renewal and will expire during the first calendar month after the effective date of this section through May 1, 2022, the expiration of the license is extended through May 31, 2022, with no fees due for this time period. Upon renewal, the expiration date of the licenses and endorsements may subsequently be prorated as necessary in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW.

(b) The licenses and endorsements subject to this section are those licenses and endorsements issued under the following sections: RCW 66.24.140, 66.24.145, 66.24.146, 66.24.165, 66.24.170, 66.24.175, 66.24.179, 66.24.240, 66.24.244, 66.24.246, 66.24.310, 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.354, 66.24.371, 66.24.380, 66.24.400, 66.24.420, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.452, 66.24.455, 66.24.495, 66.24.520, 66.24.540, 66.24.550, 66.24.580, 66.24.590, 66.24.600, 66.24.610, 66.24.650, 66.24.655, 66.24.690, and 66.24.695.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) For the purposes of chapter 19.02 RCW, liquor license renewals with the liquor and cannabis board are subject to section 1 of this act.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---