BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person is allowed a one-time credit against the tax due under this chapter as provided in this section. The credit equals $5,000.

(b) To be eligible for the credit authorized in this section, a person must have been registered to conduct business in the state in calendar year 2020.

(2) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter, and a person may only use the credit once. Any unused portion of the credit may not be carried over, and no refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(3) No credits may be claimed under this section after December 31, 2021.

(4) This section expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---