BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under qualifications, terms, conditions, benefits, and continuity of care requirements set by the public employees' benefits board, retired or disabled school employees who are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 RCW as of January 1, 2002, and their dependents, may enroll in medical and dental plans under the authority, provided they apply no later than the end of the open enrollment period for the plan year beginning January 1, 2022.

(2) Retired or disabled school employees and their dependents are responsible for payment of rates developed by the authority, and must include any amounts necessary for administration in accordance with this chapter. Premium rates charged to retired or disabled school employees and retired or disabled state employees and their dependents shall be based on the experience of the community-rated risk pools established under RCW 41.05.022 and 41.05.080 and must be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.

(3) The authority may establish rules to implement the enrollment opportunity under this section.

(4) Enrollment must be processed on a first-come, first-enrolled basis, subject to an enrollment cap reflecting 25 percent of the eligible medicare retirees, as specified in the state operating budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---