BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must use the King county classification for the purposes of determining the provider rate in Snohomish county for community residential service businesses as defined in RCW 74.39A.009.

(2) For purposes of this section, "provider rate" means the rate for each tier that is specific to county categories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2021, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---