BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.118.031 and 2009 c 351 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The manufacturer shall publish an owner's manual and provide it to the new motor vehicle dealer or leasing company. The owner's manual shall include a list of the addresses and phone numbers for the manufacturer's customer assistance division, or zone or regional offices. A manufacturer shall provide to the new motor vehicle dealer or leasing company all applicable manufacturer's written warranties. The dealer or leasing company shall transfer to the consumer, at the time of original retail sale or lease, the owner's manual and applicable written warranties as provided by a manufacturer.

(2) At the time of purchase, the new motor vehicle dealer shall provide the consumer with a written statement that explains the consumer's rights under this chapter. The written statement shall be prepared and supplied by the attorney general and shall contain a toll-free number that the consumer can contact for information regarding the procedures and remedies under this chapter, and may be presented to the consumer in paper or electronic form. In the event a consumer requests modification of the new motor vehicle in a manner which may partially or completely void the manufacturer's implied or express warranty, and which becomes part of the basis of the bargain of the initial retail sale or lease of the vehicle, a new motor vehicle dealer shall provide a clear and conspicuous written disclosure, independently signed and dated by the consumer, stating "Your requested modification may void all or part of a manufacturer warranty and a resulting defect or condition may not be subject to remedies afforded by the motor vehicle warranties act, chapter 19.118 RCW." A dealer who obtains a signed written disclosure under circumstances where the warranty may be void is not subject to this chapter as a manufacturer to the extent the modification affects the use, value, or safety of a new motor vehicle. Failure to provide the disclosure specified in this subsection does not constitute a violation of chapter 19.86 RCW.

(3) For the purposes of this chapter, if a new motor vehicle does not conform to the warranty and the consumer reports the nonconformity during the term of the eligibility period or the period of coverage of the applicable manufacturer's written warranty, whichever is less, to the manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer who sold the new motor vehicle, the manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer shall make repairs as are necessary to conform the vehicle to the warranty, regardless of whether such repairs are made after the expiration of the eligibility period. Any corrections or attempted repairs undertaken by a new motor vehicle dealer under this chapter shall be treated as warranty work and billed by the dealer to the manufacturer in the same manner as other work under the manufacturer's written warranty is billed. For purposes of this subsection, the manufacturer's written warranty shall be at least one year after the date of the original delivery to the consumer of the vehicle or the first twelve thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first.

(4) Upon request from the consumer, the manufacturer or new motor vehicle dealer shall provide a copy of any report or computer reading compiled by the manufacturer's field or zone representative regarding inspection, diagnosis, or test-drive of the consumer's new motor vehicle, or shall provide a copy of any technical service bulletin issued by the manufacturer regarding the year and model of the consumer's new motor vehicle as it pertains to any material, feature, component, or the performance thereof.

(5) The new motor vehicle dealer shall provide to the consumer each time the consumer's vehicle is returned from being diagnosed or repaired under the warranty, a fully itemized, legible statement or repair order indicating any diagnosis made, and all work performed on the vehicle including but not limited to, a general description of the problem reported by the consumer or an identification of the defect or condition, parts and labor, the date and the odometer reading when the vehicle was submitted for repair, and the date when the vehicle was made available to the consumer.

(6) No manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer may refuse to diagnose or repair any nonconformity covered by the warranty for the purpose of avoiding liability under this chapter.

(7) For purposes of this chapter, consumers shall have the rights and remedies, including a cause of action, against manufacturers as provided in this chapter.

(8) The eligibility period and thirty-day out-of-service period, and sixty-day out-of-service period in the case of a motor home, shall be extended by any time that repair services are not available to the consumer as a direct result of a strike, war, invasion, fire, flood, or other natural disaster.

Sec. 2. RCW 63.14.040 and 2012 c 117 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The retail installment contract shall contain the names of the seller and the buyer, the place of business of the seller, the residence or other address of the buyer as specified by the buyer and a description or identification of the goods sold or to be sold, or service furnished or rendered or to be furnished or rendered. The contract also shall contain the following items, which shall be set forth in the sequence appearing below:

(a) The sale price of each item of goods or services;

(b) The amount of the buyer's down payment, if any, identifying the amounts paid in money and allowed for goods traded in;

(c) The difference between items (a) and (b) of this subsection;

(d) The aggregate amount, if any, included for insurance, specifying the type or types of insurance and the terms of coverage;

(e) The aggregate amount of official fees, if any;

(f) The amount, if any, actually paid or to be paid by the retail seller pursuant to an agreement with the buyer to discharge a security interest or lien on like-kind goods traded in or lease interest in the circumstance of a lease for like goods being terminated in conjunction with the sale pursuant to a retail installment contract;

(g) The principal balance, which is the sum of items (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection;

(h) The dollar amount or rate of the service charge;

(i) The amount of the time balance owed by the buyer to the seller, which is the sum of items (g) and (h) of this subsection, if (h) (([of this subsection]))of this subsection is stated in a dollar amount; and

(j) Except as otherwise provided in the next two sentences, the maximum number of installment payments required and the amount of each installment and the due date of each payment necessary to pay such balance. If installment payments other than the final payment are stated as a series of equal scheduled amounts and if the amount of the final installment payment does not substantially exceed the scheduled amount of each preceding installment payment, the maximum number of payments and the amount and due date of each payment need not be separately stated and the amount of the scheduled final installment payment may be stated as the remaining unpaid balance. The due date of the first installment payment may be fixed by a day or date or may be fixed by reference to the date of the contract or to the time of delivery or installation.

Additional items may be included to explain the calculations involved in determining the balance to be paid by the buyer.

(2) Every retail installment contract shall contain the following notice in ten point bold face type or larger directly above the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the buyer: "NOTICE TO BUYER:

(a) Do not sign this contract before you read it or if any spaces intended for the agreed terms, except as to unavailable information, are blank.

(b) You are entitled to a copy of this contract at the time you sign it.

(c) You may at any time pay off the full unpaid balance due under this contract, and in so doing you may receive a partial rebate of the service charge.

(d) The service charge does not exceed . . . .% (must be filled in) per annum computed monthly.

(e) You may cancel this contract if it is solicited in person, and you sign it, at a place other than the seller's business address shown on the contract, by sending notice of such cancellation by certified mail return receipt requested to the seller at his or her address shown on the contract which notice shall be posted not later than midnight of the third day (excluding Sundays and holidays) following your signing this contract. If you choose to cancel this contract, you must return or make available to the seller at the place of delivery any merchandise, in its original condition, received by you under this contract."

Subsection (2)(e) of this section is effective and needs to be included in the notice only if the contract is solicited in person by the seller or his or her representative, and the buyer signs it, at a place other than the seller's business address shown on the contract, but does not apply to a retail installment contract used for the sale of a motor vehicle by a licensed vehicle dealer.

Sec. 3. RCW 63.14.154 and 2012 c 117 s 174 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other rights he or she may have, the buyer shall have the right to cancel a retail installment transaction for other than the seller's breach by sending notice of such cancellation to the seller at his or her place of business as set forth in the contract or charge agreement by certified mail, return receipt requested, which shall be posted not later than midnight of the third day (excluding Sundays and holidays) following the date the buyer signs the contract or charge agreement:

(a) If the retail installment transaction was entered into by the buyer and solicited in person or by a commercial telephone solicitation as defined by chapter 20, Laws of 1989 by the seller or his or her representative at a place other than the seller's address, which may be his or her main or branch office, shown on the contract; and

(b) If the buyer returns goods received or makes them available to the seller as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(2) In the event of cancellation pursuant to this section:

(a) The seller shall, without request, refund to the buyer within ten days after such cancellation all deposits, including any down payment, made under the contract or charge agreement and shall return all goods traded in to the seller on account or in contemplation of the contract less any reasonable costs actually incurred in making ready for sale the goods so traded in;

(b) The seller shall be entitled to reclaim and the buyer shall return or make available to the seller at the place of delivery in its original condition any goods received by the buyer under the contract or charge agreement;

(c) The buyer shall incur no additional liability for such cancellation.

(3) This section does not apply to a retail installment transaction for the purchase of a motor vehicle.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.70.023 and 2016 sp.s. c 26 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An "established place of business" requires a permanent, enclosed commercial building located within the state of Washington easily accessible at all reasonable times. The business of a vehicle dealer must be lawfully carried on at an established place of business in accordance with the terms of all applicable building code, zoning, and other land-use regulatory ordinances. A vehicle dealer may display a vehicle for sale only at its established place of business, licensed subagency, or temporary subagency site, except at auction, however a vehicle dealer may deliver a vehicle for inspection, a test drive, lease, or purchase and have a customer sign agreements over the internet or at a location other than the vehicle dealer's established place of business or licensed or temporary subagency. The dealer shall keep the building open to the public so that the public may contact the vehicle dealer or the dealer's salespersons at all reasonable times. The books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business shall be kept and maintained at that place. The established place of business shall display an exterior sign with the business name and nature of the business, such as auto sales, permanently affixed to the land or building, with letters clearly visible to the major avenue of traffic. A room or rooms in a hotel, rooming house, or apartment house building or part of a single or multiple-unit dwelling house may not be considered an "established place of business" unless the ground floor of such a dwelling is devoted principally to and occupied for commercial purposes and the dealer offices are located on the ground floor. A mobile office or mobile home may be used as an office if it is connected to utilities and is set up in accordance with state law. A statewide trade association representing manufactured housing dealers shall be permitted to use a manufactured home as an office if the office complies with all other applicable building code, zoning, and other land-use regulatory ordinances. This subsection does not apply to auction companies that do not own vehicle inventory or sell vehicles from an auction yard.

(2) An auction company shall have office facilities within the state. The books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business shall be maintained at the office facilities. All storage facilities for inventory shall be listed with the department, and shall meet local zoning and land use ordinances. An auction company shall maintain a telecommunications system.

(3) Auction companies shall post their vehicle dealer license at each auction where vehicles are offered, and shall provide the department with the address of the auction at least three days before the auction.

(4) If a dealer maintains a place of business at more than one location or under more than one name in this state, he or she shall designate one location as the principal place of business of the firm, one name as the principal name of the firm, and all other locations or names as subagencies. A subagency license is required for each and every subagency: PROVIDED, That the department may grant an exception to the subagency requirement in the specific instance where a licensed dealer is unable to locate their used vehicle sales facilities adjacent to or at the established place of business. This exception shall be granted and defined under the promulgation of rules consistent with the administrative procedure act.

(5) All vehicle dealers shall maintain ownership or leasehold throughout the license year of the real property from which they do business. The dealer shall provide the department with evidence of ownership or leasehold whenever the ownership changes or the lease is terminated.

(6) A subagency shall comply with all requirements of an established place of business, except that subagency records may be kept at the principal place of business designated by the dealer. Auction companies shall comply with the requirements in subsection (2) of this section.

(7) A temporary subagency shall meet all local zoning and building codes for the type of merchandising being conducted. The dealer license certificate shall be posted at the location. No other requirements of an established place of business apply to a temporary subagency. Auction companies are not required to obtain a temporary subagency license.

(8) A wholesale vehicle dealer shall have office facilities in a commercial building within this state, with no more than two other wholesale or retail vehicle dealers in the same building, and all storage facilities for inventory shall be listed with the department, and shall meet local zoning and land use ordinances. A wholesale vehicle dealer shall maintain a telecommunications system. An exterior sign visible from the nearest street shall identify the business name and the nature of business. When two or more vehicle dealer businesses share a location, all records, office facilities, and inventory, if any, must be physically segregated and clearly identified.

(9) A retail vehicle dealer shall be open during normal business hours, maintain office and display facilities in a commercially zoned location or in a location complying with all applicable building and land use ordinances, and maintain a business telephone listing in the local directory. When two or more vehicle dealer businesses share a location, all records, office facilities, and inventory shall be physically segregated and clearly identified.

(10) A subagency license is not required for a mobile home dealer to display an on-site display model, a consigned mobile home not relocated from its site, or a repossessed mobile home if sales are handled from a principal place of business or subagency. A mobile home dealer shall identify on-site display models, repossessed mobile homes, and those consigned at their sites with a sign that includes the dealer's name and telephone number.

(11) Every vehicle dealer shall advise the department of the location of each and every place of business of the firm and the name or names under which the firm is doing business at such location or locations. If any name or location is changed, the dealer shall notify the department of such change within ten days. The license issued by the department shall reflect the name and location of the firm and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at that location by the dealer.

(12) A vehicle dealer's license shall upon the death or incapacity of an individual vehicle dealer authorize the personal representative of such dealer, subject to payment of license fees, to continue the business for a period of six months from the date of the death or incapacity.

--- END ---