BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70A.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A work group is created to develop an odor control plan and best management practices for asphalt plants for the purpose of reducing noxious odors, including requirements related to the enjoyment of life and property.

(2) The work group consists of the following members, to be appointed by the director of the department:

(a) Two representatives of the asphalt industry;

(b) Two representatives of regional clean air agencies;

(c) Two representatives of local government;

(d) Two representatives of research institutions in Washington with expertise in air pollution control and manufacturing or engineering;

(e) Two representatives of local public health agencies; and

(f) One representative of a community or environmental organization with expertise in air pollution, toxicology, or other relevant fields.

(3) The director of the department, or the director's designee, shall serve as the chair of the work group.

(4) The first meeting of the work group must occur by August 1, 2021.

(5) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department.

(6) By January 1, 2022, the work group must submit recommendations to the director of the department on the development of an odor control plan and best management practices for asphalt plants, which may be incorporated into permits or policies adopted by the department and the regional clean air agencies.

(7) This section expires December 31, 2024.

--- END ---