BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.06.210 and 2013 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The proclamation of a state of emergency and other proclamations or orders issued by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270 as now or hereafter amended shall be in writing and shall be signed by the governor and shall then be filed with the secretary of state. A proclamation of a state of emergency is effective upon the governor's signature.

(2) The governor shall give as much public notice as practical through the news media of the issuance of proclamations or orders pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270 as now or hereafter amended.

(3) The state of emergency shall cease to exist upon the earlier of:

(a) The issuance of a proclamation of the governor declaring its termination: PROVIDED, That the governor must terminate said state of emergency proclamation when order has been restored in the area affected; or

(b) Thirty days after the state of emergency proclamation is signed by the governor unless extended by the legislature through a concurrent resolution approved by a two-thirds vote in both the house of representatives and the senate. If the legislature is not in session, the state of emergency proclamation may be extended in writing by the leadership of the senate and the house of representatives until the legislature can extend the state of emergency proclamation by concurrent resolution. For purposes of this section, "leadership of the senate and the house of representatives" means the majority and minority leaders of the senate and the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives.

--- END ---