BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No law, rule, or order, by any government or private entity, shall require the receipt of any epidemic or pandemic vaccines, including vaccines used to prevent SARS-CoV-2 or COVID-19, for any reason, including, but not limited to, as a condition of employment, school attendance, professional licensure, educational certification or degree, admittance to any place of business or entertainment, or access to any mode of transportation, if the following have not been met:

(a) The vaccine has been licensed for use by the United States food and drug administration;

(b) The vaccine product has been evaluated for its long-term potential to cause cancer, impair fertility, mutate genes, or cause autoimmune, neurological, or any other chronic or serious adverse effects;

(c) The pivotal clinical trial relied upon by the United States food and drug administration for approval of the vaccine product has been evaluated for its safety:

(i) For no less than three years after the vaccine product is administered; and

(ii) Against a control group that received:

(A) A true placebo; or

(B) Another vaccine product approved by the United States food and drug administration based on a pivotal clinical trial that has evaluated the safety of that vaccine product against a control group that received a true placebo;

(d) Studies have been conducted to determine what injuries and health conditions are caused by the vaccine product when administered alone as well as with other vaccines;

(e) The risk of permanent disability and death from the vaccine product has been proven to be less than that caused by the disease it is intended to prevent;

(f) The infection targeted by the vaccine product is highly transmissible in public settings and:

(i) There are no reasonable nonpharmaceutical interventions capable of reducing risk of the spread;

(ii) There are no effective nutrient or drug treatments available to reduce the risk of infection; and

(iii) There are no effective nutrient or drug treatments available to reduce risk of severe disease;

(g) The infection targeted by the vaccine poses a grave health risk to the population being required to receive it; and

(h) The vaccine product has been proven to prevent person-to-person transmission of the targeted infection.

(2) For purposes of this section, "true placebo" means an inert substance such as saline, with no pharmacological or immunological action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

A person or his or her dependent or dependent child shall be exempt from any requirement for epidemic or pandemic vaccines, including vaccines used to prevent SARS-CoV-2 or COVID-19, imposed by any law, rule, or order, by any government or private entity consistent with section 1 of this act, including, but not limited to, as a condition of employment, school attendance, professional licensure, educational certification or degree, admittance to any place of business or entertainment, or access to any mode of transportation, upon verbal or written declaration of medical, philosophical, or religious objection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---