BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the COVID-19 pandemic, as recognized by emergency proclamations issued by the governor, has resulted in an unprecedented drop in local government revenues. The legislature intends to provide local governments with increased flexibility in the use of existing revenues in order to enable local governments to continue to provide essential services and to facilitate economic recovery through December 31, 2023.

PART I

CRIMINAL JUSTICE SALES TAX

Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.310 and 2019 c 415 s 988 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county criminal justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer must transfer into the county criminal justice assistance account from the general fund the sum of ((twenty-three million two hundred thousand dollars))$23,200,000 divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer must increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsections (4) and (5) of this section, must be distributed at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's funding factor as determined under this subsection.

(a) A county's funding factor is the sum of:

(i) The population of the county, divided by ((one thousand))1,000, and multiplied by two-tenths;

(ii) The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for each ((one thousand))1,000 in population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b) Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i) The population of the county or city is as last determined by the office of financial management;

(ii) The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each ((one thousand))1,000 in population;

(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court must be determined by the most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the administrative office of the courts;

(iv) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989-1991 biennium must be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this subsection. Future distributions must be based on the most recent figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this subsection.

(3) Moneys distributed under this section must be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes ((and)). Except after the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, these funds may not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a) domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020, and (b) during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth, truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal justice assistance account may be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements may not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

(5) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the sum of ((one hundred fifty-three thousand dollars))$153,000, and during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the sum of ((five hundred ten thousand dollars))$510,000, may be appropriated for the Washington state patrol to provide investigative assistance and report services to assist local law enforcement agencies to prosecute criminals. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.14.320 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 971 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The municipal criminal justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer must transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of ((four million six hundred thousand dollars))$4,600,000 divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer must increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) No city may receive a distribution under this section from the municipal criminal justice assistance account unless:

(a) The city has a crime rate in excess of ((one hundred twenty-five))125 percent of the statewide average as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(b) The city has levied the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate or the tax authorized in RCW 82.46.010(3) at the maximum rate; and

(c) The city has a per capita yield from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate of less than ((one hundred fifty))150 percent of the statewide average per capita yield for all cities from such local sales and use tax.

(3) The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (7) of this section, must be distributed at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150. The distributions must be made as follows:

(a) Unless reduced by this subsection, ((thirty))30 percent of the moneys must be distributed ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management to those cities eligible under subsection (2) of this section that have a crime rate determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section which is greater than ((one hundred seventy-five))175 percent of the statewide average crime rate. No city may receive more than ((fifty))50 percent of any moneys distributed under this subsection (a) but, if a city distribution is reduced as a result of exceeding the ((fifty))50 percent limitation, the amount not distributed must be distributed under (b) of this subsection.

(b) The remainder of the moneys, including any moneys not distributed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, must be distributed to all cities eligible under subsection (2) of this section ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management.

(4) No city may receive more than ((thirty))30 percent of all moneys distributed under subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), must be made to the county in which the city is located.

(6) Moneys distributed under this section must be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes ((and)). Except after the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, these funds may not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020, and publications and public educational efforts designed to provide information and assistance to parents in dealing with runaway or at-risk youth. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(7) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal justice assistance account may be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements may not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

(8) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the amount that would otherwise be transferred into the municipal criminal justice assistance account from the general fund under subsection (1) of this section must be reduced by 3.4 percent.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.14.330 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 972 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer must transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of ((four million six hundred thousand dollars))$4,600,000 divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer must increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, must be distributed to the cities of the state as follows:

(i) ((Twenty))20 percent appropriated for distribution must be distributed to cities with a three-year average violent crime rate for each ((one thousand))1,000 in population in excess of ((one hundred fifty))150 percent of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate for each ((one thousand))1,000 in population. The three-year average violent crime rate must be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. Moneys must be distributed under this subsection (1)(a) ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per capita. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year must be distributed to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement agencies with ((ten))10 or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.

(ii) ((Sixteen))16 percent must be distributed to cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management, but no city may receive less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000.

(b) The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this subsection (1) must be distributed at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150.

(c) Moneys distributed under this subsection (1) must be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes ((and)). Except after the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, these funds may not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(2)(a) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this section:

(i) ((Ten))10 percent must be distributed on a per capita basis to cities that contract with another governmental agency for the majority of the city's law enforcement services. Cities that subsequently qualify for this distribution must notify the department of commerce by November 30th for the upcoming calendar year. The department of commerce must provide a list of eligible cities to the state treasurer by December 31st. The state treasurer must modify the distribution of these funds in the following year. Cities have the responsibility to notify the department of commerce of any changes regarding these contractual relationships. Adjustments in the distribution formula to add or delete cities may be made only for the upcoming calendar year; no adjustments may be made retroactively.

(ii) The remaining ((fifty-four))54 percent must be distributed to cities and towns by the state treasurer on a per capita basis. These funds must be used for: (A) Innovative law enforcement strategies; (B) programs to help at-risk children or child abuse victim response programs; and (C) programs designed to reduce the level of domestic violence or to provide counseling for domestic violence victims.

(b) The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this subsection (2), less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, must be distributed at the times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year must be distributed to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement agencies with ((ten))10 or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.

(c) If a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds received under this subsection (2) in a manner that does not comply with the criteria under which the moneys were received, the city is ineligible to receive future distributions under this subsection (2) until the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction of the director or are repaid to the state general fund.

(3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), must be made to the county in which the city is located.

(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal justice assistance account may be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements may not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the amount that would otherwise be transferred into the municipal criminal justice assistance account from the general fund under subsection (1) of this section must be reduced by 3.4 percent.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.14.340 and 2010 c 127 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of any county may fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter, provided that such sales and use tax is subject to repeal by referendum, using the procedures provided in RCW 82.14.036. The referendum procedure provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the exclusive method for subjecting any county sales and use tax ordinance or resolution to a referendum vote.

(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such county. The rate of tax equals one-tenth of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax).

(3) When distributing moneys collected under this section, the state treasurer must distribute ((ten))10 percent of the moneys to the county in which the tax was collected. The remainder of the moneys collected under this section must be distributed to the county and the cities within the county ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. In making the distribution based on population, the county must receive that proportion that the unincorporated population of the county bears to the total population of the county and each city must receive that proportion that the city incorporated population bears to the total county population.

(4) Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section must be expended for criminal justice purposes. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020. After the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, criminal justice purposes includes local government programs which have a reasonable relationship to reducing the numbers of people interacting with the criminal justice system including, but not limited to, reducing homelessness or improving behavioral health.

(5) In the expenditure of funds for criminal justice purposes as provided in this section, cities and counties, or any combination thereof, are expressly authorized to participate in agreements, pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to jointly expend funds for criminal justice purposes of mutual benefit. Such criminal justice purposes of mutual benefit include, but are not limited to, the construction, improvement, and expansion of jails, court facilities, juvenile justice facilities, and services with ancillary benefits to the civil justice system.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.14.450 and 2010 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.

(2)(a) A city legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the city voters at a primary or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this subsection may not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax. A city may not begin imposing a tax approved by the voters under this subsection prior to January 1, 2011.

(b) If a county adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under subsection (1) of this section prior to a city within the county adopting an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the voters to impose the tax under this subsection, the rate of tax by the city under this subsection may not exceed an amount that would cause the total county and city tax rate under this section to exceed three-tenths of one percent. This subsection (2)(b) also applies if the county and city adopt an ordinance or resolution to impose sales and use taxes under this section on the same date.

(c) If the city adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under this subsection prior to the county in which the city is located, the county must provide a credit against its tax under subsection (1) of this section for the city tax under this subsection to the extent the total county and city tax rate under this section would exceed three-tenths of one percent.

(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county.

(4) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are exempt from tax imposed under this section.

(5) One-third of all money received under this section must be used solely for criminal justice purposes, fire protection purposes, or both. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice purposes" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.340, except that from the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, "criminal justice purposes" includes local government programs which have a reasonable relationship to reducing the numbers of people interacting with the criminal justice system including, but not limited to, reducing homelessness or improving behavioral health.

(6) Money received by a county under subsection (1) of this section must be shared between the county and the cities as follows: ((Sixty))60 percent must be retained by the county and ((forty))40 percent must be distributed on a per capita basis to cities in the county.

(7) Tax proceeds received by a city imposing a tax under this section must be shared between the county and city as follows: ((Fifteen))15 percent must be distributed to the county and ((eighty-five))85 percent is retained by the city.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.14.460 and 2015 c 291 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

(b) If a county with a population over eight hundred thousand has not imposed the tax authorized under this subsection by January 1, 2011, any city with a population over thirty thousand located in that county may authorize, fix, and impose the sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The county must provide a credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed under this subsection (1)(b) by any city located in that county if the county imposes the tax after January 1, 2011.

(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax and within a city for a city's tax. The rate of tax equals one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.

(3) Moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs and services and for the operation or delivery of therapeutic court programs and services. Moneys collected by cities under this section may also be used for modifications to existing facilities to address health and safety needs necessary for the provision, operation, or delivery of chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs or services otherwise funded with moneys collected in this section. For the purposes of this section, "programs and services" includes, but is not limited to, treatment services, case management, transportation, and housing that are a component of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health treatment program or service. Every county that authorizes the tax provided in this section shall, and every other county may, establish and operate a therapeutic court component for dependency proceedings designed to be effective for the court's size, location, and resources.

(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as provided in this section, except as follows:

(a) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand or a city with a population over thirty thousand, which initially imposed the tax authorized under this section prior to January 1, 2012, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar years 2011-2012; up to forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2013; up to thirty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2016;

(b) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand or a city with a population over thirty thousand, which initially imposes the tax authorized under this section after December 31, 2011, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty percent may be used to supplant existing funding for up to the first three calendar years following adoption; and up to twenty-five percent may be used to supplant existing funding for the fourth and fifth years after adoption;

(c) For a county with a population of less than twenty-five thousand, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to eighty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar years 2011-2012; up to sixty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2013; up to forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2016; and

(d) Notwithstanding (a) through (c) of this subsection, moneys collected under this section may be used to support the cost of the judicial officer and support staff of a therapeutic court.

(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit the use of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of services and programs as provided in this section.

PART II

LODGING TAX

Sec. 8. RCW 82.04.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 1201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same. For the purposes of this section, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging offered regularly for public occupancy for periods of less than a month constitutes a license to use or enjoy the property subject to sales and use tax and not a rental or lease of property;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(b) Credit bureau services;

(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;

(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and

(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:

(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;

(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW;

(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;

(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;

(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.

(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).

(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.

(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.

(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:

(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.

(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;

(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;

(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(v) Batting cage activities;

(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;

(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;

(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;

(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;

(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);

(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;

(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW ((43.215.010))43.216.010;

(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;

(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;

(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;

(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and

(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:

(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed ((twenty-one))21 days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;

(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or

(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age ((eighteen))18, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.04.050 and 2020 c 80 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same. For the purposes of this section, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging offered regularly for public occupancy for periods of less than a month constitutes a license to use or enjoy the property subject to sales and use tax and not a rental or lease of property;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(b) Credit bureau services;

(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;

(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and

(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:

(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;

(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW;

(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;

(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;

(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.

(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).

(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.

(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.

(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:

(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.

(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;

(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;

(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(v) Batting cage activities;

(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;

(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;

(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;

(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;

(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);

(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;

(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.216.010;

(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;

(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;

(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;

(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and

(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:

(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed ((twenty-one))21 days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;

(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or

(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age ((eighteen))18, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.

PART III

REAL ESTATE EXCISE TAX

Sec. 10. RCW 82.46.010 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of any county or city must identify in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and must indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.

(2)(a) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. ((The))Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the revenues from this tax must be used by any city or county with a population of ((five thousand))5,000 or less and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

(b) ((After))Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, after April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed under this subsection (2) in counties over ((five thousand))5,000 population and cities over ((five thousand))5,000 population that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 must be used solely for financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450. However, revenues (i) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (ii) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-half of one percent of the selling price.

(4) Taxes imposed under this section must be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.

(5) Taxes imposed under this section must comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(6) The definitions in this subsection (6) apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "City" means any city or town.

(b) "Capital project" means those public works projects of a local government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative facilities; judicial facilities; river flood control projects; waterway flood control projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes; and technology infrastructure that is integral to the capital project.

(7) From July 22, 2011, until December 31, 2016, a city or county may use the greater of ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000 or ((thirty-five))35 percent of available funds under this section, but not to exceed ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 per year, for the operations and maintenance of existing capital projects as defined in subsection (6) of this section.

(8) After the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, a city or county may use the greater of $100,000 or 35 percent of available funds under this section for the operation of, maintenance of, and service support for, existing capital projects, including the provision of services to residents of affordable housing or shelter units.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.46.015 and 2016 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A))After the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, a city or county may use the greater of $100,000 or 35 percent of available funds from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 for the maintenance of, operation of, and service support for, existing capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010, and including the provision of services to residents of affordable housing or shelter units.

(2) After December 31, 2023, a city or county that meets the requirements of subsection (((2)))(3) of this section may use the greater of ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000 or ((twenty-five))25 percent of available funds, but not to exceed ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 per year, from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 for the maintenance of capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010(((6)(b))).

(((2)))(3) A city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (((1)))(2) of this section if:

(a) The city or county prepares a written report demonstrating that it has or will have adequate funding from all sources of public funding to pay for all capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010, identified in its capital facilities plan for the succeeding two-year period. Cities or counties not required to prepare a capital facilities plan may satisfy this provision by using a document that, at a minimum, identifies capital project needs and available public funding sources for the succeeding two-year period; and

(b)(i) The city or county has not enacted, after June 9, 2016: Any requirement on the listing or sale of real property; or any requirement on landlords, at the time of executing a lease, to perform or provide physical improvements or modifications to real property or fixtures, except if necessary to address an immediate threat to health or safety; or

(ii) Any local requirement adopted by the city or county under (b)(i) of this subsection is: Specifically authorized by RCW 35.80.030, 35A.11.020, chapter 7.48 RCW, or chapter 19.27 RCW; specifically authorized by other state or federal law; or a seller or landlord disclosure requirement pursuant to RCW 64.06.080.

(((3)))(4) The report prepared under subsection (((2)))(3)(a) of this section must: (a) Include information necessary to determine compliance with the requirements of subsection (((2)))(3)(a) of this section; (b) identify how revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 were used by the city or county during the prior two-year period; (c) identify how funds authorized under subsection (((1)))(2) of this section will be used during the succeeding two-year period; and (d) identify what percentage of funding for capital projects within the city or county is attributable to revenues under RCW 82.46.010 compared to all other sources of capital project funding. The city or county must prepare and adopt the report as part of its regular, public budget process.

(((4)))(5) The authority to use funds as authorized in this section is in addition to the authority to use funds pursuant to RCW 82.46.010(7), which remains in effect through December 31, 2016.

(((5)))(6) For purposes of this section, "maintenance" means the use of funds for labor and materials that will preserve, prevent the decline of, or extend the useful life of a capital project. "Maintenance" does not include labor or material costs for routine operations of a capital project.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.46.035 and 2019 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The))Except for revenues used after the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the legislative authority of any county or city must identify in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and must indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.

(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city that plans under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. Any county choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(2) and any city within such a county may only adopt an ordinance imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the ordinance is first authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters.

(3) Revenues generated from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section must be used by such counties and cities solely for financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan, except that the greater of $100,000 or 35 percent of revenues may additionally be used for the operation of, maintenance of, and service support for, existing capital projects after the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023. However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to March 1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(4) Revenues generated by the tax imposed by this section must be deposited in a separate account after December 31, 2023.

(5) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and "capital project" means those public works projects of a local government for:

(a) Planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, bridges, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems;

(b) Planning, construction, reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of parks; and

(c) Until January 1, 2026, planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of facilities for those experiencing homelessness and affordable housing projects.

(6) A county or city may use the greater of ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000 or ((twenty-five))25 percent of available funds, but not to exceed ((one million dollars))$1,000,000, for capital projects as defined in subsection (5)(c) of this section. The limits in this subsection do not apply to any county or city that used revenue under this section for the acquisition, construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of facilities to provide housing for the homeless prior to June 30, 2019.

(7) A county or city using funds for uses in subsection (5)(c) of this section must document in its plan under RCW 36.70A.070(3) that it has funds during the next two years for capital projects in subsection (5)(a) of this section.

(8) When the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.340 with the secretary of state and the appropriate county or city, the county or city's authority to impose the additional excise tax under this section is temporarily rescinded until the governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of noncompliance.

Sec. 13. RCW 82.46.037 and 2019 c 73 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A city or county that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may use the greater of ((one hundred thousand dollars))$100,000 or ((twenty-five))25 percent of available funds, but not to exceed ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 per year, except for the period from the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023, when the greater of $100,000 or 35 percent may be used from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.035 for:

(a) The maintenance of capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.035(5); ((and))

(b) The planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, improvement, or maintenance of capital projects as defined in RCW 82.46.010(6)(b) that are not also included within the definition of capital projects in RCW 82.46.035(5); and

(c) The operation of, and service support for, existing capital projects as included in the definition of capital project in RCW 82.46.035(5) and 82.46.010(6)(b), from the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023.

(2) A city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (1) of this section after the effective date of this section through December 31, 2023. Thereafter, a city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) The city or county prepares a written report demonstrating that it has or will have adequate funding from all sources of public funding to pay for all capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.035(5), identified in its capital facilities plan for the succeeding two-year period; and

(b)(i) The city or county has not enacted, after June 9, 2016, any requirement on the listing or sale of real property; or any requirement on landlords, at the time of executing a lease, to perform or provide physical improvements or modifications to real property or fixtures, except if necessary to address an immediate threat to health or safety;

(ii) Any local requirement adopted by the city or county under (b)(i) of this subsection is: Specifically authorized by RCW 35.80.030, 35A.11.020, chapter 7.48 RCW, or chapter 19.27 RCW; specifically authorized by other state or federal law; or a seller or landlord disclosure requirement pursuant to RCW 64.06.080; or

(iii) For a city or county using funds under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the requirements of this subsection apply, except that the date for such enactment under (b)(i) of this subsection is ninety days after October 19, 2017.

(3) The report prepared under subsection (2)(a) of this section must: (a) Include information necessary to determine compliance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section; (b) identify how revenues collected under RCW 82.46.035 were used by the city or county during the prior two-year period; (c) identify how funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section will be used during the succeeding two-year period; and (d) identify what percentage of funding for capital projects within the city or county is attributable to revenues under RCW 82.46.035 compared to all other sources of capital project funding. The city or county must prepare and adopt the report as part of its regular, public budget process.

(4) For purposes of this section, "maintenance" means the use of funds for labor and materials that will preserve, prevent the decline of, or extend the useful life of a capital project. "Maintenance" does not include labor or material costs for routine operations of a capital project.

PART IV

LEVY FLEXIBILITY

Sec. 14. RCW 84.55.050 and 2018 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant to this section shall be held not more than ((twelve))12 months prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state the conditions, if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section.

(2)(a) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years, during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The title of each ballot measure must state the limited purposes for which the proposed annual increases during the specified period of up to six consecutive years shall be used.

(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2)(b), funds raised by a levy under this subsection may not supplant existing funds used for the limited purpose specified in the ballot title. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the control of the taxing district receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(ii) The supplanting limitations in (b)(i) of this subsection do not apply to levies approved by the voters in calendar years 2009, 2010, ((and)) 2011, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, and 2022, in any county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more. This subsection (2)(b)(ii) only applies to levies approved by the voters after July 26, 2009.

(iii) The supplanting limitations in (b)(i) of this subsection do not apply to levies approved by the voters in calendar year 2009 and thereafter in any county with a population less than ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000. This subsection (2)(b)(iii) only applies to levies approved by the voters after July 26, 2009.

(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter, unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under this section will be used for this purpose.

(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:

(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;

(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made under (a) of this subsection;

(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on bonds;

(i) For the county in which the state capitol is located, the period for which the increased levies are made may not exceed ((twenty-five))25 years; and

(ii) For districts other than a district under (c)(i) of this subsection, the period for which the increased levies are made may not exceed nine years;

(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate allowed for the district;

(e) Provide that the exemption authorized by RCW 84.36.381 will apply to the levy of any additional regular property taxes authorized by voters; or

(f) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.

(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot measure under this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:

(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and

(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years levies were made under the proposition.

PART V

UTILITY LIEN FLEXIBILITY

Sec. 15. RCW 35.21.290 and 2010 c 135 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 35.21.217(4) and in subsection (2) of this section, cities and towns owning their own waterworks, or electric light or power plants shall have a lien against the premises to which water, electric light, or power services were furnished for four months charges therefor due or to become due, but not for any charges more than four months past due.

(2) The lien provided for in subsection (1) of this section may apply to charges more than four months past due, if the city or town has been unable to pursue collection or a lien against the premises to which water, electric light, or power services were furnished due to an emergency declaration by the governor. A lien may be imposed after the expiration of the emergency declaration that prevented collection. The period in which the lien may be imposed is the later of:

(a) Three months from the expiration of the emergency declaration preventing collection or a lien; or

(b) Three months of the ratepayer's failure to abide by the terms of an agreed payment plan, if the payment plan for past due charges would have allowed the ratepayer to repay the past due charges over a period of six months or more.

Sec. 16. RCW 35.67.210 and 1965 c 7 s 35.67.210 are each amended to read as follows:

((The))(1) Except as provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the sewerage lien shall be effective for a total of not to exceed six months' delinquent charges without the necessity of any writing or recording. In order to make such lien effective for more than six months' charges the city or town treasurer, clerk, or official charged with the administration of the affairs of the utility shall cause to be filed for record in the office of the county auditor of the county in which such city or town is located, a notice in substantially the following form:

"Sewerage lien notice

City (or town) of . . . .

vs.

. . . . reputed owner.

Notice is hereby given that the city (or town) of . . . . . . has and claims a lien for sewer charges against the following described premises situated in . . . . . . county, Washington, to wit:

(here insert legal description of premises)

Said lien is claimed for not exceeding six months such charges and interest now delinquent, amount to $. . . . . ., and is also claimed for future sewerage charges against said premises.

Dated . . . .

City (or town) of . . . .

By . . . ."

The lien notice may be signed by the city or town treasurer or clerk or other official in charge of the administration of the utility. The lien notice shall be recorded as prescribed by law for the recording of mechanics' liens.

(2) A sewage lien may exceed six months' delinquent charges without the necessity of any writing or recording if collection of charges was impacted by the declaration of an emergency by the governor. In such circumstances, a lien may be filed for all charges due during the period covered by the declaration and may be effective for six months after the expiration of the declaration of the emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Section 9 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. Section 8 of this act expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Except for section 9 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---