BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall appoint, after consultation with the commission, an executive director who shall act to carry out this chapter. The secretary shall also employ such professional, secretarial, clerical, and other assistants as may be necessary to effectively administer this chapter. The secretary shall fix the compensation and provide for travel expenses for the executive director and all such employees, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.79.390 (Secretary and commission relationship) and 2013 c 81 s 5, 2011 c 60 s 8, & 2008 c 134 s 30; and

(2) RCW 18.79.410 (Commission—Information to legislature) and 2013 c 81 s 6.

--- END ---