BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2021-2023 FISCAL BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2023.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act.

(a) "Fiscal year 2022" or "FY 2022" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022.

(b) "Fiscal year 2023" or "FY 2023" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023.

(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.

(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$546,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade Crossing Protective Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$504,000

Pilotage Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,832,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,832,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1418), Laws of 2021 (enhancing rail safety governance). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1418), Laws of 2021 is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation of $1,832,000 provided in this section lapses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,441,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$126,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,567,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,186,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,358,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$668,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section is provided solely for increasing the number of certified women and minority-owned contractors outside of the Puget Sound area in the transportation sector and supporting these contractors to successfully compete and earn more transportation contracting opportunities. This shall be done through various programs including but not limited to: (1) Outreach to women and minority business communities and individuals; (2) technical assistance as needed in areas such as financing, accounting, contracting, procurement, and resolution of disputes and grievances; (3) language access programs for those with limited English proficiency; and (4) other programs that aim to increase the number of women and minority contractors that are successful in obtaining contracts in the transportation sector either directly with state agencies such as the department, with local jurisdictions, or as subcontractors for prime contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE INSTITUTE FOR PUBLIC POLICY

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The total appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit analysis for an exclusive or partial American steel requirement for future transportation contracts and subcontracts authorized in the transportation budget. This cost-benefit analysis must, to the extent feasible, (1) compare existing types and uses of steel to made in America steel alternatives including evaluation of quality, (2) examine benefits to Washington workers and the Washington economy, (3) examine lifecycle and embodied carbon greenhouse gas emissions, (4) identify requirements for purchasing American steel that minimize costs and maximize benefits, and (5) evaluate American steel requirements or preferences in other states. The Washington state institute for public policy may solicit input for the analysis from representatives of interested parties to include, but not be limited to, the construction and manufacturing sectors, organized labor in the construction and manufacturing sectors, cities, counties, American steel manufacturing companies, environmental advocacy organizations, and appropriate state agencies. A final report is due to the legislature by December 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,776,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,926,000 of the pilotage account—state appropriation is provided solely for self-insurance liability premium expenditures; however, this appropriation is contingent upon the board:

(a) Annually depositing the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars collected through Puget Sound pilotage district pilotage tariffs into the pilotage account; and

(b) Assessing a self-insurance premium surcharge of sixteen dollars per pilotage assignment on vessels requiring pilotage in the Puget Sound pilotage district.

(2) The board of pilotage commissioners shall file the annual report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees required under RCW 88.16.035(1)(f) by September 1, 2019, and annually thereafter. The report must include the continuation of policies and procedures necessary to increase the diversity of pilots, trainees, and applicants, including a diversity action plan. The diversity action plan must articulate a comprehensive vision of the board's diversity goals and the steps it will take to reach those goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR THE SENATE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), to contract with the association of Washington cities to inventory and assess fish passage barriers associated with city roads located in the U.S. v. Washington case area, water resource inventory area numbers one through 23. The study is a continuation of previous inventories, and must finalize a complete inventory of city-owned fish passage barriers in water resource inventory area numbers one through 23. The inventories and assessments must be conducted using the methods described in the department's fish passage, inventory, assessment, and prioritization manual. A report of the study must be provided to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

(1) When distributing funds for litter control the department shall give priority to litter control along state highways.

(2) The department shall contract with the department of transportation to schedule litter prevention messaging and coordination of litter emphasis patrols with the Washington state patrol. The department of transportation may coordinate with the department to conduct litter pickup during scheduled maintenance closures as situations allow.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,601,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$27,198,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$32,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a demonstration project in one county, coordinating with a public transportation benefit area (PTBA) and the department of transportation, to test the feasibility and accuracy of the use of automated enforcement technology for high occupancy vehicle (HOV) lane passenger compliance. All costs associated with the demonstration project must be borne by the participating public transportation benefit area. Any photograph, microphotograph, or electronic images of a driver or passengers are for the exclusive use of the PTBA in the determination of whether an HOV passenger violation has occurred to test the feasibility and accuracy of automated enforcement under this subsection and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. All photographs, microphotographs, and electronic images must be destroyed after determining a passenger count and no later than the completion of the demonstration project. No warnings or notices of infraction may be issued under the demonstration project.

For purposes of the demonstration project, an automated enforcement technology device may record an image of a driver and passenger of a motor vehicle. The county and PTBA must erect signs marking the locations where the automated enforcement for HOV passenger requirements is occurring.

The PTBA, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature with the number of violations detected during the demonstration project, whether the technology used was accurate and any recommendations for future use of automated enforcement technology for HOV lane enforcement by June 30, 2022.

(2) The Washington traffic safety commission shall coordinate with each city that implements a pilot program as authorized in RCW 46.63.170, chapter 224, Laws of 2020 to provide the transportation committees of the legislature with the following information by June 30, 2023:

(a) The number of warnings and infractions issued to first-time violators under the pilot program;

(b) The number of warnings and infractions issued to the registered owners of vehicles that are not registered with an address located in the city conducting the pilot program; and

(c) The frequency with which warnings and infractions are issued on weekdays versus weekend days.

(3) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a pilot program in up to three cities implementing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in zones that have been designated by ordinance as "Stay Out of Areas of Racing."

(a) Any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2022.

(b) If a city has established an authorized automated vehicle noise enforcement camera pilot program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system.

(c) Any city administering a pilot program overseen by the traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(i) Automated vehicle noise enforcement camera may record photographs or audio of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only while a violation is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle;

(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall install two signs facing opposite directions within two hundred feet, or otherwise consistent with the uniform manual on traffic control devices, where the automated vehicle noise enforcement camera is used that state "Street Racing Noise Pilot Program in Progress";

(iii) Cities testing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras must post information on the city website and notify local media outlets indicating the zones in which the automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras will be used;

(iv) A city may only issue a warning notice with no penalty for a violation detected by automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in a Stay Out of Areas of Racing zone. Warning notices must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen days of the detected violation;

(v) A violation detected through the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras is not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, videos, microphotographs, audio recordings, or electronic images prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. No photograph, microphotograph, audio recording, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than the issuance of warnings for violations under this section or retained longer than necessary to issue a warning notice as required under this subsection (3); and

(vii) By June 30, 2023, the participating cities shall provide a report to the commission and appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, warnings issued, data retention and use, and other relevant issues regarding automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,134,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,743,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,669,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,546,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the county road administration board emergency loan account—state account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,660,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$770,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,430,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $220,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for overseeing a consultant study to provide recommendations related to the Washington state department of transportation's role in broadband service expansion efforts as directed in chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1457), Laws of 2021 (broadband and highway rights-of-way). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1457), Laws of 2021 (broadband and highway rights-of-way) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the joint transportation committee to convene a study on the impacts of current and historical city transportation investments on designated populations, including communities of color, low-income households, vulnerable populations, and displaced communities. The study must identify and measure the true costs of underinvestment of accessible transportation for designated populations, including the secondary impacts to public health, economic opportunity, educational access, and environmental risk factors. The assessment must include specific approaches to addressing existing inequities within cities, as well as recommendations to develop best practices to improve, diversify, and expand city transportation investments. A report must be provided to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 20, 2022.

(3) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided for the development of a workforce plan for the Washington state ferries which addresses recruitment, retention, diversity, training needs, leadership development, succession planning and other elements needed to ensure sufficient and cost-effective crewing and staffing of the ferry system. In developing the scope of work for the plan and throughout plan development, the joint transportation committee must solicit input from representatives of the Washington state ferries division and the human resources division of the Washington state department of transportation. Represented employee groups must also be consulted as part of plan development. The plan must include a roadmap for Washington state ferries to comprehensively address persistent staffing challenges and strategically position itself for its future workforce needs. The joint transportation committee must issue an interim report identifying short-term strategies to reduce reliance on overtime for staffing day-to-day ferry service. The interim report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022. The final report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 20, 2022.

(4) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided for the joint transportation committee to examine best practices from other states for insuring highway facilities. The joint transportation committee shall report to the legislature on findings and include recommendations for best practices for Washington state by December 15, 2021.

(5) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to update the Washington State Short Line Rail Inventory and Needs Assessment, prepared in 2015, and to facilitate a stakeholder process to assess the effectiveness of state support for short line rail infrastructure based on current and future short line rail infrastructure needs. This assessment must include consideration of current state grant and loan programs, including state investment in nonstate owned short lines, the state's role and investments in the Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) rail system, and any other ongoing state activities related to short line rail infrastructure. The joint transportation committee must solicit input from all regions of the state from representatives of: Short line rail infrastructure owners, short line rail operators, short line rail customers from representative industries, ports served by short line rail infrastructure, the Washington state department of transportation, the utilities and transportation commission, and other relevant stakeholders as identified by the joint transportation committee. A report with recommendations to enhance the state's support for short line rail infrastructure is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

(6)(a) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to develop a truck parking action plan with recommendations for immediate next steps for near-term and lasting change in the availability of truck parking for short-haul and long-distance commercial vehicle drivers who require reasonable accommodations for parking commercial motor vehicles, obtaining adequate services, and complying with federal rest requirements. For each opportunity identified, the action plan must:

(i) Assess the magnitude of potential impact;

(ii) Assess the potential difficulty level of implementation; and

(iii) Explain barriers to success and specific steps required to overcome them.

(b) The action plan must focus on approaches that would be most impactful and feasible and may include, but not be limited to:

(i) Specific cooperative private sector and government actions;

(ii) Legal and regulatory frameworks at the state level to drive private and/or public-sector action;

(iii) Incentive-based government programs to spur private sector innovation and investment; and

(iv) Direct government action at the state, regional, and/or local level.

(c) The action plan must identify specific, promising projects and approaches, and provide a clear roadmap to what is needed to drive real, substantial improvements in truck parking.

(d) Outreach for action plan input, including on the feasibility of each opportunity evaluated, must include outreach to representatives of: The trucking industry; truck labor organizations; the shipping industry; truck stop owners; commercial freight delivery recipients, including warehouse and retail recipients; the association of Washington cities; the Washington state association of counties; the Washington state department of transportation; the Washington state patrol; and an academic or research institution that can provide input on technical components of the plan.

(e) A concise action plan with specific recommended next steps is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

(7) $400,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to evaluate options for providing connectivity in the Pacific Northwest region from Portland, Oregon to Vancouver, British Columbia in light of new trends impacting the transportation system to determine how updated forecasts of future highway volumes and changes to future transportation mobility needs impact earlier assessments of options for facilitating mobility in the region, including ultra high speed rail. The assessment must consider and update relevant information provided in past Washington state department of transportation long range plans for the Cascades corridor. A comparative assessment of the potential benefits and costs of each option evaluated must be included. A report is due to the legislature by December 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,332,000

Interstate 405 and state Route Number 167 Express Toll Lanes

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$127,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$172,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,087,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $127,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $276,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $180,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $172,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation commission's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

(2) The commission shall identify and measure how a road usage charge could be adjusted so that vehicles of comparable efficiency pay the same rate regardless of their means of propulsion and examine options for indexing to stabilize revenue as vehicle fleets become more efficient over time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$523,697,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,157,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,261,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,224,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,053,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$288,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,348,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$433,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$77,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$552,538,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) $510,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(3) $16,099,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio system replacement, upgrade, and other related activities. Beginning January 1, 2022, the Washington state patrol must report semiannually to the office of the state chief information officer on the progress related to the projects and activities associated with the land mobile radio system, including the governance structure, outcomes achieved in the prior six-month time period, and how the activities are being managed holistically as recommended by the office of the chief information officer. At the time of submittal to the office of the state chief information officer, this report shall be transmitted to the office of financial management and the house and senate transportation committees.

(4) $493,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for aerial criminal investigation tools, including software licensing and maintenance, and annual certification, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(5) $786,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for one-time costs associated with establishing the second toxicology laboratory and addressing the backlog of toxicology cases from impaired driving and death investigations.

(6) $580,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2021, and quarterly thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since January 1, 2021, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the calendar quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since January 1, 2021, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406(18) of this act.

(7) The Washington state patrol and the office of financial management must be consulted by the department of transportation during the design phase of any improvement or preservation project that could impact Washington state patrol weigh station operations. During the design phase of any such project, the department of transportation must estimate the cost of designing around the affected weigh station's current operations, as well as the cost of moving the affected weigh station.

(8) $4,180,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for an additional arming and trooper basic training class. The cadet class is expected to graduate in June 2023.

(9) By December 1st of each year during the 2021-2023 biennium, the Washington state patrol must report to the house and senate transportation committees on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:

(a) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;

(b) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;

(c) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;

(d) The composition of workforce; and

(e) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years.

(10) $1,348,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $433,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $77,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington state patrol's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations and enforcement for the respective tolling facilities.

(11) $289,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of 911 workstations.

(12) $35,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of bomb response equipment.

(13) $713,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology infrastructure maintenance.

(14) The Washington state patrol must provide a report to the office of financial management and the house and senate transportation committees on its plan for implementing a transition to cloud computing and storage with its 2023-2025 budget submittal.

(15) $945,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1223), Laws of 2021 (custodial interrogations). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1223), Laws of 2021 (custodial interrogations) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(16) $92,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1054), Laws of 2021 (peace officer tactics). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1054), Laws of 2021 (peace officer tactics) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(17) $92,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310), Laws of 2021 (use of force by officers). If chapter . . . (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310), Laws of 2021 (use of force by officers) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(18)(a) The Washington state patrol is directed to terminate its "Agreement for Utility Connection and Reimbursement of Water Extension Expenses" with the city of Shelton, executed on June 12, 2017, subject to the city of Shelton's consent to terminate the agreement. The legislature finds that the water connection extension constructed by the Washington state patrol from the city of Shelton's water facilities to the Washington state patrol academy was necessary to meet the water supply needs of the academy. The legislature also finds that the water connection provides an ongoing water supply that is necessary to the operation of the training facility, that the state is making use of the water connection for these public activities, and that any future incidental use of the municipal infrastructure put in place to support these activities will not impede the Washington state patrol's ongoing use of the water connection extension.

(b) $2,220,000 of the transfer from the waste tire removal account—state appropriation to the motor vehicle account—state appropriation in this act, as required under RCW 70A.205.425, reimburses the motor vehicle account—state appropriation for the portion of the water project costs assigned by the agreement to properties, other than the Washington state patrol academy, that make use of the water connection while the agreement remains in effect. This reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund is intended to address any possibility that the termination of this agreement could be determined to result in the unconstitutional use of 18th amendment designated funds for nonhighway purposes under the constitution of the state of Washington; however, this transfer is not intended to indicate that the incidental use of this infrastructure by these properties necessarily requires such reimbursement under the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,928,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$242,488,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,294,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$79,421,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,099,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,189,000

License Plate Technology Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,250,000

Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,074,000

Limousine Carriers Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$417,000

DOL Technology Improvement & Data Management

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$816,000

Agency Financial Transaction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$21,257,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$916,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$371,443,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $12,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation, $2,000 of the limited fish and wildlife account—state appropriation, $728,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $238,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation, and $10,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $28,636,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs necessary to accommodate increased demand for enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall report on a quarterly basis on the use of these funds, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued/renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued/renewed. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall implement efficiency measures to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times including, but not limited to, the installation of additional cameras at licensing service offices that reduce bottlenecks and align with the "keep your customer" initiative.

(3)(a) The department must implement cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least a portion of credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions. The department must develop a method of tracking the amount of credit card and other financial cost-recovery revenues. The department must notify the state treasurer of these amounts and the state treasurer must deposit these revenues in the agency financial transaction account on a quarterly basis. If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1115), Laws of 2021 (cost recovery of state agency credit card and transaction fees) is enacted by June 30, 2021, this subsection (3)(a) lapses.

(b) The appropriations in this section assume implementation by the department of cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $21,257,000 during the 2021-2023 biennium in credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

(4) $3,074,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

(5) $1,550,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of social and health services, children's administration division for the purpose of providing driver's license support to a larger population of foster youth than is already served within existing resources. Support services include reimbursement of driver's license issuance costs, fees for driver training education, and motor vehicle liability insurance costs.

(6) $500,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for communication and outreach activities necessary to inform the public of federally acceptable identification options including, but not limited to, enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall continue the outreach plan that includes informational material that can be effectively communicated to all communities and populations in Washington. To accomplish this work, the department shall contract with an external vendor with demonstrated experience and expertise in outreach and marketing to underrepresented communities in a culturally responsive fashion.

(7) $23,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1078), Laws of 2021 (restoring voter eligibility after felony conviction). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1078), Laws of 2021 (restoring voter eligibility after felony conviction) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(8) $523,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1207), Laws of 2021 (department of licensing issued documents). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1207), Laws of 2021 (department of licensing issued documents) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(9) $57,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1322), Laws of 2021 (off-road vehicle enforcement). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1322), Laws of 2021 (off-road vehicle enforcement) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(10)(a) $54,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the issuance of nonemergency medical transportation vehicle decals to implement the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program established elsewhere in this act. A for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle is a vehicle that is a "for hire vehicle" under RCW 46.04.190 that provides nonemergency medical transportation, including for life-sustaining transportation purposes, to meet the medical transportation needs of individuals traveling to medical practices and clinics, cancer centers, dialysis facilities, hospitals, and other care providers.

(b) As part of this pilot program, the owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director, for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal for a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle. The high occupancy vehicle exempt decal allows the for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle to use a high occupancy vehicle lane as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025 during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) For the exemption in this subsection to apply to a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, the decal:

(i) Must be displayed on the vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside the vehicle;

(ii) Must identify that the vehicle is exempt from the high occupancy vehicle requirements; and

(iii) Must be visible from the rear of the vehicle.

(d) The owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle or the owner's representative must apply for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal on a form provided or approved by the department. The application must include:

(i) The name and address of the person who is the owner of the vehicle;

(ii) A full description of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, and the vehicle identification number;

(iii) The purpose for which the vehicle is principally used;

(iv) An attestation signed by the vehicle's owner or the owner's representative that the vehicle's owner has a minimum of one contract or service agreement to provide for hire transportation services for medical purposes with one or more of the following entities: A health insurance company; a hospital, clinic, dialysis center, or other medical institution; a day care center, retirement home, or group home; a federal, state, or local agency or jurisdiction; or a broker who negotiates these services on behalf of one or more of these entities; and

(v) Other information as required by the department upon application.

(e) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect the fee required under (f) of this subsection when issuing a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal.

(f) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent, is required to collect a $5 fee when issuing a decal under this subsection, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(g) A high occupancy vehicle exempt decal may not be renewed and expires upon the termination of the pilot program established elsewhere in this act. The status as an exempt vehicle continues until suspended or revoked for misuse, or when the vehicle is no longer used as a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, or when the pilot program established elsewhere in this act is terminated.

(h) The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(11) The department must place personal and company data elements in separate data fields to allow the department to select discrete data elements when providing information or data to persons or entities outside the department. Pursuant to the restrictions in federal and state law, a person's photo, social security number, or medical information must not be made available through public disclosure or data being provided under RCW 46.12.630 or 46.12.635.

(12) The department must work with any regional transit authority pursuant to RCW 82.44.135 to determine cost allocations that are based on actual costs and that would result in full cost recovery for administration and collection of the taxes. The department must report actual cost allocations to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$53,747,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,150,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$29,809,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,933,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,984,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$132,623,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $12,483,846 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide semiannual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:

(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips;

(b) A month-to-month comparison of travel times and travel time reliability for the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor as specified in (a) of this subsection since implementation of the express toll lanes and, to the extent available, a comparison to the travel times and travel time reliability prior to implementation of the express toll lanes;

(c) Total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane (i) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, on this segment of Interstate 405 prior to implementation of the express toll lanes and (ii) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, from month to month since implementation of the express toll lanes; and

(d) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.

(3) The department shall make detailed semiannual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's website on the following:

(a) The use of consultants in the tolling program, including the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consultant contracts;

(b) The nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of staffing the division, consultants, and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs;

(c) The vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of the customer service center, cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, electronic payment processing, and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement;

(d) The toll adjudication process, including a summary table for each toll facility that includes:

(i) The number of notices of civil penalty issued;

(ii) The number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty;

(iii) The number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond;

(iv) Workload costs related to hearings;

(v) The cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and

(vi) Revenues generated from notices of civil penalty; and

(e) A summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and express toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(4) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department plans to issue a request for proposals as the first stage of a competitive procurement process that will replace the toll equipment and select a new tolling operator for the Tacoma Narrows Bridge. The request for proposals and subsequent competitive procurement must incorporate elements that prioritize the overall goal of lowering costs per transaction for the facility, such as incentives for innovative approaches which result in lower transactional costs, requests for efficiencies on the part of the bidder that lower operational costs, and incorporation of technologies such as self-serve credit card machines or other point-of-payment technologies that lower costs or improve operational efficiencies.

(5) $20,001,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation is provided solely for the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility's expected share of collecting toll revenues, operating customer services, and maintaining toll collection systems. The legislature expects to see appropriate reductions to the other toll facility accounts once tolling on the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility stabilizes and any previously incurred costs for start-up of the new facility are charged back to the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account. The office of financial management shall closely monitor the application of the cost allocation model and ensure that the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility is adequately sharing costs and the other toll facility accounts are not being overspent or subsidizing the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility.

(6)(a) $1,651,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $709,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, $932,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation, and $708,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation are provided solely for the reappropriation of unspent funds on the new tolling back office system from the 2019-2021 biennium, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) The department shall continue to work with the office of financial management, office of the chief information officer, and the transportation committees of the legislature on the project management plan that includes a provision for independent verification and validation of contract deliverables from the successful bidder and a provision for quality assurance that includes reporting independently to the office of the chief information officer on an ongoing basis during system implementation.

(c) The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection in unallotted status until the department submits a detailed progress report on the progress of the new tolling back office system. The director of the office of financial management or their designee shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(7) Out of funding appropriated in this section, the department shall contract with the state auditor's office for a performance audit of the department's project to replace its electronic toll collection system. The audit should include an evaluation of the department's project planning, vendor procurement, contract management and project oversight. The final report is to be issued by December 31, 2022. The state auditor will transmit copies of the report to the jurisdictional committees of the legislature and the department.

(8) $1,516,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the increased costs of insurance for the state route number 520 floating bridge. The department shall conduct an evaluation of the short and long-term costs and benefits including risk mitigation of self-insurance as compared to the commercial insurance option for the state route number 520 floating bridge, as allowed under the terms of the state route number 520 master bond resolution. By December 15, 2021, the department shall report to the legislature on the results of this evaluation.

(9) As part of the department's 2023-2025 biennial budget request, the department shall update the cost allocation recommendations that assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by relevant Washington state department of transportation programs, the Washington state patrol, and the transportation commission. The recommendations shall be based on updated traffic and toll transaction patterns and other relevant factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,437,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$102,671,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$263,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,831,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,441,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$108,643,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,546,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's cost related to the one Washington project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) The capital systems replacement or modernization project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$35,771,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$35,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,480,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,916,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,888,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public use airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security.

(2) $505,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1198), Laws of 2021 (aviation coordinating commission). If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1198), Laws of 2021 is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(3) $280,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1379), Laws of 2021 (unpiloted aircraft system state coordinator). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1379), Laws of 2021 (unpiloted aircraft system state coordinator) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$60,273,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$258,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$61,031,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Rocky Reach Trail, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on state route number 2 and the coincident section of state route number 97. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-09-04686 containing the trail and associated buffer areas to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(a) The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes.

(b) Prior to completing the transfer in this subsection (1), the department must ensure that provisions are made to accommodate private and public utilities and any facilities that predate the department's acquisition of the property, at no cost to those entities. Prior to completing the transfer, the department shall also ensure that provisions, by fair market assessment, are made to accommodate other private and public utilities and any facilities that have been legally allowed by permit or other instrument.

(c) The department may sell any adjoining property that is not necessary to support the Rocky Reach Trail and adjacent buffer areas only after the transfer of trail-related property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is complete. Adjoining property owners must be given the first opportunity to acquire such property that abuts their property, and applicable boundary line or other adjustments must be made to the legal descriptions for recording purposes.

(2) With respect to Parcel 12 of the real property conveyed by the state of Washington to the city of Mercer Island under that certain quitclaim deed, dated April 19, 2000, recorded in King county under recording no. 20000425001234, the requirement in the deed that the property be used for road/street purposes only will be deemed satisfied by the department of transportation so long as commuter parking, as part of the vertical development of the property, is one of the significant uses of the property.

(3) During the 2021-2023 biennium, if the department takes possession of the property situated in the City of Edmonds for which a purchase agreement was executed between Unocal and the department in 2005 (Tax Parcel Number 262703-2-003-0009), and if the department confirms that the property is still no longer needed for transportation purposes, the department shall provide the City of Edmonds with the right of first purchase in accordance with RCW 47.12.063(3) for the city's intended use of the property to rehabilitate near-shore habitat for salmon and related species.

(4) The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, on the status of its efforts to consolidate franchises for broadband facilities across the state, including plans for increasing the number of consolidated franchises in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$675,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,900,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,533,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$17,108,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The public private partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(2) $2,400,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the pilot program established under RCW 47.04.355, to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards.

(3)(a)(i) $133,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of conducting an assessment of options for the development, including potential features and costs, for a publicly available mapping and forecasting tool that provides locations and essential information of charging and refueling infrastructure to support forecasted levels of electric vehicle adoption, travel, and usage across Washington state as described in chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1287), Laws of 2021 (preparedness for a zero emissions transportation future).

(ii) The assessment must include a review of existing infrastructure needs assessments, mapping and forecasting tools, environmental health disparity resources, and related modeling. It must be performed in consultation with the department of ecology, department of commerce, and office of equity, and include a stakeholder process to address community, public agency, and relevant public and private utility needs to determine the resources needed to facilitate statewide and local transportation electrification efforts to drive emission reductions consistent with RCW 70A.45.020.

(iii) A report summarizing the findings of the assessment and the options recommended by the department for the tool's development is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2021.

(b) $10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a clean alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure grant program for clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure that will provide public benefits for the state's network of charging infrastructure to facilitate state zero emission vehicle requirements under RCW 70A.30.010 and greenhouse gas emission reduction goals under RCW 70A.45.020. The department must develop a strategy for grant award selection based on maximizing public benefits by: Facilitating residents' and businesses' ability to purchase and lease clean alternative fuel vehicles through increased access to public electric vehicle charging and refueling, facilitating a decline in vehicle emissions that would otherwise contribute to pollution and greenhouse gas emissions, and increasing equity of access to clean alternative fuel vehicles. The department shall use proposed grant matching funds as a criterion for selecting grant award recipients. When the publicly available mapping and forecasting tool in (a) of this subsection has been developed and is available to be used for this purpose, strategy development for grant award selection must include analysis of the information provided by the tool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$505,498,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,222,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,529,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,443,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,573,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$529,265,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,529,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of stormwater runoff from state highways. Plan and reporting requirements as required in chapter 435, Laws of 2019 (Local Stormwater Charges) shall be consistent with the January 2012 findings of the Joint Transportation Committee Report for Effective Cost Recovery Structure for WSDOT, Jurisdictions, and Efficiencies in Stormwater Management.

(2) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(3) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019. The department must contract out or hire a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.

(4) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma. The program shall address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $570,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.

(5) The department must continue a pilot program for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium at the four highest demand safety rest areas to create and maintain an online calendar for volunteer groups to check availability of weekends for the free coffee program. The calendar must be updated at least weekly and show dates and times that are, or are not, available to participate in the free coffee program. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the ongoing pilot by December 1, 2022, outlining the costs and benefits of the online calendar pilot, and including surveys from the volunteer groups and agency staff to determine its effectiveness.

(6) $686,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for reimbursing the Oregon department of transportation (ODOT) for the department's share of increased maintenance costs of six highway bridges over the Columbia River that are maintained by ODOT.

(7) $4,145,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased costs of highway maintenance materials.

(8) $5,816,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for repairing damages to highways caused by known and unknown third parties. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for third-party damage repair and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(9) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department owned rights-of-way. The department must coordinate and work with local government officials and social service organizations to provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights of way. The department may hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary to provide enhanced safety-related activities along state highway rights-of-way.

(10) $623,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1355), Laws of 2021 (noxious weeds). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1355), Laws of 2021 (noxious weeds) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,142,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$224,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,112,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$79,838,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(2)(a) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to organ transport vehicles transporting a time urgent organ for an organ procurement organization as defined in RCW 68.64.010. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, organ transport vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(d) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to private, for hire vehicles regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW that have been specially manufactured, designed, or modified for the transportation of a person who has a mobility disability and uses a wheelchair or other assistive device. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, wheelchair-accessible taxicabs that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered public transportation vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(e) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicles, when in use for medical purposes, as described elsewhere in this act. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, nonemergency medical transportation vehicles that meet the requirements identified elsewhere in this act must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(f) Nothing in this subsection (2) is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.

(3) When regional transit authority construction activities are visible from a state highway, the department shall allow the regional transit authority to place safe and appropriate signage informing the public of the purpose of the construction activity.

(4) The department must make signage for low-height bridges a high priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$43,973,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$780,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,129,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$185,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$77,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$46,915,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce through: (1) The preapprenticeship support services (PASS) program, which aims to increase diversity in the highway construction workforce and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway construction workforce. In addition to the services allowed by RCW 47.01.435, the PASS program may provide housing assistance for youth aging out of the foster care and juvenile rehabilitation systems in order to support the participation of these youth in a transportation-related preapprenticeship program; (2) assisting minority and women-owned businesses to perform work in the highway construction industry. This assistance shall include technical assistance, business training, counseling, guidance, prime to subcontractor relationship building, and a capacity building mentorship program. At a minimum, $1,000,000 of the total appropriation in this subsection shall be directed towards the efforts outlined in this subsection. Of the total appropriation in this subsection, up to one full time position can be created to support all this work. The provider(s) chosen to complete the work in this subsection shall be selected through a competitive bidding process. The program shall be administered by the Washington state department of transportation's office of equal opportunity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,776,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$34,865,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$406,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,669,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,879,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$69,904,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,879,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for completion of updating the state route number 167 master plan.

(2) $406,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington department of mechanical engineering, to study measures to reduce noise impacts from the state route number 520 bridge expansion joints. The field testing shall be scheduled during existing construction, maintenance, or other scheduled closures to minimize impacts. The testing must also ensure safety of the traveling public. The study shall examine testing methodologies and project timelines and costs. A final report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by March 1, 2022.

(3) $5,900,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for delivery of the department's state planning and research work program and pooled fund research projects, provided that the department may not expend any amounts provided in this section on a long-range plan or corridor scenario analysis for I-5 from Tumwater to Marysville. This is not intended to reference or impact: The existing I-5 corridor from Mounts road to Tumwater design and operations alternatives analysis; design studies related to HOV lanes or operations; or where it is necessary to continue design and operations analysis related to projects already under development.

(4) $4,080,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Forward Drive road usage charge research project overseen by the transportation commission using a portion of the amount of the federal grant award. The purpose of the Forward Drive road usage charge research project is to advance research in key policy areas related to road usage charge including assessing impacts of future mobility shifts on road usage charge revenues, conducting an equity analysis, updating and assessing emerging mileage reporting methods, determining opportunities to reduce cost of collection, conducting small-scale pilot tests, and identifying a long-term, detailed phase-in plan.

(5) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided for the department to partner with the department of commerce in developing vehicle miles traveled targets for the counties in Washington state with (a) a population density of at least 100 people per square mile and a population of at least 200,000; or (b) a population density of at least 75 people per square mile and an annual growth rate of at least 1.75 percent as determined by the office of financial management. Given land use patterns are key factors in travel demand and should be taken into consideration when developing the targets, the department and the department of commerce shall partner with local jurisdictions, regional transportation planning organizations and other stakeholders to inventory existing laws and rules that promote transportation and land use, identify gaps and make recommendations for changes in laws, rules and agency guidance, and establish a framework for considering underserved and rural communities in the evaluation. The department and the department of commerce shall provide an initial technical report by December 31, 2021, an interim report by June 22, 2022, and a final report to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2023, that includes a process for establishing vehicle miles traveled reduction targets, a recommended suite of options for local jurisdictions to achieve the targets, and funding requirements for state and local jurisdictions.

(6) $500,0000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of a state route number 161 corridor study to be conducted in consultation with Pierce Transit, Sound Transit, and other regional entities. The department must study practical solutions to address high vehicle volumes and delays in the corridor. The study should develop short-, mid-, and long-term strategies and identify potential improvements for the corridor or improvements to nearby roads that could help address the traffic congestion on state route number 161.

(7) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for WSDOT to do a corridor study of SR 302 (Victor Area) to recommend safety and infrastructure improvements to address current damage and prevent future roadway collapse and landslides that have caused road closures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$77,093,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,045,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$220,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$184,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$80,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Consistent with existing protocol and practices, for any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds $5,000,000, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2021, and quarterly thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.

(3) Beginning October 1, 2021, and quarterly thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.

(4) When the department identifies significant legal issues that have potential transportation budget implications, the department must initiate a briefing for appropriate legislative members or staff through the office of the attorney general and its legislative briefing protocol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$784,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$104,478,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$33,168,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$146,827,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,574,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$288,931,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $72,698,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) $16,526,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) $56,172,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2019 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2019" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(2) $33,168,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(3) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (i) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (ii) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(4) $26,800,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Public Transportation Program (V), except for the King County Metro Eastlake Off-Street Layover Facility project, for which $4,524,000 is reappropriated, and the King County Metro Transit Speed & Reliability Hot Spot Imp Program project, for which $950,000 is reappropriated.

(5)(a) $77,679,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2021, and December 15, 2022, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2023-2025 biennium, no more than thirty percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $6,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of this amount:

(a) $30,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation is provided solely for the STAR pass program for state employees residing in Mason and Grays Harbor Counties. Use of the pass is for public transportation between Mason County and Thurston County, and Grays Harbor and Thurston County. The pass may also be used within Grays Harbor County. The STAR pass commute trip reduction program is open to any state employee who expresses intent to commute to his or her assigned state worksite using a public transit system currently participating in the STAR pass program.

(b) $800,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a first mile/last mile connections grant program. Eligible grant recipients include cities, businesses, nonprofits, and transportation network companies with first mile/last mile solution proposals. Transit agencies are not eligible. The commute trip reduction board shall develop grant parameters, evaluation criteria, and evaluate grant proposals. The commute trip reduction board shall provide the transportation committees of the legislature a report on the effectiveness of this grant program and best practices for continuing the program.

(8) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, $28,263,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021. It is the intent of the legislature that entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP document referenced in this subsection receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP document referenced in this subsection before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.

(9) The department shall not require more than a ten percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.

(10) $375,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Intercity Transit for the Dash shuttle program.

(11) $31,993,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the green transportation capital grant program established in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption).

(12) $555,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to establish and administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington State University extension energy program shall prepare a report regarding the utilization of the program and provide this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$421,103,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$124,000,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$545,224,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2021-2023 supplemental and 2023-2025 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs. The data in the tables in the report must be supplied in a digital file format.

(2) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee, which must include a representative of the department of enterprise services.

(3) $70,794,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 703 of this act. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall review future use of alternative fuels and dual fuel configurations, including hydrogen.

(4) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) $336,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for evacuation slide training.

(6) $336,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for fall restraint labor and industries inspections.

(7) $2,400,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for overtime expenses incurred by engine and deck crew members.

(8) $735,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for familiarization for new assignments of engine crew and terminal staff.

(9) $160,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for electronic navigation training.

(10) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for a cost benefit study of a second shift at the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility.

(11) $688,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for new employee training.

(12) $1,978,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for restoration of service to reflect increased ridership, availability of crewing, and available revenues. Expenditures may be made to resume service to Sidney British Columbia, including any service to the San Juans; to provide Saturday service on the Fauntleroy-Vashon-Southworth route; and to resume late night service on other routes in the system.

(13) The department must request reimbursement from the federal transit administration for the maximum amount of ferry operating expenses eligible for reimbursement under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,307,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$80,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department is directed to continue to pursue efforts to reduce costs, increase ridership, and review Amtrak Cascades fares and fare schedules. Within thirty days of each annual cost/revenue reconciliation under the Amtrak service contract, the department shall report annual credits to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees. Annual credits from Amtrak to the department including, but not limited to, credits due to higher ridership, reduced level of service, and fare or fare schedule adjustments, must be used to offset corresponding amounts of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, which must be placed in reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,465,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,932,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,448,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3) and $350,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:

(a) In coordination with stakeholders, identify county-owned fish passage barriers, and assess which barriers share the same stream system as state-owned fish passage barriers.

(b) Streamline and update the county road administration board's data dashboard, county reporting systems, and program management software to provide a more detailed, more transparent, and user-friendly platform for data management, reporting, and research by the public and other interested parties.

(c) A study of the use of county road right-of-way as a potential source of revenue for county road operating and maintenance needs with recommendations on their feasibility statewide.

(2) The entire multiuse roadway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants under RCW 46.09.540, subject to the following limitations:

(a) Twenty-five percent of the amounts provided are reserved for counties that each have a population of fifteen thousand persons or less;

(b)(i) Seventy-five percent of the amounts provided are reserved for counties that each have a population exceeding fifteen thousand persons; and

(ii) No county that receives a grant or grants under (b) of this subsection may receive more than sixty thousand dollars in total grants.

(3)(a) By October 1, 2021, the department must report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees with recommendations regarding:

(i) Modifications to the agreement with Wahkiakum county regarding future state reimbursement for the Wahkiakum ferry operating and maintenance deficit; and

(ii) Cost-sharing models for operating and maintenance costs, which recognize the benefit of the ferry route to both Washington and Oregon.

(b) The reimbursement recommendations must reflect a mutual agreement with Wahkiakum county, which considers future county ferry operating loss projections. The report may address the importance of the ferry route to the state highway system and whether there is a need for an increased role for the state department of transportation in the finance or operation of the ferry route.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,577,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,195,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects by amount, as listed in the LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - FMSIB.

(2) Until directed by the legislature, the board may not initiate a new call for projects.

(3)(a) For the 2021-2023 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects as listed in the LEAP transportation document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - FMSIB project list in order for the board to manage project spending and support the efficient and timely delivery of all projects in the program. The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects under the following conditions and limitations:

(i) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(ii) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects on the FMSIB LEAP list;

(iii) Transfers between projects may be made by the board without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (3)(a), provided that the transfer amount does not exceed $250,000 or 10 percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees; and

(iv) Transfers may only be made in fiscal year 2023.

(b) At the time the board submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.

(c) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and consider any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.

(d) No fewer than 10 days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the board of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,196,000

(1) $695,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for roof replacement.

(2) $3,501,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

(a) $250,000 for emergency repairs;

(b) $350,000 for fuel tank decommissioning;

(c) $750,000 for generator and electrical replacement;

(d) $195,000 for the exterior envelope of the Yakima office;

(e) $466,000 for the snow cat shelter;

(f) $325,000 for the weatherization of the Bow Hill inspection station;

(g) $325,000 for the weatherization of the Sea-Tac north inspection station;

(h) $200,000 for roof replacements originally authorized in the 2019-2021 biennium; and

(i) $640,000 for the Marysville water and fire suppression project originally authorized in the 2019-2021 biennium.

The Washington state patrol may transfer funds between projects specified in this subsection to address cash flow requirements. If a project specified in this subsection is completed for less than the amount provided, the remainder may be transferred to another project specified in this subsection not to exceed the total appropriation provided in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$55,028,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,456,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$37,379,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$93,863,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,100,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$201,000,000

Complete Streets Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,670,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$219,770,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $7,500,000 of the transportation improvement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Relight Washington Program. Of this amount, $5,000,000 is for cities with an assessed value of over $2,000,000,000 that can demonstrate a sustainable return on investment when converting to energy efficient LED streetlights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,852,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,852,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new Olympic region maintenance and administration facility to be located on the department-owned site at the intersection of Marvin Road and 32nd Avenue in Lacey, Washington.

(2)(a) $4,325,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for payments of a financing contract for the department facility located at 15700 Dayton Ave N in Shoreline.

(b) Payments from the department of ecology pursuant to the agreement with the department to pay a share of the financing contract in (a) of this subsection must be deposited into the motor vehicle account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$128,053,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$91,517,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$269,338,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$57,092,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,940,000

Connecting Washington Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,658,654,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$105,363,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,284,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$149,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,308,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$340,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,699,698,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-1 as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) The connecting Washington account—state appropriation includes up to $2,375,216,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.

(5) The special category C account—state appropriation includes up to $87,659,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.

(6) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to $47,226,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(7) $69,450,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $2,258,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and $984,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z). It is the intent of the legislature that any legal damages paid to the state as a result of a lawsuit related to contractual provisions for construction and delivery of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project be used to repay project cost increases paid from the transportation partnership account—state funds.

(8) $193,699,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R).

(9) $14,827,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-405/SR 522 to I-5 Capacity Improvements project (L2000234) for activities related to adding capacity on Interstate 405 between state route number 522 and Interstate 5, with the goals of increasing vehicle throughput and aligning project completion with the implementation of bus rapid transit in the vicinity of the project.

(10)(a) $492,349,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation and $355,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R).

(b) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project (current anticipated contract completion of 2023), WSDOT shall sell that portion of the property not used for permanent transportation improvements and initiate a process to convey that surplus property to a subsequent owner.

(11) $359,522,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $105,523,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $15,369,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $2,300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $2,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).

(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.

(b) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall develop a coordinated corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509 in collaboration with affected stakeholders. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.

(c) It is the legislature's intent that the department shall construct a full single-point urban interchange at the junction of state route number 161 (Meridian avenue) and state route number 167 and a full single-point urban interchange at the junction of state route number 509 and 188th Street. If the department receives additional funds from an outside source for this project after the base project is fully funded, the funds must first be applied toward the completion of these two full single-point urban interchanges.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the design phase of the Puyallup to Tacoma multiuse trail along the SR 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park.

(12) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(13) Any advisory group that the department convenes during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium must consider the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(14) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70.95.805, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.

Further, the legislature determines construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials substantially meet widely recognized international, national, and local standards and specifications referenced in American society for testing and materials, American concrete institute, Washington state department of transportation, Seattle department of transportation, American public works association, federal aviation administration, and federal highway administration specifications, and are described as necessary and desirable products for recycling and reuse by state and federal agencies.

As these recyclable materials have well established markets, are substantially a primary or secondary product of necessary construction processes and production, and are managed as an item of commercial value, construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials are exempt from chapter 173-350 WAC.

(15)(a) $26,928,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $1,671,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for supporting a project office and the continued work towards replacement of the Interstate 5 bridge across the Columbia river (G2000088).

(b) The work of this project office includes, but is not limited to, the reevaluation of the purpose and need identified for the project previously known as the Columbia river crossing, the reevaluation of permits and development of a finance plan, the reengagement of key stakeholders and the public, and the reevaluation of scope, schedule, and budget for a reinvigorated bistate effort for replacement of the Interstate 5 Columbia river bridge. When reevaluating the finance plan for the project, the department shall assume that some costs of the new facility may be covered by tolls. The project office must also study the possible different governance structures for a bridge authority that would provide for the joint administration of the bridges over the Columbia river between Oregon and Washington. As part of this study, the project office must examine the feasibility and necessity of an interstate compact in conjunction with the national center for interstate compacts.

(c) During the 2021-2023 biennium the department shall have as a goal to:

(i) Conduct all work necessary to prepare and publish a draft SEIS;

(ii) Coordinate with regulatory agencies to begin the process of obtaining environmental approvals and permits;

(iii) Identify a locally preferred alternative; and

(iv) Begin preparing a final SEIS.

The department shall aim to provide progress reports on these activities to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, June 1, 2022, and December 1, 2022.

(16) $1,000,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the North Lewis County transportation study. The study shall examine new, alternate routes for vehicular and truck traffic at the Harrison interchange (Exit 82) in North Centralia and shall allow for a site and configuration to be selected and feasibility to be conducted for final design, permitting and construction of the I-5/North Lewis county Interchange project (L2000204).

(17)(a) $332,500,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $52,036,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, and $1,849,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.

(b) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach to maximize habitat gain by replacing both state and local culverts. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts.

(c) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.

(18) $340,000,000 of the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Account—federal appropriation is provided solely for water infrastructure projects that remove fish passage barriers that are impeding state streams, rivers, and other waterways (0BI4001), as permitted under the federal American rescue plan act of 2021. Once available, these amounts must be applied prior to other amounts provided for this purpose (0BI4001). These water infrastructure projects are intended to meet compliance requirements with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.

(19)(a) The Washington state department of transportation is directed to pursue compliance with the U.S. v. Washington permanent injunction by delivering culvert corrections within the injunction area guided by the principle of providing the greatest fisheries habitat gain at the earliest time and considering the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert condition, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts.

(b) The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must provide updates on the implementation of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the legislature by November 1, 2021, and June 1, 2022.

(20) $14,669,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation and $3,037,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the I-90/Barker to Harvard – Improve Interchanges & Local Roads project (L2000122). The connecting Washington account appropriation for the improvements that fall within the city of Liberty Lake may only be expended if the city of Liberty Lake agrees to cover any project costs within the city of Liberty Lake above the $20,900,000 of state appropriation provided for the total project in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-1 as developed March 22, 2021, Program – Highway Improvements (I).

(21) $15,189,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $259,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and $15,481,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 410 to SR 18 - Congestion Management project (316706C).

(22) $18,914,000 of the Special Category C account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River project (L1000199) for improving and widening state route number 18 to four lanes from Issaquah-Hobart Road to Raging River.

(23) $1,090,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/East Sequim Corridor Improvements project (L2000343).

(24) $12,139,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $9,104,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI).

(25) $1,378,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/Morse Creek Safety Barrier project (L1000247).

(26) $915,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 162/410 Interchange Design and Right of Way project (L1000276).

(27)(a) $6,581,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US Hwy 2 Safety project (N00200R).

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is for the department to conduct a Highway 2 Safety-Capacity study.

(28) The department may advance the I-405/SR 522 to I-5 Capacity Improvements (L2000234) project and construct the project earlier than is scheduled in the LEAP list if funding is identified by September 1, 2021. The department shall explore alternatives to toll revenue funding including but not limited to federal loan and grant programs. The department shall explore phasing and modifying the project to align as best as possible with the anticipated deployment of bus rapid transit on the corridor in 2023-25. The department shall report back to the transportation committees of the legislature on this work prior to September 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,520,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,394,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$85,444,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$465,871,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,792,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,891,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$182,780,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,730,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$314,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,039,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$49,105,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$849,880,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-1 as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act. The department may not convene a Washington freight advisory committee. When submitting its 2021-2023 supplemental and 2023-2025 biennial budget requests, the department shall provide a prioritized freight project list for the national highway freight program funds that first addresses shortfalls in funding for connecting Washington act projects. The freight project list must describe how the estimated funding allocation for the national highway freight program for federal fiscal years 2022-2025 could be invested and matched.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) $5,166,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio upgrade (G2000055) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The land mobile radio project is subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer. The department, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, shall identify where existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments should be consolidated, identify when existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments can be reused or leveraged to meet multiagency needs, increase mobile radio interoperability between agencies, and identify how redundant investments can be reduced over time. The department shall also provide quarterly reports to the technology services board on project progress.

(5) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund. The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted. No funds provided in this subsection may be expended on any legal fees related to the SR 99/Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project (809936Z).

(6) The appropriation in this section includes funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.

(7) The department must consult with the Washington state patrol and the office of financial management during the design phase of any improvement or preservation project that could impact Washington state patrol weigh station operations. During the design phase of any such project, the department must estimate the cost of designing around the affected weigh station's current operations, as well as the cost of moving the affected weigh station.

(8) Within the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,273,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,289,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,962,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $579,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 99 Aurora Bridge ITS project (L2000338).

(2) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Challenge Seattle project (000009Q). The department shall provide a progress report on this project to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$128,759,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$139,188,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$312,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,410,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,640,000

Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$152,453,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$504,762,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) No additional funding may be allocated or expended for terminal electrification purposes.

(3) $28,097,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation, $71,293,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, and $809,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Seattle Terminal Replacement project (900010L).

(4) $5,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) $1,277,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ORCA card next generation project (L2000300). The ferry system shall work with Washington technology solutions and the tolling division on the development of a new, interoperable ticketing system.

(6) $4,200,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation and $2,200,000 of the Puget Sound operating account—federal appropriation are provided solely for ferry vessel and terminal preservation (L2000110). The funds provided in this subsection must be used for unplanned preservation needs before shifting funding from other preservation projects.

(7) $24,750,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the conversion of up to two Jumbo Mark II vessels to electric hybrid propulsion (G2000084). The department shall seek additional funds for the purposes of this subsection. The department may spend from the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation in this section only as much as the department receives in Volkswagen settlement funds for the purposes of this subsection.

(8) $152,453,000 of the capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car hybrid-electric vessel. The commencement of construction of new vessels for the ferry system is important not only for safety reasons, but also to keep skilled marine construction jobs in the Puget Sound region and to sustain the capacity of the region to meet the ongoing construction and preservation needs of the ferry system fleet of vessels. The legislature has determined that the current vessel procurement process must move forward with all due speed, balancing the interests of both the taxpayers and shipyards. To accomplish construction of vessels in accordance with RCW 47.60.810, the prevailing shipbuilder, for vessels initially funded after July 1, 2020, is encouraged to follow the historical practice of subcontracting the construction of ferry superstructures to a separate nonaffiliated contractor located within the Puget Sound region, that is qualified in accordance with RCW 47.60.690.

(9) The capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation includes up to $152,453,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(10) For the 2021-2023 biennium, the marine division shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees the following reports on ferry capital projects:

(a) On a semiannual basis the report must include a status update on projects with funding provided in (a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Anticipated cost increases and cost savings;

(ii) Anticipated cash flow and schedule changes; and

(iii) Explanations for the changes.

(b) On an annual basis the report must include a status update on vessel and terminal preservation and improvement plans including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) What work has been done;

(ii) How have schedules shifted; and

(iii) Associated changes in funding among projects, accompanied by explanations for the changes.

(c) On an annual basis the report must include an update on the implementation of the maintenance management system with recommendations for using the system to improve the efficiency of project reporting under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$550,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,456,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$79,754,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$41,219,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$126,979,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2) $5,089,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.

(3) $7,040,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) $367,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely to reimburse Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects. The value of the public benefit of this project is expected to meet or exceed the cost of this project in: Shipper savings on transportation costs; jobs saved in rail-dependent industries; and/or reduced future costs to repair wear and tear on state and local highways due to fewer annual truck trips (reduced vehicle miles traveled). The amounts provided in this subsection are not a commitment for future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations until the full $7,337,000 cost of this project is reimbursed.

(5)(a) $550,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (F01111B).

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state in this subsection may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues and transfers deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property relating to the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad;

(ii) Revenues from trackage rights agreement fees paid by shippers; and

(iii) Revenues and transfers transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad.

(6) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 15, 2022, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(7) $12,077,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely as expenditure authority for any insurance proceeds received by the state for Passenger Rail Equipment Replacement (project 700010C.) The department must use this expenditure authority only to purchase replacement equipment that has been competitively procured and for service recovery needs and corrective actions related to the December 2017 derailment.

(8) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the department to pursue federal grant opportunities leveraging up to $6,696,000 in connecting Washington programmed funds to be used as a state match to improve the state-owned Palouse river and Coulee City system. The amount listed in this subsection is not a commitment for future legislatures, but is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations up to a state match share not to exceed $6,696,000 of a grant award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$793,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,600,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$750,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,564,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$43,698,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$6,600,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$116,792,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$88,145,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$275,942,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) $36,760,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects. $9,233,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is reappropriated for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects selected in the previous biennia (L2000188).

(b) $11,400,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $26,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school projects. $7,944,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $4,647,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects selected in the previous biennia (L2000189). The department may consider the special situations facing high-need areas, as defined by schools or project areas in which the percentage of the children eligible to receive free and reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program is equal to, or greater than, the state average as determined by the department, when evaluating project proposals against established funding criteria while ensuring continued compliance with federal eligibility requirements.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program. The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status. In its December 1, 2021, report the department must also include recommended changes to the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program application and selection processes to increase utilization by a greater diversity of jurisdictions.

(4) $6,561,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) $10,097,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Covington Connector (L2000104).

(6)(a) $12,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for national highway freight network projects identified on the project list submitted in accordance with section 218(4)(b), chapter 14, Laws of 2016 on October 31, 2016.

(b) $11,679,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is for acceleration of local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system (G2000100). The department will identify projects through its current national highway system asset management call for projects with applications due in February 2021. The department shall give priority to those projects that can be obligated by September 30, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312. ANNUAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAM

(1) As part of its annual budget submittal, the department of transportation shall provide an update to the report provided to the legislature in the prior fiscal year that: (a) Compares the original project cost estimates approved in the 2003, 2005, and 2015 revenue package project lists to the completed cost of the project, or the most recent legislatively approved budget and total project costs for projects not yet completed; (b) identifies highway projects that may be reduced in scope and still achieve a functional benefit; (c) identifies highway projects that have experienced scope increases and that can be reduced in scope; (d) identifies highway projects that have lost significant local or regional contributions that were essential to completing the project; (e) identifies risk reserves and contingency amounts allocated to projects; and (f) lists the nickel, TPA, and connecting Washington projects charging to the Nickel/TPA/CWA Environmental Mitigation Reserve (OBI4ENV) and the Nickel/TPA Projects Completed with Minor Ongoing Expenditures project (0BI100B), and the amount each project is charging.

(2) As part of its annual budget submittal, the department of transportation shall provide: (a) An annual report on the number of toll credits the department has accumulated and how the department has used the toll credits, and (b) a status report on the projects funded using federal national highway freight program funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313. QUARTERLY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAM

On a quarterly basis, the department of transportation shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees a report for all capital projects, except for ferry projects subject to the reporting requirements established elsewhere in this act, that must include: (1) A TEIS version containing actual capital expenditures for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget; (2) anticipated cost savings, cost increases, reappropriations, and schedule adjustments for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget; (3) the award amount, the engineer's estimate, and the number of bidders for all active projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget; (4) risk reserves and contingency amounts for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314. FEDERAL FUNDS RECEIVED FOR CAPITAL PROJECT EXPENDITURES

To the greatest extent practicable, the department of transportation shall expend federal funds received for capital project expenditures before state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315. NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR PAUSES AND CANCELLATIONS

(1) The department shall notify the transportation committees of the legislature when it intends to pause for a significant length of time or not proceed with operating items or capital projects included as budget provisos or on project lists. When feasible, this notification shall be provided prior to the pause or cancellation and at least seven days in advance of any public announcement related to such a pause or cancellation.

(2) At the time of notification, the department shall provide an explanation for the reason or reasons for the pause or cancellation for each operating budget item and capital project. The explanation shall include specific reasons for each pause or cancellation, in addition to a statement of the broad rationale for the pause or cancellation.

(3) When feasible, the department shall make best efforts to keep the transportation committees of the legislature informed of an evaluation process underway for selecting operating budget items and capital projects to be paused or cancelled, providing updates as its selection efforts proceed.

(4) When exigent circumstances prevent prior notice of a pause or cancellation from being provided to the transportation committees of the legislature, the department shall provide the information required under this section to the transportation committees of the legislature as soon as is practicable.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$743,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,548,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$438,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,462,779,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,150,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,770,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$29,323,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$76,376,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,609,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$149,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,110,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$88,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,347,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to

cities and counties
. . . .
$467,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

statutory transfers
. . . .
$1,974,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATUTORY TRANSFERS

Waste Tire Removal Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$8,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

transfers
. . . .
$235,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
$27,000,000

(2)(a) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Capital Vessel

Replacement Account—State
. . . .
$152,453,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(3)(a) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State
. . . .
$46,000,000

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases, and an equivalent reimbursing transfer is to occur after the debt service and deferred sales tax on the Tacoma Narrows bridge construction costs are fully repaid in accordance with chapter 195, Laws of 2018.

(4) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement

Project Account—State
. . . .
$6,269,000

(5) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation

Account—State
. . . .
$7,666,000

(6) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Freight Mobility Investment

Account—State
. . . .
$5,511,000

(7) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account—State
. . . .
$9,331,000

(8) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account—State
. . . .
$18,688,000

(9) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation 2003 Account

(Nickel Account)—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

(10) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Road Administration Board

Emergency Loan Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

(11) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

(12) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State
. . . .
$1,532,000

(13) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

(14) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Aeronautics

Account—State
. . . .
$550,000

(15) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation

Partnership Account—State
. . . .
$9,138,000

(16) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Complete Streets

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$14,670,000

(17) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Freight Mobility

Multimodal Account—State
. . . .
$4,011,000

(18) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Pilotage

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

(19) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

(20) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Regional Mobility

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$27,679,000

(21) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Rural Mobility

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$15,223,000

(22)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Transportation Partnership Account—State
. . . .
$28,660,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(23) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

(24) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

(25) Connecting Washington Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$100,000,000

(26)(a) General Fund Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol

Highway Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207(6) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For distribution to cities and

counties
. . . .
$26,786,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

distribution to cities and counties
. . . .
$23,438,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$50,224,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$199,129,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,372,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$224,501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT REVENUE LOSS DEPOSITS

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$144,134,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into accounts in the amounts specified in subsection (2) of this section. These amounts reflect projected revenue losses to state transportation accounts in state fiscal year 2021 relative to revenues collected in state fiscal year 2019 and shall be used to maintain government services pursuant to the federal American rescue plan act of 2021.

(2) The appropriation must be distributed to the following accounts in the amounts designated:

Aeronautics Account—State. . . .$448,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State. . . .$2,101,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State. . . .$23,016,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State. . . .$55,224,000

Connecting Washington Account—State. . . .$45,828,000

Special Category C Account—State. . . .$2,380,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State . . . .$15,137,000

COMPENSATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

Sections 503 through 520 of this act represent the results of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining process required under chapters 41.80, 47.64, and 41.56 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 503 through 520 of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 503 through 520 of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—OPEIU

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the office and professional employees international union local eight (OPEIU) pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does include furloughs. The agreement provides that positions designated by the employer as not requiring backfill take 24 furlough days during the biennium. In addition, the following positions are not subject to the furlough requirement: Bid administrator, dispatch, dispatch coordinator, and relief positions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—FASPAA

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the ferry agents, supervisors, and project administrators association pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does include furloughs. The agreement provides that positions designated by the employer as not requiring backfill take 24 furlough days during the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—SEIU LOCAL 6

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 6 pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does include furloughs. The agreement provides that positions designated by the employer as not requiring backfill take 24 furlough days during the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—CARPENTERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Pacific Northwest regional council of carpenters pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does include furloughs. The agreement provides that positions designated by the employer as not requiring backfill take 24 furlough days during the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—METAL TRADES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Puget Sound metal trades council through an interest arbitration award pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The arbitration award imposed and funding is provided to implement a 1.9% general wage decrease from July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, and exempted these employees from the furlough requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-UL

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association unlicensed engine room employees pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either wage increases or the furlough requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-L

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association licensed engineer officers pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either wage increases or the furlough requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA—PORT ENGINEERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association port engineers pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does include furloughs. The agreement provides that positions designated by the employer as not requiring backfill take 24 furlough days during the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P MATES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - mates pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which includes a two percent wage increase for second mates and does not include the furlough requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P MASTERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - masters pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either wage increases or the furlough requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P WATCH CENTER SUPERVISORS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - watch center supervisors pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does include furloughs only for the following positions: Fleet facility security officers and workforce development leads.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—IBU

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the inlandboatmen's union of the Pacific pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW through an interest arbitration award for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in position that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—PTE LOCAL 17

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the professional and technical employees local 17 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in position that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA

An agreement has not been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 41.80.010(6), funding is provided for fiscal year 2022 to fund the terms of the 2019-2021 agreement and for fiscal year 2023 to fund the terms according to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—COALITION OF UNIONS

An agreement has been reached for the 2019-2021 biennium between the governor and the coalition of unions under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which includes 24 furlough days for employees in position that do not require the position to be backfilled. The agreement includes and funding is provided for a 2.5 percent wage increase for fiscal year 2022 and a 2.5 percent wage increase for fiscal year 2023 for the department of corrections marine vessel operators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol troopers association under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include general wages increases but does provide the ability to request to reopen the compensation article for the purpose of bargaining base rate of pay for fiscal year 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP LIEUTENANTS AND CAPTAINS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include general wages increases but does provide the ability to request to reopen the compensation article for the purpose of bargaining base rate of pay for fiscal year 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—HEALTH CARE—COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2021-2023 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the 2019-2021 agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $988 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2022. For fiscal year 2023, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1018 per eligible employee.

The board shall collect a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment if directed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, may not exceed $988 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2022. For fiscal year 2023, the monthly employer funding rate may not exceed $1018 per eligible employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 523. COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The employer monthly funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $988 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2022. For fiscal year 2023, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1018 per eligible employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 524. COMPENSATION—REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES

The appropriations in this act for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 525. JUNETEENTH HOLIDAY

Funding is provided within the amounts appropriated for the cost to agencies of additional staff necessary to provide coverage in positions that require continual presence, as a result of implementing chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1016), Laws of 2021 (making Juneteenth a legal holiday). If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1016), Laws of 2021 is not enacted by June 30, 2021, this section does not take effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 526. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—ELIMINATING FURLOUGH DAYS

Appropriations in this act provide sufficient funding to eliminate the furlough days required in the following collective bargaining agreements for the 2021-2023 biennium:

(1) Office and professional employees international union local 8;

(2) Ferry agents, supervisors, and project administrators association;

(3) Service employees international union local 6;

(4) Pacific Northwest regional council of carpenters;

(5) Marine engineers' beneficial association port engineers;

(6) Masters, mates, and pilots - watch center supervisors;

(7) Inlandboatmen's union of the Pacific;

(8) Washington public employees association general government;

(9) Washington federation of state employees;

(10) Professional and technical employees local 17; and

(11) The coalition of unions.

Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 527. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—ELIMINATING GENERAL WAGE DECREASE

Appropriations in this act provide sufficient funding solely for the purpose of eliminating the 1.9 percent wage reduction from July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, provided in the arbitration award for the Puget Sound metal trades council. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate modification of the agreement between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 528. FORGONE GENERAL WAGE INCREASES

Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to provide a three percent or two percent general wage increase, effective July 1, 2021, for employees that were scheduled to receive a general wage increase of either of those amounts on July 1, 2020, that was forgone due to COVID-19 emergency.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. FUND TRANSFERS

(1) The 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements and 2015 connecting Washington projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP Transportation Document 2021-1 as developed March 22, 2021, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a sixteen-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a sixteen-year plan. The department of transportation is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and connecting Washington account projects on the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. For the 2019-2021 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may provide written authorization for a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation partnership account appropriations or connecting Washington account appropriations to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed in the current fiscal biennium;

(d) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(e) Transfers to a project may not occur if that project is a programmatic funding item described in broad general terms on the applicable project list without referencing a specific state route number;

(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session;

(g) Transfers to a project may not be made with funds designated as attributable to practical design savings as described in RCW 47.01.480;

(h) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature;

(i) Transfers between projects may be made by the department of transportation without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (1), provided that the transfer amount to a single project does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars or ten percent of the total project per biennium, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees;

(j) Transfers may only be made in fiscal year 2023;

(k) The total amount of transfers to projects in fiscal year 2023 may not exceed $50,000,000; and

(l) The total amount transferred to a single project may not exceed $20,000,000.

(2) The department of transportation must submit quarterly all transfers authorized under this section in the transportation executive information system. The office of financial management must maintain a legislative baseline project list identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and update that project list with all authorized transfers under this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current biennium.

(3) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.

(4) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and address any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.

(5) No fewer than ten days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(6) The department must submit annually as part of its budget submittal a report detailing all transfers made pursuant to this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. BOND REIMBURSEMENT

To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the motor vehicle account, special category C account, Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, transportation 2003 account (nickel account), transportation partnership account, transportation improvement account, Puget Sound capital construction account, multimodal transportation account, state route number 520 corridor account, connecting Washington account, or other transportation capital project account in the state treasury for a state transportation program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in chapter 47.10 RCW, the legislature declares that any such expenditures made before the issue date of the applicable transportation bonds for that state transportation program are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those transportation bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. BELATED CLAIMS

The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. REAPPROPRIATIONS REPORTING

(1) As part of its 2020 supplemental budget submittal, the department of transportation shall provide a report to the legislature and the office of financial management that:

(a) Identifies, by capital project, the amount of state funding that has been reappropriated from the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium into the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium; and

(b) Identifies, for each project, the amount of cost savings or increases in funding that have been identified as compared to the 2017 enacted omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(2) As part of the agency request for capital programs, the department shall load reappropriations separately from funds that were assumed to be required for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium into budgeting systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. WEB SITE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS

(1) The department of transportation shall post on its web site every report that is due from the department to the legislature during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium on one web page. The department must post both completed reports and planned reports on a single web page.

(2) The department shall provide a web link for each change order that is more than five hundred thousand dollars on the affected project web page.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. TRANSIT, BICYCLE, AND PEDESTRIAN ELEMENTS REPORTING

(1) By November 15th of each year, the department of transportation must report on amounts expended to benefit transit, bicycle, or pedestrian elements within all connecting Washington projects in programs I, P, and Z identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 22, 2021. The report must address each modal category separately and identify if eighteenth amendment protected funds have been used and, if not, the source of funding.

(2) To facilitate the report in subsection (1) of this section, the department of transportation must require that all bids on connecting Washington projects include an estimate on the cost to implement any transit, bicycle, or pedestrian project elements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. PROJECT SCOPE CHANGES

(1) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, while the legislature is not in session, the director of the office of financial management may approve project scope change requests to connecting Washington projects in the highway improvements program, provided that the requests meet the criteria outlined in RCW 47.01.480 and are subject to the limitations in this section.

(2) At the time the department of transportation submits a request for a project scope change under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(3) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested project scope changes.

(4) No fewer than ten days after the receipt of a scope change request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project scope changes, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(5) As part of its annual budget submittal, the department of transportation must report on all approved scope change requests from the prior year, including a comparison of the scope before and after the requested change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. TOLL CREDITS

The department of transportation may provide up to three million dollars in toll credits to Kitsap transit for its role in passenger-only ferry service and ferry corridor-related projects. The number of toll credits provided must be equal to, but no more than, the number sufficient to meet federal match requirements for grant funding for passenger-only ferry service, but must not exceed the amount authorized in this section.

MISCELLANEOUS 2021-2023 FISCAL BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OVERSIGHT

(1) Agencies must apply to the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer for approval before beginning a project or proceeding with each discrete stage of a project subject to this section. At each stage, the office of the state chief information officer must certify that the project has an approved technology budget and investment plan, complies with state information technology and security requirements, and other policies defined by the office of the state chief information officer. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application and may not approve a funding request for ten business days from the date of notification.

(2)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must have the detail by fiscal month for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out, as well as at least five years of maintenance and operations costs.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit an updated technology budget, if changes occurred, to include detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project by fiscal month to include and identify:

(i) Fund sources;

(ii) Full-time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions;

(iii) Discrete financial budget codes to include at least the appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures;

(v) Anticipated deliverables;

(vi) Historical budget and expenditure detail by fiscal year; and

(vii) Maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year for at least five years as a separate worksheet

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(3)(a) Each project must have an investment plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(v) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(vi) Financial budget coding to include at least discrete financial coding for the project.

(4) Projects with estimated costs greater than one hundred million dollars from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the chief information officer. Each subproject must have a technology budget and investment plan as provided in this section.

(5)(a) The office of the state chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. This includes, at least:

(i) Project changes each fiscal month;

(ii) Noting if the project has a completed market requirements document, and when it was completed;

(iii) Financial status of information technology projects under oversight;

(iv) Coordination with agencies;

(v) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(vi) Monthly office of the chief information officer status reports;

(vii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2021;

(viii) Budget and expenditures each fiscal month;

(ix) Estimated annual maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year; and

(x) Posting monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:

(A) Office of the chief information officer;

(B) Agency project team; and

(C) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable to the project.

(b) The dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active.

(6) If the project affects more than one agency:

(a) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared for each agency; and

(b) The dashboard must contain a statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(7) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(c) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(d) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(e) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(8) The office of the chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(9) The office of the chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the chief information officer must report on July 1st and December 1st each calendar year any suspension or termination of a project in the previous six-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(10) The office of the chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the chief information officer must report on July 1st and December 1st each calendar year any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous six-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(11) The following transportation projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in this section:

(a) For the Washington state patrol: Aerial criminal investigation tools;

(b) For the department of licensing: Website accessibility and usability; and

(c) For the department of transportation: Maintenance management system, land mobile radio system replacement, new CSC system and operator, PROPEL – WSDOT support of one Washington, and capital systems replacement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS

The department of transportation is authorized, subject to the conditions in section 305(2) of this act, to enter into a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW through the state treasurer's lease-purchase program for the purposes indicated. The department may use any funds, appropriated or nonappropriated, in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves, if any. Expenditures made by the department of transportation for the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financing contract and any certificates of participation therein may be reimbursed from proceeds of the financing contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

Sec. 703. RCW 43.19.642 and 2019 c 416 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.

(3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on July 1, 2016, file annual reports with the department of enterprise services documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how any problems encountered were resolved.

(4) By December 1, 2009, the department of enterprise services shall:

(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and

(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and report these findings to the legislature.

(5) During the ((2017-2019 and)) 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the Washington state ferries is required to use a minimum of ((five))10 percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the Washington state ferries for the operation of the Washington state ferries diesel-powered vessels, as long as the price of a ((B5 or)) B10 biodiesel blend does not exceed the price of conventional diesel fuel by five percent or more.

Sec. 704. RCW 46.20.745 and 2019 c 416 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ignition interlock device revolving account program is created within the department to assist in covering the monetary costs of installing, removing, and leasing an ignition interlock device, and applicable licensing, for indigent persons who are required under RCW 46.20.385, 46.20.720, and 46.61.5055 to install an ignition interlock device in all vehicles owned or operated by the person. For purposes of this subsection, "indigent" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.101.010, as determined by the department. During the ((2019-2021))2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the ignition interlock device revolving account program also includes ignition interlock enforcement work conducted by the Washington state patrol.

(2) A pilot program is created within the ignition interlock device revolving account program for the purpose of monitoring compliance by persons required to use ignition interlock devices and by ignition interlock companies and vendors.

(3) The department, the state patrol, and the Washington traffic safety commission shall coordinate to establish a compliance pilot program that will target at least one county from eastern Washington and one county from western Washington, as determined by the department, state patrol, and Washington traffic safety commission.

(4) At a minimum, the compliance pilot program shall:

(a) Review the number of ignition interlock devices that are required to be installed in the targeted county and the number of ignition interlock devices actually installed;

(b) Work to identify those persons who are not complying with ignition interlock requirements or are repeatedly violating ignition interlock requirements; and

(c) Identify ways to track compliance and reduce noncompliance.

(5) As part of monitoring compliance, the Washington traffic safety commission shall also track recidivism for violations of RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 by persons required to have an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 and 46.20.720.

Sec. 705. RCW 47.66.120 and 2019 c 287 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose through the 2023-2025 biennium, the department's public transportation division shall establish a green transportation capital grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to aid any transit authority in funding cost-effective capital projects to reduce the carbon intensity of the Washington transportation system, examples of which include: Electrification of vehicle fleets, including battery and fuel cell electric vehicles; modification or replacement of capital facilities in order to facilitate fleet electrification and/or hydrogen refueling; necessary upgrades to electrical transmission and distribution systems; and construction of charging and fueling stations. The department's public transportation division shall identify projects and shall submit a prioritized list of all projects requesting funding to the legislature by December 1st of each even-numbered year.

(b) The department's public transportation division shall select projects based on a competitive process that considers the following criteria:

(i) The cost-effectiveness of the reductions in carbon emissions provided by the project; and

(ii) The benefit provided to transitioning the entire state to a transportation system with lower carbon intensity.

(2) The department's public transportation division must establish an advisory committee to assist in identifying projects under subsection (1) of this section. The advisory committee must include representatives from the department of ecology, the department of commerce, the utilities and transportation commission, and at least one transit authority.

(3) In order to receive green transportation capital grant program funding for a project, a transit authority must provide matching funding for that project that is at least equal to twenty percent of the total cost of the project.

(4) The department's public transportation division must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects funded by the program created under this section.

(5) For purposes of this section, "transit authority" means a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county public transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112 RCW, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public transportation system.

(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may provide green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects.

Sec. 706. RCW 46.68.063 and 2019 c 416 s 712 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of licensing technology improvement and data management account is created in the highway safety fund. All receipts from fees collected under RCW 46.12.630(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for investments in technology and data management at the department. During the 2019-2021 ((biennium))and 2021-2023 biennia, the account may also be used for responding to public records requests. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 707. RCW 46.68.370 and 2019 c 416 s 713 are each amended to read as follows:

The license plate technology account is created in the state treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.17.015 must be deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must support current and future license plate technology and systems integration upgrades for both the department and correctional industries. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Additionally, the moneys in this account may be used to reimburse the motor vehicle ((account [fund]))fund for any appropriation made to implement the digital license plate system. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the license plate technology account to the highway safety ((account [fund]))fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the license plate technology account. During the 2019-2021 ((biennium))and 2021-2023 biennia, the account may also be used for the maintenance of recently modernized information technology systems for vehicle registrations.

Sec. 708. RCW 46.68.300 and 2019 c 416 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:

The freight mobility investment account is hereby created in the state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for freight mobility projects that have been approved by the freight mobility strategic investment board in RCW 47.06A.020 and may include any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements. During the ((2019-2021))2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the expenditures from the account may also be used for the administrative expenses of the freight mobility strategic investment board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709. (1) The agency financial transaction account is created in the state treasury. Designated receipts from cost-recovery charges for credit card and other financial transaction fees pursuant to this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for paying credit card and financial transaction fees, and other related costs incurred by state agencies.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2023.

Sec. 710. RCW 47.12.370 and 2003 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may enter into exchange agreements with local, state, or federal agencies, tribal governments, or private nonprofit nature conservancy corporations as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to convey properties under the jurisdiction of the department that serve as environmental mitigation sites, as full or part consideration for the grantee assuming all future maintenance and operation obligations and costs required to maintain and operate the environmental mitigation site in perpetuity.

(2) ((Tribal))(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, tribal governments shall only be eligible to participate in an exchange agreement if they:

(((a)))(i) Provide the department with a valid waiver of their tribal sovereign immunity from suit. The waiver must allow the department to enforce the terms of the exchange agreement or quitclaim deed in state court; and

(((b)))(ii) Agree that the property shall not be placed into trust status.

(b) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the restrictions in (a) of this subsection do not apply to any exchange agreement with a tribal government for the acquisition of real property required by the department for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project.

(3) The conveyances must be by quitclaim deed, or other form of conveyance, executed by the secretary of transportation, and must expressly restrict the use of the property to a mitigation site consistent with preservation of the functions and values of the site, and must provide for the automatic reversion to the department if the property is not used as a mitigation site or is not maintained in a manner that complies with applicable permits, laws, and regulations pertaining to the maintenance and operation of the mitigation site.

Sec. 711. RCW 47.60.530 and 2017 c 313 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Puget Sound ferry operations account is created in the motor vehicle fund.

(2) The following funds must be deposited into the account:

(a) All moneys directed by law;

(b) All revenues generated from ferry fares; and

(c) All revenues generated from commercial advertising, concessions, parking, and leases as allowed under RCW 47.60.140.

(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(4) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the maintenance, administration, and operation of the Washington state ferry system.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Puget Sound ferry operations account to the connecting Washington account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

(6) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Puget Sound ferry operations account to the connecting Washington account.

(7) During the 2021-23 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Puget Sound ferry operations account to the Puget Sound capital construction account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

Sec. 712. RCW 47.60.315 and 2019 c 431 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall adopt fares and pricing policies by rule, under chapter 34.05 RCW, according to the following schedule:

(a) Each year the department shall provide the commission a report of its review of fares and pricing policies, with recommendations for the revision of fares and pricing policies for the ensuing year;

(b) By September 1st of each year, beginning in 2008, the commission shall adopt by rule fares and pricing policies for the ensuing year.

(2) The commission may adopt by rule fares that are effective for more or less than one year for the purposes of transitioning to the fare schedule in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The commission may increase ferry fares included in the schedule of charges adopted under this section by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth factor.

(4) The chief executive officer of the ferry system may authorize the use of promotional, discounted, and special event fares to the general public and commercial enterprises for the purpose of maximizing capacity use and the revenues collected by the ferry system. The department shall report to the commission a summary of the promotional, discounted, and special event fares offered during each fiscal year and the financial results from these activities.

(5) ((Fare))Except for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, fare revenues and other revenues deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account created in RCW 47.60.530 may not be used to support the Puget Sound capital construction account created in RCW 47.60.505, unless the support for capital is separately identified in the fare.

(6) The commission may not raise fares until the fare rules contain pricing policies developed under RCW 47.60.290, or September 1, 2009, whichever is later.

(7) The commission shall impose a vessel replacement surcharge of twenty-five cents on every one-way and round-trip ferry fare sold, including multiride and monthly pass fares. This surcharge must be clearly indicated to ferry passengers and drivers and, if possible, on the fare media itself.

(8) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, beginning May 1, 2020, the commission shall impose an additional vessel replacement surcharge in an amount sufficient to fund twenty-five year debt service on one 144-auto hybrid vessel taking into account funds provided in chapter 417, Laws of 2019 or chapter . . . (SSB 5419), Laws of 2019. The department of transportation shall provide to the commission vessel and debt service cost estimates. Information on vessels constructed or purchased with revenue from the surcharges must be publicly posted including, but not limited to, the commission web site.

(9) The vessel replacement surcharges imposed in this section may only be used for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels and to pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for the construction or purchase of new ferry vessels.

(10) The commission shall not impose the additional vessel replacement surcharge in subsection (8) of this section if doing so would increase fares by more than ten percent.

Sec. 713. RCW 34.05.350 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an agency for good cause finds:

(a) That immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule is necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, and that observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to the public interest;

(b) That state or federal law or federal rule or a federal deadline for state receipt of federal funds requires immediate adoption of a rule; or

(c) In order to implement the requirements or reductions in appropriations enacted in any budget for fiscal year 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, or 2013, or in an omnibus transportation appropriations act for the 2021-2023 biennium related to setting toll rates, which necessitates the need for the immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule, and that observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to the fiscal needs or requirements of the agency,

the agency may dispense with those requirements and adopt, amend, or repeal the rule on an emergency basis. The agency's finding and a concise statement of the reasons for its finding shall be incorporated in the order for adoption of the emergency rule or amendment filed with the office of the code reviser under RCW 34.05.380 and with the rules review committee.

(2) An emergency rule adopted under this section takes effect upon filing with the code reviser, unless a later date is specified in the order of adoption, and may not remain in effect for longer than one hundred twenty days after filing. Identical or substantially similar emergency rules may not be adopted in sequence unless conditions have changed or the agency has filed notice of its intent to adopt the rule as a permanent rule, and is actively undertaking the appropriate procedures to adopt the rule as a permanent rule. This section does not relieve any agency from compliance with any law requiring that its permanent rules be approved by designated persons or bodies before they become effective.

(3) Within seven days after the rule is adopted, any person may petition the governor requesting the immediate repeal of a rule adopted on an emergency basis by any department listed in RCW 43.17.010. Within seven days after submission of the petition, the governor shall either deny the petition in writing, stating his or her reasons for the denial, or order the immediate repeal of the rule. In ruling on the petition, the governor shall consider only whether the conditions in subsection (1) of this section were met such that adoption of the rule on an emergency basis was necessary. If the governor orders the repeal of the emergency rule, any sanction imposed based on that rule is void. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit adoption of any rule as a permanent rule.

Sec. 714. RCW 46.68.060 and 2019 c 416 s 705 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the highway safety fund to the credit of which must be deposited all moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund must be used for carrying out the provisions of law relating to driver licensing, driver improvement, financial responsibility, cost of furnishing abstracts of driving records and maintaining such case records, and to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 43.59.010, and chapters 46.72 and 46.72A RCW. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the highway safety fund to the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the motor vehicle fund, and the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the highway safety fund. During the ((2017-2019 and the)) 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the highway safety fund to the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 715. RCW 46.68.325 and 2019 c 416 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rural mobility grant program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.100.

(2) Beginning September 2011, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the rural mobility grant program account two million five hundred thousand dollars.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the rural mobility grant program account.

(4) During the ((2017-2019 and the)) 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 716. RCW 47.56.876 and 2019 c 416 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:

A special account to be known as the state route number 520 civil penalties account is created in the state treasury. All state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program civil penalties generated from the nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor must be deposited into the account, as provided under RCW 47.56.870(4)(b)(vii). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to fund any project within the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program, including mitigation. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the state route number 520 civil penalties account to the state route number 520 corridor account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the state route number 520 civil penalties account. Funds transferred must be used solely for capital expenditures for the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project. During the ((2017-2019 and the)) 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the state route number 520 civil penalties account to the state route number 520 corridor account.

Sec. 717. RCW 47.60.322 and 2019 c 416 s 716 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The capital vessel replacement account is created in the motor vehicle fund. All revenues generated from the vessel replacement surcharge under RCW 47.60.315(7) and service fees collected by the department of licensing or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director under RCW 46.17.040, 46.17.050, and 46.17.060 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels and to pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels. However, expenditures from the account must first be used to support the construction or purchase, including any applicable financing costs, of a ferry vessel with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred forty-four cars.

(2) The state treasurer may transfer moneys from the capital vessel replacement account to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) for debt service on bonds issued for the construction of 144-car class ferry vessels.

(3) The legislature may transfer from the capital vessel replacement account to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395 such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the capital vessel replacement account to be used for ferry terminal construction and preservation.

(4) During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the capital vessel replacement account to the transportation partnership account.

Sec. 718. RCW 46.68.395 and 2020 c 219 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The connecting Washington account is created in the motor vehicle fund. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or improvements identified as connecting Washington projects or improvements in a transportation appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements.

(2) Moneys in the connecting Washington account may not be expended on the state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project.

(3) During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the connecting Washington account to the motor vehicle fund.

2019-2021 FISCAL BIENNIUM

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 801. 2019 c 416 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($545,000))

$536,000

Sec. 802. 2020 c 219 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,419,000))

$1,388,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,840,000))

$1,809,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, in direct coordination with the office of state treasurer, to evaluate, coordinate, and assist in efforts by state agencies in developing cost recovery mechanisms for credit card and other financial transaction fees currently paid from state funds. This may include disbursing interagency reimbursements for the implementation costs incurred by the affected agencies. As part of the first phase of this effort, the office of financial management, with the assistance of relevant agencies, must develop implementation plans and take all necessary steps to ensure that the actual cost-recovery mechanisms will be in place by January 1, 2020, for the vehicles and drivers programs of the department of licensing. By November 1, 2019, the office of financial management must provide a report to the joint transportation committee on the phase 1 implementation plan and options to expand similar cost recovery mechanisms to other state agencies and programs, including the ferries division.

Sec. 803. 2019 c 416 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($652,000))

$647,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 901. 2020 c 219 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,675,000))

$4,647,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,051,000))

$26,943,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$118,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($32,694,000))

$32,558,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 54, Laws of 2019 (Cooper Jones Active Transportation Safety Council). If chapter 54, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a pilot program in up to three cities implementing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in zones that have been designated by ordinance as "Stay Out of Areas of Racing."

(a) Any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, ((2020))2022.

(b) If a city has established an authorized automated vehicle noise enforcement camera pilot program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system.

(c) Any city administering a pilot program overseen by the traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(i) Automated vehicle noise enforcement camera may record photographs or audio of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only while a violation is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle;

(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall install two signs facing opposite directions within two hundred feet, or otherwise consistent with the uniform manual on traffic control devices, where the automated vehicle noise enforcement camera is used that state "Street Racing Noise Pilot Program in Progress";

(iii) Cities testing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras must post information on the city web site and notify local media outlets indicating the zones in which the automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras will be used;

(iv) A city may only issue a warning notice with no penalty for a violation detected by automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in a Stay Out of Areas of Racing zone. Warning notices must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen days of the detected violation;

(v) A violation detected through the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras is not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, videos, microphotographs, audio recordings, or electronic images prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. No photograph, microphotograph, audio recording, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than the issuance of warnings for violations under this section or retained longer than necessary to issue a warning notice as required under this subsection (2); and

(vii) By June 30, 2021, the participating cities shall provide a report to the commission and appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, warnings issued, data retention and use, and other relevant issues regarding automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

(3) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a demonstration project in one county, coordinating with a public transportation benefit area (PTBA) and the department of transportation, to test the feasibility and accuracy of the use of automated enforcement technology for high occupancy vehicle (HOV) lane passenger compliance. All costs associated with the demonstration project must be borne by the participating public transportation benefit area. Any photograph, microphotograph, or electronic images of a driver or passengers are for the exclusive use of the PTBA in the determination of whether an HOV passenger violation has occurred to test the feasibility and accuracy of automated enforcement under this subsection and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. All photographs, microphotographs, and electronic images must be destroyed after determining a passenger count and no later than the completion of the demonstration project. No warnings or notices of infraction may be issued under the demonstration project.

For purposes of the demonstration project, an automated enforcement technology device may record an image of a driver and passenger of a motor vehicle. The county and PTBA must erect signs marking the locations where the automated enforcement for HOV passenger requirements is occurring.

The PTBA, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature with the number of violations detected during the demonstration project, whether the technology used was accurate and any recommendations for future use of automated enforcement technology for HOV lane enforcement by June 30, 2021.

(4)(a) The Washington traffic safety commission shall coordinate with each city that implements a pilot program as authorized in chapter 224, Laws of 2020 (automated traffic safety cameras) or chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5789), Laws of 2020 (automated traffic safety cameras) to provide the transportation committees of the legislature with the following information by June 30, 2021:

(i) The number of warnings and infractions issued to first-time violators under the pilot program;

(ii) The number of warnings and infractions issued to the registered owners of vehicles that are not registered with an address located in the city conducting the pilot program; and

(iii) The frequency with which warnings and infractions are issued on weekdays versus weekend days.

(b) If neither chapter 224, Laws of 2020 nor chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5789), Laws of 2020 is enacted by June 30, 2020, the conditions of this subsection (4) have no force and effect.

Sec. 902. 2020 c 219 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,137,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,920,000))

$3,042,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,677,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,734,000))

$5,856,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $58,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for succession planning and training.

Sec. 903. 2020 c 219 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,187,000))

$2,173,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($917,000))

$895,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$275,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,379,000))

$3,343,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a comprehensive assessment of statewide transportation needs and priorities, and existing and potential transportation funding mechanisms to address those needs and priorities. The assessment must include: (a) Recommendations on the critical state and local transportation projects, programs, and services needed to achieve an efficient, effective, statewide transportation system over the next ten years; (b) a comprehensive menu of funding options for the legislature to consider to address the identified transportation system investments; (c) recommendations on whether a revision to the statewide transportation policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 is warranted in light of the recommendations and options identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection; and (d) an analysis of the economic impacts of a range of future transportation investments. The assessment must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020. Starting July 1, 2020, and concluding by December 31, 2020, a committee-appointed commission or panel shall review the assessment and make final recommendations to the legislature for consideration during the 2021 legislative session on a realistic, achievable plan for funding transportation programs, projects, and services over the next ten years including a timeline for legislative action on funding the identified transportation system needs shortfall.

(2)(a) $382,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct an analysis of the electrification of public fleets in Washington state. The study must include the following:

(i) An inventory of existing public fleets for the state of Washington, counties, a sampling of cities, and public transit agencies. The inventory must differentiate among battery and fuel cell electric vehicles, hybrid vehicles, gasoline powered vehicles, and any other functional categories. Three cities from each of the following population ranges must be selected for the analysis:

(A) Population up to and including twenty-five thousand;

(B) Population greater than twenty-five thousand and up to and including fifty thousand;

(C) Population greater than fifty thousand and up to and including one hundred thousand;

(D) Population greater than one hundred thousand;

(ii) A review of currently available battery and fuel cell electric vehicle alternatives to the vehicle types most commonly used by the state, counties, cities, and public transit agencies. The review must include:

(A) The average vehicle cost differential among the commercially available fuel options;

(B) A cost benefit analysis of the conversion of different vehicle classes; and

(C) Recommendations for the types of vehicles that should be excluded from consideration due to insufficient alternatives, unreliable technology, or excessive cost;

(iii) The projected costs of achieving substantial conversion to battery and/or fuel cell electric fleets by 2025, 2030, and 2035 for the state, counties, cities, and public transit agencies. This cost estimate must include:

(A) Vehicle acquisition costs, charging and refueling infrastructure costs, and other associated costs;

(B) Financial constraints of each type of entity to transition to an electric vehicle fleet; and

(C) Any other identified barriers to transitioning to a battery and/or fuel cell electric vehicle fleet;

(iv) Identification and analysis of financing mechanisms that could be used to finance the transition of publicly owned vehicles to battery and fuel cell electric vehicles. These mechanisms include, but are not limited to: Energy or carbon savings performance contracting, utility grants and rebates, revolving loan funds, state grant programs, private third-party financing, fleet management services, leasing, vehicle use optimization, and vehicle to grid technology; and

(v) The predicted number and location profile of electric vehicle fueling stations needed statewide to provide fueling for the fleets of the state, counties, cities, and public transit agencies.

(b) In developing and implementing the study, the joint transportation committee must solicit input from representatives of the department of enterprise services, the department of transportation, the department of licensing, the department of commerce, the Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities, the Washington state transit association, transit agencies, and others as deemed appropriate.

(c) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by September 30, 2020.

(3)(a) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study of the feasibility of an east-west intercity passenger rail system. The study must include the following elements:

(i) Projections of potential ridership;

(ii) Review of relevant planning studies;

(iii) Establishment of an advisory group and associated meetings;

(iv) Development of a Stampede Pass corridor alignment to maximize ridership, revenue, and rationale, considering service to population centers: Auburn, Cle Elum, Yakima, Tri-Cities, Ellensburg, Toppenish, and Spokane;

(v) Assessment of current infrastructure conditions, including station stop locations;

(vi) Identification of equipment needs; and

(vii) Identification of operator options.

(b) A report of the study findings and recommendations is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020.

(4)(a) $275,000 of the highway safety fund—state appropriation is for a study of vehicle subagents in Washington state. The study must consider and include recommendations, as necessary, on the following:

(i) The relevant statutes, rules, and/or regulations authorizing vehicle subagents and any changes made to the relevant statutes, rules, and/or regulations;

(ii) The current process of selecting and authorizing a vehicle subagent, including the change of ownership process and the identification of any barriers to entry into the vehicle subagent market;

(iii) The annual business expenditures borne by each of the vehicle subagent businesses since fiscal year 2010 and identification of any materials, including office equipment and supplies, provided by the department of licensing to each vehicle subagent since fiscal year 2010. To accomplish this task, each vehicle subagent must provide expenditure data to the joint transportation committee for the purposes of this study;

(iv) The oversight provided by the county auditors and/or the department of licensing over the vehicle subagent businesses;

(v) The history of service fees, how increases to the service fee rate are made, and how the requested fee increase is determined;

(vi) The online vehicle registration renewal process and any potential improvements to the online process;

(vii) The department of licensing's ability to provide more vehicle licensing services directly, particularly taking into account the increase in online vehicle renewal transactions;

(viii) The potential expansion of services that can be performed by vehicle subagents; and

(ix) The process by which the geographic locations of vehicle subagents are determined.

(b) In conducting the study, the joint transportation committee must consult with the department of licensing, a representative of county auditors, and a representative of vehicle subagents.

(c) The joint transportation committee may collect any data from the department of licensing, county auditors, and vehicle subagents that is necessary to conduct the study.

(d) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by September 30, 2020.

(5)(a) $235,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee a consultant study on rail safety governance best practices, by class of rail where applicable, and recommendations for the implementation of these best practices in Washington state. The study must assess rail safety governance for passenger and freight rail, including rail transit services, and must consider recommendations made by the national transportation safety board in its 2017 Amtrak passenger train 501 derailment accident report that are relevant to rail safety governance.

(b) The study must include the following components:

(i)(A) An assessment of rail safety oversight in Washington state that includes: (I) The rail safety oversight roles of federal, state, regional, and local agencies, including the extent to which federal and state laws govern these roles and the extent to which these roles would be modified should the suspended federal rules in 49 C.F.R. Part 270 take effect; (II) federal, state, regional, and local agency organizational structures and processes utilized to conduct rail safety oversight; and (III) coordination activities by federal, state, regional, and local agencies in conducting rail safety oversight;

(B) An examination of rail safety governance best practices by other states for the items identified in (a) of this subsection; and

(C) Recommendations for the implementation of best practices for rail safety governance in Washington state.

(ii) The study must address the extent to which additional safety oversight of rail project design and construction is used in other states and would be a recommended best practice for Washington state.

(c) The joint transportation committee shall consult with the Washington state department of transportation, the Washington state utilities and transportation commission, sound transit, the national transportation safety board, Amtrak, the federal railroad administration, BNSF railway company, one or more representatives of short line railroads, one or more representatives of labor, and other entities with rail safety expertise as necessary.

(d) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations on rail safety governance to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 6, 2021.

(6)(a) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study of the feasibility of a private auto ferry between the state of Washington and British Columbia, Canada. The study must include the following elements:

(i) Expected impacts to ridership, revenue, and expenditures for Washington state ferries;

(ii) Expected impacts to ferry service provided to the San Juan Islands;

(iii) Possible terminal locations on Fidalgo Island;

(iv) Economic impacts to the Anacortes area if ferry service between the area and Vancouver Island ceases;

(v) Economic impacts to the San Juan Islands if ferry service or ferry tourism is reduced;

(vi) Expected impacts to family wage jobs in the marine industry for Washingtonians;

(vii) Expected impacts to ferry fares between the state of Washington and British Columbia, Canada;

(viii) Legal analysis of all state, federal, or Canadian laws or rules, including the Jones act and rules of the board of pilotage commissioners, that may apply to initiation of private service or cessation of state service; and

(ix) Options for encouraging private auto ferry service between the state of Washington and Vancouver Island, Canada.

(b) In conducting the study, the joint transportation committee must consult with the department of transportation, a representative of San Juan county, a representative of the city of Anacortes, a representative of the inland boatman's union, a representative of Puget Sound pilots, a representative of the port of Anacortes, a representative of the economic development alliance of Skagit county, and interested private ferry operators in Washington state.

(c) A report of the study findings and options is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by February 15, 2021.

Sec. 904. 2020 c 219 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,324,000))

$1,861,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express Toll Lanes

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($410,000))

$406,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($271,000))

$262,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($158,000))

$152,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($136,000))

$132,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,299,000))

$2,813,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The commission shall reconvene the road usage charge steering committee, with the same membership described in chapter 297, Laws of 2018, and shall report at least once every three months to the steering committee with updates on report development for the completed road usage charge pilot project until the final report is submitted. The commission shall also report to the steering committee on any other activities undertaken in accordance with this subsection (1) as necessary to keep it apprised of new developments and to obtain input on its efforts. The final report on the road usage charge pilot project is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2020, and should include recommendations for necessary next steps to consider impacts to communities of color, low-income households, vulnerable populations, and displaced communities. Any legislative vacancies on the steering committee must be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives for a house of representatives member vacancy, and by the president of the senate for a senate member vacancy.

(b)(i) The commission shall coordinate with the department of transportation to jointly seek federal funds available through the federal surface transportation system funding alternatives grant program, applying toll credits for meeting match requirements. One or more grant applications shall be developed that propose to:

(A) Create a framework for modeling the effects of a road usage charge on passenger and light-duty vehicles including, but not limited to, plug-in electric vehicles, autonomous vehicles, state fleets, and transportation network companies on a road usage charge system;

(B) Identify and measure potential disparate impacts of a road usage charge on designated populations, including communities of color, low-income households, vulnerable populations, and displaced communities;

(C) Incorporate emerging approaches to mileage reporting, such as in-vehicle telematics, improved smartphone apps, and use of private businesses to provide odometer verification and mileage reporting services, into a road usage charge system;

(D) Conduct a series of facilitated work sessions with other states and private sector firms to identify opportunities to reduce the cost of collections for a road usage charge;

(E) Develop a road usage charge phase-in plan that incorporates findings from (b)(i)(A) through (D) of this subsection;

(F) Carry out a limited scale demonstration to test new mileage reporting methods; equity policies; cost reduction techniques; and collecting a road usage charge from passenger and light-duty vehicles including, but not limited to, plug-in electric vehicles, autonomous vehicles, state fleets, transportation network companies, and other new mobility services; and

(G) Produce a final report with recommendations and a recommended roadmap that details how a road usage charge could be appropriately scaled to fit state circumstances and that includes a framework for evaluating policy choices related to the use of road usage charge revenue.

(ii) A year-end report on the status of any federally-funded project for which federal funding is secured must be provided to the governor's office and the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2020, and by January 1, 2021.

(c) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for analysis of potential impacts of a road usage charge on communities of color, low-income households, vulnerable populations, and displaced communities. The analysis must include an assessment of potential mitigation measures to address these potential impacts. These funds must be held in unallotted status during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, and may only be used after the commission has provided notice to the office of financial management that it has exhausted all efforts to secure federal funds from the federal surface transportation system funding alternatives grant program under (b) of this subsection without successfully securing federal funding for the further study of a road usage charge. A year-end update on the status of this effort, if undertaken prior to the end of calendar year 2020, must be provided to the governor's office and the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2021.

(2)(a) $250,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for the transportation commission to conduct a study, applicable to the Interstate 405 express toll lanes, of discounted tolls and other similar programs for low-income drivers that are provided by other states, countries, or other entities and how such a program could be implemented in the state of Washington. The transportation commission may contract with a consultant to conduct all or a portion of this study.

(b) In conducting this study, the transportation commission shall consult with both the department of transportation and the department of social and health services.

(c) The transportation commission shall, at a minimum, consider the following issues when conducting the study of discounted tolls and other similar programs for low-income drivers:

(i) The benefits, requirements, and any potential detriments to the users of a program;

(ii) The most cost-effective way to implement a program given existing financial commitments, shared cost requirements across facilities, and technical requirements to execute and maintain a program;

(iii) The implications of a program for tolling policies, revenues, costs, operations, and enforcement; and

(iv) Any implications to tolled facilities based on the type of tolling implemented on a particular facility.

(d) The transportation commission shall provide a report detailing the findings of this study and recommendations for implementing a discounted toll or other appropriate program in the state of Washington to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(3) $160,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $271,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $158,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $136,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation commission's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

(4) The legislature requests that the commission commence proceedings to name state route number 165 as The Glacier Highway to commemorate the significance of glaciers to the state of Washington.

Sec. 905. 2020 c 219 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($501,294,000))

$498,197,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,081,000))

$16,079,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,258,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,188,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,010,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$286,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,182,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,988,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,158,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$996,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($535,441,000))

$532,342,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) $510,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(3) $1,424,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely to enter into an agreement for upgraded land mobile software, hardware, and equipment.

(4) $2,582,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of radios and other related equipment.

(5) $343,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for aerial criminal investigation tools, including software licensing and maintenance, and annual certification.

(6) $2,342,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely to address the increase in the number of toxicology cases from impaired driving and death investigations.

(7) $580,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2019, and quarterly thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since July 1, 2017, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the calendar quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since July 1, 2017, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406, chapter 416, Laws of 2019.

(8) $18,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the license investigation unit to procure an additional license plate reader and related costs.

(9) The Washington state patrol and the office of financial management must be consulted by the department of transportation during the design phase of any improvement or preservation project that could impact Washington state patrol weigh station operations. During the design phase of any such project, the department of transportation must estimate the cost of designing around the affected weigh station's current operations, as well as the cost of moving the affected weigh station.

(10) $4,210,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for a third arming and a third trooper basic training class. The cadet class is expected to graduate in June 2021.

(11) $65,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 440, Laws of 2019 (immigrants in the workplace). If chapter 440, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(12)(a) The Washington state patrol must report quarterly to the house and senate transportation committees on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:

(i) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;

(ii) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;

(iii) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;

(iv) The composition of workforce; and

(v) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years.

(b) By January 1, 2020, the Washington state patrol must submit to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor a workforce diversity plan. The plan must identify ongoing, and both short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.

(13) $1,182,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $1,988,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $1,158,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $996,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington state patrol's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations and enforcement for the respective tolling facilities.

(14) $100,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of ((Senate Bill No. 6218))chapter 97, Laws of 2020 (Washington state patrol retirement definition of salary), which reflects an increase in the Washington state patrol retirement system pension contribution rate of 0.15 percent for changes to the definition of salary. If ((Senate Bill No. 6218))chapter 97, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((16)))(15) $975,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for communications officers at the King county public safety answering point.

(((17)))(16) $830,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology security enhancements.

(((18)))(17) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to work with the department of enterprise services and office of minority and women's business enterprises to contract for a workforce diversity strategic action plan. The successful consultant must have demonstrated expertise in workforce diversity research and an established record of assisting organizations in implementing diversity initiatives. The plan must include:

(a) Current and past employment data on the composition of the state patrol workforce generally and of its protective service workers;

(b) Research into the reasons for underrepresentation of minorities and women in the state patrol workforce;

(c) Research on best practices for recruiting across the state and from communities historically underrepresented in the Washington state patrol workforce;

(d) Case studies of law enforcement and other agencies that have successfully diversified their workforce; and

(e) A strategic plan with recommendations that will address disparities in the Washington state patrol employment ranks in both commissioned and noncommissioned personnel, with a focus on executive, command, and supervisory employees.

Sec. 906. 2020 c 219 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,052,000))

$5,023,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($511,000))

$510,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($242,965,000))

$221,941,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,294,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($71,447,000))

$65,416,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$10,008,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,779,000))

$4,687,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,696,000))

$7,685,000

License Plate Technology Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,250,000

Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,925,000

Limousine Carriers Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$113,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$264,000

DOL Technology Improvement & Data Management

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,250,000

Agency Financial Transaction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,903,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($366,677,000))

$338,489,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $139,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 65, Laws of 2019 (motorcycle safety). If chapter 65, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $25,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation, $4,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation, $1,708,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $576,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $22,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation, and $28,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to fund the appropriate staff and necessary equipment and software for data management, data analytics, and data compliance activities. The department must, in consultation with the office of the chief information officer, construct a framework with goals for providing better data stewardship and a plan to achieve those goals. The department must provide the framework and plan to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019, and an update by May 1, 2020.

(3) Appropriations provided for the cloud continuity of operations project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020.

(4) $24,028,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs necessary to accommodate increased demand for enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall report on a quarterly basis on the use of these funds, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued/renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued/renewed. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall implement efficiency measures to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times including, but not limited to, the installation of additional cameras at licensing service offices that reduce bottlenecks and align with the "keep your customer" initiative.

(5) $507,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419), Laws of 2019 (vehicle service fees) or chapter 417, Laws of 2019 (vehicle service fees). If neither chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419), Laws of 2019 or chapter 417, Laws of 2019 are enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(6) $25,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 177, Laws of 2019 (San Juan Islands license plate). If chapter 177, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(7) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 384, Laws of 2019 (Seattle Storm license plate). If chapter 384, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(8) $65,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 440, Laws of 2019 (immigrants in the workplace). If chapter 440, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(9) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $11,903,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2020. At the direction of the office of financial management, the department must develop a method of tracking the additional amount of credit card and other financial cost-recovery revenues. In consultation with the office of financial management, the department must notify the state treasurer of these amounts and the state treasurer must deposit these revenues in the agency financial transaction account created in section 717, chapter 416, Laws of 2019 on a quarterly basis.

(10) $1,281,000 of the department of licensing service account—state appropriation is provided solely for savings from the implementation of chapter 417, Laws of 2019 (vehicle service fees). If chapter 417, Laws of 2019 is enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(11) $2,650,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account.

(12) $20,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2019 (Gold Star license plate). If chapter 210, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(13) $31,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 262, Laws of 2019 (snow bikes). If chapter 262, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(14) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 139, Laws of 2019 (Purple Heart license plate). If chapter 139, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(15) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 278, Laws of 2019 (vehicle and vessel owner information). If chapter 278, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(16) $600,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of social and health services, children's administration division for the purpose of providing driver's license support to a larger population of foster youth than is already served within existing resources. Support services include reimbursement of driver's license issuance costs, fees for driver training education, and motor vehicle liability insurance costs.

(17) The department must place personal and company data elements in separate data fields to allow the department to select discrete data elements when providing information or data to persons or entities outside the department. Pursuant to the restrictions in federal and state law, a person's photo, social security number, or medical information must not be made available through public disclosure or data being provided under RCW 46.12.630 or 46.12.635.

(18) $91,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to the one Washington project.

(19) (($1,674,000))$1,174,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for communication and outreach activities necessary to inform the public of federally acceptable identification options including, but not limited to, enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall continue the outreach plan that includes informational material that can be effectively communicated to all communities and populations in Washington. To accomplish this work, the department shall contract with an external vendor with demonstrated experience and expertise in outreach and marketing to underrepresented communities in a culturally-responsive fashion.

(20) Due to the passage of chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020, the department, working with the office of financial management, shall provide a monthly report on the number of registrations involved and differences between actual collections and collections if the initiative was not subject to a temporary injunction as of December 5, 2019.

(21) The appropriations in this section assume full cost recovery for the administration and collection of a motor vehicle excise tax on behalf of any regional transit authority pursuant to section 706 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020.

(((26)))(22) $107,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 78, Laws of 2020 (military veterans commercial driver's license waivers) or chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5544), Laws of 2020 (military veterans commercial driver's license waivers). If neither chapter 78, Laws of 2020 nor chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5544), Laws of 2020 is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((28)))(23) $114,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 124, Laws of 2020 (homeless youth identicards) or chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6304), Laws of 2020 (homeless youth identicards). If neither chapter 124, Laws of 2020 nor chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6304), Laws of 2020 is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((29)))(24) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 129, Laws of 2020 (Seattle national hockey league special license plate) or chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6562), Laws of 2020 (Seattle national hockey league special license plate). If neither chapter 129, Laws of 2020 nor chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6562), Laws of 2020 is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((30)))(25) $14,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2723), Laws of 2020 (off-road vehicle enforcement) or chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6115), Laws of 2020 (off-road vehicle enforcement). If neither chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2723), Laws of 2020 nor chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6115), Laws of 2020 is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((31)))(26) $105,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 118, Laws of 2020 (tribal vehicles compact) or chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6251), Laws of 2020 (tribal vehicles compact). If neither chapter 118, Laws of 2020 nor chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6251), Laws of 2020 (tribal vehicles compact) is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((32)))(27) $57,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 148, Laws of 2020 (state wildlife account). If chapter 148, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((33)))(28) $19,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 93, Laws of 2020 (apples special license plate). If chapter 93, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((34)))(29) $19,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 239, Laws of 2020 (stolen vehicle check). If chapter 239, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((36)))(30) $40,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020, with a proposed plan to allow the registered owner of a vehicle, or the registered owner's authorized representative, to voluntarily enter into either a quarterly or monthly payment plan with the department to pay vehicle fees or taxes due at the time of application for renewal vehicle registration. The plan must include: (a) An analysis of the administrative costs associated with allowing the payment plans; (b) the estimated revenue impact by fund or account, including impacts to local governments; and (c) the recommended method to achieve the greatest level of customer payment compliance.

(((37)))(31)(a) Within available resources, and in collaboration with the department of revenue, the department of licensing shall evaluate the effectiveness of chapter 218, Laws of 2017, in improving compliance with state laws relating to the registration of off-road vehicles, including the payment of retail sales and use tax. The department of licensing shall recommend any statutory, administrative, or other changes needed to optimize and further strengthen the compliance, including an implementation timeline and corresponding resource requirements. Among its recommendations, the department of licensing must address potential changes to the process under RCW 46.93.210 by which the department notifies persons whose vehicles may not be properly registered in the state. The department shall submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2020.

(b) If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2723), Laws of 2020 is enacted by June 30, 2020, this subsection has no force and effect.

Sec. 907. 2020 c 219 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($59,059,000))

$36,506,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,145,000))

$20,231,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,806,000))

$34,075,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,616,000))

$19,858,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,457,000))

$23,638,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($146,083,000))

$134,308,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $11,034,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide quarterly reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:

(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips;

(b) A month-to-month comparison of travel times and travel time reliability for the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor as specified in (a) of this subsection since implementation of the express toll lanes and, to the extent available, a comparison to the travel times and travel time reliability prior to implementation of the express toll lanes;

(c) Total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane (i) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, on this segment of Interstate 405 prior to implementation of the express toll lanes and (ii) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, from month to month since implementation of the express toll lanes; and

(d) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.

(3)(a) $2,114,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $4,920,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $2,116,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $2,776,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to finish implementing a new tolling customer service toll collection system, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020.

(b) The department shall continue to work with the office of financial management, office of the chief information officer, and the transportation committees of the legislature on the project management plan that includes a provision for independent verification and validation of contract deliverables from the successful bidder and a provision for quality assurance that includes reporting independently to the office of the chief information officer on an ongoing basis during system implementation.

(4) The department shall make detailed quarterly reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's web site on the following:

(a) The use of consultants in the tolling program, including the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consultant contracts;

(b) The nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of staffing the division, consultants, and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs;

(c) The vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of the customer service center, cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, electronic payment processing, and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement;

(d) The toll adjudication process, including a summary table for each toll facility that includes:

(i) The number of notices of civil penalty issued;

(ii) The number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty;

(iii) The number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond;

(iv) Workload costs related to hearings;

(v) The cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and

(vi) Revenues generated from notices of civil penalty; and

(e) A summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and express toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(5) (($24,735,000))$20,914,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for operational costs related to the express toll lane facility.

(6) In calendar year 2021, toll equipment on the Tacoma Narrows Bridge will have reached the end of its operational life. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department plans to issue a request for proposals as the first stage of a competitive procurement process that will replace the toll equipment and select a new tolling operator for the Tacoma Narrows Bridge. The request for proposals and subsequent competitive procurement must incorporate elements that prioritize the overall goal of lowering costs per transaction for the facility, such as incentives for innovative approaches which result in lower transactional costs, requests for efficiencies on the part of the bidder that lower operational costs, and incorporation of technologies such as self-serve credit card machines or other point-of-payment technologies that lower costs or improve operational efficiencies.

(7) (($18,840,000))$17,082,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation is provided solely for the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility's expected share of collecting toll revenues, operating customer services, and maintaining toll collection systems. The legislature expects to see appropriate reductions to the other toll facility accounts once tolling on the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility commences and any previously incurred costs for start-up of the new facility are charged back to the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account. The office of financial management shall closely monitor the application of the cost allocation model and ensure that the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility is adequately sharing costs and the other toll facility accounts are not being overspent or subsidizing the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility.

(8) $608,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation are provided solely for increased levels of service from the Washington state patrol for enforcement of toll lane violations on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes. The department shall compile monthly data on the number of Washington state patrol enforcement hours on each facility and the percentage of time during peak hours that speeds are at or above forty-five miles per hour on each facility. The department shall provide this data in a report to the transportation committees of the legislature on at least a calendar quarterly basis.

(9) The department shall develop an ongoing cost allocation method to assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by each Washington state department of transportation program and all relevant transportation agencies, including the Washington state patrol and the transportation commission. This method should update the toll cost allocation method used in the 2020 supplemental transportation appropriations act. By December 1, 2020, a report with the recommended method and any changes or potential impacts to toll rates shall be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management.

Sec. 908. 2020 c 219 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,460,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($96,331,000))

$93,032,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$263,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,878,000))

$2,665,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($102,392,000))

$98,880,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,114,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development of the labor system replacement project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020. It is the intent of the legislature that if any portion of the labor system replacement project is leveraged in the future for the time, leave, and labor distribution of any other agencies, the motor vehicle account will be reimbursed proportionally for the development of the system since amounts expended from the motor vehicle account must be used exclusively for highway purposes in conformance with Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution. This must be accomplished through a loan arrangement with the current interest rate under the terms set by the office of the state treasurer at the time the system is deployed to additional agencies. If the motor vehicle account is not reimbursed for future use of the system, it is further the intent of the legislature that reductions will be made to central service agency charges accordingly. The department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019, detailing the project timeline as of July 1, 2019, an updated project timeline if necessary, expenditures made to date for the purposes of this project, and expenditures projected through the remainder of the project timeline.

(2) $1,375,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's cost related to the one Washington project.

(3) $21,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the activities of the information technology program in developing and maintaining information systems that support the operations and program delivery of the department, ensuring compliance with section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020, and the requirements of the office of the chief information officer under RCW 43.88.092 to evaluate and prioritize any new financial and capital systems replacement or modernization project and any other information technology project. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department may use the distributed direct program support or other cost allocation method to fund a new capital systems replacement or modernization project. The department shall submit a decision package for implementation of a new capital systems replacement project to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature as part of the normal budget process for the 2021-2023 biennium.

Sec. 909. 2020 c 219 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($34,807,000))

$33,819,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($34,841,000))

$33,853,000

Sec. 910. 2020 c 219 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,743,000))

$6,773,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,043,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,846,000))

$9,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,862,000))$2,505,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public use airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security.

(2) (($268,000))$218,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for one FTE dedicated to planning aviation emergency services and addressing emerging aeronautics requirements.

(3) $200,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene an electric aircraft work group to study the state of the electrically powered aircraft industry and assess infrastructure needs related to the deployment of electric or hybrid-electric aircraft for commercial air travel in Washington state.

(a) The chair of the work group may be a consultant specializing in aeronautics. The work group must include, but is not limited to, representation from the electric aircraft industry, the aircraft manufacturing industry, electric utility districts, the battery industry, the department of commerce, the department of transportation aviation division, the airline pilots association, a primary airport representing an airport association, and the airline industry.

(b) The study must include, but is not limited to:

(i) Infrastructure requirements necessary to facilitate electric aircraft operations at airports;

(ii) Potential economic and public benefits including, but not limited to, the direct and indirect impact on the number of manufacturing and service jobs and the wages from those jobs in Washington state;

(iii) Potential incentives for industry in the manufacturing and operation of electric aircraft for regional air travel;

(iv) Educational and workforce requirements for manufacturing and maintaining electric aircraft;

(v) Demand and forecast for electric aircraft use to include expected timeline of the aircraft entering the market given federal aviation administration certification requirements;

(vi) Identification of up to six airports in Washington state that may benefit from a pilot program once an electrically propelled aircraft for commercial use becomes available; and

(vii) Recommendations to further the advancement of the electrification of aircraft for regional commercial use within Washington state, including specific, measurable goals for the years 2030, 2040, and 2050 that reflect progressive and substantial increases in the utilization of electric and hybrid-electric commercial aircraft.

(c) The work group must submit a report and accompanying recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020.

(4) (($350,000))$193,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 396, Laws of 2019 (aviation coordinating commission).

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the aviation division of the department shall assist and consult with the department of revenue in their efforts to update the document titled "Washington Action Plan - FAA Policy Concerning Airport Revenue" to reflect changes to Washington tax code regarding hazardous substances. The department of revenue, in consultation with the aviation division of the Washington state department of transportation, is tasked with developing and recommending a methodology to segregate and track actual amounts collected from the hazardous substance tax under chapter 82.21 RCW and the petroleum products tax under chapter 82.23A RCW as imposed on aviation fuel. The department of revenue is directed to submit a report, including the recommended methodology, to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by January 11, 2021.

Sec. 911. 2020 c 219 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($59,788,000))

$58,643,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$258,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,546,000))

$59,401,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Rocky Reach Trail, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on state route number 2 and the coincident section of state route number 97. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-09-04686 containing the trail and associated buffer areas to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(a) The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes.

(b) Prior to completing the transfer in this subsection (1), the department must ensure that provisions are made to accommodate private and public utilities and any facilities that predate the department's acquisition of the property, at no cost to those entities. Prior to completing the transfer, the department shall also ensure that provisions, by fair market assessment, are made to accommodate other private and public utilities and any facilities that have been legally allowed by permit or other instrument.

(c) The department may sell any adjoining property that is not necessary to support the Rocky Reach Trail and adjacent buffer areas only after the transfer of trail-related property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is complete. Adjoining property owners must be given the first opportunity to acquire such property that abuts their property, and applicable boundary line or other adjustments must be made to the legal descriptions for recording purposes.

(2) With respect to Parcel 12 of the real property conveyed by the state of Washington to the city of Mercer Island under that certain quitclaim deed, dated April 19, 2000, recorded in King county under recording no. 20000425001234, the requirement in the deed that the property be used for road/street purposes only will be deemed satisfied by the department of transportation so long as commuter parking, as part of the vertical development of the property, is one of the significant uses of the property.

(3) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for real estate services activities. Consistent with RCW 47.12.120 and during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, when initiating, extending, or renewing any rent or lease agreements with a regional transit authority, consideration of value must be equivalent to one hundred percent of economic or market rent.

(4)(a) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to:

(i) Determine the real property owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department in King county that is surplus property located in an area encompassing south of Dearborn Street in Seattle, south of Newcastle, west of SR 515, and north of South 216th to SR 515; and

(ii) Use any remaining funds after (a)(i) of this subsection is completed to identify additional real property across the state owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department that is surplus property.

(b) The department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature describing the properties it has identified as surplus property under (a) of this subsection by October 1, 2020.

Sec. 912. 2020 c 219 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$670,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$100,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,634,000))

$350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,304,000))

$1,120,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The economic partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(2) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to execute a transit oriented development pilot project at Kingsgate park and ride in Kirkland intended to be completed by December 31, 2023. The purpose of the pilot project is to demonstrate how appropriate department properties may be used to provide multiple public benefits such as affordable and market rate housing, commercial development, and institutional facilities in addition to transportation purposes. To accomplish the pilot project, the department is authorized to exercise all legal and administrative powers authorized in statute that may include, but is not limited to, the transfer, lease, or sale of some or all of the property to another governmental agency, public development authority, or nonprofit developer approved by the department and partner agencies. The department may also partner with sound transit, King county, the city of Kirkland, and any other federal, regional, or local jurisdiction on any policy changes necessary from those jurisdictions to facilitate the pilot project. By December 1, 2019, the department must report to the legislature on any legislative actions necessary to facilitate the pilot project and future transit oriented development projects.

(3) (($2,000,000))$100,000 of the electric vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption).

(4) (($1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the pilot program established under chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards.

(5) $84,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the department of commerce for the purpose of conducting a study as described in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) to identify opportunities to reduce barriers to electric vehicle adoption by lower income residents of the state through the use of vehicle and infrastructure financing assistance.

(6))) Building on the information and experience gained from the transit oriented development project at the Kingsgate park and ride, the department must identify a pilot park and ride with future public-private partnership development potential in Pierce county and report back to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021, with a proposal for moving forward with a pilot project.

Sec. 913. 2020 c 219 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($486,514,000))

$461,472,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,447,000))

$4,422,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,549,000))

$1,539,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,537,000))

$8,844,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,528,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($513,575,000))

$487,805,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $6,170,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of stormwater runoff from state highways. Plan and reporting requirements as required in chapter 435, Laws of 2019 (Local Stormwater Charges) shall be consistent with the January 2012 findings of the Joint Transportation Committee Report for Effective Cost Recovery Structure for WSDOT, Jurisdictions, and Efficiencies in Stormwater Management.

(b) Pursuant to RCW 90.03.525(3), the department and the utilities imposing charges to the department shall negotiate with the goal of agreeing to rates such that the total charges to the department for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium do not exceed the amount provided in this subsection. The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the amount of funds requested, the funds granted, and the strategies used to keep costs down, by January 17, 2021. If chapter 435, Laws of 2019 (local stormwater charges) is enacted by June 30, 2019, this subsection (1)(b) does not take effect.

(2) (($4,447,000))$4,422,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the state route number 520 floating bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(3) (($1,549,000))$1,539,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the new Tacoma Narrows bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(4) $2,050,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes between Lynnwood and Bellevue, and Renton and the southernmost point of the express toll lanes. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(5) $2,478,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium only on the Interstate 405 roadway between Renton and Bellevue.

(6) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(7) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019. The department must contract out or hire a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.

(8) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma. The program shall address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $570,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.

(9) The department must commence a pilot program for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium at the four highest demand safety rest areas to create and maintain an online calendar for volunteer groups to check availability of weekends for the free coffee program. The calendar must be updated at least weekly and show dates and times that are, or are not, available to participate in the free coffee program. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the ongoing pilot by December 1, 2020, outlining the costs and benefits of the online calendar pilot, and including surveys from the volunteer groups and agency staff to determine its effectiveness.

Sec. 914. 2020 c 219 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($76,211,000))

$73,602,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$53,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$31,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($78,653,000))

$76,044,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(2)(a) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to organ transport vehicles transporting a time urgent organ for an organ procurement organization as defined in RCW 68.64.010. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, organ transport vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(d) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to private, for hire vehicles regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW that have been specially manufactured, designed, or modified for the transportation of a person who has a mobility disability and uses a wheelchair or other assistive device. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, wheelchair-accessible taxicabs that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered public transportation vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(e) Nothing in this subsection (2) is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.

(3) When regional transit authority construction activities are visible from a state highway, the department shall allow the regional transit authority to place safe and appropriate signage informing the public of the purpose of the construction activity.

(4) The department must make signage for low-height bridges a high priority.

(5) $32,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $53,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $31,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $26,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the traffic operations program's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

Sec. 915. 2020 c 219 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($38,251,000))

$35,920,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,380,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,129,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$199,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$116,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($41,794,000))

$39,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program that makes awards for the following: (a) Support for nonprofit agencies, churches, and other entities to help provide outreach to populations underrepresented in the current apprenticeship programs; (b) preapprenticeship training; and (c) child care, transportation, and other supports that are needed to help women, veterans, and minorities enter and succeed in apprenticeship. The department must report on grants that have been awarded and the amount of funds disbursed by December 1st each year. If moneys are provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act for a career connected learning grant program, defined in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1336), Laws of 2019, or otherwise, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a user-centered and mobile-compatible web site redesign using estimated web site ad revenues.

(3) From the revenues generated by the five dollar per studded tire fee under RCW 46.37.427, $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the appropriate local jurisdictions and relevant stakeholder groups, to establish a pilot media-based public information campaign regarding the damage of studded tire use on state and local roadways in Whatcom county, and to continue the existing pilot information campaign in Spokane county. The reason for the geographic selection of Spokane and Whatcom counties is based on the high utilization of studded tires in these jurisdictions. The public information campaigns must primarily focus on making the consumer aware of the safety implications for other drivers, road deterioration, financial impact for taxpayers, and, secondarily, the alternatives to studded tires. The Whatcom county pilot media-based public information campaign must begin by September 1, 2020. By January 14, 2021, the department must provide the transportation committees of the legislature an update on the Spokane and Whatcom county pilot media-based public information campaigns.

(4) $119,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $199,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $116,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $100,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation management and support program's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

Sec. 916. 2020 c 219 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express Toll Lanes

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,123,000))

$121,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,587,000))

$24,097,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,385,000))

$32,508,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,200,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$710,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($763,000))

$150,000

((Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$104,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($70,902,000))

$61,695,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $130,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for completion of a corridor study to identify potential improvements between exit 116 and exit 99 of Interstate 5. The study should further develop mid- and long-term strategies from the corridor sketch, and identify potential US 101/I-5 interchange improvements, a strategic plan for the Nisqually River bridges, regional congestion relief options, and ecosystem benefits to the Nisqually River estuary for salmon productivity and flood control.

(2) The study on state route number 518 referenced in section 218(5), chapter 297, Laws of 2018 must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 30, 2019.

(3) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to complete the Tacoma mall direct access feasibility study.

(4) (($4,600,000))$672,900 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely to complete the road usage charge pilot project overseen by the transportation commission using the remaining unspent amount of the federal grant award. The purpose of the road usage charge pilot project is to explore the viability of a road usage charge as a possible replacement for the gas tax.

(5) $3,000,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for updating the state route number 167 master plan. If chapter 421, Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(6) $123,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $207,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $121,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $104,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation planning, data, and research program's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

(7) By December 31, 2020, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report examining the feasibility of doing performance-based evaluations for projects. The department must incorporate feedback from stakeholder groups, including traditionally underserved and historically disadvantaged populations, and the report shall include the project evaluation procedures that would be used for the performance-based evaluation.

(8) (($556,000))$150,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington department of mechanical engineering, to study measures to reduce noise impacts from the state route number 520 bridge expansion joints. The field testing shall be scheduled during existing construction, maintenance, or other scheduled closures to minimize impacts. The testing must also ensure safety of the traveling public. The study shall examine testing methodologies and project timelines and costs. A final report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by ((December 1, 2021))March 1, 2022.

(9) $5,900,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for delivery of the department's state planning and research work program and pooled fund research projects, provided that the department may not expend any amounts provided in this section on a long-range plan or corridor scenario analysis for I-5 from Tumwater to Marysville. This is not intended to reference or impact: The existing I-5 corridor from Mounts road to Tumwater design and operations alternatives analysis; design studies related to HOV lanes or operations; or where it is necessary to continue design and operations analysis related to projects already under development.

(10) $1,050,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Forward Drive road usage charge research project overseen by the transportation commission using a portion of the amount of the federal grant award. The purpose of the Forward Drive road usage charge research project is to advance research in key policy areas related to road usage charge including assessing impacts of future mobility shifts on road usage charge revenues, conducting an equity analysis, updating and assessing emerging mileage reporting methods, determining opportunities to reduce cost of collection, conducting small-scale pilot tests, and identifying a long-term, detailed phase-in plan.

Sec. 917. 2020 c 219 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($79,474,000))

$86,974,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,833,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$122,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$205,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$120,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($82,856,000))

$90,356,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Consistent with existing protocol and practices, for any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds five million dollars, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2019, and quarterly thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.

(3) Beginning October 1, 2019, and quarterly thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.

(4) $122,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $205,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $120,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $102,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the charges from other agencies' program's proportional share of supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

(5) When the department identifies significant legal issues that have potential transportation budget implications, the department must initiate a briefing for appropriate legislative members or staff through the office of the attorney general and its legislative briefing protocol.

Sec. 918. 2020 c 219 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$784,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($88,698,000))

$78,159,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$32,223,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($122,355,000))

$122,349,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,574,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($247,734,000))

$237,189,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $62,698,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) $14,297,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) $48,401,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2017 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2017" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(2) $32,223,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(3)(a) $10,539,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (i) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (ii) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) At least $1,600,000 of the amount provided in this subsection must be used for vanpool grants in congested corridors.

(4) $27,483,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).

(5)(a) (($61,215,000))$50,676,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2019, and December 15, 2020, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2021-2023 biennium, no more than thirty percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $7,670,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of this amount:

(a) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue a pilot transit pass incentive program. Businesses and nonprofit organizations located in a county adjacent to Puget Sound with a population of more than seven hundred thousand that have never offered transit subsidies to employees are eligible to apply to the program for a fifty percent rebate on the cost of employee transit subsidies provided through the regional ORCA fare collection system. No single business or nonprofit organization may receive more than ten thousand dollars from the program.

(i) Businesses and nonprofit organizations may apply and be awarded funds prior to purchasing a transit subsidy, but the department may not provide reimbursement until proof of purchase or a contract has been provided to the department.

(ii) The department shall update the transportation committees of the legislature on the impact of the program by January 31, 2020, and may adopt rules to administer the program.

(b) $30,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation is provided solely for the STAR pass program for state employees residing in Mason and Grays Harbor Counties. Use of the pass is for public transportation between Mason County and Thurston County, and Grays Harbor and Thurston County. The pass may also be used within Grays Harbor County. The STAR pass commute trip reduction program is open to any state employee who expresses intent to commute to his or her assigned state worksite using a public transit system currently participating in the STAR pass program.

(c) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a first mile/last mile connections grant program. Eligible grant recipients include cities, businesses, nonprofits, and transportation network companies with first mile/last mile solution proposals. Transit agencies are not eligible. The commute trip reduction board shall develop grant parameters, evaluation criteria, and evaluate grant proposals. The commute trip reduction board shall provide the transportation committees of the legislature a report on the effectiveness of this grant program and best practices for continuing the program.

(8) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, $33,370,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021. It is the intent of the legislature that entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP document referenced in this subsection receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP document referenced in this subsection before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.

(9) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit coordination grants. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(10) The department shall not require more than a ten percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.

(11)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (4) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the following projects:

(i) King County Metro - RapidRide Expansion, Burien-Delridge (G2000031);

(ii) King County Metro - Route 40 Northgate to Downtown (G2000032);

(iii) Mason Transit Park & Ride Development (G2000042); or

(iv) Pierce Transit - SR 7 Express Service (G2000045).

(b) At least ten business days before advancing a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(12) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Intercity Transit for the Dash shuttle program.

(13)(a) $485,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for King county for:

(i) An expanded pilot program to provide certain students in the Highline, Tukwila, and Lake Washington school districts with an ORCA card during these school districts' summer vacations. In order to be eligible for an ORCA card under this program, a student must also be in high school, be eligible for free and reduced-price lunches, and have a job or other responsibility during the summer; and

(ii) Providing administrative support to other interested school districts in King county to prepare for implementing similar programs for their students.

(b) King county must provide a report to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2021, regarding:

(i) The annual student usage of the pilot program;

(ii) Available ridership data;

(iii) A cost estimate, including a detailed description of the various expenses leading to the cost estimate, and any other factors relevant to expanding the program to other King county school districts;

(iv) A cost estimate, including a detailed description of the various expenses leading to the cost estimate, and any other factors relevant to expanding the program to student populations other than high school or eligible for free and reduced-price lunches;

(v) Opportunities for subsidized ORCA cards or local grant or matching funds; and

(vi) Any additional information that would help determine if the pilot program should be extended or expanded.

(14) $12,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the green transportation capital grant program established in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption).

(15) $555,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to establish and administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles.

(((17)))(16) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the appropriated amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) No allotment modifications may be made to amounts provided solely for the special needs transportation grant program;

(b) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this biennium;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021;

(d) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the multimodal transportation account—state; and

(e) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken under this subsection.

(((18)))(17)(a) The Washington state department of transportation public transportation division, working with the Thurston regional planning council, shall provide state agency management, the office of financial management, and the transportation committees of the legislature with results of their regional mobility grant program demonstration project I-5/US 101 Practical Solutions: State Capitol Campus Transportation Demand Management – Mobile Work. This includes reporting after the 2020 legislative session on the measurable results of an early pilot initiative, "Telework Tuesday," beginning in January 2020.

(b) Capitol campus state agency management is directed to fully participate in this work, which aims to reduce greenhouse gases, require less office space and parking investments; provide low cost congestion relief on I-5 during peak periods, US 101, and the local transportation network; and improve retention and recruitment of public employees. The agencies should actively: Encourage employees qualified to telework to participate in this program and increase the number of employees who qualify for mobile work and schedule shifts.

(c) If measurable success is achieved, the capitol campus state agencies shall provide options to expand the project to other jurisdictions concentrated with large employers. Expansion and encouragement of telework will help reduce demand on the transportation system, reduce traffic during peak hours, and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

Sec. 919. 2020 c 219 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($545,997,000))

$487,445,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,932,000))

$47,169,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($554,300,000))

$534,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2019-2021 supplemental and 2021-2023 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs.

(2) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee, which must include a representative of the department of enterprise services.

(3) (($73,161,000))$67,052,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 703, chapter 416, Laws of 2019. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall review future use of alternative fuels and dual fuel configurations, including hydrogen.

(4) $650,000 of the Puget sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased staffing at Washington ferry terminals to meet increased workload and customer expectations. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department shall contract with uniformed officers for additional traffic control assistance at the Kingston ferry terminal during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends. Traffic control methods should include, but not be limited to, holding traffic on the shoulder at Lindvog Road until space opens for cars at the tollbooths and dock, and management of traffic on Highway 104 in order to ensure Kingston residents and business owners have access to businesses, roads, and driveways.

(5) $254,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated inventory logistics manager on a one-time basis.

(6) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(7) By January 1, 2020, the ferries division must submit a workforce plan for reducing overtime due to shortages of staff available to fill vacant crew positions. The plan must include numbers of crew positions being filled by staff working overtime, strategies for filling these positions with straight time employees, progress toward implementing those strategies, and a forecast for when overtime expenditures will return to historical averages.

(8) $160,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for a ferry fleet baseline noise study, conducted by a consultant, for the purpose of establishing plans and data-driven goals to reduce ferry noise when Southern resident orca whales are present. In addition, the study must establish prioritized strategies to address vessels serving routes with the greatest exposure to orca whale movements.

(9)(a) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the Washington state transportation center, to develop a plan for service on the triangle route with a goal of providing maximum sailings moving the most passengers to all stops in the least travel time, including waits between sailings, within budget and resource constraints.

(b) The Washington state transportation center must use new traffic management models and scheduling tools to examine proposed improvements for the triangle route. The department shall report to the standing transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2021. The report must include:

(i) Implementation and status of data collection, modeling, scheduling, capital investments, and procedural improvements to allow Washington state ferries to schedule more sailings to and from all stops on the triangle route with minimum time between sailings;

(ii) Recommendations for emergency boat allocations, regular schedule policies, and emergency schedule policies based on all customers alternative travel options to ensure that any dock with no road access is prioritized in scheduling and scheduled service is provided based on population size, demographics, and local medical services;

(iii) Triangle route pilot economic analysis of Washington state ferries fare revenue and fuel cost impact of offering additional, better spaced sailings;

(iv) Results of an economic analysis of the return on investment of potentially acquiring and using traffic control infrastructure, technology, walk on loading bridges, and Good-to-Go and ORCA replacement of current fare sales, validation, collections, accounting, and all associated labor and benefits costs that can be saved via those capital investments; and

(v) Recommendation on policies, procedures, or agency interpretations of statute that may be adopted to mitigate any delays or disruptions to scheduled sailings.

(10) $15,139,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for training. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,500,000 is for training for new employees.

(b) $160,000 is for electronic chart display and information system training.

(c) $379,000 is for marine evacuation slide training.

(11) $1,600,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for naval architecture staff support for the marine maintenance program.

(12) $336,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for inspections of fall restraint systems.

(13) $4,361,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for overtime expenses incurred by engine and deck crew members.

(14) $1,200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for familiarization for new assignments of engine crew and terminal staff.

(15) $100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely to develop a plan for upgrading a second vessel to meet the international convention for the safety of life at sea standards. The plan must identify the option with the lowest impacts to sailing schedules.

(16) The department must request reimbursement from the federal transit administration for the maximum amount of ferry operating expenses eligible for reimbursement under federal law.

Sec. 920. 2020 c 219 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($70,244,000))

$46,851,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$717,000

((Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($71,461,000))

$47,568,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a)(i) $224,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $671,000 of the multimodal transportation account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for continued analysis of the ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor in a new study, with participation from Washington, Oregon, and British Columbia. No funds may be expended until the department is in receipt of $671,000 in private/local funding provided solely for this purpose.

(ii) The ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor advisory group must include legislative membership.

(iii) "Ultra high-speed" means a maximum testing speed of at least two hundred fifty miles per hour.

(b) The study must consist of the following:

(i) Development of proposed corridor governance, general powers, operating structure, legal instruments, and contracting requirements, in the context of the roles of relevant jurisdictions, including federal, state, provincial, and local governments;

(ii) Development of a long-term funding and financing strategy for project initiation, development, construction, and program administration of the high-speed corridor, building on the funding and financing chapter of the 2019 business case analysis and aligned with the recommendations of (b)(i) of this subsection; and

(iii) Development of recommendations for a department-led ultra-high speed corridor engagement plan for policy leadership from elected officials.

(c) This study must build on the results of the 2018 Washington state ultra high-speed ground transportation business case analysis and the 2019 Washington state ultra high-speed ground transportation study findings report. The department shall consult with the transportation committees of the legislature regarding all issues related to proposed corridor governance.

(d) The development work referenced in (b) of this subsection is intended to identify and make recommendations related to specific entities, including interjurisdictional entities, policies, and processes required for the purposes of furthering preliminary analysis efforts for the ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor. This development work is not intended to authorize one or more entities to assume decision making authority for the design, construction, or operation of an ultra high-speed rail corridor.

(e) By December 1, 2020, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report of the study's findings regarding the three elements noted in this subsection. As applicable, the report should also be sent to the executive and legislative branches of government in the state of Oregon and appropriate government bodies in the province of British Columbia.

(2) The department is directed to continue to pursue efforts to reduce costs, increase ridership, and review Amtrak Cascades fares and fare schedules. Within thirty days of each annual cost/revenue reconciliation under the Amtrak service contract, the department shall report annual credits to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees. Annual credits from Amtrak to the department including, but not limited to, credits due to higher ridership, reduced level of service, and fare or fare schedule adjustments, must be used to offset corresponding amounts of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, which must be placed in reserve.

Sec. 921. 2020 c 219 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,187,000))

$12,441,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$450,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($15,554,000))

$15,808,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a study by the Puget Sound regional council of new passenger ferry service to better connect communities throughout the twelve county Puget Sound region. The study must assess potential new routes, identify future terminal locations, and provide recommendations to accelerate the electrification of the ferry fleet. The study must identify future passenger only demand throughout Western Washington, analyze potential routes and terminal locations on Puget Sound, Lake Washington, and Lake Union with an emphasis on preserving waterfront opportunities in public ownership and opportunities for partnership. The study must determine whether and when the passenger ferry service achieves a net reduction in carbon emissions including an analysis of the emissions of modes that passengers would otherwise have used. The study must estimate capital and operating costs for routes and terminals. The study must include early and continuous outreach with all interested stakeholders and a report to the legislature and all interested parties by January 31, 2021.

(2) $1,142,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:

(a) In coordination with stakeholders, identify county-owned fish passage barriers, with priority given to barriers that share the same stream system as state-owned fish passage barriers. The study must identify, map, and provide a preliminary assessment of county-owned barriers that need correction, and provide, where possible, preliminary costs estimates for each barrier correction. The study must provide recommendations on:

(i) How to prioritize county-owned barriers within the same stream system of state-owned barriers in the current six-year construction plan to maximize state investment; and

(ii) How future state six-year construction plans should incorporate county-owned barriers;

(b) Update the local agency guidelines manual, including exploring alternatives within the local agency guidelines manual on county priorities;

(c) Study the current state of county transportation funding, identify emerging issues, and identify potential future alternative transportation fuel funding sources to meet current and future needs.

(3) The entire multiuse roadway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants under RCW 46.09.540, subject to the following limitations:

(a) Twenty-five percent of the amounts provided are reserved for counties that each have a population of fifteen thousand persons or less;

(b)(i) Seventy-five percent of the amounts provided are reserved for counties that each have a population exceeding fifteen thousand persons; and

(ii) No county that receives a grant or grants under (b) of this subsection may receive more than sixty thousand dollars in total grants.

(4) $260,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Wahkiakum county ferry operating deficit.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

Sec. 1001. 2020 c 219 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,015,000))

$17,344,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$81,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,907,000))

$3,165,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,992,000))

$4,454,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,899,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($36,144,000))

$28,193,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects by amount, as listed in the LEAP Transportation Document ((2020-3))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, ((Conference))Program - FMSIB ((Project List)).

(2) Until directed by the legislature, the board may not initiate a new call for projects. By January 1, 2020, the board must report to the legislature on alternative proposals to revise its project award and obligation process, which result in lower reappropriations.

(((4)))(3) It is the intent of the legislature to continue to make strategic investments in a statewide freight mobility transportation system with the help of the freight mobility strategic investment board, including projects that mitigate the impact of freight movement on local communities.

Sec. 1002. 2020 c 219 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($62,884,000))

$51,184,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,456,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$39,590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($103,930,000))

$92,230,000

Sec. 1003. 2020 c 219 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($51,187,000))

$49,717,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($51,523,000))

$50,746,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($102,710,000))

$100,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($51,523,000))$50,746,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new Olympic region maintenance and administration facility to be located on the department-owned site at the intersection of Marvin Road and 32nd Avenue in Lacey, Washington.

(2)(a) (($43,297,000))$41,827,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department facility located at 15700 Dayton Ave N in Shoreline. This appropriation is contingent upon the department of ecology signing a not less than twenty-year agreement to pay a share of any financing contract issued pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.

(b) Payments from the department of ecology as described in this subsection shall be deposited into the motor vehicle account.

(c) Total project costs are not to exceed $46,500,000.

(3) $1,565,000 from the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for furniture for the renovated Northwest Region Headquarters at Dayton Avenue. The department must efficiently furnish the renovated building.

Sec. 1004. 2020 c 219 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($385,619,000))

$395,725,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($102,543,000))

$63,435,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($151,857,000))

$156,149,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($70,404,000))

$64,126,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Connecting Washington Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,355,205,000))

$1,631,186,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,134,000))

$19,123,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,853,000))

$3,855,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$77,956,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,429,000))

$9,403,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($90,027,000))

$33,742,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,284,027,000))

$2,454,702,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-1 as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) The connecting Washington account—state appropriation includes up to (($1,835,325,000))$1,085,325,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.

(5) The special category C account—state appropriation includes up to (($24,910,000))$19,123,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.

(6) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to (($162,658,000))$175,140,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(7) The Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation includes up to $77,956,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(8) (($168,757,000))$162,005,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($19,790,000))$17,898,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $3,384,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, $77,956,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation, and (($1,838,000))$854,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z). It is the intent of the legislature that the $25,000,000 increase in funding provided in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium be covered by any legal damages paid to the state as a result of a lawsuit related to contractual provisions for construction and delivery of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. The legislature intends that the $25,000,000 of the transportation partnership account—state funds be repaid when those damages are recovered.

(9) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit mitigation for the SR 99/Viaduct Project - Construction Mitigation project (809940B).

(10) (($168,655,000))$148,097,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $1,052,000 of the special category C account—state appropriation, and (($738,000))$1,338,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R).

(11) (($82,991,000))$29,187,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-405/SR 522 to I-5 Capacity Improvements project (L2000234) for activities related to adding capacity on Interstate 405 between state route number 522 and Interstate 5, with the goals of increasing vehicle throughput and aligning project completion with the implementation of bus rapid transit in the vicinity of the project.

(12)(a) (($422,099,000))$356,007,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation and (($456,000))$400,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R).

(b) Recognizing that the department of transportation requires full possession of parcel number 1-23190 to complete the Montlake Phase of the West End project, the department is directed to:

(i) Work with the operator of the Montlake boulevard market located on parcel number 1-23190 to negotiate a lease allowing continued operations up to January 1, 2020. After that time, the department shall identify an area in the vicinity of the Montlake property for a temporary market or other food service to be provided during the period of project construction. Should the current operator elect not to participate in providing that temporary service, the department shall then develop an outreach plan with the city to solicit community input on the food services provided, and then advertise the opportunity to other potential vendors. Further, the department shall work with the city of Seattle and existing permit processes to facilitate vendor access to and use of the area in the vicinity of the Montlake property.

(ii) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project (current anticipated contract completion of 2023), WSDOT shall sell that portion of the property not used for permanent transportation improvements and initiate a process to convey that surplus property to a subsequent owner.

(c) $60,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations located in a city with a population exceeding six hundred thousand persons and that empower artists through equitable access to vital expertise, opportunities, and business services. Funds may be used only for the purpose of preserving, commemorating, and sharing the history of the city of Seattle's freeway protests and making the history of activism around the promotion of more integrated transportation and land use planning accessible to current and future generations through the preservation of Bent 2 of the R. H. Thompson freeway ramp.

(13) It is the intent of the legislature that for the I-5 JBLM Corridor Improvements project (M00100R), the department shall actively pursue $50,000,000 in federal funds to pay for this project to supplant state funds in the future. $50,000,000 in connecting Washington account funding must be held in unallotted status during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. These funds may only be used after the department has provided notice to the office of financial management that it has exhausted all efforts to secure federal funds from the federal highway administration and the department of defense.

(14) (($310,469,000))$172,911,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation((is)), $12,599,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $2,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).

(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.

(b) Proceeds from the sale of any surplus real property acquired for the purpose of building the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway (M00600R) project must be deposited into the motor vehicle account for the purpose of constructing the project.

(c) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall develop a coordinated corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509 in collaboration with affected stakeholders. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.

(d) It is the legislature's intent that the department shall construct a full single-point urban interchange at the junction of state route number 161 (Meridian avenue) and state route number 167 and a full single-point urban interchange at the junction of state route number 509 and 188th Street. If the department receives additional funds from an outside source for this project after the base project is fully funded, the funds must first be applied toward the completion of these two full single-point urban interchanges.

(e) In designing the state route number 509/state route number 516 interchange component of the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R), the department shall make every effort to utilize the preferred "4B" design.

(f) The department shall explore the development of a multiuse trail for bicyclists, pedestrians, skateboarders, and similar users along the SR 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park.

(g) If sufficient bonding authority to complete this project is not provided within chapter 421, Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter 421, Laws of 2019 by June 30, 2019, it is the intent of the legislature to return the Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R) to its previously identified construction schedule by moving $128,900,000 in connecting Washington account—state appropriation back to the 2027-2029 biennium from the 2023-2025 biennium on the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section. If sufficient bonding authority is provided, it is the intent of the legislature to advance the project to allow for earlier completion and inflationary savings.

(15) It is the intent of the legislature that, for the I-5/North Lewis County Interchange project (L2000204), the department develop and design the project with the objective of significantly improving access to the industrially zoned properties in north Lewis county. The design must consider the county's process of investigating alternatives to improve such access from Interstate 5 that began in March 2015.

(16) (($1,029,000))$1,030,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation is provided solely for the U.S. 2 Trestle IJR project (L1000158).

(17) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(18) Any advisory group that the department convenes during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium must consider the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(19) The legislature finds that there are sixteen companies involved in wood preserving in the state that employ four hundred workers and have an annual payroll of fifteen million dollars. Before the department's switch to steel guardrails, ninety percent of the twenty-five hundred mile guardrail system was constructed of preserved wood and one hundred ten thousand wood guardrail posts were produced annually for state use. Moreover, the policy of using steel posts requires the state to use imported steel. Given these findings, where practicable, and until June 30, 2021, the department shall include the design option to use wood guardrail posts, in addition to steel posts, in new guardrail installations. The selection of posts must be consistent with the agency design manual policy that existed before December 2009.

(20)(a) For connecting Washington projects that have already begun and are eligible for the authority granted in section 601 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020, the department shall prioritize advancing the following projects if expected reappropriations become available:

(i) SR 14/I-205 to SE 164th Ave - Auxiliary Lanes (L2000102);

(ii) SR 305 Construction - Safety Improvements (N30500R);

(iii) SR 14/Bingen Underpass (L2220062);

(iv) I-405/NE 132nd Interchange - Totem Lake (L1000110);

(v) US Hwy 2 Safety (N00200R);

(vi) US-12/Walla Walla Corridor Improvements (T20900R);

(vii) I-5 JBLM Corridor Improvements (M00100R);

(viii) I-5/Slater Road Interchange - Improvements (L1000099);

(ix) SR 510/Yelm Loop Phase 2 (T32700R); or

(x) SR 520/124th St Interchange (Design and Right of Way) (L1000098).

(b) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section and in section 601 of this act to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(c) The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(21) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70.95.805, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.

Further, the legislature determines construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials substantially meet widely recognized international, national, and local standards and specifications referenced in American society for testing and materials, American concrete institute, Washington state department of transportation, Seattle department of transportation, American public works association, federal aviation administration, and federal highway administration specifications, and are described as necessary and desirable products for recycling and reuse by state and federal agencies.

As these recyclable materials have well established markets, are substantially a primary or secondary product of necessary construction processes and production, and are managed as an item of commercial value, construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials are exempt from chapter 173-350 WAC.

(22)(a) (($17,500,000))$8,072,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation ((is))and $7,329,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for staffing of a project office to replace the Interstate 5 bridge across the Columbia river (G2000088). If at least a $9,000,000 transfer is not authorized in section 406(29), chapter 416, Laws of 2019, then $9,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation lapses.

(b) ((Of the amount provided in this subsection, $7,780,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status by the office of financial management until the department develops a detailed plan for the work of this project office in consultation with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature. The director of the office of financial management shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(c))) The work of this project office includes, but is not limited to, the reevaluation of the purpose and need identified for the project previously known as the Columbia river crossing, the reevaluation of permits and development of a finance plan, the reengagement of key stakeholders and the public, and the reevaluation of scope, schedule, and budget for a reinvigorated bistate effort for replacement of the Interstate 5 Columbia river bridge. When reevaluating the finance plan for the project, the department shall assume that some costs of the new facility may be covered by tolls. The project office must also study the possible different governance structures for a bridge authority that would provide for the joint administration of the bridges over the Columbia river between Oregon and Washington. As part of this study, the project office must examine the feasibility and necessity of an interstate compact in conjunction with the national center for interstate compacts.

(((d)))(c) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must implement chapter 137, Laws of 2019 (projects of statewide significance).

(((e)))(d) The department shall have as a goal to:

(i) Reengage project stakeholders and reevaluate the purpose and need and environmental permits by July 1, 2020;

(ii) Develop a finance plan by December 1, 2020; and

(iii) Have made significant progress toward beginning the supplemental environmental impact statement process by June 30, 2021. The department shall aim to provide a progress report on these activities to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, and a final report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(23) (($17,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to begin the pre-design phase on the I-5/Columbia River Bridge project (G2000088).

(24)))(a) $191,360,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $47,655,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $11,179,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $6,100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and $18,706,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the court injunction by 2030.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $320,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely to remove the fish passage barrier on state route number 6 that interfaces with Boistfort Valley water utilities near milepost 46.6.

(c) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach to maximize habitat gain by replacing both state and local culverts. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts.

(d) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.

(e) It is the intent of the legislature that for the amount listed for the 2021-2023 biennium for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) on the LEAP list referenced in subsection (1) of this section, that accrued practical design savings deposited in the transportation future funding program account be used to help fund the cost of fully complying with the court injunction by 2030.

(((25)))(24)(a) The Washington state department of transportation is directed to pursue compliance with the U.S. v. Washington permanent injunction by delivering culvert corrections within the injunction area guided by the principle of providing the greatest fisheries habitat gain at the earliest time and considering the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert condition, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts.

(b) The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board, while providing the opportunity for stakeholders, tribes, and government agencies to give input on a statewide culvert remediation plan, must provide updates on the development of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the capital budget, ways and means, and transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020, and March 15, 2021. The first update must include a project timeline and plan to ensure that all state agencies with culvert correction programs are involved in the creation of the comprehensive plan. The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must submit the final comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan and the process by which it will be adaptively managed over time to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2021.

(((26) $16,649,000))(25) $4,880,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $373,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and (($6,000,000))$113,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the I-90/Barker to Harvard – Improve Interchanges & Local Roads project (L2000122). The connecting Washington account appropriation for the improvements that fall within the city of Liberty Lake may only be expended if the city of Liberty Lake agrees to cover any project costs within the city of Liberty Lake above the $20,900,000 of state appropriation provided for the total project in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-1 as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program – Highway Improvements (I).

(((27)))(26)(a) (($6,799,000))$3,901,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($31,000))$34,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation((, $3,812,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation)), and (($7,000,000))$4,519,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 410 to SR 18 - Congestion Management project (316706C).

(b) If sufficient bonding authority to complete this project is not provided within chapter 421, Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter 421, Laws of 2019 by June 30, 2019, it is the intent of the legislature to remove the $100,000,000 in toll funding from this project on the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section.

(((28)))(27) For the I-405/North 8th Street Direct Access Ramp in Renton project (L1000280), if sufficient bonding authority to begin this project is not provided within chapter 421, Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter 421, Laws of 2019, it is the intent of the legislature to remove the project from the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section.

(((29) $7,985,000))(28) $7,071,000 of the Special Category C account—state appropriation ((and $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are))is provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River project (L1000199) for improving and widening state route number 18 to four lanes from Issaquah-Hobart Road to Raging River.

(((30)))(29) $2,250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5 Corridor from Mounts Road to Tumwater project (L1000231) for completing a National and State Environmental Policy Act (NEPA/SEPA) analysis to identify mid- and long-term environmental impacts associated with future improvements along the I-5 corridor from Tumwater to DuPont.

(((31) $622,000))(30) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/East Sequim Corridor Improvements project (L2000343).

(((32) $12,916,000))(31) $777,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI).

(((33) $1,000,000))(32) $1,001,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation ((is))and $1,227,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the US 101/Morse Creek Safety Barrier project (L1000247).

(((34) $1,000,000))(33) $85,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 162/410 Interchange Design and Right of Way project (L1000276).

(((36)))(34) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the appropriated amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this biennium;

(b) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Multimodal transportation account—state, transportation partnership account—state, connecting Washington account—state, and special category C account—state; and

(d) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken under this subsection.

Sec. 1005. 2020 c 219 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,971,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,248,000))

$20,566,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($82,447,000))

$87,866,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($490,744,000))

$498,257,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,408,000))

$7,660,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($326,000))

$395,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($204,630,000))

$178,738,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,350,000))

$1,078,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,000))

$79,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,018,000))

$1,457,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$17,892,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($838,044,000))

$816,960,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-1 as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) (($26,683,000))$21,517,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio upgrade (G2000055) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020. The land mobile radio project is subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer. The department, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, shall identify where existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments should be consolidated, identify when existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments can be reused or leveraged to meet multiagency needs, increase mobile radio interoperability between agencies, and identify how redundant investments can be reduced over time. The department shall also provide quarterly reports to the technology services board on project progress.

(5) (($4,000,000))$5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund. The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted. No funds provided in this subsection may be expended on any legal fees related to the SR 99/Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project (809936Z).

(6) The appropriation in this section includes funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.

(7) $21,289,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $840,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the preservation of structurally deficient bridges or bridges that are at risk of becoming structurally deficient (L1000068). These funds must be used widely around the state of Washington. When practicable, the department shall pursue design-build contracts for these bridge projects to expedite delivery. The department shall provide a report that identifies the progress of each project funded in this subsection as part of its annual agency budget request.

(8) The department must consult with the Washington state patrol and the office of financial management during the design phase of any improvement or preservation project that could impact Washington state patrol weigh station operations. During the design phase of any such project, the department must estimate the cost of designing around the affected weigh station's current operations, as well as the cost of moving the affected weigh station.

(9) During the course of any planned resurfacing or other preservation activity on state route number 26 between Colfax and Othello in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must add dug-in reflectors.

(10) Within the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.

Sec. 1006. 2020 c 219 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,746,000))

$6,296,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,137,000))

$5,039,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$579,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($100,000))

$189,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($14,562,000))

$12,103,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1) $700,000))$121,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 99 Aurora Bridge ITS project (L2000338).

Sec. 1007. 2020 c 219 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($116,253,000))

$85,297,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($198,688,000))

$177,352,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,779,000))

$4,575,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,582,000))

$2,312,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$112,426,000

Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($96,030,000))

$35,547,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$986,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($535,744,000))

$418,495,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) $2,857,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation, (($17,832,000))$18,818,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation, and $63,789,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, are provided solely for the Mukilteo ferry terminal (952515P). To the extent practicable, the department shall avoid the closure of, or disruption to, any existing public access walkways in the vicinity of the terminal project during construction.

(3) (($102,641,000))$94,643,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation, $47,819,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, and $4,355,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—local appropriation are provided solely for the Seattle Terminal Replacement project (900010L).

(4) $5,357,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) (($2,300,000))$2,224,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ORCA acceptance project (L2000300). The ferry system shall work with Washington technology solutions and the tolling division on the development of a new, interoperable ticketing system.

(6) $495,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for an electric ferry planning team (G2000087) to develop ten-year and twenty-year implementation plans to efficiently deploy hybrid-electric vessels, including a cost-benefit analysis of construction and operation of hybrid-electric vessels with and without charging infrastructure. The plan includes, but is not limited to, vessel technology and feasibility, vessel and terminal deployment schedules, project financing, and workforce requirements. The plan shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020.

(7) (($35,000,000))$10,776,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation and $8,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the conversion of up to two Jumbo Mark II vessels to electric hybrid propulsion (G2000084). The department shall seek additional funds for the purposes of this subsection. The department may spend from the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation in this section only as much as the department receives in Volkswagen settlement funds for the purposes of this subsection.

(8) $400,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a request for proposals for a new maintenance management system (project L2000301) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 219, Laws of 2020.

(9) (($96,030,000))$35,547,000 of the capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car hybrid-electric vessel. The vendor must present to the joint transportation committee and the office of financial management, by September 15, 2019, a list of options that will result in significant cost savings changes in terms of construction or the long-term maintenance and operations of the vessel. The vendor must allow for exercising the options without a penalty. It is the intent of the legislature to provide an additional $88,000,000 in funding in the 2021-23 biennium. The reduction provided in this subsection is an assumed underrun pursuant to subsection (11) of this section. The commencement of construction of new vessels for the ferry system is important not only for safety reasons, but also to keep skilled marine construction jobs in the Puget Sound region and to sustain the capacity of the region to meet the ongoing construction and preservation needs of the ferry system fleet of vessels. The legislature has determined that the current vessel procurement process must move forward with all due speed, balancing the interests of both the taxpayers and shipyards. To accomplish construction of vessels in accordance with RCW 47.60.810, the prevailing shipbuilder, for vessels initially funded after July 1, 2020, is encouraged to follow the historical practice of subcontracting the construction of ferry superstructures to a separate nonaffiliated contractor located within the Puget Sound region, that is qualified in accordance with RCW 47.60.690.

(10) The capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation includes up to (($96,030,000))$35,547,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(((12)))(11) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the appropriated amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this biennium;

(b) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Puget Sound capital construction account—state, transportation partnership account—state, and capital vessel replacement account—state; and

(d) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken under this subsection.

Sec. 1008. 2020 c 219 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,300,000))

$2,300,000

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$851,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,554,000))

$7,465,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$74,876,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,601,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$336,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($95,518,000))

$94,429,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2) (($7,136,000))$7,047,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.

(3) $7,782,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $51,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation, and $135,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) $367,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely to reimburse Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects. The value of the public benefit of this project is expected to meet or exceed the cost of this project in: Shipper savings on transportation costs; jobs saved in rail-dependent industries; and/or reduced future costs to repair wear and tear on state and local highways due to fewer annual truck trips (reduced vehicle miles traveled). The amounts provided in this subsection are not a commitment for future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations until the full $7,337,000 cost of this project is reimbursed.

(5)(a) $716,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation and $82,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (F01111B).

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state in this subsection may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues and transfers deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property relating to the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad;

(ii) Revenues from trackage rights agreement fees paid by shippers; and

(iii) Revenues and transfers transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad.

(6) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 15, 2020, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(7) (($10,000,000))$4,031,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely as expenditure authority for any insurance proceeds received by the state for Passenger Rail Equipment Replacement (project 700010C.) The department must use this expenditure authority only to purchase replacement equipment that has been competitively procured and for service recovery needs and corrective actions related to the December 2017 derailment.

(8) $898,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation and $8,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Ridgefield Rail Overpass (project 725910A). Total costs for this project may not exceed $909,000 across fiscal biennia.

(9)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project in this section with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance the South Kelso Railroad Crossing project (L1000147).

(b) At least ten business days before advancing the project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of the project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(10) ((The multimodal transportation account—state appropriation includes up to $25,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.867.

(11))) The department must report to the joint transportation committee on the progress made on freight rail investment bank projects and freight rail assistance projects funded during this biennium by January 1, 2020.

(((12)))(11) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Chelatchie Prairie railroad roadbed rehabilitation project (L1000233).

(((13)))(12) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Moses Lake Northern Columbia Basin railroad feasibility study (L1000235).

(((14)))(13) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane airport transload facility project (L1000242).

(((15) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the grade separation at Bell road project (L1000239).

(16)))(14) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $399,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the rail crossing improvements at 6th Ave. and South 19th St. project (L2000289).

(((18)))(15) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the appropriated amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this biennium;

(b) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the multimodal transportation account—state; and

(d) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken under this subsection.

Sec. 1009. 2020 c 219 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,276,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,337,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,380,000))

$1,630,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,314,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,607,000))

$24,543,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($41,420,000))

$52,267,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,600,000))

$18,000,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($155,550,000))

$130,708,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($77,469,000))

$74,351,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($340,953,000))

$305,426,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) (($18,380,000))$8,361,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects. (($18,577,000))$19,363,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $1,380,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are reappropriated for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects selected in the previous biennia (L2000188).

(b) (($11,400,000))$4,066,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($7,750,000))$4,668,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school projects. (($11,354,000))$10,744,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($4,640,000))$3,075,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $1,314,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects selected in the previous biennia (L2000189). The department may consider the special situations facing high-need areas, as defined by schools or project areas in which the percentage of the children eligible to receive free and reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program is equal to, or greater than, the state average as determined by the department, when evaluating project proposals against established funding criteria while ensuring continued compliance with federal eligibility requirements.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program. The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status.

(4) (($37,537,000))$32,976,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) (($23,926,000))$13,829,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Covington Connector (L2000104). The amounts described in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section are not a commitment by future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve appropriations in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium to reimburse the city of Covington for approved work completed on the project up to the full $24,000,000 cost of this project.

(6)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project in this section with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the following projects:

(i) I-5/Port of Tacoma Road Interchange (L1000087);

(ii) SR 99 Revitalization in Edmonds (NEDMOND); or

(iii) SR 523 145th Street (L1000148);

(b) At least ten business days before advancing a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(7) It is the expectation of the legislature that the department will be administering a local railroad crossing safety grant program for $7,000,000 in federal funds during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(8)(a) (($15,213,000))$22,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for national highway freight network projects identified on the project list submitted in accordance with section 218(4)(b), chapter 14, Laws of 2016 on October 31, 2016.

(b) The department shall convene a stakeholder group for the purpose of developing a recommendation for a Washington freight advisory committee. The recommendations must include, but are not limited to, defining the committee's purpose and goals, roles and responsibilities, reporting structure, and proposed activities. Stakeholders must include representation from, but not limited to, the trucking industry, the maritime industry, the rail industry, cities, tribal governments, counties, ports, and representatives from key industrial associations important to the state's economic vitality and other relevant public and private interests. In developing the recommendation, the stakeholder group must review practices used by other states. The proposed committee must conform with requirements of the fixing America's surface transportation act and other relevant federal legislation. The recommendations must include how the committee can address improving freight mobility including, but not limited to, addressing insufficient truck parking in Washington state, examining the link between preservation investments and freight mobility, and enhancing freight logistics through the application of technology. The stakeholder group shall make recommendations to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(9) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Beech Street Extension project (L1000222).

(10) (($3,900,000))$2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Dupont-Steilacoom road improvements project (L1000224).

(11) (($650,000))$100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 104/40th place northeast roundabout project (L1000244).

(12) (($860,000))$360,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Clinton to Ken's corner trail project (L1000249).

(13) (($210,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-405/44th gateway signage and green-scaping improvements project (L1000250).

(14) $650,000))$50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Wallace Kneeland and Shelton springs road intersection improvements project (L1000260).

(((15)))(14) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the complete 224th Phase two project (L1000270).

(((16)))(15) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the installation of an updated meteorological station at the Colville airport (L1000279).

(((17)))(16)(a) $700,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Ballard-Interbay Regional Transportation system plan project (L1000281).

(b) Funding in this subsection is provided solely for the city of Seattle to develop a plan and report for the Ballard-Interbay Regional Transportation System project to improve mobility for people and freight. The plan must be developed in coordination and partnership with entities including but not limited to the city of Seattle, King county, the Port of Seattle, Sound Transit, the Washington state military department for the Seattle armory, and the Washington state department of transportation. The plan must examine replacement of the Ballard bridge and the Magnolia bridge, which was damaged in the 2001 Nisqually earthquake. The city must provide a report on the plan that includes recommendations to the Seattle city council, King county council, and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020. The report must include recommendations on how to maintain the current and future capacities of the Magnolia and Ballard bridges, an overview and analysis of all plans between 2010 and 2020 that examine how to replace the Magnolia bridge, and recommendations on a timeline for constructing new Magnolia and Ballard bridges.

(((18)))(17) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Mickelson Parkway project (L1000282).

(((19) $300,000))(18) $175,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the South 314th Street Improvements project (L1000283).

(((20) $250,000))(19) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Ridgefield South I-5 Access Planning project (L1000284).

(((21) $300,000))(20) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washougal 32nd Street Underpass Design and Permitting project (L1000285).

(((22) $600,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $150,000))(21) $25,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and $267,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Bingen Walnut Creek and Maple Railroad Crossing (L2000328).

(((23) $1,500,000))(22) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 303 Warren Avenue Bridge Pedestrian Improvements project (L2000339).

(((24) $1,000,000))(23) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 72nd/Washington Improvements in Yakima project (L2000341).

(((25) $650,000))(24) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 48th/Washington Improvements in Yakima project (L2000342).

(((27)))(25) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the appropriated amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this biennium;

(b) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2020))2021-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March ((11, 2020))22, 2021;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Connecting Washington account—state and multimodal transportation account—state; and

(d) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken under this subsection.

(26) $11,679,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely to accelerate local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system. The department will identify projects through its current national highway system asset management call for projects with applications due in February 2021.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 1101. 2020 c 219 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($105,000))

$21,000

((Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$125,000))

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,407,000))

$182,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,723,000))

$2,455,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,378,835,000))

$1,308,311,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,078,000))

$25,079,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,452,000))

$12,062,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($31,253,000))

$29,514,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($86,483,000))

$69,407,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,543,461,000))

$1,447,031,000

Sec. 1102. 2020 c 219 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

((Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,000))

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($281,000))

$68,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,599,000))

$640,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,000))

$9,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,926,000))

$717,000

Sec. 1103. 2020 c 219 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to

cities and counties
. . . .
(($508,276,000))

$456,823,000

Sec. 1104. 2020 c 219 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

statutory transfers
. . . .
(($2,146,790,000))

$1,921,901,000

Sec. 1105. 2020 c 219 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

transfers
. . . .
(($235,788,000))

$240,415,000

Sec. 1106. 2020 c 219 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) ((Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account—State
. . . .
$54,000,000

(2) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

(3))) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
(($57,000,000))

$22,000,000

(((4)))(2) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Freight Mobility Investment

Account—State
. . . .
$8,070,000

(((5)))(3) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$1,732,000

(((6)))(4) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account—State
. . . .
(($5,067,000))

$34,067,000

(((7)))(5) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account—State
. . . .
(($52,000,000))

$43,000,000

(((8) Motor Vehicle))(6) Multimodal Transportation

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State
. . . .
(($55,000,000))

$50,000,000

(((9)))(7) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

(((10)))(8) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to

the State Route Number 520 Corridor

Account—State
. . . .
$1,434,000

(((11)))(9) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

(((12)))(10) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Regional

Mobility Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$11,215,000

(((13)))(11) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Rural

Mobility Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$15,223,000

(((14) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel

Account)))(12) Multimodal Transportation Account—

State Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget

Sound Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$20,000,000

(((15)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$9,992,000

(b) The transfer identified in this subsection is provided solely to repay in full the motor vehicle account—state appropriation loan from section 1005(21), chapter 416, Laws of 2019.

(16)))(13)(a) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Alaskan Way Viaduct

Replacement Project Account—State
. . . .
$77,956,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents that portion of the up to $200,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873, intended to be sold through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, used only for construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z), and that must be repaid from the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account consistent with RCW 47.56.864.

(((17)))(14) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation

Account—State
. . . .
(($4,829,000))

$9,902,000

(((18)))(15)(a) General Fund Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207(7), chapter 416, Laws of 2019.

(((19)))(16) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation

Partnership Account—State
. . . .
(($2,312,000))

$1,167,000

(((20)))(17)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Transportation Partnership Account—State
. . . .
$15,858,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(((21)))(18) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

(((22)))(19)(a) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

(b) A transfer in the amount of $5,000,000 was made from the Motor Vehicle Account to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account in April 2019. It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer was to be temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases, and this is an equivalent reimbursing transfer to occur in November 2019.

(((23)))(20)(a) Transportation ((2003 Account (Nickel Account)))Partnership Account

—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma

Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State
. . . .
$12,543,000

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases, and an equivalent reimbursing transfer is to occur after the debt service and deferred sales tax on the Tacoma Narrows bridge construction costs are fully repaid in accordance with chapter 195, Laws of 2018.

(((24)))(21) Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$9,000,000

(((25)))(22) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Pilotage

Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

(((26)))(23)(a) Motor Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the County Road

Administration Board Emergency Loan Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

(b) If chapter 157, Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((27)))(24)(a) Advanced Environmental Mitigation

Revolving Account—State Appropriation: For transfer

to the Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection is contingent on at least a $9,000,000 transfer to the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account authorized by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus capital appropriations act.

(((28)))(25) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Electric Vehicle

Charging Infrastructure Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

(((29)))(26) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Complete Streets

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$10,200,000

(((30)))(27)(a) Transportation Partnership

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State
. . . .
(($96,030,000))

$35,547,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(((31)))(28) Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account—State
. . . .
$7,296,000

(((32)))(29) Connecting Washington Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$115,000,000

(30) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement

Project Account—State
. . . .
$11,783,000

(31) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the 520 Civil Penalties Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

(32) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation 2003 Account

(Nickel Account)—State
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. A new section is added to 2020 c 219 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021—REVENUE LOSS DEPOSITS

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$315,866,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into accounts in the amounts specified in subsection (2) of this section. These amounts reflect revenue losses to state transportation accounts in state fiscal year 2020 relative to revenues collected in state fiscal year 2019 and shall be used to maintain government services pursuant to the federal American rescue plan act of 2021.

(2) The appropriation must be distributed to the following accounts in the amounts designated:

Aeronautics Account—State. . . .$328,000

State Patrol Highway Account—State. . . .$12,358,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State. . . .$790,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State. . . .$16,530,000

Highway Safety Account—State. . . .$8,218,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State. . . .$99,416,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State. . . .$30,742,000

Connecting Washington Account—State. . . .$17,246,000

Special Category C Account—State. . . .$1,086,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State. . . .$115,609,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State. . . .$13,543,000

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---