BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After the effective date of this section, the legislature shall not transfer moneys from nonappropriated funds or accounts that receive fees paid by regulated or licensed businesses or organizations to any other funds or accounts.

(2) This section does not apply to transfers specifically authorized by statutes enacted prior to the effective date of this section.

(3) This section does not apply to acts enacted after the effective date of this section that are enacted with at least a three-fifths majority of the members of both the house of representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After the effective date of this section, the legislature shall not transfer moneys from nonappropriated funds or accounts that receive fees paid by regulated or licensed businesses or organizations to any other funds or accounts in an omnibus biennial or supplemental appropriations act.

(2) This section does not apply to implementing transfers that are allowed under section 1 (2) or (3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---