BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.065 and 2020 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be in the county of Grant, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Okanogan, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Mason, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Thurston, ((eight))nine judges of the superior court; in the counties of Pacific and Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the counties of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens jointly, three judges of the superior court; in the county of San Juan, one judge of the superior court; and in the county of Island, two judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective only if Thurston county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law and the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective November 1, 2021.

--- END ---