BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 6.27.105 and 2019 c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A writ that is issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall be substantially in the following form, but:

(a) ((If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for child support, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support";

(b))) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for private student loan debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt";

(((c)))(b) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for consumer debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt"; and

(((d)))(c) If the writ is issued by an attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of this section:

"IN THE . . . . . COURT

OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR

THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . .,

Plaintiff,

No. . . . .

vs.

. . . .,

WRIT OF

Defendant

GARNISHMENT FOR

CONTINUING LIEN ON

. . . .,

EARNINGS

Garnishee

THE STATE OF WASHINGTON TO:. . . .

Garnishee

AND TO:. . . .

Defendant

The above-named plaintiff has applied for a writ of garnishment against you, claiming that the above-named defendant is indebted to plaintiff and that the amount to be held to satisfy that indebtedness is $ . . . . . ., consisting of:

Balance on Judgment or Amount of Claim

$ . . . .

Interest under Judgment from . . . . to . . . .

$ . . . .

Per Day Rate of Estimated Interest

$ . . . . per day

Taxable Costs and Attorneys' Fees

$ . . . .

Estimated Garnishment Costs:

Filing and Ex Parte Fees

$ . . . .

Service and Affidavit Fees

$ . . . .

Postage and Costs of Certified Mail

$ . . . .

Answer Fee or Fees

$ . . . .

Garnishment Attorney Fee

$ . . . .

Other

$ . . . .

THIS IS A WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN. THE GARNISHEE SHALL HOLD the nonexempt portion of the defendant's earnings due at the time of service of this writ and shall also hold the defendant's nonexempt earnings that accrue through the last payroll period ending on or before SIXTY days after the date of service of this writ. HOWEVER, IF THE GARNISHEE IS PRESENTLY HOLDING THE NONEXEMPT PORTION OF THE DEFENDANT'S EARNINGS UNDER A PREVIOUSLY SERVED WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN, THE GARNISHEE SHALL HOLD UNDER THIS WRIT only the defendant's nonexempt earnings that accrue from the date the previously served writ or writs terminate and through the last payroll period ending on or before sixty days after the date of termination of the previous writ or writs. IN EITHER CASE, THE GARNISHEE SHALL STOP WITHHOLDING WHEN THE SUM WITHHELD EQUALS THE AMOUNT STATED IN THIS WRIT OF GARNISHMENT.

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court, by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment, delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.

YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses listed at the bottom of this writ.

If, at the time this writ was served, you owed the defendant any earnings (that is, wages, salary, commission, bonus, tips, or other compensation for personal services or any periodic payments pursuant to a nongovernmental pension or retirement program), the defendant is entitled to receive amounts that are exempt from garnishment under federal and state law. You must pay the exempt amounts to the defendant on the day you would customarily pay the compensation or other periodic payment. As more fully explained in the answer, the basic exempt amount is the greater of seventy-five percent of disposable earnings or a minimum amount determined by reference to the employee's pay period, to be calculated as provided in the answer. However, ((if this writ carries a statement in the heading of "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support," the basic exempt amount is fifty percent of disposable earnings; and)) if this writ carries a statement in the heading of "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt," the basic exempt amount is the greater of eighty-five percent of disposable earnings or fifty times the minimum hourly wage of the highest minimum wage law in the state at the time the earnings are payable; and if this writ carries a statement in the heading of "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt," the basic exempt amount is the greater of eighty percent of disposable earnings or thirty-five times the state minimum hourly wage.

YOU MAY DEDUCT A PROCESSING FEE FROM THE REMAINDER OF THE EMPLOYEE'S EARNINGS AFTER WITHHOLDING UNDER THIS WRIT. THE PROCESSING FEE MAY NOT EXCEED TWENTY DOLLARS FOR THE FIRST ANSWER AND TEN DOLLARS AT THE TIME YOU SUBMIT THE SECOND ANSWER.

If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.

IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.

JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

[Seal]

. . . .

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff (or Plaintiff, if no attorney)

Clerk of the Court

. . . .

. . . .

Address

By

. . . .

. . . .

Name of Defendant

Address"

. . . .

Address of Defendant

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ issued by the clerk of the court.

Dated this . . . . . . . .day of . . . . . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address of the Clerk of the Court"

. . . .

Name of Defendant

. . . .

Address of Defendant

Sec. 2. RCW 6.27.140 and 2019 c 371 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The notice required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form, printed or typed in no smaller than size twelve point font:

NOTICE OF GARNISHMENT

AND OF YOUR RIGHTS

A Writ of Garnishment issued in a Washington court has been or will be served on the garnishee named in the attached copy of the writ. After receipt of the writ, the garnishee is required to withhold payment of any money that was due to you and to withhold any other property of yours that the garnishee held or controlled. This notice of your rights is required by law.

YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING EXEMPTION RIGHTS:

WAGES. If the garnishee is your employer who owes wages or other personal earnings to you, your employer is required to pay amounts to you that are exempt under state and federal laws, as explained in the writ of garnishment. You should receive a copy of your employer's answer, which will show how the exempt amount was calculated. ((If the garnishment is for child support, the exempt amount paid to you will be a percent of your disposable earnings, which is fifty percent of that part of your earnings remaining after your employer deducts those amounts which are required by law to be withheld.))A garnishment against wages or other earnings for child support may not be issued under chapter 6.27 RCW. If the garnishment is for private student loan debt, the exempt amount paid to you will be the greater of the following: A percent of your disposable earnings, which is eighty-five percent of the part of your earnings remaining after your employer deducts those amounts which are required by law to be withheld, or fifty times the minimum hourly wage of the highest minimum wage law in the state at the time the earnings are payable. If the garnishment is for consumer debt, the exempt amount paid to you will be the greater of the following: A percent of your disposable earnings, which is eighty percent of the part of your earnings remaining after your employer deducts those amounts which are required by law to be withheld, or thirty-five times the state minimum hourly wage.

BANK ACCOUNTS. If the garnishee is a bank or other institution with which you have an account in which you have deposited benefits such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Social Security, veterans' benefits, unemployment compensation, or any federally qualified pension, such as a state or federal pension, individual retirement account (IRA), or 401K plan, you may claim the account as fully exempt if you have deposited only such benefit funds in the account. It may be partially exempt even though you have deposited money from other sources in the same account. An exemption is also available under RCW 26.16.200, providing that funds in a community bank account that can be identified as the earnings of a stepparent are exempt from a garnishment on the child support obligation of the parent.

OTHER EXEMPTIONS. If the garnishee holds other property of yours, some or all of it may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010, a Washington statute that exempts certain property of your choice (including up to $2,500.00 in a bank account if you owe on private student loan debts; up to $2,000.00 in a bank account if you owe on consumer debts; or up to $500.00 in a bank account for all other debts) and certain other property such as household furnishings, tools of trade, and a motor vehicle (all limited by differing dollar values).

HOW TO CLAIM EXEMPTIONS. Fill out the enclosed claim form and mail or deliver it as described in instructions on the claim form. If the plaintiff does not object to your claim, the funds or other property that you have claimed as exempt must be released not later than 10 days after the plaintiff receives your claim form. If the plaintiff objects, the law requires a hearing not later than 14 days after the plaintiff receives your claim form, and notice of the objection and hearing date will be mailed to you at the address that you put on the claim form.

THE LAW ALSO PROVIDES OTHER EXEMPTION RIGHTS. IF NECESSARY, AN ATTORNEY CAN ASSIST YOU TO ASSERT THESE AND OTHER RIGHTS, BUT YOU MUST ACT IMMEDIATELY TO AVOID LOSS OF RIGHTS BY DELAY.

(2)(a) If the writ is to garnish funds or property held by a financial institution, the claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form, printed or typed in no smaller than size twelve point font:

[Caption to be filled in by judgment creditor

or plaintiff before mailing.]

Name of Court

. . . .

No . . . . . .

Plaintiff,

vs.

. . . .

EXEMPTION CLAIM

Defendant,

Garnishee Defendant

INSTRUCTIONS:

1.

Read this whole form after reading the enclosed notice. Then put an X in the box or boxes that describe your exemption claim or claims and write in the necessary information on the blank lines. If additional space is needed, use the bottom of the last page or attach another sheet.

2.

Make two copies of the completed form. Deliver the original form by first-class mail or in person to the clerk of the court, whose address is shown at the bottom of the writ of garnishment. Deliver one of the copies by first-class mail or in person to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney, whose name and address are shown at the bottom of the writ. Keep the other copy. YOU SHOULD DO THIS AS QUICKLY AS POSSIBLE, BUT NO LATER THAN 28 DAYS (4 WEEKS) AFTER THE DATE ON THE WRIT.

I/We claim the following money or property as exempt:

IF BANK ACCOUNT IS GARNISHED:

[ ] The account contains payments from:

[ ]

Temporary assistance for needy families, SSI, or other public assistance. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Social Security. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Veterans' Benefits. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Federally qualified pension, such as a state or federal pension, individual retirement account (IRA), or 401K plan. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Unemployment Compensation. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Child support. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Other. Explain . . . .

[ ]

$2,500 exemption for private student loan debts.

[ ]

$2,000 exemption for consumer debts.

[ ]

$500 exemption for all other debts.

IF EXEMPTION IN BANK ACCOUNT IS CLAIMED, ANSWER ONE OR BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING:

[ ]

No money other than from above payments are in the account.

[ ]

Moneys in addition to the above payments have been deposited in the account. Explain . . . .

. . . .

. . . .

OTHER PROPERTY:

[ ]

Describe property . . . .

. . . .

(If you claim other personal property as exempt, you must attach a list of all other personal property that you own.)

. . . .

. . . .

Print: Your name

If married or in a state registered domestic partnership,

name of husband/wife/state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

Your signature

Signature of husband,

wife, or state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address

(if different from yours)

. . . .

. . . .

Telephone number

Telephone number

(if different from yours)

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to go to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim that a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

(b) If the writ is directed to an employer to garnish earnings, the claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form, ((subject to (c) of this subsection,)) printed or typed in no smaller than size twelve point font type:

[Caption to be filled in by judgment creditor

or plaintiff before mailing.]

. . . .

Name of Court

. . . .

No . . . . . .

Plaintiff,

vs.

. . . .

EXEMPTION CLAIM

Defendant,

. . . .

Garnishee Defendant

INSTRUCTIONS:

1.

Read this whole form after reading the enclosed notice. Then put an X in the box or boxes that describe your exemption claim or claims and write in the necessary information on the blank lines. If additional space is needed, use the bottom of the last page or attach another sheet.

2.

Make two copies of the completed form. Deliver the original form by first-class mail or in person to the clerk of the court, whose address is shown at the bottom of the writ of garnishment. Deliver one of the copies by first-class mail or in person to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney, whose name and address are shown at the bottom of the writ. Keep the other copy. YOU SHOULD DO THIS AS QUICKLY AS POSSIBLE, BUT NO LATER THAN 28 DAYS (4 WEEKS) AFTER THE DATE ON THE WRIT.

I/We claim the following money or property as exempt:

IF PENSION OR RETIREMENT BENEFITS ARE GARNISHED:

[ ]

Name and address of employer who is paying the

benefits:. . . .

. . . .

((IF EARNINGS ARE GARNISHED FOR CHILD SUPPORT:

[ ]

I claim maximum exemption.))

IF EARNINGS ARE GARNISHED FOR PRIVATE STUDENT LOAN DEBT:

[ ]

I claim maximum exemption.

IF EARNINGS ARE GARNISHED FOR CONSUMER DEBT:

[ ]

I claim maximum exemption.

. . . .

. . . .

Print: Your name

If married or in a state registered domestic partnership,

name of husband/wife/state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

Your signature

Signature of husband,

wife, or state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address

(if different from yours)

. . . .

. . . .

Telephone number

Telephone number

(if different from yours)

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to go to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim that a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

(c) ((If the writ under (b) of this subsection is not a writ for the collection of child support, the exemption language pertaining to child support may be omitted.

(d))) If the writ under (b) of this subsection is not a writ for the collection of private student loan debt, the exemption language pertaining to private student loan debt may be omitted.

(((e)))(d) If the writ under (b) of this subsection is not a writ for the collection of consumer debt, the exemption language pertaining to consumer debt may be omitted.

Sec. 3. RCW 6.27.150 and 2019 c 371 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if the garnishee is an employer owing the defendant earnings, then for each week of such earnings, an amount shall be exempt from garnishment which is the greatest of the following:

(a) Thirty-five times the federal minimum hourly wage in effect at the time the earnings are payable; or

(b) Seventy-five percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(2) In the case of a garnishment based on a ((judgment or other order for child support or)) court order for spousal maintenance, other than a mandatory wage assignment order pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, or a mandatory assignment of retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, the exemption shall be fifty percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(3) In the case of a garnishment based on a judgment or other order for the collection of private student loan debt, for each week of such earnings, an amount shall be exempt from garnishment which is the greater of the following:

(a) Fifty times the minimum hourly wage of the highest minimum wage law in the state at the time the earnings are payable; or

(b) Eighty-five percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(4) In the case of a garnishment based on a judgment or other order for the collection of consumer debt, for each week of such earnings, an amount shall be exempt from garnishment which is the greater of the following:

(a) Thirty-five times the state minimum hourly wage; or

(b) Eighty percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(5) The exemptions stated in this section shall apply whether such earnings are paid, or are to be paid, weekly, monthly, or at other intervals, and whether earnings are due the defendant for one week, a portion thereof, or for a longer period.

(6) Unless directed otherwise by the court, the garnishee shall determine and deduct exempt amounts under this section as directed in the writ of garnishment and answer, and shall pay these amounts to the defendant.

(7) No money due or earned as earnings as defined in RCW 6.27.010 shall be exempt from garnishment under the provisions of RCW 6.15.010, as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 4. RCW 6.27.330 and 2012 c 159 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A judgment creditor may obtain a continuing lien on earnings by a garnishment pursuant to this chapter, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A continuing lien on earnings may not be issued pursuant to this chapter if the garnishment is based on a judgment or other order for child support. A judgment creditor may seek to withhold from earnings based on a judgment or other order for child support under chapter 26.18 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.18.020 and 2018 c 150 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Dependent child" means any child for whom a support order has been established or for whom a duty of support is owed.

(2) "Duty of maintenance" means the duty to provide for the needs of a spouse or former spouse or domestic partner or former domestic partner imposed under chapter 26.09 RCW.

(3) "Duty of support" means the duty to provide for the needs of a dependent child, which may include necessary food, clothing, shelter, education, and health care. The duty includes any obligation to make monetary payments, to pay expenses, including maintenance in cases in which there is a dependent child, or to reimburse another person or an agency for the cost of necessary support furnished a dependent child. The duty may be imposed by court order, by operation of law, or otherwise.

(4) "Obligee" means the custodian of a dependent child, the spouse or former spouse or domestic partner or former domestic partner, or person or agency, to whom a duty of support or duty of maintenance is owed, or the person or agency to whom the right to receive or collect support or maintenance has been assigned.

(5) "Obligor" means the person owing a duty of support or duty of maintenance.

(6) "Support or maintenance order" means any judgment, decree, or order of support or maintenance issued by the superior court or authorized agency of the state of Washington; or a judgment, decree, or other order of support or maintenance issued by a court or agency of competent jurisdiction in another state or country, which has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state.

(7) "Employer" includes the United States government, a state or local unit of government, and any person or entity who pays or owes earnings or remuneration for employment to the obligor.

(8) "Earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services or remuneration for employment, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy support or maintenance obligations, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(9) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld.

(10) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(11) "Health insurance coverage" is another term for, and included in the definition of, "health care coverage." Health insurance coverage includes any coverage under which medical services are provided by an employer or a union whether that coverage is provided through a self-insurance program, under the employee retirement income security act of 1974, a commercial insurer pursuant to chapters 48.20 and 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor pursuant to chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization pursuant to chapter 48.46 RCW, and the state through chapter 41.05 RCW.

(12) "Insurer" means a commercial insurance company providing disability insurance under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor providing health care coverage under chapter 48.44 RCW, a health maintenance organization providing comprehensive health care services under chapter 48.46 RCW, and shall also include any employer or union which is providing health insurance coverage on a self-insured basis.

(13) "Remuneration for employment" means moneys due from or payable by the United States to an individual within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 659 and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 662(f).

(14) "Health care coverage" means fee for service, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, and other types of private health insurance and public health care coverage under which medical services could be provided to a dependent child or children. The term "health care coverage" includes, but is not limited to, health insurance coverage.

(15) "Public health care coverage," sometimes called "state purchased health care," means state-financed or federally financed medical coverage, whether or not there is an assignment of rights. For children residing in Washington state, this includes coverage through the department of social and health services or the health care authority, except for coverage under chapter 41.05 RCW; for children residing outside of Washington, this includes coverage through another state's agencies that administer state purchased health care programs.

(16) "Income withholding order" means an order regarding withholding of income of amounts payable as a support obligation that complies with the requirements in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666.

Sec. 6. RCW 26.18.080 and 1987 c 435 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of a petition or motion seeking a mandatory wage assignment that complies with RCW 26.18.070, the court shall issue ((a)): (a) A wage assignment order((, as provided in RCW 26.18.100 and))for unpaid maintenance; (b) an income withholding order for unpaid child support; or (c) an income withholding order for unpaid maintenance and unpaid child support, including the information required in RCW 26.18.090(((1))), directed to the employer, and commanding the employer to answer the order on the forms served with the order that comply with RCW 26.18.120 within twenty days after service of the order upon the employer.

(2) The clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the mandatory wage assignment or income withholding order, a true and correct copy of the support orders in the court file, and a statement containing the obligee's address and social security number shall be forwarded to the Washington state support registry within five days of the entry of the order.

Sec. 7. RCW 26.18.090 and 2008 c 6 s 1032 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The wage assignment order in RCW 26.18.080 for unpaid maintenance only shall include:

(a) The maximum amount of current ((support or)) maintenance, if any, to be withheld from the obligor's earnings each month, or from each earnings disbursement; and

(b) The total amount of the arrearage or reimbursement judgment previously entered by the court, if any, together with interest, if any.

(2) The total amount to be withheld from the obligor's earnings each month, or from each earnings disbursement, shall not exceed fifty percent of the disposable earnings of the obligor. If the amounts to be paid toward the arrearage are specified in the ((support or)) maintenance order, then the maximum amount to be withheld is the sum of: Either the current support or maintenance ordered, or both; and the amount ordered to be paid toward the arrearage, or fifty percent of the disposable earnings of the obligor, whichever is less.

(3) The provisions of RCW 6.27.150 do not apply to wage assignments for ((child support or)) maintenance authorized under this chapter, but fifty percent of the disposable earnings of the obligor are exempt, and may be disbursed to the obligor.

(4) ((If an obligor is subject to two or more attachments for child support on account of different obligees, the employer shall, if the nonexempt portion of the obligor's earnings is not sufficient to respond fully to all the attachments, apportion the obligor's nonexempt disposable earnings between or among the various obligees equally. Any obligee may seek a court order reapportioning the obligor's nonexempt disposable earnings upon notice to all interested obligees. Notice shall be by personal service, or in the manner provided by the civil rules of superior court or applicable statute.

(5))) If an obligor is subject to two or more attachments for maintenance on account of different obligees, the employer shall, if the nonexempt portion of the obligor's earnings is not sufficient to respond fully to all the attachments, apportion the obligor's nonexempt disposable earnings between or among the various obligees equally. An obligee may seek a court order reapportioning the obligor's nonexempt disposable earnings upon notice to all interested obligees. Notice shall be by personal service, or in the manner provided by the civil rules of superior court or applicable statute.

(5) An income withholding order for unpaid child support or unpaid child support and unpaid maintenance shall meet federal requirements in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. RCW 26.18.100 (Wage assignment order—Form) and 2016 c 202 s 24, 2008 c 6 s 1033, & 1998 c 77 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 9. RCW 26.18.110 and 2008 c 6 s 1034 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An employer upon whom service of a wage assignment order or income withholding order has been made shall answer the order by sworn affidavit within twenty days after the date of service. The answer shall state whether the obligor is employed by or receives earnings or other remuneration from the employer, whether the employer will honor the wage assignment order or income withholding order, and whether there are either multiple child support or maintenance attachments, or both, against the obligor.

(2) If the employer possesses any earnings or remuneration due and owing to the obligor, the earnings subject to the wage assignment order or income withholding order shall be withheld immediately upon receipt of the wage assignment order or income withholding order. The withheld earnings shall be delivered to the Washington state support registry or, if the wage assignment order is to satisfy a duty of maintenance, to the addressee specified in the assignment within five working days of each regular pay interval.

(3) The employer shall continue to withhold the ordered amounts from nonexempt earnings or remuneration of the obligor until notified by:

(a) The court that the wage assignment has been modified or terminated; or

(b) ((The))In the case of an income withholding order, the Washington state support registry ((or obligee)) that the accrued child support or maintenance debt has been paid((, provided the wage assignment order contains the language set forth under RCW 26.18.100(3)(b))). The employer shall promptly notify the addressee specified in the assignment when the employee is no longer employed. If the employer no longer employs the employee, the wage assignment order shall remain in effect for one year after the employee has left the employment or the employer has been in possession of any earnings or remuneration owed to the employee, whichever is later. The employer shall continue to hold the wage assignment order during that period. If the employee returns to the employer's employment during the one-year period the employer shall immediately begin to withhold the employee's earnings or remuneration according to the terms of the wage assignment order. If the employee has not returned within one year, the wage assignment shall cease to have effect at the expiration of the one-year period, unless the employer continues to owe remuneration for employment to the obligor.

(4) The employer may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of the employee's earnings after withholding under the wage assignment order or income withholding order, even if the remainder is exempt under RCW 26.18.090. The processing fee may not exceed (a) ten dollars for the first disbursement made by the employer to the Washington state support registry; and (b) one dollar for each subsequent disbursement to the clerk.

(5) An income withholding order ((for wage assignment)) for support for a dependent child entered under this chapter shall have priority over any other wage assignment or garnishment, except for another wage assignment or garnishment for child support, or order to withhold and deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW. An order for wage assignment for spousal maintenance entered under this chapter shall have priority over any other wage assignment or garnishment, except for a wage assignment, garnishment, or order to withhold and deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW for support of a dependent child, and except for another wage assignment or garnishment for maintenance.

(6) An employer who fails to withhold earnings as required by a wage assignment order or income withholding order issued under this chapter may be held liable to the obligee for one hundred percent of the support or maintenance debt, or the amount of support or maintenance moneys that should have been withheld from the employee's earnings whichever is the lesser amount, if the employer:

(a) Fails or refuses, after being served with a wage assignment order or income withholding order, to deduct and promptly remit from the unpaid earnings the amounts of money required in the order;

(b) Fails or refuses to submit an answer to the notice of wage assignment or income withholding after being served; or

(c) Is unwilling to comply with the other requirements of this section.

Liability may be established in superior court. Awards in superior court shall include costs, interest under RCW 19.52.020 and 4.56.110, and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(7) No employer who complies with a wage assignment order or income withholding order issued under this chapter may be liable to the employee for wrongful withholding.

(8) No employer may discharge, discipline, or refuse to hire an employee because of the entry or service of a wage assignment or income withholding order issued and executed under this chapter. If an employer discharges, disciplines, or refuses to hire an employee in violation of this section, the employee or person shall have a cause of action against the employer. The employer shall be liable for double the amount of damages suffered as a result of the violation and for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees, and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars for each violation. The employer may also be ordered to hire, rehire, or reinstate the aggrieved individual.

(9) For wage assignments or income withholding payable to the Washington state support registry, an employer may combine amounts withheld from various employees into a single payment to the Washington state support registry, if the payment includes a listing of the amounts attributable to each employee and other information as required by the registry.

(10) An employer shall deliver a copy of the wage assignment order or income withholding order to the obligor as soon as is reasonably possible.

Sec. 10. RCW 26.18.130 and 1987 c 435 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Service of the wage assignment order or income withholding order on the employer is invalid unless it is served with five answer forms in substantial conformance with RCW 26.18.120, together with stamped envelopes addressed to, respectively, the clerk of the court where the order was issued, the Washington state support registry, the obligee's attorney or the obligee, and the obligor. The obligee shall also include an extra copy of the wage assignment order or income withholding order for the employer to deliver to the obligor. Service on the employer shall be in person or by any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(2) On or before the date of service of the wage assignment order or income withholding order on the employer, the obligee shall mail or cause to be mailed by certified mail a copy of the wage assignment order or income withholding order to the obligor at the obligor's last known post office address; or, in the alternative, a copy of the wage assignment order or income withholding order shall be served on the obligor in the same manner as a summons in a civil action on, before, or within two days after the date of service of the order on the employer. This requirement is not jurisdictional, but if the copy is not mailed or served as this subsection provides, or if any irregularity appears with respect to the mailing or service, the superior court, in its discretion, may quash the wage assignment order or income withholding order, upon motion of the obligor promptly made and supported by an affidavit showing that the obligor has suffered substantial injury due to the failure to mail or serve the copy.

Sec. 11. RCW 26.18.140 and 2008 c 6 s 1036 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in a hearing to quash, modify, or terminate the wage assignment order or income withholding order, the court may grant relief only upon a showing that the wage assignment order or income withholding order causes extreme hardship or substantial injustice. Satisfaction by the obligor of all past due payments subsequent to the issuance of the wage assignment order or income withholding order is not grounds to quash, modify, or terminate the wage assignment order or income withholding order. If a wage assignment order or income withholding order has been in operation for twelve consecutive months and the obligor's support or maintenance obligation is current, the court may terminate the order upon motion of the obligor unless the obligee can show good cause as to why the wage assignment order or income withholding order should remain in effect.

(2) The court may enter an order delaying, modifying, or terminating the wage assignment order or income withholding order and order the obligor to make payments directly to the obligee as provided in RCW 26.23.050(2).

Sec. 12. RCW 26.23.010 and 1987 c 435 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature recognizes the financial impact on custodial parents and children when child support is not received on time, or in the correct amount. The legislature also recognizes the burden placed upon the responsible parent and the second family when enforcement action must be taken to collect delinquent support.

It is the intent of the legislature to create a central Washington state support registry to improve the recordkeeping of support obligations and payments, thereby providing protection for both parties, and reducing the burden on employers by creating a single standardized process through which support payments are deducted from earnings.

It is also the intent of the legislature that child support payments be made through ((mandatory wage assignment or payroll deduction))income withholding if the responsible parent becomes delinquent in making support payments under a court or administrative order for support.

To that end, it is the intent of the legislature to interpret all existing statutes and processes to give effect to, and to implement, one central registry for recording and distributing support payments in this state.

Sec. 13. RCW 26.23.050 and 2019 c 46 s 5026 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the division of child support is providing support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for support enforcement services by signing the application form on the bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:

(a) A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;

(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) A statement that the receiving parent might be required to submit an accounting of how the support, including any cash medical support, is being spent to benefit the child;

(d) A statement that any parent required to provide health care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other parent when the coverage terminates; and

(e) A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.

(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the responsible parent to make payments directly to the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.

(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:

(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(ii) A statement that the receiving parent may be required to submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the child;

(iii) A statement that any parent required to provide health care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other parent when the coverage terminates; and

(iv) A statement that a parent seeking to enforce the obligation to provide health care coverage may:

(A) File a motion in the underlying superior court action; or

(B) If there is not already an underlying superior court action, initiate an action in the superior court.

As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income withholding as follows:

(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible parent has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.

(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.

(c) If a mandatory ((wage))income withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under this subsection and the division of child support provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding ((notice))order.

(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of social and health services shall require that all support obligations established as administrative orders include a provision which orders and directs that the responsible parent shall make all support payments to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall also state that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the order, unless:

(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.

(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or that a parent's licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5) Every support order shall state:

(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;

(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;

(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;

(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;

(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;

(g) A provision requiring both the responsible parent and the custodial parent to keep the Washington state support registry informed of whether he or she has access to health care coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the health care coverage information;

(h) That either or both the responsible parent and the custodial parent shall be obligated to provide medical support for his or her child through health care coverage if:

(i) The obligated parent provides accessible coverage for the child through private or public health care coverage; or

(ii) Coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent through employment or is union-related; or

(iii) In the absence of such coverage, through an additional sum certain amount, as that parent's monthly payment toward the premium as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(i) That a parent providing health care coverage must notify both the division of child support and the other parent when coverage terminates;

(j) That if proof of health care coverage or proof that the coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the parent seeking enforcement or the department may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through the employer or union of the parent required to provide medical support without further notice to the parent as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;

(k) The reasons for not ordering health care coverage if the order fails to require such coverage;

(l) That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;

(m) That each parent must:

(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the information required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(n) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to the state case registry and update as necessary their residential addresses and the address of the responsible parent's employer. The division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children, social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an administrative support order. The division of child support shall not release this information if the division of child support determines that there is reason to believe that release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one party from the other party.

(6) After the responsible parent has been ordered or notified to make payments to the Washington state support registry under this section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against a support obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.

(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21A, 26.23, 26.26A, 26.26B, and 26.27 RCW shall complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of dissolution, or parentage orders for filing in such actions unless accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or parentage order, and may provide copies of the confidential information form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans, orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that administers Title IV-A, IV-D, IV-E, or XIX of the federal social security act. In state initiated parentage actions, the parties adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

(8) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 14. RCW 26.23.050 and 2020 c 227 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the division of child support is providing support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for support enforcement services by signing the application form on the bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:

(a) A provision that orders and directs the person required to pay support to make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;

(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) A statement that the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support might be required to submit an accounting of how the support, including any cash medical support, is being spent to benefit the child;

(d) A statement that a party to the support order who is required to provide health care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other party to the support order when the coverage terminates;

(e) A statement that any privilege of the person required to pay support to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the person is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320; and

(f) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated as provided in RCW 26.09.320 if the person required to pay support is confined in a jail, prison, or correctional facility for at least six months, or is serving a sentence greater than six months in a jail, prison, or correctional facility.

As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.

(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the person required to pay support to make payments directly to the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.

(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:

(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(ii) A statement that the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support may be required to submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the child;

(iii) A statement that any party to the order required to provide health care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other party to the order when the coverage terminates; and

(iv) A statement that a party to the order seeking to enforce the other party's obligation to provide health care coverage may:

(A) File a motion in the underlying superior court action; or

(B) If there is not already an underlying superior court action, initiate an action in the superior court.

As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income withholding as follows:

(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the person required to pay support has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The payee under the order or the person entitled to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.

(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support, after a payment is past due.

(c) If a mandatory ((wage))income withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under this subsection and the division of child support provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding ((notice))order.

(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of social and health services shall require that all support obligations established as administrative orders include a provision which orders and directs that the person required to pay support shall make all support payments to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders shall also state that any privilege of the person required to pay support to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the person is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall also state that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of the order, unless:

(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.

(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or that licensing privileges of the person required to pay support may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the division of child support may serve a notice on the person stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5) Every support order shall state:

(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;

(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;

(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;

(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;

(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;

(g) A provision requiring both the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order, to keep the Washington state support registry informed of whether he or she has access to health care coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the health care coverage information;

(h) That either or both the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order, shall be obligated to provide medical support for a child or children covered by the order through health care coverage if:

(i) The person obligated to provide medical support provides accessible coverage for the child or children through private or public health care coverage; or

(ii) Coverage that can be extended to cover the child or children is or becomes available to the person obligated to provide medical support through employment or is union-related; or

(iii) In the absence of such coverage, through an additional sum certain amount, as that obligated person's monthly payment toward the premium as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(i) That a person obligated to provide medical support who is providing health care coverage must notify both the division of child support and the other party to the order when coverage terminates;

(j) That if proof of health care coverage or proof that the coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the person seeking enforcement or the department may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through the employer or union of the person required to provide medical support without further notice to the person as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;

(k) The reasons for not ordering health care coverage if the order fails to require such coverage;

(l) That any privilege of the person required to pay support to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the person is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;

(m) That each party to the support order must:

(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the information required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(n) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to the state case registry and update as necessary their residential addresses and the address of the employer of the person required to pay support. The division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children, social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an administrative support order. The division of child support shall not release this information if the division of child support determines that there is reason to believe that release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one party from the other party.

(6) After the person required to pay support has been ordered or notified to make payments to the Washington state support registry under this section, that person shall be fully responsible for making all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The person required to pay support shall not be entitled to credit against a support obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the person required to pay support to recover payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.

(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21A, 26.23, 26.26A, 26.26B, and 26.27 RCW shall complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of dissolution, or parentage orders for filing in such actions unless accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or parentage order, and may provide copies of the confidential information form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans, orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that administers Title IV-A, IV-D, IV-E, or XIX of the federal social security act. In state initiated parentage actions, the parties adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

(8) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 15. RCW 26.23.060 and 2020 c 125 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The division of child support may issue ((a notice of payroll deduction))an income withholding order:

(a) As authorized by a support order that contains a notice clearly stating that child support may be collected by withholding from earnings, wages, or benefits without further notice to the obligated parent; or

(b) After service of a notice containing an income-withholding provision under this chapter or chapter 74.20A RCW.

(2) The division of child support shall serve ((a notice of payroll deduction))an income withholding order upon a responsible parent's employer or upon the employment security department for the state in possession of or owing any benefits from the unemployment compensation fund to the responsible parent pursuant to Title 50 RCW or from the paid family and medical leave program under Title 50A RCW:

(a) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(b) By certified mail, return receipt requested;

(c) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service by electronic means; or

(d) By regular mail to a responsible parent's employer unless the division of child support reasonably believes that service of process in the manner prescribed in (a) or (b) of this subsection is required for initiating an action to ensure employer compliance with the withholding requirement.

(3) Service of ((a notice of payroll deduction))an income withholding order upon an employer or employment security department requires the employer or employment security department to immediately make a mandatory payroll deduction from the responsible parent's unpaid disposable earnings or benefits paid by the employment security department. The employer or employment security department shall thereafter deduct each pay period the amount stated in the ((notice))order divided by the number of pay periods per month. The payroll deduction each pay period shall not exceed fifty percent of the responsible parent's disposable earnings.

(4) ((A notice of payroll deduction))An income withholding order for support shall have priority over any wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal process.

(5) The ((notice of payroll deduction))income withholding order shall be in writing and include:

(a) The name and social security number of the responsible parent;

(b) The amount to be deducted from the responsible parent's disposable earnings each month, or alternate amounts and frequencies as may be necessary to facilitate processing of the payroll deduction;

(c) A statement that the total amount withheld shall not exceed fifty percent of the responsible parent's disposable earnings;

(d) The address to which the payments are to be mailed or delivered; and

(e) A notice to the responsible parent warning the responsible parent that, despite the payroll deduction, the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as defined in RCW 74.20A.320.

(6) An informational copy of the ((notice of payroll deduction))income withholding order shall be mailed to the last known address of the responsible parent by regular mail.

(7) An employer or employment security department that receives ((a notice of payroll deduction))an income withholding order shall make immediate deductions from the responsible parent's unpaid disposable earnings and remit proper amounts to the Washington state support registry within seven working days of the date the earnings are payable to the responsible parent.

(8) An employer, or the employment security department, upon whom ((a notice of payroll deduction))an income withholding order is served, shall make an answer to the division of child support within twenty days after the date of service. The answer shall confirm compliance and institution of the payroll deduction or explain the circumstances if no payroll deduction is in effect. The answer shall also state whether the responsible parent is employed by or receives earnings from the employer or receives benefit payments from the employment security department, whether the employer or employment security department anticipates paying earnings or benefits and the amount of earnings or benefit payments. If the responsible parent is no longer employed, or receiving earnings from the employer, the answer shall state the present employer's name and address, if known. If the responsible parent is no longer receiving benefit payments from the employment security department, the answer shall state the present employer's name and address, if known.

The returned answer or a payment remitted to the division of child support by the employer constitutes proof of service of the ((notice of payroll deduction))income withholding order in the case where the ((notice))order was served by regular mail.

(9) The employer may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of the responsible parent's earnings after withholding under the ((notice of payroll deduction))income withholding order, even if the remainder is exempt under RCW 26.18.090. The processing fee may not exceed: (a) Ten dollars for the first disbursement made to the Washington state support registry; and (b) one dollar for each subsequent disbursement to the registry.

(10) The ((notice of payroll deduction))income withholding order shall remain in effect until released by the division of child support, the court enters an order terminating the ((notice))income withholding order and approving an alternate arrangement under RCW 26.23.050, or until the employer no longer employs the responsible parent and is no longer in possession of or owing any earnings to the responsible parent. The employer shall promptly notify the office of support enforcement when the employer no longer employs the parent subject to the ((notice))income withholding order. For the employment security department, the ((notice of payroll deduction))income withholding order shall remain in effect until released by the division of child support or until the court enters an order terminating the ((notice))income withholding order.

(11) The division of child support ((may))must use ((uniform interstate))income withholding forms adopted and required by the United States department of health and human services to take withholding actions under this section whether the responsible parent is receiving earnings or unemployment compensation in this state or in another state.

Sec. 16. RCW 26.23.090 and 1997 c 296 s 13 and 1997 c 58 s 894 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The employer shall be liable to the Washington state support registry, or to the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another state, under Title IV-D of the federal social security act and issuing a notice, garnishment, or wage assignment attaching wages or earnings in satisfaction of a support obligation, for the amount of support moneys which should have been withheld from the employee's earnings, if the employer:

(a) Fails or refuses, after being served with ((a notice of payroll deduction, or substantially similar action issued by the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another state,))an income withholding order under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, to deduct and promptly remit from unpaid earnings the amounts of money required in the ((notice))order;

(b) Fails or refuses to submit an answer to the ((notice of payroll deduction, or substantially similar action issued by the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another state,))income withholding order under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, after being served; or

(c) Is unwilling to comply with the other requirements of RCW 26.23.060.

(2) Liability may be established in superior court or may be established pursuant to RCW 74.20A.350. Awards in superior court and in actions pursuant to RCW 74.20A.350 shall include costs, interest under RCW 19.52.020 and 4.56.110, and reasonable attorneys' fees and staff costs as a part of the award. Debts established pursuant to this section may be collected by the division of child support using any of the remedies available under chapter 26.09, 26.18, 26.21, 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW for the collection of child support.

Sec. 17. RCW 74.20A.080 and 2002 c 199 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary may issue to any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States, an order to withhold and deliver property of any kind, including but not restricted to earnings which are or might become due, owing, or belonging to the debtor, when the secretary has reason to believe that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States property which is or might become due, owing, or belonging to said debtor. Such order to withhold and deliver may be issued:

(a) At any time, if a responsible parent's support order:

(i) Contains notice that withholding action may be taken against earnings, wages, or assets without further notice to the parent; or

(ii) Includes a statement that other income-withholding action under this chapter may be taken without further notice to the responsible parent;

(b) Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support debt under RCW 74.20A.040;

(c) Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of parental responsibility under RCW 74.20A.056;

(d) Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support owed under RCW 26.23.110;

(e) Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of financial responsibility under RCW 74.20A.055; or

(f) When appropriate under RCW 74.20A.270.

(2) The order to withhold and deliver shall:

(a) State the amount to be withheld on a periodic basis if the order to withhold and deliver is being served to secure payment of monthly current support;

(b) State the amount of the support debt accrued;

(c) State in summary the terms of RCW 74.20A.090 and 74.20A.100;

(d) Be served:

(i) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(ii) By certified mail, return receipt requested;

(iii) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service by electronic means;

(iv) By regular mail to a responsible parent's employer unless the division of child support reasonably believes that service of process in the manner prescribed in (d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection is required for initiating an action to ensure employer compliance with the withholding requirement; or

(v) By regular mail to an address if designated by the financial institution as a central levy or garnishment address, and if the notice is clearly identified as a levy or garnishment order. Before the division of child support may initiate an action for noncompliance with a withholding action against a financial institution, the division of child support must serve the order to withhold and deliver on the financial institution in the manner described in (d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(3) The division of child support ((may))must use ((uniform interstate))income withholding forms adopted and required by the United States department of health and human services to take withholding actions under this section ((when the responsible parent is owed money or property that is located in this state or in another state)).

(4) Any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States upon whom service has been made is hereby required to:

(a) Answer said order to withhold and deliver within twenty days, exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of therein; and

(b) Provide further and additional answers when requested by the secretary.

(5) The returned answer or a payment remitted to the division of child support by the employer constitutes proof of service of the order to withhold and deliver in the case where the order was served by regular mail.

(6) Any such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States in possession of any property which may be subject to the claim of the department shall:

(a)(i) Immediately withhold such property upon receipt of the order to withhold and deliver; and

(ii) Within seven working days deliver the property to the secretary;

(iii) Continue to withhold earnings payable to the debtor at each succeeding disbursement interval as provided for in RCW 74.20A.090, and deliver amounts withheld from earnings to the secretary within seven working days of the date earnings are payable to the debtor;

(iv) Deliver amounts withheld from periodic payments to the secretary within seven working days of the date the payments are payable to the debtor;

(v) Inform the secretary of the date the amounts were withheld as requested under this section; or

(b) Furnish to the secretary a good and sufficient bond, satisfactory to the secretary, conditioned upon final determination of liability.

(7) An order to withhold and deliver served under this section shall not expire until:

(a) Released in writing by the division of child support;

(b) Terminated by court order;

(c) A person or entity, other than an employer as defined in Title 50 RCW, who has received the order to withhold and deliver does not possess property of or owe money to the debtor; or

(d) An employer who has received the order to withhold and deliver no longer employs, contracts, or owes money to the debtor under a contract of employment, express or implied.

(8) Where money is due and owing under any contract of employment, express or implied, or is held by any person, firm, corporation, or association, political subdivision, or department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States subject to withdrawal by the debtor, such money shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the secretary.

(9) Delivery to the secretary of the money or other property held or claimed shall satisfy the requirement and serve as full acquittance of the order to withhold and deliver.

(10) A person, firm, corporation, or association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States that complies with the order to withhold and deliver under this chapter is not civilly liable to the debtor for complying with the order to withhold and deliver under this chapter.

(11) The secretary may hold the money or property delivered under this section in trust for application on the indebtedness involved or for return, without interest, in accordance with final determination of liability or nonliability.

(12) Exemptions contained in RCW 74.20A.090 apply to orders to withhold and deliver issued under this section.

(13) The secretary shall also, on or before the date of service of the order to withhold and deliver, mail or cause to be mailed a copy of the order to withhold and deliver to the debtor at the debtor's last known post office address, or, in the alternative, a copy of the order to withhold and deliver shall be served on the debtor in the same manner as a summons in a civil action on or before the date of service of the order or within two days thereafter. The copy of the order shall be mailed or served together with a concise explanation of the right to petition for judicial review. This requirement is not jurisdictional, but, if the copy is not mailed or served as in this section provided, or if any irregularity appears with respect to the mailing or service, the superior court, in its discretion on motion of the debtor promptly made and supported by affidavit showing that the debtor has suffered substantial injury due to the failure to mail the copy, may set aside the order to withhold and deliver and award to the debtor an amount equal to the damages resulting from the secretary's failure to serve on or mail to the debtor the copy.

(14) An order to withhold and deliver issued in accordance with this section has priority over any other wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal process.

(15) The division of child support shall notify any person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States required to withhold and deliver the earnings of a debtor under this action that they may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of the debtor's earnings, even if the remainder would otherwise be exempt under RCW 74.20A.090. The processing fee shall not exceed ten dollars for the first disbursement to the department and one dollar for each subsequent disbursement under the order to withhold and deliver.

Sec. 18. RCW 74.20A.240 and 1997 c 296 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States employing a person owing a support debt or obligation, shall honor, according to its terms, a duly executed assignment of earnings presented by the secretary as a plan to satisfy or retire a support debt or obligation. This requirement to honor the assignment of earnings and the assignment of earnings itself shall be applicable whether said earnings are to be paid presently or in the future and shall continue in force and effect until released in writing by the secretary. Payment of moneys pursuant to an assignment of earnings presented by the secretary shall serve as full acquittance under any contract of employment. A person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States that complies with the assignment of earnings under this chapter is not civilly liable to the debtor for complying with the assignment of earnings under this chapter. The secretary shall be released from liability for improper receipt of moneys under an assignment of earnings upon return of any moneys so received.

(2) An assignment of earnings presented by the secretary in accordance with this section must include income withholding forms adopted and required by the United States department of health and human services.

(3) An assignment of earnings presented by the secretary in accordance with this section has priority over any other wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal process except for another wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal process for support moneys.

(4) The employer may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of the debtor's earnings, even if the remainder would be exempt under RCW 74.20A.090. The processing fee shall not exceed fifteen dollars from the first disbursement to the department and one dollar for each subsequent disbursement under the assignment of earnings.

Sec. 19. RCW 74.20A.350 and 2018 c 150 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The division of child support may issue a notice of noncompliance to any person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government that the division believes is not complying with:

(a) ((A notice of payroll deduction))An income withholding order issued under chapter 26.23 RCW;

(b) A lien, order to withhold and deliver, or assignment of earnings issued under this chapter;

(c) Any other wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or withholding instrument properly served by the agency or firm providing child support enforcement services for another state, under Title IV-D of the federal social security act;

(d) A subpoena issued by the division of child support, or the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another state, under Title IV-D of the federal social security act;

(e) An information request issued by the division of child support, or the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, to an employer or entity required to respond to such requests under RCW 74.20A.360;

(f) The duty to report newly hired employees imposed by RCW 26.23.040; or

(g) The duty of a business, employer, or payroll processor that has received an income withholding order from the department of social and health services requiring payment to the Washington state support registry to remit withheld funds by electronic means imposed by RCW 26.23.065.

(2) Liability for noncompliance with a wage withholding, garnishment, order to withhold and deliver, or any other lien or attachment issued to secure payment of child support is governed by RCW 26.23.090 and 74.20A.100, except that liability for noncompliance with remittance time frames is governed by subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Fines for noncompliance by a business, employer, or payroll processor with the duty to remit withheld funds by electronic means imposed by RCW 26.23.065 are governed by subsection (4)(c) of this section.

(4) The division of child support may impose fines of up to one hundred dollars per occurrence for:

(a) Noncompliance with a subpoena or an information request issued by the division of child support, or the agency or firm providing child support enforcement services for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act;

(b) Noncompliance with the required time frames for remitting withheld support moneys to the Washington state support registry, or the agency or firm providing child support enforcement services for another state, except that no liability shall be established for failure to make timely remittance unless the division of child support has provided the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government with written warning:

(i) Explaining the duty to remit withheld payments promptly;

(ii) Explaining the potential for fines for delayed submission; and

(iii) Providing a contact person within the division of child support with whom the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government may seek assistance with child support withholding issues;

(c) A business, employer, or payroll processor's noncompliance with the duty to remit withheld funds by electronic means imposed by RCW 26.23.065. The division of child support may not impose fines for failure to comply with this requirement unless it has provided the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government with written warning:

(i) Explaining the duty to remit withheld payments by electronic means;

(ii) Explaining the potential for fines for failure to remit withheld payments by electronic means when required under RCW 26.23.065; and

(iii) Providing a contact person within the division of child support with whom the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government may seek assistance with child support withholding issues.

(5) The division of child support may assess fines according to RCW 26.23.040 for failure to comply with employer reporting requirements.

(6) The division of child support may suspend licenses for failure to comply with a subpoena issued under RCW 74.20.225.

(7) The division of child support may serve a notice of noncompliance by personal service or by any method of mailing requiring a return receipt.

(8) The liability asserted by the division of child support in the notice of noncompliance becomes final and collectible on the twenty-first day after the date of service, unless within that time the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government:

(a) Initiates an action in superior court to contest the notice of noncompliance;

(b) Requests a hearing by delivering a hearing request to the division of child support in accordance with rules adopted by the secretary under this section; or

(c) Contacts the division of child support and negotiates an alternate resolution to the asserted noncompliance or demonstrates that the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government has complied with the child support processes.

(9) The notice of noncompliance shall contain:

(a) A full and fair disclosure of the rights and obligations created by this section; and

(b) Identification of the:

(i) Child support process with respect to which the division of child support is alleging noncompliance; and

(ii) State child support enforcement agency issuing the original child support process.

(10) In an administrative hearing convened under subsection (8)(b) of this section, the presiding officer shall determine whether or not, and to what extent, liability for noncompliance exists under this section, and shall enter an order containing these findings. If liability does exist, the presiding officer shall include language in the order advising the parties to the proceeding that the liability may be collected by any means available to the division of child support under subsection (13) of this section without further notice to the liable party.

(11) Hearings under this section are governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(12) After the twenty days following service of the notice, the person, firm, entity, or agency of state or federal government may petition for a late hearing. A petition for a late hearing does not stay any collection action to recover the debt. A late hearing is available upon a showing of any of the grounds stated in civil rule 60 for the vacation of orders.

(13) The division of child support may collect any obligation established under this section using any of the remedies available under chapter 26.09, 26.18, 26.21A, 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW for the collection of child support.

(14) The division of child support may enter agreements for the repayment of obligations under this section. Agreements may:

(a) Suspend the obligation imposed by this section conditioned on future compliance with child support processes. Such suspension shall end automatically upon any failure to comply with a child support process. Amounts suspended become fully collectible without further notice automatically upon failure to comply with a child support process;

(b) Resolve amounts due under this section and provide for repayment.

(15) The secretary may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. Section 13 of this act expires February 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. Section 14 of this act takes effect February 1, 2021.

--- END ---