BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.450 and 2011 c 339 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game. A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse, unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a specific big game combination license package. Each big game license includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package. A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for annual big game combination packages are as follows:

(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for this license is eighty-five dollars for residents, seven hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents, $17 for seniors, and forty dollars for youth.

(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is seventy-five dollars for residents, six hundred seventy dollars for nonresidents, $15 for seniors, and thirty-five dollars for youth.

(c) Big game number 3: Deer. The fee for this license is thirty-nine dollars for residents, three hundred ninety-three dollars for nonresidents, $7.80 for seniors, and eighteen dollars for youth.

(d) Big game number 4: Elk. The fee for this license is forty-four dollars for residents, four hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, $8.80 for seniors, and eighteen dollars for youth.

(e) Big game number 5: Bear. The fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, $4 for seniors, and ten dollars for youth.

(f) Big game number 6: Cougar. The fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, $4 for seniors, and ten dollars for youth.

(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:

(a) Elk: The fee is sixty dollars for residents, three hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, $12 for seniors, and twenty dollars for youth.

(b) Deer: The fee is sixty dollars for residents, two hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, $12 for seniors, and twenty dollars for youth.

(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit hunt for goat, sheep, moose, or other big game species not specified the permit fees are three hundred dollars for residents, one thousand five hundred dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

(4) Multiple season big game permit: The commission may, by rule, offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one general season. Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under a multiple season big game permit. The fee is one hundred sixty-five dollars.

(5) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection (3) of this section is by special permit issued under RCW 77.32.370.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.460 and 2020 c 148 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.

(a) The fee for this license is thirty-five dollars for residents, one hundred sixty-five dollars for nonresidents, $7 for seniors, and fifteen dollars for youth.

(b) The fee for this license if purchased at the same time as a big game combination license package is twenty dollars for residents, eighty-eight dollars for nonresidents, $4 for seniors, and eight dollars for youth.

(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is sixty dollars for nonresidents.

(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required to hunt for turkey.

(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is fourteen dollars for residents and forty dollars for nonresidents. A primary turkey tag will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a youth small game license at no charge.

(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is fourteen dollars for residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(c) One-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management within the limited fish and wildlife account. An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated solely for upland game bird management within the limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1). The remainder of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3). Moneys received from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect April 1, 2022.

--- END ---