BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:

(1) The department of children, youth, and families seeks to expand trauma-informed, culturally relevant, racial equity-based, and developmentally appropriate therapeutic placement supports in less restrictive community settings. Under current law, these supports are limited to placement in community facilities—which are only available for about 25 percent of juvenile rehabilitation's population—and electronic home monitoring for persons serving adult sentences in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families' juvenile rehabilitation who have an earned release date between the ages of 25 and 26.

(2) To help reduce the bottleneck of youth and young adults placed in the department's juvenile rehabilitation institutions and enhance community-based, less restrictive options, this act creates a community transition services program, which utilizes electronic home monitoring as a tool embedded in a progressively supportive community-based approach with therapeutic supports for young people reentering the community. This approach considers developmentally appropriate programs for successful reentry by increasing access to community transition services, including housing assistance, behavioral health treatment, independent living, employment, education, and family and community connections.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.01.412 and 2019 c 322 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families under RCW 72.01.410 ((who has an earned release date that is after the person's twenty-fifth birthday but on or before the person's twenty-sixth birthday may, after turning twenty-five, serve the remainder of the person's term of confinement in partial confinement on electronic home monitoring))is eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department of children, youth, and families((, provided that)):

(a) After 60 percent of their minimum term of confinement has been served, and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement served including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order;

(b) If the person has an earned release date that is before their 26th birthday; and

(c) Provided the department of children, youth, and families determines that such placement and retention by the department of children, youth, and families is in the best interests of the person and the community. The department's determination described under this subsection must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations.

(2) The department of children, youth, and families retains the authority to transfer the person to the custody of the department of corrections under RCW 72.01.410.

(((2)))(3) A person placed ((on electronic home monitoring))in community transition services under this section must ((otherwise continue to be subject to similar treatment, options, access to programs and resources, conditions, and restrictions applicable to other similarly situated persons under the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families))have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department of children, youth, and families, including but not limited to:

(a) Behavioral health treatment;

(b) Independent living;

(c) Employment;

(d) Education;

(e) Connections to family and natural supports; and

(f) Community connections.

(4) If the person has a sentence that includes a term of community custody, this term of community custody must begin after the current term of confinement has ended.

(((3)))(5) If a person placed on ((electronic home monitoring))community transition services under this section commits a violation requiring the return of the person to total confinement after the person's 25th birthday, the person must be transferred to the custody and supervision of the department of corrections for the remainder of the sentence.

(6) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:

(a) Persons with pending charges or warrants;

(b) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;

(c) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;

(d) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(e) Level III sex offenders; and

(f) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.

(7) As used in this section, "community transition services" means a therapeutic and supportive community-based custody option in which:

(a) A person serves a portion of his or her term of confinement residing in the community, outside of the department of children, youth, and families institutions and community facilities;

(b) The department of children, youth, and families supervises the person in part through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored person's presence or absence at a particular location;

(c) The department of children, youth, and families provides access to developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, racial equity-based, and culturally relevant programs to promote successful reentry; and

(d) The department of children, youth, and families prioritizes the delivery of available programming from individuals who share characteristics with the individual being served related to: Race; ethnicity; sexual identity; and gender identity.

Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.020 and 2019 c 444 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Assessment" means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child's psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders, and recommendations for treatment. "Assessment" includes, but is not limited to, drug and alcohol evaluations, psychological and psychiatric evaluations, records review, clinical interview, and administration of a formal test or instrument;

(2) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other services including, when appropriate, restorative justice programs; or attendance at school or other educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to available funds;

(3) "Community-based sanctions" may include one or more of the following:

(a) A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;

(b) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of community restitution;

(4) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews;

(5) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of the following:

(a) Community-based sanctions;

(b) Community-based rehabilitation;

(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;

(d) Posting of a probation bond;

(e) Residential treatment, where substance abuse, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorders have been identified in an assessment by a qualified mental health professional, psychologist, psychiatrist, co-occurring disorder specialist, or substance use disorder professional and a funded bed is available. If a child agrees to voluntary placement in a state-funded long-term evaluation and treatment facility, the case must follow the existing placement procedure including consideration of less restrictive treatment options and medical necessity.

(i) A court may order residential treatment after consideration and findings regarding whether:

(A) The referral is necessary to rehabilitate the child;

(B) The referral is necessary to protect the public or the child;

(C) The referral is in the child's best interest;

(D) The child has been given the opportunity to engage in less restrictive treatment and has been unable or unwilling to comply; and

(E) Inpatient treatment is the least restrictive action consistent with the child's needs and circumstances.

(ii) In any case where a court orders a child to inpatient treatment under this section, the court must hold a review hearing no later than sixty days after the youth begins inpatient treatment, and every thirty days thereafter, as long as the youth is in inpatient treatment;

(6) "Community transition services" means a therapeutic and supportive community-based custody option in which:

(a) A person serves a portion of their term of confinement residing in the community, outside of department institutions and community facilities;

(b) The department supervises the person in part through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored person's presence or absence at a particular location; and

(c) The department provides access to developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, racial equity-based, and culturally relevant programs to promote successful reentry;

(7) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department of children, youth, and families in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department. Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(((7)))(8) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);

(((8)))(9) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a) The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter; or

(b) The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(((9)))(10) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families;

(((10)))(11) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(((11)))(12) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community accountability board, youth court under the supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local community;

(((12)))(13) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other legally authorized care;

(((13)))(14) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(((14)))(15) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further offenses;

(((15)))(16) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110, unless the individual was convicted of a lesser charge or acquitted of the charge for which he or she was previously transferred pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(((16)))(17) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(((17)))(18) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;

(((18)))(19) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; (c) 0-150 hours of community restitution; or (d) $0-$500 fine;

(((19)))(20) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(((20)))(21) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not include confinement;

(((21)))(22) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;

(((22)))(23) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control a juvenile offender or limit a juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:

(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;

(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or

(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another;

(((23)))(24) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic;

(((24)))(25) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by the court;

(((25)))(26) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have committed an offense;

(((26)))(27) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the victim or offender;

(((27)))(28) "Restorative justice" means practices, policies, and programs informed by and sensitive to the needs of crime victims that are designed to encourage offenders to accept responsibility for repairing the harm caused by their offense by providing safe and supportive opportunities for voluntary participation and communication between the victim, the offender, their families, and relevant community members;

(((28)))(29) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:

(a) Physical restraint; or

(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons;

(((29)))(30) "Risk assessment tool" means the statistically valid tool used by the department to inform release or placement decisions related to security level, release within the sentencing range, community facility eligibility, community transition services eligibility, and parole. The "risk assessment tool" is used by the department to predict the likelihood of successful reentry and future criminal behavior;

(31) "Screening" means a process that is designed to identify a child who is at risk of having mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention, or more comprehensive assessment. A screening may be undertaken with or without the administration of a formal instrument;

(((30)))(32) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department;

(((31)))(33) "Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(((32)))(34) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;

(((33)))(35) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification;

(((34)))(36) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction of the case;

(((35)))(37) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant youth from the institution or detention facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution or detention facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated youth from the institution or detention facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location;

(((36)))(38) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which do not include incarceration;

(((37)))(39) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(((38)))(40) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the supervision of the juvenile court.

Sec. 4. RCW 13.40.205 and 2019 c 468 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if consistent with public safety and if:

(a) Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and

(b) The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:

(i) To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;

(ii) To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community; or

(iii) To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.

(3) No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all preminimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.

(4) Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the juvenile.

(5) Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on leave.

(6) Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.

(7) The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.

(8) If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give notice of any leave or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section to the victim or the victim's immediate family.

(9) A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may be taken into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical circumstances.

(10) Community transition services is an electronic monitoring program as that term is used in RCW 9A.76.130.

(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status or in community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may participate in work, educational, community restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence. This authorization may be increased to more than twelve hours a day up to sixteen hours a day if approved by the secretary and operated within the department's appropriations.

(((11)))(12) Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW 13.40.215.

(13)(a) The department may require a person in its custody to serve the remainder of the person's sentence in community transition services if the department determines that such placement is in the best interest of the person and the community using the risk assessment tool and considering the availability of appropriate placements, treatment, and programming. The department's determination described under this subsection must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations. The department shall establish appropriate conditions the person must comply with to remain in community transition services. A person must have served 60 percent of their minimum term of confinement and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order before becoming eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department.

(b) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department, including but not limited to:

(i) Behavioral health treatment;

(ii) Independent living;

(iii) Employment;

(iv) Education;

(v) Connections to family and natural supports; and

(vi) Community connections.

(c) Community transition services under this section is in lieu of confinement in an institution or community facility operated by the department, and will not fulfill any period of parole required under RCW 13.40.210.

(d) If a person placed in community transition services under this section violates a condition of participation in the community transition services program, or if the department determines that placement in the program is no longer in the best interests of the person or community, the person may be returned to an institution operated by the department at the department's discretion.

(e) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:

(i) Persons with pending charges or warrants;

(ii) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;

(iii) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;

(iv) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(v) Level III sex offenders; and

(vi) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.

(14) The department shall design, or contract for the design, and implement a risk assessment tool. The tool must be designed to limit bias related to race, ethnicity, gender, and age. The risk assessment tool must be certified at least every three years based on current academic standards for assessment validation, and can be certified by the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability or an outside researcher.

Sec. 5. RCW 13.40.215 and 2020 c 167 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility or community transition services program, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:

(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside; and

(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside.

(b)(i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility or community transition services program, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of an individual who is found to have committed a violent offense or a sex offense, is twenty-one years of age or younger, and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent, to the designated recipient of the school where the juvenile either: (A) Was enrolled prior to incarceration or detention; or (B) has expressed an intention to enroll following his or her release. This notice must also include the restrictions described in subsection (5) of this section.

(ii) The community residential facility shall provide written notice of the offender's criminal history to the designated recipient of any school that the offender attends while residing at the community residential facility and to any employer that employs the offender while residing at the community residential facility.

(iii) As used in this subsection, "designated recipient" means: (A) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (B) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (C) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(c) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific juvenile:

(i) The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;

(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings involving the offense; and

(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.

Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.

(d) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply to emergency medical furloughs.

(e) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.

(2)(a) If a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.

(b) The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the offense was a homicide.

In case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3), (4), and (5).

(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.

(4) The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.

(5) Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or other authorized leave or release, a convicted juvenile sex offender shall not attend a public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school that is attended by a victim or a sibling of a victim of the sex offender. The parents or legal guardians of the convicted juvenile sex offender shall be responsible for transportation or other costs associated with or required by the sex offender's change in school that otherwise would be paid by a school district.

(6) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(c) "Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;

(d) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children.

Sec. 6. RCW 13.40.220 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 610 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever legal custody of a child is vested in someone other than his or her parents, under this chapter, and not vested in the department, after due notice to the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child, and after a hearing, the court may order and decree that the parent or other legally obligated person shall pay in such a manner as the court may direct a reasonable sum representing in whole or in part the costs of support, treatment, and confinement of the child after the decree is entered.

(2) If the parent or other legally obligated person willfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the court may proceed against such person for contempt.

(3) Whenever legal custody of a child is vested in the department under this chapter, the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child shall be liable for the costs of support, treatment, and confinement of the child, in accordance with the department's reimbursement of cost schedule. The department shall adopt a reimbursement of cost schedule based on the costs of providing such services, and shall determine an obligation based on the responsible parents' or other legally obligated person's ability to pay. The department is authorized to adopt additional rules as appropriate to enforce this section.

(4) To enforce subsection (3) of this section, the department shall serve on the parents or other person legally obligated to care for and support the child a notice and finding of financial responsibility requiring the parents or other legally obligated person to appear and show cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of responsibility and/or the amount thereof is incorrect and should not be ordered. This notice and finding shall relate to the costs of support, treatment, and confinement of the child in accordance with the department's reimbursement of cost schedule adopted under this section, including periodic payments to be made in the future. The hearing shall be held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, and the rules of the department.

(5) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be served in the same manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or may be served on the parent or legally obligated person by certified mail, return receipt requested. The receipt shall be prima facie evidence of service.

(6) If the parents or other legally obligated person objects to the notice and finding of financial responsibility, then an application for an adjudicative hearing may be filed within twenty days of the date of service of the notice. If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and responsibility, if any, of the parents or other legally obligated person and shall also determine the amount of periodic payments to be made in the future. If the parents or other legally responsible person fails to file an application within twenty days, the notice and finding of financial responsibility shall become a final administrative order.

(7) Debts determined pursuant to this section are subject to collection action without further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing officer. The department may collect the debt in accordance with RCW 43.20B.635, 43.20B.640, 74.20A.060, and 74.20A.070. The department shall exempt from payment parents receiving adoption support under RCW 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, parents eligible to receive adoption support under RCW 74.13A.085, and a parent or other legally obligated person when the parent or other legally obligated person, or such person's child, spouse, or spouse's child, was the victim of the offense for which the child was committed.

(8) An administrative order entered pursuant to this section shall supersede any court order entered prior to June 13, 1994.

(9) The department shall be subrogated to the right of the child and his or her parents or other legally responsible person to receive support payments for the benefit of the child from any parent or legally obligated person pursuant to a support order established by a superior court or pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The department's right of subrogation under this section is limited to the liability established in accordance with its cost schedule for support, treatment, and confinement, except as addressed in subsection (10) of this section.

(10) Nothing in this section precludes the department from recouping such additional support payments from the child's parents or other legally obligated person as required to qualify for receipt of federal funds. The department may adopt such rules dealing with liability for recoupment of support, treatment, or confinement costs as may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds unless such rules would be expressly prohibited by law. If any law dealing with liability for recoupment of support, treatment, or confinement costs is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds, such conflicting law is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

(11) This section does not apply to juveniles or young adults in a community transition services program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules, policies, and procedures as may be needed to implement a community transition services program required by this act, to include the following:

(1) Identification and regular monitoring of metrics of quality implementation for the community transition program, and regularly publishing outcome analyses for program participants; and

(2) Allowing for the use of new electronic home monitoring equipment and technologies as they become available that eliminate or minimize trauma, social stigma, and racial injustice, and imposing penalties for the knowing or intentional tampering, damaging, or destruction of equipment that renders it not fully functional.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of children, youth, and families may issue rental vouchers for a period not to exceed six months for those transferring to community transition services under this act if an approved address cannot be obtained without the assistance of a voucher.

Sec. 9. RCW 13.04.800 and 2019 c 322 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state institute for public policy must:

(a) Assess the impact of chapter 162, Laws of 2018, ((and)) sections 2 through 6, chapter 322, Laws of 2019, and sections 2 and 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2021 (sections 2 and 3 of this act) on community safety, racial disproportionality, recidivism, state expenditures, and youth rehabilitation, to the extent possible; and

(b) Conduct a cost-benefit analysis, including health impacts and recidivism effects, of extending RCW 72.01.410 to include all offenses committed under the age of twenty-one.

(2) The institute shall submit, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, a preliminary report on the requirements listed in subsection (1) of this section to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2031.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) The Washington partnership council on juvenile justice shall convene stakeholders to develop recommendations regarding improving outcomes for individuals exiting a juvenile detention facility or institution, with a focus on:

(a) Increasing community involvement before and after the individual's exit from a juvenile detention facility or institution;

(b) Geographic barriers or inequities in reentry related services; and

(c) Reentry related service gaps that should be addressed.

(2) The Washington partnership council on juvenile justice shall include, at a minimum, the following stakeholders in the requirements included in this section:

(a) Two individuals who were confined in a juvenile detention facility or institution;

(b) A family member of an individual who was confined in a juvenile detention facility or institution;

(c) A representative of the department of children, youth, and families;

(d) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(e) A representative of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(f) A representative of a statewide organization representing criminal defense attorneys;

(g) A representative of a statewide organization representing public defenders;

(h) A representative of a statewide organization providing legal services to youth;

(i) A representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(j) A representative from the state board for community and technical colleges;

(k) A representative from the Washington student achievement council; and

(l) Two representatives from service providers that assist individuals when exiting from a juvenile detention facility or institution by providing mentoring or other community involvement opportunities to that individual.

(3)(a) By November 1, 2021, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the Washington partnership council on juvenile justice shall submit an initial set of recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor related to improving outcomes for individuals exiting a juvenile detention facility or institution as required under this section.

(b) By September 1, 2022, the Washington partnership council on juvenile justice shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor that describes the recommendations related to improving outcomes for individuals exiting a juvenile detention facility or institution as required under this section.

(4) The following definitions apply to this section:

(a) "Detention facility" means:

(i) Any detention facility as defined under RCW 13.40.020; and

(ii) Any juvenile correctional facility under alternative administration operated under a consortium of counties under RCW 13.04.035.

(b) "Institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.40.020.

(5) This section expires on January 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. (1) Sections 1 through 6, 8, and 9 of this act take effect six months after the department of children, youth, and families designs and implements a risk assessment tool as defined in RCW 13.40.020 used to determine eligibility for "community transition services" as provided under RCW 13.40.205(13) and provides notice as required under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The department of children, youth, and families must provide notice of the implementation of a risk assessment tool described under subsection (1) of this section to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department of children, youth, and families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2021, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---