BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the installation of ductless mini split systems has increased across the state as more customers look toward these systems for inexpensive, zonal heating and cooling. Energy codes and other laws pushing for more electrification of homes are also driving the move towards these HVAC systems. The legislature further finds that HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians are trained and can safely connect the indoor units to the installed outdoor units, as the circuits are specified by the manufacturer, the type of cable used is standardized by manufacturers, and the terminals on both ends are coded. This is more cost-effective for consumers and efficient for home builders. It is also important to allow specialty electricians to do this type of work since there currently is a shortage of certified electricians in the state. The legislature therefore intends to update the scope of work for HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians to allow them to install, repair, replace, or maintain branch circuits from the outdoor unit to the indoor unit or units of a split ductless HVAC system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:

The scope of work for the HVAC/refrigeration specialty or specialties involves installing, repairing, replacing, or maintaining HVAC/refrigeration systems and related equipment as specified by rule of the department. For work on split ductless HVAC systems, the HVAC/refrigeration specialty scope of work includes the installation, repair, replacement, or maintenance of branch circuits between the outdoor unit and the indoor unit or units of split ductless HVAC systems under the following conditions:

(1) The branch circuit supplying the outdoor unit has been installed by a journey level electrician or residential specialty electrician;

(2) The indoor unit or units are located in dwelling units;

(3) The wiring method is limited to cable type, size, and cable length as specified by the manufacturer of the HVAC system;

(4) The cable is protected by an appropriately sized overcurrent device located in the outdoor unit or as specified by the manufacturer of the split ductless HVAC system; and

(5) All HVAC system components are listed and labeled by a testing laboratory accredited by the department and manufacturer instructions for cable installation and termination are included and complied with.

--- END ---