BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to develop and implement an economic development strategy to promote the new space economy and broaden the geographic distribution of employment and training opportunities in that sector. The current space economy is valued at hundreds of billions of dollars, and market analysts advise that a trillion dollar space economy is imminent. The legislature declares its objective that Washington state pursue as much of this economic opportunity as possible. The legislature intends for Washington state to compete aggressively for any federal dollars appropriated in support of civilian opportunities and military missions related to the new space economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department of commerce, in consultation with the leaders of the economic development committees of the legislature, is directed to seek applications and convene an advisory committee to provide information, advice, and assistance in completing a study of public policies that would foster the new space economy and the geographic distribution of employment and training opportunities in that sector.

(2) The study shall, among other components, include:

(a) A 10-year strategy for a bold expansion of trained workforce to support that industry sector;

(b) An evaluation of the state's capacity to:

(i) Train personnel in the cybersecurity protocols needed for civilian businesses to secure national defense contracts; and

(ii) Offer grants and incentives to businesses for the purpose of lowering the ongoing cost of cybersecurity compliance;

(c) An evaluation of the state's capacity to provide technical assistance and mentoring to start-up and emerging businesses competing for national defense contracts;

(d) An evaluation of the state's level of investment in federal lobbying or federal liaison services related to securing defense and civilian space-related appropriations and procurement through which Washington might bolster its local workforce or facilities, and thereby provide indirect and induced benefits for the larger state economy;

(e) An assessment of the infrastructure needs to support the new space sector; and

(f) An assessment of the institutional capacity of state agencies and nonprofit organizations to foster economic growth in the new space sector.

(3) By October 31, 2022, the results of the study required in this section must be submitted in a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature consistent with the requirements of RCW 43.01.036. The study must be accompanied by recommendations that include the identification of short-term and long-term action plans for the legislature to support and sustain a bold vision for economic growth in the new space sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2021, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---