BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.700 and 2020 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health plan offered to employees, school employees, and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2017, shall reimburse a provider for a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine or store and forward technology if:

(i) The plan provides coverage of the health care service when provided in person by the provider;

(ii) The health care service is medically necessary;

(iii) The health care service is a service recognized as an essential health benefit under section 1302(b) of the federal patient protection and affordable care act in effect on January 1, 2015; ((and))

(iv) The health care service is determined to be safely and effectively provided through telemedicine or store and forward technology according to generally accepted health care practices and standards, and the technology used to provide the health care service meets the standards required by state and federal laws governing the privacy and security of protected health information; and

(v) Beginning January 1, 2023, for audio-only telemedicine, the covered person has an established relationship with the provider.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, a health plan offered to employees, school employees, and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, shall reimburse a provider for a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine ((at)) the same ((rate as))amount of compensation the carrier would pay the provider if the health care service was provided in person by the provider.

(ii) Hospitals, hospital systems, telemedicine companies, and provider groups consisting of eleven or more providers may elect to negotiate ((a reimbursement rate))an amount of compensation for telemedicine services that differs from the ((reimbursement rate))amount of compensation for in-person services.

(iii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), the number of providers in a provider group refers to all providers within the group, regardless of a provider's location.

(2) For purposes of this section, reimbursement of store and forward technology is available only for those covered services specified in the negotiated agreement between the health plan and health care provider.

(3) An originating site for a telemedicine health care service subject to subsection (1) of this section includes a:

(a) Hospital;

(b) Rural health clinic;

(c) Federally qualified health center;

(d) Physician's or other health care provider's office;

(e) ((Community mental health center))Licensed or certified behavioral health agency;

(f) Skilled nursing facility;

(g) Home or any location determined by the individual receiving the service; or

(h) Renal dialysis center, except an independent renal dialysis center.

(4) Except for subsection (3)(g) of this section, any originating site under subsection (3) of this section may charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the patient. Reimbursement for a facility fee must be subject to a negotiated agreement between the originating site and the health plan. A distant site, a hospital that is an originating site for audio-only telemedicine, or any other site not identified in subsection (3) of this section may not charge a facility fee.

(5) The plan may not distinguish between originating sites that are rural and urban in providing the coverage required in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) The plan may subject coverage of a telemedicine or store and forward technology health service under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and conditions of the plan including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that are applicable to coverage of a comparable health care service provided in person.

(7) This section does not require the plan to reimburse:

(a) An originating site for professional fees;

(b) A provider for a health care service that is not a covered benefit under the plan; or

(c) An originating site or health care provider when the site or provider is not a contracted provider under the plan.

(8)(a) If a provider intends to bill a patient or the patient's health plan for an audio-only telemedicine service, the provider must obtain patient consent for the billing in advance of the service being delivered. The authority may submit information on any potential violations of this subsection to the appropriate disciplining authority, as defined in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) If the health care authority has cause to believe that a provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the health care authority may submit information to the appropriate disciplining authority for action. Prior to submitting information to the appropriate disciplining authority, the health care authority may provide the provider with an opportunity to cure the alleged violations or explain why the actions in question did not violate this subsection (8).

(c) If the provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the appropriate disciplining authority may levy a fine or cost recovery upon the provider in an amount not to exceed the applicable statutory amount per violation and take other action as permitted under the authority of the disciplining authority. Upon completion of its review of any potential violation submitted by the health care authority or initiated directly by an enrollee, the disciplining authority shall notify the health care authority of the results of the review, including whether the violation was substantiated and any enforcement action taken as a result of a finding of a substantiated violation.

(9) For purposes of this section:

(a)(i) "Audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(ii) For purposes of this section only, "audio-only telemedicine" does not include:

(A) The use of facsimile or email; or

(B) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.

(b) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020;

(c) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;

(((b)))(d) "Established relationship" means the covered person has had at least one in-person appointment within the past year with the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or with a provider employed at the same clinic as the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or the covered person was referred to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine by another provider who has had at least one in-person appointment with the covered person within the past year and has provided relevant medical information to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine.

(e) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((c)))(f) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW;

(((d)))(g) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving health care services through telemedicine;

(((e)))(h) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((f)))(i) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a covered person's medical information from an originating site to the health care provider at a distant site which results in medical diagnosis and management of the covered person, and does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or email; and

(((g)))(j) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" ((does not include the use of))includes audio-only ((telephone))telemedicine, but does not include facsimile((,)) or email.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.43.735 and 2020 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2017, a health carrier shall reimburse a provider for a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine or store and forward technology if:

(i) The plan provides coverage of the health care service when provided in person by the provider;

(ii) The health care service is medically necessary;

(iii) The health care service is a service recognized as an essential health benefit under section 1302(b) of the federal patient protection and affordable care act in effect on January 1, 2015; ((and))

(iv) The health care service is determined to be safely and effectively provided through telemedicine or store and forward technology according to generally accepted health care practices and standards, and the technology used to provide the health care service meets the standards required by state and federal laws governing the privacy and security of protected health information; and

(v) Beginning January 1, 2023, for audio-only telemedicine, the covered person has an established relationship with the provider.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, for health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, a health carrier shall reimburse a provider for a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine ((at)) the same ((rate as))amount of compensation the carrier would pay the provider if the health care service was provided in person by the provider.

(ii) Hospitals, hospital systems, telemedicine companies, and provider groups consisting of eleven or more providers may elect to negotiate ((a reimbursement rate))an amount of compensation for telemedicine services that differs from the ((reimbursement rate))amount of compensation for in-person services.

(iii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), the number of providers in a provider group refers to all providers within the group, regardless of a provider's location.

(2) For purposes of this section, reimbursement of store and forward technology is available only for those covered services specified in the negotiated agreement between the health carrier and the health care provider.

(3) An originating site for a telemedicine health care service subject to subsection (1) of this section includes a:

(a) Hospital;

(b) Rural health clinic;

(c) Federally qualified health center;

(d) Physician's or other health care provider's office;

(e) ((Community mental health center))Licensed or certified behavioral health agency;

(f) Skilled nursing facility;

(g) Home or any location determined by the individual receiving the service; or

(h) Renal dialysis center, except an independent renal dialysis center.

(4) Except for subsection (3)(g) of this section, any originating site under subsection (3) of this section may charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the patient. Reimbursement for a facility fee must be subject to a negotiated agreement between the originating site and the health carrier. A distant site, a hospital that is an originating site for audio-only telemedicine, or any other site not identified in subsection (3) of this section may not charge a facility fee.

(5) A health carrier may not distinguish between originating sites that are rural and urban in providing the coverage required in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) A health carrier may subject coverage of a telemedicine or store and forward technology health service under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and conditions of the plan in which the covered person is enrolled including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that are applicable to coverage of a comparable health care service provided in person.

(7) This section does not require a health carrier to reimburse:

(a) An originating site for professional fees;

(b) A provider for a health care service that is not a covered benefit under the plan; or

(c) An originating site or health care provider when the site or provider is not a contracted provider under the plan.

(8)(a) If a provider intends to bill a patient or the patient's health plan for an audio-only telemedicine service, the provider must obtain patient consent for the billing in advance of the service being delivered. The insurance commissioner may submit information on any potential violations of this subsection to the appropriate disciplining authority, as defined in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) If the commissioner has cause to believe that a provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the commissioner may submit information to the appropriate disciplining authority for action. Prior to submitting information to the appropriate disciplining authority, the commissioner may provide the provider with an opportunity to cure the alleged violations or explain why the actions in question did not violate this subsection (8).

(c) If the provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the appropriate disciplining authority may levy a fine or cost recovery upon the provider in an amount not to exceed the applicable statutory amount per violation and take other action as permitted under the authority of the disciplining authority. Upon completion of its review of any potential violation submitted by the commissioner or initiated directly by an enrollee, the disciplining authority shall notify the commissioner of the results of the review, including whether the violation was substantiated and any enforcement action taken as a result of a finding of a substantiated violation.

(9) For purposes of this section:

(a)(i) "Audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(ii) For purposes of this section only, "audio-only telemedicine" does not include:

(A) The use of facsimile or email; or

(B) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.

(b) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020;

(c) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;

(((b)))(d) "Established relationship" means the covered person has had at least one in-person appointment within the past year with the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or with a provider employed at the same clinic as the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or the covered person was referred to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine by another provider who has had at least one in-person appointment with the covered person within the past year and has provided relevant medical information to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine.

(e) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((c)))(f) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW;

(((d)))(g) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving health care services through telemedicine;

(((e)))(h) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((f)))(i) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a covered person's medical information from an originating site to the health care provider at a distant site which results in medical diagnosis and management of the covered person, and does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or email; and

(((g)))(j) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" ((does not include the use of))includes audio-only ((telephone))telemedicine, but does not include facsimile((,)) or email.

(9) The commissioner may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.41.020 and 2016 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms, whenever used in this chapter, shall be deemed to have the following meanings:

(1) "Aftercare" means the assistance provided by a lay caregiver to a patient under this chapter after the patient's discharge from a hospital. The assistance may include, but is not limited to, assistance with activities of daily living, wound care, medication assistance, and the operation of medical equipment. "Aftercare" includes assistance only for conditions that were present at the time of the patient's discharge from the hospital. "Aftercare" does not include:

(a) Assistance related to conditions for which the patient did not receive medical care, treatment, or observation in the hospital; or

(b) Tasks the performance of which requires licensure as a health care provider.

(2)(a) "Audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(b) "Audio-only telemedicine" does not include:

(i) The use of facsimile or email; or

(ii) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.

(3) "Department" means the Washington state department of health.

(((3)))(4) "Discharge" means a patient's release from a hospital following the patient's admission to the hospital.

(((4)))(5) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine.

(((5)))(6) "Emergency care to victims of sexual assault" means medical examinations, procedures, and services provided by a hospital emergency room to a victim of sexual assault following an alleged sexual assault.

(((6)))(7) "Emergency contraception" means any health care treatment approved by the food and drug administration that prevents pregnancy, including but not limited to administering two increased doses of certain oral contraceptive pills within seventy-two hours of sexual contact.

(((7)))(8) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, or agency which provides accommodations, facilities and services over a continuous period of twenty-four hours or more, for observation, diagnosis, or care, of two or more individuals not related to the operator who are suffering from illness, injury, deformity, or abnormality, or from any other condition for which obstetrical, medical, or surgical services would be appropriate for care or diagnosis. "Hospital" as used in this chapter does not include hotels, or similar places furnishing only food and lodging, or simply domiciliary care; nor does it include clinics, or physician's offices where patients are not regularly kept as bed patients for twenty-four hours or more; nor does it include nursing homes, as defined and which come within the scope of chapter 18.51 RCW; nor does it include birthing centers, which come within the scope of chapter 18.46 RCW; nor does it include psychiatric hospitals, which come within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW; nor any other hospital, or institution specifically intended for use in the diagnosis and care of those suffering from mental illness, intellectual disability, convulsive disorders, or other abnormal mental condition. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents or patients in any hospital conducted for those who rely primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious denominations.

(((8)))(9) "Lay caregiver" means any individual designated as such by a patient under this chapter who provides aftercare assistance to a patient in the patient's residence. "Lay caregiver" does not include a long-term care worker as defined in RCW 74.39A.009.

(((9)))(10) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving health care services through telemedicine.

(((10)))(11) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

(((11)))(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(((12)))(13) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.

(((13)))(14) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. "Telemedicine" ((does not include the use of))includes audio-only ((telephone))telemedicine, but does not include facsimile((,)) or email.

(((14)))(15) "Victim of sexual assault" means a person who alleges or is alleged to have been sexually assaulted and who presents as a patient.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.24.335 and 2019 c 325 s 1019 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations shall reimburse a provider for a behavioral health service provided to a covered person who is under eighteen years old through telemedicine or store and forward technology if:

(a) The behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization in which the covered person is enrolled provides coverage of the behavioral health service when provided in person by the provider; ((and))

(b) The behavioral health service is medically necessary; and

(c) Beginning January 1, 2023, for audio-only telemedicine, the covered person has an established relationship with the provider.

(2)(a) If the service is provided through store and forward technology there must be an associated visit between the covered person and the referring provider. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of telemedicine for the associated office visit.

(b) For purposes of this section, reimbursement of store and forward technology is available only for those services specified in the negotiated agreement between the behavioral health administrative services organization, or managed care organization, and the provider.

(3) An originating site for a telemedicine behavioral health service subject to subsection (1) of this section means an originating site as defined in rule by the department or the health care authority.

(4) Any originating site, other than a home, under subsection (3) of this section may charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the patient. Reimbursement must be subject to a negotiated agreement between the originating site and the behavioral health administrative services organization, or managed care organization, as applicable. A distant site, a hospital that is an originating site for audio-only telemedicine, or any other site not identified in subsection (3) of this section may not charge a facility fee.

(5) Behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations may not distinguish between originating sites that are rural and urban in providing the coverage required in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) Behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations may subject coverage of a telemedicine or store and forward technology behavioral health service under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and conditions of the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization in which the covered person is enrolled, including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that are applicable to coverage of a comparable behavioral health care service provided in person.

(7) This section does not require a behavioral health administrative services organization or a managed care organization to reimburse:

(a) An originating site for professional fees;

(b) A provider for a behavioral health service that is not a covered benefit; or

(c) An originating site or provider when the site or provider is not a contracted provider.

(8)(a) If a provider intends to bill a patient, a behavioral health administrative services organization, or a managed care organization for an audio-only telemedicine service, the provider must obtain patient consent for the billing in advance of the service being delivered. The authority may submit information on any potential violations of this subsection to the appropriate disciplining authority, as defined in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) If the health care authority has cause to believe that a provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the health care authority may submit information to the appropriate disciplining authority for action. Prior to submitting information to the appropriate disciplining authority, the health care authority may provide the provider with an opportunity to cure the alleged violations or explain why the actions in question did not violate this subsection (8).

(c) If the provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the appropriate disciplining authority may levy a fine or cost recovery upon the provider in an amount not to exceed the applicable statutory amount per violation and take other action as permitted under the authority of the disciplining authority. Upon completion of its review of any potential violation submitted by the health care authority or initiated directly by an enrollee, the disciplining authority shall notify the health care authority of the results of the review, including whether the violation was substantiated and any enforcement action taken as a result of a finding of a substantiated violation.

(9) For purposes of this section:

(a)(i) "Audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(ii) For purposes of this section only, "audio-only telemedicine" does not include:

(A) The use of facsimile or email; or

(B) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.

(b) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW
18.130.020;

(c) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;

(((b)))(d) "Established relationship" means the covered person has had at least one in-person appointment within the past year with the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or with a provider employed at the same clinic as the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or the covered person was referred to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine by another provider who has had at least one in-person appointment with the covered person within the past year and has provided relevant medical information to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine.

(e) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW;

(((c)))(f) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving behavioral health services through telemedicine;

(((d)))(g) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((e)))(h) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a covered person's medical or behavioral health information from an originating site to the provider at a distant site which results in medical or behavioral health diagnosis and management of the covered person, and does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or email; and

(((f)))(i) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care or behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" ((does not include the use of))includes audio-only ((telephone))telemedicine, but does not include facsimile((,)) or email.

(9) The authority must adopt rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.09.325 and 2020 c 92 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the Washington state health care authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed health care system shall reimburse a provider for a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine or store and forward technology if:

(i) The medicaid managed care plan in which the covered person is enrolled provides coverage of the health care service when provided in person by the provider;

(ii) The health care service is medically necessary;

(iii) The health care service is a service recognized as an essential health benefit under section 1302(b) of the federal patient protection and affordable care act in effect on January 1, 2015; ((and))

(iv) The health care service is determined to be safely and effectively provided through telemedicine or store and forward technology according to generally accepted health care practices and standards, and the technology used to provide the health care service meets the standards required by state and federal laws governing the privacy and security of protected health information; and

(v) Beginning January 1, 2023, for audio-only telemedicine, the covered person has an established relationship with the provider.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the Washington state health care authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed health care system shall reimburse a provider for a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine ((at)) the same ((rate as))amount of compensation the managed health care system would pay the provider if the health care service was provided in person by the provider.

(ii) Hospitals, hospital systems, telemedicine companies, and provider groups consisting of eleven or more providers may elect to negotiate ((a reimbursement rate))an amount of compensation for telemedicine services that differs from the ((reimbursement rate))amount of compensation for in-person services.

(iii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), the number of providers in a provider group refers to all providers within the group, regardless of a provider's location.

(iv) A rural health clinic shall be reimbursed for audio-only telemedicine at the rural health clinic encounter rate.

(2) For purposes of this section, reimbursement of store and forward technology is available only for those services specified in the negotiated agreement between the managed health care system and health care provider.

(3) An originating site for a telemedicine health care service subject to subsection (1) of this section includes a:

(a) Hospital;

(b) Rural health clinic;

(c) Federally qualified health center;

(d) Physician's or other health care provider's office;

(e) ((Community mental health center))Licensed or certified behavioral health agency;

(f) Skilled nursing facility;

(g) Home or any location determined by the individual receiving the service; or

(h) Renal dialysis center, except an independent renal dialysis center.

(4) Except for subsection (3)(g) of this section, any originating site under subsection (3) of this section may charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the patient. Reimbursement for a facility fee must be subject to a negotiated agreement between the originating site and the managed health care system. A distant site, a hospital that is an originating site for audio-only telemedicine, or any other site not identified in subsection (3) of this section may not charge a facility fee.

(5) A managed health care system may not distinguish between originating sites that are rural and urban in providing the coverage required in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) A managed health care system may subject coverage of a telemedicine or store and forward technology health service under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and conditions of the plan in which the covered person is enrolled including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that are applicable to coverage of a comparable health care service provided in person.

(7) This section does not require a managed health care system to reimburse:

(a) An originating site for professional fees;

(b) A provider for a health care service that is not a covered benefit under the plan; or

(c) An originating site or health care provider when the site or provider is not a contracted provider under the plan.

(8)(a) If a provider intends to bill a patient or a managed health care system for an audio-only telemedicine service, the provider must obtain patient consent for the billing in advance of the service being delivered. The authority may submit information on any potential violations of this subsection to the appropriate disciplining authority, as defined in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) If the health care authority has cause to believe that a provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the health care authority may submit information to the appropriate disciplining authority for action. Prior to submitting information to the appropriate disciplining authority, the health care authority may provide the provider with an opportunity to cure the alleged violations or explain why the actions in question did not violate this subsection (8).

(c) If the provider has engaged in a pattern of unresolved violations of this subsection (8), the appropriate disciplining authority may levy a fine or cost recovery upon the provider in an amount not to exceed the applicable statutory amount per violation and take other action as permitted under the authority of the disciplining authority. Upon completion of its review of any potential violation submitted by the health care authority or initiated directly by an enrollee, the disciplining authority shall notify the health care authority of the results of the review, including whether the violation was substantiated and any enforcement action taken as a result of a finding of a substantiated violation.

(9) For purposes of this section:

(a)(i) "Audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(ii) For purposes of this section only, "audio-only telemedicine" does not include:

(A) The use of facsimile or email; or

(B) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.

(b) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW
18.130.020;

(c) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;

(((b)))(d) "Established relationship" means the covered person has had at least one in-person appointment within the past year with the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or with a provider employed at the same clinic as the provider providing audio-only telemedicine or the covered person was referred to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine by another provider who has had at least one in-person appointment with the covered person within the past year and has provided relevant medical information to the provider providing audio-only telemedicine.

(e) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((c)))(f) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW;

(((d)))(g) "Managed health care system" means any health care organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services covered under this chapter and rendered by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(((e)))(h) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving health care services through telemedicine;

(((f)))(i) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(((g)))(j) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a covered person's medical information from an originating site to the health care provider at a distant site which results in medical diagnosis and management of the covered person, and does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or email; and

(((h)))(k) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" ((does not include the use of))includes audio-only ((telephone))telemedicine, but does not include facsimile((,)) or email.

(((9) To measure the impact on access to care for underserved communities and costs to the state and the medicaid managed health care system for reimbursement of telemedicine services, the Washington state health care authority, using existing data and resources, shall provide a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2018.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall adopt rules regarding medicaid fee-for-service reimbursement for services delivered through audio-only telemedicine. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the rules must establish a manner of reimbursement for audio-only telemedicine that is consistent with RCW 74.09.325.

(2) The rules shall require rural health clinics to be reimbursed for audio-only telemedicine at the rural health clinic encounter rate.

(3)(a) For purposes of this section, "audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between a patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(b) For purposes of this section only, "audio-only telemedicine" does not include:

(i) The use of facsimile or email; or

(ii) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.130.180 and 2020 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;

(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed;

(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice any health care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(6) Except when authorized by RCW 18.130.345, the possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing controlled substances for oneself;

(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional conduct or practice;

(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:

(a) Not furnishing any papers, documents, records, or other items;

(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the disciplining authority;

(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or

(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;

(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with the disciplining authority;

(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a license is required;

(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;

(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or rule;

(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;

(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;

(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving serious risk to public health;

(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;

(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal abortion;

(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon demand of the disciplining authority;

(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as recognized by law;

(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW or a pattern of violations of RCW 41.05.700(8), 48.43.735(8), 48.49.020 ((or)), 48.49.030, 71.24.335(8), or 74.09.325(8);

(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;

(23) Current misuse of:

(a) Alcohol;

(b) Controlled substances; or

(c) Legend drugs;

(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client or patient;

(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals, where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on recognized professional ethical standards;

(26) Violation of RCW 18.130.420;

(27) Performing conversion therapy on a patient under age eighteen;

(28) Violation of RCW 18.130.430.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) The insurance commissioner, in collaboration with the Washington state telehealth collaborative and the health care authority, shall study and make recommendations regarding:

(a) Preliminary utilization trends for audio-only telemedicine;

(b) Qualitative data from health carriers, including medicaid managed care organizations, on the burden of compliance and enforcement requirements for audio-only telemedicine;

(c) Preliminary information regarding whether requiring reimbursement for audio-only telemedicine has affected the incidence of fraud;

(d) Proposed methods to measure the impact of audio-only telemedicine on access to health care services for historically underserved communities and geographic areas;

(e) An evaluation of the relative costs to providers and facilities of providing audio-only telemedicine services as compared to audio-video telemedicine services and in-person services; and

(f) Any other issues the insurance commissioner deems appropriate.

(2) The insurance commissioner must report his or her findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2023.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2024.

Sec. 9. RCW 28B.20.830 and 2020 c 92 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The collaborative for the advancement of telemedicine is created to enhance the understanding and use of health services provided through telemedicine and other similar models in Washington state. The collaborative shall be hosted by the University of Washington telehealth services and shall be comprised of one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate and the house of representatives, and representatives from the academic community, hospitals, clinics, and health care providers in primary care and specialty practices, carriers, and other interested parties.

(2) By July 1, 2016, the collaborative shall be convened. The collaborative shall develop recommendations on improving reimbursement and access to services, including originating site restrictions, provider to provider consultative models, and technologies and models of care not currently reimbursed; identify the existence of telemedicine best practices, guidelines, billing requirements, and fraud prevention developed by recognized medical and telemedicine organizations; and explore other priorities identified by members of the collaborative. After review of existing resources, the collaborative shall explore and make recommendations on whether to create a technical assistance center to support providers in implementing or expanding services delivered through telemedicine technologies.

(3) The collaborative must submit an initial progress report by December 1, 2016, with follow-up policy reports including recommendations by December 1, 2017, December 1, 2018, and December 1, 2021. The reports shall be shared with the relevant professional associations, governing boards or commissions, and the health care committees of the legislature.

(4) The collaborative shall study store and forward technology, with a focus on:

(a) Utilization;

(b) Whether store and forward technology should be paid for at parity with in-person services;

(c) The potential for store and forward technology to improve rural health outcomes in Washington state; and

(d) Ocular services.

(5) The meetings of the board shall be open public meetings, with meeting summaries available on a web page.

(6) The future of the collaborative shall be reviewed by the legislature with consideration of ongoing technical assistance needs and opportunities. The collaborative terminates December 31, ((2021))2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

--- END ---