BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A goal is established for the state that all publicly-owned and privately owned passenger and light duty vehicles of model year 2030 or later that are sold, purchased, or registered in Washington state be electric vehicles.

(2) The goal established in this section does not supersede any other law, and the other law controls if inconsistent with the goal established in this section.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Electric vehicles" are vehicles that use energy stored in rechargeable battery packs or in hydrogen and which rely solely on electric motors for propulsion.

(b) "Passenger and light duty vehicles" are on-road motor vehicles with a scale weight of up to 10,000 pounds and three or more wheels. Emergency services vehicles are not passenger and light duty vehicles.

(4) Nothing in this section:

(a) Authorizes any state agency to restrict the purchase, sale, or registration of vehicles that are not electric vehicles; or

(b) Changes or affects the directive to the department of ecology to implement the zero emission vehicle program required under RCW 70A.30.010.

--- END ---