BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.010 and 2020 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this chapter:

(1) The term "commission" means the Washington state criminal justice training commission.

(2) The term "boards" means the education and training standards boards, the establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.

(3) The term "criminal justice personnel" means any person who serves in a county, city, state, or port commission agency engaged in crime prevention, crime reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.

(4) The term "law enforcement personnel" means any public employee or volunteer having as a primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general or any employee or volunteer of, or any individual commissioned by, any municipal, county, state, or combination thereof, agency having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general as distinguished from an agency possessing peace officer powers, the primary function of which is the implementation of specialized subject matter areas. For the purposes of this subsection "primary function" means that function to which the greater allocation of resources is made.

(5) The term "correctional personnel" means any employee or volunteer who by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof, statute has the responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training, treatment, education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose civil rights have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6) "Chief for a day program" means a program in which commissioners and staff partner with local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies, hospitals, and the community to provide a day of special attention to chronically ill children. Each child is selected and sponsored by a law enforcement agency. The event, "chief for a day," occurs on one day, annually or every other year and may occur on the grounds and in the facilities of the commission. The program may include any appropriate honoring of the child as a "chief," such as a certificate swearing them in as a chief, a badge, a uniform, and donated gifts such as games, puzzles, and art supplies.

(7) A peace officer or corrections officer is "convicted" at the time a plea of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings, including but not limited to sentencing, posttrial or postfact-finding motions and appeals. "Conviction" includes a deferral of sentence and also includes the equivalent disposition by a court in a jurisdiction other than the state of Washington.

(8)(a) "Discharged for disqualifying misconduct" has the following meanings:

(i) A peace officer terminated from employment for: (A) Conviction of (I) any crime committed under color of authority as a peace officer, (II) any crime involving dishonesty or false statement within the meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), (III) the unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance, or (IV) any other crime the conviction of which disqualifies a Washington citizen from the legal right to possess a firearm under state or federal law; (B) conduct that would constitute any of the crimes addressed in (a)(i)(A) of this subsection; or (C) knowingly making materially false statements during disciplinary investigations, where the false statements are the sole basis for the termination; or

(ii) A corrections officer terminated from employment for: (A) Conviction of (I) any crime committed under color of authority as a corrections officer, (II) any crime involving dishonesty or false statement within the meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), or (III) the unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance; (B) conduct that would constitute any of the crimes addressed in (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection; or (C) knowingly making materially false statements during disciplinary investigations, where the false statements are the sole basis for the termination.

(b) A peace officer or corrections officer is "discharged for disqualifying misconduct" within the meaning of this subsection (8) under the ordinary meaning of the term and when the totality of the circumstances support a finding that the officer resigned in anticipation of discipline, whether or not the misconduct was discovered at the time of resignation, and when such discipline, if carried forward, would more likely than not have led to discharge for disqualifying misconduct within the meaning of this subsection (8).

(9) An "eye-based truth verification test" is a test that measures credibility through analysis of the physiological responses of the eye, including, but not limited to, changes in pupil diameter, eye movement, reading behavior, blinks, and fixations.

(10) When used in context of proceedings referred to in this chapter, "final" means that the peace officer or corrections officer has exhausted all available civil service appeals, collective bargaining remedies, and all other such direct administrative appeals, and the officer has not been reinstated as the result of the action. Finality is not affected by the pendency or availability of state or federal administrative or court actions for discrimination, or by the pendency or availability of any remedies other than direct civil service and collective bargaining remedies.

(((10)))(11) "Peace officer" means any law enforcement personnel subject to the basic law enforcement training requirement of RCW 43.101.200 and any other requirements of that section, notwithstanding any waiver or exemption granted by the commission, and notwithstanding the statutory exemption based on date of initial hire under RCW 43.101.200. Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol, whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the commission from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included as peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW 77.15.075 are peace officers for purposes of this chapter.

(((11)))(12) "Corrections officer" means any corrections agency employee whose primary job function is to provide for the custody, safety, and security of adult prisoners in jails and detention facilities and who is subject to the basic corrections training requirement of RCW 43.101.220 and any other requirements of that section, notwithstanding any waiver or exemption granted by the commission, and notwithstanding the statutory exemption based on date of initial hire under RCW 43.101.220. For the purpose of RCW 43.101.080, 43.101.096, 43.101.106, 43.101.116, 43.101.121, 43.101.126, 43.101.136, 43.101.146, 43.101.156, 43.101.380, and 43.101.400, "corrections officer" does not include individuals employed by state agencies.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.101.080 and 2020 c 119 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have all of the following powers:

(1) To meet at such times and places as it may deem proper;

(2) To adopt any rules and regulations as it may deem necessary;

(3) To contract for services as it deems necessary in order to carry out its duties and responsibilities;

(4) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of any department, agency, or instrumentality in state, county, and city government, and other commissions affected by or concerned with the business of the commission;

(5) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it fully and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power granted to it;

(6) To select and employ an executive director, and to empower him or her to perform such duties and responsibilities as it may deem necessary;

(7) To assume legal, fiscal, and program responsibility for all training conducted by the commission;

(8) To establish, by rule and regulation, standards for the training of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not prescribed by statute;

(9) To own, establish, and operate, or to contract with other qualified institutions or organizations for the operation of, training and education programs for criminal justice personnel and to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, subject to the approval of the department of enterprise services, a training facility or facilities necessary to the conducting of such programs;

(10) To establish, by rule and regulation, minimum curriculum standards for all training programs conducted for employed criminal justice personnel;

(11) To review and approve or reject standards for instructors of training programs for criminal justice personnel, and to employ personnel on a temporary basis as instructors without any loss of employee benefits to those instructors;

(12) To direct the development of alternative, innovative, and interdisciplinary training techniques;

(13) To review and approve or reject training programs conducted for criminal justice personnel and rules establishing and prescribing minimum training and education standards recommended by the training standards and education boards;

(14) To allocate financial resources among training and education programs conducted by the commission;

(15) To allocate training facility space among training and education programs conducted by the commission;

(16) To issue diplomas certifying satisfactory completion of any training or education program conducted or approved by the commission to any person so completing such a program;

(17) To provide for the employment of such personnel as may be practical to serve as temporary replacements for any person engaged in a basic training program as defined by the commission;

(18) To establish rules and regulations recommended by the training standards and education boards prescribing minimum standards relating to physical, mental and moral fitness which shall govern the recruitment of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not prescribed by statute or constitutional provision;

(19) To require county, city, or state law enforcement and corrections agencies that make a conditional offer of employment to an applicant as a fully commissioned peace officer, a reserve officer, or a corrections officer to administer a background investigation ((including a))to each applicant, the results of which shall be used by the employer to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a fully commissioned peace officer, a reserve officer, or a corrections officer. The background investigation must include: A check of criminal history((,)); verification of immigrant or citizenship status as either a citizen of the United States of America or a lawful permanent resident((,)); a psychological examination((, and)); and either an eye-based truth verification test or a polygraph test or similar assessment ((to each applicant, the results of which shall be used by the employer to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a fully commissioned peace officer, a reserve officer, or a corrections officer)), or both. The background investigation, psychological examination, eye-based truth verification test, and the polygraph examination shall be administered in accordance with the requirements of RCW 43.101.095(2) for peace officers, and RCW 43.101.096 for corrections officers. The employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may require that each peace officer, reserve officer, or corrections officer who is required to take a psychological examination, an eye-based truth verification test, and a polygraph or similar test, or any combination of these tests, pay a portion of the testing fee based on the actual cost of the test or four hundred dollars, whichever is less. County, city, and state law enforcement agencies may establish a payment plan if they determine that the peace officer, reserve officer, or corrections officer does not readily have the means to pay for his or her portion of the testing fee. This subsection does not apply to corrections officers employed by state agencies;

(20) To promote positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the state of Washington by allowing commissioners and staff to participate in the "chief for a day program." The executive director shall designate staff who may participate. In furtherance of this purpose, the commission may accept grants of funds and gifts and may use its public facilities for such purpose. At all times, the participation of commissioners and staff shall comply with chapter 42.52 RCW and chapter 292-110 WAC.

All rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be adopted and administered pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.101.095 and 2018 c 32 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As a condition of continuing employment as peace officers, all Washington peace officers: (a) Shall timely obtain certification as peace officers, or timely obtain certification or exemption therefrom, by meeting all requirements of RCW 43.101.200, as that section is administered under the rules of the commission, as well by meeting any additional requirements under this chapter; and (b) shall maintain the basic certification as peace officers under this chapter.

(2)(a) As a condition of continuing employment for any applicant who has been offered a conditional offer of employment as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer after July 24, 2005, including any person whose certification has lapsed as a result of a break of more than twenty-four consecutive months in the officer's service as a fully commissioned peace officer or reserve officer, the applicant shall submit to a background investigation ((including a))as administered by the county, city, or state law enforcement agency, the results of which shall be used to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer. The background investigation must include: A check of criminal history((,)); verification of immigrant or citizenship status as either a citizen of the United States of America or a lawful permanent resident((,)); a psychological examination((, and)); and either an eye-based truth verification test or a polygraph or similar assessment ((as administered by the county, city, or state law enforcement agency, the results of which shall be used to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer)), or both.

(i) The background investigation including a check of criminal history shall be administered by the county, city, or state law enforcement agency that made the conditional offer of employment in compliance with standards established in the rules of the commission.

(ii) The psychological examination shall be administered by a psychiatrist licensed in the state of Washington pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW or a psychologist licensed in the state of Washington pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW, in compliance with standards established in rules of the commission.

(iii) The polygraph test shall be administered by an experienced polygrapher who is a graduate of a polygraph school accredited by the American polygraph association and in compliance with standards established in rules of the commission.

(iv) Any other test or assessment to be administered as part of the background investigation shall be administered in compliance with standards established in rules of the commission.

(b) The employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may require that each peace officer or reserve officer who is required to take a psychological examination, an eye-based truth verification test, and a polygraph or similar test, or any combination of these tests, pay a portion of the testing fee based on the actual cost of the test or four hundred dollars, whichever is less. County, city, and state law enforcement agencies may establish a payment plan if they determine that the peace officer or reserve officer does not readily have the means to pay for his or her portion of the testing fee.

(3) The commission shall certify peace officers who have satisfied, or have been exempted by statute or by rule from, the basic training requirements of RCW 43.101.200 on or before January 1, 2002. Thereafter, the commission may revoke certification pursuant to this chapter.

(4) The commission shall allow a peace officer to retain status as a certified peace officer as long as the officer: (a) Timely meets the basic law enforcement training requirements, or is exempted therefrom, in whole or in part, under RCW 43.101.200 or under rule of the commission; (b) meets or is exempted from any other requirements under this chapter as administered under the rules adopted by the commission; (c) is not denied certification by the commission under this chapter; and (d) has not had certification revoked by the commission.

(5) As a prerequisite to certification, as well as a prerequisite to pursuit of a hearing under RCW 43.101.155, a peace officer must, on a form devised or adopted by the commission, authorize the release to the commission of his or her personnel files, termination papers, criminal investigation files, or other files, papers, or information that are directly related to a certification matter or decertification matter before the commission.

(6) The commission is authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data for any purpose associated with employment by the commission or peace officer certification under this chapter. Dissemination or use of nonconviction data for purposes other than that authorized in this section is prohibited.

(7) For a national criminal history records check, the commission shall require fingerprints be submitted and searched through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section. The Washington state patrol shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.101.096 and 2020 c 119 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As a condition of continuing employment as corrections officers, all Washington state corrections officers shall: (a) Timely obtain certification as corrections officers, or timely obtain exemption therefrom, by meeting all requirements of RCW 43.101.220, as that section is administered under the rules of the commission, as well as by meeting any additional requirements under this chapter; and (b) maintain the basic certification as corrections officers under this chapter. The commission shall certify corrections officers who have satisfied, or have been exempted by statute or by rule from, the basic training requirements of RCW 43.101.220 on or before June 11, 2020. Thereafter, the commission may revoke certification pursuant to this chapter.

(2) As a condition of continuing employment for any applicant who has been offered a conditional offer of employment as a corrections officer after July 1, 2021, including any person whose certification has lapsed as a result of a break of more than twenty-four consecutive months in the officer's service as a corrections officer, the applicant shall submit to a background investigation ((including a))as administered by the corrections agency, the results of which shall be used to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a corrections officer. The background investigation must include: A check of criminal history((,)); verification of immigrant or citizenship status as either a citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent resident((,)); a psychological examination((, and)); and either an eye-based truth verification test or a polygraph or similar assessment ((as administered by the corrections agency, the results of which shall be used to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a corrections officer)), or both.

(3) The commission shall allow a corrections officer to retain status as a certified corrections officer as long as the officer: (a) Timely meets the basic corrections officer training requirements, or is exempted therefrom, in whole or in part, under RCW 43.101.220 or under rule of the commission; (b) meets or is exempted from any other requirements under this chapter as administered under the rules adopted by the commission; (c) is not denied certification by the commission under this chapter; and (d) has not had certification revoked by the commission.

(4) As a prerequisite to certification, as well as a prerequisite to pursuit of a hearing under RCW 43.101.156, a corrections officer must, on a form devised or adopted by the commission, authorize the release to the commission of his or her personnel files, termination papers, criminal investigation files, or other files, papers, or information that are directly related to a certification matter or decertification matter before the commission.

--- END ---