BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.76.030 and 2018 c 135 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receiving an application for transporter's license the director, if satisfied that the applicant is entitled thereto, shall issue a proper certificate of license registration and ((a))up to three distinctive ((set))sets of license plates or an indicator tab pursuant to RCW 46.55.065 and shall transmit the fees obtained therefor with a proper identifying report to the state treasurer, who shall deposit such fees in the motor vehicle fund. The certificate of license registration and license plates or indicator tab issued by the director shall authorize the holder of the license to drive or tow any motor vehicle or trailers upon the public highways of Washington state. The director, if satisfied that the applicant has sufficient business need, may issue more than three, but no more than 10, sets of license plates to meet the business need of the applicant. Registered tow truck operators licensed under chapter 46.55 RCW are not subject to this limit, with respect to indicator tabs.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.76.040 and 2019 c 44 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The fee for an original transporter's license is ((twenty-five dollars))$150. Transporter license number plates bearing an appropriate symbol and serial number or an indicator tab pursuant to RCW 46.55.065 must be attached to all vehicles being delivered or evaluated in the conduct of the business licensed under this chapter. The plates ((or indicator tab)) may be obtained for a fee of ((two dollars))$50 for each set. Indicator tabs may be obtained by a registered tow truck operator licensed under chapter 46.55 RCW for a fee of $2 per tab.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.76.050 and 1985 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A transporter's license expires on the date assigned by the director, and may be renewed by filing a proper application and paying an annual fee of ((fifteen dollars))$100.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.76.060 and 2018 c 135 s 4 and 2018 c 16 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Transporter's license plates or indicator tabs pursuant to RCW 46.55.065 must be conspicuously displayed on all vehicles being delivered by the driveaway or towaway methods or being driven on the public roads of the state for the purpose of repair evaluation. These plates or indicator tabs must not be loaned to or used by any person other than the holder of the license or his or her employees. If a transporter license plate or indicator tab is lost, stolen, or damaged, the holder of the license must report the event to the department within 10 days of discovering that the transporter license plate or indicator tab has been lost, stolen, or damaged.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.76.065 and 2018 c 135 s 5 and 2018 c 16 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following conduct shall be sufficient grounds pursuant to RCW 34.05.422 for the director or a designee to deny, suspend, or revoke the license of a motor vehicle transporter:

(1) Using transporter plates or indicator tabs pursuant to RCW 46.55.065 for driveaway or towaway of any vehicle owned by such transporter;

(2) Knowingly, as that term is defined in RCW 9A.08.010(1)(b), having possession of a stolen vehicle or a vehicle with a defaced, missing, or obliterated manufacturer's identification serial number;

(3) Loaning transporter plates or indicator tabs;

(4) Using transporter plates or indicator tabs for any purpose other than as provided under RCW 46.76.010 or 46.76.015; ((or))

(5) Violation of provisions of this chapter or of rules and regulations adopted relating to enforcement and proper operation of this chapter; or

(6) Using transporter plates on public highways located outside of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect January 1, 2022.

--- END ---