BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the ability of county elected officials to fulfill their statutory responsibilities through continued conduct of essential functions and services during the current COVID-19 pandemic and potential future public health crises requires updating, and at times temporary waiver, of these requirements in statute. The legislature intends to update the manner in which services may be provided; maintaining access and opportunity. In addition, the legislature intends to clarify the conditions under which waiver or suspension of specific statutes may be assumed by county elected officials in order to eliminate temporary barriers to continuity of operations.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.32.050 and 2017 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The clerk of the supreme court, each clerk of the court of appeals, and each clerk of a superior court, has power to take and certify the proof and acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property, or any other written instrument authorized or required to be proved or acknowledged, and to administer oaths in every case when authorized by law; and it is the duty of the clerk of the supreme court, each clerk of the court of appeals, and of each county clerk for each of the courts for which he or she is clerk:

(1) To keep the seal of the court and affix it in all cases where he or she is required by law;

(2) To record the proceedings of the court;

(3) To keep the records, files, and other books and papers appertaining to the court;

(4) To file all papers delivered to him or her for that purpose in any action or proceeding in the court as directed by court rule or statute;

(5) To attend, either in person or electronically if the proceeding is virtual, the court of which he or she is clerk, to administer oaths, and receive the verdict of a jury in any action or proceeding therein, in the presence and under the direction of the court;

(6) To keep the minutes of the proceedings of the court, and, under the direction of the court, to enter its orders, judgments, and decrees;

(7) To authenticate by certificate or transcript, as may be required, the records, files, or proceedings of the court, or any other paper appertaining thereto and filed with him or her;

(8) To exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred and imposed upon him or her elsewhere by statute;

(9) In the performance of his or her duties to conform to the direction of the court;

(10) To publish notice of the procedures for inspection of the public records of the court.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.41.041 and 2017 c 323 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county assessor must cause taxable real property ((to be physically inspected))characteristics to be reviewed in accordance with international association of assessing officers standards for physical inspection and valued at least once every six years in accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan must provide that all taxable real property within a county must be revalued and these newly determined values placed on the assessment rolls each year. Property must be valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair value and assessed on the same basis, in accordance with RCW 84.40.030, unless specifically provided otherwise by law. During the intervals between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of such property must be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be made once each year and to be based upon appropriate statistical data.

(2) The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data respecting taxable property in their control including data respecting any sale or purchase of said property within the past five years, the cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property and other facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

Sec. 4. RCW 38.52.040 and 2019 c 333 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created the emergency management council (hereinafter called the council), to consist of not more than ((eighteen))21 members who shall be appointed by the adjutant general. The membership of the council shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of city and county governments, sheriffs and police chiefs, county coroners and medical examiners, the Washington state patrol, the military department, the department of ecology, state and local fire chiefs, seismic safety experts, state and local emergency management directors, search and rescue volunteers, medical professions who have expertise in emergency medical care, building officials, private industry, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The representatives of private industry shall include persons knowledgeable in emergency and hazardous materials management. The councilmembers shall elect a chair from within the council membership. The members of the council shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for their travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

(2) The emergency management council shall advise the governor and the director on all matters pertaining to state and local emergency management. The council may appoint such ad hoc committees, subcommittees, and working groups as are required to develop specific recommendations for the improvement of emergency management practices, standards, policies, or procedures. The council shall ensure that the governor receives an annual assessment of statewide emergency preparedness including, but not limited to, specific progress on hazard mitigation and reduction efforts, implementation of seismic safety improvements, reduction of flood hazards, and coordination of hazardous materials planning and response activities. The council shall review administrative rules governing state and local emergency management practices and recommend necessary revisions to the director.

(3) The council or a council subcommittee shall serve and periodically convene in special session as the state emergency response commission required by the emergency planning and community right-to-know act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11001 et seq.). The state emergency response commission shall conduct those activities specified in federal statutes and regulations and state administrative rules governing the coordination of hazardous materials policy including, but not limited to, review of local emergency planning committee emergency response plans for compliance with the planning requirements in the emergency planning and community right-to-know act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11001 et seq.). Committees shall annually review their plans to address changed conditions, and submit their plans to the state emergency response commission for review when updated, but not less than at least once every five years. The department may employ staff to assist local emergency planning committees in the development and annual review of these emergency response plans, with an initial focus on the highest risk communities through which trains that transport oil in bulk travel. By March 1, 2018, the department shall report to the governor and legislature on progress towards compliance with planning requirements. The report must also provide budget and policy recommendations for continued support of local emergency planning.

(4)(a) The intrastate mutual aid committee is created and is a subcommittee of the emergency management council. The intrastate mutual aid committee consists of not more than five members who must be appointed by the council chair from council membership. The chair of the intrastate mutual aid committee is the military department representative appointed as a member of the council. Meetings of the intrastate mutual aid committee must be held at least annually.

(b) In support of the intrastate mutual aid system established in chapter 38.56 RCW, the intrastate mutual aid committee shall develop and update guidelines and procedures to facilitate implementation of the intrastate mutual aid system by member jurisdictions, including but not limited to the following: Projected or anticipated costs; checklists and forms for requesting and providing assistance; recordkeeping; reimbursement procedures; and other implementation issues. These guidelines and procedures are not subject to the rule-making requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) On emergency management issues that involve early learning, kindergarten through twelfth grade, or higher education, the emergency management council must consult with representatives from the following organizations: The department of children, youth, and families; the office of the superintendent of public instruction; the state board for community and technical colleges; and an association of public baccalaureate degree-granting institutions.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.54.430 and 2015 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When requested by first responders during an emergency, employees of companies providing personal emergency response services must provide to first responders the name, address, and any other information necessary for first responders to contact subscribers within the jurisdiction of the emergency.

(2) Companies providing personal emergency response services may adopt policies to respond to requests from first responders to release subscriber contact information during an emergency. Policies may include procedures to:

(a) Verify that the requester is a first responder;

(b) Verify that the request is made pursuant to an emergency;

(c) Fulfill the request by providing the subscriber contact information; and

(d) Deny the request if no emergency exists or if the requester is not a first responder.

(3) Information received by a first responder under subsection (1) of this section is confidential and exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, and may be used only in responding to the emergency that prompted the request for information. Any first responder receiving the information must destroy it at the end of the emergency.

(4) It is not a violation of this section if a personal emergency response services company or an employee makes a good faith effort to comply with this section. In addition, the company or employee is immune from civil liability for a good faith effort to comply with this section. Should a company or employee prevail upon the defense provided in this section, the company or employee is entitled to recover expenses and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

(5) First responders and their employing jurisdictions are not liable for failing to request the information in subsection (1) of this section. In addition, chapter 30, Laws of 2015 does not create a private right of action nor does it create any civil liability on the part of the state or any of its subdivisions, including first responders.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Emergency" means an occurrence that renders the personal emergency response services system inoperable for a period of twenty-four or more continuous hours, and that requires the attention of first responders acting within the scope of their official duties.

(b) "First responder" means firefighters, law enforcement officers, coroners and medical examiners, and emergency medical personnel, as licensed or certificated by this state.

(c) "Personal emergency response services" means a service provided for profit that allows persons in need of emergency assistance to contact a call center by activating a wearable device, such as a pendant or bracelet.

(7) This section does not require a personal emergency response services company to:

(a) Provide first responders with subscriber contact information in nonemergency situations; or

(b) Provide subscriber contact information to entities other than first responders.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.09.230 and 2020 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section:

(a) "Special purpose district" means every municipal and quasi-municipal corporation other than counties, cities, and towns. Such special purpose districts include, but are not limited to, water-sewer districts, fire protection districts, port districts, public utility districts, special districts as defined in RCW 85.38.010, lake and beach management districts, conservation districts, and irrigation districts.

(b) "Unauditable" means a special purpose district that the state auditor has determined to be incapable of being audited because the special purpose district has improperly maintained, failed to maintain, or failed to submit adequate accounts, records, files, or reports for an audit to be completed.

(2) The state auditor shall require from every local government financial reports covering the full period of each fiscal year, in accordance with the forms and methods prescribed by the state auditor, which shall be uniform for all accounts of the same class.

Such reports shall be prepared, certified, and filed with the state auditor within one hundred fifty days after the close of each fiscal year. The state auditor may allow local governments a thirty-day extension for filing annual fiscal reports if the governor has declared an emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.210.

The reports shall contain accurate statements, in summarized form, of all collections made, or receipts received, by the officers from all sources; all accounts due the public treasury, but not collected; and all expenditures for every purpose, and by what authority authorized; and also: (a) A statement of all costs of ownership and operation, and of all income, of each and every public service industry owned and operated by a local government; (b) a statement of the entire public debt of every local government, to which power has been delegated by the state to create a public debt, showing the purpose for which each item of the debt was created, and the provisions made for the payment thereof; (c) a classified statement of all receipts and expenditures by any public institution; and (d) a statement of all expenditures for labor relations consultants, with the identification of each consultant, compensation, and the terms and conditions of each agreement or arrangement; together with such other information as may be required by the state auditor.

The reports shall be certified as to their correctness by the state auditor, the state auditor's deputies, or other person legally authorized to make such certification.

Their substance shall be published in an annual volume of comparative statistics at the expense of the state as a public document.

(3)(a)(i) On or before December 31, 2020, and on or before December 31st of each year thereafter, the state auditor must search available records and notify the legislative authority of a county if any special purpose districts, located wholly or partially within the county, have been determined to be unauditable. If the boundaries of the special purpose district are located within more than one county, the state auditor must notify all legislative authorities of the counties within which the boundaries of the special purpose district lie.

(ii) If a county has been notified as provided in (a)(i) of this subsection (3), the special purpose district and the county auditor, acting on behalf of the special purpose district, are prohibited from issuing any warrants against the funds of the special purpose district until the district has had its report certified by the state auditor.

(iii) Notwithstanding (a)(ii) of this subsection (3), a county may authorize the special purpose district and the county auditor to issue warrants against the funds of the special purpose district:

(A) In order to prevent the discontinuation or interruption of any district services;

(B) For emergency or public health purposes; or

(C) To allow the district to carry out any district duties or responsibilities.

(b)(i) On or before December 31, 2020, and on or before December 31st of each year thereafter, the state auditor must search available records and notify the state treasurer if any special purpose districts have been determined to be unauditable.

(ii) If the state treasurer has been notified as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection (3), the state treasurer may not distribute any local sales and use taxes imposed by a special purpose district to the district until the district has had its report certified by the state auditor.

Sec. 7. RCW 65.04.140 and 2012 c 117 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor in his or her capacity of recorder of deeds is sole custodian of all books in which are recorded deeds, mortgages, judgments, liens, incumbrances, and other instruments of writing, indexes thereto, maps, charts, town plats, survey and other books and papers constituting the records and files in said office of recorder of deeds, and all such records and files are, and shall be, matters of public information, free of charge to any and all persons demanding to inspect or to examine the same, or to search the same for titles of property. It is said recorder's duty to arrange in suitable places the indexes of said books of record, and when practicable, the record books themselves, to the end that the same may be accessible to the public and convenient for said public inspection, examination, and search, and not interfere with the said auditor's personal control and responsibility for the same, or prevent him or her from promptly furnishing the said records and files of his or her said office to persons demanding any information from the same. The said auditor or recorder must and shall, upon demand, and without charge, freely permit any and all persons, during reasonable office hours, to inspect, examine, and search any or all of the records and files of his or her said office, and to gather any information therefrom, and to make any desired notes or memoranda about or concerning the same, and to prepare an abstract or abstracts of title to any and all property therein contained. The county auditor has fulfilled this obligation regarding those records that can be accessed by the public on the county auditor's website.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.20.118 and 2009 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall maintain a negative file. It shall contain negatives of all pictures taken by the department of licensing as authorized by this chapter. Negatives in the file shall not be available for public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) The department may make the file available to official governmental enforcement agencies to assist in the investigation by the agencies of suspected criminal activity or for the purposes of verifying identity when a law enforcement officer is authorized by law to request identification from an individual.

(3) The department shall make the file available to the office of the secretary of state, at the expense of the secretary of state, to assist in maintenance of the statewide voter registration database.

(4) The department may also provide a print to the driver's next of kin in the event the driver is deceased.

(5) The department shall make the file available to the county coroner or medical examiner for the purpose of identifying a deceased person.

Sec. 9. RCW 6.01.060 and 2019 c 371 s 2 and 2019 c 227 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certified mail" includes, for mailings to a foreign country, any form of mail that requires or permits a return receipt.

(2) "Consumer debt" means any obligation or alleged obligation of a consumer to pay money arising out of a transaction in which the money, property, insurance, or services which are the subject of the transaction are primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. Consumer debt includes medical debt.

(3) "Medical debt" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.16.100.

(4) "Private student loan" means any loan not guaranteed by the federal or state government that is used solely for personal use to finance postsecondary education and costs of attendance at an educational institution. A private student loan includes a loan made solely to refinance a private student loan. A private student loan does not include an extension of credit made under an open-end consumer credit plan, a reverse mortgage transaction, a residential mortgage transaction, or any other loan that is secured by real property or a dwelling.

(5) "Public auction sale by electronic media" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 36.16.145.

Sec. 10. RCW 6.21.030 and 1987 c 442 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the sale of real property under execution, order of sale, or decree, notice of the sale shall be given as follows:

(1) The judgment creditor shall:

(a) Not less than thirty days prior to the date of sale, cause a copy of the notice in the form provided in RCW 6.21.040 to be (i) served on the judgment debtor or debtors and each of them in the same manner as a summons in a civil action, or (ii) transmitted both by regular mail and by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the judgment debtor or debtors, and to each of them separately if there is more than one judgment debtor, at each judgment debtor's last known address; and

(b) Not less than thirty days prior to the date of sale, mail a copy of the notice of sale to the attorney of record for the judgment debtor, if any; and

(c) File an affidavit with the court that the judgment creditor has complied with the notice requirements of this section.

(2) The sheriff shall:

(a) For a period of not less than four weeks prior to the date of sale, post a notice in the form provided in RCW 6.21.040, particularly describing the property, in two public places in the county in which the property is located, one of which shall be at the courthouse door, ((where the property is to be sold,)) and in case of improved real estate, one of which shall be at the front door of the principal building constituting such improvement; and

(b) Publish a notice of the sale once a week, consecutively, for the same period, in any daily or weekly legal newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the real property to be sold is situated, but if there is more than one legal newspaper published in the county, then the plaintiff or moving party in the action, suit, or proceeding has the exclusive right to designate in which of the qualified newspapers the notice shall be published, and if there is no qualified legal newspaper published in the county, then the notice shall be published in a qualified legal newspaper published in a contiguous county, as designated by the plaintiff or moving party. The published notice shall be in substantially the following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON FOR . . . . COUNTY

Plaintiff,

vs.

Defendant.











CAUSE NO.

SHERIFF'S PUBLIC

NOTICE OF SALE OF

REAL PROPERTY

TO: [Judgment Debtor]

The Superior Court of . . . . . . County has directed the undersigned Sheriff of . . . . . . County to sell the property described below to satisfy a judgment in the above-entitled action. If developed, the property address is: . . . . . .

The sale of the above-described property is to take place:

Time: . . . .

Date: . . . .

Place: . . . .

The judgment debtor can avoid the sale by paying the judgment amount of $ . . . ., together with interest, costs, and fees, before the sale date. For the exact amount, contact the sheriff at the address stated below:

. . . . . . SHERIFF-DIRECTOR, . . . . . . COUNTY, WASHINGTON.

By . . . . . . . . . ., Deputy

Address . . . .

City . . . .

Washington 9. . . .

Phone (. . .) . . . .

(c) If the sale is to take place via electronic media, notice of the public sale shall also be posted on the website hosting the auction sale for a period not less than four weeks prior to the date of sale.

Sec. 11. RCW 6.21.040 and 2016 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The notice of sale shall be printed or typed and shall be in substantially the following form, except that if the sale is not pursuant to a judgment of foreclosure of a mortgage or a statutory lien, the notice shall also contain a statement that the sheriff has been informed that there is not sufficient personal property to satisfy the judgment and that if the judgment debtor or debtors do have sufficient personal property to satisfy the judgment, the judgment debtor or debtors should contact the sheriff's office immediately:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON FOR . . . . COUNTY

Plaintiff,

vs.

Defendant.











CAUSE NO.

SHERIFF'S NOTICE TO

JUDGMENT DEBTOR OF

SALE OF REAL PROPERTY

TO: [Judgment Debtor]

The Superior Court of . . . . . . County has directed the undersigned Sheriff of . . . . . . County to sell the property described below to satisfy a judgment in the above-entitled action. The property to be sold is described on the reverse side of this notice. If developed, the property address is: . . . . . .

The sale of the above-described property is to take place:

Time: . . . . . .

Date: . . . . . .

Place: . . . . . .

if the sale is to be conducted by electronic media, include the web address of the sale website.

The judgment debtor can avoid the sale by paying the judgment amount of $ . . . ., together with interest, costs, and fees, before the sale date. For the exact amount, contact the sheriff at the address stated below:

This property is subject to: (check one)

□ 1. No redemption rights after sale.

□ 2. A redemption period of eight months which will expire at 4:30 p.m. on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

□ 3. A redemption period of one year which will expire at 4:30 p.m. on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

The judgment debtor or debtors or any of them may redeem the above described property at any time up to the end of the redemption period by paying the amount bid at the sheriff's sale plus additional costs, taxes, assessments, certain other amounts, fees, and interest. If you are interested in redeeming the property contact the undersigned sheriff at the address stated below to determine the exact amount necessary to redeem.

IMPORTANT NOTICE: IF THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR OR DEBTORS DO NOT REDEEM THE PROPERTY BY 4:30 p.m. ON THE . . . . DAY OF . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., THE END OF THE REDEMPTION PERIOD, THE PURCHASER AT THE SHERIFF'S SALE WILL BECOME THE OWNER AND MAY EVICT THE OCCUPANT FROM THE PROPERTY UNLESS THE OCCUPANT IS A TENANT HOLDING UNDER AN UNEXPIRED LEASE. IF THE PROPERTY TO BE SOLD

IS OCCUPIED AS A PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE BY THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR OR DEBTORS AT THE TIME OF SALE, HE, SHE, THEY, OR ANY OF THEM MAY HAVE THE RIGHT TO RETAIN POSSESSION DURING THE REDEMPTION PERIOD, IF ANY, WITHOUT PAYMENT OF ANY RENT OR OCCUPANCY FEE. THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR MAY ALSO HAVE A RIGHT TO RETAIN POSSESSION DURING ANY REDEMPTION PERIOD IF THE PROPERTY IS USED FOR FARMING OR IF THE PROPERTY IS BEING SOLD UNDER A MORTGAGE THAT SO PROVIDES.

. . . . . . SHERIFF-DIRECTOR, . . . . . . COUNTY, WASHINGTON.

By . . . . . . . . . ., Deputy

Address . . . . . . . . . .

City . . . . . . . . . .

Washington 9 . . . .

Phone ( . . .) . . . . . . . . . .

Sec. 12. RCW 6.21.050 and 1987 c 442 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All sales of property under execution, order of sale, or decree, shall be made by auction between nine o'clock in the morning and four o'clock in the afternoon. Sale of a public franchise under execution or order of sale on foreclosure must be made at the front door of the courthouse in the county in which the franchise was granted or by public auction sale by electronic media. Sales of real property shall be made at the courthouse door or by public auction sale by electronic media on Friday unless Friday is a legal holiday and then the sale shall be held on the next following regular business day.

(2) If at the time appointed for the sale the sheriff is prevented from attending at the place appointed or, being present, should deem it for the advantage of all concerned to postpone the sale for want of purchasers, or other sufficient cause, the sheriff may postpone the sale not exceeding one week next after the day appointed, and so from time to time for the like cause, giving notice of every adjournment by public proclamation made at the same time, and by posting written notices of such adjournment under the notices of sale originally posted. The sheriff for like causes may also adjourn the sale from time to time, not exceeding thirty days beyond the day at which the writ is made returnable, with the consent of the plaintiff indorsed upon the writ.

Sec. 13. RCW 6.21.090 and 1987 c 442 s 609 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The form and manner of selling real estate by execution shall be as follows: The sheriff shall proclaim aloud at the place of sale, in the hearing of all the bystanders: "I am about to sell the following tracts of real estate (here reading the description,) upon the following execution:" (here reading the execution). The sheriff shall also state the amount that is required upon the execution, which shall include damages, interests and costs up to the day of sale, and increased costs. The sheriff shall then offer the land for sale.

(b) If the sale is by electronic media, a copy of the execution shall be posted on the website hosting the auction sale. The website shall also include a statement from the sheriff that states the amount that is required upon the execution, which shall include damages, interests and costs up to the day of sale, and increased costs. The sheriff shall then offer the land for sale.

(2) If the sale is of real property consisting of several known lots or parcels, they shall be sold separately or otherwise as the sheriff deems likely to bring the highest price, except that if an interest in a portion of such real property is claimed by a third person who, by request directed to the sheriff in writing prior to the sale or orally or in writing at the sale before the bidding is begun, requests that it be sold separately, such portion shall be sold separately. Bids on all land except town lots may be by the acre or by tract or parcel.

(3) If the land is sold by the acre and any fewer number of acres than the whole tract or parcel is sold, it shall be measured off to the purchaser in a square form, from the northeast corner of the tract or parcel, unless some person claiming an interest in the land, by request directed to the sheriff in writing prior to the sale or orally or in writing at the sale before the bidding is begun, requests that the land sold be taken from some other part or in some other form; in such case, if the request is reasonable, the officer making the sale shall sell accordingly.

(4) If an entire tract or parcel of land is sold by the acre, it shall not be measured but shall be deemed and taken to contain the number of acres named in the description, and be paid for accordingly; and if the number of acres is not contained in the description, the officer shall declare according to his or her judgment how many acres are contained therein, which shall be deemed and taken to be the true number of acres.

Sec. 14. RCW 6.21.100 and 1987 c 442 s 610 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The officer shall strike off the land to the highest bidder, who shall forthwith pay the money bid to the officer((, who shall return the money with the execution and the report of proceedings on the execution to the clerk of the court from which the execution issued: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That when))or to their agent conducting the sale by electronic media. The sheriff or their agent conducting the sale by electronic media shall tender the money to the clerk of the court that issued the writ.

(b) When final judgment shall have been entered in the supreme court or the court of appeals and the execution upon which sale has been made issued from said court, the return shall be made to the superior court in which the action was originally commenced, and the same proceedings shall be had as though execution had issued from that superior court.

(2) At the time of the sale, the sheriff shall prepare a certificate of the sale, containing a particular description of the property sold, the price bid for each distinct lot or parcel, and the whole price paid; and when subject to redemption, it shall be so stated. The matters contained in such certificate shall be substantially stated in the sheriff's return of proceedings upon the writ. Upon receipt of the purchase price, the sheriff shall give a copy of the certificate to the purchaser and the original certificate to the clerk of the court with the return on the execution to hold for delivery to the purchaser upon confirmation of the sale.

Sec. 15. RCW 84.56.020 and 2019 c 332 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Treasurers' tax collection duties.

(1) The county treasurer must be the receiver and collector of all taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or officer for the use of his or her county. No treasurer may accept tax payments or issue receipts for the same until the treasurer has completed the tax roll for the current year's collection and provided notification of the completion of the roll. Notification may be accomplished electronically, by posting a notice in the office, or through other written communication as determined by the treasurer. All real and personal property taxes and assessments made payable by the provisions of this title are due and payable to the county treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of April and, except as provided in this section, are delinquent after that date.

Tax statements.

(2)(a) Tax statements for the current year's collection must be distributed to each taxpayer on or before March 15th provided that:

(i) All city and other taxing district budgets have been submitted to county legislative authorities by November 30th per RCW 84.52.020;

(ii) The county legislative authority in turn has certified taxes levied to the county assessor by November 30th per RCW 84.52.070; and

(iii) The county assessor has delivered the tax roll to the county treasurer by January 15th per RCW 84.52.080.

(b) Each tax statement must include a notice that checks for payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . . County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements may not include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other individual.

(c) Each tax statement distributed to an address must include a notice with information describing the:

(i) Property tax exemption program pursuant to RCW 84.36.379 through 84.36.389; and

(ii) Property tax deferral program pursuant to chapter 84.38 RCW.

Tax payment due dates.

On-time tax payments: First-half taxes paid by April 30th and second-half taxes paid by October 31st.

(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax is paid on or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax is due and payable on or before the following thirty-first day of October and is delinquent after that date.

Delinquent tax payments for current year: First-half taxes paid after April 30th.

(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot, block or tract of real property, personal property, or on any mobile home payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax is paid after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax is due and payable on or before the following thirty-first day of October and is delinquent after that date.

Delinquent tax payments: Interest, penalties, and treasurer duties.

(5) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the amount of tax delinquent from the date of delinquency until paid. Interest must be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of the tax payment, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent. In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to penalties as follows:

(a) A penalty of three percent of the amount of tax delinquent is assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year in which the tax is due.

(b) An additional penalty of eight percent is assessed on the delinquent tax amount on December 1st of the year in which the tax is due.

(c) If a taxpayer is successfully participating in a payment agreement under subsection (15)(b) of this section or a partial payment program pursuant to subsection (15)(c) of this section, the county treasurer may not assess additional penalties on delinquent taxes that are included within the payment agreement. Interest and penalties that have been assessed prior to the payment agreement remain due and payable as provided in the payment agreement.

(6) A county treasurer must provide notification to each taxpayer whose taxes have become delinquent under subsections (4) and (5) of this section. The delinquency notice must specify where the taxpayer can obtain information regarding:

(a) Any current tax or special assessments due as of the date of the notice;

(b) Any delinquent tax or special assessments due, including any penalties and interest, as of the date of the notice; and

(c) Where the taxpayer can pay his or her property taxes directly and contact information, including but not limited to the phone number, for the statewide foreclosure hotline recommended by the Washington state housing finance commission.

(7) Within ninety days after the expiration of two years from the date of delinquency (when a taxpayer's taxes have become delinquent), the county treasurer must provide the name and property address of the delinquent taxpayer to a homeownership resource center or any other designated local or state entity recommended by the Washington state housing finance commission.

Collection of foreclosure costs.

(8)(a) When real property taxes become delinquent and prior to the filing of the certificate of delinquency, the treasurer is authorized to assess and collect tax foreclosure avoidance costs.

(b) When tax foreclosure avoidance costs are collected, such costs must be credited to the county treasurer service fund account, except as otherwise directed.

(c) For purposes of chapter 84.64 RCW, any taxes, interest, or penalties deemed delinquent under this section remain delinquent until such time as all taxes, interest, and penalties for the tax year in which the taxes were first due and payable have been paid in full.

Periods of armed conflict.

(9) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest or penalties may be assessed during any period of armed conflict regarding delinquent taxes imposed on the personal residences owned by active duty military personnel who are participating as part of one of the branches of the military involved in the conflict and assigned to a duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the United States.

State of emergency.

(10) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the county treasurer, on his or her own motion or at the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due date of any taxes payable under this section as the treasurer deems proper.

Retention of funds from interest.

(11) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes must be credited to the county current expense fund.

(12) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest and penalties.

Retention of funds from property foreclosures and sales.

(13) The direct cost of foreclosure and sale of real property, and the direct fees and costs of distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, must, when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale; and must be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray the cost of further foreclosure, distraint, and sale because of delinquent taxes without regard to budget limitations and not subject to indirect costs of other charges.

Tax due dates and options for tax payment collections.

Electronic billings and payments.

(14) For purposes of this chapter, and in accordance with this section and RCW 36.29.190, the treasurer may collect taxes, assessments, fees, rates, interest, and charges by electronic billing and payment. Electronic billing and payment may be used as an option by the taxpayer, but the treasurer may not require the use of electronic billing and payment. Electronic bill presentment and payment may be on a monthly or other periodic basis as the treasurer deems proper for:

(a) Delinquent tax year payments; and

(b) Prepayments of current tax.

Tax payments.

Prepayment for current taxes.

(15)(a) The treasurer may accept prepayments for current year taxes by any means authorized. All prepayments must be paid in full by the due date specified in subsection (16) of this section.

Payment agreements for current year taxes.

(b)(i) The treasurer may provide, by electronic means or otherwise, a payment agreement that provides for payment of current year taxes, inclusive of prepayment collection charges. The payment agreement must be signed by the taxpayer and treasurer or the treasurer's deputy prior to the sending of an electronic or alternative bill, which includes a payment plan for current year taxes.

Payment agreements for delinquent year taxes.

(ii)(A) The treasurer may provide, by electronic means or otherwise, a payment agreement for payment of past due delinquencies. The payment agreement must be signed by the taxpayer and treasurer or the treasurer's deputy prior to the sending of an electronic or alternative bill, which includes a payment plan for past due delinquent taxes and charges.

(B) Tax payments received by a treasurer for delinquent year taxes from a taxpayer participating on a payment agreement must be applied first to the oldest delinquent year unless such taxpayer requests otherwise.

Partial payments: Acceptance of partial payments for current and delinquent taxes.

(c)(i) In addition to the payment agreement program in (b) of this subsection, the treasurer may accept partial payment of any current and delinquent taxes including interest and penalties by any means authorized including electronic bill presentment and payments.

(ii) All tax payments received by a treasurer for delinquent year taxes from a taxpayer paying a partial payment must be applied first to the oldest delinquent year unless such taxpayer requests otherwise.

Payment for delinquent taxes.

(d) Payments on past due taxes must include collection of the oldest delinquent year, which includes interest, penalties, and taxes within an eighteen-month period, prior to filing a certificate of delinquency under chapter 84.64 RCW or distraint pursuant to RCW 84.56.070.

Due date for tax payments.

(16) All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the provisions of this title are due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of April and are delinquent after that date. The remainder of the tax is due and payable on or before the following thirty-first of October and is delinquent after that date. All other assessments, fees, rates, and charges are delinquent after the due date.

Electronic funds transfers.

(17) A county treasurer may authorize payment of:

(a) Any current property taxes due under this chapter by electronic funds transfers on a monthly or other periodic basis; and

(b) Any past due property taxes, penalties, and interest under this chapter by electronic funds transfers on a monthly or other periodic basis. Delinquent taxes are subject to interest and penalties, as provided in subsection (5) of this section. All tax payments received by a treasurer from a taxpayer paying delinquent year taxes must be applied first to the oldest delinquent year unless such taxpayer requests otherwise.

Payment for administering prepayment collections.

(18) The treasurer must pay any collection costs, investment earnings, or both on past due payments or prepayments to the credit of a county treasurer service fund account to be created and used only for the payment of expenses incurred by the treasurer, without limitation, in administering the system for collecting prepayments.

Waiver of interest and penalties for qualified taxpayers subject to foreclosure.

(19) No earlier than sixty days prior to the date that is three years after the date of delinquency, the treasurer must waive all outstanding interest and penalties on delinquent taxes due from a taxpayer if the property is subject to an action for foreclosure under chapter 84.64 RCW and the following requirements are met:

(a) The taxpayer is income-qualified under RCW 84.36.381(5)(a), as verified by the county assessor;

(b) The taxpayer occupies the property as their principal place of residence; and

(c) The taxpayer has not previously received a waiver on the property as provided under this subsection.

Definitions.

(20) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Electronic billing and payment" means statements, invoices, or bills that are created, delivered, and paid using the internet. The term includes an automatic electronic payment from a person's checking account, debit account, or credit card.

(b) "Internet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.270.010.

(c) "Tax foreclosure avoidance costs" means those direct costs associated with the administration of properties subject to and prior to foreclosure. Tax foreclosure avoidance costs include:

(i) Compensation of employees for the time devoted to administering the avoidance of property foreclosure; and

(ii) The cost of materials, services, or equipment acquired, consumed, or expended in administering tax foreclosure avoidance prior to the filing of a certificate of delinquency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022.

--- END ---