BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By the beginning of the 2022-23 school year, school districts and private schools must make menstrual hygiene products available at no cost in all gender-neutral bathrooms and bathrooms designated for female students located in schools that serve students in any of grades six through twelve. If a school building serving grades six through twelve does not have a gender-neutral bathroom, then the products must also be available in at least one bathroom accessible to male students or in a school health room accessible to all students. For schools that serve students in grades three through five, school districts and private schools must make menstrual hygiene products available in a school health room or other location as designated by the school principal.

(2) Menstrual hygiene products must include sanitary napkins, tampons, or similar items.

(3) School districts and private schools must bear the cost of supplying menstrual hygiene products. School districts and private schools may seek grants or partner with nonprofit or community-based organizations to fulfill this obligation.

(4) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) By the beginning of the 2022-23 academic year, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 must make menstrual hygiene products available at no cost in all gender-neutral bathrooms and bathrooms designated for female students.

(2) Menstrual hygiene products must include sanitary napkins, tampons, or similar items.

(3) Institutions of higher education must bear the cost of supplying menstrual hygiene products. Institutions of higher education may seek grants or partner with nonprofit or community-based organizations to fulfill this obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 2 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2021, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---