BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.47.020 and 1991 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of a border area jurisdiction may, by resolution for the purposes authorized in this chapter and by approval of a majority of the registered voters of the jurisdiction voting on the proposition at a general or special election, fix and impose an excise tax on the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel within the jurisdiction. An election held under this section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition ((shall))must state the tax rate that is proposed. The rate of such tax ((shall be in increments of one-tenth of a cent per gallon and shall))may not exceed ((one cent))two cents per gallon in 2021. This two cents per gallon maximum tax rate may be adjusted to reflect the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce, for the period of time between 2021 and when the tax is placed on the ballot for voter approval.

(2) The tax imposed in this section shall be collected and paid to the jurisdiction but once in respect to any motor vehicle fuel or special fuel. This tax shall be in addition to any other tax authorized or imposed by law.

(3) For purposes of this chapter, the term "border area jurisdictions" means all cities and towns within ten miles of an international border crossing and any transportation benefit district established under RCW 36.73.020 which has within its boundaries an international border crossing.

--- END ---