BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.42.090 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 ((shall))must be transmitted to the state treasurer and ((shall))must be credited to the aeronautics account hereby created in the state treasury.

(2) Moneys collected from the consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall))must be transmitted to the state treasurer and distributed as follows:

(a)(i) During the period from July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2023, an amount equivalent to imposing one-half of one percent tax must be credited to the aeronautics account; and

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2023, an amount equivalent to imposing a one percent tax must be credited to the aeronautics account; and

(b) An amount equivalent to six and five-tenths percent minus the amount in (a) of this subsection must be credited to the state general fund.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2021, the aviation division of the department of transportation must track the amount of additional funds awarded for airport projects through the airport aid grant program. The aviation division of the department of transportation must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature for the years 2021 to 2027, and thereafter as needed. The report must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A short description of each airport project funded;

(b) The state grant amount from the aeronautics account contributed to each project;

(c) The amount of federal matching funds contributed to the project; and

(d) The amount of local airport sponsor matching funds contributed to the project.

(4) At the end of fiscal close of each biennium, beginning June 30, 2022, the aviation division of the department of transportation must report to the senate ways and means, house appropriations, and the transportation committees of the legislature the estimated amount of funds returned to the general fund giving consideration of sales and business and occupation taxes generated as a result of the funded airport projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---