BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.210 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 330 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An authority is authorized to establish, by resolution, a schedule of fines and penalties for civil infractions established in RCW 81.112.220. Fines established by an authority shall not exceed those imposed for class 1 infractions under RCW 7.80.120.

(b) An authority is further authorized to establish, by resolution, an alternative fare enforcement system, which may include: (i) The issuance of notices of violation subject to fines not exceeding the amounts authorized in (a) of this subsection or nonmonetary sanctions or both, and (ii) resolve notices of violations and appeals, in addition to or as a replacement for the schedule of fines and penalties authorized by (a) of this subsection.

(2)(a) An authority may designate persons to monitor fare payment who are equivalent to and are authorized to exercise all the powers of an enforcement officer, defined in RCW 7.80.040. An authority is authorized to employ personnel to either monitor fare payment, or to contract for such services, or both.

(b) In addition to the specific powers granted to enforcement officers under RCW 7.80.050 and 7.80.060, persons designated to monitor fare payment also have the authority to take the following actions:

(i) Request proof of payment from passengers;

(ii) Request personal identification from a passenger who does not produce proof of payment when requested;

(iii)(A) Issue a notice of infraction for a civil infraction established in RCW 81.112.220.

(B) The notice of infraction form to be used for violations under this subsection must be approved by the administrative office of the courts and must not include vehicle information; ((and))

(iv) Issue a notice of violation of the alternative fare enforcement system authorized in subsection (1)(b) of this section; and

(v) Request that a passenger leave the authority facility when the passenger has not produced proof of payment after being asked to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

(3) Authorities shall keep records of citations in the manner prescribed by RCW 7.80.150. All civil infractions established by chapter 20, Laws of 1999 shall be heard ((and determined by a district or municipal court)) as provided in RCW 7.80.010 (1), (2), and (4).

Sec. 2. RCW 81.112.220 and 2012 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Persons traveling on facilities operated by an authority shall pay the fare established by the authority and shall produce proof of payment in accordance with the terms of use established by the authority. Such persons shall produce proof of payment when requested by a person designated to monitor fare payment. The required manner of producing proof of payment specified in the terms of use established by the authority may include, but is not limited to, requiring a person using an electronic fare payment card to validate the card by presenting the card to an electronic card reader before or upon entering a public transportation vehicle or a restricted fare paid area.

(2) The following constitute civil infractions punishable according to the schedule of fines and penalties established by the authority under RCW 81.112.210(1)(a) or violations punishable according to an alternative fare enforcement system established by the authority under RCW 81.112.210(1)(b):

(a) Failure to pay the required fare, except when the authority fails to meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section;

(b) Failure to produce proof of payment in the manner required by the terms of use established by the authority including, but not limited to, the failure to produce a validated fare payment card when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment; and

(c) Failure to depart the facility when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

(3) If fare payment is required before entering a transit vehicle, as defined in RCW 9.91.025(2)(b), or before entering a fare paid area in a transit facility, as defined in RCW 9.91.025(2)(a), signage must be conspicuously posted at the place of boarding or within ((ten))10 feet of the nearest entrance to a transit facility that clearly indicates: (a) The locations where tickets or fare media may be purchased; and (b) that a person using an electronic fare payment card must present the card to an electronic card reader before entering a transit vehicle or before entering a restricted fare paid area.

--- END ---