BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that local school district boards of directors have the authority to put capital bond votes before their voters, but often lack the basic understanding of legal requirements related to public works projects. Better informed school boards of directors are likely to take greater responsibility in selecting responsible contractors and enforcing public works legal obligations. Better understanding of public works obligations and opportunities may lead to lower overall project costs, more money retained locally, and opportunities to develop a workforce pipeline for family-wage jobs and careers within the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Prior to approving a bond authorization for voter consideration, any member of a school district board of directors voting to approve that bond authorization must have received training on basic legal requirements and opportunities of public sector capital projects. Any member of a school district board of directors voting to approve a bond authorization for voter consideration must have received the training required by this section in the six-year period preceding their vote. This training must include, but is not limited to:

(a) Apprenticeship utilization requirements;

(b) Prevailing wage requirements; and

(c) The opportunity for school districts, general contractors, and labor organizations to provide perspectives on project labor agreements and community workforce agreements.

(2) School districts and educational service districts are encouraged to provide the required training under subsection (1) of this section using a regional model with the assistance and materials provided by the Washington state department of labor and industries, labor organizations, and associations representing general contractors.

(3) In partnership with the Washington state department of labor and industries, labor organizations, and associations representing general contractors, the Washington state school directors' association shall draft a model policy and procedure to meet the training requirements established by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect September 1, 2022.

--- END ---