BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.205.095 and 2019 c 444 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall issue a trainee certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that he or she is working toward the education and experience requirements in RCW 18.205.090.

(2) A trainee certified under this section shall submit to the secretary for approval a declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that he or she is enrolled in an approved education program or an apprenticeship program registered and approved under chapter 49.04 RCW and approved by the secretary, and actively pursuing the experience requirements in RCW 18.205.090. This declaration must be updated with the trainee's annual renewal.

(3) A trainee certified under this section may practice only under the supervision of a certified substance use disorder professional. The first fifty hours of any face-to-face client contact must be under direct observation. All remaining experience must be under supervision in accordance with rules adopted by the department.

(4) A certified substance use disorder professional trainee provides substance use disorder assessments, counseling, and case management with a state regulated agency and can provide clinical services to patients consistent with his or her education, training, and experience as approved by his or her supervisor.

(5) A trainee certification may only be renewed four times.

(6) Applicants are subject to denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130 RCW.

(7) As of July 28, 2019, a person certified under this chapter holding the title of chemical dependency professional trainee is considered to hold the title of substance use disorder professional trainee until such time as the person's present certification expires or is renewed.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.205.090 and 2019 c 444 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Completion of an educational program approved by the secretary, an apprenticeship program registered and approved under chapter 49.04 RCW and approved by the secretary, or successful completion of alternate training that meets established criteria;

(b) Successful completion of an approved examination, based on core competencies of substance use disorder counseling; and

(c) Successful completion of an experience requirement that establishes fewer hours of experience for applicants with higher levels of relevant education. In meeting any experience requirement established under this subsection, the secretary may not require more than one thousand five hundred hours of experience in substance use disorder counseling for applicants who are licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW or under chapter 18.79 RCW as advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

(3) Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) Certified substance use disorder professionals shall not be required to be registered under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

(5) As of July 28, 2019, a person certified under this chapter holding the title of chemical dependency professional is considered to hold the title of substance use disorder professional until such time as the person's present certification expires or is renewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

Educational requirements for an apprenticeship for substance use
disorder professionals must be defined by the secretary of health
under RCW 18.205.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The department of health may adopt any rules necessary to implement this act.

--- END ---