BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.153 and 2020 c 302 s 16 and 2020 c 5 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility if available with adequate space for the person, or approved substance use disorder treatment program if available with adequate space for the person, for not more than one hundred twenty hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, a peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under the following circumstances:

(i) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or

(ii) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a behavioral health disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.

(b) A peace officer's delivery of a person, to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program is subject to the availability of a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, triage facility that has elected to operate as an involuntary facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(4) Within three hours after arrival, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional. Within twelve hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. In conjunction with this evaluation, the facility where the patient is located must inquire as to a person's veteran status or eligibility for veterans benefits and, if the person appears to be potentially eligible for these benefits, inquire whether the person would be amenable to treatment by the veterans health administration compared to other relevant treatment options. This information must be shared with the designated crisis responder. If the person has been identified as being potentially eligible for veterans health administration services and as being amenable for those services, and if appropriate in light of all reasonably available information about the person's circumstances, the designated crisis responder must first refer the person to the veterans health administration for mental health or substance use disorder treatment at a facility capable of meeting the needs of the person including, but not limited to, the involuntary treatment options available at the Seattle division of the VA Puget Sound health care system. If the person is accepted for treatment by the veterans health administration, and is willing to accept treatment by the veterans health administration as an alternative to other available treatment options, the designated crisis responder, the veterans health administration, and the facility where the patient is located will work to make arrangements to have the person transported to a veterans health administration facility. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the behavioral health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(5) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated crisis responder has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.153 and 2020 c 302 s 17 and 2020 c 5 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, for not more than one hundred twenty hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(2) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under the following circumstances:

(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a behavioral health disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.

(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, triage facility that has elected to operate as an involuntary facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(4) Within three hours after arrival, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional. Within twelve hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. In conjunction with this evaluation, the facility where the patient is located must inquire as to a person's veteran status or eligibility for veterans benefits and, if the person appears to be potentially eligible for these benefits, inquire whether the person would be amenable to treatment by the veterans health administration compared to other relevant treatment options. This information must be shared with the designated crisis responder. If the person has been identified as being potentially eligible for veterans health administration services and as being amenable for those services, and if appropriate in light of all reasonably available information about the person's circumstances, the designated crisis responder must first refer the person to the veterans health administration for mental health or substance use disorder treatment at a facility capable of meeting the needs of the person including, but not limited to, the involuntary treatment options available at the Seattle division of the VA Puget Sound health care system. If the person is accepted for treatment by the veterans health administration, and is willing to accept treatment by the veterans health administration as an alternative to other available treatment options, the designated crisis responder, the veterans health administration, and the facility where the patient is located will work to make arrangements to have the person transported to a veterans health administration facility. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the behavioral health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(5) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated crisis responder has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.

--- END ---