BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act shall be known and cited as Evelyn's law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

An osteopathic physician and surgeon shall refer a person who is 18 years of age or younger to a children's specialty health care facility that can provide specialized diagnostic services, including genetic testing, unless the person is currently receiving care in such a facility, if the person has experienced any neurological or physical symptoms, including but not limited to seizures or missing developmental milestones that an osteopathic physician and surgeon determines requires a referral to a specialty health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

A physician shall refer a person who is 18 years of age or younger to a children's specialty health care facility that can provide specialized diagnostic services, including genetic testing, unless the person is currently receiving care in such a facility, if the person has experienced any neurological or physical symptoms, including but not limited to seizures or missing developmental milestones that a physician determines requires a referral to a specialty health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:

A physician's assistant shall refer a person who is 18 years of age or younger to a children's specialty health care facility that can provide specialized diagnostic services, including genetic testing, unless the person is currently receiving care in such a facility, if the person has experienced any neurological or physical symptoms, including but not limited to seizures or missing developmental milestones that a physician's assistant determines requires a referral to a specialty health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

An advanced registered nurse practitioner shall refer a person who is 18 years of age or younger to a children's specialty health care facility that can provide specialized diagnostic services, including genetic testing, unless the person is currently receiving care in such a facility, if the person has experienced any neurological or physical symptoms, including but not limited to seizures or missing developmental milestones that an advanced registered nurse practitioner determines requires a referral to a specialty health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, a health carrier must provide coverage for genetic testing including up to a full genome panel as determined by the ordering practitioner to identify potential causes of seizures, neurological symptoms, or other physical symptoms as determined by the health care provider in persons who are 18 years of age or younger.

(2) If the health plan imposes any deductible, genetic testing benefits must be included for purposes of meeting the deductible requirement. A health plan may subject coverage of genetic testing to copayment or coinsurance requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, must provide coverage for genetic testing including up to a full genome panel as determined by the ordering practitioner to identify potential causes of seizures, neurological symptoms, or other physical symptoms as determined by the health care provider in persons who are 18 years of age or younger.

(2) If the health plan imposes any deductible, genetic testing benefits must be included for purposes of meeting the deductible requirement. A health plan may subject coverage of genetic testing to copayment or coinsurance requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed health care system must provide coverage for genetic testing including up to a full genome panel as determined by the ordering practitioner to identify potential causes of seizures, neurological symptoms, or other physical symptoms as determined by the health care provider in persons who are 18 years of age or younger.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit or modify informed consent and parental consent requirements for genetic testing or any other health care service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect January 1, 2022.

--- END ---