BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) A task force on unclaimed property is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from the senate;

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from the house of representatives;

(iii) The director of the department of revenue or the director's designee;

(iv) The state treasurer or the treasurer's designee; and

(v) The state treasurer shall appoint one member representing underrepresented people or people of lower incomes.

(b) The task force shall be chaired by the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(2) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) How to increase public awareness and notice of unclaimed property; and

(b) How to improve public access and remove barriers for the public to claim unclaimed property.

(3) Staff support to the task force must be provided by the office of the treasurer.

(4) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2023.

(7) This section expires February 1, 2023.

--- END ---