BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to any:

(a) Person performing custom farming services for a farmer, when the person performing the custom farming services is: (i) An eligible farmer; or (ii) at least 50 percent owned by an eligible farmer; or

(b) Person performing farm management services, contract labor services, services provided with respect to animals that are agricultural products, or any combination of these services, for a farmer or for a person performing custom farming services, when the person performing the farm management services, contract labor services, services with respect to animals, or any combination of these services, and the farmer or person performing custom farming services are related.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)(i) "Custom farming services" means the performance of specific farming operations through the use of any farm machinery or equipment, farm implement, or draft animal, together with an operator, when: (A) The specific farming operation consists of activities directly related to the growing, raising, or producing of any agricultural product to be sold or consumed by a farmer; and (B) the performance of the specific farming operation is for, and under a contract with, or the direction or supervision of, a farmer. "Custom farming services" does not include the custom application of fertilizers, chemicals, or biologicals, or any services related to the growing, raising, or producing of marijuana.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(a), "specific farming operation" includes specific planting, cultivating, or harvesting activities, or similar specific farming operations. The term does not include veterinary services as defined in RCW 18.92.010; farrier, boarding, training, or appraisal services; artificial insemination or stud services, or agricultural consulting services; packing or processing of agricultural products; or pumping or other waste disposal services.

(b) "Eligible farmer" means a person who is eligible for an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855 at the time that the custom farming services are rendered, regardless of whether the person has applied for an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.

(c) "Farm management services" means the consultative decisions made for the operations of the farm including, but not limited to, determining which crops to plant, the choice and timing of application of fertilizers and chemicals, the horticultural practices to apply, the marketing of crops and livestock, and the care and feeding of animals. "Farm management services" does not include any services related to the growing, raising, or producing of marijuana.

(d) "Related" means having any of the relationships specifically described in section 267(b) (1), (2), and (4) through (13) of the internal revenue code, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall not apply to any person hauling agricultural products or farm machinery or equipment for a farmer or for a person performing custom farming services, when the person providing the hauling and the farmer or person performing custom farming services are related.

(2) The exemption provided by this section shall not apply to the hauling of any substances or articles manufactured from agricultural products. For the purposes of this subsection, "manufactured" has the same meaning as "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120.

(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in sections 1 and 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2021 (sections 1 and 2 of this act). This performance statement is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or to be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to reduce structural inefficiencies in the tax structure, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(d).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide tax relief to farmers, including those who changed their farm structure in response to federal regulations regarding irrigated water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808(4) do not apply to this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---