BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that due to the pandemic caused by COVID-19, Washington high school athletes have not been able to participate in athletic programs. This has resulted in a reduced opportunity to showcase athletic talents that help these students get recruited by and receive athletic scholarships from universities and colleges. The legislature therefore intends to support Washington athletes by requiring the state's public four-year institutions of higher education to devote a portion of athletic scholarship funding to Washington athletes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2022-23 academic year and until the 2025-26 academic year, the public four-year institutions of higher education must reserve at least 50 percent of available athletic scholarship funding for newly recruited student athletes graduating from Washington public high schools, Washington private high schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or Washington community or technical colleges.

(2) This section expires December 31, 2026.

--- END ---