BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any criteria used by the state to allocate vaccine doses for the COVID-19 virus must include the following persons in the category of critical workers given first priority for receipt of the vaccine:

(a) Public and private school teachers;

(b) Classified on-site public school staff; and

(c) Private school employees who are the equivalent of classified on-site public school staff.

(2) This section supersedes any allocation criteria issued by the state prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---