BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, a retail pet store may not sell or offer for sale any dog or cat.

(2) A retail pet store that sold or offered for sale any dog prior to the effective date of this section may sell or offer for sale a dog.

--- END ---