BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "COVID-19" means a respiratory disease caused by the severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2).

(b) "COVID-19 pandemic emergency" means the state of emergency relating to the outbreak and spread of COVID-19 declared in the governor's proclamation 20-05 on February 29, 2020, and any renewals thereof.

(c) "COVID-19 restrictive orders" means the following orders of the governor related to the COVID-19 pandemic emergency, and any renewals thereof: 20-15, 20-20, 20-23, 20-28, 20-30, 20-31, 20-32, 20-36, 20-41, 20-43, 20-44, 20-45, 20-48, 20-49, 20-51, 20-52, 20-56, 20-59, 20-64, 20-65, 20-66, 20-69, and 20-74.

(2) Until 12 months after the cessation or withdrawal of any COVID-19 restrictive order and the COVID-19 pandemic emergency, the following authorizations are temporarily not required of any residential construction, commercial construction, industrial construction, industrial facility operations, or activities undertaken by a public port:

(a) A permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW;

(b) A permit issued under chapter 70A.15 RCW;

(c) A permit issued under chapter 77.55 RCW; and

(d) Any project permit as defined in RCW 36.70B.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

A permit under this chapter is not required for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

A permit under this chapter is not required for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 70A.15 RCW to read as follows:

A permit under this chapter is not required for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

A permit under this chapter is not required for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

An authorization or permit under critical areas ordinances established consistent with this chapter are not required for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW to read as follows:

A permit or approval is not required to be obtained from a city, town, or county for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A building permit is not required to be obtained from a city for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

A building permit is not required to be obtained from a code city for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

A building permit is not required to be obtained from a county for the activities described in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---