BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules to implement a limited mental health staff certificate that meets the requirements in this section.

(2) The role of a person with a limited mental health staff certificate is to provide trauma-informed counseling and supports to students who were impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic. The role of a person with a limited mental health staff certificate is not to provide academic counseling.

(3) Except for a person who has a restriction on a license or certificate for violation of chapter 18.130 RCW, a limited mental health staff certificate may be issued to an applicant who is licensed or certified in any of the following professions:

(a) Mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, social worker, or associate level providers in these professions, licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(b) Substance use disorder professional, or substance use disorder professional trainee, certified under chapter 18.205 RCW; or

(c) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(4) All limited mental health staff certificates expire July 1, 2025.

(5) Nothing in this section authorizes practice by a person licensed under the chapters set forth in subsection (3) of this section that is otherwise prohibited or restricted by any other law, including licensure statutes and rules and regulations adopted by the appropriate licensure board or agency, from practicing or working in a school.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2021-22 school year, school districts must employ one person with either a school counselor certificate or a limited mental health staff certificate for every 150 full-time equivalent students.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2025.

--- END ---