BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that the ongoing coronavirus pandemic has led to the complete or partial discontinuation of in-person instruction for many students throughout Washington. As a result, schools, teachers, and students have, by necessity, pivoted to the broad use of internet-based remote instruction.

(2) Although virtual classrooms have proven satisfactory for many courses and subjects, some have proven more difficult than others to conduct remotely. Physical education courses, for example, often involve specialized facilities and equipment, and team-based competitive actions between students. These attributes are difficult to replicate or substitute in a remote instruction setting.

(3) In recognition of the challenges that can be associated with earning meaningful physical education credits during an ongoing pandemic, the legislature intends to promote alternative methods for earning physical education credit that would allow students in the graduating classes of 2021 and 2022 to earn credit through voluntary community service actions that would be approved by the district, consistent with any applicable administrative rules, and in compliance with state learning standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) School district boards of directors are encouraged to adopt policies that would enable students in the graduating classes of 2021 and 2022 to earn physical education credit through the performance of voluntary community service actions that meet appropriate safety and supervisory criteria and comply with requirements in the Washington state health and physical education K-12 learning standards.

(2) The state board of education may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---