BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, must provide coverage for wraparound services for persons who are under 21 years of age.

(2) Wraparound services include:

(a) Case management and care coordination;

(b) Counseling, including individual, family, group, youth, and vocational counseling;

(c) Crisis care and outreach;

(d) Education and special education services, including tutoring;

(e) Family support, independent living supports, self-help, or support groups;

(f) Psychiatric consultation and community-based in-patient psychiatric care;

(g) Legal services, protection, and advocacy;

(h) Recreation therapy;

(i) Residential treatment, including respite care;

(j) Small therapeutic group care; and

(k) Transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, a health carrier must provide coverage for wraparound services for persons who are under 21 years of age.

(2) Wraparound services include:

(a) Case management and care coordination;

(b) Counseling, including individual, family, group, youth, and vocational counseling;

(c) Crisis care and outreach;

(d) Education and special education services, including tutoring;

(e) Family support, independent living supports, self-help, or support groups;

(f) Psychiatric consultation and community-based in-patient psychiatric care;

(g) Legal services, protection, and advocacy;

(h) Recreation therapy;

(i) Residential treatment, including respite care;

(j) Small therapeutic group care; and

(k) Transportation.

--- END ---