BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.57 RCW to read as follows:

An authority may include in any of its contracts that provide for ambulance services for the transportation of the sick and injured provisions for training for the people that will be responsible for transporting the sick and injured. This authority is part of the powers granted in RCW 36.57.040(5)(b). The authority may engage the services of the training provider and the personnel transporting the sick and injured in separate contracts.

--- END ---