BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.30 RCW to read as follows:

The department has authority to regulate crab with respect to health and safety in relation to biotoxin contamination. For the purposes of this section, crab means any commercially harvested crab. By July 2023, the state board of health shall adopt rules regulating crab harvesting, tracking, and recalls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---