BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.92.205 and 2019 c 406 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other eligibility requirements outlined in this chapter, students who demonstrate financial need are eligible to receive the Washington college grant. Financial need is as follows:

(((1) Until academic year 2020-21, students with family incomes between zero and fifty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-one and seventy percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-one and fifty-five percent of the state median family income;

(b) Sixty-five percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income;

(c) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income; and

(d) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income.

(2) Beginning with academic year 2020-21, students))Students with family incomes between zero and ((fifty-five))70 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. Grants for students with incomes between ((fifty-six))71 and ((one hundred))100 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(((a) Seventy))(1) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between ((fifty-six and sixty))71 and 80 percent of the state median family income;

(((b) Sixty))(2) Twenty-five percent for students with family incomes between ((sixty-one and sixty-five))81 and 90 percent of the state median family income; and

(((c) Fifty))(3) Ten percent for students with family incomes between ((sixty-six and seventy))91 and 100 percent of the state median family income((;

(d) Twenty-four and one-half percent for students with family incomes between seventy-one and seventy-five percent of the state median family income; and

(e) Ten percent for students with family incomes between seventy-six and one hundred percent of the state median family income)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28B.92.060 (State need grant awards) and 2019 c 298 s 4 & 2012 c 229 s 558 are each repealed.

--- END ---