BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there are environmental advantages to having state agencies purchase paper that is produced in a manner that reduces carbon dioxide to combat climate change.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.19A.022 and 2015 c 225 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state agencies shall purchase, for use in office printers and copiers, (a) one hundred percent postconsumer recycled content white cut sheet bond paper ((used in office printers and copiers))or (b) paper that has at least 30 percent recycled content and is certified as responsibly sourced by a third-party certification entity approved by the department of enterprise services under subsection (4) of this section. State agencies are encouraged to give priority to purchasing from companies that produce paper in facilities that generate energy from a renewable energy source.

(2) State agencies that utilize office printers and copiers that, after reasonable attempts, cannot be calibrated to utilize such paper referenced in subsection (1) of this section, must for those models of equipment:

(a) Purchase paper at the highest recycled content that can be utilized efficiently by the copier or printer;

(b) At the time of lease renewal or at the end of the life cycle, either lease or purchase a model that will efficiently utilize ((one hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper))paper that complies with subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Printed projects that require the use of high volume production inserters or high-speed digital devices, such as those used by the department of enterprise services, are not required to meet the one hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper standard, but must ((utilize the highest recycled content that can be utilized efficiently by such equipment and not impede the business of agencies))still comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(4) The department of enterprise services shall identify for use by agencies ((one hundred percent recycled)) paper products that comply with subsection (1) of this section, and process efficiently through high-speed production equipment and do not impede the business of agencies. The department shall also identify, and approve, organizations that can certify paper as responsibly sourced.

--- END ---