BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the director, or the director's designee, of the department of commerce must appoint and maintain an aviation and aerospace advisory committee to generally advise the director of the department of commerce and the secretary of the department of transportation on matters related to aviation and aerospace in Washington state. This includes, but is not limited to, developing recommendations regarding capital budget requests related to aviation and aerospace needs and developing strategies to enhance the safe and effective use of public use airports and aerospace facilities in Washington state. The aviation and aerospace advisory committee must also advise the director and secretary, or their designees, and make recommendations on the following matters:

(a) Employment of emerging aviation and aerospace technologies to include unmanned, autonomous, and alternative propulsion systems;

(b) New, changed, or proposed federal regulations;

(c) Industry needs to remain nationally and internationally competitive;

(d) Policy considerations;

(e) Funding priorities and capital project needs;

(f) Methods to reduce greenhouse gas emissions;

(g) Workforce development needs and opportunities;

(h) Multimodal requirements;

(i) Planning, funding, and community integration for advanced air mobility infrastructure and operations; and

(j) Other matters pertaining to the aviation and aerospace industries as the aviation and aerospace advisory committee deems appropriate.

(2) The director of the department of commerce, or the director's designee, may appoint members to the aviation and aerospace advisory committee as the director or the director's designee determines is the most helpful in the discharge of the committee's duties. However, at a minimum, the director or the director's designee must invite the following:

(a) One senator from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One representative from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) Two county commissioners, one from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(d) An owner of an aviation company and an owner of an aerospace company or their representatives;

(e) The director or the director's designee of the aviation division of the department of transportation;

(f) Two individuals with the title of airport director, one from an airport located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one from an airport located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(g) Advisory members from the federal aviation administration;

(h) The aerospace lead from the department of commerce or a representative of the department;

(i) A representative of a statewide environmental organization;

(j) A representative of the military department;

(k) Representatives from airport associations;

(l) Representatives from an aviation and aerospace educational program;

(m) Representatives from both aviation and aerospace associations;

(n) A representative from the state board for community and technical colleges;

(o) A representative from a labor organization representing aerospace engineers; and

(p) A representative from a labor organization representing aerospace machinists.

(3) The director of the department of commerce and the secretary of the department of transportation or their designees serve as the administrative cochairs for the aviation and aerospace advisory committee.

(4) The department of commerce must provide staff support for all committee meetings.

(5) The aviation and aerospace advisory committee must meet at the call of the administrative cochairs for any purpose that directly relates to the duties set forth in subsection (1) of this section or as otherwise requested by the director, secretary, or their designees as the administrative cochairs.

(6) The cochairs may seek recommendations and input from the aviation and aerospace advisory committee to inform the legislature on aviation and aerospace issues.

(7) Each member of the aviation and aerospace advisory committee serves without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) The members of the aviation and aerospace advisory committee, or individuals acting on their behalf, are immune from civil liability for official acts performed in the course of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2023.

--- END ---