BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

At the request of a prospective licensee considering or in the process of becoming licensed as an agency under this chapter, the department shall:

(1) Meet with the individual to explain the licensure requirements; and

(2) Inspect the physical space that is contemplated for licensure and inform the prospective licensee of:

(a) Any changes needed to the physical space that are required for licensure; and

(b) Any other existing barriers to licensure.

--- END ---