BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The military department shall conduct a study to determine the quantity of commodities needed for a stockpile to supply Washington residents with the necessary emergency supplies, including but not limited to food, medicine, sanitation, and personal protective equipment, for a man-made or natural disaster lasting one year in length.

(2) The military department shall compile the results of the study in a report that includes recommendations for ways in which Washington could support local Washington businesses through its procurement practices for the stockpile. The report must also identify any benefits to both preparedness and resiliency from sourcing commodities for the stockpile from businesses close to Washington residents.

(3) The report is due to the relevant committees of the legislature and the governor by October 31, 2021.

(4) This section expires January 31, 2022.

--- END ---