BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.816 and 2019 c 287 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) The sale of batteries or fuel cells for electric vehicles, including batteries or fuel cells sold as a component of an electric bus at the time of the vehicle's sale;

(b) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving electric vehicle batteries or fuel cells;

(c) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, or improving battery or fuel cell electric vehicle infrastructure, including hydrogen fueling stations;

(d) The sale of tangible personal property that will become a component of battery or fuel cell electric vehicle infrastructure during the course of installing, constructing, repairing, or improving battery or fuel cell electric vehicle infrastructure; and

(e) The sale of zero emissions buses.

(2) Sellers may make tax exempt sales under this section only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data, except that the department may provide estimates of taxes exempted under this section until such time as retailers are able to report such exempted amounts on their tax returns.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(c) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery, and equipment necessary and integral to support a battery or fuel cell electric vehicle, including battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, battery exchange stations, fueling stations that provide hydrogen for fuel cell electric vehicles, green electrolytic hydrogen production facilities, and renewable hydrogen production facilities.

(d) "Green electrolytic hydrogen" means hydrogen produced through electrolysis, and does not include hydrogen manufactured using steam reforming or any other conversion technology that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock.

(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(((e)))(f) "Renewable hydrogen" means hydrogen produced using renewable resources both as the source for hydrogen and the source for the energy input into the production process.

(((f)))(g) "Renewable resource" means (i) water; (ii) wind; (iii) solar energy; (iv) geothermal energy; (v) renewable natural gas; (vi) renewable hydrogen; (vii) wave, ocean, or tidal power; (viii) biodiesel fuel that is not derived from crops raised on land cleared from old growth or first growth forests; or (ix) biomass energy.

(((g)))(h) "Zero emissions bus" means a bus that emits no exhaust gas from the onboard source of power, other than water vapor.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.816 and 2019 c 287 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of:

(a) Electric vehicle batteries or fuel cells, including batteries or fuel cells sold as a component of an electric bus at the time of the vehicle's sale;

(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving electric vehicle batteries or fuel cells;

(c) Tangible personal property that will become a component of battery or fuel cell electric vehicle infrastructure during the course of installing, constructing, repairing, or improving battery or fuel cell electric vehicle infrastructure; and

(d) Zero emissions buses.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(c) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery, and equipment necessary and integral to support a battery or fuel cell electric vehicle, including battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, battery exchange stations, fueling stations that provide hydrogen for fuel cell electric vehicles, green electrolytic hydrogen production facilities, and renewable hydrogen production facilities.

(d) "Green electrolytic hydrogen" means hydrogen produced through electrolysis, and does not include hydrogen manufactured using steam reforming or any other conversion technology that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock.

(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(((e)))(f) "Renewable hydrogen" means hydrogen produced using renewable resources both as the source for hydrogen and the source for the energy input into the production process.

(((f)))(g) "Renewable resource" means (i) water; (ii) wind; (iii) solar energy; (iv) geothermal energy; (v) renewable natural gas; (vi) renewable hydrogen; (vii) wave, ocean, or tidal power; (viii) biodiesel fuel that is not derived from crops raised on land cleared from old growth or first growth forests; or (ix) biomass energy.

(((g)))(h) "Zero emissions bus" means a bus that emits no exhaust gas from the onboard source of power, other than water vapor.

(3) On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data, except that the department may provide estimates of taxes exempted under this section until such time as retailers are able to report such exempted amounts on their tax returns.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.29A.125 and 2019 c 287 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Leasehold excise tax may not be imposed on leases to tenants of public lands for purposes of installing, maintaining, and operating electric vehicle infrastructure.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(c) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery, and equipment necessary and integral to support an electric vehicle, including battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, battery exchange stations, fueling stations that provide hydrogen for fuel cell electric vehicles, green electrolytic hydrogen production facilities, and renewable hydrogen production facilities.

(d) "Green electrolytic hydrogen" means hydrogen produced through electrolysis, and does not include hydrogen manufactured using steam reforming or any other conversion technology that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock.

(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(((e)))(f) "Renewable hydrogen" means hydrogen produced using renewable resources both as the source for hydrogen and the source for energy input into the production process.

(((f)))(g) "Renewable resource" means (i) water; (ii) wind; (iii) solar energy; (iv) geothermal energy; (v) renewable natural gas; (vi) renewable hydrogen; (vii) wave, ocean, or tidal power; (viii) biodiesel fuel that is not derived from crops raised on land cleared from old growth or first growth forests; or (ix) biomass energy.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 4. RCW 54.04.190 and 2019 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, public utility districts are authorized to produce and distribute biodiesel, ethanol, and ethanol blend fuels, including entering into crop purchase contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purpose of generating electricity or producing biodiesel produced from Washington feedstocks, cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels for use in internal operations of the electric utility and for sale or distribution.

(2) In addition to any other authority provided by law:

(a) Public utility districts are authorized to produce renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, and renewable hydrogen and utilize the renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen they produce for internal operations.

(b) Public utility districts may sell renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen that is delivered into a gas transmission pipeline located in the state of Washington or delivered in pressurized containers:

(i) At wholesale;

(ii) To an end-use customer; or

(iii) If delivered in a pressurized container, or if the end-use customer takes delivery of the renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen through a pipeline, and the end-use customer is an eligible purchaser of natural gas from sellers other than the gas company from which that end-use customer takes transportation service and:

(A) When the sale is made to an end-use customer in the state of Washington, the sale is made pursuant to a transportation tariff approved by the Washington utilities and transportation commission; or

(B) When the sale to an end-use customer is made outside of the state of Washington, the sale is made pursuant to a transportation tariff approved by the state agency which regulates retail sales of natural gas.

(c) Public utility districts may sell renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen at wholesale or to an end-use customer through a pipeline directly from renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen production facilities to facilities that compress, liquefy, or dispense compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen fuel for end use as a transportation fuel.

(d) Public utility districts may sell green electrolytic hydrogen or renewable hydrogen at wholesale or to an end-use customer in pressurized containers directly from green electrolytic hydrogen or renewable hydrogen production facilities to facilities that utilize green electrolytic hydrogen or renewable hydrogen as a nonutility related input for a manufacturing process.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b)(iii) of this section, nothing in this section authorizes a public utility district to sell renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen delivered by pipeline to an end-use customer of a gas company.

(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4), nothing in this section authorizes a public utility district to own or operate natural gas distribution pipeline systems used to serve retail customers.

(b) For the purposes of subsection (2)(b) of this section, public utility districts are authorized to own and operate interconnection pipelines that connect renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen production facilities to gas transmission pipelines.

(c) For the purposes of subsection (2)(c) of this section, public utility districts may own and/or operate pipelines to supply, and/or compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen facilities to provide, renewable natural gas, green electrolytic hydrogen, or renewable hydrogen for end use as a transportation fuel if all such pipelines and facilities are located in the county in which the public utility district is authorized to provide utility service.

(5) Exercise of the authorities granted under this section to public utility districts does not subject them to the jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation commission, except that public utility districts are subject only to administration and enforcement by the commission of state and federal requirements related to pipeline safety and fees payable to the commission that are applicable to such administration and enforcement.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Green electrolytic hydrogen" means hydrogen produced through electrolysis, and does not include hydrogen manufactured using steam reforming or any other conversion technology that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock.

(b) "Renewable natural gas" means a gas consisting largely of methane and other hydrocarbons derived from the decomposition of organic material in landfills, wastewater treatment facilities, and anaerobic digesters.

(((b)))(c) "Renewable hydrogen" means hydrogen produced using renewable resources both as the source for the hydrogen and the source for the energy input into the production process.

(((c)))(d) "Renewable resource" means: (i) Water; (ii) wind; (iii) solar energy; (iv) geothermal energy; (v) renewable natural gas; (vi) renewable hydrogen; (vii) wave, ocean, or tidal power; (viii) biodiesel fuel that is not derived from crops raised on land cleared from old growth or first growth forests; or (ix) biomass energy.

(((d)))(e) "Gas company" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.04.010.

--- END ---