BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 7.69 RCW to read as follows:

The court shall provide counsel to a victim of any felony offense at public expense when either: (1) The victim is unable to afford counsel, or the expense of counsel would result in a substantial hardship to the victim, or (2) the victim does not have practical access to funds with which to pay counsel. Counsel shall assist the victim in exercising the constitutional and statutory rights afforded to victims found in Article I, section 35 of the state Constitution and state law.

--- END ---