BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish a substance use recovery services plan to implement measures to assist persons with substance use disorder in accessing outreach, treatment, and recovery support services that are low-barrier, person-centered, informed by people with lived experience, and culturally and linguistically appropriate. The plan must articulate the manner in which continual, rapid, and widespread access to a comprehensive continuum of care will be provided to all persons with substance use disorder.

(2) The plan must consider:

(a) The manner in which persons with substance use disorder currently access and interact with the behavioral health system;

(b) The points of intersection that persons with substance use disorder have with the health care, criminal, legal, and child welfare systems, including emergency departments, syringe service programs, law enforcement, correctional facilities, and dependency court; and

(c) The various locations in which persons with untreated substance use disorder congregate, including homeless encampments, motels, and casinos.

(3) The plan must:

(a) Address the effects of establishing personal use amounts of controlled substances, counterfeit substances, and legend drugs as provided in RCW 69.50.101;

(b) Include potential new community-based care access points, including the safe station model in partnership with fire departments;

(c) Include strategic grant making to community organizations to educate the public to eliminate stigma and prejudice against persons with substance use disorder by improving public understanding and promoting hope;

(d) Include innovative mechanisms for real-time, peer-driven, noncoercive outreach and engagement to individuals in active substance use disorder across all settings and develop measures to enhance the effectiveness of and opportunities for intervention across new and existing points of contact with this population; and

(e) Support diversion to community-based care for individuals who may face criminal consequences for other drug-related law violations, but for whom it is evident that a response that addresses and attends to the underlying behavioral health needs and social determinants of health may be more effective.

(4) The plan and related rules adopted by the authority must include the following substance use treatment and recovery services, which must be available in or accessible by all jurisdictions: Field-based outreach and engagement; peer recovery support services; intensive case management; substance use disorder treatment, including evidence-based treatment, promising practices, and innovative approaches; and recovery support services including housing, job training, and placement services. These services must be equitably distributed across urban and rural settings and, if possible, made available on demand through 24 hour, seven days a week peer recovery coach response, behavioral health triage centers, or other innovative rapid response models. These services must, at a minimum, incorporate the following principles: Low barrier to entry and reentry; improve the health and safety of the individual; reduce the harm of substance use and related activity for the public; integrated and coordinated services; incorporate structural competency and antiracism; noncoercive methods of retaining people in treatment and recovery services, including contingency management; consideration of the unique needs of rural communities; and services that increase social determinants of health.

(5) In developing the plan, the authority shall:

(a) Provide due consideration to the adoption and implementation of the recommendations of the substance use recovery services advisory committee established in section 2 of this act. Where adoption and implementation of recommendations are infeasible, the authority shall notify the advisory committee and request refinement or modification of recommendations for implementation;

(b) Align the components of the plan with previous and ongoing studies, plans, and reports, including the Washington state opioid overdose and response plan, published by the authority, the roadmap to recovery planning grant strategy being developed by the authority, and plans associate with federal block grants; and

(c) Coordinate its work with the efforts of the blue ribbon commission on the intersection of the criminal justice and behavioral health crisis systems established in the governor's executive order 21-02 and the crisis response improvement strategy committee established in chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477), Laws of 2021.

(6) The authority must submit the substance use recovery services plan to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2021. After submitting the plan, the authority shall adopt rules and enter into contracts with providers to implement the plan by December 1, 2022. In addition to seeking public comment under chapter 34.05 RCW, the authority must adopt rules in accordance with the recommendations of the substance use recovery services advisory committee as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(7) The authority must submit a readiness report to the governor and the legislature by November 1, 2022, that indicates progress on the substance use disorder continuum of care, including availability of outreach, treatment, and recovery support services.

(8) In consultation with the substance use recovery services advisory committee, the authority must submit a report on the implementation of the substance use recovery services plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by December 1st of each year, beginning in 2022.

(9) For the purposes of this section, "recovery support services" means a collection of nontreatment resources that sustain long-term recovery from substance use disorder, including recovery housing, employment and education supports, peer recovery coaching, family education, technological recovery supports, transportation and child care assistance to facilitate treatment participation and early recovery, and social connectedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish the substance use recovery services advisory committee to advise the authority in the development and implementation of the substance use recovery services plan under section 1 of this act.

(2) The authority must, in consultation with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and an organization that represents the interests of people who have been directly impacted by substance use and the criminal legal system, appoint members to the advisory committee who have relevant background related to the needs of persons with substance use disorder.

(3) The advisory committee must make recommendations and provide perspectives to the authority regarding:

(a) Current regional capacity for existing public and private programs providing substance use disorder assessments, each of the American society of addiction medicine levels of care, and recovery support services;

(b) Barriers to accessing the existing behavioral health system for those populations chronically exposed to criminal legal system responses relating to complex behavioral health conditions and the consequences of trauma, and possible innovations that could reduce those barriers and improve the quality and accessibility of care for those populations;

(c) Evidence-based, research-based, and promising treatment and recovery services appropriate for target populations;

(d) Workforce needs for the behavioral health services sector, including addressing wage and retention challenges;

(e) Options for leveraging existing integrated managed care, medicaid waiver, American Indian or Alaska Native fee-for-service behavioral health benefits, and private insurance service capacity for substance use disorders, including but not limited to coordination with managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative services organizations, the Washington health benefit exchange, accountable communities of health, and the office of the insurance commissioner;

(f) Framework and design assistance for jurisdictions to assist in compliance with the requirements of RCW 10.31.110 for diversion of individuals with complex behavioral health conditions to community-based care whenever possible and appropriate, and identifying resource gaps that impede jurisdictions in fully realizing the potential impact of this approach;

(g) The design of community-based outreach and intensive case management programs in section 3 of this act, including reporting requirements by behavioral health administrative services organizations to monitor the effectiveness of the programs;

(h) The design of ongoing qualitative and quantitative research about the types of services desired by people with substance use disorders and barriers they experience in accessing existing and recommended services; and

(i) Proposing a funding framework in which, over time, resources are shifted from punishment sectors to community-based care interventions such that community-based care becomes the primary strategy for addressing and resolving public order issues related to behavioral health conditions.

(4) The advisory committee must convene as necessary for the development of the substance use recovery services plan and the development and adoption of rules for implementing the plan, and must convene to monitor implementation of the plan and advise the authority.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each behavioral health administrative services organization shall establish a community-based outreach and intensive case management program. The program shall provide intake, assessment, and referral services and, as appropriate, long-term case management services, to individuals with substance use disorder who are referred to the program from diverse sources and facilitate and coordinate connections to a broad range of community resources for individuals with substance use disorder.

(2) The authority shall establish uniform program standards for behavioral health administrative services organizations to follow in the design of their community-based outreach and intensive case management programs. The uniform program standards must be modeled upon the components of the law enforcement assisted diversion program and address project management, field engagement, biopsychosocial assessment, intensive case management and care coordination, stabilization housing when available and appropriate, and, as necessary, legal system coordination. The authority must adapt the uniform program standards from the components of the law enforcement assisted diversion program to accommodate an expanded population of persons with substance use disorder and allow for referrals from a broad range of sources. The expanded population must include both persons who use controlled substances, counterfeit substances, and legend drugs within the personal use amount as provided in RCW 69.50.101 and persons whose use exceeds the personal use amount. In addition to accepting referrals from law enforcement, the uniform program standards must provide guidance for accepting referrals on behalf of an individual with substance use disorder from various sources including, but not limited to, self-referral, family members of the individual, emergency department personnel, persons engaged with serving homeless encampments, safe station program personnel, fire department personnel, emergency medical service personnel, community-based organizations, members of the business community, harm reduction program personnel, faith-based organization staff, and other sources within the criminal justice system, as outlined within the sequential intercept model. In developing response time requirements within the statewide program standards, the authority shall require that responses to referrals from law enforcement occur immediately for in custody referrals.

(3) The authority shall provide funding to each behavioral health administrative services organization for the development of its program. Before receiving funding for implementation and ongoing administration, each behavioral health administrative services organization must submit a program plan that demonstrates the ability to fully comply with statewide program standards. The authority shall establish a schedule for the regular review of behavioral health administrative services organizations' programs. The authority shall arrange for technical assistance to be provided by the LEAD national support bureau to all behavioral health administrative services organizations.

(4) Each behavioral health administrative services organization must have a designated program director for its community-based outreach and intensive case management program. The program director shall be responsible for assuring compliance with program standards, including staffing standards. Each community-based outreach and intensive case management program must maintain a sufficient number of appropriately trained personnel for both providing intake and referral services and conducting field assessments for persons referred to the program. Program staff must include people with lived experience with substance use disorder to the extent possible. The designated program director must assure that staff who are conducting intake and referral services and field assessments are paid a livable and competitive wage and have appropriate initial training and receive continuing education.

(5) Each community-based outreach and intensive case management program must submit quarterly reports to the authority with information identified by the authority and the substance use recovery services advisory committee. The reports must be provided to the substance use recovery services advisory committee for discussion at meetings following the submission of the reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority shall establish a grant program to:

(a) Provide treatment services for low-income individuals with substance use disorder who are not eligible for medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW; and

(b) Provide treatment services that are not eligible for federal matching funds to individuals who are enrolled in medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(2) In establishing the grant program, the authority shall consult with behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and regional behavioral health providers to adopt regional standards that are consistent with the substance use recovery services plan developed under section 1 of this act to provide sufficient access to meet each region's needs for:

(a) Opioid treatment programs;

(b) Low-barrier buprenorphine clinics;

(c) Withdrawal management services;

(d) Inpatient substance use disorder treatment services;

(e) Inpatient co-occurring disorder treatment services; and

(f) Behavioral health crisis walk-in and drop-off services.

(3) Funds in the grant program must be used to reimburse providers for the provision of services to individuals identified in subsection (1) of this section. The authority may use the funds to support evidence-based practices and promising practices that are not reimbursed by medical assistance or private insurance. In addition, funds may be used to provide assistance to organizations to establish or expand services as reasonably necessary and feasible to increase the availability of services to achieve the regional access standards developed under subsection (2) of this section, including such items as training and recruitment of personnel, reasonable modifications to existing facilities to accommodate additional clients, start-up funding, and similar forms of assistance. Funds may not be used to support the ongoing operational costs of a provider or organization, except in relation to payments for specific service encounters with an individual identified in subsection (1) of this section or for noninsurance reimbursable services.

(4) The authority must establish regional access standards under subsection (2) of this section by January 1, 2022, and begin distributing grant funds by March 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority shall establish the expanded recovery support services program to develop and expand access to recovery service for individuals in recovery from substance use disorder.

(2) In establishing the program, the authority shall consult with behavioral health administrative services organizations, regional behavioral health providers, and regional community organizations that support individuals in recovery from substance use disorder to adopt regional expanded recovery plans that are consistent with the substance use recovery services plan developed under section 1 of this act to provide sufficient access to meet each region's needs for:

(a) Recovery housing;

(b) Employment pathways, support, and training;

(c) Education pathways, including recovery high schools and collegiate recovery programs;

(d) Recovery coaching and substance use disorder peer support;

(e) Social connectedness initiatives, including the recovery café model;

(f) Family support services;

(g) Technology-based recovery support services;

(h) Transportation assistance; and

(i) Legal support services.

(3) Funds in the expanded recovery support services program must be used to reimburse providers for the provision of services to individuals in recovery from substance use disorder. In addition, the funds may be used to provide assistance to organizations to establish or expand recovery support services as reasonably necessary and feasible to increase the availability of services to achieve the regional access standards developed under subsection (2) of this section, including such items as training and recruitment of personnel, reasonable modifications to existing facilities to accommodate additional clients, and similar forms of assistance.

(4) The authority must establish regional expanded recovery plans under subsection (2) of this section by January 1, 2022, and begin distributing grant funds by March 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2022, all law enforcement personnel required to complete basic law enforcement training under RCW 43.101.200 must receive training on law enforcement interaction with persons with substance use disorders, including referral to treatment and recovery services, as part of the basic law enforcement training. The training must be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate substance use disorder recovery advocacy organizations and with appropriate community, local, and state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of working with persons with substance use disorders, including law enforcement diversion of such individuals to community-based care. In developing the training, the commission must also examine existing courses certified by the commission that relate to persons with a substance use disorder, and should draw on existing training partnerships with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(2) The training must consist of classroom instruction or internet instruction and shall replicate likely field situations to the maximum extent possible. The training should include, at a minimum, core instruction in all of the following:

(a) Proper procedures for referring persons to treatment and supportive services in accordance with section 1 of this act;

(b) The cause and nature of substance use disorders, including the role of trauma;

(c) Barriers to treatment engagement experienced by many with such disorders who have contact with the legal system;

(d) How to identify indicators of substance use disorder and how to respond appropriately in a variety of common situations;

(e) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations involving persons with a substance use disorder;

(f) Appropriate language usage when interacting with persons with a substance use disorder;

(g) Alternatives to lethal force when interacting with potentially dangerous persons with a substance use disorder;

(h) The principles of recovery and the multiple pathways to recovery; and

(i) Community and state resources available to serve persons with substance use disorders and how these resources can be best used by law enforcement to support persons with a substance use disorder in their communities.

(3) In addition to incorporation into the basic law enforcement training under RCW 43.101.200, training must be made available to law enforcement agencies, through electronic means, for use at their convenience and determined by the internal training needs and resources of each agency.

Sec. 7. RCW 10.31.110 and 2019 c 326 s 3 and 2019 c 325 s 5004 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the individual has committed acts constituting a crime, and the individual is known by history or consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, ((behavioral health administrative services organization,)) crisis hotline, or local crisis services providers to suffer from a mental disorder or substance use disorder, in addition to existing authority under state law, as an alternative to arrest, the arresting officer is authorized and encouraged to:

(a) Take the individual to a crisis stabilization unit as defined in RCW 71.05.020. Individuals delivered to a crisis stabilization unit pursuant to this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours. The individual must be examined by a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional within three hours of arrival;

(b) Take the individual to a triage facility as defined in RCW 71.05.020. An individual delivered to a triage facility which has elected to operate as an involuntary facility may be held up to a period of twelve hours. The individual must be examined by a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional within three hours of arrival;

(c) Refer the individual to a ((mental health professional))designated crisis responder for evaluation for initial detention and proceeding under chapter 71.05 RCW; or

(d) Release the individual upon agreement to voluntary participation in outpatient treatment.

(2) If the individual is released to the community, the mental health provider or substance use disorder professional shall make reasonable efforts to inform the arresting officer of the planned release prior to release if the arresting officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(3) In deciding whether to refer the individual to treatment under this section, the police officer must be guided by local law enforcement diversion guidelines for behavioral health developed and mutually agreed upon with the prosecuting authority with an opportunity for consultation and comment by the defense bar and disability community. These guidelines must address, at a minimum, the length, seriousness, and recency of the known criminal history of the individual, the mental health history of the individual, if available the substance use disorder history of the individual, if available, the opinions of a mental health professional, if available, the opinions of a substance use disorder professional, if available, and the circumstances surrounding the commission of the alleged offense. The guidelines must include a process for clearing outstanding warrants or referring the individual for assistance in clearing outstanding warrants, if any, and issuing a new court date, if appropriate, without booking or incarcerating the individual or disqualifying ((him or her))the individual from referral to treatment under this section, and define the circumstances under which such action is permissible.

(4) Any agreement to participate in treatment shall not require individuals to stipulate to any of the alleged facts regarding the criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a mental health or substance use disorder treatment alternative. The agreement is inadmissible in any criminal or civil proceeding. The agreement does not create immunity from prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.

(5) If an individual violates such agreement and the mental health or substance use disorder treatment alternative is no longer appropriate:

(a) The mental health provider shall inform the referring law enforcement agency of the violation; and

(b) The original charges may be filed or referred to the prosecutor, as appropriate, and the matter may proceed accordingly.

(6) The police officer is immune from liability for any good faith conduct under this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 69.50.101 and 2020 c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

(d) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(e) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.

(f) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(g) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020.

(h)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(i) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(j) "Department" means the department of health.

(k) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(l) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(m) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(n) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(o) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(p) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(q) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(r) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(s) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.

(t) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(u) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (gg)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(v) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(w) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(x) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(y) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include:

(1) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination; or

(2) Hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020, seeds used for licensed hemp production under chapter 15.140 RCW.

(z) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(aa) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(bb) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(cc) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(dd) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(ee) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(ff) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (y) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(gg) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in (1) through (7) of this subsection.

(hh) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(ii) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(jj) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(kk) "Personal use amount" means an amount that does not exceed:

(1) Forty user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methadone;

(2) Forty pills, tablets, or capsules of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone;

(3) Two grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;

(4) One gram or five pills, tablets, or capsules of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine or 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;

(5) Two grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;

(6) Two grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine;

(7) Forty user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide;

(8) Twelve grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin or psilocyn;

(9) The amounts of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product established in RCW 69.50.360(3) (a) through (d); or

(10) An amount or amounts that may be established by rule by the director of the health care authority, or the director's designee, for recreational or nonmedical and nonprescribed use of a controlled substance, counterfeit substance, or legend drug for which a maximum personal use amount has not been established in this section.

(11) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(((ll)))(mm) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(((mm)))(nn) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(((nn)))(oo) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(((oo)))(pp) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(((pp)))(qq) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(((qq)))(rr) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(((rr)))(ss) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(((ss)))(tt) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(((tt)))(uu) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(((uu)))(vv) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(((vv)))(ww) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(((ww)))(xx) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

(((xx)))(yy) "Youth access" means the level of interest persons under the age of twenty-one may have in a vapor product, as well as the degree to which the product is available or appealing to such persons, and the likelihood of initiation, use, or addiction by adolescents and young adults.

Sec. 9. RCW 69.50.101 and 2020 c 133 s 2 and 2020 c 80 s 43 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

(d) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(e) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.

(f) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(g) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020.

(h)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(i) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(j) "Department" means the department of health.

(k) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(l) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(m) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(n) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(o) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(p) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(q) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(r) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(s) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.

(t) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(u) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (gg)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(v) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(w) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(x) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(y) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include:

(1) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination; or

(2) Hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020, seeds used for licensed hemp production under chapter 15.140 RCW.

(z) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(aa) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(bb) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(cc) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(dd) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(ee) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(ff) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (y) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(gg) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in (1) through (7) of this subsection.

(hh) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(ii) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(jj) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(kk) "Personal use amount" means an amount that does not exceed:

(1) Forty user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methadone;

(2) Forty pills, tablets, or capsules of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone;

(3) Two grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;

(4) One gram or five pills, tablets, or capsules of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine or 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;

(5) Two grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;

(6) Two grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine;

(7) Forty user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide;

(8) Twelve grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin or psilocyn;

(9) The amounts of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product established in RCW 69.50.360(3) (a) through (d); or

(10) An amount or amounts that may be established by rule by the director of the health care authority, or the director's designee, for recreational or nonmedical and nonprescribed use of a controlled substance, counterfeit substance, or legend drug for which a maximum personal use amount has not been established in this section.

(11) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(((ll)))(mm) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(((mm)))(nn) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(((nn)))(oo) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(((oo)))(pp) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(((pp)))(qq) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(((qq)))(rr) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(((rr)))(ss) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(((ss)))(tt) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(((tt)))(uu) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(((uu)))(vv) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(((vv)))(ww) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(((ww)))(xx) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

(((xx)))(yy) "Youth access" means the level of interest persons under the age of twenty-one may have in a vapor product, as well as the degree to which the product is available or appealing to such persons, and the likelihood of initiation, use, or addiction by adolescents and young adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

The health care authority must review the personal use amounts established in RCW 69.50.101(kk) and shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature with any recommended adjustments to the established personal use amounts and any recommendations for establishing additional personal use amounts of controlled substances, counterfeit substances, and legend drugs for which there is routine nonmedical and nonprescribed use. Reports must be submitted on an annual basis by December 1st, with the first report due on December 1, 2021.

Sec. 11. RCW 69.50.4011 and 2003 c 53 s 332 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for ((any)):

(a) Any person to create((,))or deliver((, or possess)) a counterfeit substance; or

(b) Any person to knowingly possess a counterfeit substance.

(2) Any person who violates subsection (1)(a) of this section with respect to:

(a) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(b) A counterfeit substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(c) Any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(d) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(e) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section is a misdemeanor.

(b) Violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section is a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW if:

(i) The person is under the age of 21; or

(ii) The person is 21 years of age or older and the counterfeit substance is in an amount that does not exceed a personal use amount as established in RCW 69.50.101.

(4) A person who is subject to the penalties established in subsection (3)(b) of this section shall be referred to the program established in section 3 of this act for evaluation and services. The monetary penalty for the civil infraction must be waived upon verification that the person has received an assessment by the program within 45 days of receiving the infraction. Proceeds from the infraction must be deposited in the State v. Blake reimbursement account created in section 23 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2017 c 317 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter.

(2)(a) Except as provided in ((RCW 69.50.4014))(b) of this subsection, any person who violates this section is guilty of a ((class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW))misdemeanor.

(b) Violation of this section is a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW if:

(i) The person is under the age of 21; or

(ii) The person is 21 years of age or older and the controlled substance is in an amount that does not exceed a personal use amount as established in RCW 69.50.101.

(3) A person who is subject to the penalties established in subsection (2)(b) of this section shall be referred to the program established in section 3 of this act for evaluation and services. The monetary penalty for the civil infraction must be waived upon verification that the person has received an assessment by the program within 45 days of receiving the infraction. Proceeds from the infraction must be deposited in the State v. Blake reimbursement account created in section 23 of this act.

(4)(a) The possession, by a person twenty-one years of age or older, of useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(b) The possession of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized in accordance with RCW 69.50.382 and 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(((4)))(5)(a) The delivery by a person twenty-one years of age or older to one or more persons twenty-one years of age or older, during a single twenty-four hour period, for noncommercial purposes and not conditioned upon or done in connection with the provision or receipt of financial consideration, of any of the following marijuana products, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provisions of Washington state law:

(i) One-half ounce of useable marijuana;

(ii) Eight ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;

(iii) Thirty-six ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form; or

(iv) Three and one-half grams of marijuana concentrates.

(b) The act of delivering marijuana or a marijuana product as authorized under this subsection (((4)))(5) must meet one of the following requirements:

(i) The delivery must be done in a location outside of the view of general public and in a nonpublic place; or

(ii) The marijuana or marijuana product must be in the original packaging as purchased from the marijuana retailer.

(((5)))(6) No person under twenty-one years of age may possess, manufacture, sell, or distribute marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates, regardless of THC concentration. This does not include qualifying patients with a valid authorization.

(((6)))(7) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants in accordance with chapter 69.51A RCW is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

Sec. 13. RCW 69.50.412 and 2019 c 64 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to use drug paraphernalia to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, or conceal((, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body)) a controlled substance other than marijuana. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, or conceal((, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body)) a controlled substance other than marijuana. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates subsection (2) of this section by delivering drug paraphernalia to a person under eighteen years of age who is at least three years his or her junior is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) It is lawful for any person over the age of eighteen to possess sterile hypodermic syringes and needles for the purpose of reducing blood-borne diseases.

Sec. 14. RCW 69.50.445 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to open a package containing marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates, or consume marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates, in view of the general public or in a public place.

(2) It is unlawful to open a package containing a counterfeit or controlled substance or consume a counterfeit or controlled substance in view of the general public or in a public place.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010, but the exclusions in RCW 66.04.011 do not apply.

(((3)))(4)(a) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

(b) A person who violates subsection (2) of this section is guilty of a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. Proceeds from this infraction must be deposited in the State v. Blake reimbursement account created in section 23 of this act.

Sec. 15. RCW 69.41.010 and 2019 c 358 s 6 and 2019 c 308 s 23 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(a) A practitioner; or

(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.

(2) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(3) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential programs for persons with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.

(4) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(7) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(8) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a legend drug.

(9) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(10) "Drug" means:

(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;

(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or animals; and

(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(11) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization transmitted verbally by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(12) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings.

(13) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law or regulation of the pharmacy quality assurance commission to be dispensed on prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.

(14) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.

(15) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled insulin syringes.

(16) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

(17) "Personal use amount" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(18) "Practitioner" means:

(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner to the extent authorized under chapter 18.06 RCW and the rules adopted under RCW 18.06.010(1)(j), a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a licensed athletic trainer to the extent authorized under chapter 18.250 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or, when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course of professional practice or research in this state; and

(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the state of Washington.

(((18)))(19) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

Sec. 16. RCW 69.41.010 and 2020 c 80 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(a) A practitioner; or

(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.

(2) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(3) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential programs for persons with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.

(4) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(7) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(8) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a legend drug.

(9) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(10) "Drug" means:

(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;

(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or animals; and

(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(11) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization transmitted verbally by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(12) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings.

(13) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law or regulation of the pharmacy quality assurance commission to be dispensed on prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.

(14) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.

(15) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled insulin syringes.

(16) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

(17) "Personal use amount" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(18) "Practitioner" means:

(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner to the extent authorized under chapter 18.06 RCW and the rules adopted under RCW 18.06.010(1)(j), a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a licensed athletic trainer to the extent authorized under chapter 18.250 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or, when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course of professional practice or research in this state; and

(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the state of Washington.

(((18)))(19) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

Sec. 17. RCW 69.41.030 and 2019 c 55 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or knowingly possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed osteopathic physician assistant, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter prohibits possession or delivery of legend drugs by an authorized collector or other person participating in the operation of a drug take-back program authorized in chapter 69.48 RCW.

(2)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) ((A))(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, a violation of this section involving possession is a misdemeanor.

(ii) A violation of this section involving possession is a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW if:

(A) The person is under the age of 21; or

(B) The person is 21 years of age or older and the legend drug is in an amount that does not exceed a personal use amount as established in RCW 69.50.101.

(3) A person who is subject to the penalties established in subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section shall be referred to the program established in section 3 of this act for evaluation and services. The monetary penalty for the civil infraction must be waived upon verification that the person has received an assessment by the program within 45 days of receiving the infraction. Proceeds from the infraction must be deposited in the State v. Blake reimbursement account created in section 23 of this act.

Sec. 18. RCW 69.41.030 and 2020 c 80 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or knowingly possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed physician assistant, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter prohibits possession or delivery of legend drugs by an authorized collector or other person participating in the operation of a drug take-back program authorized in chapter 69.48 RCW.

(2)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) ((A))(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, a violation of this section involving possession is a misdemeanor.

(ii) A violation of this section involving possession is a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW if:

(A) The person is under the age of 21; or

(B) The person is 21 years of age or older and the legend drug is in an amount that does not exceed a personal use amount as established in RCW 69.50.101.

(3) A person who is subject to the penalties established in subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section shall be referred to the program established in section 3 of this act for evaluation and services. The monetary penalty for the civil infraction must be waived upon verification that the person has received an assessment by the program within 45 days of receiving the infraction. Proceeds from the infraction must be deposited in the State v. Blake reimbursement account created in section 23 of this act.

Sec. 19. RCW 9.94A.518 and 2003 c 53 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES

INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III

Any felony offense under chapter 69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon special verdict under RCW ((9.94A.602))9.94A.825

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.4015)

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II

Create((,))or deliver((, or possess)) a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4011(1)(a))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4012)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(1)(f))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(2)(a))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(2) (c) through (e))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

I

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(2)(c))

((Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule I-V (RCW 69.50.4013)

Possession of Controlled Substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II (RCW 69.50.4013)))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Sec. 20. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2020 c 18 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile

disposition

offense

category

description (rcw citation)

juvenile disposition

category for

attempt, bailjump,

conspiracy, or

solicitation

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A

Arson 1 (9A.48.020)

B+

B

Arson 2 (9A.48.030)

C

C

Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040)

D

D

Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050)

E

B

Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070)

C

C

Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080)

D

D

Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090)

E

E

Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus (9.40.100)

E

E

Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105)

E

A

Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)

B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving Physical Harm

A

Assault 1 (9A.36.011)

B+

B+

Assault 2 (9A.36.021)

C+

C+

Assault 3 (9A.36.031)

D+

D+

Assault 4 (9A.36.041)

E

B+

Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 15 or under

C+

A++

Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 16 or 17

A

D+

Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050)

E

C+

Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060)

D+

D+

Coercion (9A.36.070)

E

C+

Custodial Assault (9A.36.100)

D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+

Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed at

age 15 or under

C+

A-

Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed at

age 16 or 17

B+

B

Residential Burglary (9A.52.025)

C

B

Burglary 2 (9A.52.030)

C

D

Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060)

E

D

Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070)

E

E

Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080)

E

C

Mineral Trespass (78.44.330)

C

C

Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095)

D

D

Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100)

E

Drugs

E

Possession/Consumption of Alcohol (66.44.270)

E

C

Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug (69.41.020)

D

C+

Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a))

D+

((E

Possession of Legend

Drug (69.41.030(2)(b))))

E

B+

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or (b))

B+

C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c))

C

((E

Possession of Marihuana <40 grams (69.50.4014)))

E

C

Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled Substance (69.50.403)

C

C+

Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit (69.50.410)

C+

E

Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020)

E

B

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b))

B

C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e))

C

((C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4013)

C

C

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)))

C

Firearms and Weapons

B

Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300)

C

B

Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310)

C

E

Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit (9.41.050)

E

C

Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18) (9.41.040(2)(a) (vi))

C

D+

Possession of Dangerous Weapon (9.41.250)

E

D

Intimidating Another Person by use of Weapon (9.41.270)

E

Homicide

A+

Murder 1 (9A.32.030)

A

A+

Murder 2 (9A.32.050)

B+

B+

Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060)

C+

C+

Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070)

D+

B+

Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520)

C+

Kidnapping

A

Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020)

B+

B+

Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030)

C+

C+

Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)

D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D

Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer (9A.76.020)

E

E

Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040)

E

B

Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140)

C

C

Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150)

D

E

Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160)

E

B+

Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180)

C+

B+

Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)

C+

Public Disturbance

C+

Criminal Mischief with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b))

D+

D+

Criminal Mischief Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a))

E

E

Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020)

E

E

Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030)

E

Sex Crimes

A

Rape 1 (9A.44.040)

B+

B++

Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 14 or under

B+

A-

Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 15 through age 17

B+

C+

Rape 3 (9A.44.060)

D+

B++

Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)

committed at age 14 or under

B+

A-

Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)

committed at age 15

B+

B+

Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076)

C+

B

Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1))

C

C

Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2))

D

D+

Indecent Exposure (Victim <14) (9A.88.010)

E

E

Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010)

E

B+

Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070)

C+

C+

Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080)

D+

E

O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030)

E

B+

Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100)

C+

B++

Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 14 or under

B+

A-

Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 15 through age 17

B+

B

Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086)

C+

C

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (9A.44.132)

D

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B

Theft 1 (9A.56.030)

C

C

Theft 2 (9A.56.040)

D

D

Theft 3 (9A.56.050)

E

B

Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and 9A.56.083)

C

C

Forgery (9A.60.020)

D

A

Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed at

age 15 or under

B+

A++

Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed at

age 16 or 17

A

B+

Robbery 2 (9A.56.210)

C+

B+

Extortion 1 (9A.56.120)

C+

C+

Extortion 2 (9A.56.130)

D+

C

Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2))

D

D

Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3))

E

D

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (9.35.010)

E

B

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068)

C

B

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (9A.56.150)

C

C

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (9A.56.160)

D

D

Possession of Stolen Property 3 (9A.56.170)

E

B

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (9A.56.070)

C

C

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (9A.56.075)

D

B

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065)

C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E

Driving Without a License (46.20.005)

E

B+

Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a))

C+

C

Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b))

D

D

Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5))

E

E

Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010)

E

C

Vehicular Assault (46.61.522)

D

C

Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police Vehicle (46.61.024)

D

E

Reckless Driving (46.61.500)

E

D

Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502 and 46.61.504)

E

B+

Felony Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502(6))

B

B+

Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))

B

Other

B

Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205)

C

B

Bomb Threat (9.61.160)

C

C

Escape 11 (9A.76.110)

C

C

Escape 21 (9A.76.120)

C

D

Escape 3 (9A.76.130)

E

E

Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls (9.61.230)

E

A

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class A Felony

B+

B

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class B Felony

C

C

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class C Felony

D

D

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross Misdemeanor

E

E

Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Misdemeanor

E

V

Violation of Order of Restitution, Community Supervision, or Confinement (13.40.200)2

V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 28 days confinement

2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing option A, B, C, or D.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A++

129 to 260 weeks for all category A++ offenses

A+

180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offenses

A

103-129 weeks for all category A offenses

A-

30-40 weeks

52-65 weeks

80-100 weeks

103-129 weeks

103-129 weeks

B++

15-36 weeks

52-65 weeks

80-100 weeks

103-129 weeks

103-129 weeks

CURRENT

B+

15-36 weeks

15-36 weeks

52-65 weeks

80-100 weeks

103-129 weeks

OFFENSE

B

LS

LS

15-36 weeks

15-36 weeks

52-65 weeks

CATEGORY

C+

LS

LS

LS

15-36 weeks

15-36 weeks

C

LS

LS

LS

LS

15-36 weeks

D+

LS

LS

LS

LS

LS

D

LS

LS

LS

LS

LS

E

LS

LS

LS

LS

LS

PRIOR

0

1

2

3

4 or more

ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.

(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B

SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this subsection:

(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population; and

(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.

(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.

(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option under this section if the offender:

(a) Is adjudicated of an A+ or A++ offense;

(b) Is fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or more of the following offenses:

(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A offense;

(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060);

(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070); or

(iv) Violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;

(c) Is ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under RCW 13.40.193;

(d) Is adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(e) Has a prior option B disposition.

OR

OPTION C

CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY/MENTAL HEALTH DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed a B++ or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D

MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 21. RCW 2.24.010 and 2013 c 27 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There may be appointed in each county or judicial district, by the judges of the superior court having jurisdiction therein, one or more court commissioners for said county or judicial district. Each such commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and shall hold the office during the pleasure of the judges making the appointment.

(2)(a) There may be appointed in counties with a population of more than four hundred thousand, by the presiding judge of the superior court having jurisdiction therein, one or more attorneys to act as criminal commissioners to assist the superior court in disposing of adult criminal cases. Such criminal commissioners shall have power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the judges thereof, in adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments, preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333 or 9.94B.040; accept pleas if authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make determinations of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of pretrial release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize continuances; accept waivers of the right to speedy trial; and authorize and issue search warrants and orders to intercept, monitor, or record wired or wireless telecommunications or for the installation of electronic taps or other devices to include, but not be limited to, vehicle global positioning system or other mobile tracking devices with all the powers conferred upon the judge of the superior court in such matters.

(b) Criminal commissioners shall also have the authority to conduct resentencing hearings and to vacate convictions related to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021). Criminal commissioners may be appointed for this purpose regardless of the population of the county served by the appointing court.

(c) The county legislative authority must approve the creation of criminal commissioner positions.

Sec. 22. RCW 2.24.040 and 2009 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Such court commissioner shall have power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the judge thereof, in the following particulars:

(1) To hear and determine all matters in probate, to make and issue all proper orders therein, and to issue citations in all cases where same are authorized by the probate statutes of this state.

(2) To grant and enter defaults and enter judgment thereon.

(3) To issue temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions, and to fix and approve bonds thereon.

(4) To act as referee in all matters and actions referred to him or her by the superior court as such, with all the powers now conferred upon referees by law.

(5) To hear and determine all proceedings supplemental to execution, with all the powers conferred upon the judge of the superior court in such matters.

(6) To hear and determine all petitions for the adoption of children and for the dissolution of incorporations.

(7) To hear and determine all applications for the commitment of any person to the hospital for the insane, with all the powers of the superior court in such matters: PROVIDED, That in cases where a jury is demanded, same shall be referred to the superior court for trial.

(8) To hear and determine all complaints for the commitments of minors with all powers conferred upon the superior court in such matters.

(9) To hear and determine ex parte and uncontested civil matters of any nature.

(10) To grant adjournments, administer oaths, preserve order, compel attendance of witnesses, and to punish for contempts in the refusal to obey or the neglect of the court commissioner's lawful orders made in any matter before the court commissioner as fully as the judge of the superior court.

(11) To take acknowledgments and proofs of deeds, mortgages and all other instruments requiring acknowledgment under the laws of this state, and to take affidavits and depositions in all cases.

(12) To provide an official seal, upon which shall be engraved the words "Court Commissioner," and the name of the county for which he or she may be appointed, and to authenticate his official acts therewith in all cases where same is necessary.

(13) To charge and collect, for his or her own use, the same fees for the official performance of official acts mentioned in subsections (4) and (11) of this section as are provided by law for referees and notaries public.

(14) To hear and determine small claims appeals as provided in chapter 12.36 RCW.

(15) In adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments, preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333 or 9.94B.040; accept pleas if authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make determinations of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of pretrial release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize continuances; ((and)) accept waivers of the right to speedy trial; and conduct resentencing hearings and hearings to vacate convictions related to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. The State v. Blake reimbursement account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from penalties collected under RCW 69.50.4011(3)(b), 69.50.4013(2)(b), 69.41.030(2)(b)(ii), and 69.50.445(4)(b) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for state and local government costs resulting from the supreme court's decision in State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021) and to reimburse individuals for legal financial obligations paid in connection with sentences that have been invalidated as a result of the decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. RCW 69.50.4014 (Possession of forty grams or less of marijuana—Penalty) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 505 & 2003 c 53 s 335 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. Sections 8, 15, and 17 of this act expire July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. Sections 9, 16, and 18 of this act take effect July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---