BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In addition to the other indicators that apply under the healthy Washington: Roadmap to recovery plan, the department of health shall monitor the status of each county on a weekly basis with respect to its COVID-19 vaccine dose allocation to determine whether each county is receiving an equitable share of COVID-19 vaccine doses in proportion to the state's allocation. If the department of health determines that a county is in danger of being reverted to a more restrictive phase, the department shall immediately adjust the vaccine dose allocation to ensure that the county will receive an allocation of COVID-19 vaccine doses that does not fall below the statewide average allocation for counties. A county that has not received an equitable share of COVID-19 vaccine doses in proportion to the state's allocation may not be reverted to a more restrictive phase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---