BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that many Washington property taxpayers are confused about precisely how those funds are spent by state and local governments. This confusion is caused, in many cases, by confusing language included on property tax statements, bills, and other related documents. So, the legislature intends to ease the confusion by requiring simplicity and clarity in property tax documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 84.56 RCW to read as follows:

Any tax statement or notice of taxes due, required to be provided to a taxpayer under this chapter, may not contain language that in any way refers to the state property tax levied under RCW 84.52.065 or 84.52.067 using the phrase "school tax" or any substantially similar phrase.

--- END ---