BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012;

(b) Was the victim of, or is the immediate family member of the victim of, a violent offense that occurred in Washington;

(c) Is enrolled in, or was accepted for enrollment in, a postsecondary education program for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent semester credits; and

(d) Files an annual application for financial aid as approved by the office.

(2) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(3) "Postsecondary education program" means a registered apprenticeship program or a certificate, undergraduate, graduate, or professional program at an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.

(4) "Program" means the crime victims and families scholarship program.

(5) "Violent offense" has the same meaning as RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The crime victims and families scholarship program is established. The purpose of the program is to help victims of violent crimes attend postsecondary education programs in Washington. The crime victims and families scholarship program shall be administered by the office.

(2) The office shall have the following powers and duties in administrating the program:

(a) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;

(b) Create a scholarship application form and verification process for determining whether an applicant meets the eligibility criteria;

(c) Accept scholarship applications beginning with the 2022-23 academic year and verify student eligibility;

(d) Award scholarships to all eligible students and distribute scholarship funds to eligible students' postsecondary education programs; and

(e) Publicize the program.

(3) The legislature shall appropriate funding for the crime victims and families scholarship program. Allocations must be made on the basis of estimated eligible participants enrolled in institutions of higher education or apprenticeship programs. All eligible students are entitled to a scholarship beginning in the 2022-23 academic year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) To receive a scholarship, an eligible student shall apply to the office. An eligible student that meets all requirements of the scholarship is entitled to receive a scholarship. The office shall award all eligible students a scholarship beginning in the 2022-23 academic year.

(2) The scholarship amount shall be as follows:

(a) For students attending registered apprenticeship programs or undergraduate programs at public two or four-year institutions of higher education, the scholarship award shall be the difference between the student's tuition and required fees, less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver assistance received;

(b) For students attending undergraduate private four-year institutions of higher education, the scholarship award shall be the representative average of awards granted to students in public research universities in Washington;

(c) For students attending private vocational schools in Washington, the scholarship award shall be the representative average of awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges in Washington; and

(d) For students attending a graduate or professional program in Washington, the scholarship award shall be the representative average of awards granted to students in public research universities in Washington.

(3) Scholarship recipients may receive scholarship funds for no more than two years' worth of full-time enrollment.

(4) Qualifications for receipt and renewal include maintaining satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program as determined by the office and established in rule.

(5) Should a recipient terminate enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship must be returned to the institution of higher education according to the institution of higher education's policy for issuing refunds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload of the crime victims and families scholarship program and submit the caseload forecast as specified in RCW 43.88C.020.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2020 c 352 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college grant program under RCW 28B.92.200 and 28B.92.205 and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; ((and))

(d) The number of children who are eligible, as defined in RCW 43.216.505, to participate in, and the number of children actually served by, the early childhood education and assistance program; and

(e) The number of students who are eligible for the crime victims and families scholarship program under chapter 28B.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 6 of this act) and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) The caseload forecast council shall present the number of individuals who are assessed as eligible for and have requested a service through the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver administered by the developmental disabilities administration as a courtesy. The caseload forecast council shall be presented with the service request list as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 to aid in development of this information.

(10) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(11) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of youth expected to receive behavioral rehabilitation services while involved in the foster care system and the number of screened in reports of child abuse or neglect.

(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---