BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the number 988 as the universal telephone number within the United States to connect to the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system. The legislature has taken steps in accordance with the national suicide hotline designation act of 2020 to improve acute mental health crisis outreach and stabilization services within Washington state. By July 1, 2024, the department of health must have in place the network of providers and have all of the new systems operational for when people located in Washington dial 988 for services.

This act provides for deployment of signs announcing the 988 hotline as part of new construction and replacement of public facilities with the intent to place the hotline information in locations that will be seen by people who are likely to use the hotline's services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) For any building, bridge, ferry, or park being constructed or replaced after July 1, 2024, as a public works project, there must be installed in appropriate locations signs displaying the 988 national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline.

(b) The public body as defined in RCW 39.10.210 in control of a public works project in this subsection must decide where signs under this section would be physically feasible and appropriate. The following facilities are recommended to have such signs:

(i) Bridges where suicides by jumping have occurred or are likely to occur; and

(ii) Locations that provide services to people that have high incidence of suicide or mental health conditions that would benefit from knowing about the hotline.

(c) The signs must be designed to communicate that dialing 988 on a telephone will connect callers to mental health and suicide prevention services as provided in accordance with state and federal laws governing the 988 number.

(d) If a sign is located along a state highway or the interstate system, the department of transportation must approve the location prior to erecting the sign, but no permit is necessary.

(e) Signs created under this section may not conflict with provisions of the manual of uniform traffic control devices or existing state laws related to placement and design of signs.

(2) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as conferring a right of action in cases where no right of action exists independent of this section. This section is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to impose liability on the public body if a sign has or has not been posted on the premises of the public facility or in any particular location recommended in this section.

(3) The public body may accept gifts or donations to pay for the creation, installation, or maintenance of signs under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---