BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

TRANSITION PROPOSAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. The legislature finds that many transportation facilities provide a public good where user fares and fees are insufficient to pay for the capital, maintenance, and operating expenses of the facility, activity, service, or program. The majority of revenue appropriated through the omnibus transportation appropriations act for transportation facilities comes from fees or taxes related to driving a vehicle. This is an unsustainable model of funding in light of the trend to adopt laws that are meant to reduce vehicle miles traveled, reduce the quantity of emissions of greenhouse gases per distance traveled in the transportation sector, and reduce the sale of fossil fuels on which many taxes are imposed. In order to provide the caliber of transportation facilities and social services that are being demanded by society, use of general fund resources are the most equitable funding option. It is unfair and unsustainable to make one mode of travel pay for all other modes. The general fund, even during a pandemic, is experiencing substantial revenue growth while the funds associated with the transportation budget are stagnant or below revenue expectations and actual programmatic needs. This act designates programs and activities that in the future will receive funding from the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislature has created several transportation programs in the omnibus transportation appropriations act over the course of time that continue to this day. These include many transportation grant programs that the legislature intends to continue funding in the future. The connecting Washington transportation plan enacted in 2015 provided intent to fund a number of grants and projects as identified in LEAP Transportation Documents 2015 NL-1 and NL-2 that will continue to be funded, unless there was a specific legal change in a subsequently adopted act.

(b) The legislature has also created several transportation-related tax incentives, including tax incentives related to the commute trip reduction program and the purchase of electric vehicles. It is the intent of the legislature that beginning with the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, these tax incentives will be funded by the omnibus appropriations act from accounts and sources of funds other than those appropriated in the omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(c) The legislature has also created several multimodal transportation programs on a pilot basis that have expired or will expire prior to the effective date of this section. Examples include the student ORCA card pilot program first created in section 220(10), chapter 313, Laws of 2017; the transit coordination grant program created in section 4, chapter 11, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.; and the green transportation capital grant program in RCW 47.66.120. It is the intent of the legislature that, if a legislature acts to reprise or recreate any of these programs, beginning with the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the reprised or recreated program be funded by the omnibus appropriations act from accounts and sources of funds other than those appropriated in the omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, appropriations for the following programs shall be paid out of the general fund:

(a) Projects that correct barriers for fish to swim upstream on public lands;

(b) Americans with disabilities act upgrades to transportation facilities;

(c) New buildings primarily where state transportation employees work;

(d) Mobility and public transit-related grants, social services, and programs, such as, but not limited to, regional mobility grants, rural mobility grants, vanpool grants, and any pilot or expired grants that are to be continued;

(e) Programs related to transitioning transportation programs, systems, facilities, or vehicles as designated as green or clean fuel programs authorized in law, such as, but not limited to, green transportation capital grants, the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program, and the clean alternative fuel car sharing program for underserved and low-income communities;

(f) Programs that provide tax incentives for the purchase or lease of vehicles with lithium-ion batteries or alternative fuel vehicles, as well as for other equipment that supports vehicle conversions to alternative fuels;

(g) Safe routes to schools grants;

(h) Bicycle and pedestrian pathways that are not an integrated part of a highway project or are administered by any government agency other than the department of transportation;

(i) Capital and operation costs for intercity passenger rail service;

(j) Assistance funding for freight rail programs;

(k) Stormwater facility upgrades and maintenance of such facilities near highways with high-density traffic near salmon-bearing streams where untreated runoff containing 6 CPPD and 6 CPPD quinone are killing significant amounts of salmon; and

(l) Any other programs as directed by law.

(3) Projects agreed to as part of the nickel, transportation partnership, and connecting Washington transportation package will remain funded within the transportation appropriations act. However, in situations where revenues appropriated through the transportation appropriations act are insufficient to pay for the obligations associated with those projects, general funds may be provided to ensure the completion of the projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. (1)(a) The chairs of the transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate shall convene an internal legislative work group to be known as the budgets transition work group to implement the transition in section 102 of this act. At the end of the process, the budgets transition work group members and staff should have identified the provisions that need to be modified in future budgets to successfully shift funding in accordance with this act. The members of the work group include:

(i) The chairs and ranking members of the committees on transportation, or a designated alternative member of each caucus;

(ii) The chairs and ranking member of the house of representatives' appropriations committee, or a designated alternative member of each caucus; and

(iii) The chair and ranking member of the senate ways and means committee, or a designated alternative member of each caucus.

(b) The director of the office of financial management, or a designated employee of the agency with knowledge of the legislative appropriations acts, may be invited to serve in an advisory capacity.

(2) Staff support for the budgets transition work group shall be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research. The employees of the office of financial management shall cooperate with the work group to obtain information from state agencies as necessary to effectuate the transition.

(3) Legislative members of the budgets transition work group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The expenses of the budgets transition work group shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.

PART II

STATUTORY ADJUSTMENTS TO CODIFIED SECTIONS AFFECTED BY THE TRANSITION

Sec. 201. RCW 46.68.135 and 2006 c 337 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

By July 1, 2006, and each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer two and one-half million dollars from the ((multimodal account))state general fund to the transportation infrastructure account created under RCW 82.44.190. The funds must be distributed for rail capital improvements only.

Sec. 202. RCW 46.68.320 and 2010 c 247 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The regional mobility grant program account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.030.

(2) Beginning with September 2007, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the ((multimodal transportation account))state general fund to the regional mobility grant program account five million dollars.

(3) Beginning with September 2015, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the ((multimodal transportation account))state general fund to the regional mobility grant program account six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(((4) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the regional mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the regional mobility grant program account.))

Sec. 203. RCW 46.68.325 and 2021 c 333 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rural mobility grant program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.100.

(2) Beginning September 2011, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the ((multimodal transportation account))state general fund to the rural mobility grant program account two million five hundred thousand dollars.

(3) ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the rural mobility grant program account.

(4))) During the ((2017-2019, 2019-2021, and)) 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennia))biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 204. RCW 82.08.993 and 2021 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the limitations in this subsection, beginning July 1, 2022, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after this date until the expiration of this section, fifty percent of the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales or leases of new electric passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, that are powered by a fuel cell.

(b)(i) By the end of the fifth working day of each month, until the expiration of the exemption as described in (c) of this subsection, the department must determine the cumulative number of vehicles that have claimed the exemption as described in (a) of this subsection.

(ii) The department of licensing must collect and provide, upon request, information in a form or manner as required by the department to determine the number of exemptions that have been claimed.

(c) The exemption under this section expires after the last day of the calendar month immediately following the month the department determines that the total number of vehicles exempt under (a) of this subsection reaches 650. All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption before the expiration of the exemption must continue to receive the exemption as described under (a) of this subsection on lease payments due through the remainder of the lease.

(d) The department must provide notification on its website monthly on the amount of exemptions that have been applied for, the amount issued, and the amount remaining before the limit described in (c) of this subsection has been reached, and, once that limit has been reached, the date the exemption expires pursuant to (c) of this subsection.

(e) A person may not claim the exemption under this subsection if the person claims the exemption under RCW 82.08.9999 or 82.12.9999.

(f) The per vehicle exemption must be based on the sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles.

(2)(a) Subject to the limitations in this subsection (2), beginning July 1, 2022, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after this date until the expiration of this section, the entire tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale or lease of used electric passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, that are powered by a fuel cell.

(b) The per vehicle exemption must be based on the sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles. However, the maximum value amount eligible for the exemption under (a) of this subsection is the lesser of either sixteen thousand dollars or the fair market value of the vehicle.

(c) A person may not claim the exemption under this subsection (2) if the person claims the exemption under RCW 82.08.9999 or 82.12.9999.

(3)(a) For qualifying vehicles sold by a person licensed to do business in the state of Washington, the seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. The seller reporting the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(b) For vehicles purchased from (i) a seller that is not licensed to do business in the state of Washington, or (ii) a private party, the buyer must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. The buyer claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; date of sale; sales price; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(4)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section and RCW 82.12.817 until the expiration of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria.

(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(((5) On the last day of July, October, January, and April of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the electric vehicle account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior fiscal quarter but for the exemptions provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data, except that the department may provide estimates of taxes exempted under this section until such time as retailers are able to report such exempted amounts on their tax returns.

(6))) By the last day of August 2023, and annually thereafter until this section expires, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of fuel cell electric vehicles that qualified for the exemptions under this section and RCW 82.12.817 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.817; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemptions under this section and RCW 82.12.817.

(((7)))(6)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer after the expiration of this section, or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the expiration of this section, do not qualify for the exemptions under this section.

(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the expiration of this section must continue to receive the exemption on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease.

(((8)))(7) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.

(b) "Fuel cell" means a technology that uses an electrochemical reaction to generate electric energy by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst.

(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.

(d) "Selling price" and "sales price" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(e) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.

(((9)))(8) This section expires June 30, 2029.

Sec. 205. RCW 82.08.9999 and 2021 c 145 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:

(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection to sales or leases of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:

(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or

(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power; and

(iii)(A) Have a vehicle selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles that:

(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed forty-five thousand dollars; or

(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed thirty thousand dollars; or

(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:

(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed forty-five thousand dollars; or

(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed thirty thousand dollars;

(b)(i) The exemption in this section is applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:

(A) The total amount of the vehicle's selling price, for sales made; or

(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional selling price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.

(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:

(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is twenty-five thousand dollars;

(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is twenty thousand dollars;

(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is fifteen thousand dollars.

(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is sixteen thousand dollars.

(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(3)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section or RCW 82.12.9999 until the expiration date of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria. A seller is not responsible for repayment of the tax exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 for a vehicle if the department of licensing's published list of qualifying vehicle models on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed includes the vehicle model and the department of licensing subsequently removes the vehicle model from the published list, and, if applicable, the vehicle meets the qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).

(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).

(4) ((On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the electric vehicle account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data, except that the department may provide estimates of taxes exempted under this section until such time as retailers are able to report such exempted amounts on their tax returns.

(5))) By the last day of October 2019, and every six months thereafter until this section expires, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.9999; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999.

(((6)))(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2019, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.

(b) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.

(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.

(d) "Qualification period end date" means August 1, 2025.

(e) "Qualification period start date" means August 1, 2019.

(f) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.

(((7)))(6)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.

(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.

(((8)))(7) This section expires August 1, 2028.

(((9)))(8) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.

Sec. 206. RCW 82.12.817 and 2021 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the limitations in this subsection and RCW 82.08.993(1)(c), beginning July 1, 2022, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after this date until the expiration of this section, fifty percent of the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to sales or leases of new electric passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, that are powered by a fuel cell.

(2)(a) Subject to the limitations in this subsection (2), beginning July 1, 2022, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after this date until the expiration of this section, the entire tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the sale or lease of used electric passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, that are powered by a fuel cell.

(b) The per vehicle exemption must be based on the sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles. However, the maximum value amount eligible for the exemption under (a) of this subsection is the lesser of either sixteen thousand dollars or the fair market value of the vehicle.

(c) A person may not claim the exemption under this subsection (2) if the person claims the exemption under RCW 82.08.9999 or 82.12.9999.

(3) The buyer must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. The buyer claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(4) ((On the last day of July, October, January, and April of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the electric vehicle account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior fiscal quarter but for the exemptions provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data.

(5)))(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer after the expiration of this section, or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the expiration of this section, do not qualify for the exemptions under this section.

(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the expiration of this section must continue to receive the exemption on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease.

(((6)))(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.993 apply to this section.

(((7)))(6) This section expires June 30, 2029.

Sec. 207. RCW 82.12.9999 and 2019 c 287 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, beginning with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:

(a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection in respect to the use of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:

(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or

(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power; and

(iii)(A) Have a fair market value at the time use tax is imposed for purchased vehicles that:

(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed forty-five thousand dollars; or

(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed thirty thousand dollars; or

(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:

(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed forty-five thousand dollars; or

(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed thirty thousand dollars;

(b)(i) The exemption in this section is only applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:

(A) The total amount of the vehicle's purchase price, for sales made; or

(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional purchase price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.

(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:

(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is twenty-five thousand dollars;

(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is twenty thousand dollars;

(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is fifteen thousand dollars.

(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is sixteen thousand dollars.

(2)(a) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; fair market value of the vehicle; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(b) (a) of this subsection applies only if the seller or person claiming the exemption is a vehicle dealer, as defined under RCW 46.70.011. When the seller is not a vehicle dealer, the department of licensing must establish a process for granting the tax exemption under this section for use tax otherwise collected at the time the ownership of a vehicle is transferred when the vehicle qualifies for the use tax exemption under subsection (1)(a) of this section, and must provide any information required under (a) of this subsection that it obtains as part of the vehicle titling and registration process for these vehicles to the department on at least a quarterly basis.

(3) ((On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the electric vehicle account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data.

(4)))(a) Vehicles purchased or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.

(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.

(((5)))(4) The definitions in RCW 82.08.9999 apply to this section.

(((6)))(5) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.

(((7)))(6) This section expires August 1, 2028.

Sec. 208. RCW 82.04.4496 and 2019 c 287 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A person who is taxable under this chapter is allowed a credit against the tax imposed in this chapter according to the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle and the incremental cost of the vehicle purchased above the purchase price of a comparable conventionally fueled vehicle. The credit is limited, as set forth in the table below, to the lesser of the incremental cost amount or the maximum credit amount per vehicle purchased, and subject to a maximum annual credit amount per vehicle class.

Gross Vehicle Weight

Incremental Cost Amount

Maximum Credit Amount

Per Vehicle

Maximum Annual Credit

Per Vehicle Class

Up to 14,000 pounds

75% of incremental cost

$25,000

$2,000,000

14,001 to 26,500 pounds

75% of incremental cost

$50,000

$2,000,000

Above 26,500 pounds

75% of incremental cost

$100,000

$2,000,000

(ii) A person who is taxable under this chapter is allowed a credit against the tax imposed in this chapter for up to fifty percent of the cost to purchase alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure, tangible personal property that will become a component of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure, and installation and construction of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure, but excluding the cost of property acquisition and site improvement related to the installation of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure. The credit is subject to a maximum annual credit amount of two million dollars.

(b) On September 1st of each year, any unused credits from any category identified in (a) of this subsection must be made available to applicants applying for credits under any other category identified in (a) of this subsection, subject to the maximum annual and total credit amounts identified in this subsection. The credit established in this section and RCW 82.16.0496 is subject to a maximum annual credit amount of six million dollars, and a maximum total credit amount of thirty-two and one-half million dollars since the credit became available on July 15, 2015.

(c) The credit provided in (a)(i) of this subsection is available for the lease of a vehicle. The credit amount for a leased vehicle is equal to the credit in (a)(i) of this subsection multiplied by the lease reduction factor. The person claiming the credit for a leased vehicle must be the lessee as identified in the lease contract.

(2) A person who is taxable under this chapter is allowed, subject to the maximum annual credit per category in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a credit against the tax imposed in this chapter for the lesser of twenty-five thousand dollars or fifty percent of the costs of converting a commercial vehicle to be principally powered by a clean alternative fuel with a United States environmental protection agency certified conversion.

(3) The total credits under subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section may not exceed the lesser of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or twenty-five vehicles per person per calendar year.

(4) A person may not receive credit under this section for amounts claimed as credits under chapter 82.16 RCW.

(5) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis.

(a) The department must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the total amount of credits claimed under this section, and RCW 82.16.0496, during any calendar year to exceed six million dollars. The department must provide notification on its website monthly on the amount of credits that have been applied for, the amount issued, and the amount remaining before the statewide annual limit is reached. In addition, the department must provide written notice to any person who has applied to claim tax credits in excess of the limitation in this subsection.

(b) The department must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the total amount of credits claimed beginning July 15, 2015, under this section and RCW 82.16.0496 to exceed thirty-two and one-half million dollars. The department must provide notification on its website monthly on the total amount of credits that have been applied for, the amount issued, and the amount remaining before the statewide limit is reached. In addition, the department must provide written notice to any person who has applied to claim tax credits in excess of the limitation in this subsection.

(6) For the purposes of the limits provided in this section, a credit must be counted against such limits for the calendar year in which the credit is earned.

(7) To claim a credit under this section a person must electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any other information required by the department, in an electronic format as provided or approved by the department. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(8) To claim a credit under this section, the person applying must:

(a) Complete an application for the credit which must include:

(i) The name, business address, and tax identification number of the applicant;

(ii) A quote or unexecuted copy of the purchase requisition or order for the vehicle, infrastructure, infrastructure components, infrastructure construction, or infrastructure installation;

(iii) The type of alternative fuel to be used by the vehicle or supported by the infrastructure;

(iv) The incremental cost of the alternative fuel system for vehicle credits;

(v) The anticipated delivery date of the vehicle, the anticipated delivery date of the infrastructure or infrastructure components, the anticipated construction completion date of the infrastructure, or the anticipated installation completion date of the infrastructure;

(vi) The estimated annual fuel use of the vehicle in the anticipated duties or the estimated annual fuel to be supplied by the infrastructure;

(vii) The gross weight of each vehicle for vehicle credits;

(viii) For leased vehicles, a copy of the lease contract that includes the gross capitalized cost, residual value, and name of the lessee; and

(ix) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to support administration or reporting of the program.

(b) Within fifteen days of notice of credit availability from the department, provide notice of intent to claim the credit including:

(i) A copy of the order for the vehicle or infrastructure-related item, including the total cost for the vehicle or infrastructure-related item;

(ii) The anticipated delivery date of the vehicle or infrastructure or infrastructure component, which must be within one year of acceptance of the credit;

(iii) The anticipated construction or installation completion date of the infrastructure, which must be within two years of acceptance of the credit; and

(iv) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to support administration or reporting of the program.

(c) Provide final documentation within thirty days of receipt of the vehicle or infrastructure or infrastructure components or of completion of construction or installation of the infrastructure, including:

(i) A copy of the final invoice for the vehicle or infrastructure-related items;

(ii) A copy of the factory build sheet or equivalent documentation;

(iii) The vehicle identification number of each vehicle;

(iv) The incremental cost of the alternative fuel system for vehicle credits;

(v) Attestations signed by both the seller and purchaser of each vehicle attesting that the incremental cost of the alternative fuel system includes only the costs necessary for the vehicle to run on alternative fuel and no other vehicle options, equipment, or costs; and

(vi) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to support administration or reporting of the program.

(9) A person applying for credit under subsection (8) of this section may apply for multiple vehicles on the same application, but the application must include the required information for each vehicle included in the application. A separate application is required for infrastructure-related items, but all infrastructure-related items at a single location may be included in a single application provided the required information for each infrastructure-related item is included in the application.

(10) To administer the credits, the department must, at a minimum:

(a) Provide notification on its website monthly of the amount of credits that have been applied for, claimed, and the amount remaining before the statewide annual limit and total limit are reached;

(b) Within fifteen days of receipt of the application, notify persons applying of the availability of tax credits in the year in which the vehicles or infrastructure applied for are anticipated to be delivered, constructed, or installed;

(c) Within fifteen days of receipt of the notice of intent to claim the tax credit, notify the applicant of the approval, denial, or missing information in their notice; and

(d) Within fifteen days of receipt of final documentation, review the documentation and notify the person applying of the acceptance of their final documentation.

(11) If a person fails to supply the information as required in subsection (8) of this section, the department must deny the application.

(12)(a) Taxpayers are only eligible for a credit under this section based on:

(i) Sales or leases of new commercial vehicles and qualifying used commercial vehicles with propulsion units that are principally powered by a clean alternative fuel;

(ii) Costs to modify a commercial vehicle, including sales of tangible personal property incorporated into the vehicle and labor or service expenses incurred in modifying the vehicle, to be principally powered by a clean alternative fuel; or

(iii) Sales of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure or infrastructure components, or the cost of construction or installation of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure.

(b) A credit is earned when the purchaser or the lessee takes receipt of the qualifying commercial vehicle or infrastructure-related item, the vehicle conversion is complete, or the construction or installation of the infrastructure is complete.

(13) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second year.

(14)(((a) Beginning November 25, 2015, and on the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year thereafter, the department must notify the state treasurer of the amount of credits taken under this section as reported on returns filed with the department during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and September, respectively.

(b) On the last day of March, June, September, and December of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer a sum equal to the dollar amount of the credit provided under this section from the multimodal transportation account to the general fund.

(15))) The department must conduct outreach to interested parties to obtain input on how best to streamline the application process required for the credit made available in this section and RCW 82.16.0496 to further adoption of alternative fuel technologies in commercial vehicle fleets, and must incorporate the findings resulting from this outreach effort into the rules and practices it adopts to implement and administer this section and RCW 82.16.0496 to the extent permitted under law.

(((16)))(15) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery, and equipment necessary and integral to support a clean alternative fuel vehicle.

(b) "Auto transportation company" means any corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any motor propelled vehicle, used in the business of transporting persons for compensation over public highways within the state of Washington, between fixed points or over a regular route. For the purposes of this section, "auto transportation company" also includes the following categories of providers irrespective of whether they provide service between fixed points or over a regular route: "Private, nonprofit transportation provider" as defined in RCW 81.66.010, "charter party carrier" as defined in RCW 81.70.020, and paratransit service providers who primarily provide special needs transportation to individuals with disabilities and the elderly.

(c) "Clean alternative fuel" means electricity, dimethyl ether, hydrogen, methane, natural gas, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas, or propane.

(d) "Commercial vehicle" means any commercial vehicle that is purchased by a private business and that is used exclusively in the provision of commercial services or the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, refuse, freight, animals, or passengers, and that is displaying a Washington state license plate. All commercial vehicles that provide transportation to passengers must be operated by an auto transportation company.

(e) "Gross capitalized cost" means the agreed upon value of the commercial vehicle and including any other items a person pays over the lease term that are included in such cost.

(f) "Lease reduction factor" means the vehicle gross capitalized cost less the residual value, divided by the gross capitalized cost.

(g) "Qualifying used commercial vehicle" means vehicles that:

(i) Have an odometer reading of less than four hundred fifty thousand miles;

(ii) Are less than ten years past their original date of manufacture;

(iii) Were modified after the initial purchase with a United States environmental protection agency certified conversion that would allow the propulsion units to be principally powered by a clean alternative fuel; and

(iv) Are being sold for the first time after modification.

(h) "Residual value" means the lease-end value of the vehicle as determined by the lessor, at the end of the lease term included in the lease contract.

(((17)))(16) Credits may be earned under this section from January 1, 2016, until the maximum total credit amount in subsection (1)(b) of this section is reached, except for credits for leased vehicles, which may be earned from July 1, 2016, until the maximum total credit amount in subsection (1)(b) of this section is reached.

Sec. 209. RCW 82.16.0496 and 2019 c 287 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A person who is taxable under this chapter is allowed a credit against the tax imposed in this chapter according to the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle and the incremental cost of the vehicle purchased above the purchase price of a comparable conventionally fueled vehicle. The credit is limited, as set forth in the table below, to the lesser of the incremental cost amount or the maximum credit amount per vehicle purchased, and subject to a maximum annual credit amount per vehicle class.

Gross Vehicle Weight

Incremental Cost Amount

Maximum Credit Amount

Per Vehicle

Maximum Annual Credit

Per Vehicle Class

Up to 14,000 pounds

75% of incremental cost

$25,000

$2,000,000

14,001 to 26,500 pounds

75% of incremental cost

$50,000

$2,000,000

Above 26,500 pounds

75% of incremental cost

$100,000

$2,000,000

(ii) A person who is taxable under this chapter is allowed a credit against the tax imposed in this chapter for up to fifty percent of the cost to purchase alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure, tangible personal property that will become a component of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure, and installation and construction of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure, but excluding the cost of property acquisition and site improvement related to the installation of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure. The credit is subject to a maximum annual credit amount of two million dollars.

(b) On September 1st of each year, any unused credits from any category identified in (a) of this subsection must be made available to applicants applying for credits under any other category identified in (a) of this subsection, subject to the maximum annual and total credit amounts identified in this subsection. The credit established in this section and RCW 82.04.4496 is subject to a maximum annual credit amount of six million dollars, and a maximum total credit amount of thirty-two and one-half million dollars beginning July 15, 2015.

(c) The credit provided in (a)(i) of this subsection is available for the lease of a vehicle. The credit amount for a leased vehicle is equal to the credit in (a)(i) of this subsection multiplied by the lease reduction factor. The person claiming the credit for a leased vehicle must be the lessee as identified in the lease contract.

(2) A person who is taxable under this chapter is allowed, subject to the maximum annual credit per category in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a credit against the tax imposed in this chapter for the lesser of twenty-five thousand dollars or fifty percent of the costs of converting a commercial vehicle to be principally powered by a clean alternative fuel with a United States environmental protection agency certified conversion.

(3) The total credits under subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section may not exceed the lesser of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or twenty-five vehicles per person per calendar year.

(4) A person may not receive credit under this section for amounts claimed as credits under chapter 82.04 RCW.

(5) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis.

(a) The department must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the total amount of credits claimed under this section, and RCW 82.04.4496, during any calendar year to exceed six million dollars. The department must provide notification on its website monthly on the amount of credits that have been applied for, the amount issued, and the amount remaining before the statewide annual limit is reached. In addition, the department must provide written notice to any person who has applied to claim tax credits in excess of the limitation in this subsection.

(b) The department must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the total amount of credits claimed beginning July 15, 2015, under this section and RCW 82.04.4496 to exceed thirty-two and one-half million dollars. The department must provide notification on its website monthly on the total amount of credits that have been applied for, the amount issued, and the amount remaining before the statewide limit is reached. In addition, the department must provide written notice to any person who has applied to claim tax credits in excess of the limitation in this subsection.

(6) For the purposes of the limits provided in this section, a credit must be counted against such limits for the calendar year in which the credit is earned.

(7) To claim a credit under this section a person must electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any other information required by the department, in an electronic format as provided or approved by the department. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(8) To claim a credit under this section, the person applying must:

(a) Complete an application for the credit which must include:

(i) The name, business address, and tax identification number of the applicant;

(ii) A quote or unexecuted copy of the purchase requisition or order for the vehicle, infrastructure, infrastructure components, infrastructure construction, or infrastructure installation;

(iii) The type of alternative fuel to be used by the vehicle or supported by the infrastructure;

(iv) The incremental cost of the alternative fuel system for vehicle credits;

(v) The anticipated delivery date of the vehicle, the anticipated delivery date of the infrastructure or infrastructure components, the anticipated construction completion date of the infrastructure, or the anticipated installation completion date of the infrastructure;

(vi) The estimated annual fuel use of the vehicle in the anticipated duties or the estimated annual fuel to be supplied by the infrastructure;

(vii) The gross weight of each vehicle for vehicle credits;

(viii) For leased vehicles, a copy of the lease contract that includes the gross capitalized cost, residual value, and name of the lessee; and

(ix) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to support administration or reporting of the program.

(b) Within fifteen days of notice of credit availability from the department, provide notice of intent to claim the credit including:

(i) A copy of the order for the vehicle or infrastructure-related item, including the total cost for the vehicle or infrastructure-related item;

(ii) The anticipated delivery date of the vehicle or infrastructure or infrastructure component, which must be within one year of acceptance of the credit;

(iii) The anticipated construction or installation completion date of the infrastructure, which must be within two years of acceptance of the credit; and

(iv) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to support administration or reporting of the program.

(c) Provide final documentation within thirty days of receipt of the vehicle or infrastructure or infrastructure components or of completion of construction or installation of the infrastructure, including:

(i) A copy of the final invoice for the vehicle or infrastructure-related items;

(ii) A copy of the factory build sheet or equivalent documentation;

(iii) The vehicle identification number of each vehicle;

(iv) The incremental cost of the alternative fuel system for vehicle credits;

(v) Attestations signed by both the seller and purchaser of the vehicle attesting that the incremental cost of the alternative fuel system includes only the costs necessary for the vehicle to run on alternative fuel and no other vehicle options, equipment, or costs; and

(vi) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to support administration or reporting of the program.

(9) A person applying for credit under subsection (8) of this section may apply for multiple vehicles on the same application, but the application must include the required information for each vehicle included in the application. A separate application is required for infrastructure-related items, but all infrastructure-related items at a single location may be included in a single application provided the required information for each infrastructure-related item is included in the application.

(10) To administer the credits, the department must, at a minimum:

(a) Provide notification on its website monthly of the amount of credits that have been applied for, claimed, and the amount remaining before the statewide annual limit and total limit are reached;

(b) Within fifteen days of receipt of the application, notify persons applying of the availability of tax credits in the year in which the vehicles or infrastructure applied for are anticipated to be delivered, constructed, or installed;

(c) Within fifteen days of receipt of the notice of intent to claim the tax credit, notify the applicant of the approval, denial, or missing information in their notice; and

(d) Within fifteen days of receipt of final documentation, review the documentation and notify the person applying of the acceptance of their final documentation.

(11) If a person fails to supply the information as required in subsection (8) of this section, the department must deny the application.

(12)(a) Taxpayers are only eligible for a credit under this section based on:

(i) Sales or leases of new commercial vehicles and qualifying used commercial vehicles with propulsion units that are principally powered by a clean alternative fuel;

(ii) Costs to modify a commercial vehicle, including sales of tangible personal property incorporated into the vehicle and labor or service expenses incurred in modifying the vehicle, to be principally powered by a clean alternative fuel; or

(iii) Sales of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure or infrastructure components, or the cost of construction or installation of alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure.

(b) A credit is earned when the purchaser or the lessee takes receipt of the qualifying commercial vehicle or infrastructure-related item, the vehicle conversion is complete, or the construction or installation of the infrastructure is complete.

(13) The definitions in RCW 82.04.4496 apply to this section.

(14) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second year.

(15)(((a) Beginning November 25, 2015, and on the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year thereafter, the department must notify the state treasurer of the amount of credits taken under this section as reported on returns filed with the department during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and September, respectively.

(b) On the last day of March, June, September, and December of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer a sum equal to the dollar amount of the credit provided under this section from the multimodal transportation account to the general fund.

(16))) Credits may be earned under this section from January 1, 2016, until the maximum total credit amount in subsection (1)(b) of this section is reached, except for credits for leased vehicles, which may be earned from July 1, 2016, until the maximum total credit amount in subsection (1)(b) of this section is reached.

PART III

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. Sections 201 through 209 of this act take effect July 1, 2025.

--- END ---