BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In 2021, the state enacted House Bill No. 1016 to declare Juneteenth a state legal holiday. The legislature finds that there is ambiguity about whether Juneteenth is also a school holiday as a result of that act. The legislature intends to clarify that Juneteenth, like all other state legal holidays, is a school holiday on which school may not be taught.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.150.050 and 2014 c 177 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The following are))All of the state legal holidays set forth in RCW 1.16.050(1) are also school holidays((,)) and school may not be taught on these days((:

(a) Sunday;

(b) The first day of January, commonly called New Year's Day;

(c) The third Monday of January, celebrated as the anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King, Jr.;

(d) The third Monday in February, to be known as Presidents' Day and celebrated as the anniversary of the births of Abraham Lincoln and George Washington;

(e) The last Monday in May, commonly known as Memorial Day;

(f) The fourth day of July, the anniversary of the Declaration of Independence;

(g) The first Monday in September, to be known as Labor Day;

(h) The eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day;

(i) The fourth Thursday in November, commonly known as Thanksgiving Day;

(j) The Friday immediately following the fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Native American Heritage Day; and

(k) The twenty-fifth day of December, commonly called Christmas Day)).

(2) No reduction from a teacher's time or salary may be made by reason of the fact that a school day happens to be one of the days referred to in this section as a day on which school is not taught.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2022.

--- END ---