BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess in, a ballot counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office, or areas of facilities while being used as a ballot counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous weapon as described in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other gas; or

(d)(i) Any portable device manufactured to function as a weapon and which is commonly known as a stun gun, including a projectile stun gun that projects wired probes that are attached to the device that emit an electrical charge designed to administer to a person or an animal an electric shock, charge, or impulse; or

(ii) Any device, object, or instrument that is used or intended to be used as a weapon with the intent to injure a person by an electric shock, charge, or impulse.

(2) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If a person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any, revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under subsection (1)(a) of this section is prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years from the date of conviction. The court shall order the person to immediately surrender any concealed pistol license, and within three business days notify the department of licensing in writing of the required revocation of any concealed pistol license held by the person. Upon receipt of the notification by the court, the department of licensing shall determine if the person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which, upon receipt of the notification, shall immediately revoke the license.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) Any law enforcement officer of a federal, state, or local government agency; or

(b) Any security personnel hired by a county and engaged in security specifically for a counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office or areas of facilities used for such purposes. However, a person who is not a commissioned law enforcement officer and who provides elections and voter registration security services under the direction of a county may not possess a firearm or device listed in subsection (1)(d) of this section unless he or she has successfully completed training in the use of firearms or such devices that is equivalent to the training received by commissioned law enforcement officers.

(4) Elections officers and officials must post signs providing notice of the restriction on possession of firearms and other weapons at each counting center, voting center, student engagement hub, or county elections and voter registration office, or areas of facilities while being used as a counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Ballot counting center" has the same meaning as "counting center" in RCW 29A.04.019;

(b) "Voting center" means a voting center as described in RCW 29A.40.160; and

(c) "Student engagement hub" means a student engagement hub as described in RCW 29A.40.180.

--- END ---