BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.520 and 1998 c 245 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of licensing shall use moneys designated for the motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety fund to implement by July 1, 1983, a voluntary motorcycle operator training and education program. The director may contract with public and private entities to implement this program.

(2)(a) There is created a motorcycle safety education advisory board to assist the director of licensing in the development of a motorcycle operator training education program. The board shall monitor this program following implementation and report to the director of licensing as necessary with recommendations including, but not limited to, administration, application, and substance of the motorcycle operator training and education program.

(b) The board shall consist of ((five))seven members appointed by the director of licensing. Three members of the board((, one of whom shall be appointed chairperson,)) shall be active motorcycle riders or members of nonprofit motorcycle organizations which actively support and promote motorcycle safety education. Two members shall represent motorcycle safety instructors. One member shall be a currently employed Washington state patrol motorcycle officer with at least five years experience and at least one year cumulative experience as a motorcycle officer. One member shall be a member of the public.

(c) The term of appointment shall be two years and shall extend until their successors are appointed. The terms of appointment shall be staggered so that either one or two members are appointed in every even-numbered year.

(d) All members must be specially endorsed to drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled motorcycle or have been specially endorsed by the director to drive such motorcycles.

(e) To the extent practicable, the director should strive to appoint members who reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and gender, and who reside in different areas of the state, with at least one member who resides east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(f) The board shall meet at the call of the director, but not less than two times annually and not less than five times during its term of appointment, and shall receive no compensation for services but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses while engaged in business of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

(3) The seven members of the board shall select a chair from the members who represent the active motorcycle riders, members of nonprofit motorcycle organizations, or motorcycle safety instructors.

(4) The priorities of the program shall be in the following order of priority:

(a) Public awareness of motorcycle safety.

(b) Motorcycle safety education programs conducted by public and private entities.

(c) Classroom and on-cycle training.

(d) Improved motorcycle operator testing.

--- END ---