BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.090 and 2000 c 107 s 267 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may adopt rules pertaining to the form, period of validity, use, possession, and display of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets required by this chapter. This authority extends to the issuance of electronic licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and catch record cards, as well as their use, possession, display, and presentation to agency staff.

--- END ---