BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.32.280 and 2015 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For each measure from a unit of local government that is included in a local voters' pamphlet, the ((legislative authority of that jurisdiction))auditor for the county in which a jurisdiction is located shall, ((not later than))within one week of the resolution deadline, formally appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' approval of the measure and shall formally appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' rejection of the measure. The authority shall appoint persons known to favor the measure to serve on the committee advocating approval and shall, whenever possible, appoint persons known to oppose the measure to serve on the committee advocating rejection. Each committee shall have not more than three members, however, a committee may seek the advice of any person or persons. ((If the legislative authority of a unit of local government fails to make such appointments by the prescribed deadline, the county auditor shall whenever possible make the appointments.))

(2) If a local jurisdiction is located in more than one county, the auditors of the counties shall coordinate the appointment of the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. These costs are payable in accordance with RCW 29A.04.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2023.

--- END ---