BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.18.040 and 2008 c 6 s 1029 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A proceeding to enforce a duty of support or maintenance is commenced:

(a) By filing a petition for an original action; or

(b) By motion in an existing action or under an existing cause number.

(2) Venue for the action is in the superior court of the county where the dependent child resides or is present, where the obligor or obligee resides, or where the prior support or maintenance order was entered. The petition or motion may be filed by the obligee, the state, or any agency providing care or support to the dependent child. A filing fee shall not be assessed in cases brought on behalf of the state of Washington.

(3) The court retains continuing jurisdiction under this chapter until all duties of either support or maintenance, or both, of the obligor, including arrearages, have been satisfied.

(4) A parent whose rights were terminated in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW is prohibited from commencing an action for support or maintenance against an adoptive parent even if the former parent is the custodial parent.

--- END ---