BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.04.150 and 2008 c 294 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission must appoint an advisory committee to generally represent the interests of hunters and fishers with disabilities on matters including, but not limited to, special hunts, modified sporting equipment, access to public land, and hunting and fishing opportunities. The advisory committee is composed of seven members, each being an individual with a disability. Two additional members, who have demonstrable experience working with disabled persons in a natural resource environment, may be appointed to the advisory committee. The advisory committee members must represent the entire state. The members must be appointed so that each of the six department administrative regions, as they existed on January 1, 2007, are represented with one resident on the advisory committee. One additional member must be appointed at large. The chair of the advisory committee must be a member of the advisory committee and shall be selected by the members of the advisory committee.

(2) ((For the purposes of this section, an individual with a disability includes but is not limited to:

(a) An individual with a permanent disability who is not ambulatory over natural terrain without a prosthesis or assistive device;

(b) An individual with a permanent disability who is unable to walk without the use of assistance from a brace, cane, crutch, wheelchair, scooter, walker, or other assistive device;

(c) An individual who has a cardiac condition to the extent that the individual's functional limitations are severe;

(d) An individual who is restricted by lung disease to the extent that the individual's functional limitations are severe;

(e) An individual who is totally blind or visually impaired; or

(f) An individual with a permanent disability with upper or lower extremity impairments who does not have the use of one or both upper or lower extremities.

(3))) The members of the advisory committee are appointed for a four-year term. If a vacancy occurs on the advisory committee prior to the expiration of a term, the commission must appoint a replacement within sixty days to complete the term.

(((4)))(3) The advisory committee must meet at least semiannually, and may meet at other times as requested by a majority of the advisory committee members for any express purpose that directly relates to the duties set forth in subsection (1) of this section. A majority of members currently serving on the advisory committee constitutes a quorum. The department must provide staff support for all official advisory committee meetings.

(((5)))(4) Each member of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(((6)))(5) The members of the advisory committee, or individuals acting on their behalf, are immune from civil liability for official acts performed in the course of their duties.

(((7) Beginning December 1, 2011, and again at))(6) At least once every ((four))two years, by December 1st, the commission shall present a concise report to the appropriate legislative committees detailing the ((effectiveness of the advisory committee including, but not limited to, the participation levels, general interest, quality of advice, and recommendations as to the advisory committee's continuance or modification))levels of participation in hunting and fishing by persons with disabilities, and any recommendations to maintain accessibility for persons with disabilities.

--- END ---