BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Commercial motor vehicle parking shortages are a national safety concern. Washington state has exacerbated the problem in the fall of 2021 by the closure of many state-owned and operated safety rest areas. All vehicle drivers need safe places to stop when they are tired to prevent serious and fatal injuries. Washington's target zero plan reports that drowsy driving was a factor in 44 deaths and 236 serious injuries from 2015-2017. One of the ways Washington's target zero plan addresses this issue is having available rest areas. The closure of state-owned safety rest areas is contrary to state policy to have zero deaths on the roadways.

In addition, commercial truck drivers are required to take federally mandated rest breaks that leads to the need for there to be parking available in many locations throughout the highway system. Safety rest areas are important for supply line integrity and the use by the traveling public. The legislature believes it is essential for this public service to be restored and maintained in the future as quickly as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department is directed to reconfigure its maintenance operations to assure that its owned and operated safety rest areas are open for use except for seasonal closures or cleaning, maintenance, and repairs. The change in structure may take advantage of the gig economy and restructure existing vacant employee positions to be more in line with current needs.

(2) The department may initiate a strategic planning process that addresses the maintenance, operation, and safety of its owned and operated safety rest areas. At a minimum, this plan shall evaluate operations, maintenance, safety, and commercial motor vehicle parking at safety rest areas. The department must engage members from the freight community and other stakeholders for recommendations and solutions. The plan must identify strategies that the department can employ to ensure commercial motor vehicle parking is available at state-owned and operated safety rest areas. The department shall prioritize the planning effort to conclude by the end of the 2021-2023 biennium.

(3) The department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature the changes that have been made to or are planned to be made to operation of the safety rest areas by January 15, 2023, including recommendations related to commercial vehicle parking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---