BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no health care provider may knowingly:

(a) Perform an abortion by means of medication; or

(b) Prescribe or dispense any medications for the purpose of inducing an abortion.

(2) This section does not apply to an abortion that is necessary to preserve the life of the mother.

(3) A health care provider who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---