BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the immune protection gained from a prior COVID-19 infection is at least as protective against COVID-19 as a COVID-19 vaccine. It is therefore declared to be the policy of the state that there is no rational basis to treat individuals who have had a previous COVID-19 infection differently from individuals who have received a COVID-19 vaccine.

(2) Any statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, policy, or practice by a public entity, private business, or place of public accommodation that is inconsistent with subsection (1) of this section is hereby declared null and void.

(3) The state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire field of requirements related to the protections in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Political subdivisions of the state may enact only those laws, ordinances, and regulations that are consistent with this section. Local laws, ordinances, and regulations that are inconsistent with the requirements of this section may not be enacted and are preempted and repealed, regardless of the nature of the code, charter, or home rule status of the political subdivision.

--- END ---