BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, shall exempt an enrollee from prior authorization requirements for coverage of biomarker testing for either of the following:

(a) Stage 3 or 4 cancer; or

(b) Recurrent, relapsed, refractory, or metastatic cancer.

(2) For purposes of this section, "biomarker test" means a single or multigene diagnostic test of the cancer patient's biospecimen, such as tissue, blood, or other bodily fluids, for DNA, RNA, or protein alterations, including phenotypic characteristics of a malignancy, to identify an individual with a subtype of cancer, in order to guide patient treatment.

(3) For purposes of this section, biomarker testing must be:

(a) Recommended in the latest version of nationally recognized guidelines or biomarker compendia, such as those published by the national comprehensive cancer network;

(b) Approved by the United States food and drug administration or a validated clinical laboratory test performed in a clinical laboratory certified under the clinical laboratory improvement amendments or in an alternative laboratory program approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services;

(c) A covered service; and

(d) Prescribed by an in-network provider.

(4) This section does not limit, prohibit, or modify an enrollee's rights to biomarker testing as part of an approved clinical trial under chapter 69.77 RCW.

(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to mandate coverage of a health care service.

(6) Nothing in this section prohibits a health plan from requiring a biomarker test prior to approving a drug or treatment.

(7) This section does not limit an enrollee's rights to access individual gene tests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed care organization shall exempt an enrollee from prior authorization requirements for coverage of biomarker testing for either of the following:

(a) Stage 3 or 4 cancer; or

(b) Recurrent, relapsed, refractory, or metastatic cancer.

(2) For purposes of this section, "biomarker test" means a single or multigene diagnostic test of the cancer patient's biospecimen, such as tissue, blood, or other bodily fluids, for DNA, RNA, or protein alterations, including phenotypic characteristics of a malignancy, to identify an individual with a subtype of cancer, in order to guide patient treatment.

(3) For purposes of this section, biomarker testing must be:

(a) Recommended in the latest version of nationally recognized guidelines or biomarker compendia, such as those published by the national comprehensive cancer network;

(b) Approved by the United States food and drug administration or a validated clinical laboratory test performed in a clinical laboratory certified under the clinical laboratory improvement amendments or in an alternative laboratory program approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services;

(c) A covered service; and

(d) Prescribed by an in-network provider.

(4) This section does not limit, prohibit, or modify an enrollee's rights to biomarker testing as part of an approved clinical trial under chapter 69.77 RCW.

(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to mandate coverage of a health care service.

(6) Nothing in this section prohibits a managed care plan from requiring a biomarker test prior to approving a drug or treatment.

(7) This section does not limit an enrollee's rights to access individual gene tests.

--- END ---