BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

No legislative member of the house of representatives or the senate may be prohibited from accessing the legislative building, including the house and senate floors, the Irving R. Newhouse building, the John A. Cherberg building, and the John L. O'Brien building, except for offices and other areas that are assigned to other members and staff or areas that require a reservation that the member has not made.

--- END ---