BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.110.050 and 2016 c 224 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Service contracts shall not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state or sold to consumers in this state unless the service contract provider has:

(a) Provided a receipt for, or other written evidence of, the purchase of the service contract to the contract holder; and

(b) Provided a copy of the service contract to the service contract holder within a reasonable period of time from the date of purchase.

(2) In order to either demonstrate its financial responsibility or assure the faithful performance of the service contract provider's obligations to its service contract holders, every service contract provider shall comply with the requirements of one of the following:

(a) Insure all service contracts under ((a))one or more reimbursement insurance ((policy))policies issued by ((an insurer))one or more insurers holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner or a risk retention group, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901(a)(4), as long as that risk retention group is in full compliance with the federal liability risk retention act of 1986 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901 et seq.), is in good standing in its domiciliary jurisdiction, and is properly registered with the commissioner under chapter 48.92 RCW. The insurance required by this subsection must meet the following requirements:

(i) The insurer or risk retention group must, at the time the policy ((is))or policies are filed with the commissioner, and continuously thereafter, maintain surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of at least fifteen million dollars and annually file audited financial statements with the commissioner; and

(ii) The commissioner may authorize an insurer or risk retention group that has surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of less than fifteen million dollars, but at least equal to ten million dollars, to issue the insurance required by this subsection if the insurer or risk retention group demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the company maintains a ratio of direct written premiums, wherever written, to surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of not more than three to one;

(b)(i) Maintain a funded reserve account for its obligations under its service contracts issued and outstanding in this state. The reserves shall not be less than forty percent of the gross consideration received, less claims paid, on the sale of the service contract for all in-force contracts. The reserve account shall be subject to examination and review by the commissioner; and

(ii) Place in trust with the commissioner a financial security deposit, having a value of not less than five percent of the gross consideration received, less claims paid, on the sale of the service contract for all service contracts issued and in force, but not less than twenty-five thousand dollars, consisting of one of the following:

(A) A surety bond issued by an insurer holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner;

(B) Securities of the type eligible for deposit by authorized insurers in this state;

(C) Cash;

(D) An irrevocable evergreen letter of credit issued by a qualified financial institution; or

(E) Another form of security prescribed by rule by the commissioner; or

(c)(i) Maintain, or its parent company maintain, a net worth or stockholder's equity of at least one hundred million dollars; and

(ii) Upon request, provide the commissioner with a copy of the service contract provider's or, if using the net worth or stockholder's equity of its parent company to satisfy the one hundred million dollar requirement, the service contract provider's parent company's most recent form 10-K or form 20-F filed with the securities and exchange commission within the last calendar year, or if the company does not file with the securities and exchange commission, a copy of the service contract provider's or, if using the net worth or stockholder's equity of its parent company to satisfy the one hundred million dollar requirement, the service contract provider's parent company's most recent audited financial statements, which shows a net worth of the service contract provider or its parent company of at least one hundred million dollars. If the service contract provider's parent company's form 10-K, form 20-F, or audited financial statements are filed with the commissioner to meet the service contract provider's financial stability requirement, then the parent company shall agree to guarantee the obligations of the service contract provider relating to service contracts sold by the service contract provider in this state. A copy of the guarantee shall be filed with the commissioner. The guarantee shall be irrevocable as long as there is in force in this state any contract or any obligation arising from service contracts guaranteed, unless the parent company has made arrangements approved by the commissioner to satisfy its obligations under the guarantee.

(3) Service contracts shall require the service contract provider to permit the service contract holder to return the service contract within twenty days of the date the service contract was mailed to the service contract holder or within ten days of delivery if the service contract is delivered to the service contract holder at the time of sale, or within a longer time period permitted under the service contract. Upon return of the service contract to the service contract provider within the applicable period, if no claim has been made under the service contract prior to the return to the service contract provider, the service contract is void and the service contract provider shall refund to the service contract holder, or credit the account of the service contract holder with the full purchase price of the service contract. The right to void the service contract provided in this subsection is not transferable and shall apply only to the original service contract purchaser. A ten percent penalty per month shall be added to a refund of the purchase price that is not paid or credited within thirty days after return of the service contract to the service contract provider.

(4) This section does not apply to service contracts on motor vehicles or to protection product guarantees.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.110.055 and 2019 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies to protection product guarantee providers.

(2) A person must not act as, or offer to act as, or hold himself or herself out to be a protection product guarantee provider in this state, nor may a protection product be sold to a consumer in this state, unless the protection product guarantee provider has:

(a) A valid registration as a protection product guarantee provider issued by the commissioner; and

(b) Either demonstrated its financial responsibility or assured the faithful performance of the protection product guarantee provider's obligations to its protection product guarantee holders by insuring all protection product guarantees under ((a))one or more reimbursement insurance ((policy))policies issued by ((an insurer))one or more insurers holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner or a risk retention group, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901(a)(4), as long as that risk retention group is in full compliance with the federal liability risk retention act of 1986 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901 et seq.), is in good standing in its domiciliary jurisdiction, and properly registered with the commissioner under chapter 48.92 RCW. The insurance required by this subsection must meet the following requirements:

(i) The insurer or risk retention group must, at the time the policy ((is))or policies are filed with the commissioner, and continuously thereafter, maintain surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of at least fifteen million dollars and annually file audited financial statements with the commissioner; and

(ii) The commissioner may authorize an insurer or risk retention group that has surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of less than fifteen million dollars, but at least equal to ten million dollars, to issue the insurance required by this subsection if the insurer or risk retention group demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the company maintains a ratio of direct written premiums, wherever written, to surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of not more than three to one.

(3) Applicants to be a protection product guarantee provider must make an application to the commissioner upon a form to be furnished by the commissioner. The application must include or be accompanied by the following information and documents:

(a) The names of the protection product guarantee provider's executive officer or officers directly responsible for the protection product guarantee provider's protection product guarantee business and their biographical affidavits on a form prescribed by the commissioner;

(b) The name, address, and telephone number of any administrators designated by the protection product guarantee provider to be responsible for the administration of protection product guarantees in this state;

(c) A copy of the protection product guarantee reimbursement insurance policy or policies;

(d) A copy of each protection product guarantee the protection product guarantee provider proposes to use in this state;

(e) The most recent annual financial statements, if available, or the most recent financial statements certified as accurate by two or more officers of the applicant which prove that the applicant has and maintains a minimum net worth or stockholder's equity of two hundred thousand dollars or more calculated in accordance with RCW 48.110.078 and the ability to pay its debts when debts become due; and

(f) A nonrefundable application fee of two hundred fifty dollars.

(4) Each registered protection product guarantee provider must appoint the commissioner as the protection product guarantee provider's attorney to receive service of legal process issued against the protection product guarantee provider in this state upon causes of action arising within this state. Service upon the commissioner as attorney constitutes effective legal service upon the protection product guarantee provider.

(a) With the appointment the protection product guarantee provider must designate the person to whom the commissioner must forward legal process so served upon him or her.

(b) The appointment is irrevocable, binds any successor in interest or to the assets or liabilities of the protection product guarantee provider, and remains in effect for as long as there could be any cause of action against the protection product guarantee provider arising out of any of the protection product guarantee provider's contracts or obligations in this state.

(c) The service of process must be accomplished and processed in the manner prescribed under RCW 48.02.200.

(5) The commissioner may refuse to issue a registration if the commissioner determines that the protection product guarantee provider, or any individual responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the protection product guarantee provider under subsection (3)(a) of this section, is not competent, trustworthy, cannot demonstrate a minimum net worth or stockholder's equity in accordance with the applicable requirements of subsection (3)(e) of this section and the ability to pay its debts when debts become due, or has had a license as a protection product guarantee provider or similar license denied or revoked for cause by any state.

(6) A registration issued under this section is valid, unless surrendered, suspended, or revoked by the commissioner, or not renewed for so long as the protection product guarantee provider continues in business in this state and remains in compliance with this chapter. A registration is subject to renewal annually on the first day of July upon application of the protection product guarantee provider and payment of a fee of two hundred fifty dollars. If not so renewed, the registration expires on the June 30th next preceding.

(7) A protection product guarantee provider must keep current the information required to be disclosed in its registration under this section by reporting all material changes or additions within thirty days after the end of the month in which the change or addition occurs.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.110.060 and 2006 c 274 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Reimbursement insurance policies insuring service contracts or protection product guarantees issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state or issued or sold to consumers in this state shall state that the insurer that issued the reimbursement insurance policy shall either reimburse ((or))the provider, or, in the event of nonperformance by the provider, shall pay on behalf of the service contract provider or the protection product guarantee provider all sums the service contract provider or the protection product guarantee provider is legally obligated to pay, including but not limited to the refund of the full purchase price of the service contract to the service contract holder or shall provide the service which the service contract provider or the protection product guarantee provider is legally obligated to perform according to the service contract provider's or protection product guarantee provider's contractual obligations under the service contracts or protection product guarantees issued or sold by the service contract provider or the protection product guarantee provider.

(2) The reimbursement insurance policy or policies shall either fully insure the obligations of the service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider((, rather than partially insure,)) or insure only in the event of service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider default.

(3) The reimbursement insurance policy or policies shall state that the service contract holder or protection product guarantee holder is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement insurance company for payment or performance due.

Sec. 4. RCW 48.110.070 and 2006 c 274 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Service contracts marketed, sold, offered for sale, issued, made, proposed to be made, or administered in this state or sold to residents of this state shall be written, printed, or typed in clear, understandable language that is easy to read, and disclose the requirements set forth in this section, as applicable.

(2) Service contracts insured under ((a))one or more reimbursement insurance ((policy))policies under RCW 48.110.050(2)(a) and 48.110.060 shall not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state or sold to residents of this state unless the service contract conspicuously contains a statement in substantially the following form: "Obligations of the service contract provider under this service contract are insured under a service contract reimbursement insurance policy." The service contract shall also conspicuously state the name and address of ((the))each issuer of the reimbursement insurance policy or policies and state that the service contract holder is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement insurance company.

(3) Service contracts not insured under ((a))one or more reimbursement insurance ((policy))policies under RCW 48.110.050(2)(a) and 48.110.060 shall contain a statement in substantially the following form: "Obligations of the service contract provider under this contract are backed by the full faith and credit of the service contract provider."

(4) Service contracts shall state the name and address of the service contract provider and shall identify any administrator if different from the service contract provider, the service contract seller, and the service contract holder to the extent that the name of the service contract holder has been furnished by the service contract holder. The identities of such parties are not required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the service contract at the time of sale.

(5) Service contracts shall state the purchase price of the service contract and the terms under which the service contract is sold. The purchase price is not required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated at the time of sale.

(6) Service contracts shall state the procedure to obtain service or to file a claim, including but not limited to the procedures for obtaining prior approval for repair work, the toll-free telephone number if prior approval is necessary for service, and the procedure for obtaining emergency repairs performed outside of normal business hours or provide for twenty-four-hour telephone assistance.

(7) Service contracts shall state the existence of any deductible amount, if applicable.

(8) Service contracts shall specify the merchandise, parts, and services to be provided and any limitations, exceptions, or exclusions.

(9) Service contracts shall state any restrictions governing the transferability of the service contract, if applicable.

(10) Service contracts shall state the terms, restrictions, or conditions governing cancellation of the service contract prior to the termination or expiration date of the service contract by either the service contract provider or by the service contract holder, which rights can be no more restrictive than provided in RCW 48.110.050(3). The service contract provider of the service contract shall mail a written notice to the service contract holder at the last known address of the service contract holder contained in the records of the service contract provider at least twenty-one days prior to cancellation by the service contract provider. The notice shall state the effective date of the cancellation and the true and actual reason for the cancellation.

(11) Service contracts shall set forth the obligations and duties of the service contract holder, including but not limited to the duty to protect against any further damage and any requirement to follow owner's manual instructions.

(12) Service contracts shall state whether or not the service contract provides for or excludes consequential damages or preexisting conditions.

(13) Service contracts shall state any exclusions of coverage.

(14) Service contracts shall not contain a provision which requires that any civil action brought in connection with the service contract must be brought in the courts of a jurisdiction other than this state. Service contracts that authorize binding arbitration to resolve claims or disputes must allow for arbitration proceedings to be held at a location in closest proximity to the service contract holder's permanent residence.

This section does not apply to service contracts on motor vehicles or to protection product guarantees.

Sec. 5. RCW 48.110.073 and 2006 c 274 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider is using (([the]))one or more reimbursement insurance ((policy))policies to satisfy the requirements of RCW 48.110.050(2)(a), 48.110.055(2)(b), or 48.110.075(2)(a), then ((the))each reimbursement insurance policy shall be filed with and approved by the commissioner in accordance with and pursuant to the requirements of chapter 48.18 RCW.

(2) All service contracts forms covering motor vehicles must be filed with and approved by the commissioner prior to the service contract forms being used, issued, delivered, sold, or marketed in this state or to residents of this state.

(3) All service contracts forms covering motor vehicles being used, issued, delivered, sold, or marketed in this state or to residents of this state by motor vehicle manufacturers or import distributors or wholly owned subsidiaries thereof must be filed with the commissioner for approval within sixty days after the motor vehicle manufacturer or import distributor or wholly owned subsidiary thereof begins using the service contracts forms.

(4) The commissioner shall disapprove any motor vehicle service contract form if:

(a) The form is in any respect in violation of, or does not comply with, this chapter or any applicable order or regulation of the commissioner issued under this chapter;

(b) The form contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous, or misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions;

(c) The form has any title, heading, or other indication of its provisions that is misleading; or

(d) The purchase of the contract is being solicited by deceptive advertising.

Sec. 6. RCW 48.110.075 and 2006 c 274 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies to service contracts on motor vehicles.

(2) Service contracts shall not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state or sold to consumers in this state unless:

(a) The service contract provider has either demonstrated its financial responsibility or assured the faithful performance of the service contract provider's obligations to its service contract holders by insuring all service contracts under ((a))one or more reimbursement insurance ((policy))policies issued by ((an insurer))one or more insurers holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner or a risk retention group, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901(a)(4), as long as that risk retention group is in full compliance with the federal liability risk retention act of 1986 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901 et seq.), is in good standing in its domiciliary jurisdiction, and properly registered with the commissioner under chapter 48.92 RCW. The insurance required by this subsection must meet the following requirements:

(i) The insurer or risk retention group must, at the time the policy ((is))or policies are filed with the commissioner, and continuously thereafter, maintain surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of at least fifteen million dollars and annually file audited financial statements with the commissioner; and

(ii) The commissioner may authorize an insurer or risk retention group that has surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of less than fifteen million dollars, but at least equal to ten million dollars, to issue the insurance required by this subsection if the insurer or risk retention group demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the company maintains a ratio of direct written premiums, wherever written, to surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of not more than three to one;

(b) The service contract conspicuously states that the obligations of the provider to the service contract holder are guaranteed under the reimbursement insurance policy or policies, the name and address of the issuer or insurers of the reimbursement insurance policy or policies, the applicable policy ((number))numbers, and the means by which a service contract holder may file a claim under the policy or policies;

(c) The service contract conspicuously and unambiguously states the name and address of the service contract provider and identifies any administrator if different from the service contract provider, the service contract seller, and the service contract holder. The identity of the service contract seller and the service contract holder are not required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the service contract at the time of sale;

(d) The service contract states the purchase price of the service contract and the terms under which the service contract is sold. The purchase price is not required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated at the time of sale;

(e) The contract contains a conspicuous statement that has been initialed by the service contract holder and discloses:

(i) Any material conditions that the service contract holder must meet to maintain coverage under the contract including, but not limited to, any maintenance schedule to which the service contract holder must adhere, any requirement placed on the service contract holder for documenting repair or maintenance work, any duty to protect against any further damage, and any procedure to which the service contract holder must adhere for filing claims;

(ii) The work and parts covered by the contract;

(iii) Any time or mileage limitations;

(iv) That the implied warranty of merchantability on the motor vehicle is not waived if the contract has been purchased within ninety days of the purchase date of the motor vehicle from a provider or service contract seller who also sold the motor vehicle covered by the contract;

(v) Any exclusions of coverage; and

(vi) The contract holder's right to return the contract for a refund, which right can be no more restrictive than provided for in subsection (4) of this section;

(f) The service contract states the procedure to obtain service or to file a claim, including but not limited to the procedures for obtaining prior approval for repair work, the toll-free telephone number if prior approval is necessary for service, and the procedure for obtaining emergency repairs performed outside of normal business hours or for obtaining twenty-four-hour telephone assistance;

(g) The service contract states the existence of any deductible amount, if applicable;

(h) The service contract states any restrictions governing the transferability of the service contract, if applicable; and

(i) The service contract states whether or not the service contract provides for or excludes consequential damages or preexisting conditions.

(3) Service contracts shall not contain a provision which requires that any civil action brought in connection with the service contract must be brought in the courts of a jurisdiction other than this state. Service contracts that authorize binding arbitration to resolve claims or disputes must allow for arbitration proceedings to be held at a location in closest proximity to the service contract holder's permanent residence.

(4)(a) At a minimum, every provider shall permit the service contract holder to return the contract within thirty days of its purchase if no claim has been made under the contract, and shall refund to the holder the full purchase price of the contract unless the service contract holder returns the contract ten or more days after its purchase, in which case the provider may charge a cancellation fee not exceeding twenty-five dollars.

(b) If no claim has been made and a contract holder returns the contract after thirty days, the provider shall refund the purchase price pro rata based upon either elapsed time or mileage computed from the date the contract was purchased and the mileage on that date, less a cancellation fee not exceeding twenty-five dollars.

(c) A ten percent penalty shall be added to any refund that is not paid within thirty days of return of the contract to the provider.

(d) If a contract holder returns the contract under this subsection, the contract is void from the beginning and the parties are in the same position as if no contract had been issued.

(e) If a service contract holder returns the contract in accordance with this section, the insurer or insurers issuing the reimbursement insurance policy or policies covering the contract shall refund to the provider the full premium by the provider for the contract if canceled within thirty days or a pro rata refund if canceled after thirty days.

(5) A service contract provider shall not deny a claim for coverage based upon the service contract holder's failure to properly maintain the vehicle, unless the failure to maintain the vehicle involved the failed part or parts.

(6) A contract provider has only sixty days from the date of the sale of the service contract to the holder to determine whether or not the vehicle qualifies under the provider's program for that vehicle. After sixty days the vehicle qualifies for the service contract that was issued and the service contract provider may not cancel the contract and is fully obligated under the terms of the contract sold to the service contract holder.

Sec. 7. RCW 48.110.110 and 2006 c 274 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Service contract providers or protection product guarantee providers are considered to be the agent of ((the))each insurer which issued the reimbursement insurance policy or policies for purposes of obligating the insurer to service contract holders or protection product guarantee holders in accordance with the service contract or protection product guarantee holders and this chapter. Payment of the provider fee by the consumer to the service contract seller, service contract provider, or administrator or payment of consideration for the protection product to the protection product seller constitutes payment by the consumer to the service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider and to ((the))each insurer which issued the reimbursement insurance policy or policies. In cases where a service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider is acting as an administrator and enlists other service contract providers or protection product guarantee providers, the service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider acting as the administrator shall notify ((the))each insurer of the existence and identities of the other service contract providers or protection product guarantee providers.

(2) This chapter does not prevent or limit the right of an insurer which issued a reimbursement insurance policy to seek indemnification or subrogation against a service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider if the issuer pays or is obligated to pay the service contract holder or protection product guarantee holder sums that the service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider was obligated to pay under the provisions of the service contract or protection product guarantee.

Sec. 8. RCW 48.110.140 and 2006 c 274 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this chapter are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition, as specifically contemplated by RCW 19.86.020, and is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Any service contract holder or protection product guarantee holder injured as a result of a violation of a provision of this chapter shall be entitled to maintain an action pursuant to chapter 19.86 RCW against the service contract provider or protection product guarantee provider and ((the))each insurer issuing the applicable service contract or protection product guarantee reimbursement insurance policy or policies and shall be entitled to all of the rights and remedies afforded by that chapter.

--- END ---