BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No state agency or political subdivision of the state may enact or issue a rule, ordinance, order, or any similar policy that would result in an individual being required to submit to vaccination or immunization for COVID-19 despite his or her religious, philosophical, or personal objections.

(2) No state agency or political subdivision of the state may take any other action that would result in an individual being required to submit to vaccination or immunization for COVID-19 despite his or her religious, philosophical, or personal objections including, but not limited to, requiring vaccination or immunization for COVID-19 as a condition of employment, access to education, travel, entry to a public place, or contracting with a state agency or political subdivision.

(3) No employer, school or university, transportation provider, or any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement may require, directly or indirectly, any person to submit to vaccination or immunization for COVID-19.

(4) Any rule, ordinance, order, policy, or action enacted, issued, or taken in violation of this section is null and void as against the public policy of the state.

--- END ---