BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that a singular focus on methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus does not reflect the reality that there are many more pathogens of epidemiological concern. Modernization of state law is needed. Hospitals must prepare and respond effectively to pathogens of epidemiological concern within their facilities through a broad facility risk assessment that identifies pathogens of epidemiological concern that pose risks to patients, health care workers, and visitors. Department of health oversight and surveys will ensure risk assessments are appropriate and current. Lab identified pathogens must be reported to the national healthcare safety network of the United States centers for disease control and prevention pursuant to requirements from the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.41.430 and 2009 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each hospital licensed under this chapter shall, by January 1, ((2010))2023, adopt a policy regarding ((methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus))prevention and control of the transmission of pathogens of epidemiological concern. The policy shall, at a minimum, contain the following elements:

(((a) A requirement to test any patient for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus who is a member of a patient population identified as appropriate to test based on the hospital's risk assessment for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus;

(b) A requirement that a patient in the hospital's adult or pediatric, but not neonatal, intensive care unit be tested for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus within twenty-four hours of admission unless the patient has been previously tested during that hospital stay or has a known history of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus;

(c) Appropriate procedures to help prevent patients who test positive for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus from transmitting to other patients. For purposes of this subsection, "appropriate procedures" include, but are not limited to, isolation or cohorting of patients colonized or infected with methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus. In a hospital where patients, whose methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus status is either unknown or uncolonized, may be roomed with colonized or infected patients, patients must be notified they may be roomed with patients who have tested positive for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus; and

(d) A requirement that every patient who has a methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus infection receive oral and written instructions regarding aftercare and precautions to prevent the spread of the infection to others.))(a) A facility risk assessment to identify pathogens of epidemiological concern that considers elements such as the probability of occurrence as determined via surveillance, potential impact, and measures the hospital has implemented to mitigate the risk to patients, health care workers, and visitors; and

(b) Appropriate evidence-based procedures and intervention strategies to identify and help prevent patients from transmitting pathogens of epidemiological concern to other patients and health care workers.

(2) A hospital that has identified ((a hospitalized patient who has a diagnosis of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus shall report the infection to the department using the department's comprehensive hospital abstract reporting system. When making its report, the hospital shall use codes used by the))through appropriate testing a patient who has a pathogen of epidemiological concern that is required to be reported to the national healthcare safety network of the United States centers for disease control and prevention shall report the event as required by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services((, when available)).

(3) For the purposes of this section "pathogens of epidemiological concern" means infectious agents that have one or more of the following characteristics:

(a) A propensity for transmission within health care facilities based on published reports from the centers for disease control and prevention and the occurrence of temporal or geographic clusters of two or more patients;

(b) Antimicrobial resistance implications;

(c) Association with serious clinical disease or increased morbidity and mortality; or

(d) A newly discovered or reemerging pathogen.

--- END ---