BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.83 RCW to read as follows:

Within one year of the secretary of the department of health and human services adding a disorder to the federal recommended uniform screening panel, the state board of health shall consider whether or not to add the disorder to the panel of required screening tests for newborn infants.

--- END ---