BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2023, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2021 c 332 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($1,523,000))

$815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($32,378,000))

$31,343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($33,901,000))

$32,158,000

Sec. 1002. 2021 c 332 s 1009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,302,000))

$6,350,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,997,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($9,299,000))

$9,347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($31,101,000))

$31,053,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,400,000

Sec. 1003. 2021 c 332 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,750,000))

$1,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($9,128,000))

$8,983,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,878,000))

$10,746,000

Sec. 1004. 2021 c 332 s 1015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The ((reappropriations))appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriations))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020. Section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020 is set forth in full below, except that new language is added to subsection (1)(f)(x) of this section, which supersedes the requirements of subsection (1)(f)(x) in section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

(1) $83,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $19,631,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $8,658,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than 15 years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income;

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation and $1,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract directly with YouthCare Service Center to purchase the 1534 Broadway site from Capitol Hill Housing in order for YouthCare Service Center to develop a youth community center.

(f) $25,506,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) Spokane Housing Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .$1,500,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) Parkview Apartments Affordable Housing. . . .$100,000

(viii) Supported Housing and Employment (Longview). . . .$129,000

(ix) $2,000,000 is provided solely for homeownership assistance for low-income households displaced from their manufactured/mobile homes due the closure or conversion of a mobile home park or manufactured housing community in south King county. $1,500,000 of this amount in this subsection is provided solely for low-income residents displaced from the Firs Mobile Home Park located in SeaTac.

(x) $7,500,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $200,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a 25 year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection (1)(f)(x) must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $4,500,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection (1)(f)(x) is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection (1)(f)(x). $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Shelton can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Orting can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded.

(xi) $7,290,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $4,290,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(xii) $1,500,000 is provided solely for Valley Cities modular housing project in Auburn.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (f) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) Ten percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) Ten percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) Five percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities; and

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,716,000))

$6,246,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$24,810,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$1,578,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($32,104,000))

$32,634,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($79,386,000))

$78,856,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($111,490,000))

$112,990,000

Sec. 1005. 2021 c 332 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$10,954,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,000,000))

$11,954,000

Sec. 1006. 2021 c 332 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The reappropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations((is))are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$222,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($376,000))

$3,868,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($23,124,000))

$19,410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,500,000

Sec. 1007. 2021 c 332 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 413, Laws of 2019, except that funding may not be provided for an aluminum smelter restart project in Whatcom county because this project is transitioning to the 2021-23 Clean Energy V - Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148) project pursuant to section 1017 of this act.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,362,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($29,402,000))

$27,002,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($34,764,000))

$32,364,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($46,100,000))

$43,700,000

Sec. 1008. 2021 c 332 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,700,000))

$1,884,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($26,200,000))

$25,379,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($27,900,000))

$27,263,000

Sec. 1009. 2021 c 332 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$999,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$3,062,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,999,000))

$4,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($11,501,000))

$11,404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($15,500,000))

$15,465,000

Sec. 1010. 2021 c 332 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
(($1,500,000))

$1,839,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($29,500,000))

$29,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($5,520,000))

$5,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,020,000

Sec. 1011. 2021 c 332 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1) The appropriation and reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

(2)))The community economic revitalization board may make grants and loans to local governments and federally recognized tribes to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, with a minimum of 25 megabits per second download speed, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development.

(1) The board is authorized to make rural broadband loans to local governments and to federally recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of financing the cost to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development. Grants may also be authorized for purposes designated in this section, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe, and subject to a finding by the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move forward. However, no more than 25 percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to local governments and federally recognized Indian tribes.

(2) Application for funding must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board must conform to the following requirements:

(a) The board may not provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion;

(ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state;

(iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote gambling;

(iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant local government or federally recognized Indian tribe; or

(v) For the deployment of publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure ("backbone") solely for the sake of creating competitive, publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure;

(b) The board may provide financial assistance only:

(i) For projects demonstrating convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(C) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county; or

(ii) For a project that does not meet the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements;

(C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard economic principles; and

(D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county;

(c) The board must develop guidelines for local participation and allowable match and activities.

(d) An application must demonstrate local match and local participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.

(e) An application must be approved by the local government and supported by the local associate development organization or local workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.

(f) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the project.

(g) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.

(h) The board must prioritize each proposed project according to:

(i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed, but also giving consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;

(ii) The rate of return of the state's investment, including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;

(iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of employees;

(iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary transportation improvements;

(v) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance; and

(vi) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.

(i) A responsible official of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe must be present during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(3) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization board.

(4) The appropriations must be used for projects that use a technology-neutral approach in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents.

(5) $25,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

(6) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Broadband" means networks of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed internet access and other advanced telecommunications services.

(b) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, public port districts, quasi-municipal corporations, and special purpose districts.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$3,450,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$6,600,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,050,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($38,450,000))

$63,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Broadband (40000251)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

Sec. 1013. 2021 c 332 s 1055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,105,000))

$1,106,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($1,280,000))

$1,281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($20,000))

$19,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,300,000

Sec. 1014. 2021 c 332 s 1058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Public Works Assistance Account-Construction (40000141)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($129,000,000))

$249,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($129,000,000))

$249,000,000

Sec. 1015. 2021 c 332 s 1061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 CERB Capital Construction (40000144)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$42,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,000,000))

$67,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($25,000,000))

$67,500,000

Sec. 1016. 2021 c 332 s 1063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Library Capital Improvement Program (LCIP) Grants (40000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a local library capital improvement grant program for the following list of projects:

City of Colville. . . .$264,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries (Langley). . . .$700,000

Stevens County Rural Library District (Loon Lake). . . .$649,000

Stevens County Rural Library District (Chewelah). . . .$90,000

North Olympic Library System (Sequim). . . .$2,000,000

Spokane County Library District (Spokane Valley). . . .$2,000,000

Jefferson County Rural Library District (Port Hadlock). . . .$285,000

Stevens County Rural Library District (Northport). . . .$50,000

North Central Regional Library (Wenatchee). . . .$798,000

City of Seattle. . . .$1,889,000

Pend Oreille County Library District (Metaline Falls). . . .$40,000

Upper Skagit Library District (Concrete). . . .$209,000

City of Cashmere. . . .$14,000

Town of Coulee City. . . .$760,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Fort Vancouver Regional Library Foundation (Woodland). . . .$2,000,000

City of Mount Vernon. . . .$2,000,000

((Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,100,000))

Camas Library Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000

Ephrata Public Library (Ephrata). . . .$91,000

Lake Stevens Early Learning Library (Lake Stevens). . . .$2,000,000

Camas Public Library Roof Replacement (Camas). . . .$773,000

La Conner Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$640,000

Mill Creek Library Project (Mill Creek). . . .$200,000

Shelton Library Deck Repairs (Shelton). . . .$155,000

Washougal Community Library Building Project

(Washougal). . . .$515,000

(2) The department must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist libraries operated by governmental units, as defined in RCW 27.12.010, in acquiring, constructing, repairing, or rehabilitating facilities.

(3) The department must establish a committee to develop the grant program criteria and review proposals. The committee must be composed of five members as provided in this subsection. The committee must include: (a) A representative from the department of commerce; (b) a representative from the department of archaeology and historic preservation; (c) the state librarian; (d) a representative from a library district; and (e) a representative from a municipal library.

(4) The department must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications. The department must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with the committee established in subsection (3) of this section, using objective criteria. The ranking of projects must prioritize library district facilities listed on a local, state, or federal register of historic places and those located in distressed or rural counties. The evaluation and ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets that applicants propose to apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(5) The department must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature by October 1, 2022, for inclusion in the department of commerce's 2023-2025 biennial capital budget request. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. Individual grants may not exceed $2,000,000. The total amount of recommended state funding for the projects on a biennial project list may not exceed $10,000,000.

(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

(7) The department must assist grant recipients under this section to apply for applicable competitive federal grant funding and, upon receipt of any such funding, an equal amount of the state building construction account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($17,704,000))

$18,887,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($47,704,000))

$48,887,000

Sec. 1017. 2021 c 332 s 1064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Clean Energy V - Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burdens.

(2) The 2021 state energy strategy must guide the department in the design of programs under this section, using an equity and environmental justice lens for program structure and participation. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's existing strengths in communities, aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology (particularly data center infrastructure, artificial intelligence and machine learning), grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(3) Subject to the availability of funds, the department must reconvene an advisory committee to support involvement of a broad range of stakeholders in the design and implementation of programs implemented under this section to encourage collaboration, leverage partners, and engage communities and organizations in improving the equitable distribution of benefits from the program.

(4) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(5) During project solicitation periods for grants funded with this appropriation, the department must maintain a list of applicants by grant program that scored competitively but did not receive a grant award due to lack of available funding. These applicants must be considered for funding during future grant award cycles. If the department submits a 2022 supplemental budget request for this program, the request must include a list of prioritized projects by grant type.

(6)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past 24 months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(7) The requirements in subsections (4) and (6) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(8) $17,594,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants.

(a)(i) $11,000,000 is provided solely for projects that: Advance community resilience, clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources and sustainable microgrids; and support state decarbonization goals pursuant to the clean energy transformation act, including requirements placed upon retail electric utilities.

(ii) Projects must be implemented by community organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state (retail electric utilities). Projects submitted by applicants other than retail electric utilities must demonstrate partnership with their load serving entity to apply. Priority must be given to:

(A) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and

(B) Projects that demonstrate partnerships between eligible applicants in applying for funding, including utilities, public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations.

(iii) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, develop program guidelines that encourage smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding. Where suitable, this may include funding for projects consisting solely of planning, predesign and/or predevelopment activities.

(iv) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(b) $3,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Public Utility District No. 1 of Lewis county for land acquisition and construction of the Winlock Industrial Park and South County Substation and Transmission facility, located on North Military Road in Winlock.

(c) $3,044,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Klickitat County Public Hospital District #1 for the Electrical Upgrade and Smart Grid project at the Klickitat Valley Health Hospital in Goldendale.

(9) $10,830,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants must be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies, focusing on areas that help develop technologies to meet the state's climate goals, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains. The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, recycling energy system components, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(a) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants.

(b) $4,800,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory for a renewable energy platform to support ocean energy research and development testbeds for the Marine and Coastal Research Laboratory in Sequim.

(c) $1,030,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Chelan County Public Utility District for the hydroelectric turbine hub project at Rocky Reach dam near Wenatchee.

(10)(a) $2,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies by households, or for the benefit of households, with high energy burden or environmental health risk now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that must provide matching private capital and administer the loan fund. The department shall select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(11) $5,550,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to demonstrate innovative approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a)(i) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants, prioritizing projects that:

(A) Demonstrate meaningful and enduring benefits to communities and populations disproportionately burdened by air pollution, climate change, or lack of transportation investments;

(B) Beneficially integrate load using behavioral, software, hardware, or other demand-side management technologies, such as demand response, time-of-use rates, or behavioral programming;

(C) Accelerate the transportation electrification market in Washington using market transformation principles; or

(D) Develop electric vehicle charging and hydrogen fueling infrastructure along highways, freeways, and other heavily trafficked corridors across the state to support long-distance travel.

(ii) Projects must be implemented by local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state, or state agencies. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department shall consult and coordinate with the Washington state department of transportation on project selection and implementation. The department shall also coordinate with other state agencies that have other electrification programs, in order to determine to optimally accomplish each agency's respective policy and program goals.

(iii) Projects must be related to on-road end-uses and nonmaritime off-road uses.

(iv) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(A) Battery electric vehicle supply equipment;

(B) On-site generation or storage, where the technology directly supplies electricity to the electric vehicle supply equipment;

(C) Electric grid distribution system infrastructure upgrades, where the upgrade is needed as a result of the installed electric vehicle supply equipment;

(D) Hydrogen refueling station infrastructure that:

(I) Dispenses renewable hydrogen or hydrogen produced in Washington with electrolysis; and

(II) Aligns with the 2021 state energy strategy's recommended uses of hydrogen in the transportation sector.

(v) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for federally recognized tribal governments and for local governments in rural communities, for projects aligning with the above objectives and addressing electric vehicle supply infrastructure gaps in rural communities.

(b) $2,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Lewis Public Transportation Benefit Area to construct a hydrogen fueling station that dispenses renewable hydrogen or hydrogen produced in Washington with electrolysis for electric vehicles at Exit 74 on Interstate 5, near Chehalis.

(12)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of building electrification projects that advance the goals of the 2021 state energy strategy to demonstrate grid-enabled, high-efficiency, all electric buildings.

(b) The program may include, but is not limited to: Shifting from fossil fuels to high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment, control systems that enable grid integration or demand control, and on-site renewable generation and efficiency measures that significantly reduce building energy loads.

(c) Preference must be given to projects based on total greenhouse gas emissions reductions, accelerating the path to zero-energy, or that demonstrate early adoption of grid integration technology.

(d) Program funding may be administered to entities also receiving incentives provided according to RCW 19.27A.220 for buildings covered by the state energy performance standard, RCW 19.27A.210.

(e) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purpose of supporting the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels through the installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment.

(13) $4,924,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for maritime electrification grants.

(a) $4,450,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Northwest Seaport Alliance to upgrade the reefer plug capacity at the Port of Seattle's Terminal 5, located in west Seattle.

(b) $474,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Skagit County Public Works Department for electric ferry charging infrastructure in Anacortes.

(14) $4,900,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop targeted rural clean energy innovation projects as provided in this subsection (14).

(a) $150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop targeted rural clean energy strategies informed by rural community and business engagement, outreach, and research. The department must convene a rural energy work group to identify investments, programs, and policy changes that align with the 2021 state energy strategy and increase access to clean energy opportunities in rural communities and agricultural and forestry management practices. The group must identify existing federal funding opportunities and strategies to leverage these funds with state capital investment. By June 30, 2022, the department shall report recommendations and findings from the rural energy work group to the office of financial management, the governor, and the appropriate legislative committees and present a strategic plan for state rural clean energy investment.

(b) $4,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for rural clean energy innovation grants.

(i) The department must award at least 40 percent of the funding to projects that enhance the viability of dairy digester bioenergy projects through advanced resource recovery systems that produce renewable natural gas and value-added biofertilizers, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and improve soil health and air and water quality.

(ii) Grants may also be awarded to other clean energy innovation projects in rural communities, including, but not limited to, projects that enhance energy efficiency, demand response, energy storage, renewable energy, beneficial electrification, resilience, organic waste management, and biological carbon sequestration.

(iii) Grants may fund project predevelopment, research, and development, pilot projects, strategic implementation, field trials, and data dashboards and tools to inform rural project development.

(c) The department is encouraged to make 20 percent of the funds under (b) of this subsection (14) to tribal governments, designated subdivisions, and agencies.

(d) If a grant is awarded to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(15) $10,072,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of an aluminum smelter restart project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of 750,000 tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create aluminum manufacturing jobs located in Whatcom county. It is the intent of the legislature that if the appropriation in this subsection is not spent by June 30, 2025, the funding provided in this subsection shall not be reappropriated.

(16) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Grant county public utility district for expenses related to public infrastructure development benefiting a large-scale solar manufacturing facility in central Washington. If the department has not received a signed agreement between the Grant county public utility district and the large-scale solar manufacturer indicating the manufacturer's intent to develop the site in central Washington by December 31, 2025, the funding provided in this subsection shall not be reappropriated.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($53,798,000))

$63,798,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$10,072,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($56,298,000))

$76,370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($156,298,000))

$176,370,000

Sec. 1018. 2021 c 332 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Weatherization Plus Health (40000150)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington State University, shall make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature on strategies to expand and align the weatherization program and the rural rehabilitation loan program. The department shall report the recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by November 1, 2022. The recommendations must include strategies to:

(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard to reach market segments;

(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;

(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with non-profit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and

(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.

(3) If funding from this appropriation is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(4) $15,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the weatherization assistance program in section 40551 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$15,000,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$50,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($60,000,000))

$90,000,000

Sec. 1019. 2021 c 332 s 1068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000153)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($129,903,000))$54,441,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $72,462,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation, and $20,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness, people with developmental disabilities, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of these funds to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(a) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium "first-time home buyer" also includes:

(i) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(ii) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and who has only owned a home with a spouse;

(iii) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(iv) An individual who has only owned a property that is discerned by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(b) $5,000,000 of the appropriation provided in this subsection (1) is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities. Of this amount, $1,000,000 is provided solely for the FFC Homes project in Kent and $1,000,000 is provided solely for the FFC Homes project in Lacey;

(c)(i) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(ii) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(iii) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(A) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than 15 years old;

(B) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(C) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(D) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(E) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(2) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grant awards for the development of community housing and cottage communities to shelter individuals or households experiencing homelessness.

(a) $8,775,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grant awards. This funding must be awarded to projects that develop a minimum of four individual structures in the same location. Individual structures must contain insulation, electricity, overhead lights, and heating. Kitchens and bathrooms may be contained within the individual structures or offered as a separate facility that is shared with the community. When evaluating applications for this grant program, the department must prioritize projects that demonstrate:

(i) The availability of land to locate the community;

(ii) A strong readiness to proceed to construction;

(iii) A longer term of commitment to maintain the community;

(iv) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, case management and employment support services to the tenants;

(v) Access to employment centers, health care providers, and other services; and

(vi) A community engagement strategy.

(b) $1,225,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for Eagle Haven Cottage Village located in Bellingham.

(3)(a) (($11,500,000))$14,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bellwether Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Didgwalic Transitional Housing (Anacortes). . . .$4,500,000

Redondo Heights TOD (Federal Way). . . .$3,000,000

Squire Park Plaza Affordable Housing Preservation

(Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

(b) $3,497,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Habitat for Humanity (North Bend). . . .$250,000

Manette Affordable Housing Project (Bremerton). . . .$515,000

OlyCAP Port Townsend Affordable Housing and Child

(Port Townsend). . . .$412,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$515,000

Willapa Center (Raymond). . . .$1,805,000

(4) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(5) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following reporting requirements:

(a) By June 30, 2023, the department must report on its website the following for every previous funding cycle: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to 80 percent of the area median income, up to 50 percent of the area median income, and up to 30 percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2021, and continuing annually, the department must provide the legislature with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

(6) $100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of social and health services to complete a study of the community-based housing needs of adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services shall collaborate with appropriate stakeholders and the department in completing this study and the study shall:

(a) Estimate the number of adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are facing housing insecurity;

(b) Make recommendations for how to improve housing stability for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are facing housing insecurity;

(c) Make recommendations for how to increase the capacity of developers to support increasing the supply of housing that meets the needs of the intellectual and developmental disabilities population; and

(d) Be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(7) The legislature finds that there are insufficient data sources to identify adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities facing housing insecurity in Washington state and that the absence of reliable data limits the ability for the legislature to make informed decisions that will improve the outcomes of these individuals. The legislature further finds that reliable, current information about the unmet housing needs of this population will position Washington state to leverage community-based partnerships and funding to establish greater housing choice and increased community integration of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,597,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($141,403,000))

$68,941,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$72,462,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$175,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$620,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$795,000,000

Sec. 1020. 2021 c 332 s 1071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this section, the appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire or rent real property for a rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, drop-in center, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Amounts provided in this section may be also used for renovation and building update costs associated with establishment of the acquired or rented facilities. For youth housing, drop-in centers, and shelter projects, renovation of existing properties is an allowable activity. The department may only approve funding for projects resulting in increased shelter or housing capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service.

(2) Funds may also be used for permanent financing for real estate acquired using other short term acquisition sources. To expand availability of permanent housing, financing of acquisition of unoccupied multifamily housing is a priority. Funds must also be provided specifically for the city of Seattle to move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into safe spaces, including, but not limited to, tiny homes, hotels, enhanced emergency shelters, or other rapid housing alternatives.

(3) While emphasizing the rapid deployment of the amounts appropriated under this section to alleviate the immediate crisis of homelessness throughout the state, the department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which may include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant, during which time the property must be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant. The criteria must include:

(a) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(b) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(c) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds or units; and

(d) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants throughout the end of the grant contract.

(4) The department must provide a progress report on its website by December 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, housing units, and anticipated completion date.

(5) The funding provided under this section is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050. The department of commerce shall dispense funds to the city of Seattle and other qualifying applicants within 45 days of receipt of documentation from the applicant for qualifying uses and execution of any necessary contracts with the department in order to effect the purpose of rapid deployment of funds under this section.

(6) If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection (6), "greatest public benefit" must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The greatest number of accommodations or increased shelter capacity that will benefit extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, and youth experiencing homelessness.

(b) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(c) The scarcity of the affordable housing or shelter capacity applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units or shelter capacity in the same geographic location; and

(d) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(7) $900,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the public building conversion pilot program. The pilot program must be implemented in Grays Harbor county in collaboration with Community House on Broadway, in partnership with CORE Health.

(a) The appropriation may be used only for costs related to rehabilitation, retrofitting, and conversion of the publicly owned building for use as housing for homeless persons.

(b) The appropriation may not be used for staffing or maintaining buildings converted to housing for homeless persons. Costs for staffing and maintenance must be borne by the county or the contractor.

(c) In the contract for the pilot program, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(d) The pilot program should help inform the development of a public building conversion grant program to encourage counties to convert unused, publicly owned buildings into housing for homeless persons. The department must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022, regarding the establishment of the pilot program and any recommendations related to implementation of a public building conversion grant program.

(8) $17,800,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

$5,000,000 for the Tacoma Housing Authority affordable housing acquisition;

$4,000,000 for the Keiro nursing home acquisition in Seattle;

$1,500,000 for the Parkland/Spanaway homeless shelter;

$300,000 for the Concord apartments acquisition in Seattle;

$2,000,000 for the ((Eastgate supportive))Illahee affordable housing in Bellevue; and

$5,000,000 for the City of Seattle for the acquisition of the Clay Apartments in partnership with a low-income housing provider.

(9)(a) (($7,903,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal))$6,565,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation and $1,338,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation ((is))are provided solely for the following list of youth housing projects identified by the office of homeless youth protection and prevention programs:

FYRE's Village: Housing Stability for Young Adults

(Omak). . . .$3,350,000

NWYS Young Adult Shelter Services (Bellingham). . . .$438,000

OlyCap Pfeiffer House (Port Townsend). . . .$127,000

Ryan's House for Youth Campus (Coupeville). . . .$1,015,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$773,000

Volunteers of America Crosswalk 2.0 (Spokane). . . .$2,200,000

(b) If funding provided in (a) of this subsection needs to be reallocated, the department shall consult with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to identify other eligible youth housing projects.

(10) The department must ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. All expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section must be obligated by December 31, 2024.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($90,000,000))

$91,338,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$30,435,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$29,097,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$120,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$120,435,000

Sec. 1021. 2021 c 332 s 1075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Adams County Property/Evidence Processing Facility

(Othello). . . .$900,000

Amara 29 Acre Opportunity in Pierce County (Tacoma). . . .$246,000

American Lake Park ADA Improvement Project (Lakewood). . . .$258,000

American Legion Building Renovation (Goldendale). . . .$262,000

American Legion Veterans Housing & Resource Ctr (Raymond). . . .$88,000

Arlington Innovation Center (Arlington). . . .$372,000

Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$552,000

Auburn Resource Center (Auburn). . . .$1,500,000

Aurora Commons Acquisition (Seattle). . . .$2,500,000

Ballinger Park - Hall Creek Restoration

(Mountlake Terrace). . . .$824,000

Battle Ground HealthCare Free Clinic Relocation

(Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue High School Automotive Dynamometer Install

(Bellevue). . . .$277,000

Bigelow House Museum Preservation (Olympia). . . .$52,000

BIPOC Artist Installation at Kraken Training Center

(Seattle). . . .$155,000

Brewery Park Visitor Center (Tumwater). . . .$1,200,000

Bridges To Home (Shoreline). . . .$2,000,000

Camp Kilworth - YMCA Day Camp/Environmental Educ

(Federal Way). . . .$1,030,000

Campus Towers Roofing Project (Longview). . . .$301,000

Capitol Theatre Curtains/Soft Goods Replacement (Yakima). . . .$250,000

Central Klickitat County Parks Improvements (Goldendale). . . .$25,000

Chehalis Centralia Steam Locomotive Repair/Restore

(Chehalis). . . .$123,000

Chelan Municipal Airport Extension (Chelan). . . .$5,700,000

Children's Village Neurodevelopmental Center Expansion

(Yakima). . . .$750,000

City of Wenatchee Community Center (Wenatchee). . . .$2,500,000

Civic Park Mika's Playground (Edmonds). . . .$258,000

Clallam Joint Emergency Services (Port Angeles). . . .(($1,200,000))

$1,700,000

Class A Biosolids Dryer (Yelm). . . .$850,000

Clemans View Park (Naches). . . .$442,000

Coastal Community Action Program Service Ctr (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Communications Tower (Ocean Shores). . . .$77,000

Community Action Resource and Training Center (Omak). . . .$400,000

Community Multi-Use Center (Carnation). . . .$1,030,000

Cornforth Campbell Demolition & Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$330,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$846,000

Coulon North Water Walk Repair and Enhancement

(Renton). . . .$1,339,000

Coupeville Boys & Girls Club (Coupeville). . . .(($1,030,000))

$1,236,000

Cow Skull Creek and Rushingwater Creek Acclimation Ponds

(Orting). . . .$690,000

Craft Beverage Lab & Instrumentation (Tumwater). . . .$773,000

Cross Park Trail and Picnic Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

CSML Food Bank Facility (Moses Lake). . . .$1,900,000

Cultural Anchor Village (Tukwila). . . .$1,500,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$85,000

Dawson Place Facilities (Everett). . . .$258,000

Day/Night House Exhibit Rebuild - Design Phase

(Seattle). . . .$300,000

Daybreak Star Indian Cultural Center (Seattle). . . .$2,600,000

Delridge Wetland Park (Seattle). . . .$244,000

Des Moines North Marina Bulkhead Replacement Ph II

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Doris Morrison Learning Center (Greenacres). . . .$1,030,000

Downtown Puyallup Redevelopment Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Downtown Revitalization (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Duffy's Pond Pathway Completion (Kennewick). . . .$38,000

Early Learning Facility Project for Licensed Childcare

(Hoquiam). . . .$721,000

East County Family Resource Center Renovation

(Washougal). . . .$721,000

Edmonds Marsh Restoration (Edmonds). . . .$258,000

Edmonds Waterfront Center (Edmonds). . . .$250,000

Ejido Farm Project (Everson). . . .$200,000

Ellensburg Masonic Temple (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,500,000

Ephrata Rec Center Upgrade (Ephrata). . . .$621,000

Esther's Home (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Extruded Curb Improvements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

Family Engagement Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Felts Field Gateway Project (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Ferry County Airport Runway Lighting System (Republic). . . .$450,000

Flag Plaza Redevelopment (Kennewick). . . .$46,000

FOE Meeting and Dance Hall (Puyallup). . . .$77,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$1,236,000

Franklin Pierce Farm Agricultural Resource Center

(Tacoma). . . .$3,900,000

Frontier Park - Goat Barn Roof (Graham). . . .$89,000

Frontier Park-Horse Arena Cover (Graham). . . .$1,811,000

Garfield Pool Upgrade (Garfield). . . .$500,000

Gas Station Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Gold Mountain Communications Zone - Upgraded Telecomm

(Bremerton). . . .$835,000

Granger Historical Society Museum (Granger). . . .$300,000

Green Lake Community Boathouse (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Grounds Improvement Proposal (Ritzville). . . .$150,000

Health Care Kiosk Deployment (Federal Way). . . .$75,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Infrastructure Predesign

(Chelan). . . .$150,000

Immigrant and Refugee Community Hub (Tukwila). . . .$960,000

Island County Criminal Justice Renovation (Coupeville). . . .$600,000

IT3 Discovery Center (Ridgefield). . . .$1,350,000

Japanese Gulch Daylighting (Mukilteo). . . .$206,000

Jim Kaemingk Sr. Trail (Lynden). . . .$200,000

Joya Child & Family Development Center (Spokane). . . .$1,200,000

JV Memorial Pool Roof (Oak Harbor). . . .$250,000

Kitsap Lake Park Renovation & Accessibility (Bremerton). . . .$258,000

Kittitas Valley Healthcare Laboratory Services Reno

(Ellensburg). . . .$397,000

La Center City Hall Improvements (La Center). . . .$1,236,000

Lake Lawrence Fire Station (Yelm). . . .$515,000

Lake Sacajawea Renovation Project (Longview). . . .$900,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase 3 (Lake Stevens). . . .$2,100,000

Lakefront Property Acquisition (Lake Forest Park). . . .$432,000

LASA Client Services Center (Lakewood). . . .$515,000

Leavenworth Ski Hill ADA Restroom (Leavenworth). . . .$52,000

Lewis County Public Safety Radio Infrastructure

(Chehalis). . . .$129,000

Lewis County Youth Services Renovation and Addition

(Chehalis). . . .$824,000

LGBTQ-Affirming Senior Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Links to Opportunity (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

Little League Field Improvement (Federal Way). . . .$200,000

Longview Hospice Care Center Renovation (Longview). . . .$765,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$245,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$500,000

Maddie's Place (Spokane). . . .$644,000

Madrona Day Treatment School (Bremerton). . . .$321,000

Magnuson Park Hangar 2 (Seattle). . . .$1,130,000

Main Street Phase 2 (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$1,200,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$1,670,000

Martin Luther King Center Improvements (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Mary's Place Shelter Renovation (Burien). . . .$352,000

Marysville Trail Connector (Marysville). . . .$515,000

Mason County Veterans Memorial Hall Refurbishment

(Shelton). . . .$62,000

McKinney Center Renovations (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Meadowglen Community Park (Spokane). . . .$77,000

Medical Examiner's Facility Upgrades (Spokane). . . .$600,000

Miller Park (Yakima). . . .$642,000

MLK Community Center Roof Replacement (Spokane). . . .$1,380,000

Moses Lake Business Incubator (Moses Lake). . . .$1,313,000

Mountain Rescue Center (North Bend). . . .$222,000

Nelson Dam Removal Project (Naches). . . .$1,325,000

New Ground Kirkland (Kirkland). . . .$258,000

Next Chapter Morgan Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$16,000

NJROTC/NNDCC Program Peninsula School District

(Gig Harbor). . . .$170,000

North Bend Depot Rehab (North Bend). . . .$151,000

North Clear Zone Land Acquisition (Lakewood). . . .$1,400,000

North Creek Trail (Bothell). . . .$618,000

North Seattle Boys & Girls Club Safety Upgrades

(Seattle). . . .$361,000

Northwest Kidney Centers Clinic (Port Angeles). . . .$900,000

Ocean Beach Medical Group - Ilwaco Clinic (Ilwaco). . . .$309,000

Panther Lake Community Park (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Patterson Park Preservation & Upgrade (Republic). . . .$300,000

Pedestrian Overcrossing Replacement (Kalama). . . .$2,250,000

Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$1,698,000

Perry Technical Institute Auditorium Renovation

(Yakima). . . .$1,550,000

Peter Kirk Community Center Roof and Retrofitted Emerg

(Kirkland). . . .$773,000

Phase 1 Master Plan - COVID Mitigation (Lake Stevens). . . .$103,000

Phase 1 of Trails Plan Improvements (Issaquah). . . .$251,000

Planning & Upgrades Edmonds Boys & Girls Club (Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Point Hudson Breakwater (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Police Station Renovations - City of Duvall (Duvall). . . .$107,000

Port of Olympia Marine Center (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Port of Vancouver Waterfront T1 Building Demo/Deconst

(Vancouver). . . .$1,000,000

Port Susan Trail (Stanwood). . . .$742,000

Port Townsend Affordable Housing Development

(Port Townsend). . . .$1,400,000

Proclaim Liberty Affordable Housing (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

Project Chairlift: Lifting Up Washington State Chair

((1))2 (Mead). . . .$750,000

Pts of Ilwaco/Chinook Nav Infrastructure

(Ilwaco & Chinook). . . .$634,000

Public Pavilion for Shoreline Park (Shoreline). . . .$361,000

Puyallup Recreation Center (Puyallup). . . .$1,030,000

Puyallup Valley Cultural Heritage Center (Puyallup). . . .$335,000

Rainier View Covered Court (Sumner). . . .$245,000

Ramstead Regional Park (Everson). . . .$1,500,000

Redmond Senior and Community Center (Redmond). . . .$1,250,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$900,000

Replacement Hospice House (Richland). . . .$900,000

Resource Center Planning (Pasco). . . .$250,000

Ridgefield I-5 Pedestrian Screen (Ridgefield). . . .$335,000

Ridgefield YMCA (Ridgefield). . . .$258,000

Ridgetop DNR Trust Land Purchase (Silverdale). . . .$2,050,000

Ritzville Downtown Improvements (Ritzville). . . .$105,000

Sargent Oyster House Restoration (Allyn). . . .$344,000

School Based Health Care Clinic (Tacoma). . . .$750,000

SE 168th St. Bike Lanes/Safe Crossings (Renton). . . .$500,000

Seattle Aquarium Expansion (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Kraken Multisport Courts (Seattle). . . .$103,000

Selah-Moxee Irrigation District (Moxee). . . .$300,000

Seminary Hill Natural and Heritage Trail Project

(Centralia). . . .$52,000

Sheffield Trail (Fife). . . .$1,030,000

Shipley Senior Center (Sequim). . . .$463,000

Shoreline Parks Restrooms (Shoreline). . . .$412,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Seattle). . . .$309,000

Silver Crest Park (Mill Creek). . . .$90,000

Skabob House Cultural Center Art Studio (Skokomish). . . .$500,000

Skagit County Morgue (Mount Vernon). . . .$139,000

Sky Valley Teen Center (Sultan). . . .$773,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,100,000

Snohomish County Food and Farming Center (Everett). . . .$2,550,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activity Center (North Bend). . . .$361,000

Soap Lake City Hall Reactivation (Soap Lake). . . .$157,000

SoCo Park (Covington). . . .$1,300,000

South Bend School Multi-Use Field Upgrades (South Bend). . . .$361,000

South Kitsap Community Events Center (Port Orchard). . . .$1,236,000

South Kitsap HS Phys Ed Support (Port Orchard). . . .$15,000

Southwest Washington Grain Project (Chehalis). . . .$1,750,000

Spokane Public Radio (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Spokane Valley Boys & Girls Club (Spokane Valley). . . .$1,030,000

Spokane Valley Fairgrounds Exhibition Center

(Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000

Sprinker Recreation Center Outdoor Improvements

(Tacoma). . . .$400,000

Squire's Landing Park Waterfront & Open Space Access Pr

(Kenmore). . . .$927,000

Steilacoom Tribal Cultural Center (Steilacoom). . . .$814,000

Stonehenge Memorial Public Restroom Project (Maryhill). . . .$129,000

Sultan Basin Park Design (Sultan). . . .$26,000

Sumas Sidewalks and Trails (Sumas). . . .$75,000

Teaching & Commercial Kitchen (Kent). . . .$515,000

The Campaign for Wesley Des Moines (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

The Eli's Park Project (Seattle). . . .$900,000

The Ethiopian Village (Seattle). . . .$515,000

The Hilltop (Tacoma). . . .$1,545,000

The Landing (Redmond). . . .$258,000

The Millworks (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000

The Podium (Spokane). . . .$774,000

The Way Station (Bellingham). . . .$4,050,000

Therapeutic Play Spaces (Spokane). . . .$108,000

Tiny ((Homes))House Villages and Cottages (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Together Center (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000

Toppenish Junior Livestock Facility Planning (Toppenish). . . .$21,000

Trails End Community Meeting Space (Tumwater). . . .$155,000

Treatment Plant Remodel (Duvall). . . .$742,000

Turf Field Lighting (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Turning Pointe Youth Advocacy Addition (Shelton). . . .$82,000

Twisp Civic Center (Twisp). . . .$1,500,000

United Way of King County Building Restoration

(Seattle). . . .$566,000

University Heights Center Renovation (Seattle). . . .$595,000

Upper Kittitas County Medic One - Station 99 (Cle Elum). . . .$784,000

Vaughn Library Hall Restoration (Vaughn). . . .$103,000

Wards Lake Park Improvement Project (Lakewood). . . .$258,000

Water Efficiency Improvements (Royal City). . . .$193,000

Wenas Creek Screening, Passage Engineering Design

(Selah). . . .$150,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$1,881,000

Whatcom County Integrated Public Safety Radio System

(Bellingham). . . .$400,000

Woodland Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$600,000

Yakima County Fire Communications Radio Repeaters

(Yakima). . . .$103,000

Yakima Valley Fair (Grandview). . . .$235,000

Yelm Senior Center Repairs (Yelm). . . .$36,000

Youth Resource Center (Federal Way). . . .$82,000

(b) The funding for the Magnuson Park Historic Hanger 2 (Seattle) project is contingent on the contribution of at least $6,000,000 for the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence. If the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence has not certified to the department of commerce that the project has secured at least $6,000,000 in total funding for the capital phase of the project by July 31, 2022, the funds in this subsection (8)(b) shall lapse. The lapse date of July 31, 2022, must be extended to the same extent that the city of Seattle grants an extension, if any, beyond that date for the same project, provided that no further extension may be granted past July 31, 2023. The Magnuson Park Center For Excellence must ensure that the long-term lease with Seattle Parks and Recreation stipulates meaningful public benefits that prioritize low-income, black, indigenous, and people of color youth and families of the Magnuson park and neighborhood and Northeast Seattle. The lease must include provisions to proactively recruit and provide no-cost access to the residents as well as the creation of a scholarship fund dedicated to the residents for the center's events and programming. Additional public benefits to improve accessibility for Magnuson Park residents must be considered in the lease negotiations.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($160,910,000))

$169,916,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($160,910,000))

$169,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Regional Manufacturing Shovel Ready Site Development (40000243)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide design, permitting, and infrastructure costs for shovel-ready projects that were awarded funds from the operating budget for planning and predevelopment grants to assist local governments and federally recognized tribes to advance environmental permitting activities in and around current and future manufacturing sites and other key economic growth centers.

(2) Unless otherwise stated, eligible applicants for grants awarded under this section include:

(a) Local governments, including cities, counties, and ports; and

(b) Federally recognized Indian tribes.

(3) Projects receiving grants under this section must:

(a) Demonstrate that the project site is under the applicant's control for a minimum of 25 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease;

(b) Be located on land that is no less than 50 contiguous acres in size; and

(c) Be located in an urban growth area or an unincorporated area of the county that is within an urban growth area at the time of award.

(4) Unless otherwise stated, priority must be given to projects:

(a) Located in rural counties. For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county with a population density of less than 100 persons per square mile or a county smaller than 225 square miles as determined by the office of financial management and published each year for the period July 1st to June 30th;

(b) That have successfully completed a planning project funded by the community economic revitalization board, and found feasible to continue to the predevelopment phase; or

(c) Located in geographic areas of greatest priority to improve the state's competitiveness for manufacturing and research and development job retention and job creation.

(5) If House Bill No. 1958 is enacted by June 30, 2022, the office of economic development and competitiveness is directed to coordinate with the community economic revitalization board to maximize opportunities to leverage federal funding and efficient state investment in shovel-ready projects that are located on land that is no less than 50 contiguous acres in size.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants Authority (40000246)

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$1,083,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,083,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000260)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $298,000,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation and $100,000,000 of the apple health and homes account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations as defined in RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire real property for a rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Amounts provided in this section may also be used for renovation and building update costs associated with the acquired facilities. For youth housing and shelter projects, renovation of existing properties is an allowable activity. The department may only approve funding for projects resulting in increased shelter or housing capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service. Of the amounts in this section:

(a) $298,000,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing projects that will assist in rapidly moving people experiencing unsheltered homelessness away from unsanctioned encampments, the public right of way, or public spaces into safe and habitable spaces, including, but not limited to, permanent housing, permanent supportive housing, tiny homes, hotels, enhanced emergency shelters, or other rapid housing alternatives. New construction of high-quality low-income housing projects that are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing, and that fits the federal funding timeline is an eligible activity.

(b) $100,000,000 of the apple health and homes account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rapid permanent supportive housing program created under chapter (. . .), Laws of 2022 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1866).

(c) When selecting projects, the department shall balance the state's interest in quickly approving and financing projects, the degree to which the project will leverage other funds, the extent to which the project promotes racial equity, and the extent to which the project will promote priorities on a statewide basis, including in rural areas and in geographically diverse parts of the state.

(2) $2,000,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Woodley Place by Bayside Housing and Services project in Port Hadlock.

(3) Amounts appropriated under this section may also be used for permanent financing for real estate acquired using other short-term acquisition sources. To expand availability of permanent housing, financing of acquisition of unoccupied multifamily housing is a priority.

(4) While emphasizing the rapid deployment of the amounts appropriated under this section to alleviate the immediate crisis of homelessness throughout the state, the department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the funds using the best practices in affordable housing such as those practiced by the housing trust fund created in RCW 43.185.030, which may include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the recipient for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the award, during which time the property must be used for the express purpose of the award. If the recipient is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the recipient shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the award plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the award. The criteria must include:

(a) The date upon which the units can be placed in service and occupied by the intended population, or the date any necessary structural modifications would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(b) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(c) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with placing the beds or units in service; and

(d) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants throughout the end of the contract.

(5) The department must provide a progress report on its website by June 30, 2023. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, housing units, and anticipated completion date.

(6) The funding provided under this section is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(7) The department shall prioritize proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department. For purposes of this subsection, "greatest public benefit" must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The greatest number of accommodations or increased shelter capacity that will benefit extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, and youth experiencing homelessness;

(b) Whether the project has local funding commitments and rental assistance;

(c) The scarcity of the affordable housing or shelter capacity applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units or shelter capacity in the same geographic location; and

(d) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(8) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$300,000,000

Apple Health and Homes Account—State
. . . .
$100,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000261)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $78,375,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for production of affordable housing units that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness, people with developmental disabilities, farmworkers, people who are experiencing homelessness, people in need of permanent supportive housing, class members of Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., and first-time home buyers. The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of these funds to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(2) $6,625,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Boat Street (Lakewood). . . .$450,000

Heron Park (Langley). . . .$875,000

Mary's Place Burien Project Shelter Replacement

(Burien). . . .$3,000,000

Veteran Housing & Resource Ctr (Raymond). . . .$2,300,000

(3) $15,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for homeownership projects.

(4) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects under this section during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium "first-time home buyer" also includes:

(a) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(b) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and who has only owned a home with a spouse;

(c) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable rules and regulations; or

(d) An individual who has only owned a property that was considered by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(5) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(6) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following reporting requirements:

(a) By June 30, 2023, the department must report on its website the following: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to 80 percent of the area median income, up to 50 percent of the area median income, and up to 30 percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(b) The department must continue to provide the legislature and the office of financial management with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

(7) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities for Adults (40000262)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for 16-bed crisis triage and stabilization facilities, one in each of the health care authority 10 regional service areas, with at least one project in each area that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased crisis triage and stabilization facility. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act, chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 15-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) The department must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(4) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate crisis stabilization facilities.

(5) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date.

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Residential Crisis Stabilization Facilities for Youth (40000263)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants for at least two residential crisis stabilization facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease. These facilities must increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors.

(2) The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased residential crisis stabilization facility capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(3) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 15-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(4) The department must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(5) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate crisis stabilization facilities.

(6) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date.

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation provided in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

988 Expansion (Everett). . . .$300,000

Accessibility and Upgrades for WHO (Vancouver). . . .$283,000

Allyn Community Center (Allyn). . . .$300,000

Boys & Girls Club Fire Safety Upgrade (Federal Way). . . .$361,000

Bremerton Library Building - HVAC (Bremerton). . . .$412,000

Camp Korey Internet & Telemedicine (Mount Vernon). . . .$330,000

Children's Therapy Center Tacoma Building (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

CHOB Electrical Upgrade to Emergency Shelter

(Longview). . . .$258,000

City Hall Preservation Phase II (Enumclaw). . . .$289,000

City of Tenino Playground (Tenino). . . .$515,000

City of Yelm Dog Park (Yelm). . . .$52,000

Communication Devices for Football Officials

(Olympia). . . .$36,000

Confluence Health Treatment Center (Moses Lake). . . .$1,236,000

Craft Beverage (Tumwater). . . .$100,000

Elks 1450 Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$381,000

Ferndale Civic and Community Campus (Ferndale). . . .$1,500,000

First Street Downtown Revitalization (Cle Elum). . . .$465,000

Foss Waterway Seaport Public Restrooms (Tacoma). . . .$258,000

GenPride LGBTQ+ Senior Community Center (Seattle). . . .$530,000

GH Senior Center Office/Education Container

(Gig Harbor). . . .$61,000

Goldsborough Switching Station (Shelton). . . .$103,000

Harlequin Productions Theater Renovation (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Illahee Preserve 'Homestead, Ph 1' Acquisition

(Bremerton). . . .$196,000

Kitsap Humane Society (Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kiwanis Park Playground Accessibility Upgrades

(Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Klickitat County Animal Shelter (Goldendale). . . .$670,000

Lake Wilderness Lodge Emergency Generator

(Maple Valley). . . .$412,000

Lewis County Regional Tennis and Wrestling Facility

(Chehalis). . . .$875,000

Longview Senior Center Roof and Energy Upgrades

(Longview). . . .$273,000

Marina Gear Yard Relocation & Expansion Project

(Westport). . . .$412,000

Marymount/Spana-Park Senior Center Roof (Spanaway). . . .$103,000

Mason Co Housing Authority Roof & Electrical

(Shelton). . . .$201,000

McKinney Center Minor Works (Seattle). . . .$560,000

Mill Creek Parks Master Plan (Mill Creek). . . .$206,000

Mount Spokane Lodge Renovations (Mead). . . .$397,000

New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$201,000

Nooksack River Integrated Floodplain Mitigation

(Whatcom County). . . .$2,000,000

North Creek Trail (Bothell). . . .$500,000

North Trailhead Restroom & Covered Structure

(Castle Rock). . . .$155,000

ODMF Multicultural Village (Kent). . . .$450,000

Pacific Co. Fair Three M Project (Raymond). . . .$412,000

Pattison Property Redevelopment (Federal Way). . . .$1,250,000

Peshastin Cross Over Siphon Pipe (Peshastin). . . .$309,000

Pilchuck Glass School Ventilation (Stanwood). . . .$103,000

Public Electric Vehicle Infrastructure (Lacey). . . .$103,000

Ridgefield Splashpad (Ridgefield). . . .$258,000

Rister Stadium Elevator Lift (Kelso). . . .$33,000

Roslyn Downtown Association Gazebo (Roslyn). . . .$171,000

Salmon Reintroduction in the Upper Columbia (Spokane). . . .$375,000

Seattle Aquarium Ocean Pavilion (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Secure Parking for Shelton Police (Shelton). . . .$206,000

Seismic Upgrade and Roof Replacement (Vancouver). . . .$309,000

Senior Resources Svc HUB Feasibility Study (Freeland). . . .$273,000

Smokey Point Park (Arlington). . . .$278,000

Snohomish Teen Center Addition (Snohomish). . . .$515,000

South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$400,000

Starbuck Rodeo Arena Remodel (Dayton). . . .$98,000

Sultan-Monroe Commercial Kitchen (Monroe). . . .$134,000

The Tacoma Recovery Cafe Site Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Titlow Park Bridge Replacement (Tacoma). . . .$350,000

Tubman Health Clinic (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Vandercook Park Restroom (Longview). . . .$309,000

Veteran Housing at Stratford Apartments (Longview). . . .$206,000

Wa Na Wari Capital Improvements (Seattle). . . .$258,000

Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$515,000

West Plains Childcare Center (Airway Heights). . . .$191,000

WGC - Accessibility and Education Support (Waitsburg). . . .$42,000

Woodland Community Library Building Project

(Woodland). . . .$515,000

WWCS Electrical & Kitchen Upgrades (Walla Walla). . . .$336,000

Yakima Greenway Master Plan (Yakima). . . .$67,000

Yakima YMCA Park Development (Yakima). . . .$232,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ports Infrastructure (40000278)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Dredge River Access (Port of Clarkston). . . .$1,550,000

SE 41st Street Project (Port of Camas-Washougal). . . .$2,400,000

Off Dock Container Yard (Port of Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

Pier 66 Shore Power (Port of Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Point Hudson Breakwater Project (Port Townsend). . . .$1,500,000

Terminal and Warehouse Upgrades (Port of Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Trades District (Chelan-Douglas Regional Port). . . .$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,450,000

Sec. 1030. 2021 c 332 s 1045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($625,000))

$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($35,369,000))

$35,244,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,994,000

Sec. 1031. 2021 c 332 s 1048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Library Capital Improvement Program (91001239)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,000,000))

$6,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,838,000))

$6,559,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,838,000

Sec. 1032. 2021 c 332 s 1053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6009, chapter 413, Laws of 2019. Section 6009, chapter 298, Laws of 2019 is set forth in full below, except that new language is added to subsection (7), which supersedes the requirements of subsection (7) in section 6009, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $2,209,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project, including the purchase of twenty acres of land by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights for development of affordable housing, the purchase of mobile home parks or mobile homes by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights in order to reduce the use of the accident potential zone for residential purposes, and $70,000 for a pilot project. The pilot project shall include payment of moving costs and down payment or closing costs of up to $7,000 for 10 individuals or families living in mobile homes located in the accidental potential zone whose mobile homes are purchased and who relocate to affordable housing constructed on the 20 acres of land purchased by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights through the appropriation in this subsection. There shall be no limitations on the sequence of the purchase of mobile home parks or mobile homes. If Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights subsequently rezones, develops, and leases the mobile home park property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone, Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of mobile home parks in its entirety within ten years. Mobile home parks purchased under the provisions of this subsection may be sold by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights, provided that the uses of the mobile home park property are not contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone. Any moneys from this sale must be used to purchase other mobile home parks or mobile homes in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. The twenty acres of land purchased under this subsection for development as affordable housing may be sold, in whole or in part, by the recipient, provided the property sold is used for affordable housing as required in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. Recipients of funds provided under this subsection are not required to demonstrate that the project site is under their control for a minimum of ten years but they must demonstrate that the project site is under their control through ownership or long-term lease. Projects funded under this subsection are not required to meet the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125(6) and subsection (5) of this section.

(8) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the White River restoration project. Design solutions for flooding reductions in the lower White River must include a floodplain habitat design that both reduces flood risks and restores salmon habitat by reconnecting the river with its floodplain and a sustainable riparian corridor. Project designs and plans must also identify lands for acquisition needed for floodplain reconnection where pending or existing development eliminates the potential for riparian and aquatic habitat restoration. The city shall work cooperatively with the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe and the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and develop a plan collaboratively to achieve both flood reduction and habitat restoration.

(9) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section for the veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter project may be spent on preconstruction or preacquisition activities, including, but not limited to, building inspections, design of necessary renovations, cost estimation, and other activities necessary to identify and select a facility appropriate for the program. The remainder of the appropriation must be used for eventual acquisition and renovations of a facility.

(10) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the mercy housing and health care center at Sand Point. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the center may not house any community health care training organization that has been investigated by and has paid settlement fees to the attorney general's office for alleged medicaid fraud.

(11) The Lake Chelan land use plan must be developed without adverse impacts on agricultural operations.

(12) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for phase one of the main street revitalization project in the city of Mountlake Terrace.

(13) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the city of Stanwood to acquire property for a new city hall/public safety facility.

(14) Up to 30 percent of the funding for the Kennewick boys and girls club may be used for land acquisition.

(15) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Algona senior center

$500,000

All-accessible destination playground

$750,000

Appleway trail

$1,000,000

Basin 3 sewer rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Bellevue downtown park inspiration playground and sensory garden

$1,000,000

Bender fields parking lot and restrooms

$1,000,000

Blackhills community soccer complex safety projects

$750,000

Bremerton children's dental clinic

$396,000

Brewster reservoir replacement

$1,250,000

Brookville gardens

$1,200,000

Camas-Washougal Babe Ruth youth baseball improve Louis Bloch park

$10,000

Cancer immunotherapy facility-Seattle children's research inst.

$7,000,000

Caribou trail apartments

$100,000

Carnegie library imprv for the rapid recidivism reduction program

$1,000,000

Cavelero park - regional park facility/skateboard park

$500,000

CDM caregiving services: Clark county aging resource center

$1,200,000

Centerville school heating upgrades

$46,000

Chambers Creek regional park pier extension and moorage

$1,750,000

City of LaCenter parks & rec community center

$1,500,000

City of Lynden pipeline

$2,000,000

City of Lynden-Riverview road construction

$850,000

City of Lynden-safe routes to school and Kaemingk trail gap elim.

$300,000

City of Mt. Vernon downtown flood protect project & riverfront trail

$1,500,000

City of Olympia - Percival Landing renovation

$950,000

City of Pateros water system

$1,838,000

City of Stanwood City hall/public safety facility property acquisition

$300,000

Classroom door barricade - nightlock

$45,000

Confluence area parks upgrade and restoration

$1,000,000

Corbin senior center elevator

$300,000

Covington community park

$5,000,000

Cross Kirkland corridor trail connection 52nd St.

$1,069,000

Dawson place child advocacy center building completion project

$161,000

Dekalb street pier

$500,000

DNR/City of Castle Rock exchange

$80,000

Dr. Sun Yat Sen memorial statue

$10,000

Drug abuse and prevention center - Castle Rock

$96,000

DuPont historical museum renovation

$46,000

East Tacoma community center

$1,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts: Gym climate control & roof repairs

$250,000

Edmonds senior & community center

$1,250,000

Emergency generator for kidney resource center

$226,000

Enumclaw expo center

$350,000

Fairchild air force base protection & comm empowerment project

$2,209,000

Federal Way PAC center

$2,000,000

Filipino community of Seattle village (innovative learning center)

$1,200,000

Franklin Pierce early learning center

$2,000,000

Gateway center project

$1,000,000

Gilda club repairs

$800,000

Granite Falls boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Gratzer park ball fields

$200,000

Grays Harbor navigation improvement project

$2,500,000

Green river gorge open space buffer, Kummer connection

$750,000

Guy Cole center revitalization

$450,000

Historic renovation Maryhill museum

$1,000,000

Hopelink at Ronald commons

$750,000

Irvine slough storm water separation

$500,000

Kahlotus highway sewer force main

$2,625,000

Kennewick boys and girls club

$500,000

Kent east hill YMCA

$500,000

Key Pen civics center

$50,000

KiBe high school parking

$125,000

Kitsap humane society - shelter renovation

$90,000

Lacey boys & girls club

$29,000

Lake Chelan land use plan

$75,000

LeMay car museum ADA access improvements

$500,000

Lyman city park renovation

$167,000

Lyon creek flood reduction project

$400,000

Marine terminal rail investments

$1,000,000

Martin Luther King Jr. family outreach center expansion project

$85,000

Mason county Belfair wastewater system rate relief

$1,500,000

McAllister museum

$660,000

Mercer arena energy savings & sustainability funding

$450,000

Mercy housing and health center at Sand Point

$2,500,000

Meridian center for health

$2,500,000

Minor Road water reservoir replacement

$1,500,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway Tiger Mountain access improvements

$300,000

Mountlake Terrace Main street revitalization project

$1,300,000

Mt. Spokane guest services building & preservation/maintenance of existing facilities

$520,000

Boys & girls club of Snohomish county (Brewster, Sultan, Granite Falls, Arlington, and Mukilteo)

$1,000,000

Mukilteo tank farm clean-up

$250,000

New Shoreline medical-dental clinic

$1,500,000

Nordic heritage museum

$2,000,000

North Kitsap fishline foodbank

$625,000

Northwest native canoe center project

$250,000

Oak Harbor clean water facility

$2,500,000

Okanogan emergency communications

$400,000

Onalaska community tennis and sports courts

$80,000

Opera house ADA elevator

$357,000

Orcas Island library expansion

$1,400,000

Pacific community center

$250,000

PCAF's building for the future

$350,000

Pe Ell second street

$197,000

Perry technical school

$1,000,000

Pike Place Market front project

$800,000

Police station security/hardening

$38,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia station

$500,000

Port of Sunnyside demolish the carnation building

$450,000

PROVAIL TBI residential facility

$450,000

Quincy water reuse

$1,500,000

Redmond downtown park

$3,000,000

Redondo boardwalk repairs

$1,500,000

Renovate senior center

$400,000

Rochester boys & girls club

$38,000

Rockford wastewater treatment

$1,200,000

Roslyn renaissance-NW improve company bldg renovation project

$900,000

Sammamish rowing association boathouse

$500,000

SE 240th St. watermain system improvement project

$700,000

SE Seattle financial & economic opportunity center

$1,500,000

Seattle theatre group

$131,000

Snohomish veterans memorial rebuild

$10,000

Snoqualmie riverfront project

$1,520,000

South 228th street inter-urban trail connector

$500,000

Splash pad/foundation: Centralia outdoor pool restoration project

$200,000

Spokane women's club

$300,000

Springbrook park neighborhood connection project

$300,000

SR 532 flood berm and bike/ped path

$85,000

St. Vincent food bank & community services construction project

$400,000

Stan & Joan cross park

$750,000

Steilacoom Sentinel Way repairs

$450,000

Stilly Valley youth project Arlington B&G club

$2,242,000

Sunset neighborhood park

$1,750,000

Support, advocacy & resource center for victims of violence

$750,000

The gathering house job training café

$14,000

The Salvation Army Clark County: Corps community center

$1,200,000

Thurston county food bank

$500,000

Tulalip water pipeline, (final of 8 segments)

$2,000,000

Twin Bridges museum rehab Lyle Wa

$64,000

Twisp civic building

$500,000

Vancouver, Columbia waterfront project

$2,500,000

Vantage point senior apartments

$2,000,000

Veterans center

$500,000

Veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter

$600,000

Waitsburg Main Street bridge replacement

$1,700,000

Washington green schools

$105,000

Washougal roof repair

$350,000

Water meter and system improvement program

$500,000

Water reservoir and transmission main

$500,000

Wayne golf course land preservation

$500,000

White River restoration project

$850,000

Willapa behavioral health safety improvement project

$75,000

WSU LID frontage - local and economic benefits

$500,000

Yakima children's museum center

$50,000

Yakima SunDome

$2,000,000

Yelm community center

$500,000

Yelm senior center

$80,000

Youth wellness campus gymnasium renovation

$1,000,000

Total

$130,169,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$117,919,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$128,919,000

Sec. 1033. 2021 c 332 s 1082 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Substance Use Disorder Recovery Housing (91001675)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for an agreement with Catholic Community Services/Catholic Housing Services to fund a master planning process for the development of a family-centered drug treatment and housing program in western Washington that supports families staying together while they recover from addiction and rebuild their lives. Housing developers, service providers, and other stakeholders must be included in this master planning process.

(2) The master planning process under this section must model the project to be developed after Rising Strong in Spokane and must include units for families that are experiencing substance use disorder and that are involved in the child welfare system. The site must include living quarters for families, space for services, play areas for children, and space for child care. The program services located at the site must include, but are not limited to, case management, counseling, substance use disorder treatment, and parenting skills classes. The site must be located in King County, or located near King county, to provide services to families in the western area of the state.

(3) Phase two of the planning process must: Further define the community needs; work with the department, the health care authority, and the department of children, youth, and families in identifying a sponsoring agency or organization and service partners; make preferred site recommendations; determine the project budget and establish the model and sources for funding the program located in the facility, including the conditions for sustainable funding; and include additional components identified by Catholic Community Services/Catholic Housing Services or its consultants needed to prepare for a 2023-2025 biennium capital construction request.

(4) The master plan developed under this section must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, ((2021))2022.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

Sec. 1034. 2021 c 332 s 1074 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Grants for Affordable Housing Development Connections (91001685)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for grants to local governments and public utility districts for system development charges and utility improvements for new affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income households. Where applicable, the extension must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area.

(2) $7,600,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $16,300,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to local governments or public utilities located within a jurisdiction that imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii), 82.14.530(1)(b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.

(3) $10,700,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments or public utilities located within:

(a) A city or county with a population of 150,000 or less; and

(b) A jurisdiction that imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii) or 82.14.530(1)(b)(i)(B).

(4) The department shall coordinate with the office of financial management and the governor's office to develop a process for project submittal, project selection criteria, review, and monitoring, and tracking the housing development projects that receive affordable housing development connections grants under this section. To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:

(a) That affordable housing development will begin construction within 24 months of the grant award; and

(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.

(5) $1,700,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port Townsend Utility Connection Project.

(6) (($5,700,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Chelan municipal airport extension.

(7))) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund, all expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section must be ((incurred))obligated by December 31, 2024.

(((8)))(7) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.

(a) "Affordable housing" and has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(c) "System development charges" means charges for new drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater connections when a local government or public utility has waived standard fees normally applied to developers for connection charges on affordable housing projects.

(d) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery

Account—Federal
. . . .
$27,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$18,300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($42,000,000))

$45,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($42,000,000))

$45,300,000

Sec. 1035. 2021 c 332 s 1085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Infrastructure Projects (91001687)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund, all expenditures of amounts appropriated in this section must be ((incurred))obligated by December 31, 2024.

(9) ((The))$31,409,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, $97,926,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation, and $15,928,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the following list of projects:

Airway Heights Water Resources Replacement (Airway

Heights). . . .$14,950,000

Anderson Road Project Design (Chelan). . . .$258,000

((Belfair Water Reclamation Facility (Belfair). . . .$500,000))

Boat Haven Stormwater Improvement (Port Townsend). . . .$2,050,000

Centralia School District - Gemini & LTE

(Centralia). . . .$1,529,000

Cheney Purple Pipe Project (Cheney). . . .(($11,050,000))$12,050,000

City of Fircrest Water Meter Replacement

(Fircrest). . . .$171,000

City of Ilwaco – Drinking Water Source Protection

(Ilwaco). . . .$721,000

Crusher Canyon Sewer Line (Selah). . . .$1,000,000

Dryden Wastewater Improvement Project (Dryden). . . .$1,030,000

Fall City Waste Management System (Fall City). . . .$6,500,000

Fry Creek Pump Station (Aberdeen). . . .$8,975,000

Index Phased Water Line Replacement (Index). . . .$1,351,000

Lacamas Lake Management Plan (Camas). . . .$155,000

Leach Creek Interceptor Extension (University

Place). . . .$2,100,000

Louis Thompson Road Tightline (Sammamish). . . .$3,000,000

Malaga Industrial Park Waterline Extension

(Malaga). . . .$1,545,000

((Malden USDA Water (Malden). . . .$247,000))

Mill Creek Flood Control Channel (Walla Walla). . . .$1,545,000

NE 92nd Avenue Pump Station & Force Main (Battle

Ground). . . .$2,050,000

New Well for the Community of Peshastin (Peshastin). . . .$1,100,000

Omak Water Reservoir (Omak). . . .$4,300,000

Othello Water Conservation System (Othello). . . .$515,000

Packwood Sewer System (Packwood). . . .$8,050,000

PFAS Treatment at City of DuPont Water Wells

(DuPont). . . .$5,950,000

Port Hadlock Wastewater Facility (Port Hadlock). . . .$20,175,000

Port of Mattawa Wastewater Infrastructure

(Mattawa). . . .$618,000

Reservoir No. 2, Water Supply & Distribution

(Bridgeport). . . .$3,200,000

Shelton: Well 1 Water Main (Shelton). . . .$2,050,000

Skamania County Well Installation (Stevenson). . . .$52,000

Vader Wastewater Treatment Plant Improvements

(Vader). . . .$1,850,000

Wallula Dodd Water System Ph2 (Wallula). . . .$2,050,000

Wanapum Indian Village Fiber infrastructure

Project (Mattawa). . . .$155,000

Water Main Infrastructure Extension Project

(George). . . .$155,000

WWTP Reclaimed Water (Shelton). . . .$2,050,000

223rd Green Street Planning (Des Moines). . . .$300,000

4th St. NW. Stormwater System Upgrade (Puyallup). . . .$824,000

Alger I-5 Waterline Relocation (Bellingham). . . .$2,500,000

Boulevard Park Sanitary Sewer Extension (Burien). . . .$2,400,000

Cheney Purple Pipe Project (Cheney). . . .$1,000,000

City of Brewster Canyon Well House (Brewster). . . .$494,000

City of Brewster Sewer Upgrade (Brewster). . . .$3,521,000

Coyle Water Line Replacement (Quilcene). . . .$400,000

Curtin Creek Ph. 1 Septic Elimination (Vancouver). . . .$800,000

East Blaine Water Pump Station (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Gardiner Booster Pump Upgrade and Replacement

(Sequim). . . .$250,000

Langley Infrastructure (Langley). . . .$250,000

Port of Allyn Well & Water Pump Facility (Allyn). . . .$412,000

Rustlewood Water System Upgrades (Grapeview). . . .$567,000

Shelton Water Reclamation Facility (Shelton). . . .$3,750,000

Wastewater Lift Stations (Concrete). . . .$567,000

Wastewater Treatment Facility Improvements (Sultan). . . .$1,030,000

Water System Improvement Project (Morton). . . .$12,418,000

Western Ranchettes Water Distribution System

(Puyallup). . . .$1,030,000

(10) $747,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Belfair Water Reclamation Facility (Belfair). . . .$500,000

Malden USDA Water (Malden). . . .$247,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,409,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$747,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery

Account—Federal
. . . .
(($112,997,000))

$97,926,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$15,928,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$146,010,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($112,997,000))

$146,010,000

Sec. 1036. 2021 c 332 s 1084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Food Banks (91001690)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Chelan Douglas Food Distribution Center (Malaga). . . .$1,030,000

FISH Community Food Bank and Food Pantry

(Ellensburg). . . .$1,545,000

Gig Harbor Peninsula FISH New Facility

Construction (Gig Harbor). . . .$2,050,000

Hunger Solution Center Cold Storage Expansion

(Seattle). . . .$827,000

Issaquah Food Bank Expansion (Issaquah). . . .$1,030,000

La Center Community Center Repairs and

Improvements (La Center). . . .$515,000

Northwest Harvest (Yakima). . . .$3,200,000

Port Angeles Food Bank (Port Angeles). . . .$1,050,000

Puyallup Food Bank Capital Campaign (Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Selah Naches Food Bank (Selah). . . .$52,000

White Center Food Bank Relocation (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,304,000))

$12,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,304,000))

$12,586,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Permanent Supportive Housing Remediation (91002160)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for permanent supportive housing remediation grants to be provided on a first-come, first-served basis. The funding may be provided for building improvements, rehabilitation, clean-up expenses, and temporary relocation costs associated with property damage, destruction, or contamination of properties providing permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030. The maximum amount of total funding that the department may provide to any applicant is $50,000 per biennium.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

Sec. 1038. 2021 c 332 s 1091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1022, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that no funding may be directed to the Auburn Resource Center.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,318,000))

$4,818,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,318,000))

$4,818,000

Sec. 1039. 2021 c 332 s 1083 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Early Learning Facilities (91001677)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,089,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $5,840,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Laurel Forest Childcare Center (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Learning to Grow (Elma). . . .$500,000

Monroe ECEAP Facility (Monroe). . . .(($361,000))

$876,000

Petah Villages Outdoor Preschool (Renton). . . .$370,000

Rainier Valley Early Learning Center (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Site Study and Predesign for Two ECEAP Classrooms

(Spokane). . . .$40,000

Walla Walla YMCA ECEAP (Walla Walla). . . .$75,000

Willapa Center (Raymond). . . .$318,000

(2) $23,911,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation and $23,160,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

(3)(a) $7,500,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities revolving account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund. Up to four percent of the funding in this appropriation may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

(b) In addition to the reporting requirements in RCW 43.31.573(5), the department must require the contractor to include the following information in the annual reports due to the department:

(i) ((Audited financial statements or reports independently verified by an accountant showing operating costs, including a clear delineation of the operating costs incurred due to administering grants and loans under this subsection (3);

(ii) Independently verified information regarding the))The interest rates and terms of all loans provided to early learning facilities under this subsection (3);

(((iii) Independently verified or audited information))and

(ii) Information showing all private matching dollars, public matching dollars, and revenues received by the contractor from the repayment of loans, clearly delineating revenues received from the repayment of loans provided under this subsection (3)((; and

(iv) A forward-looking financial plan that projects the timing and public funding level at which the Washington early learning loan fund will become self-sustaining and will no longer need state matching dollars to provide loans to early learning facilities. The plan must include scenarios based upon a range of state investment in the fund)).

(4) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(5) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.

(6) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(7) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.

(8) The department shall, in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families, prepare a report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the geographical diversity of early learning facilities grants. The report must be submitted by December 1, 2022, and must provide the following information:

(a) Geographical disbursement of school district early learning grants, early learning facilities grants to eligible organizations, and early learning loans or grants provided by a nongovernmental private-public partnership contracted by the department, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant;

(b) Disbursement of early learning grants or loans to providers in rural and nonrural counties, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant; and

(c) Disbursement of early learning grants or loans to providers by type of provider, including school district, child care center, licensed family home, or other, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant.

(9) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. These projects are not subject to section 7017, chapter 332, Laws of 2021 or RCW 43.88.150.

(10) It is the intent of the legislature to reappropriate funding in the 2023-2025 omnibus capital appropriations act for early learning facilities appropriated in this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,089,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$23,911,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$29,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,500,000))

$61,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,500,000))

$61,500,000

Sec. 1040. 2021 c 332 s 1052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($31,088,000))

$31,045,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,088,000))

$32,045,000

Sec. 1041. 2021 c 332 s 1069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000219)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 15-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) $71,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $1,950,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section:

(a) $11,600,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $1,950,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for at least six enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placements of dementia discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least one facility with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least one crisis triage and stabilization facility that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(e) $12,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for two 16-bed crisis triage and stabilization facilities in the King county region((, one within the city of Seattle and one in south King county,)) consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B, by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15–35462, and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease;

(f) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least two mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the nine regions;

(g) $18,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;

(h) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs;

(i) $9,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least three intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(j) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(6)(a) $15,648,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $4,275,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

EvergreenHealth Monroe (Monroe). . . .$4,275,000

Astria Toppenish Hospital (Toppenish). . . .$1,648,000

Compass Health Broadway (Everett). . . .$14,000,000

(b) $8,116,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $21,775,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except that the following projects are not required to establish new capacity:

Comprehensive Health Care - Goldendale Facility

(Goldendale). . . .$1,030,000

Evergreen Recovery Center (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Expansion & Enhancement of Opioid Clinic in Seattle

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Jamestown S'Klallam (Sequim). . . .$3,250,000

Lummi Nation Healing Wellness Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,250,000

Lynnwood Community Recovery Center (Lynnwood). . . .$6,000,000

Maplewood Enhanced Services Facility (Bellingham). . . .$1,500,000

NE Spokane Community Behavioral Health Center

(Spokane). . . .$700,000

Oxford Housing Program in Lacey (Lacey). . . .$500,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Recovery Center

(Kennewick). . . .$1,545,000

Family Solutions (Vancouver). . . .$2,050,000

Renovation Youth Evaluation & Treatment Facility

(Bremerton). . . .$316,000

Sound Enhanced Services Facility (Auburn). . . .$3,000,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Recovery Center

(Kennewick). . . .$2,750,000

(7) The department must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated within subsection (5) of this section in the manner prescribed. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category of projects under subsection (5) of this section, the department may allocate funds to other behavioral health capacity project categories within subsection (5) of this section, prioritizing projects under subsections (5)(a), (g), and (i) of this section. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.

(10) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$95,164,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$28,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$123,164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$120,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($215,164,000))

$243,164,000

Sec. 1042. 2021 c 332 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Response Community Preservation Pilot Program (91001278)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,518,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$482,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$4,000,000

Sec. 1043. 2021 c 332 s 1086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to the statewide broadband office for qualifying broadband infrastructure projects.

(b) Unless otherwise stated, eligible applicants for grants awarded under subsections (2) and (3) of this section are:

(i) Local governments, including ports and public utility districts;

(ii) Federally recognized tribes; and

(iii) ((Nonprofit organizations;

(iv) Nonprofit cooperative organizations; and

(v))) Multiparty entities comprised exclusively of a combination of ((public entity members or private entity members. A multiparty entity cannot be solely comprised of private entities))local governments or tribal entities.

(c) Projects receiving grants under this section must:

(i) Demonstrate that the project site is under the applicant's control for a minimum of 25 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease; and

(ii) Commit to using the infrastructure funded by the grant for the purposes of providing broadband connectivity for a minimum of 25 years.

(d) Unless otherwise stated, priority must be given to projects:

(i) Located in unserved areas of the state, which for the purposes of this section means areas of Washington in which households and businesses lack access to broadband service of speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload;

(ii) Located in geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment of broadband infrastructure to achieve the state's broadband goals, as provided in RCW 43.330.536, identified with department and board mapping tools; or

(iii) That construct last mile infrastructure, as defined in RCW 43.330.530.

(e) Unless otherwise stated, appropriations may not be used for projects where a broadband provider currently provides, or has begun construction to provide, broadband service, as defined in RCW 43.330.530, to end users in the proposed project area ((at speeds equal to or greater than the state speed goals provided in RCW 43.330.536)).

(f) The appropriations must be used for projects that use a technology-neutral approach in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents.

(g)(i) The statewide broadband office must act as fiscal agent for the grants authorized in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(ii) No more than 1.5 percent of the funds appropriated for the program may be expended by the statewide broadband office for administration purposes.

(2)(a) $50,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the statewide broadband office to award as grants to eligible applicants as match funds to leverage federal broadband infrastructure program funding.

(b)(i) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "state broadband infrastructure funders" are the state broadband office, the public works board, and the community economic revitalization board.

(ii) The statewide broadband office must develop a project evaluation process to assist in coordination among state broadband infrastructure funders to maximize opportunities to leverage federal funding and ensure efficient state investment. The project evaluation process must help determine whether a project is a strong candidate for a known federal funding opportunity and if a project can be packaged as part of a regional or other coordinated federal grant proposal. The state broadband infrastructure funders are encouraged to enter into a memorandum of understanding outlining how coordination will take place so that the process can help with a coordinated funding strategy across these entities.

(3)(a) (($260,003,000))$150,996,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation ((and $16,000,000)), $124,749,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation, and $258,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to eligible applicants for qualifying broadband infrastructure projects.

(b)(i) Projects that receive grant funding under this subsection (3) must be eligible for funds under section 9901 of the American rescue plan act.

(ii) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and coronavirus capital projects account, all expenditures of amounts appropriated in this subsection (3) must be ((incurred))obligated by December 31, 2024.

(c)(i) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this subsection is provided for broadband equity and affordability grants.

(ii) Grants must be provided to eligible applicants located in areas:

(A) With existing broadband service with speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload; and

(B) Where the state broadband office, in consultation with the department of equity, determine that access to existing broadband service is not affordable or equitable.

(iii) Eligible applicants for grants awarded under this subsection (3)(c) are:

(A) Local governments, including ports and public utility districts;

(B) Federally recognized tribes;

(C) Public school districts; and

(D) ((Nonprofit organizations; and

(E))) Multiparty entities comprised exclusively of ((public entity members to fund broadband deployment))a combination of local governments or tribal entities.

(d) $258,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))state building construction account—state appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the Precision Agriculture and Broadband pilot project.

(e) $225,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the Point Roberts rural broadband project.

(4) By January 30, 2022, and January 30, 2023, the statewide broadband office must develop and submit a report regarding the grants established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of projects approved for grant funding in the preceding fiscal year;

(c) The total amount of grant funding that was disbursed during the preceding fiscal year;

(d) The total amount of funds obligated and timing of when the funds were obligated in the preceding fiscal year; and

(e) For projects funded in the prior biennium, the outcomes achieved by the approved projects.

(5) For eligible applicants providing service outside of their jurisdictional boundary, no more than three percent of the award amount may be expended for administration purposes.

(6) $50,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this subsection shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$50,258,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery

Account—Federal
. . . .
(($260,003,000))

$150,996,000

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
(($16,000,000))

$124,749,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($326,003,000))

$376,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($326,003,000))

$376,003,000

Sec. 1044. 2021 c 332 s 1081 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(2) (($5,355,000 of the))The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Dental Expansion for Maple Street Clinic (Spokane). . . .$309,000

HealthPoint (Auburn). . . .$721,000

HealthPoint (Renton). . . .$309,000

ICHS Holly Park (Seattle). . . .$106,000

ICHS International District (Seattle). . . .$106,000

International Community Health Services (Bellevue). . . .$106,000

International Community Health Services (Shoreline). . . .$106,000

NEW Health CHC Dental Expansion (Newport). . . .$1,900,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Gig Harbor). . . .$490,000

Sea Mar Community Health Center (Kent). . . .$1,042,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$1,030,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,225,000

Sec. 1045. 2021 c 332 s 1087 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Community Relief (92000957)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Communities of Concern Commission for development of a list of community-led capital projects that serve underserved communities. Eligible expenses include costs incurred by the Communities of Concern Commission in conducting outreach, developing an application process, providing technical assistance, assisting project proponents with project readiness, and assisting the department with identifying barriers faced in accessing capital grant programs. The department must present the list prepared by the Communities of Concern Commission to the fiscal committees of the legislature for consideration for funding in the 2022 supplemental capital budget with the list of identified projects. (($2,500,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) shall remain in unallotted status for purposes of legislative review of the joint list prepared by the Communities of Concern Commission and the department until the legislature appropriates funds for these projects in the budget process. The legislature retains the right to review and consider all such funding as it does with other requests for project funding.)) The intent of the legislature is to only provide funding in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in order to inform the department's comprehensive equity review required in the operating budget and allow the opportunity for the department to implement the steps necessary to improve equitable delivery of all of their capital grant programs. The department must submit an interim report to the legislature by December 31, 2021, on the barriers identified and lessons learned through projects identified through this section and in section 1093 of this act and the connection to the equity review required in the operating budget.

(2)(a) ((The))$2,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of Communities of Concern Commission projects:

Community to Community, Ejidos Cooperative Farm

(Everson). . . .$250,000

Foundation for Homeless & Poverty Management, Community

Rejuvenation Center (Bremerton). . . .$1,200,000

Northwest Native Canoe Center (Seattle). . . .$800,000

FAME/Equity Alliance Washington, FAME Plaza (Seattle). . . .$25,000

Lummi Stepping Stones/Lhaq'temish Foundation, Eagle

Haven Cottage Village (Bellingham). . . .$225,000

(b) $10,650,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?al?al (means "Home" in Lushootseed) (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Asberry Historic Home Site Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$919,000

Be'er Sheva Park Improvements and Shoreline Restoration

(Seattle). . . .$500,000

Cham Community Center (CCC) (Seattle). . . .$515,000

((Communities of Concern Commission (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000))

Elevate Youngstown Capital Project (Seattle). . . .$515,000

Feast Collective Capital Request (Spokane). . . .$103,000

Feeding Change Campaign (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Khmer Community Center & Cultural Hub (Seattle). . . .$309,000

Neighborhood House Early Learning Facilities (Seattle). . . .$2,050,000

Shiloh Baptist Housing Development Project (Tacoma). . . .$2,100,000

Skyway Resource Center Renovation Project (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Wadajir Residences & Souq (Tukwila). . . .$1,339,000

(((b)))(c) For the Asberry Historic Home Site Acquisition, the department must work with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and the grantee to develop a historic preservation easement. The easement must be held through the department of archaeology and historic preservation and must be placed on the title in perpetuity.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,150,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,650,000

Sec. 1046. 2021 c 332 s 1089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Child Care Minor Renovation Grants (92001109)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(($10,000,000))$28,522,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to childcare providers for minor renovations and small capital purchases and projects. The grants are intended to support childcare providers so that they may maintain operations or expand operations during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(1) The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to conduct outreach to licensed family homes to ensure they are made aware of the grant opportunity.

(2) The department shall give priority to projects that make minor renovations without adding capacity and are therefore ineligible for the early learning facilities program.

(3) All grants provided in this section must be awarded by September 30, ((2022))2023.

(4) Of the amounts provided in this section, no more than four percent may be retained by the department for administrative purposes.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$28,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$28,522,000

Sec. 1047. 2021 c 332 s 1092 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Work, Education, Health Monitoring Projects (91001686)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) $926,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Camp Waskowitz Restrooms (North Bend). . . .$250,000

Mary's Place Burien Shelter COVID Updates

(Seattle). . . .$550,000

Nordic Heritage Museum HVAC Renovation (Seattle). . . .$26,000

Sherwood COVID Mitigation (Lake Stevens). . . .$100,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$926,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$926,000

Sec. 1048. 2021 c 332 s 1094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning COVID-19 Renovation Grants (91001681)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,500,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund to provide grants to early learning facilities for emergency renovation and remodeling changes in response to the public health emergency with respect to the coronavirus disease.

(2) The grants may not be used for operating expenditures, but must be used for capital needs to:

(a) Support increased social distancing requirements;

(b) Support increased health and safety measures;

(c) Provide increased outdoor space; or

(d) Increase or preserve early learning slots within a facility or community.

(3) Grant recipients must meet the requirements in RCW 43.31.575.

(4) Up to four percent of the funding in this appropriation may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$8,500,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Fire Protection Services Capital Grant Program (91001985)

(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a fire protection services capital grant program for the following list of projects:

Lake Chelan EMS Design (Chelan). . . .$191,000

Lewis County Fire District #5 (Napavine). . . .$2,000,000

Lincoln County Fire District 1 Helipad (Sprague). . . .$103,000

Town of Elmer City Fire Station Improvements

(Elmer City). . . .$772,000

WCFD #8 Station 34 replacement (Bellingham). . . .$2,000,000

Yakima County Fire District 12 (Yakima). . . .$10,000

(b) Grant assistance under this subsection may be given only after private or public match funding is committed. Private or public match funding may consist of cash, equipment, land, buildings, or in-kind contributions. In determining the level of match required, the department shall take into consideration the financial need of the applicant and the economic conditions of the location of the proposed facility.

(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this subsection, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

(2)(a) The department must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and award funding to local governments located in a rural county, as defined in RCW 43.160.020, in planning, acquiring, constructing, improving, reconstructing, repairing, replacing, or rehabilitating facilities providing fire protection services.

(b) The department must establish a committee to develop the grant program criteria, determine a process for prioritizing applications, and review proposals. The committee must be composed of no less than one representative each from the department, a fire protection district, a county, and a city.

(c) The department must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications. The department must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with the committee established in (b) of this subsection, using objective criteria. The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in prioritizing projects:

(i) The insurance services office fire rating for the jurisdiction providing the fire protection services in the facility;

(ii) The extent to which the project leverages other funding or resources;

(iii) The ability of the local government providing the fire protection services to levy local resources;

(iv) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of the people in the community of service;

(v) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(vi) Whether the project is located in a distressed area as defined in RCW 43.168.020; and

(vii) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes services.

(d) The department must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2022, for inclusion in the department's 2023-2025 biennial capital budget request. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funding to be used for the project. Individual grants may not exceed $2,000,000. The total amount of recommended state funding for the projects on a biennial project list may not exceed $10,000,000.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,076,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Homeless Youth Facilities (91001991)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Access to Our Community (Tukwila). . . .$250,000

Communities of Color Coalition (Everett). . . .$3,400,000

Community Youth Services (Olympia). . . .$100,000

Friends of Youth (Redmond). . . .$2,500,000

HopeSource (Ellensburg). . . .$3,300,000

Northwest Youth Services (Burlington). . . .$100,000

Skagit Valley Family YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$495,000

Transitional Youth Housing and Services (Seattle). . . .$750,000

YouthCare (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$14,895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Dental Capacity Grants (92001175)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding in this section is provided solely for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities that provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increased efficiency in dental access. Projects funded in this section must maintain dental services for a period of at least 10 years.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Battle Ground HealthCare Dental Expansion

(Battle Ground). . . .$283,000

Community Health Care (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Family Health Center (Omak). . . .$2,500,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Bremerton). . . .$463,000

Yakima Valley Farmworkers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,246,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Program (92001179)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,869,000 of the energy efficiency revolving loan capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization program in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Capital

Account—State
. . . .
$1,869,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,869,000

Sec. 1053. 2021 c 332 s 1095 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with Cowlitz county to acquire land and rights of way along the Cowlitz river for the United States army corps of engineers to dredge. The land is necessary for dredged material deposit sites for the Mt. St. Helen's flood protection project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

Sec. 1054. 2021 c 332 s 1096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to cover staffing and support costs of the facilities oversight team.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,769,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,440,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,819,000

Sec. 1055. 2021 c 332 s 1097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to cover staffing and support costs of the capital budget team.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$1,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,260,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,044,000

Sec. 1056. 2021 c 332 s 1098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (30000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.

(2) For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management.

(3) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the legislative fiscal committees as emergency projects are approved for funding and include what funded level was approved.

(4) The office of financial management must report quarterly, beginning October 1, 2021, on the funding approved by agency and by emergency to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($16,000,000))

$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,000,000))

$25,000,000

Sec. 1057. 2021 c 332 s 1101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations and reappropriation are subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that the final environmental impact statement that includes identification of a preferred alternative for Capitol Lake management must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by October 31, 2022.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$156,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,663,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,819,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$715,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$150,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$865,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,699,000))

$6,849,000

Sec. 1058. 2021 c 332 s 1104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,416,000))

$2,983,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,586,000))

$3,153,000

Sec. 1059. 2021 c 332 s 1111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Campus Modernization (92000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6024 of this act.

(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designee(s) and the house of representatives executive rules committee or its designee(s) at least every other month.

(3) $11,585,000 of the Thurston county capital facilities account—state appropriation is provided solely for the global legislative campus modernization subproject, which includes, but is not limited to, modular building leases or purchases and associated costs, site development work on campus to include Columbia street, stakeholder outreach, and historic mitigation for the project.

(4) $69,037,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for Irv Newhouse building replacement design and construction subproject on opportunity site six.

(a) The department must:

(i) Have a design contractor selected by September 1, 2021;

(ii) Start design validation by October 1, 2021; and

(iii) Start design by December 1, 2021.

(b) The design and construction must result in:

(i) A high performance building that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than 35;

(ii) Sufficient program space required to support senate offices and support functions;

(iii) A building façade similar to the American neoclassical style with a base, shaft, and capitol expression focus with some relief expressed in modern construction methods to include adding more detailing and depth to the exterior so that it will fit with existing legislative buildings on west capitol campus, like the John Cherberg building;

(iv) Member offices of similar size as member offices in the John A. Cherberg building;

(v) Demolition of the buildings located on opportunity site six;

(vi) Consultation with the leadership of the senate, or their designee(s), at least every month, effective July 1, 2021; and

(vii) Ensure the subproject meets legislative intent to complete design by April 30, 2023, and start construction by September 1, 2023.

(5) $8,538,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for Pritchard building design subproject. The design contractor must be selected by January 1, 2023, and the design must result in:

(a) A high performance building that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than 35;

(b) Sufficient program space required to support house of representatives offices and support functions; and

(c) Additional office space necessary to offset house of representatives members and staff office space that may be eliminated in the renovation of the third and fourth floors of the John L. O'Brien building.

(6) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(7) The state capitol committee, in consultation with capitol campus design advisory committee, may review architectural design proposals for continuity with the 2006 master plan for the capitol of the state of Washington and 2009 west capitol campus historic landscape preservation and vegetation management plan. As part of planning efforts, the state capitol committee may conduct a review of current design criteria and standards.

(8) The Irv Newhouse building replacement and Pritchard building designs should include an analysis of comprehensive impacts to the campus and the surrounding neighborhood, an evaluation of future workforce projections and an analysis of traffic impacts, parking needs, visual buffers, and campus aesthetics. The designs should include a public engagement process including the capitol campus design advisory committee and state capitol committee.

(9) $180,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to conduct a preservation study of the Pritchard building as a continuation of the predesign in section 6024 of this act. The study must include an analysis of seismic, geotechnical, building codes, constructability, and costs associated with renovation and expansion of the Pritchard building to accommodate tenant space needs. The department shall contract with a third-party historic preservation specialist to ensure the study is in compliance with the secretary of the interior's standards and any other applicable standards for historic rehabilitation. The study must include a public engagement process including the capitol campus design advisory committee and state capitol committee. The study is subject to review and approval by the state capitol committee by March 31, 2022, to inform the design of a renovation, expansion, or replacement of the Pritchard building.

(10) The department may sell by auction the Ayers and Carlyon houses, known as the press houses, separate and apart from the underlying land, subject to the following conditions:

(a) The purchaser, at its sole cost and expense, must remove the houses by December 31, 2021;

(b) The state is not responsible for any costs or expenses associated with the sale, removal, or relocation of the buildings from opportunity site six; and

(c) Any sale proceeds must be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account.

(11) Implementation of subsections (7) through (10) of this section is not intended to delay the design and construction of any of the subprojects included in the legislative campus modernization project.

(12) If the department receives information that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (3), (4), or (5) of this section will exceed 103 percent of the amount provided in the respective subsection, the department must provide that information to the project executive team committee, along with at least two options to reduce subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject. Before proceeding with a subproject that would exceed the 103 percent threshold, the department must receive the approval of at least a majority of the project executive team committee.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,855,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State

. . . .
$11,585,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$79,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($90,812,000))

$127,714,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($180,748,000))

$217,650,000

Sec. 1060. 2021 c 332 s 1114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Temple of Justice HVAC, Lighting & Water Systems (92000040)

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) To assist in funding this project, the department must work with the office of financial management to access federal funding for the total project cost.

(b) If the agency receives more than $26,000,000 in federal funds, an amount of the state building construction account—state appropriation equal to the additional federal funds must be placed in unallotted status.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "additional federal funds" means the difference between the total amount of federal funds received under (a) of this subsection and $26,000,000.

(2) The department must:

(a) Submit the final predesign to the office of financial management by June 1, 2021;

(b) Submit the final energy services proposal to the senate ways and means committee and the house capital budget committee prior to the department starting the design phase; and

(c) Start design by August 31, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$30,000,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$26,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$47,887,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,952,000

Sec. 1062. 2021 c 332 s 1120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Snohomish Readiness Center (30000930)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($3,562,000))

$4,349,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,188,000))

$1,566,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,750,000))

$5,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,750,000))

$5,915,000

Sec. 1063. 2021 c 332 s 1121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Anacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,551,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,551,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($75,000))

$74,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($7,252,000))

$7,251,000

Sec. 1064. 2021 c 332 s 1123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2019-21 Biennium (40000037)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,200,000))

$2,243,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$109,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($22,309,000))

$22,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($691,000))

$648,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. 2021 c 332 s 2054 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000014)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$735,000

Sec. 2002. 2021 c 332 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
(($425,000))

$612,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
(($425,000))

$612,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($850,000))

$1,224,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,084,000))

$2,710,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

Sec. 2003. 2021 c 332 s 2006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,358,000))

$2,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($27,832,000))

$27,749,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,190,000

Sec. 2004. 2021 c 332 s 2012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign the intermediate care facility of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention. It is also the intent of the legislature to concentrate the footprint of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center on the northern portion of the property. As a result, $7,750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for design of a 120-bed nursing facility.

(2) $2,243,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to relocate the adult training program to a different location on the Fircrest Rehabilitation Center campus. The department must consider the proposal to redesign the facility as a short-term crisis stabilization and intervention when devising options for relocation of the adult training program and submit a report of these options to the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(3) The department must seek input from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including the residents at Fircrest and their families or guardians, in design of a nursing facility.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$58,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($242,000))

$184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,235,000

Sec. 2005. 2021 c 332 s 2014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,227,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,450,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,173,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,850,000

Sec. 2006. 2021 c 332 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,234,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$36,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,270,000))

$1,955,000

Sec. 2007. 2021 c 332 s 2028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

(2) The department shall collaborate with the city of Shoreline on the future siting of three 16-bed behavioral health facilities on the northeast corner of the campus and a 120-bed nursing facility on the northwest portion of the campus.

(3) The department shall collaborate with the city to rezone portions of the Fircrest campus that are under used and not necessary for department operations, including the southwest corner, for long-term, revenue-generating opportunities.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$102,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$125,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$168,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$98,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($325,000))

$493,000

Sec. 2008. 2021 c 332 s 2047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000571)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,950,000))

$9,745,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,845,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,795,000))

$11,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($29,795,000))

$32,590,000

Sec. 2009. 2021 c 332 s 2048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Transitional Care Center-Main Building: Patient Rooms Cooling (40000574)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$2,335,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,335,000

Sec. 2010. 2021 c 332 s 2050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: Roofing Replacement (40000589)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,285,000))

$5,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,285,000))

$5,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-ICF Cottages: HVAC and Water Heater Improvements (40000946)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: CMS Certification (40000948)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

State Agency Compliance with Clean Buildings Law (40000951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$693,000

Sec. 2014. 2021 c 332 s 2056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000077)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2054, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,235,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($37,700,000))

$38,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,765,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($57,700,000))

$58,125,000

Sec. 2015. 2021 c 332 s 2062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($5,115,000))

$5,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$585,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,700,000))

$6,000,000

Sec. 2016. 2021 c 332 s 2063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$4,933,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$196,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$66,519,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,648,000

Sec. 2017. 2021 c 332 s 2065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2034, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($38,529,000))

$48,390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($69,609,000))

$69,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,138,000))

$118,000,000

Sec. 2018. 2021 c 332 s 2066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$1,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,858,000))

$3,538,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,858,000))

$5,000,000

Sec. 2019. 2021 c 332 s 2068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
(($31,000,000))

$33,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$1,303,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

Sec. 2020. 2021 c 332 s 2069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2068, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($750,000))

$1,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($21,000))

$120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($771,000))

$1,500,000

Sec. 2021. 2021 c 332 s 2070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Small & Disadvantaged Communities DW (40000031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $20,063,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for assistance to small and disadvantaged communities in section 50104 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($743,000))

$20,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($743,000))

$20,806,000

Sec. 2022. 2021 c 332 s 2071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

E-wing Remodel to a Molecular Laboratory (40000032)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$216,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,179,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,395,000

Sec. 2023. 2021 c 332 s 2072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Replace Air Handling Unit (AHU) in A/Q-wings (40000034)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,894,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,894,000

Sec. 2024. 2021 c 332 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

(3) $78,900,000 of the drinking water assistance account—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the drinking water state revolving fund program in section 50102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this subsection shall lapse.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
(($34,000,000))

$112,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($34,000,000))

$112,900,000

Sec. 2025. 2021 c 332 s 2076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Construction Loans - State Match (40000051)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of health must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$20,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$20,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Generator for New Central Boiler Plant (40000053)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Improve Critical Water Infrastructure (40000058)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$70,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2023 DWSRF Preconstruction Loans (40000059)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

Sec. 2029. 2021 c 332 s 2080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($250,000))

$441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($162,000))

$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($412,000))

$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

State Agency Compliance with Clean Buildings Laws (40000065)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$490,000

Sec. 2031. 2021 c 332 s 2082 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

DVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is granted federal expenditure authority in anticipation of the receipt of federal competitive grant funding for which it is eligible to apply under section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(2) Funding appropriated in this section must be used for projects in the following priority order:

(a) The WVH HVAC Retrofit project (40000006); and

(b) Minor works projects that meet the requirements set forth in section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(((3) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section must be used as state match funds to leverage the federal funding described in subsection (1) of this section. Any amount that exceeds the level of state match funds required to maximize the federal funding opportunity must be placed in unallotted status.))

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$24,515,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,584,000))

$15,384,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,099,000))

$39,899,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($33,099,000))

$39,899,000

Sec. 2032. 2021 c 332 s 2084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$9,174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,600,000))

$426,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,600,000

Sec. 2033. 2021 c 332 s 2085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$181,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,800,000))

$1,619,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,762,000

Sec. 2034. 2021 c 332 s 2086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000400)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,250,000))

$1,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$2,440,000

Sec. 2035. 2021 c 332 s 2093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Replace Roofs (30000654)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,719,000))

$3,520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,219,000))

$4,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Paint and Repair 300,000 Gallon Water Storage Tank (30000697)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

ECWR: Foundation and Siding Repair (40000067)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$850,000

Sec. 2038. 2021 c 332 s 2105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000187)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,500,000))

$1,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,973,000))

$9,812,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,473,000))

$11,668,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,275,000

Sec. 2040. 2021 c 332 s 2095 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Support Building HVAC Replacement (40000379)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$4,646,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,646,000

Sec. 2041. 2021 c 332 s 2104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Sewer System HABU (Highest and Best Use) (40000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2103, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($500,000))

$720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($300,000))

$80,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

Sec. 2042. 2021 c 332 s 2102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000254)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($11,800,000))

$10,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,833,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,633,000))

$71,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Inpatient Psychiatric Unit (40000413)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC: Sage Unit Move to AHCC (40000414)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,105,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

AHCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$791,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000416)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State Agency Compliance with Clean Buildings Law (40000420)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Utilidor Mechanical and Electrical System Repair (91000432)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,977,000

Sec. 2049. 2021 c 332 s 2106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Unit Six Roof Replacement (92000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($650,000))

$786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($277,000))

$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$927,000

Sec. 2050. 2021 c 332 s 2107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: AC for MSU (92000039)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,000))

$99,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,296,000))

$1,509,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2021 c 332 s 3016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3020, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) $400,000 of the reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide to the city of Tacoma to reimburse the developer of the former ASARCO smelter site for costs incurred by the site developer in cleanup and remediation of the former Ruston Way tunnel, including cleanup and remediation costs that occurred prior to June 30, 2019. Before the city of Tacoma may issue the reimbursement, the city must verify that the city and the site developer have properly documented the cleanup costs and that the site developer has released all affected public entities for liability for an amount at least equal to the amount provided in this subsection.

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$1,273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,260,000

Sec. 3002. 2021 c 332 s 3071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
(($31,504,000))

$31,542,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($8,496,000))

$8,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

Sec. 3003. 2021 c 332 s 3084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000337)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $33,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the clean water state revolving fund program in section 50210 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this section is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$225,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($75,000,000))

$108,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($300,000,000))

$333,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,500,000,000))

$1,533,000,000

Sec. 3004. 2021 c 332 s 3086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 State Match - Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000339)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($75,000,000))

$78,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Pacific Wood Treating Site Cleanup – Cleanup Settlement Account (40000464)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,326,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (40000465)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Failing Main Electrical Service Panel (40000467)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Community-Based Public-Private Stormwater Partnership (40000470)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to establish a community-based public-private partnership stormwater pilot program, using the Washington state stormwater community-based public-private partnership feasibility assessment as a guide. The department must work with partner agencies to develop local capacity and attract private investment.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000473)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$200,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

Sec. 3010. 2021 c 332 s 3112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to administer a pilot grant program for water banking strategies to meet local water needs.

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for qualified applicants located within the Methow River Basin.

(2)(a) Grant awards may only be used for:

(i) Development of water banks in rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5);

(ii) Acquisition of water rights appropriate for use in a water bank including all costs necessary to evaluate the water right for eligibility for its intended use; and

(iii) Activities necessary to facilitate the creation of a water bank.

(b) For applicants located outside of the Methow River Basin, grant awards may only be used for the development of water banks in rural counties that have the headwaters of a major watershed within their borders and only for water banking strategies within the county of origin. For purposes of this section, "major watershed" has the same meaning as shoreline of statewide significance in RCW 90.58.030(2)(f)(v) (A) and (B).

(3) Grant awards may not exceed $2,000,000 per applicant.

(4) For the purposes of a grant pursuant to this section, a water bank must meet water needs, which include, but are not limited to, agricultural use and instream flow for fish and wildlife. The water bank must preserve water rights for use in the county of origin and for permanent instream flows for fish and wildlife through the primary and secondary reaches of the water right.

(5) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, an applicant must:

(a) Be a public entity or a participant in a public-private partnership with a public entity;

(b) Exhibit sufficient expertise and capacity to develop and maintain a water bank consistent with the purposes of this appropriation;

(c) Secure a valid interest to purchase a water right;

(d) Show that the water rights appear to be adequate for the intended use; and

(e) Agree to have one-third of any water right purchased with the funds appropriated under this section to have its purpose of use changed permanently to instream flow benefiting fish and wildlife.

(6) If the amounts provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section are not obligated by June 30, 2023, the water banking pilot program established in this section is null and void, and funding is not reappropriated.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness and Response Account—

State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$14,000,000

Sec. 3011. 2021 c 332 s 3129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,137,000))

$4,026,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,337,000))

$4,226,000

Sec. 3012. 2021 c 332 s 3130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,914,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,024,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$1,035,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,938,000))

$9,043,000

Sec. 3013. 2021 c 332 s 3133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($142,000))

$128,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,080,000))

$1,066,000

Sec. 3014. 2021 c 332 s 3134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Repair Failing Bridge (30000876)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($193,000))

$191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($248,000))

$246,000

Sec. 3015. 2021 c 332 s 3136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,023,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,268,000))

$1,748,000

Sec. 3016. 2021 c 332 s 3138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

Parkland Acquisition Account—State
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,245,000))

$12,745,000

Sec. 3017. 2021 c 332 s 3143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($397,000))

$392,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,000))

$495,000

Sec. 3018. 2021 c 332 s 3147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,605,000))

$1,718,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($300,000))

$187,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

Sec. 3019. 2021 c 332 s 3149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Preservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,139,000))

$1,196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,308,000))

$3,251,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,447,000

Sec. 3020. 2021 c 332 s 3151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascade Trail - Crab Creek Trestle Replacement (40000162)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$79,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$2,281,000

Sec. 3021. 2021 c 332 s 3154 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Saint Edward Maintenance Facility (40000218)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,199,000))

$2,524,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,199,000))

$2,524,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Anderson Lake - New Day Use Facilities and Trail Development (91000441)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the design and construction of new day use facilities and trail development at Anderson Lake State Park.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,282,000

Sec. 3023. 2021 c 332 s 3161 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000014)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($11,239,000))

$10,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($31,000,000))

$29,965,000

Sec. 3024. 2021 c 332 s 3163 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2021-23 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000017)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a pool of eligible projects owned by the state parks and recreation commission.

(2) The following projects are the only projects eligible for funding in this section:

(a) Larrabee Water System Replacement;

(b) Cape Disappointment - Welcome Center and Entrance Improvements;

(c) Blake Island Marine Facilities Improvements;

(d) Cape Disappointment: Campground Access Road Culverts;

(e) Twenty-Five Mile Creek - Replace Moorage Floats;

(f) Maryhill Parkwide Septic System Overhaul;

(g) Palouse to Cascade Trail - Crab Creek Trestle Replacement;

(h) Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way;

(i) Sun Lakes Replace Primary Lift Station;

(j) Lyons Ferry Campground Reestablishment;

(k) Pearrygin Lake West Campground Development;

(l) Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation;

(m) Birch Bay - Repair Failing Bridge;

(n) Centennial Trail Paving Repair and Overlay;

(o) Deception Pass - Bowman Bay Pier Replacement;

(p) Ike Kinswa: Main Campground Loop Utility Upgrades;

(q) South Whidbey - Campground to Day Use Conversion;

(r) Wallace Falls Water System Replacement;

(s) Willapa Hills Trail: Bridge 48 and Trail Relocation;

(t) Statewide - Facility & Infrastructure Backlog Reduction 2021-23;

(u) Statewide - ADA Compliance 2021-23;

(v) Statewide - Code/Regulatory Compliance 2021-23;

(w) Statewide - Marine Facilities Rehabilitation 2021-23;

(x) Palouse to Cascades Trail – Repair Trestles and Trail Access;

(y) Electrical, Water and Sewer Infrastructure Preservation 2021-23;

(z) Statewide Park Paving Projects 2021-23;

(aa) Statewide Park Comfort Station Replacements 2021-23;

(bb) Wallace Falls Parking Expansion;

(cc) Lake Wenatchee-Pedestrian Bridge; and

(dd) Twanoh-Shoreline Restoration.

(3) The commission shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature the list of projects with funding levels, allotments, and schedules for the projects in this section by January 1, 2022.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($39,500,000))

$40,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($39,500,000))

$40,250,000

Sec. 3025. 2021 c 332 s 3164 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($637,000))

$785,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($41,363,000))

$41,215,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,000,000

Sec. 3026. 2021 c 332 s 3165 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($616,000))

$843,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($132,000))

$464,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($2,189,000))

$2,647,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
(($470,000))

$494,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,407,000))

$4,448,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($61,593,000))

$60,552,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

Sec. 3027. 2021 c 332 s 3168 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($903,000))

$3,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($69,097,000))

$66,343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

Sec. 3028. 2021 c 332 s 3171 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($1,181,000))

$1,563,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($2,910,000))

$2,814,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($3,268,000))

$3,085,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
(($1,345,000))

$117,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($8,704,000))

$7,579,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,619,000))

$47,744,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,323,000

Sec. 3029. 2021 c 332 s 3173 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
(($49,000))

$137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($14,161,000))

$14,073,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,210,000

Sec. 3030. 2021 c 332 s 3178 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($82,000))

$670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,918,000))

$7,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

Sec. 3031. 2021 c 332 s 3183 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($160,000))

$204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,840,000))

$4,796,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

Sec. 3032. 2021 c 332 s 3184 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$32,369,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,642,000))

$6,231,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($34,011,000))

$38,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($32,202,000))

$27,613,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,213,000

Sec. 3033. 2021 c 332 s 3185 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2017-42, developed July 20, 2017, and LEAP capital document No. 2018-6H, developed January 3, 2018.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($5,860,000))

$5,002,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($12,592,000))

$12,878,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($12,474,000))

$14,248,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($30,926,000))

$32,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($49,074,000))

$47,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

Sec. 3034. 2021 c 332 s 3187 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
(($895,000))

$2,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($12,300,000))

$10,204,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,195,000

Sec. 3035. 2021 c 332 s 3188 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,302,000))

$1,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,775,000))

$2,555,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,077,000

Sec. 3036. 2021 c 332 s 3189 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2018-9H, developed March 5, 2018.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$884,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,732,000))

$4,013,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,616,000))

$4,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($8,669,000))

$7,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,285,000

Sec. 3037. 2021 c 332 s 3190 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($16,640,000))

$20,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($23,360,000))

$19,237,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

Sec. 3038. 2021 c 332 s 3195 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,769,000))

$5,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,731,000))

$6,710,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

Sec. 3039. 2021 c 332 s 3197 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3200, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
(($6,880,000))

$6,687,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
(($20,349,000))

$25,791,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($28,025,000))

$24,390,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($55,254,000))

$56,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($29,746,000))

$28,132,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$85,000,000

Sec. 3040. 2021 c 332 s 3201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amounts reappropriated in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital documents No. 2020-467-HSBA, developed February 25, 2020, and No. 2020-467-HB, developed February 14, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,597,000))

$7,833,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,403,000))

$4,167,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

Sec. 3041. 2021 c 332 s 3214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000021)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.

(2) $640,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.

(3) $15,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the recreation and conservation office for the pacific coastal salmon recovery fund in P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this subsection shall lapse.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$65,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($80,000,000))

$95,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($480,000,000))

$495,000,000

Sec. 3042. 2021 c 332 s 3221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000035)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. ((RCO-5-HB-2021))RCO-5.1-HB-2022, developed ((April 15, 2021))February 3, 2022.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the appropriation.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$107,180,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$133,975,000

Sec. 3043. 2021 c 332 s 3229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($152,000))

$622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($11,033,000))

$10,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,185,000

Sec. 3044. 2021 c 332 s 3230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Upper Quinault River Restoration Project (91000958)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,359,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$641,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Fish Barrier Removal Projects in Skagit County (91001662)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a direct payment to Skagit county for the design of 11 high priority fish barrier removal projects located on the county's roads. Skagit county must ensure that the projects designed with funding from this section meet applicable state and federal grant program standards to facilitate the county's application to such programs for the purpose of receiving capital funding for the projects' construction.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 3046. 2021 c 332 s 3232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3049, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
(($132,000))

$497,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,859,000))

$8,050,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($5,991,000))

$8,547,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($28,790,000))

$26,234,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-2023 Farmland Protection and Land Access (40000020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the state conservation commission to implement and administer the farmland protection and land access program. In administering this program, the state conservation commission shall support opportunities for all producers but shall prioritize: (a) Conservation of high priority agricultural land at imminent risk of development; and (b) grants for the purchase of agricultural easements to historically underserved producers, as defined in 7 C.F.R. Sec. 1470.3 (2022), including young and beginning farmers, people of color, and veterans.

(2) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the state conservation commission must include provisions that require that easements be held by the grantee for a specified period, appropriate to protect the public investment and to the conservation purpose of the grant. If the state conservation commission finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

Sec. 3048. 2021 c 332 s 3253 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($350,000))

$270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($400,000))

$320,000

Sec. 3049. 2021 c 332 s 3254 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3063, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,387,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($13,108,000))

$13,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($36,000,000))

$48,616,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($51,495,000))

$66,394,000

Sec. 3050. 2021 c 332 s 3255 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$350,000))

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,923,000))

$2,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,673,000))

$4,888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beaver Creek Hatchery - Renovation (30000680)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,337,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,472,000

Sec. 3052. 2021 c 332 s 3273 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($577,000))

$504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,671,000))

$12,598,000

Sec. 3053. 2021 c 332 s 3274 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,606,000))

$3,102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,906,000))

$3,402,000

Sec. 3054. 2021 c 332 s 3281 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Toutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to purchase fee-title and/or easements as ((part of))necessary for sediment abatement, fish release and collection sites, and for project obligations related to the state's participation in design review and design cost share of the fish collection facility.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for project obligations related to modular housing replacement.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,371,000))

$2,066,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,326,000))

$7,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Klickitat WLA - Simcoe Fencing (40000161)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Taneum Creek Property Acquisition Post Closing Activities (40000162)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Western Pond Turtle Nest Hill Restoration (91000161)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the restoration of the western pond turtle nest hill at the Pierce county recovery site.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Creek Hatchery (91000160)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the Kalama Creek Hatchery project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

Sec. 3059. 2021 c 332 s 3292 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($520,000))

$519,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($680,000))

$679,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upper Indian Creek Fish Screen Removal (92001248)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000

Sec. 3061. 2021 c 332 s 3298 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Structurally Deficient Bridges (40000086)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following projects: (a) The Naked Falls/Stebbins Creek bridge replacement in Skamania county; (b) the Shale Creek timber bridge repair in Jefferson county; ((and)) (c) the Coal Creek bridge replacement in Clallam county; (d) the Shale Creek concrete bridge repair in Jefferson county; (e) the 5970 #1 bridge replacement in Pacific county; (f) the Rock Creek bridge replacement in Skamania county; (g) the EF Dickey River bridge design in Clallam county; (h) the Steep Creek bridge replacement in Skamania county; (i) the Sollecks High bridge repair in Jefferson county; (j) the 5973 bridge replacement in Pacific county; (k) the Cedar Creek bridge repair in Grays Harbor county; (l) the Arvid Creek bridge replacement in Jefferson county; (m) the Susie Creek bridge repair in Jefferson county; (n) the YR-Jones bridge replacement in Yakima county; (o) the Middle Creek railcar bridge replacement in Pend Oreille county; and (p) the Butler Mill bridge replacement in Grays Harbor county.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,050,000

Access Road Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$2,250,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,050,000))

$13,300,000

Sec. 3062. 2021 c 332 s 3305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($107,000))

$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$108,000

Sec. 3063. 2021 c 332 s 3306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (40000034)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3281, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,675,000))

$1,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,725,000))

$4,704,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,400,000

Sec. 3064. 2021 c 332 s 3308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway (40000038)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,220,000))

$1,305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($636,000))

$551,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,856,000

Sec. 3065. 2021 c 332 s 3313 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities 2019-21 (40000046)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($295,000))

$527,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,705,000))

$1,473,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 3066. 2021 c 332 s 3317 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Grouse Ridge Fish Barriers & RMAP Compliance (40000056)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,210,000))

$3,217,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($35,000))

$28,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,975,000

Sec. 3067. 2021 c 332 s 3319 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Minor Works Preservation (40000070)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $205,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for communication site preservation and repairs.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,183,000))

$3,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,183,000))

$3,122,000

Sec. 3068. 2021 c 332 s 3328 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rural Broadband Investment (40000082)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for installation of new communication towers at Ellis Peak, Striped Peak, and Paradise Peak.

(2) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for communication tower upgrades at Blyn Mountain and Capitol Peak.

(3) $20,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a new generator in Okanogan county.

(4) $5,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a utility connection project in Clallam county.

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Finalization of New Trust Land Transfer Tool (91000294)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue the work described in the 2021 trust land transfer beneficiaries and stakeholder report, submitted in accordance with section 3333, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, as well as for the completion of the trust land transfer of the Dabob property identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-9H, developed April 27, 2019.

(2) The department of natural resources shall convene a work group of trust land beneficiaries and stakeholders, tribal representatives, and representatives of overburdened communities and vulnerable populations to facilitate the continuation of the work identified under subsection (a) of this section. This work group shall address the topics identified by the 2021 trust land transfer beneficiaries and stakeholder work group and listed in the department's 2021 legislative report.

(3) The department shall make recommendations for any budget and policy legislation needed to establish and implement the trust land transfer process developed under this section in the 2023 legislative session. The department shall also evaluate at least four parcels, including the parcels known as Blakely Island, Devils Lake, Eglon, and Morning Star, for eligibility and prioritization using the new trust land transfer process developed under this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

Sec. 3070. 2021 c 332 s 3332 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

DNR and Camp Colman Collaboration (92000037)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($100,000))$20,000 is provided solely for the department to contract with a third party facilitator for the purpose of collaborating with the YMCA of greater Seattle, Camp Colman, on finding solutions for maintaining a high-quality camp experience while establishing a barrier free passage for migrating fish species at Whiteman cove.

(2) $500,000 is provided solely for the department to grant to the YMCA of greater Seattle to retain expertise to scope, plan, and advance the future of the Camp Colman experience given the restoration of the Whiteman cove estuary. The planning process should be inclusive of tribal input, with an open invitation for their participation, and must include department technical experts, participation from the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, and any other resources needed. The plan should include a vision for how the cove can be returned to a fully functioning estuary, benefiting native flora and fauna, as well as serve as an environmental outdoor educational opportunity that will serve youth and families, especially those from historically marginalized and underrepresented communities, and include educational opportunities for youth and families to learn of native cultural heritage unique and specific to the natural and human history of the site. The plan must identify specific projects and estimated costs, given estuary restoration, for physical improvements for the camp, such as water access structures or swimming facilities, with recommendations for funding. The department, on behalf of the YMCA, must submit the plan in a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2021.

(3) (($300,000))$450,000 is provided solely for the department to design the fish blockage removal and predesign enhancements for a new bridge and roadway across Whiteman cove that are part of the fish blockage removal project and necessary as part of maintaining the route as access to the camp. The predesign must take into consideration the means to maintain continuous road access to Camp Colman for campers and camp staff without disruption, ensure the continuation, mitigation and innovation of Camp Colman's recreational, water safety, and environmental education programs in the salt water estuary, and maintain the critical outdoor experiences for historically marginalized and underrepresented communities.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($900,000))

$970,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($900,000))

$970,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Crime Laboratory I-5 Corridor Consolidated Facility (30000290)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign.

(2) The predesign must include:

(a) An assessment of current forensic services operations, including volumes processed by sample type (e.g., DNA, material analysis, firearms, latent prints), locations from which evidentiary samples and materials were sent to the lab, how samples are processed, how results are delivered, and other duties conducted by forensic services staff as part of their operations that impact availability for forensic analysis including, but not limited to, evidence collection and testimony;

(b) An evaluation of a consolidated lab model compared to distributed lab models, including an examination of advantages and disadvantages associated with each model, which model is preferred, and why. The evaluation should include an analysis on the impacts of the factors listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, including the impacts on the delivery of samples and materials to the lab and staffing impacts, including for responsibilities such as testimony and evidence collection;

(c) An evaluation of state-owned compared to leased lab approach, including costs associated with each approach, the anticipated source of funds for each option, which approach is preferred, and why; and

(d) A projected volume of evidentiary samples able to be processed in the preferred alternative and a comparison to the current processing model.

(3) The predesign must align with the most recent master plan.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$333,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$333,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2021 c 332 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($385,701,000))

$385,645,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($387,230,000))

$387,174,000

Sec. 5002. 2021 c 332 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers - Minor Works (30000187)

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—Bonds—State
. . . .
(($521,000))

$512,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$2,991,000

Sec. 5003. 2021 c 332 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The reappropriation is subject to provisions of section 5002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.))

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for grant funding to the Bremerton school district to complete the design of the expansion phase of the West Sound technical skills center modernization project.

(2) In coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Bremerton school district's West Sound technical skills center must: (a) Ensure the career and technical programs planned for in the design of the skills center support high-demand and high-wage sector program needs; (b) ensure that space needs are reasonable and appropriate for the programs planned and enrollment projections; (c) evaluate the proposed project budget using value engineering and life-cycle cost analysis techniques; and (d) use this information to inform the proposed design.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$274,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$226,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$86,791,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,000))

$91,343,000

Sec. 5004. 2021 c 332 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Construction Assistance Program (40000034)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($727,780,000))$537,844,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) $2,836,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($702,657,000))

$505,306,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($24,959,000))

$29,374,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$6,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($730,616,000))

$540,680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,899,490,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,630,106,000))

$4,440,170,000

Sec. 5005. 2021 c 332 s 5018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000039)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for a modernization grant to the Mount Adams school district to complete the replacement of Harrah Elementary School.

(2)(a) (($21,795,000))$33,795,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation ((and $12,000,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation in this section are))is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts with total enrollments of 1,000 students or less with significant building system deficiencies and limited financial capacity as approved by the superintendent of public instruction's small district modernization grant advisory committee.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee, to the legislature by January 15, 2023. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $5,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources.

(3) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts with enrollments of 1,000 students or less interested in seeking modernization grants. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for school districts with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $5,000,000 or less.

(4)(a) $4,218,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state tribal compact schools. The superintendent may prioritize planning grants for state tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a prioritized list of state-tribal compact school modernization projects to the legislature by January 15, 2023. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the planning grant amount; and (iii) estimated total project costs.

(5) The appropriated funds in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1.1-CD-2021, developed April 15, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($30,113,000))

$42,113,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$12,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$42,113,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$290,592,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$332,705,000

Sec. 5006. 2021 c 332 s 5019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000040)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: In addition to the conditions and limitations specified in section 7019 of this act, no skill center shall receive funding for more than two minor works projects within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,556,000))

$3,388,000

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,832,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,388,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,388,000

Sec. 5007. 2021 c 332 s 5023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School District Health and Safety (40000052)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $643,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and (($1,357,000))$3,057,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $965,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation((, $2,035,000))and $3,228,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation((, and $1,193,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation)) in this section are provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $200,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $322,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and $678,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$1,193,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,930,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,070,000))

$6,963,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,193,000))

$8,893,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$52,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($59,193,000))

$60,893,000

Sec. 5008. 2021 c 332 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (40000054)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for school seismic safety retrofit planning grants to school districts. The superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize planning grants for school districts with the most significant building deficiencies and the greatest seismic risks as determined by the most recent geological data and building engineering assessments, beginning with facilities classified as very high risk.

(2) (($38,000,000))$74,686,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for school seismic safety retrofit grants to school districts for seismic retrofits and seismic safety related improvements of school buildings used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through 12th grade. The superintendent of public instruction must prioritize school seismic safety retrofit grants for school districts with the most significant building deficiencies and the greatest seismic risks as determined by the school seismic safety retrofit planning grants established in subsection (1) of this section, beginning with facilities classified as very high risk.

(3) In the development of school seismic safety retrofit projects, the superintendent of public instruction shall consider the following: (a) Prioritizing student instructional spaces and facilities that improve communities' emergency response capacity, including school gymnasiums and school facilities that are capable of providing space for emergency shelter and response coordination; (b) the financial capacity of low property value school districts in the sizing of grant awards; (c) facilities' seismic needs in light of the useful life of the facilities; and (d) the extent to which the cost of the proposed seismic improvements are less than the estimated costs of facility replacement or new construction.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($40,000,000))

$76,686,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($200,000,000))

$236,686,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools - T-12 Lighting (91000483)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to public schools, including charter schools and state-tribal education compact schools, for the removal, disposal, and replacement of T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured in or before 1979 with energy-efficient LED lighting. State grant funding provided under this section may be used for all school district, state-tribal education compact, and charter school buildings, but must be prioritized for buildings that are not under contract to be replaced or modernized. State grant funding provided under this section may only be expended after all applicable funding from utility company rebate programs available to schools in the state has been exhausted.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide information to state grant applicants under this section related to identifying the year of T-12 lighting fixture and ballast manufacture, which may include pertinent information developed by the United States environmental protection agency. In order to receive a state grant under this section, grant applicants must provide, as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, supporting documentation that includes: (a) The number of T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured before 1979 and after 1979 in their facilities; and (b) the age and primary use of each facility where the T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts under (a) of this subsection are located. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to administer this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

Sec. 5010. 2021 c 332 s 5038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Distressed Schools (92000917)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a 12-classroom addition at Green Lake Elementary School in Seattle public schools.

(2) $940,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Healthy Schools pilot to reduce exposure to air pollution and improve air quality in schools.

(3) $772,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a school-based health center at Spanaway Middle School.

(4) $12,993,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Almira school district to replace the Almira elementary school destroyed by fire. The appropriation must be combined with insurance proceeds to meet the project costs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of state funding under this section for this use.

(5) $2,850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Republic school district to complete design and renovation projects at Republic junior high school and Republic senior high school.

(6) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Nooksack valley school district for facilities improvements responding to flood damage and future flood risks. State funding provided under this subsection must be repaid to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to the extent that the Nooksack valley school district receives an insurance settlement or federal emergency management agency funding for flood damage and future flood risks.

(7) $515,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a facilities accessibility and security improvement project in the Wahkiakum school district.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,712,000))

$27,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,712,000))

$27,070,000

Sec. 5011. 2021 c 332 s 5039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

(2)(a) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the North Beach school district to complete needed seismic safety retrofits to the Pacific Beach elementary school gymnasium project as approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction's school seismic safety retrofit committee. With approval of the committee, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may allow funding to be used by the North Beach school district to replace and relocate the Pacific Beach elementary school campus and its facilities.

(b) The North Beach school district must provide sufficient local funding to pay for all associated costs of relocating and replacing the Pacific Beach elementary school campus and its facilities less the amount of the seismic retrofit grant funding approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction's school seismic safety retrofit committee.

(c) If the North Beach school district cannot demonstrate to the office of the superintendent of public instruction that a local match pursuant to (b) of this subsection has been secured by June 30, 2023, and the district does not proceed with the approved seismic safety retrofits to the Pacific Beach elementary school gymnasium, the appropriation in (a) of this subsection shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,190,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,561,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($13,240,000))

$21,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2022 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (92000925)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,951,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

SD Brewster School District. . . .$933,000

SD Creston School District. . . .$5,018,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,951,000

Sec. 5013. 2021 c 332 s 5044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($34,300,000))

$32,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,800,000

Sec. 5014. 2021 c 332 s 5046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Facility (40000038)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6042 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($200,750,000))

$206,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($234,000,000))

$240,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Clean Energy Testbeds (40000098)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to construct a modular dry room, perform electrical infrastructure upgrades, and purchase manufacturing equipment to establish an open-access battery fabrication testbed facility.

(2) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for capital equipment to enhance materials and imaging and analysis capabilities.

(3) The supporting operating costs for expanding the clean energy testbeds network are provided in the 2022 supplemental operating budget.

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

Sec. 5016. 2021 c 332 s 5051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$15,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($13,988,000))

$13,912,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,988,000

Sec. 5017. 2021 c 332 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$1,142,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,658,000))

$7,116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,258,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Pullman Student Success Center Phase 1 (40000339)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 5019. 2021 c 332 s 5070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($69,200,000))

$66,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,200,000))

$69,690,000

Sec. 5020. 2021 c 332 s 5083 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Health Education (40000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,505,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,700,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$57,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($60,505,000))

$62,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Grid Security (40000121)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Health and Counseling Center (30000614)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,362,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,742,000

Sec. 5023. 2021 c 332 s 5093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Preservation (40000034)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($3,580,000))

$2,580,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,945,000))

$2,945,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$77,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,025,000

Sec. 5024. 2021 c 332 s 5094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab II HVAC Upgrades (40000047)

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$4,000,000))

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Recreation and Athletic Center Critical Repairs (40000082)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Emergency Dispatch & Communication System Replacement (40000084)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 5027. 2021 c 332 s 5096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (91000031)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$107,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,966,000))

$4,859,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,866,000

Sec. 5028. 2021 c 332 s 5101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5089, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The University may pursue the living building challenge petal certification for this project instead of the LEED silver certification required by RCW 39.35D.030.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$51,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$52,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($53,000,000))

$54,500,000

Sec. 5029. 2021 c 332 s 5107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program 2021-2023 (30000918)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$557,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$8,557,000

Sec. 5030. 2021 c 332 s 5111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,186,000))

$6,579,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,986,000))

$8,379,000

Sec. 5031. 2021 c 332 s 5112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,777,000))

$4,731,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,177,000))

$9,131,000

Sec. 5032. 2021 c 332 s 5115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Preservation - Minor Works 2021-23 (40000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,500,000))

$3,553,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,144,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,298,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,798,000))

$12,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Complete HVAC Controls Replacement (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Garage and Emergency Exit Concrete Remediation (40000053)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$901,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$901,000

Sec. 5035. 2021 c 332 s 5153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (40000169)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,826,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,627,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($33,074,000))

$32,587,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($38,527,000))

$38,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure (40000431)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,796,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Olympic South Asbestos Abatement and Restoration (40000516)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,159,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,159,000

Sec. 5038. 2021 c 332 s 5170 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Yakima Sun Dome Reflectors (92000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($80,000))

$66,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$588,000

(End of part)

PART 6

RESERVED

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 7001. 2021 c 332 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are (($46,768,901))$46,810,631 for the 2021-2023 biennium, (($314,662,796))$324,599,260 for the 2023-2025 biennium, and (($447,088,148))466,702,535 for the 2025-2027 biennium.

Sec. 7002. 2021 c 332 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $119,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,706,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $115,700,000 plus costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor College for up to $3,200,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student services and instructional building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $3,128,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an allied health, science, and manufacturing replacement building.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a health education building.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bates Technical College for up to $1,350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and facilities.

(7) The department of ecology: ((Submit a financing contract proposal to fully fund the Lacey headquarters parking garage preservation project, including financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, in the department's 2022 supplemental capital budget request))Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,797,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Lacey headquarters parking garage preservation project.

Sec. 7003. 2021 c 332 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Executive Order No. 21-02, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective ((November 10, 2005))April 7, 2021. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of projects on cultural resources and historic properties proposed in state-funded construction or acquisition projects, including grant or pass-through funding that culminates in construction or land acquisitions. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated early in the project planning process, prior to construction or taking title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. A new section is added to 2021 c 332 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The public works board created in RCW 43.155.030 shall develop recommendations for a program design and administration, including but not limited to, prioritization and selection criteria, operation, and funding structure and levels for the types of innovative infrastructure projects that conserve water and energy, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, or reduce pollution and waste with a focus on those projects that achieve multiple benefits. In developing recommendations, the public works board shall, at a minimum, collaborate with the interagency, multijurisdictional system improvement team established by RCW 43.155.150, the department of commerce's state energy office, the industrial waste coordination program established by RCW 43.31.625, and local governments to evaluate barriers and gaps in incentives and funding for advancing innovative systems and technologies in public infrastructure that promote community and ecosystem resilience. Examples of innovative project types that should be addressed by the program include water reuse or reclaimed water systems, projects that integrate energy generation or water collection from waste products, and projects that reduce pollution discharges, treat or store water through green, or nature-based, infrastructure. The public works board shall provide recommendations to the governor's office, office of financial management, the senate ways and means committee and the house capital budget committee by October 1, 2022.

Sec. 7005. 2021 c 332 s 7020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For

transfer to the drinking water assistance account,

up to $5,500,000 for fiscal year 2022 and up to

(($5,500,000))$14,900,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$20,400,000

(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For

transfer to the water pollution control revolving

account, up to $7,500,000 for fiscal year 2022 and

up to (($7,500,000))$10,500,000 for fiscal year

2023
. . . .
(($15,000,000))

$18,000,000

(3) Public Works Assistance Account: For

transfer to the statewide broadband account, up to

$7,000,000 for fiscal year 2022 and up to $7,000,000

for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$14,000,000

(4) Capital Community Assistance Account: For

transfer to the apple homes and health account,

$100,000,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$100,000,000

Sec. 7006. 2021 c 332 s 7041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of enterprise services shall convene a construction industry work group to recommend how to apply successful carbon reduction strategies, incorporate necessary parameters of design and construction considerations, and allow for efficient and cost effective state construction projects. The work group must be comprised of construction industry professionals as recommended by a leading association on Washington business in design, specification, construction, and material supply and construction professionals that have successfully realized real and measurable results. The work group must also include a representative from the department of enterprise services, representatives from environmental groups, and someone of applicable expertise from the Washington academy of sciences.

(2) The work group shall identify and recommend carbon reduction strategies and environmental product declaration principles to successfully apply in state construction projects and:

(a) Clarify the definition of environmental product declaration to ensure that environmental product declarations (EPD) are applied properly, consistently, and as intended and provide a baseline of understanding based on accepted metrics to obtain measurable results for state construction projects;

(b) Suggest a pilot project or project review to apply construction industry recommendations and create an education and standards brief that accompanies the report required under subsection (3) of this section;

(c) Outline the environmental project review data collection process in functional detail and use existing data gathering resources such as EC3; and

(d) Identify measurable outcome criteria to establish a project baseline summary for use during design from estimated project material quantities using industry average environmental product declarations.

(3) The work group shall provide their recommendations in a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((January 1, 2022))June 30, 2022.

(d) Identify measurable outcome criteria to establish a project baseline summary for use during design from estimated project material quantities using industry average environmental product declarations; and

(e) Identify sustainable and low-carbon emitting building materials, including but not limited to, aggregate and recycled concrete materials, as described in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The work group shall provide their recommendations in a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

(4)(a) The legislature continues to prioritize Washington state's sustainability goals and reaffirms its determination that recyclable construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled. The legislature further finds that the reuse of construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials into construction projects is known to:

(i) Reduce the need for consumption of new construction aggregate materials and conserves existing aggregate resources;

(ii) Encourages reuse and recycling, reduces waste, and discourages landfilling of readily available natural resources;

(iii) Reduces truck trips and related transportation emissions; and

(iv) Reduces greenhouse gases related to the construction of state funded construction projects, reduce embodied energy, and improve and advance the sustainable principles and practices of Washington state.

(b) These recyclable materials have well established markets, are substantially a primary or secondary product of necessary construction processes and production, as a commodity substantially meets widely recognized international, national, and local standards and specifications, and are managed as an item of commercial value.

Sec. 7007. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2020 c 168 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The state drought preparedness and response account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and all cost recovery revenues collected under RCW 43.83B.410(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used for drought preparedness and response activities under this chapter, including grants issued under RCW 43.83B.415. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the state drought preparedness and response account created in RCW 43.83B.430 for activities related to water banking.

Sec. 7008. RCW 43.155.050 and 2021 c 334 s 979 and 2021 c 332 s 7031 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the aviation revitalization board. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for projects identified in section 1035 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. The energy efficiency revolving loan capitalization account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the state from the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization grant program created in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) must be deposited into the account. The account may also receive legislative transfers and appropriations and all other revenues directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to make grants or loans, and to provide technical assistance, to conduct energy audits and to implement audit strategies to increase the energy efficiency of residential and commercial buildings and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---