BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.380 and 2018 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The minimum monthly salary paid to state patrol troopers and sergeants must be competitive with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington, guided by the results of a survey undertaken in the collective bargaining process during each biennium. The salary levels must be guided by the average of compensation paid to the corresponding rank from the Seattle police department, King county sheriff's office, Tacoma police department, Snohomish county sheriff's office, Spokane police department, and Vancouver police department. Compensation must be calculated using base salary, premium pay (a pay received by more than a majority of employees), education pay, and longevity pay. The compensation comparison data is based on the Washington state patrol and the law enforcement agencies listed in this section. Increases in salary levels for captains and lieutenants that are collectively bargained must be proportionate to the increases in salaries for troopers and sergeants as a result of the survey described in this section.

(2) By December 1, 2024, as part of the salary survey required in this section, the office of financial management must report to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature on the efficacy of Washington state patrol recruitment and retention efforts. Using the results of the 2016 salary survey as the baseline data, the report must include an analysis of voluntary resignations of state patrol troopers and sergeants and a comparison of state patrol academy class sizes and trooper graduations.

(((3) This section expires June 30, 2025.))

--- END ---