BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"License plate" means a plate that may be issued to a vehicle owner by the department or by an authorized entity for vehicle licensing or identification purposes. "License plates" do not include: (1) Temporary license plates; or (2) metal tags issued for the purposes of licensing wheeled all-terrain vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Temporary license plate" means a plate or placard that may be issued to a vehicle owner by the department or by an authorized entity for the purposes of temporary vehicle licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Temporary operating authority" means a paper or electronic credential issued under chapter 46.87 RCW that conforms with the international registration plan requirements for temporary evidence of apportioned registration.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16A.300 and 2010 c 161 s 415 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may authorize vehicle dealers properly licensed under chapters 46.09, 46.10, and 46.70 RCW to issue temporary ((permits))license plates as described in RCW 46.16A.305 to operate vehicles under rules adopted by the department.

(2) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect the fee required under RCW 46.17.400(1)(a) for each temporary ((permit))license plate application sold to an authorized vehicle dealer.

(3) The payment of vehicle license fees to an authorized dealer is considered payment to the state of Washington.

(4) The department shall provide access to a secure system that allows temporary ((permits))license plates issued by vehicle dealers properly licensed under chapters 46.09, 46.10, and 46.70 RCW to be generated and printed on demand. By July 1, ((2011))2023, all such ((permits))plates must be generated using the designated system.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.16A.305 and 2010 c 161 s 416 and 2010 c 8 s 9011 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director may grant a temporary ((permit))license plate to operate a vehicle for which an application for registration has been made. The application for a temporary ((permit))license plate must be made by the owner or the owner's representative to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished by the department and must contain:

(a) A full description of the vehicle, including its make, model, vehicle identification number, and type of body;

(b) The name and address of the applicant;

(c) The date of application; and

(d) Other information that the department may require.

(2) Temporary ((permits))license plates must:

(a) Be consecutively numbered;

(b) Be displayed ((where it is visible from outside of the vehicle, such as on the inside left side of the rear window))as described for permanent license plates in RCW 46.16A.200(5)(a); ((and))

(c) Be composed of material that must be durable and remain unaltered in field conditions for a minimum of four months; and

(d) Remain on the vehicle only until the receipt of permanent license plates.

(3) The application must be accompanied by the fee required under RCW 46.17.400(1)(b).

(4) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the department may adopt rules for the design and display of temporary license plates.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.17.400 and 2011 c 171 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for one of the following permits or temporary license plates, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay the following permit or temporary license plate fee by permit or license type in addition to any other fee or tax required by law:

PERMIT OR LICENSE TYPE

FEE

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary license plate

$

15.00

RCW 46.16A.300

RCW 46.68.030

(b) Department temporary license plate

$

.50

RCW 46.16A.305

RCW 46.68.450

(c) Farm vehicle trip

$

6.25

RCW 46.16A.330

RCW 46.68.035

(d) Nonresident military

$

10.00

RCW 46.16A.340

RCW 46.68.070

(e) Nonresident temporary snowmobile

$

5.00

RCW 46.10.450

RCW 46.68.350

(f) Special fuel trip

$

30.00

RCW 82.38.100

RCW 46.68.460

(g) Temporary ORV use

$

7.00

RCW 46.09.430

RCW 46.68.045

(h) Vehicle trip

$

25.00

RCW 46.16A.320

RCW 46.68.455

(2) Permit or temporary license plate fees as provided in subsection (1) of this section are in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, except an additional filing fee may not be charged for:

(a) Dealer temporary ((permits))license plates;

(b) Special fuel trip permits; and

(c) Vehicle trip permits.

(3) Five dollars of the fifteen dollar dealer temporary ((permit))license plate fee provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section must be credited to the payment of vehicle license fees at the time application for registration is made. The remainder must be deposited to the state patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.68.450 and 2010 c 161 s 814 are each amended to read as follows:

The department temporary ((permit))license plate fee imposed under RCW 46.17.400(1)(b) must be distributed as follows:

(1) If collected by the department, the fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.030; and

(2) If collected by the county auditor or other agent or subagent, the fee must be distributed to the county current expense fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect July 1, 2023.

--- END ---