BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

By December 1, 2023, the Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules providing for reviewing and vacating reprimands issued to persons with certificates or permits authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Beginning within 90 days of the adoption of the rules, the superintendent of public instruction shall make reasonable efforts to contact each person with a certificate or permit authorized under chapters 28A.410 and 28A.405 RCW, who was issued a reprimand between January 1, 2007, and the date of adoption of the rules, and whose reprimand is eligible for vacating under the rules.

(2) By July 1, 2025, and in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with an update on the progress made towards meeting the requirement in subsection (1) of this section and on the number of people with a certificate or permit authorized under chapters 28A.410 and 28A.405 RCW who have had a reprimand vacated under the rules.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "rules" means rules providing for reviewing and vacating reprimands adopted as required by section 1 of this act.

(4) This section expires on June 30, 2026.

--- END ---