BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

The authority shall dedicate at least one full-time employee to:

(1) Connecting families, behavioral health providers, educators, and other stakeholders with current information about law and policy related to behavioral health services for minors;

(2) Creating shareable content appropriate for communicating policy and resources related to behavioral health services for minors;

(3) Designing and maintaining a communications plan related to behavioral health services for minors involving social media and other forms of direct outreach to providers, families, and youth; and

(4) Monitoring the health care authority website to make sure that the information included on the website is accurate and designed in a manner that is accessible to families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall convene stakeholders to design, further define, and implement a parent portal. The stakeholders convened under this section must include parents, caregivers, youth, and young adults.

(2) As used in this section, "parent portal" means a method for connecting families to their community's service and education infrastructure related to behavioral health services for minors, including services supported or provided by:

(a) A behavioral health provider as defined in RCW 71.24.025 that provides services to minors;

(b) A licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025 that provides behavioral health services to minors;

(c) A long-term care facility as defined in RCW 43.190.020 in which minors with behavioral health conditions reside;

(d) The child study and treatment center as identified in RCW 71.34.380;

(e) A facility or agency that receives state funding to provide behavioral health treatment services to minors with a behavioral health condition;

(f) The department of children, youth, and families;

(g) The office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(h) The department.

(3) By November 1, 2022, the authority shall provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature detailing:

(a) The stakeholder engagement conducted under this section;

(b) The design and further definition of the parent portal; and

(c) Other relevant information about successfully implementing the parent portal, including needed legislative changes or support.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.34.3871 and 2019 c 381 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority must conduct ((an annual survey of a sample group of))stakeholder engagement efforts with parents, youth, and behavioral health providers to measure the impacts of implementing policies resulting from chapter 381, Laws of 2019 during the first three years of implementation and sections 1 and 2 of this act. The stakeholder engagement efforts required under this subsection must include live events soliciting feedback from stakeholders and alternative methods for stakeholders to submit feedback. The first ((survey))stakeholder engagement efforts must be complete by ((July 1, 2020))October 1, 2022, followed by subsequent annual ((surveys))stakeholder engagement efforts completed by July 1, ((2021))2023, and by July 1, ((2022))2024. The authority must report on the results of the ((surveys))stakeholder engagement efforts annually to the governor and the legislature beginning November 1, ((2020))2022. The final report is due November 1, ((2022))2024, and must include any recommendations for statutory changes identified as needed based on ((survey))stakeholder engagement efforts results.

(2) This section expires December 31, ((2022))2024.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.40.040 and 2021 c 202 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The state office of behavioral health consumer advocacy shall assure performance of the following activities, as authorized in contract:

(1) Selection of a name for the contracting advocacy organization to use for the advocacy program that it operates pursuant to contract with the office. The name must be selected by the statewide advisory council established in this section and must be separate and distinguishable from that of the office;

(2) Certification of behavioral health consumer advocates by October 1, 2022, and coordination of the activities of the behavioral health consumer advocates throughout the state according to standards adopted by the office;

(3) Provision of training regarding appropriate access by behavioral health consumer advocates to behavioral health providers or facilities according to standards adopted by the office;

(4) Establishment of a toll-free telephone number, website, and other appropriate technology to facilitate access to contracting advocacy organization services for patients, residents, and clients of behavioral health providers or facilities;

(5) Establishment of a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data relating to complaints and conditions provided by behavioral health providers or facilities for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant problems, with permission to submit the data to all appropriate state agencies on a regular basis;

(6) Establishment of procedures consistent with the standards adopted by the office to protect the confidentiality of the office's records, including the records of patients, residents, clients, providers, and complainants;

(7) Establishment of a statewide advisory council, a majority of which must be composed of people with lived experience, that shall include:

(a) Individuals with a history of mental illness including one or more members from the black community, the indigenous community, or a community of color;

(b) Individuals with a history of substance use disorder including one or more members from the black community, the indigenous community, or a community of color;

(c) Family members of individuals with behavioral health needs including one or more members from the black community, the indigenous community, or a community of color;

(d) One or more representatives of an organization representing consumers of behavioral health services;

(e) Representatives of behavioral health providers and facilities, including representatives of facilities offering inpatient and residential behavioral health services;

(f) One or more certified peer specialists;

(g) One or more medical clinicians serving individuals with behavioral health needs;

(h) One or more nonmedical providers serving individuals with behavioral health needs;

(i) One representative from a behavioral health administrative services organization;

(j) Two parents or caregivers of a child who received behavioral health services, including one parent or caregiver of a child who received complex, multisystem behavioral health services, one parent or caregiver of a child ages one through 12, or one parent or caregiver of a child ages 13 through 17;

(k) Two representatives of medicaid managed care organizations, one of which must provide managed care to children and youth receiving child welfare services;

(l) Other community representatives, as determined by the office; and

(((k)))(m) One representative from a labor union representing workers who work in settings serving individuals with behavioral health conditions;

(8) Monitoring the development of and recommend improvements in the implementation of federal, state, and local laws, rules, regulations, and policies with respect to the provision of behavioral health services in the state and advocate for consumers;

(9) Development and delivery of educational programs and information statewide to patients, residents, and clients of behavioral health providers or facilities, and their families on topics including, but not limited to, the execution of mental health advance directives, wellness recovery action plans, crisis services and contacts, peer services and supports, family advocacy and rights, family-initiated treatment and other behavioral health service options for minors, and involuntary treatment; and

(10) Reporting to the office, the legislature, and all appropriate public agencies regarding the quality of services, complaints, problems for individuals receiving services from behavioral health providers or facilities, and any recommendations for improved services for behavioral health consumers.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.40.090 and 2021 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The contracting advocacy organization shall develop and submit, for approval by the office, a process to train and certify all behavioral health consumer advocates, whether paid or volunteer, authorized by this chapter as follows:

(1) Certified behavioral health consumer advocates must have training or experience in the following areas:

(a) Behavioral health and other related social services programs, including behavioral health services for minors;

(b) The legal system, including differences in state or federal law between voluntary and involuntary patients, residents, or clients;

(c) Advocacy and supporting self-advocacy;

(d) Dispute or problem resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation, and negotiation; and

(e) All applicable patient, resident, and client rights established by either state or federal law.

(2) A certified behavioral health consumer advocate may not have been employed by any behavioral health provider or facility within the previous twelve months, except as a certified peer specialist or where prior to July 25, 2021, the person has been employed by a regional behavioral health consumer advocate.

(3) No certified behavioral health consumer advocate or any member of a certified behavioral health consumer advocate's family may have, or have had, within the previous twelve months, any significant ownership or financial interest in the provision of behavioral health services.

--- END ---