BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that African American studies is a multidisciplinary academic field primarily devoted to the study, politics, culture, achievements, history, characteristics, and issues of people of African descent in North America. The legislature acknowledges that this field of study challenges the sociohistorical and cultural content and definition of western ideology and argues for a multicultural, rather than a eurocentric, interpretation of the western hemisphere. The legislature realizes that efforts to integrate African American studies into social studies curriculum and mainstream education in the United States date back to 1915.

(2)(a) The legislature finds that legislation enacted in 2020 directed the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a work group to develop recommendations for integrating, on a regular and ongoing basis, African American history, examinations of racism, and the history of the civil rights movement into existing social studies curriculum provided to students in grades seven through 12. One of the work group's recommendations is for the state to establish an endorsement program in African American studies for educators teaching grades seven through 12.

(b) The legislature also finds that legislation enacted in 2021 directed the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through 12.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to create an African American studies specialty endorsement and to direct the Washington professional educator standards board to develop essential learnings for the endorsement that are aligned with the framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through 12 that is being developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The African American studies specialty endorsement is created for educators with valid administrator certificates, valid educational staff associate certificates, and valid and endorsed teacher certificates.

(2)(a) By November 1, 2023, the Washington professional educator standards board must adopt rules for the essential learnings for the African American studies specialty endorsement. The essential learnings must describe the specific knowledge and skills that an educator is expected to master to obtain the specialty endorsement, for example: (i) Connects history, culture, and contributions of African Americans from precolonial Africa to contemporary America through historical, interdisciplinary, and intersectional lenses; (ii) uses culturally responsive practices and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge; and (iii) demonstrates ability to tailor curriculum to teach African American studies across urban, suburban, and rural settings.

(b) The standards or essential learnings must be aligned with the framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through 12, developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction as required by section 501(4)(o), chapter 334, Laws of 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The Washington professional educator standards board must convene a work group to advise and make recommendations to the Washington professional educator standards board regarding the essential learnings for the African American studies specialty endorsement described in section 2 of this act.

(2) The work group must include representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, a state association of school principals, a state association of public educators and other organizations representing educators, students, families, and the African American community. The work group must consult with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee created in RCW 28A.300.136 and the Washington state commission on African American affairs created in RCW 43.113.010.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2024.

--- END ---