BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a body worn camera grant program. The purpose of the program is to assist law enforcement agencies to establish and expand body worn camera programs.

(2) Grants may be used by law enforcement agencies for: (a) The initial purchase, maintenance, and replacement of body worn cameras; (b) ongoing costs related to the maintenance and storage of data recorded by body worn cameras; (c) costs associated with public records requests for body worn camera footage; and (d) hiring of personnel necessary to operate a body worn camera program.

(3) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a grant application process and review applications from agencies based on locally developed proposals to establish or expand body worn camera programs.

(4) Law enforcement agencies that are awarded grants must:

(a) Comply with the provisions of chapter 10.109 RCW;

(b) Demonstrate the ability to redact body worn camera footage consistent with RCW 42.56.240 and other applicable provisions;

(c) Provide training to officers who will wear body worn cameras and other personnel associated with implementation of the body worn camera program; and

(d) Agree to comply with any data collection and reporting requirements that are established by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must submit an annual report regarding the grant program to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year the program is funded. The report must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(6) Nothing in this section prohibits the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs from soliciting or accepting private funds to support the program created in this section.

(7) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to create an obligation to continue any body worn camera program or policy beyond the period covered by the grant.

--- END ---