BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. The legislature recognizes that Washington has a historic budget surplus due to rising revenue forecasts, federal spending on pandemic-related relief, and lower enrollments and caseloads. The legislature finds that it can provide tax relief without jeopardizing important government services, and that the current inflationary environment justifies doing so at this time. According to the United States bureau of labor statistics, Washington state inflation exceeded the national average over the last year at 6.5 percent, relative to 6.2 percent nationally. Food prices were up 7.9 percent, including a 22 percent increase in the price of meat, poultry, fish, and eggs. Energy prices and gas prices are up, impacting both consumers and producers. In November of 2021, inflation rose at the fastest pace since 1982. Economist Milton Friedman is reported to have said "inflation is taxation without legislation." Inflation is also a tax that is highly regressive, falling harder on the poor than the wealthy, because low-income people are more likely to rent their homes and therefore less likely to benefit from price gains in hard assets that occur in an inflationary environment. The legislature finds that state tax policy should respond to this mix of historic budget surplus and historic levels of inflation that is eroding the purchasing power of working families. Therefore, the legislature intends to cut taxes on the producers of consumer goods and key supply chain industries so they can pass along cost savings to consumers and make capital investments to increase their output, which will reduce prices through increased supply.

Sec. 102. RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the products, including by-products, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.2904 percent.

The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 103. RCW 82.04.240 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 518 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products, including by-products, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.2904 percent.

(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.165 percent. For the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (2) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

(4) This section expires January 1, 2024, unless the contingency in RCW 82.32.790(2) occurs.

Sec. 104. RCW 82.04.2404 and 2021 c 145 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.165 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.

(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) Any person who has claimed the preferential tax rate under this section must reimburse the department for fifty percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if the number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than ninety percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the preferential tax rate is claimed.

(5) This section expires December 1, 2028.

Sec. 105. RCW 82.04.260 and 2021 c 145 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing((:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, from July 1, 2025, until January 1, 2036, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products; and

(e) Wood))wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, or field residue and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5)))(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent through June 30, 2019, and 0.9 percent beginning July 1, 2019.

(((6)))(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(((7)))(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(((8)))(7)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 70A.380.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 70A.384 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(((9)))(8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(((10)))(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(((11)))(10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007, through March 31, 2020; and

(iii) Beginning April 1, 2020, 0.484 percent, subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (((11)))(10). The tax rate in this subsection (((11)))(10)(a)(iii) applies to all business activities described in this subsection (((11)))(10)(a).

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11)))(10) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.2904 percent through March 31, 2020; and

(ii) Beginning April 1, 2020, the following rates, which are subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (((11)))(10):

(A) The rate under RCW 82.04.250(1) on the business of making retail sales of tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and

(B) 0.484 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (((11)))(10)(b).

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11)))(10), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d)(i) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((11)))(10) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534. However, this requirement does not apply to persons reporting under the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (((11)))(10), so long as that rate remains 0.484 percent, or under any of the tax rates in (b)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (((11)))(10), so long as those tax rates remain the rate imposed pursuant to RCW 82.04.250(1) and 0.484 percent, respectively.

(ii) Nothing in (d)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) may be construed as affecting the obligation of a person reporting under a tax rate provided in this subsection (((11)))(10) to file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534: (A) Pursuant to another provision of this title as a result of claiming a tax credit or exemption; or (B) pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) as a result of claiming the tax rates in (a)(ii) or (b)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) for periods ending before April 1, 2020.

(e)(i) After March 31, 2021, the tax rates under (a)(iii) and (b)(ii) of this subsection (((11)))(10) must be reduced to 0.357 percent provided the conditions in RCW 82.04.2602 are met. The effective date of the rates authorized under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least sixty days after the department receives the last of the two written notices pursuant to RCW 82.04.2602 (3) and (4).

(ii) Both a significant commercial airplane manufacturer separately and the rest of the aerospace industry as a whole, receiving the rate of 0.357 percent under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e) are subject to the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates required under RCW 49.04.220 by April 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.

(iii) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this subsection (((11)))(10)(e).

(f)(i) Except as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection (((11)))(10), this subsection (((11)))(10) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (((11)))(10) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (((11)))(10)(f)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850. This subsection (((11)))(10)(f)(ii) continues to apply during the time that a person is subject to the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (((11)))(10).

(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "a significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least fifty thousand full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.

(((12)))(11)(a) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and ((0.2904))0.2384 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.

(b) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; or (iii) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1); as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and ((0.2904))0.2384 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.

(c) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; or (iv) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, wood products, or products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and ((0.2904))0.2384 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.

(d) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.2904))0.2384 percent. For purposes of this subsection (((12)))(11)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12)))(11)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((12)))(11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(g) Nothing in this subsection (((12)))(11) may be construed to affect the taxation of any activity defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c), defined as a wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060(2), or taxed under RCW 82.04.280(1)(g).

(((13)))(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(((14)))(13)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((14)))(13) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 106. RCW 82.16.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after the business, as follows:

(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three and six-tenths percent;

(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths percent;

(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;

(d) Urban transportation business: ((Six-tenths of one))0.24 percent;

(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats, operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;

(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned above: ((One and eight-tenths of one))0.72 percent;

(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;

(h) Log transportation business: ((One and twenty-eight one- hundredths))0.512 percent. The reduced rate established in this subsection (1)(h) is not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage collection businesses must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2023, and thereafter in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec. 107. RCW 82.04.4266 and 2020 c 139 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or

(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) For purposes of this section, "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(((4) This section expires July 1, 2025.))

Sec. 108. RCW 82.04.4268 and 2020 c 139 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax, the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing dairy products; or

(b) Selling dairy products manufactured by the seller to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(2) (("Dairy products" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.260))For purposes of this section, "dairy products" means:

(a) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(b) Products comprised of not less than 70 percent dairy products that qualify under (a) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(((4) This section expires July 1, 2025.))

Sec. 109. RCW 82.04.4269 and 2020 c 139 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or

(b) Selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(((3) This section expires July 1, 2025.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) The business of slaughtering, breaking, or processing perishable meat products or selling perishable meat products at wholesale only and not at retail;

(b) The business of manufacturing wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil.

(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

PART II

Sec. 201. RCW 82.32.790 and 2019 c 449 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1)(a) Section ((2))103, chapter . . ., Laws of 2022 (section 103 of this act), section 1, chapter 449, Laws of 2019, sections 510, 512, 514, 516, 518, 520, 522, and 524, chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., sections 9, 13, 17, 22, 24, 30, 32, and 45, chapter 135, Laws of 2017, sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, and sections 1, 2, 3, and 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington by January 1, 2024.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.

(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.

(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.

(2) The sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section take effect the first day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, if the contract is signed and received by January 1, 2024, as determined by the director of the department of revenue.

(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the effective date of the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been signed and the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section are effective, the department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.426, 82.04.448, 82.08.965, 82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, or 84.36.645. The department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding the effective date of the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(4)(a) This section expires January 1, 2024, if the contingency in subsection (2) of this section does not occur by January 1, 2024, as determined by the department.

(b) The department must provide written notice of the expiration date of this section and the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 202. RCW 49.04.220 and 2020 c 165 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) A significant commercial airplane manufacturer receiving the rate of 0.357 percent under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e) is subject to an aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate of one and five-tenths percent of its qualified apprenticeable workforce in Washington by July 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.

(2) The aerospace industry in Washington, excluding a significant commercial airplane manufacturer, is subject to an aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate of one and five-tenths percent of its qualified apprenticeable workforce in Washington by July 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.

(3) Aerospace employers must report relevant occupation data related to the qualified apprenticeable workforce to the department of labor and industries.

(4) The department of labor and industries shall report the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate to the department (([of revenue]))of revenue and the appropriate committees of the legislature annually beginning October 1, 2024.

(5) The department of labor and industries shall determine aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates under this section based on the framework developed under RCW 49.04.210 and using occupational data reported to the department of labor and industries and/or the employment security department. For data reported to the department of labor and industries, the department of labor and industries shall determine the form and manner in which occupational data is reported, consistent with the framework developed under RCW 49.04.210, and may adopt rules to ensure full participation within the industry necessary to implement the requirements of this section. The department of labor and industries, consulting with the department of revenue, may also require additional information on the annual tax performance report under RCW 82.32.534. The department of labor and industries may adopt rules to ensure full participation within the industry and necessary to implement the requirements of this section.

(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.

(a) "Aerospace employer" means any person that qualifies for the rate under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e) with twenty-five or more employees in positions determined to be qualified occupations by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to this chapter (( 49.04 RCW)) directly applicable to the production of commercial aircraft.

(b) "Qualified apprenticeable workforce" means all occupations approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to this chapter (( 49.04 RCW)) directly applicable to the production of commercial aircraft.

(c) "Significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least fifty thousand full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.

Sec. 203. RCW 82.04.250 and 2014 c 97 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10) or subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person classified by the federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 204. RCW 82.04.2602 and 2020 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
The rate of 0.357 percent authorized pursuant to RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e) may be imposed only if the following conditions are met:

(1) The department of commerce verifies with the United States trade representative that the United States and the European Union have entered into a written agreement that resolves any world trade organization disputes involving large civil aircraft.

(2) Such agreement expressly allows a business and occupation tax rate reduction for commercial airplane manufacturers to 0.357 percent or less.

(3) The department of commerce notifies the department in writing that the conditions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section are met and provides a copy of the agreement between the United States and the European Union or other document providing for the business and occupation tax rate reduction to the department.

(4) The department of labor and industries notifies the department in writing that a significant commercial airplane manufacturer has at least a three-tenths of one percent aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate of its qualified apprenticeable workforce in Washington, as defined in RCW 49.04.220.

(5) Within thirty days of receiving the last of the written notices described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the department must provide written notice to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department, that the tax rates in RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e) are reduced to 0.357 percent and the effective date of the rate reduction.

(6) Any rate reduction to 0.357 percent pursuant to this section and RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least sixty days after the department receives the last of the written notices described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(7) For the purpose of this section, "world trade organization disputes involving large civil airplanes" means any disputes filed by the United States or the European Union prior to March 25, 2020, that involve either allegations of subsidies to large civil airplanes, or allegations of taxes imposed by Washington on commercial airplanes, or both.

Sec. 205. RCW 82.04.261 and 2021 c 145 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))(11), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))(11). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(((12)))(11) (a), (b), (c), and (d).

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405, with any receipts above eight million dollars per biennium specifically used as additional funding for tribal participation grants.

(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if:

(i) Before July 1, 2024, receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million five hundred thousand dollars during any fiscal biennium;

(ii) Between July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2029, receipts from the surcharge total at least nine million dollars during any fiscal biennium; and

(iii) After June 30, 2029, the receipts from the surcharge total at least nine million five hundred thousand dollars during any fiscal biennium.

(b) The suspension of the surcharge under this subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total the values specified in this subsection (3) during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2045.

Sec. 206. RCW 82.04.290 and 2020 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing qualifying international investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 1.75 percent; or

(ii) 1.5 percent for:

(A) Any person subject to the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.299;

(B) Any person whose gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2), for the immediately preceding calendar year, was less than one million dollars, unless (I) the person is affiliated with one or more other persons, and (II) the aggregate gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2) for all affiliated persons was greater than or equal to one million dollars for the immediately preceding calendar year; and

(C) Hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020, including any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW. This subsection (2)(a)(ii)(C) must not be construed as modifying RCW 82.04.260(((10)))(9).

(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational, and promotional purposes is not considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and is not subject to taxation under this section.

(c) 14.3 percent of the revenues collected under (a)(i) of this subsection (2) must be deposited into the workforce education investment account created in RCW 43.79.195.

(d)(i) To aid in the effective administration of this subsection (2), the department may require a person claiming to be subject to the 1.5 percent tax rate under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2) to identify all of the person's affiliates, including their department tax registration number or unified business identifier number, as may be applicable, or to certify that the person is not affiliated with any other person. Requests under this subsection (2)(d)(i) must be in writing and may be made electronically.

(ii) If the department establishes, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, that a person, with intent to evade the additional taxes due under the 1.75 percent tax rate in (a)(i) of this subsection (2), failed to provide the department with complete and accurate information in response to a written request under (d)(i) of this subsection (2) within thirty days of such request, the person is ineligible for the 1.5 percent tax rate in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) for the entire current calendar year and the following four calendar years. However, the department must waive the provisions of this subsection (2)(d)(ii) for any tax reporting period that the person is otherwise eligible for the 1.5 percent tax rate in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) if (A) the department has not previously determined that the person failed to fully comply with (d)(i) of this subsection (2), and (B) within thirty days of the notice of additional tax due as a result of the person's failure to fully comply with (d)(i) of this subsection (2) the department determines that the person has come into full compliance with (d)(i) of this subsection (2). This subsection (2)(d) applies only with respect to persons claiming entitlement to the 1.5 percent tax rate solely by reason of (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2).

(e) For the purposes of (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2), if a taxpayer is subject to the reconciliation provisions of RCW 82.04.462(4), and calculates gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2) for the immediately preceding calendar year, or aggregate gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2) for the immediately preceding calendar year for all affiliated persons, based on incomplete information, the taxpayer must correct the reporting for the current calendar year when complete information for the immediately preceding calendar year is available.

(f) For purposes of this subsection (2), the definitions in this subsection (2)(f) apply:

(i) "Affiliate" means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person; and

(ii) "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of more than eighty percent of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise.

(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of performing aerospace product development for others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.9 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(c) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 207. RCW 82.04.298 and 2011 c 2 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for resale((, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4),)) to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one and one-half percent.

(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related goods for resale((, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4),)) to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.

(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:

(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW 82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or

(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative described in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.

(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise.

Sec. 208. RCW 82.04.334 and 2017 c 323 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in RCW 82.04.260(((12)))(11) apply to this section.

Sec. 209. RCW 82.04.440 and 2011 c 2 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298, inclusive, is taxable under each provision applicable to those activities.

(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270, 82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (((1)(b), (c), or (d), (4), (11),))(10) or (((12)))(11) with respect to selling products in this state, including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those products.

(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260 (((1)(b) or (12)))(11), including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.

(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (((1),)) (2), (((4), (11)))(10), or (((12)))(11), including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or manufacturing products in this state are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of those products.

(5) For the purpose of this section:

(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:

(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the tax an income tax or value added tax; and

(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately stated from the sales price.

(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2404, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (((1),)) (2), (((4), (11)))(10), and (((12)))(11), and 82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.

(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i) the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(((12)))(11); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.

(e) "Business," "manufacturer," "extractor," and other terms used in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through ((82.04.212 [82.04.217]))82.04.217, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 210. RCW 82.04.4463 and 2017 c 135 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the calendar year.

(2) The credit is equal to:

(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and

(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and

(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not within the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2) and are taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(b), or 82.04.250(3); or

(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used exclusively for aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (2) and are taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(b), or 82.04.250(3); and

(b) An amount equal to:

(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;

(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or

(C) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW 82.04.250(3) or 82.04.290(3), on computer hardware, computer peripherals, and software exempt under RCW 82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and acquired after June 30, 2008.

(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.

(A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable amount subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10) (a) or (b) on the applicable business activities of manufacturing commercial airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling specifically designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes.

(B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable amount subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW.

(C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of the fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable amount required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(((11)))(10) for manufacturing was not in effect during the full calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is earned.

(D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.

(E) As used in (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection (2), "returns" means the tax returns for which the tax imposed under this chapter is reported to the department.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.4461.

(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW 82.08.975.

(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person claiming the credit under this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2040.

Sec. 211. RCW 82.04.460 and 2014 c 97 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person earning apportionable income taxable under this chapter and also taxable in another state must, for the purpose of computing tax liability under this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance with RCW 82.04.462, that portion of the person's apportionable income derived from business activities performed within this state.

(2) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such apportionable income is taxable under RCW 82.04.290. The rule adopted by the department must, to the extent feasible, be consistent with the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, except that:

(a) The department's rule must provide for a single factor apportionment method based on the receipts factor; and

(b) The definition of "financial institution" contained in appendix A to the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions is advisory only.

(3) The department may by rule provide a method or methods of apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telecommunications service and competitive telephone service taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rule must provide for an equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the tax base.

(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable activities" means only those activities taxed under:

(i) RCW 82.04.255;

(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (((5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and (13)))(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (12);

(iii) RCW 82.04.280(1)(e);

(iv) RCW 82.04.285;

(v) RCW 82.04.286;

(vi) RCW 82.04.290;

(vii) RCW 82.04.2907;

(viii) RCW 82.04.2908;

(ix) RCW 82.04.263, but only to the extent of any activity that would be taxable under any of the provisions enumerated under (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection (4) if the tax classification in RCW 82.04.263 did not exist; and

(x) RCW 82.04.260(((14)))(13) and 82.04.280(1)(a), but only with respect to advertising.

(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax on such income under the substantial nexus standards in RCW 82.04.067(1).

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "business activities tax" and "state" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

Sec. 212. RCW 82.08.806 and 2020 c 139 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.

(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated physical components that constitute a computer system, including monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers. "Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer software.

(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by time.

(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(((14)))(13) or 82.04.280(1)(a).

(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for administrative purposes.

Sec. 213. RCW 82.45.195 and 2014 c 97 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
A sale of standing timber is exempt from tax under this chapter if the gross income from such sale is taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))(11)(d).

PART III

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. This act is exempt from the requirements of RCW 82.32.808.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. This act takes effect July 1, 2022.

--- END ---