BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.280 and 2012 c 229 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((office of the superintendent of public instruction))education data center established in RCW 43.41.400, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the student achievement council, and the public ((baccalaureate))four-year institutions((, and the education data center,))of higher education, shall prepare the dual credit report ((by September 1, 2010, and annually thereafter to the education and higher education committees of the legislature regarding participation in dual credit programs. The report shall include))required by this section.

(2) Annually, by September 1st, the education data center must submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(3) The report must include:

(a) Data about student participation rates ((and)), award of high school credit, award of postsecondary credit at an institution of higher education, and academic performance ((including but not limited to running start, college in the high school, tech prep, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and running start for the trades))for each dual credit program; and

(b) Data on the total unduplicated head count and percentage of students enrolled, students who have been awarded high school credit, and students who have been awarded postsecondary credit at an institution of higher education, in at least one dual credit program course((; and

(c) The percentage of students who enrolled in at least one dual credit program as percent of all students enrolled in grades nine through twelve)).

(((2)))(4) Data ((on student participation shall))described in subsection (3) of this section must be disaggregated by ((race, ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch))dual credit program, by the student categories and subcategories described in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3), and by:

(a) Gender;

(b) Students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW;

(c) Students who are homeless as defined in RCW 43.330.702; and

(d) Multilingual/English learners.

(5)(a) The report must also recommend additional categories of data reporting and disaggregation. For each additional category, the report must describe:

(i) The purpose for reporting on, or disaggregating by, the category;

(ii) The specific metric or indicator to be used;

(iii) Whether the specific metric or indicator is a new data point; and

(iv) Which educational entities should be responsible for collecting the data.

(b) The 2022 report must recommend whether to require: (i) Reporting of data related to the application of postsecondary credits earned through a dual credit program towards postsecondary credentials and degrees; and (ii) comparison of postsecondary credential and degree attainment between students who did or did not participate in a dual credit program, and between students who participated in different dual credit programs.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "dual credit program" means running start under RCW 28A.600.300, college in the high school under RCW 28A.600.287, career and technical education dual credit, Cambridge international, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and other programs in which a student qualifies for postsecondary and high school credit upon either successfully completing the course or passing an exam.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.175.145 and 2011 c 288 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose or otherwise available in the account established in RCW 28A.175.155, beginning in the 2011-12 school year and each year thereafter, a high school that demonstrates improvement in its dropout prevention score compared to the baseline school year as calculated under RCW 28A.175.140 may receive a PASS program award as provided under this section. The legislature intends to recognize and reward continuous improvement by using a baseline year for calculating eligibility for PASS program awards so that a high school retains previously earned award funds from one year to the next unless its performance declines.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must determine the amount of PASS program awards based on appropriated funds and eligible high schools. The intent of the legislature is to provide an award to each eligible high school commensurate with the degree of improvement in the high school's dropout prevention score and the size of the high school. The office must establish a minimum award amount. If funds available for PASS program awards are not sufficient to provide an award to each eligible high school, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish objective criteria to prioritize awards based on eligible high schools with the greatest need for additional dropout prevention and intervention services. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall encourage and may require a high school receiving a PASS program award to demonstrate an amount of community matching funds or an amount of in-kind community services to support dropout prevention and intervention.

(c) Ninety percent of an award under this section must be allocated to the eligible high school to be used for dropout prevention activities in the school as specified in subsection (2) of this section. The principal of the high school shall determine the use of funds after consultation with parents and certificated and classified staff of the school.

(d) Ten percent of an award under this section must be allocated to the school district in which the eligible high school is located to be used for dropout prevention activities as specified in subsection (2) of this section in the high school or in other schools in the district.

(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may withhold distribution of award funds under this section to an otherwise eligible high school or school district if the superintendent of public instruction issues a finding that the school or school district has willfully manipulated the dropout prevention indicators under RCW 28A.175.140, for example by expelling, suspending, transferring, or refusing to enroll students at risk of dropping out of school or at risk of low achievement.

(2) High schools and school districts may use PASS program award funds for any programs or activities that support the development of a dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system as described in RCW 28A.175.074, offered directly by the school or school district or under contract with education agencies or community-based organizations, including but not limited to educational service districts((,))and workforce development councils((, and boys and girls clubs)). Such programs or activities may include but are not limited to the following:

(a) Strategies to close the educational opportunity and achievement ((gap for disadvantaged students and minority students))gaps among groups of students as disaggregated by the categories and subcategories in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3);

(b) Use of graduation coaches as defined in RCW 28A.175.150;

(c) Opportunity internship activities under RCW 28C.18.164;

(d) Dropout reengagement programs provided by community-based organizations or community and technical colleges;

(e) Comprehensive guidance and planning programs as defined under RCW 28A.600.045, including but not limited to the navigation 101 program;

(f) Reduced class sizes, extended school day, extended school year, and tutoring programs for students identified as at risk of dropping out of school, including instruction to assist these students in meeting graduation requirements in mathematics and science;

(g) Outreach and counseling targeted to students identified as at risk of dropping out of school, or who have dropped out of school, to encourage them to consider learning alternatives such as preapprenticeship programs, skill centers, running start, technical high schools, and other options for completing a high school diploma;

(h) Preapprenticeship programs ((or running start for the trades initiatives)) under RCW 49.04.190;

(i) Mentoring programs for students;

(j) Development and use of dropout early warning data systems;

(k) Counseling, resource and referral services, and intervention programs to address social, behavioral, and health factors associated with dropping out of school;

(l) Implementing programs for in-school suspension or other strategies to avoid excluding middle and high school students from the school whenever possible;

(m) Parent engagement activities such as home visits and off-campus parent support group meetings related to dropout prevention and reengagement; and

(n) Early learning programs for prekindergarten students.

(3) High schools and school districts are encouraged to implement dropout prevention and reengagement strategies in a comprehensive and systematic manner, using strategic planning, school improvement plans, evaluation and feedback, and response to intervention tools.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.560 and 2021 c 71 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to data on student enrollment in dual credit courses, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect and post on the Washington state report card website the rates at which students earn college credit through a dual credit course, using the following criteria:

(1) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP examination;

(2) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;

(3) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced international certificate of education examination;

(4) Students who successfully complete a course through the college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.287 and are awarded credit by the partnering institution of higher education;

(5) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance requirements to earn college credit through a ((tech prep))career and technical education course; and

(6) Students who successfully complete a course through the running start program under RCW 28A.600.300 and are awarded credit by the institution of higher education.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.320.196 and 2021 c 71 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the academic acceleration incentive program is established as provided in this section. The intent of the legislature is that the funds awarded under the program be used to support teacher training, curriculum, technology, examination fees, textbook fees, and other costs associated with offering dual credit courses to high school students, including transportation for running start students to and from the institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28A.600.300.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate half of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section on a competitive basis to provide one-time grants for high schools to expand the availability of dual credit courses. To be eligible for a grant, a school district must have adopted an academic acceleration policy as provided under RCW 28A.320.195. In making grant awards, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to grants for high schools with a high proportion of low-income students and high schools seeking to develop new capacity for dual credit courses rather than proposing marginal expansion of current capacity.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate half of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section to school districts as an incentive award for each student who earned dual high school and college credit, as described under subsection (4) of this section, for courses offered by the district's high schools during the previous school year. School districts must distribute the award to the high schools that generated the funds. The award amount for low-income students eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program who earn dual credits must be set at one hundred twenty-five percent of the base award for other students. A student who earns more than one dual credit in the same school year counts only once for the purposes of the incentive award.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the following students are considered to have earned dual high school and college credit in a course offered by a high school:

(a) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP examination;

(b) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;

(c) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced international certificate of education examination;

(d) Students who successfully complete a course through the college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.287 and are awarded credit by the partnering institution of higher education; and

(e) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance requirements to earn college credit through a ((tech prep))career and technical education course.

(5) If a high school provides access to online courses for students to earn dual high school and college credit at no cost to the student, such a course is considered to be offered by the high school.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education policy committees and the fiscal committees of the legislature, by January 1st of each year, information about the demographics of the students earning dual credits in the schools receiving grants under this section for the prior school year. Demographic data shall be disaggregated pursuant to RCW 28A.300.042.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.600.160 and 2009 c 556 s 14 and 2009 c 450 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the school shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the pathway. Providing online access to the information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically ((request [requests]))requests information to be provided in written form. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities available through the selected educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways that retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible to graduate, and may not require students who transfer between pathways to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student is eligible to graduate. Educational pathways may include, but are not limited to, programs such as worksite learning, internships, ((tech prep,)) career and technical education, running start, college in the high school, ((running start for the trades,)) and preparation for technical college, community college, or university education.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.700.030 and 2008 c 170 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

All approved preparatory secondary career and technical education programs must meet the following minimum criteria:

(1) Either:

(a) Lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as necessary for employment or advancement in that field; or

(b) Allow students to earn dual credit for high school and college through ((tech prep))career and technical education, advanced placement, or other agreements or programs;

(2) Be comprised of a sequenced progression of multiple courses that are technically intensive and rigorous; and

(3) Lead to workforce entry, state or nationally approved apprenticeships, or postsecondary education in a related field.

Sec. 7. RCW 28C.18.162 and 2009 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 28C.18.160 and 28C.18.164 through 28C.18.168.

(1) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial number of current or projected employment opportunities.

(2) "Low-income high school student" means a student who is enrolled in ((grades ten, eleven, or twelve))grade 10, 11, or 12 in a public high school and who qualifies for federal free or reduced-price meals. If a student qualifies at the time the student begins participating in the opportunity internship program, the student remains eligible even if the student does not receive free or reduced-price meals thereafter. To participate in the program, the student must remain enrolled in high school until the student receives a high school diploma.

(3) "Opportunity internship consortium" means a local consortium formed for the purpose of participating in the opportunity internship program and which may be composed of a local workforce development council, economic development council, area high schools, community or technical colleges, apprenticeship councils, preapprenticeship programs ((such as running start for the trades)), private vocational schools licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW, public and private four-year institutions of higher education, employers in targeted industries, and labor organizations.

(4) "Opportunity internship graduate" means a low-income high school student who successfully completes an opportunity internship program and graduates from high school.

(5) "Postsecondary program of study" means an undergraduate or graduate certificate, apprenticeship, or degree program.

(6) "Preapprenticeship" means a program of at least ninety hours and not more than one hundred eighty hours in length that provides practical experience, education, preparation, and the development of skills that would be beneficial for entry into state-approved apprenticeship programs, including but not limited to construction industry structure and the construction process; orientation to state-approved apprenticeship; tools of the various trades and safe handling of power tools; and industry standards of safety, responsibility, and craft excellence.

(7) "Targeted industry" means a business or industry identified by a local workforce development council as having high-demand occupations that require candidates to have completed a postsecondary program of study.

--- END ---