BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.88B RCW to read as follows:

(1) A certificate that has been expired for five years or less may be reinstated if the person holding the expired certificate:

(a) Completes an abbreviated application form;

(b) Pays any necessary fees, including the current certification fee, late renewal fees, and expired credential reissuance fees;

(c) Provides a written declaration that no action has been taken by a state or federal jurisdiction or hospital which would prevent or restrict the person holding the expired certificate from practicing as a home care aide;

(d) Provides a written declaration that the person holding the expired certificate has not voluntarily given up any credential or privilege or has not been restricted from practicing as a home care aide in lieu of or to avoid formal action; and

(e) Submits to a state and federal background check as required by RCW 74.39A.056, if the certificate has been expired for more than one year.

(2) In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a certificate that has been expired for more than five years may be reinstated if the person holding the expired certificate demonstrates competence to the standards established by the secretary and meets other requirements established by the secretary.

--- END ---