BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—WASHINGTON STATE CONVENTION ECONOMY GRANTS

The sum of $5,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2023, from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—state appropriation to the department of commerce for the purposes of this section.

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide additional grants to assist businesses registered with the department of revenue as provided in RCW 82.32.030 that are dependent on the economic activity created through conventions hosted in Washington state to maintain their operations. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, the business must:

(a) Apply for or have applied for the grant;

(b) Have reported annual gross receipts of $100,000,000 or less to the department of revenue for calendar year 2019;

(c) Have expenses that are necessary to continue business operations and the expense is not a federal, state, or local tax, fee, license, or other government revenue;

(d) Self–attest that the expense is not funded by any other government or private entity;

(e) Have experienced a reduction in business income or activity related to COVID-19 or state or local actions in response to COVID-19;

(f) Have met one or more of the following criteria:

(i) Hosted a convention in Washington;

(ii) Have a business that provided support services to conventions to Washington; or

(iii) Have a business that depends on the function of conventions to sell goods and services in Washington state; and

(g) Agree to operate in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local public health guidance and directives.

(2)(a) Eligible businesses may receive up to a $500,000 grant for revenue lost due to a cancellation or a reduction of participants in a convention hosted in Washington state in 2020 or 2021.

(b) Eligible participants must provide the department of commerce with: (i) Financial records from 2019 that can provide a basis for revenue received from convention activity in Washington state prior to the COVID-19 outbreak; and (ii) financial records from 2020 and 2021 that show a reduction in gross revenue received from convention activity in Washington state during the COVID-19 outbreak.

(c) Eligible businesses must provide financial records related to any grants or loans from federal and state government programs during 2020 through 2022.

(d) The grant award shall equal the loss in revenue between 2019 and 2020, less grants or loans from federal and state government programs, and is not to exceed $500,000.

(e) If a business received one or more working Washington small business grants, the grant awarded under this section must be reduced to reflect the amounts received from previous working Washington small business grants.

(3) Nonprofit organizations may be eligible to receive funding under subsection (1) or (2) of this section if they have a primary business activity that has been impacted as described in subsection (1)(e) of this section.

--- END ---