BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) School districts may not provide instruction, including facilitation of classroom discussion, in critical race theory to students in grades kindergarten through 12.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "critical race theory" means:

(a) Propositions or assertions that resemble, in whole or in part, that:

(i) One race or sex is inherently superior to another race or sex;

(ii) The United States is fundamentally or structurally racist or sexist;

(iii) An individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, is inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive;

(iv) An individual should be discriminated against or receive adverse treatment solely or partly because of race or sex;

(v) An individual's moral character is determined by the individual's race or sex;

(vi) An individual, by virtue of race or sex, bears responsibility for actions committed in the past by other members of the same race or sex;

(vii) Any individual should feel guilt, anguish, or any other form of psychological distress on account of the individual's race or sex;

(viii) Meritocracy or traits such as a hard work ethic are racist or sexist, or were created by a particular race to oppress another race; or

(ix) Liberty and freedom are not American values; or

(b) Any other form of race or sex stereotyping or any other form of race or sex scapegoating. For the purposes of this subsection: "Race or sex stereotyping" means ascribing character traits, values, moral and ethical codes, privileges, status, or beliefs to a race or sex, or to an individual because of their race or sex, and "race or sex scapegoating" means assigning fault, blame, or bias to a race or sex, or to members of a race or sex because of their race or sex. The terms similarly encompass any claim that, consciously or subconsciously, and by virtue of race or sex, members of any race are inherently racist or are inherently inclined to oppress others, or that members of a sex are inherently sexist or inclined to oppress others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.710 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and applies to charter schools established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---