BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.87.010 (Findings—Intent—2021 c 196) and 2021 c 196 s 1;

(2) RCW 82.87.020 (Definitions) and 2021 c 196 s 4;

(3) RCW 82.87.030 (Distribution of revenues) and 2021 c 196 s 2;

(4) RCW 82.87.040 (Tax imposed—Long-term capital assets) and 2021 c 196 s 5;

(5) RCW 82.87.050 (Exemptions) and 2021 c 196 s 6;

(6) RCW 82.87.060 (Deductions) and 2021 c 196 s 7;

(7) RCW 82.87.070 (Qualified family-owned small business deduction) and 2021 c 196 s 8;

(8) RCW 82.87.080 (Charitable donation deduction) and 2021 c 196 s 9;

(9) RCW 82.87.090 (Other taxes) and 2021 c 196 s 10;

(10) RCW 82.87.100 (Allocation of long-term capital gains and losses—Credit) and 2021 c 196 s 11;

(11) RCW 82.87.110 (Filing of returns—Additional documentation—Penalty) and 2021 c 196 s 12;

(12) RCW 82.87.120 (Joint filers—Separate filers—Tax liability) and 2021 c 196 s 13;

(13) RCW 82.87.130 (Administration of taxes) and 2021 c 196 s 14;

(14) RCW 82.87.140 (Tax criminal penalties) and 2021 c 196 s 15;

(15) RCW 82.04.4497 (Credit—Sale or exchange of long-term capital assets) and 2021 c 196 s 16;

(16) RCW 82.87.150 (Annual adjustments) and 2021 c 196 s 17;

(17) 2021 c 196 s 18 (uncodified); and

(18) 2021 c 196 s 20 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2022, as well as prospectively.

--- END ---