BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.005 and 2020 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.

(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies. "State agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public official.

(4) "Ballot proposition" means any (("measure" as defined by RCW 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum)) proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters ((of the state or any municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from and after)). For purposes of this chapter, a proposition is considered proposed at the time when ((the proposition has been))it is initially filed with the appropriate election ((officer of that constituency before its circulation for signatures))official, or is initially circulated for signatures, whichever occurs first. Reporting requirements apply to expenditures made from the point at which a proposition is considered proposed.

(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.

(6) "Bona fide political party" means:

(a) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political party by the secretary of state;

(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district committee for each party in each legislative district.

(7) "Books of account" means:

(a) In the case of a campaign or political committee, a ledger or similar listing of contributions, expenditures, and debts, such as a campaign or committee is required to file regularly with the commission, current as of the most recent business day; or

(b) In the case of a commercial advertiser, details of political advertising or electioneering communications provided by the advertiser, including the names and addresses of persons from whom it accepted political advertising or electioneering communications, the exact nature and extent of the services rendered and the total cost and the manner of payment for the services.

(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when the individual first:

(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent to promote the individual's candidacy for office;

(b) Announces publicly or files for office;

(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote the individual's candidacy; or

(d) Gives consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in the state senate or state house of representatives.

(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person that sells the service of communicating messages or producing material for broadcast or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public whether through brochures, fliers, newspapers, magazines, television, radio, billboards, direct mail advertising, printing, paid internet or digital communications, or any other means of mass communications used for the purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election campaign.

(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17A.100.

(12) "Committee" unless the context indicates otherwise, includes a political committee such as a candidate, ballot proposition, recall, political, or continuing political committee.

(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning, includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any kind. For the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17A.710, "compensation" does not include per diem allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the governmental entity.

(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee that is an organization of continuing existence not limited to participation in any particular election campaign or election cycle.

(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:

(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds, or anything of value, including personal and professional services for less than full consideration;

(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political or incidental committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the candidate or committee, or their agents;

(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic, digital, or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication prepared by a candidate, a political or incidental committee, or its authorized agent;

(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b) "Contribution" does not include:

(i) Accrued interest on money deposited in a political or incidental committee's account;

(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;

(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political or incidental committee that is returned to the contributor within ten business days of the date on which it is received by the candidate or political or incidental committee;

(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is of interest to the public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a political or incidental committee;

(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or political or incidental committee, or to the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services," for the purposes of this subsection, means services or labor for which the individual is not compensated by any person;

(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts toward any applicable contribution limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or

(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf of two or more candidates or political or incidental committees either as volunteer services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the candidate or political or incidental committee for whom the services are performed as long as:

(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;

(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political or incidental committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective statements of organization under RCW 42.17A.205; and

(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects, activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this subsection.

A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection (15)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as long as the person has no authority to authorize expenditures or make decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.

(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.

(16) "Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union doing business in this state.

(17) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

(18) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to the voters. An election in which the qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(19) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.

(20) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of January after the date of the last previous general election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st after the special election.

(21)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or satellite television, radio transmission, digital communication, United States postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:

(i) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the candidate without using the candidate's name;

(ii) Is broadcast, transmitted electronically or by other means, mailed, erected, distributed, or otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election; and

(iii) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days before an election, has a fair market value or cost of one thousand dollars or more.

(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:

(i) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising appearing at least twelve months preceding the candidate becoming a candidate;

(ii) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor, so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been invited to participate in the debate or forum;

(iii) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is:

(A) Of interest to the public;

(B) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium; and

(C) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political or incidental committee;

(iv) Slate cards and sample ballots;

(v) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works (A) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming a candidate, or (B) written about a candidate;

(vi) Public service announcements;

(vii) An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or political or incidental committee, or to the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(viii) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or

(ix) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule consistent with the intent of this chapter.

(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. "Expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. "Expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment by a candidate or political or incidental committee of the principal of a loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 42.17A.235(11)(a).

(24) "Foreign national" means:

(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence;

(b) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country;

(c) A foreign political party; and

(d) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign country.

(25) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means the election that results in the election of a person to a state or local office. It does not include a primary.

(26) "Gift" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.

(27) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic partner, dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of the definition of "intermediary" in this section, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse or domestic partner, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse or domestic partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person.

(28) "Incidental committee" means any nonprofit organization not otherwise defined as a political committee but that may incidentally make a contribution or an expenditure in excess of the reporting thresholds in RCW 42.17A.235, directly or through a political committee. Any nonprofit organization is not an incidental committee if it is only remitting payments through the nonprofit organization in an aggregated form and the nonprofit organization is not required to report those payments in accordance with this chapter.

(29) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an elected office.

(30)(a) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the following elements:

(i) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person who is not:

(A) A candidate for that office;

(B) An authorized committee of that candidate for that office; and

(C) A person who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office;

(ii) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person with whom the candidate has not collaborated for the purpose of making the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office;

(iii) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and

(iv) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or opposition to that candidate, has a value of one thousand dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under one thousand dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative value is one thousand dollars or more.

(b) "Independent expenditure" does not include: Ordinary home hospitality; communications with journalists or editorial staff designed to elicit a news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general public, controlled by a person whose business is that news medium, and not controlled by a candidate or a political committee; participation in the creation of a publicly funded voters' pamphlet statement in written or video form; an internal political communication primarily limited to contributors to a political party organization or political action committee, the officers, management staff, and stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or the members of a labor organization or other membership organization; or the rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of two hundred fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker.

(31)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.

(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.

(32) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.

(33) "Legislative office" means the office of a member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

(34) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of communicating with the members of that association or organization.

(35) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either on the person's own or another's behalf.

(36) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom the lobbyist is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.

(37) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise of personal judgment or discretion.

(38) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular election, an entity:

(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;

(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;

(c) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that candidate's opponent;

(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that candidate's opponent; or

(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or opposition to a candidate.

(39) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political committee, political party, executive committee thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however organized.

(40) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, digital communication, or other means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or opposition in any election campaign.

(41) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or an individual dealing with the candidate's or individual's own funds or property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.

(42) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.

(43) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county, city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other state political subdivision elective office.

(44) "Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.

(45) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending thirty days after the recall election.

(46) "Remediable violation" means any violation of this chapter that:

(a) Involved expenditures or contributions totaling no more than the contribution limits set out under RCW 42.17A.405(2) per election, or one thousand dollars if there is no statutory limit;

(b) Occurred:

(i) More than thirty days before an election, where the commission entered into an agreement to resolve the matter; or

(ii) At any time where the violation did not constitute a material violation because it was inadvertent and minor or otherwise has been cured and, after consideration of all the circumstances, further proceedings would not serve the purposes of this chapter;

(c) Does not materially harm the public interest, beyond the harm to the policy of this chapter inherent in any violation; and

(d) Involved:

(i) A person who:

(A) Took corrective action within five business days after the commission first notified the person of noncompliance, or where the commission did not provide notice and filed a required report within twenty-one days after the report was due to be filed; and

(B) Substantially met the filing deadline for all other required reports within the immediately preceding twelve-month period; or

(ii) A candidate who:

(A) Lost the election in question; and

(B) Did not receive contributions over one hundred times the contribution limit in aggregate per election during the campaign in question.

(47)(a) "Sponsor" for purposes of an electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political advertising means the person paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the sponsor.

(b) "Sponsor," for purposes of a political or incidental committee, means any person, except an authorized committee, to whom any of the following applies:

(i) The committee receives eighty percent or more of its contributions either from the person or from the person's members, officers, employees, or shareholders;

(ii) The person collects contributions for the committee by use of payroll deductions or dues from its members, officers, or employees.

(48) "Sponsored committee" means a committee, other than an authorized committee, that has one or more sponsors.

(49) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.

(50) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.

(51) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts or expenses incurred by the committee or candidate with respect to that election. In the case of a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts or expenses when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17A.255.

(52) "Technical correction" means the correction of a minor or ministerial error in a required report that does not materially harm the public interest and needs to be corrected for the report to be in full compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(53) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals appointed by a candidate or political or incidental committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17A.210, to perform the duties specified in that section.

(54) "Violation" means a violation of this chapter that is not a remediable violation, minor violation, or an error classified by the commission as appropriate to address by a technical correction.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17A.105 and 2010 c 204 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Develop and provide forms for the reports and statements required to be made under this chapter;

(2) ((Prepare and publish a manual setting forth))Provide recommended uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting for use by persons required to make reports and statements under this chapter;

(3) Compile and maintain a current list of all filed reports and statements;

(4) Investigate whether properly completed statements and reports have been filed within the times required by this chapter;

(5) Upon complaint or upon its own motion, investigate and report apparent violations of this chapter to the appropriate law enforcement authorities;

(6) Conduct a sufficient number of audits and field investigations, as staff capacity permits without impacting the timeliness of addressing alleged violations, to provide a statistically valid finding regarding the degree of compliance with the provisions of this chapter by all required filers. Any documents, records, reports, computer files, papers, or materials provided to the commission for use in conducting audits and investigations must be returned to the candidate, campaign, or political committee from which they were received within one week of the commission's completion of an audit or field investigation;

(7) Prepare and publish an annual report to the governor as to the effectiveness of this chapter and ((its enforcement by appropriate law enforcement authorities))the work of the commission;

(8) Enforce this chapter according to the powers granted it by law;

(9) ((Adopt rules governing the arrangement, handling, indexing, and disclosing of those reports required by this chapter to be filed with a county auditor or county elections official. The rules shall:

(a) Ensure ease of access by the public to the reports; and

(b) Include, but not be limited to, requirements for indexing the reports by the names of candidates or political committees and by the ballot proposition for or against which a political committee is receiving contributions or making expenditures;

(10))) Adopt rules to carry out the policies of chapter 348, Laws of 2006. The adoption of these rules is not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 42.17A.110(1);

(((11)))(10) Adopt administrative rules establishing requirements for filer participation in any system designed and implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports; ((and

(12)))(11) Maintain and make available to the public and political committees of this state a toll-free telephone number; and

(12) Maintain a website to facilitate public access to information in reports filed with the commission, and sending electronic communications to the commission.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17A.120 and 2019 c 428 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may suspend or modify any of the reporting requirements of this chapter if it finds that literal application of this chapter works a manifestly unreasonable hardship in a particular case and the suspension or modification will not frustrate the purposes of this chapter. The commission may suspend or modify reporting requirements only to the extent necessary to substantially relieve the hardship and only after a hearing is held and the suspension or modification receives approval. A suspension or modification of the financial affairs reporting requirements in RCW 42.17A.710 may be approved for an elected official's term of office or for up to three years for an executive state officer. If a material change in the applicant's circumstances or relevant information occurs or has occurred, the applicant must request a modification at least one month prior to the next filing deadline rather than at the conclusion of the term.

(2) ((A manifestly unreasonable hardship exists if reporting the name of an entity required to be reported under RCW 42.17A.710(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to adversely affect the competitive position of any entity in which the person filing the report, or any member of the person's immediate family, holds any office, directorship, general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more.

(3))) Requests for reporting modifications may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494 and in accordance with the standards established in this section. The commission, the commission chair acting as presiding officer, or another commissioner appointed by the chair to serve as presiding officer, may preside over a brief adjudicatory proceeding. If a modification is requested by a filer because of a concern for personal safety, the information submitted regarding that safety concern shall not be made public prior to, or at, the hearing on the request. Any information provided or prepared for the modification hearing shall remain exempt from public disclosure under this chapter and chapter 42.56 RCW to the extent it is determined at the hearing that disclosure of such information would present a personal safety risk to a reasonable person.

(((4)))(3) If the commission, or presiding officer, grants a modification request, the commission or presiding officer may apply the modification retroactively to previously filed reports. In that event, previously reported information of the kind that is no longer being reported is confidential and exempt from public disclosure under this chapter and chapter 42.56 RCW.

(((5)))(4) Any citizen has standing to bring an action in Thurston county superior court to contest the propriety of any order entered under this section within one year from the date of the entry of the order.

(((6)))(5) The commission shall adopt rules governing the proceedings.

Sec. 4. RCW 42.17A.205 and 2019 c 428 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every political committee shall file a statement of organization with the commission. The statement must be filed within two weeks after organization or within two weeks after the date the committee first has the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in any election campaign, whichever is earlier. A political committee organized within ((the last three weeks))the period beginning the first day of the last full month before an election and having the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures during and for that election campaign shall file a statement of organization within three business days after its organization or when it first has the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in the election campaign.

(2) The statement of organization shall include but not be limited to:

(a) The name, address, and electronic contact information of the committee;

(b) The names, addresses, and electronic contact information of all related or affiliated committees or other persons, and the nature of the relationship or affiliation;

(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders;

(d) The name, address, and electronic contact information of its treasurer and depository;

(e) A statement whether the committee is a continuing one;

(f) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate whom the committee is supporting or opposing, and, if the committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;

(g) The ballot proposition concerned, if any, and whether the committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition;

(h) What distribution of surplus funds will be made, in accordance with RCW 42.17A.430, in the event of dissolution;

(i) Such other information as the commission may by rule prescribe, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter;

(j) The name, address, and title of any person who authorizes expenditures or makes decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee; and

(k) The name, address, and title of any person who is paid by or is a volunteer for a candidate or political committee to perform ministerial functions and who performs ministerial functions on behalf of two or more candidates or committees.

(3) No two political committees may have the same name.

(4) Any material change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization shall be reported to the commission within the ten days following the change.

(5) As used in this section, the "name" of a sponsored committee must include the name of the person who is the sponsor of the committee. If more than one person meets the definition of sponsor, the name of the committee must include the name of at least one sponsor, but may include the names of other sponsors. A person may sponsor only one political committee for the same elected office or same ballot proposition per election cycle.

Sec. 5. RCW 42.17A.207 and 2019 c 428 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An incidental committee must file a statement of organization with the commission within two weeks after the date the committee first:

(i) Has the expectation of making any expenditures aggregating at least twenty-five thousand dollars in a calendar year in any election campaign, or to a political committee; and

(ii) Is required to disclose a payment received under RCW 42.17A.240(2)(d).

(b) If an incidental committee first meets the criteria requiring filing a statement of organization as specified in (a) of this subsection ((in the last three weeks))within the period beginning the first day of the last full month before an election, then it must file the statement of organization within three business days.

(2) The statement of organization must include but is not limited to:

(a) The name, address, and electronic contact information of the committee;

(b) The names and addresses of all related or affiliated political or incidental committees or other persons, and the nature of the relationship or affiliation;

(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders and the name of the person designated as the treasurer of the incidental committee;

(d) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate whom the committee is supporting or opposing if the committee contributes directly to a candidate and, if donating to a political committee, the name and address of that political committee;

(e) The ballot proposition concerned, if any, and whether the committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition; and

(f) Such other information as the commission may by rule prescribe, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

(3) Any material change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization must be reported to the commission within the ten days following the change.

Sec. 6. RCW 42.17A.225 and 2019 c 428 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the provisions of this section, a continuing political committee shall file and report on the same conditions and at the same times as any other committee in accordance with the provisions of RCW 42.17A.205, 42.17A.210, and 42.17A.220.

(2) A continuing political committee shall file with the commission a report on the tenth day of each month detailing expenditures made and contributions received for the preceding calendar month. This report need only be filed if either the total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred dollars. The report shall be on a form supplied by the commission and shall include the following information:

(a) The information required by RCW 42.17A.240;

(b) Each expenditure made to retire previously accumulated debts of the committee identified by recipient, amount, and date of payments;

(c) Other information the commission shall prescribe by rule.

(3) If a continuing political committee makes a contribution in support of or in opposition to a candidate or ballot proposition within sixty days before the date that the candidate or ballot proposition will be voted upon, the committee shall report pursuant to RCW 42.17A.235.

(4)(a) A continuing political committee shall file reports as required by this chapter until the committee has ceased to function and intends to dissolve, at which time, when there is no outstanding debt or obligation and the committee is concluded in all respects, a final report shall be filed. Upon submitting a final report, the continuing political committee so intending to dissolve must file notice of intent to dissolve with the commission and the commission must post the notice on its website.

(b) The continuing political committee may dissolve sixty days after it files its notice to dissolve, only if:

(i) The continuing political committee does not make any expenditures other than those related to the dissolution process or engage in any political activity or any other activities that generate additional reporting requirements under this chapter after filing such notice;

(ii) No complaint or court action, pursuant to this chapter, is pending against the continuing political committee; and

(iii) All penalties assessed by the commission or court order have been paid by the continuing political committee.

(c) The continuing political committee must continue to report regularly as required under this chapter until all the conditions under (b) of this subsection are resolved.

(d) Upon dissolution, the commission must issue an acknowledgment of dissolution, the duties of the treasurer shall cease, and there shall be no further obligations under this chapter. Dissolution does not absolve the candidate or board of the committee from responsibility for any future obligations resulting from the finding after dissolution of a violation committed prior to dissolution.

(5) The treasurer shall maintain books of account, current within five business days, that accurately reflect all contributions and expenditures. During the ((ten))14 calendar days immediately preceding the date of any election that the committee has received any contributions or made any expenditures, and from the 18th calendar day before such election through the day immediately before the election for a committee that has been relieved from reporting obligations pursuant to rules adopted under the authority of RCW 42.17A.110(8), the books of account shall be kept current within one business day and shall be open for public inspection in the same manner as provided for candidates and other political committees in RCW 42.17A.235(6).

(6) All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be certified as correct by the treasurer.

(7) The treasurer shall preserve books of account, bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or political committee for not less than five calendar years following the year during which the transaction occurred.

Sec. 7. RCW 42.17A.235 and 2019 c 428 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In addition to the information required under RCW 42.17A.205 and 42.17A.210, each candidate or political committee must file with the commission a report of all contributions received and expenditures made as a political committee on the next reporting date pursuant to the timeline established in this section.

(b) In addition to the information required under RCW 42.17A.207 and 42.17A.210, on the day an incidental committee files a statement of organization with the commission, each incidental committee must file with the commission a report of any election campaign expenditures under RCW 42.17A.240(((6)))(7), as well as the source of the ten largest cumulative payments of ten thousand dollars or greater it received in the current calendar year from a single person, including any persons tied as the tenth largest source of payments it received, if any.

(2) Each treasurer of a candidate or political committee, or an incidental committee, required to file a statement of organization under this chapter, shall file with the commission a report, for each election in which ((a candidate, political committee, or incidental committee))it is participating, containing the information required by RCW 42.17A.240 at the following intervals:

(a) On the ((twenty-first))27th day, the 20th day, and the ((seventh))6th day immediately preceding the date ((on which))of the election ((is held)); and

(b) On the tenth day of the first full month after the election.

(3)(a) Each treasurer of a candidate or political committee shall file with the commission a report on the tenth day of each month during which the candidate or political committee is not ((participating in an election campaign))otherwise required to report under subsection (2) of this section, only if the committee has received a contribution or made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either the total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred dollars.

(b) Each incidental committee shall file with the commission a report on the tenth day of each month during which the incidental committee is not otherwise required to report under this section only if the committee has:

(i) Received a payment that would change the information required under RCW 42.17A.240(2)(d) as included in its last report; or

(ii) Made any election campaign expenditure reportable under RCW 42.17A.240(((6)))(7) since its last report, and the total election campaign expenditures made since the last report exceed two hundred dollars.

(4) The reports filed ((twenty-one))27 days, 20 days, and 6 days before the election shall report all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of ((one business day))two calendar days before the date of the report. ((The report filed seven days before the election shall report all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of one business day before the date of the report.)) Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall report all contributions received and expenditures made from the closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the month preceding the date of the current report.

(5) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month preceding the date of the special election, or for the period beginning the first day of the fifth month before the date of the general election, and ending on the date of that special or general election, each Monday the treasurer for a candidate or a political committee shall file with the commission a report of each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar days. The report shall contain the name of each person contributing the funds and the amount contributed by each person. However, persons who contribute no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate are not required to be identified in the report. A copy of the report shall be retained by the treasurer for the treasurer's records. In the event of deposits made by candidates, political committee members, or paid staff other than the treasurer, the copy shall be immediately provided to the treasurer for the treasurer's records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the treasurer.

(6)(a) The treasurer for a candidate or a political committee shall maintain books of account accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the ((ten))14 calendar days immediately preceding the date of the election, and from the 18th calendar day before such election through the day immediately before the election for a committee that has been relieved from reporting obligations pursuant to rules adopted under the authority of RCW 42.17A.110(8), the books of account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in the political committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17A.205, the books of account must be open for public inspection by appointment at a place agreed upon by both the treasurer and the requestor, for inspections between 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on any day from the ((tenth calendar))14th calendar day immediately before the election through the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, and from the 18th calendar day before such election through the day immediately before the election other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday for a committee that has been relieved from reporting obligations pursuant to rules adopted under the authority of RCW 42.17A.110(8). It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate or political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days. The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for such inspections that is within forty-eight hours of the time and day that is requested for the inspection. The treasurer may provide digital access or copies of the books of account in lieu of scheduling an appointment at a designated place for inspection. If the treasurer and requestor are unable to agree on a location and the treasurer has not provided digital access to the books of account, the default location for an appointment shall be a place of public accommodation selected by the treasurer within a reasonable distance from the treasurer's office.

(b) At the time of making the appointment, a person wishing to inspect the books of account must provide the treasurer the name and telephone number of the person wishing to inspect the books of account. The person inspecting the books of account must show photo identification before the inspection begins.

(c) A treasurer may refuse to show the books of account to any person who does not make an appointment or provide the required identification. The commission may issue limited rules to modify the requirements set forth in this section in consideration of other technology and best practices.

(7) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be readily available for public inspection by appointment, pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(8) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account, bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or political committee for not less than five calendar years following the year during which the transaction occurred or for any longer period as otherwise required by law.

(9) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the treasurer.

(10) Where there is not a pending complaint concerning a report, it is not evidence of a violation of this section to submit an amended report within twenty-one days of filing an initial report if:

(a) The report is accurately amended;

(b) The amended report is filed more than thirty days before an election;

(c) The total aggregate dollar amount of the adjustment for the amended report is within three times the contribution limit per election or two hundred dollars, whichever is greater; and

(d) The committee reported all information that was available to it at the time of filing, or made a good faith effort to do so, or if a refund of a contribution or expenditure is being reported.

(11)(a) When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, the campaign fund is closed, the campaign is concluded in all respects, and the political committee has ceased to function and intends to dissolve, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon submitting a final report, the political committee so intending to dissolve must file notice of intent to dissolve with the commission and the commission must post the notice on its website.

(b) Any political committee may dissolve sixty days after it files its notice to dissolve, only if:

(i) The political committee does not make any expenditures other than those related to the dissolution process or engage in any political activity or any other activities that generate additional reporting requirements under this chapter after filing such notice;

(ii) No complaint or court action under this chapter is pending against the political committee; and

(iii) All penalties assessed by the commission or court order have been paid by the political committee.

(c) The political committee must continue to report regularly as required under this chapter until all the conditions under (b) of this subsection are resolved.

(d) Upon dissolution, the commission must issue an acknowledgment of dissolution, the duties of the treasurer shall cease, and there shall be no further obligations under this chapter. Dissolution does not absolve the candidate or board of the committee from responsibility for any future obligations resulting from the finding after dissolution of a violation committed prior to dissolution.

(12) The commission must adopt rules for the dissolution of incidental committees.

Sec. 8. RCW 42.17A.255 and 2020 c 152 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section the term "independent expenditure" means any expenditure that is made in support of or in opposition to any candidate or ballot proposition and is not otherwise required to be reported pursuant to RCW 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, and 42.17A.240. "Independent expenditure" does not include: An internal political communication primarily limited to the contributors to a political party organization or political action committee, or the officers, management staff, and stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or the members of a labor organization or other membership organization; or the rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services," for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the individual is not compensated by any person.

(2) Within five days after the date of making an independent expenditure that by itself or when added to all other such independent expenditures made during the same election campaign by the same person equals one hundred dollars or more, or within five days after the date of making an independent expenditure for which no reasonable estimate of monetary value is practicable, whichever occurs first, the person who made the independent expenditure shall file with the commission an initial report of all independent expenditures made during the campaign prior to and including such date.

(3) At the following intervals each person who is required to file an initial report pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall file with the commission a further report of the independent expenditures made since the date of the last report:

(a) On the ((twenty-first))27th day, the 20th day, and the ((seventh))6th day preceding the date on which the election is held; ((and))

(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and

(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are required to be filed pursuant to this section. ((However, the))

(4) The further reports required by ((this)) subsection (3) of this section shall only be filed if the reporting person has made an independent expenditure since the date of the last previous report filed.

((The report filed pursuant to (a) of this subsection (3)))If no further reports are required to be filed, then the last report filed shall be the final report, and upon submitting such final report the duties of the reporting person shall cease, and there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.

(((4)))(5) All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be certified as correct by the reporting person.

(((5)))(6) Each report required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall disclose for the period beginning at the end of the period for the last previous report filed or, in the case of an initial report, beginning at the time of the first independent expenditure, and ending not more than one business day before the date the report is due, except ending not more than two calendar days before the date the report is due for a report required by subsection (3)(a) of this section:

(a) The name, address, and electronic contact information of the person filing the report;

(b) The name and address of each person to whom an independent expenditure was made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars, and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. If no reasonable estimate of the monetary value of a particular independent expenditure is practicable, it is sufficient to report instead a precise description of services, property, or rights furnished through the expenditure and where appropriate to attach a copy of the item produced or distributed by the expenditure;

(c) The total sum of all independent expenditures made during the campaign to date;

(d) A statement from the person making an independent expenditure that:

(i) The expenditure is not financed in any part by a foreign national; and

(ii) Foreign nationals are not involved in making decisions regarding the expenditure in any way; and

(e) Such other information as shall be required by the commission by rule in conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 9. RCW 42.17A.260 and 2020 c 152 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The sponsor of political advertising shall file a special report to the commission within twenty-four hours of, or on the first working day after, the date the political advertising is first published, mailed, or otherwise presented to the public, if the political advertising:

(a) Is published, mailed, or otherwise presented to the public within ((twenty-one))60 days of an election; and

(b) Either:

(i) Qualifies as an independent expenditure with a fair market value or actual cost of one thousand dollars or more, for political advertising supporting or opposing a candidate; or

(ii) Has a fair market value or actual cost of one thousand dollars or more, for political advertising supporting or opposing a ballot proposition, and is not otherwise required to be reported pursuant to RCW 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, or 42.17A.240, supporting or opposing the same ballot proposition.

(2) If a sponsor is required to file a special report under this section, the sponsor shall also deliver to the commission within the delivery period established in subsection (1) of this section a special report for ((each)):

(a) Each subsequent independent expenditure of any size supporting or opposing the same candidate who was the subject of the previous independent expenditure, supporting or opposing that candidate's opponent((, or, in the case of a)); or

(b) Each subsequent expenditure of any size made in support of or in opposition to ((a))the same ballot proposition that was the subject of the previous expenditure, and is not otherwise required to be reported pursuant to RCW 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, or 42.17A.240((, supporting or opposing the same ballot proposition that was the subject of the previous expenditure)).

(3) The special report must include:

(a) The name and address of the person making the expenditure;

(b) The name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was made;

(c) A detailed description of the expenditure;

(d) The date the expenditure was made and the date the political advertising was first published or otherwise presented to the public;

(e) The amount of the expenditure;

(f) The name of the candidate supported or opposed by the expenditure, the office being sought by the candidate, and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the candidate; or the name of the ballot proposition supported or opposed by the expenditure and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the ballot proposition;

(g) A statement from the sponsor that:

(i) The political advertising is not financed in any part by a foreign national; and

(ii) Foreign nationals are not involved in making decisions regarding the political advertising in any way; and

(h) Any other information the commission may require by rule.

(4) All persons required to report under RCW 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, 42.17A.240, 42.17A.255, and 42.17A.305 are subject to the requirements of this section, except as provided in this section. The commission may determine that reports filed pursuant to this section also satisfy the requirements of RCW 42.17A.255.

(5) The sponsor of independent expenditures supporting a candidate or opposing that candidate's opponent required to report under this section shall file with each required report an affidavit or declaration of the person responsible for making the independent expenditure that the expenditure was not made in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, the candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's agent, or with the encouragement or approval of the candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's agent.

Sec. 10. RCW 42.17A.265 and 2020 c 152 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Treasurers shall prepare and deliver to the commission a special report when a contribution or aggregate of contributions totals ((one thousand dollars or more))more than the contribution limit to a candidate for state office other than legislative office, as provided in RCW 42.17A.405(2), is from a single person or entity, and is received during ((a special reporting period))the period from the beginning of the last full month preceding an election in which the treasurer's committee is participating, and concluding the day before that election.

(2) A political committee shall prepare and deliver to the commission a special report when it makes a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single entity that totals ((one thousand dollars or more))more than the contribution limit to a candidate for state office other than legislative office, as provided in RCW 42.17A.405(2) during ((a special reporting period))the same period as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions made to or received from a single entity during any one ((special)) reporting period. Any subsequent contribution of any size made to or received from the same person or entity during the ((special)) reporting period must also be reported.

(4) ((Special reporting periods, for purposes of this section, include:

(a) The period beginning on the day after the last report required by RCW 42.17A.235 and 42.17A.240 to be filed before a primary and concluding on the end of the day before that primary;

(b) The period twenty-one days preceding a general election; and

(c) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions received from a single entity during any one special reporting period or made by the contributing political committee to a single entity during any one special reporting period.

(5) If a campaign treasurer files))Treasurers and political committees that file a special report under this section for one or more contributions received or made from a single entity during a ((special)) reporting period((, the treasurer shall))must also file a special report under this section for each subsequent contribution of any size which is received or made, respectively, from that entity during the ((special))same reporting period. ((If a political committee files a special report under this section for a contribution or contributions made to a single entity during a special reporting period, the political committee shall also file a special report for each subsequent contribution of any size which is made to that entity during the special reporting period.

(6)))(5) Special reports required by this section shall be delivered electronically, or in written form if an electronic alternative is not available.

(a) The special report required of a contribution recipient under subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered to the commission within forty-eight hours of the time, or on the first working day after:

(i) The qualifying contribution ((of one thousand dollars or more))as provided in subsection (1) of this section is received by the candidate or treasurer; ((the))

(ii) The aggregate received by the candidate or treasurer first equals ((one thousand dollars or more))the qualifying amount; or ((any))

(iii) Any subsequent contribution from the same source is received by the candidate or treasurer.

(b) The special report required of a contributor under subsection (2) of this section or RCW 42.17A.625 shall be delivered to the commission, and the candidate or political committee to whom the contribution or contributions are made, within twenty-four hours of the time, or on the first working day after:

(i) The qualifying contribution is made; ((the))

(ii) The aggregate of contributions made first equals ((one thousand dollars or more))the qualifying amount; or ((any))

(iii) Any subsequent contribution to the same person or entity is made.

(((7)))(6) The special report shall include:

(a) The amount of the contribution or contributions;

(b) The date or dates of receipt;

(c) The name and address of the donor;

(d) The name and address of the recipient;

(e) A statement that the candidate or political committee has received a certification from any partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons making a contribution reportable under this section that:

(i) The contribution is not financed in any part by a foreign national; and

(ii) Foreign nationals are not involved in making decisions regarding the contribution in any way; and

(f) Any other information the commission may by rule require.

(((8)))(7) Contributions reported under this section shall also be reported as required by other provisions of this chapter.

(((9)))(8) The commission shall prepare daily a summary of the special reports made under this section and RCW 42.17A.625.

(((10)))(9) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 42.17A.270.

Sec. 11. RCW 42.17A.345 and 2019 c 428 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each commercial advertiser who has accepted or provided political advertising or electioneering communications during the election campaign shall maintain current books of account and related materials as provided by rule that shall be open for public inspection during normal business hours during the campaign and for a period of no less than five years after the date of the applicable election. The documents and books of account shall specify:

(a) The names and addresses of persons from whom it accepted political advertising or electioneering communications;

(b) The exact nature and extent of the services rendered; and

(c) The total cost and the manner of payment for the services.

(2) At the request of the commission, each commercial advertiser required to comply with subsection (1) of this section shall provide to the commission copies of the information that must be maintained and be open for public inspection pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Any person who purchases political advertising or an electioneering communication from a commercial advertiser must disclose upon request from the commercial advertiser:

(a) That the purchase includes political advertising or an electioneering communication;

(b) The name of the sponsor, if different than the person making the purchase; and

(c) Any other information required for the commercial advertiser to maintain for inspection, as provided by this section or rule.

(4) Any failure to provide the required information in subsection (3) of this section upon request is a violation under this chapter, but such failure may not relieve a commercial advertiser of any of the requirements under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

(1) All advertising related to an election that encourages, directly or indirectly, people to vote for a person who, as of the date the advertisement is first presented to the public, is not a candidate for that office must include the following statement: "This ad encourages you to vote for a person who is not a candidate for this office as of . . . . . (the date the advertising is first presented to the public)."

(2) All advertising related to an election that incorrectly conveys, directly or indirectly, that a person has the endorsement of an entity or individual for an office in an election, when that person does not have that endorsement for that office in that election, must include the following statement: "As of . . . . . (the date the advertising is first presented to the public) this person does not actually have the endorsement of . . . . . (list individuals or entities whose endorsement was stated or implied) for this office in this election."

(3) For the purposes of this section, "candidate" means:

(a) Prior to the end of the filing period under RCW 29A.24.050 for an election, a person who is a candidate for that election as defined in RCW 42.17A.005; and

(b) After the end of the filing period under RCW 29A.24.050 for an election, a person who has filed a declaration of candidacy for office in that election in accordance with chapter 29A.24 RCW.

(4) In a written communication, the information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section must:

(a) Appear in a size equal to or greater than the largest size type otherwise used in the communication, adjacent to the text that:

(i) Encourages a vote, for the disclaimer in subsection (1) of this section; or

(ii) Conveys an endorsement, for the disclaimer in subsection (2) of this section;

(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and

(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter. Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, no text may be before, after, or immediately adjacent to the information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(5) In a communication that is being transmitted by television or other medium that includes a visual image, the information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section must either:

(a) Be clearly spoken; or

(b) Appear in print and be visible for at least four seconds, in letters greater than four percent of the visual screen height, with a reasonable color contrast with the background.

(6) In a communication that does not include a visual image, the information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be clearly spoken.

Sec. 13. RCW 42.17A.405 and 2019 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The contribution limits in this section apply to:

(a) Candidates for legislative office;

(b) Candidates for state office other than legislative office;

(c) Candidates for county office;

(d) Candidates for port district office;

(e) Candidates for city council office;

(f) Candidates for mayoral office;

(g) Candidates for school board office;

(h) Candidates for public hospital district board of commissioners in districts with a population over one hundred fifty thousand;

(i) Persons holding an office in (a) through (h) of this subsection against whom recall charges have been filed or to a political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of a person holding the office;

(j) Caucus political committees;

(k) Bona fide political parties.

(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for a legislative office, county office, city council office, mayoral office, school board office, or public hospital district board of commissioners that in the aggregate exceed eight hundred dollars or to a candidate for a public office in a port district or a state office other than a legislative office that in the aggregate exceed one thousand six hundred dollars for each election in which the candidate is on the ballot or appears as a write-in candidate. Contributions to candidates subject to the limits in this section made with respect to a primary may not be made after the date of the primary. However, contributions to a candidate or a candidate's authorized committee may be made with respect to a primary until thirty days after the primary, subject to the following limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions may only be raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions to candidates subject to the limits in this section made with respect to a general election may not be made after the final day of the applicable election cycle.

(3) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus political committee, may make contributions to a state official, a county official, a city official, a school board member, a public hospital district commissioner, or a public official in a port district against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the state official, county official, city official, school board member, public hospital district commissioner, or public official in a port district during a recall campaign that in the aggregate exceed eight hundred dollars if for a legislative office, county office, school board office, public hospital district office, or city office, or one thousand six hundred dollars if for a port district office or a state office other than a legislative office.

(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona fide political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to a candidate during an election cycle that in the aggregate exceed (i) eighty cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii) forty cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central committee or a legislative district committee.

(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle that when combined with contributions from other county central committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate exceed forty cents times the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.

(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, no bona fide political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to a state official, county official, city official, school board member, public hospital district commissioner, or a public official in a port district against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the state official, county official, city official, school board member, public hospital district commissioner, or a public official in a port district during a recall campaign that in the aggregate exceed (i) eighty cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled to recall the state official if the contributor is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii) forty cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central committee or a legislative district committee.

(b) No official holding an office specified in subsection (1) of this section against whom recall charges have been filed, no authorized committee of the official, and no political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the official may accept contributions from a county central committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle that when combined with contributions from other county central committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate exceed forty cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.

(6) For purposes of determining contribution limits under subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the number of eligible registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the most recent general election in the jurisdiction.

(7) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section, no person other than an individual, bona fide political party, or caucus political committee may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a caucus political committee that in the aggregate exceed eight hundred dollars in a calendar year or to a bona fide political party that in the aggregate exceed four thousand dollars in a calendar year. This subsection does not apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.

(8) For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.125, 42.17A.405 through 42.17A.415, 42.17A.450 through 42.17A.495, 42.17A.500, 42.17A.560, and 42.17A.565, a contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate or of an official specified in subsection (1) of this section against whom recall charges have been filed is considered to be a contribution to the candidate or official.

(9) A contribution received within the twelve-month period after a recall election concerning an office specified in subsection (1) of this section is considered to be a contribution during that recall campaign if the contribution is used to pay a debt or obligation incurred to influence the outcome of that recall campaign.

(10) The contributions allowed by subsection (3) of this section are in addition to those allowed by subsection (2) of this section, and the contributions allowed by subsection (5) of this section are in addition to those allowed by subsection (4) of this section.

(11) RCW 42.17A.125, 42.17A.405 through 42.17A.415, 42.17A.450 through 42.17A.495, 42.17A.500, 42.17A.560, and 42.17A.565 apply to a special election conducted to fill a vacancy in an office specified in subsection (1) of this section. However, the contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special election conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not be counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or election.

(12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no corporation or business entity not doing business in Washington state, no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in Washington state, and no political committee that has not received contributions of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons registered to vote in Washington state during the preceding one hundred eighty days may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a state office candidate, to a state official against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the official. This subsection does not apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.

(13) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no county central committee or legislative district committee may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate specified in subsection (1) of this section, or an official specified in subsection (1) of this section against whom recall charges have been filed, or political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of an official specified in subsection (1) of this section if the county central committee or legislative district committee is outside of the jurisdiction entitled to elect the candidate or recall the official.

(14) No person may accept contributions that exceed the contribution limitations provided in this section.

(15) The following contributions are exempt from the contribution limits of this section:

(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses, for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or political advertising for individual candidates;

(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal organization or fund-raising without direct association with individual candidates; ((or))

(c) An expenditure or contribution for independent expenditures as defined in RCW 42.17A.005 or electioneering communications as defined in RCW 42.17A.005; or

(d) A contribution to a political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of a person holding an office under subsection (1) of this section, only to the extent that the committee:

(i) Does not coordinate with a known or potential candidate for such office, any affiliated committee in support or opposition to any such candidate, or any person with the appointing authority for such office;

(ii) Does not solicit or accept a contribution from a known or potential candidate for such office, any affiliated campaign in support or opposition to the candidate, or any person with the appointing authority for such office; and

(iii) Submits with any report, for which a contribution over the applicable limits set forth in this section is required to be reported under RCW 42.17A.240, a sworn declaration attesting that it has not and will not engage in the activities proscribed under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

Sec. 14. RCW 42.17A.420 and 2019 c 428 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation of this chapter for any person to make, or for any candidate or political committee to accept from any one person, contributions reportable under RCW 42.17A.240 in the aggregate exceeding fifty thousand dollars for any campaign for statewide office or exceeding five thousand dollars for any other campaign subject to the provisions of this chapter within ((twenty-one))30 days of a general election. This subsection does not apply to:

(a) Contributions made by, or accepted from, a bona fide political party as defined in this chapter, excluding the county central committee or legislative district committee;

(b) Contributions made to, or received by, a ballot proposition committee; or

(c) Payments received by an incidental committee.

(2) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 42.17A.270.

Sec. 15. RCW 42.17A.700 and 2019 c 428 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After January 1st and before April 15th of each year, every elected official and every executive state officer ((who served for any portion of the preceding year)) shall electronically file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding calendar year ((or for that portion of the year served)). Any official or officer in office for any period of time in a calendar year, but not in office as of January 1st of the following year, ((may))must electronically file either within sixty days of leaving office or during the January 1st through April 15th reporting period of that following year. Such filing must include information for the portion of the current calendar year for which the official or officer was in office.

(2) Within two weeks of becoming a candidate, every candidate shall file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding twelve months. However, a candidate who already has an existing obligation to file a statement for the preceding year must report for that period.

(3) Within two weeks of appointment, every person appointed to a vacancy in an elective office or executive state officer position during the months of January through November shall file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding twelve months((, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section)). For appointments made in December, the appointee must file the statement of financial affairs between January 1st and January 15th of the immediate following year for the preceding twelve-month period ending on December 31st.

(4) ((A statement of a candidate or appointee filed during the period from January 1st to April 15th shall cover the period from January 1st of the preceding calendar year to the time of candidacy or appointment if the filing of the statement would relieve the individual of a prior obligation to file a statement covering the entire preceding calendar year.

(5))) No individual may be required to file more than once in any calendar year.

(((6)))(5) Each statement of financial affairs filed under this section shall be sworn as to its truth and accuracy.

(((7)))(6) Every elected official and every executive state officer shall file with their statement of financial affairs a statement certifying that they have read and are familiar with RCW 42.17A.555 or 42.52.180, whichever is applicable.

(((8)))(7) For the purposes of this section, the term "executive state officer" includes those listed in RCW 42.17A.705.

(((9)))(8) This section does not apply to incumbents or candidates for a federal office or the office of precinct committee officer.

Sec. 16. RCW 42.17A.705 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind, the secretary of children, youth, and families, the director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Washington state charter school commission, each director of a charter school board, Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of trustees of each community college and each technical college, each member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, state liquor and cannabis board, lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 17. RCW 42.17A.710 and 2019 c 428 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) The statement of financial affairs required by RCW 42.17A.700 shall disclose the following information for the reporting individual and each member of the reporting individual's immediate family:

(a) Occupation, name of employer, and business address;

(b) Each bank account, savings account, and insurance policy in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds twenty thousand dollars at any time during the reporting period; each other item of intangible personal property in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds two thousand dollars during the reporting period; the name, address, and nature of the entity; and the nature and highest value of each direct financial interest during the reporting period;

(c) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of two thousand dollars or more was owed; the original amount of each debt to each creditor; the amount of each debt owed to each creditor as of the date of filing; the terms of repayment of each debt; and the security given, if any, for each such debt. Debts arising from a "retail installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW (retail installment sales act) need not be reported;

(d) Every public or private office, directorship, and position held as trustee; except that an elected official or executive state officer need not report the elected official's or executive state officer's service on a governmental board, commission, association, or functional equivalent, when such service is part of the elected official's or executive state officer's official duties;

(e) All persons for whom any legislation, rule, rate, or standard has been prepared, promoted, or opposed for current or deferred compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payments made to the person reporting by the governmental entity for which the person serves as an elected official or state executive officer or professional staff member for the person's service in office; the description of such actual or proposed legislation, rules, rates, or standards; and the amount of current or deferred compensation paid or promised to be paid;

(f) The name and address of each governmental entity, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from whom compensation has been received in any form of a total value of two thousand dollars or more; the value of the compensation; and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation;

(g) The name of any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which is held any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more; the name or title of that office, directorship, or partnership; the nature of ownership interest; and: (i) With respect to a governmental unit in which the official seeks or holds any office or position, if the entity has received compensation in any form during the preceding twelve months from the governmental unit, the value of the compensation and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation; and (ii) the name of each governmental unit, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from which the entity has received compensation in any form in the amount of ten thousand dollars or more during the preceding twelve months and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation. As used in (g)(ii) of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payment for water and other utility services at rates approved by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission or the legislative authority of the public entity providing the service. With respect to any bank or commercial lending institution in which is held any office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest, it shall only be necessary to report either the name, address, and occupation of every director and officer of the bank or commercial lending institution and the average monthly balance of each account held during the preceding twelve months by the bank or commercial lending institution from the governmental entity for which the individual is an official or candidate or professional staff member, or all interest paid by a borrower on loans from and all interest paid to a depositor by the bank or commercial lending institution if the interest exceeds two thousand four hundred dollars;

(h) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was acquired during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the financial interest and of the consideration given in exchange for that interest;

(i) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was divested during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the consideration received in exchange for that interest, and the name and address of the person furnishing the consideration;

(j) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which a direct financial interest was held. If a description of the property has been included in a report previously filed, the property may be listed, for purposes of this subsection (1)(j), by reference to the previously filed report;

(k) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds twenty thousand dollars, in which a corporation, partnership, firm, enterprise, or other entity had a direct financial interest, in which corporation, partnership, firm, or enterprise a ten percent or greater ownership interest was held;

(l) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which food and beverage in excess of fifty dollars was accepted under RCW 42.52.150(5);

(m) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which items specified in RCW 42.52.010(9) (d) and (f) were accepted; and

(n) Such other information as the commission may deem necessary in order to properly carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter, as the commission shall prescribe by rule.

(2)(a) When judges, prosecutors, sheriffs, or their immediate family members are required to disclose real property that is the personal residence of the judge, prosecutor, or sheriff, the requirements of subsection (1)(h) through (k) of this section may be satisfied for that property by substituting:

(i) The city or town;

(ii) The type of residence, such as a single-family or multifamily residence, and the nature of ownership; and

(iii) Such other identifying information the commission prescribes by rule for the mailing address where the property is located.

(b) Nothing in this subsection relieves the judge, prosecutor, or sheriff of any other applicable obligations to disclose potential conflicts or to recuse oneself.

(3)(a) Where an amount is required to be reported under subsection (1)(a) through (m) of this section, it may be reported within a range as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b)

Code A

Less than thirty thousand dollars;

Code B

At least thirty thousand dollars, but less than sixty thousand dollars;

Code C

At least sixty thousand dollars, but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

Code D

At least one hundred thousand dollars, but less than two hundred thousand dollars;

Code E

At least two hundred thousand dollars, but less than five hundred thousand dollars;

Code F

At least five hundred thousand dollars, but less than seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars;

Code G

At least seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, but less than one million dollars; or

Code H

One million dollars or more.

(c) An amount of stock may be reported by number of shares instead of by market value. No provision of this subsection may be interpreted to prevent any person from filing more information or more detailed information than required.

(4) Items of value given to an official's or employee's spouse, domestic partner, or family member are attributable to the official or employee, except the item is not attributable if an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the spouse, domestic partner, or family member.))The statement of financial affairs that an elected official and executive state officer must file under RCW 42.17A.700 is for the purpose of providing necessary information to the public for transparency and accountability about an official's personal financial interests to help ensure that the official is making decisions in the best interest of the public, not enhancing a personal financial interest, and to help identify potential conflicts of interest. The financial affairs statement, known as an "F-1," requires the disclosure of personal financial information of the filer and the immediate family members of the filer, which means spouse, or registered domestic partner, and dependents. The commission shall establish rules for the information that must be reported in the statement of financial affairs, and shall provide an electronic filing application.

(1) The statement of financial affairs must disclose financial information for the applicable reporting period within certain categories, as provided in this subsection. The commission shall detail in rules the type of information required for each category, and any additional information as necessary to carry out the purpose and policies of this chapter.

(a) Assets held. The statement must include information regarding the assets in which the filer or immediate family members held a direct financial interest, including:

(i) Each bank account and insurance policy with a value of $25,000 or more; and

(ii) Other intangible personal property with a value of $10,000 or more, such as business ownership, securities, and retirement accounts.

(b) Sources of income. The statement must include information regarding the sources of income received by the filer or immediate family members with a value of $2,500 or more. Such information includes:

(i) Payments received, including compensation for employment or other consideration;

(ii) Government benefits received;

(iii) Pensions or other retirement income received; and

(iv) Income earned or provided from assets held by the filer or immediate family member.

(c) Debt. The statement must include information regarding the debt owed by the filer or immediate family members with a value of $2,500 or more, including the creditor's name, the original and present amount owed, the security given, and the terms of repayment. Debts arising from a "retail installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW, the retail installment sales act, are not required to be reported.

(d) Real property. The statement must include information regarding the direct financial interest in real property with a value of $15,000 or more that the filer or immediate family members acquired, sold, or held during the reporting period.

(i) A judge, prosecutor, sheriff, or their immediate family members is not required to disclose the address or legal description of real property that is the personal residence of the judge, prosecutor, or sheriff. It is sufficient to disclose the following information regarding the personal residence of a judge, prosecutor, or sheriff:

(A) The city or town;

(B) The type of residence, such as a single-family or multifamily residence, and the nature of ownership; and

(C) Such other identifying information the commission prescribes by rule for the mailing address where the property is located.

(ii) The limitation on reporting information regarding personal residence may not be used to relieve a judge, prosecutor, or sheriff of any other applicable obligations to disclose potential conflicts or to recuse oneself.

(e) Gifts and other payments. The statement must include information regarding gifts received by the filer, including:

(i) Food and beverages with a value of $50 or more, which were accepted in the ordinary course of meals where attendance is related to the performance of official duties, as provided under RCW 42.52.150(5);

(ii) Payments for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity, as provided under RCW 42.52.010(9)(d);

(iii) Items accepted for which the filer was authorized to accept by law, as provided in RCW 42.52.010(9)(e); and

(iv) Payment attributable to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution, as provided under RCW 42.52.010(9)(f).

(f) Lobbying activities. The statement must include information regarding:

(i) Any individual or entity who provided compensation to the filer or immediate family members to lobby, as defined in this chapter, or otherwise outside the state, except in the filer's or immediate family member's official service to a government entity; and

(ii) Any affiliated entity under (g) of this subsection that provided compensation to persons to lobby, as defined in this chapter, or otherwise outside the state.

(g) Businesses interests and associations. The statement must include information identifying each business, association, or other entity with which the filer or immediate family member holds an office or director position, or ownership interest of at least 10 percent. In addition, the information must include:

(i) The compensation of $15,000 or more provided to each identified entity;

(ii) The real property interest in the state of Washington of $25,000 or more held by each identified entity with which the filer or immediate family member holds at least a 10 percent ownership interest; and

(iii) The value of any payment to each identified entity from the government unit in which the filer or immediate family member holds or seeks an office or position, except for payment for water and other utility services at rates approved by the authority of the public entity providing the service.

(2) Where the disclosure of an amount is required within a category of financial information, the commission may establish value codes that allow for reporting monetary amounts within certain ranges, instead of disclosing the actual amount.

Sec. 18. RCW 42.17A.785 and 2018 c 304 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public disclosure transparency account is created in the ((state treasury))custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from penalties collected pursuant to enforcement actions or settlements under this chapter, including any fees or costs, must be deposited into the account. ((Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used only for the implementation of chapter 304, Laws of 2018 and duties under this chapter, and may not be used to supplant general fund appropriations to the commission.))

(2) Moneys in the account may be used only for the development and implementation of projects designated by the commission for the purpose of improving the usability, transparency, and accessibility of systems and information regarding campaign financing, lobbying activities, and the financial affairs of public officials and candidates, consistent with the purposes of this chapter.  The commission shall approve and update the list of designated projects and include a description, the purpose, and projected cost of each project as part of the commission's regular review of its technology and related business projects strategic priorities plan.

(3) Moneys in the account may not be used for ongoing operating or enforcement expenses and are not intended to be and shall not be used to supplant general fund appropriations to the commission.

(4) Only the commission may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Except for section 11 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. Section 11 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2022.

--- END ---