BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.44.210 and 2019 c 266 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must investigate referrals of alleged child abuse or neglect occurring at the state school for the deaf, including alleged incidents involving students abusing other students; determine whether there is a finding of abuse or neglect; and determine whether a referral to law enforcement is appropriate under this chapter.

(2) The department must send a copy of the investigation report, including the finding, regarding any incidents of alleged child abuse or neglect at the state school for the deaf to the director of the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee. The department may include recommendations to the director and the board of trustees or its successor board for increasing the safety of the school's students.

(3) The department must also investigate referrals of alleged child abuse or neglect occurring at substance use disorder treatment facilities including, but not limited to, incidents involving residents abusing other residents and staff abusing residents; determine whether there is a finding of abuse or neglect; and determine whether a referral to law enforcement is appropriate under this chapter. The department and the department of health must adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---