BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.450 and 2015 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A financial education public-private partnership is established, composed of the following members:

(a) Four members of the legislature, with one member from each caucus of the house of representatives appointed for a two-year term of service by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one member from each caucus of the senate appointed for a two-year term of service by the president of the senate;

(b) Four representatives from the private for-profit and nonprofit financial services sector, including at least one representative from the jumpstart coalition, to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of service by the governor;

(c) Four teachers to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of service by the superintendent of public instruction, with one each representing the elementary, middle, secondary, and postsecondary education sectors;

(d) A representative from the department of financial institutions to be appointed for a two-year term of service by the director;

(e) Two representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, with one involved in curriculum development and one involved in teacher professional development, to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of service by the superintendent; and

(f) The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee.

(2) The chair of the partnership shall be selected by the members of the partnership from among the legislative members.

(3) One-half of the members appointed under subsection (1)(b), (c), and (e) of this section shall be appointed for a one-year term beginning August 1, 2011, and a two-year term thereafter.

(4) ((To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this purpose, the))The partnership ((may))shall hire ((a)) staff ((person)) who shall reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Additional technical and logistical support ((may)), if requested by the partnership, shall be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of financial institutions, the organizations composing the partnership, and other participants in the financial education public-private partnership.

(5) The initial members of the partnership shall be appointed by August 1, 2011.

(6) Legislative members of the partnership shall receive per diem and travel under RCW 44.04.120.

(7) Travel and other expenses of members of the partnership shall be provided by the agency, association, or organization that member represents. Teachers appointed as members by the superintendent of public instruction may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 from funds available in the Washington financial education public-private partnership account. If the attendance of a teacher member at an official meeting of the partnership results in a need for a school district to employ a substitute, payment for the substitute may be made ((by the superintendent of public instruction)) from funds available in the Washington financial education public-private partnership account. A school district must release a teacher member to attend an official meeting of the partnership if the partnership pays the district for a substitute or pays the travel expenses of the teacher member.

(8) This section shall be implemented to the extent funds are available.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.460 and 2015 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The ((task))goal of the financial education public-private partnership is to ((seek out and determine the best methods of equipping students with the knowledge and skills they need, before they become self-supporting, in order for them to make critical decisions regarding their personal finances. The components of personal financial education shall include the achievement of skills and knowledge necessary to make informed judgments and effective decisions regarding))create and support efforts to provide all students with the opportunity to develop the knowledge and skills necessary for making informed judgments and effective decisions about earning, spending, and the management of money and credit.

(b) In accordance with its goal, the principal task of the partnership shall be to prepare school districts and teachers in their efforts to provide, and increase the prevalence of, effective and impactful instruction in financial education.

(2) In carrying out its task((, and to the extent funds are available,)) the partnership shall:

(a) Communicate to school districts and teachers the financial education standards adopted under RCW ((28A.300.462))28A.300.469, other important financial education skills and content knowledge, and strategies for expanding the provision and increasing the quality of financial education instruction;

(b) Review on an ongoing basis financial education curriculum that is available to school districts, including instructional materials and programs, online instructional materials and resources, and school-wide programs that include the important financial skills and content knowledge;

(c) ((Develop))Periodically update evaluation standards and a procedure for endorsing financial education curriculum that the partnership determines should be recommended for use in school districts;

(d) ((Work))Coordinate with the ((office of the superintendent of public instruction to integrate financial education skills and content knowledge into the state learning standards))state board of education to integrate inquiries about the availability of financial education into its annual school district reporting process;

(e) Monitor and provide guidance for professional development for educators regarding financial education, including ways that teachers at different grade levels may integrate financial skills and content knowledge into mathematics, social studies, and other course content areas;

(f) ((Work with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the professional educator standards board to create))Provide professional development in financial education, with input from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the professional educator standards board;

(g) Develop and periodically revise academic guidelines and standards-based protocols for use by classroom volunteers who participate in delivering financial education to students in ((the public)) schools; and

(h) Provide an annual report ((beginning December 1, 2009))each January 15th, as provided in RCW 28A.300.464, to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the committees of the legislature with oversight over K-12 education and higher education.

(3) The partnership may seek federal and private funds to support the school districts in providing access to the materials listed pursuant to RCW 28A.300.468(1), as well as related professional development opportunities for certificated staff.

(4) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.462 and 2011 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) School districts are encouraged to ((voluntarily adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education and)) provide ((students with an opportunity to master the standards))instruction in financial education that is consistent with the state financial learning standards adopted in RCW 28A.300.469 to students in all grades.

(b) In accordance with the requirements of this subsection (1)(b), each school district shall provide all students in grades six through 12 with an opportunity to master the state financial education learning standards adopted in RCW 28A.300.469.

(i) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year, school districts shall offer a financial education course as an elective that is accessible to all students in grades nine through 12.

(ii) Beginning with the 2025-26 school year, school districts shall provide instruction in financial education to all students in grades six through eight.

(2) The financial education public-private partnership, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall provide assistance to school districts regarding curriculum, professional development, instructional programs, and best practices information to implement the requirements of this section.

(((2)))(3) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the ((office of the superintendent of public instruction and the)) financial education public-private partnership, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall provide technical assistance and grants to ((support demonstration projects for district-wide adoption and implementation of the financial education learning standards under this section))school districts for planning and implementing an increase in the availability of standards-based financial education instruction provided to students.

(((3)))(4) School districts may apply on a competitive basis to ((participate as a demonstration project))the partnership for grants. The ((office and the)) partnership shall ((select up to four school districts as demonstration projects, with two districts located in eastern Washington and two districts located in western Washington, if possible))develop criteria for the awarding of grants prior to accepting grant applications.

(((4)))(5) Selected districts must:

(a) ((Adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education as the essential academic learning requirements for financial education and provide))Provide all students in grades six through 12 with an opportunity to master the standards adopted in RCW 28A.300.469;

(b) Make a commitment to integrate financial education into instruction at all grade levels and in all schools in the district;

(c) Establish, in partnership with the financial education public-private partnership, local partnerships within the community to promote financial education in the schools; and

(d) ((Conduct pre and posttesting of students' financial literacy.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with the advice of the financial education public-private partnership, shall provide assistance to the demonstration projects regarding curriculum, professional development, and innovative instructional programs to implement the financial education standards))Include an implementable plan for demonstrating how teachers will receive any required professional development necessary for the teaching of financial education.

(6)(a) The ((selected)) districts selected to receive grants must report ((findings and results of the demonstration project to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and appropriate committees of the legislature annually))data deemed necessary by the financial education public-private partnership and the office of the superintendent of public instruction for evaluating district efforts to plan for and implement an increase in the availability and rigor of financial education instruction provided to students.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, must summarize the reported district data and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature annually, beginning December 1, 2024, with the final report due December 1, 2028, or the December 1st following the cessation of legislative funding for grants in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, whichever is earlier.

(7) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.300.464 and 2009 c 443 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual report from the financial education public-private partnership((, provided funds are available,)) shall include:

(1) ((Results from the jumpstart survey of personal financial literacy;

(2))) Progress toward statewide ((adoption))integration of financial education standards into the curriculum used by school districts;

(((3)))(2) Professional development activities related to equipping teachers with the knowledge and skills to teach financial education;

(((4)))(3) Activities related to financial education curriculum ((development))review; and

(((5)))(4) Any recommendations for statutory changes, policies, or other ((activities))actions to increase and support financial education instruction in ((public)) schools.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.300.468 and 2015 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((After))The financial education public-private partnership, after consulting with ((the financial education public-private partnership,)) the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall make available to all school districts a list of materials that align with the financial education standards integrated into the state learning standards ((pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d)))adopted in RCW 28A.300.469.

(2) School districts shall provide all students in grades ((nine))six through ((twelve))12 the opportunity to ((access))master the financial education standards, whether through a regularly scheduled class period; before or after school; during lunch periods; at library and study time; at home; via online learning opportunities; through career and technical education course equivalencies; or other opportunities. School districts shall publicize the availability of financial education opportunities to students and their families. School districts are encouraged to grant credit toward high school graduation to students who successfully complete financial education courses.

(3) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 28A.310 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2022-23 school year, and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the educational service districts must have staff positions solely dedicated to student financial education.

(2) The staff positions for student financial education shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Two full-time positions, or the equivalent, for the educational service district with the largest population of students served as of the effective date of this section;

(b) One full-time position, or the equivalent, for the educational service district with the second largest population of students served as of the effective date of this section;

(c) One full-time position, or the equivalent, for the two northernmost educational service districts with the majority of their geographic area east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(d) One full-time position, or the equivalent, for the two southernmost educational service districts with the majority of their geographic area east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(e) One full-time position, or the equivalent, for the educational service districts that serve school districts located on the Olympic Peninsula; and

(f) One full-time position, or the equivalent, for the remaining educational service district.

(3) Staff in the positions created under this section shall:

(a) Provide support to school districts and other local education agencies in furthering financial education goals under RCW 28A.150.210;

(b) Coordinate with the financial education public-private partnership created under RCW 28A.300.450;

(c) Facilitate the creation and implementation of professional development for certificated educational staff relating to financial education, in particular the professional development utilized as part of the grant program created under section 7 of this act;

(d) Work to facilitate, and confirm receipt of, specific outreach for financial education training to foster students and homeless youth, students receiving special education services, and tribal communities;

(e) Coordinate with providers in the early childhood education and assistance program for the purpose of providing a curriculum on financial education that can be shared with the parents or legal guardians of participants in the early childhood education and assistance program;

(f) Coordinate with other educational service districts as necessary to accomplish any duties; and

(g) Perform other duties relating to financial education as necessary.

(4) This section expires August 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant program for the purpose of integrating financial education into professional development for certificated staff.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate with the staff of the educational service districts dedicated to student financial education under section 6 of this act when creating or selecting professional development curriculum, developing grant criteria, selecting applicants, and facilitating grants.

(3) Grants provided under this section shall be made available for the 2023-24, 2024-25, and 2025-26 school years, and shall be funded at the amount of 10 dollars per enrolled student in the school district, as determined by the annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(4) For a school district to qualify for a grant under this section, the grant proposal must provide that the grantee integrate financial education into at least seven hours of its current in-person professional development schedule over the course of the entire school year for which the school district receives the grant.

(5) Additional activities permitted for the use of these grants

include, but are not limited to:

(i) Coordinating teachers from across a school district to develop new instructional strategies and to share successful strategies;

(ii) Sharing successful practices across a group of school districts; and

(iii) Facilitating coordination between educational service districts and school districts to provide training.

(6) This section expires August 1, 2026.

--- END ---