BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.413.060 and 2019 c 268 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts must implement this section only in school years for which state funding is appropriated specifically for the purposes of this section and only for the number of days that are funded by the appropriation.

(2)(a) School districts must provide a four-day fundamental course of study on the state standards of practice, as defined by the board, to paraeducators who have not completed the course, either in the district or in another district within the state. ((At least one day of the fundamental course of study must be provided in person.))

(b) School districts must use best efforts to provide the fundamental course of study before the paraeducator begins to work with students and their families, and at a minimum by the following deadlines ((provided in subsection (3) of this section)):

(c) School districts must provide the four-day fundamental course of study by the deadlines provided in this subsection (c).

(i) The first day of the course must be provided within 30 days of a paraeducator's date of hire; however, a school district that has a particular challenge or hardship meeting this deadline for a paraeducator hired after September 1st must provide the first day of the course within 60 days of the paraeducator's date of hire.

(ii) The second day of the course must be provided within six months of a paraeducator's date of hire.

(iii) The third and fourth days of the course must be provided within one year of a paraeducator's date of hire; although, school districts are encouraged to provide the third and fourth days of the course within six months of a paraeducator's date of hire.

(d) At least two days of the four-day fundamental course of study must be provided in person and up to two days of the fundamental course of study may be provided as synchronous online instruction; although, school districts are encouraged to provide the entire four-day fundamental course of study in person.

(3) ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, school districts must provide the fundamental course of study required in subsection (2) of this section by the deadlines provided in (a) of this subsection:

(a)(i) For paraeducators hired on or before September 1st, the first two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided by September 30th of that year and the second two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within six months of the date of hire, regardless of the size of the district; and

(ii) For paraeducators hired after September 1st:

(A) For districts with ten thousand or more students, the first two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within four months of the date of hire and the second two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within six months of the date of hire or by September 1st of the following year, whichever is sooner; and

(B) For districts with fewer than ten thousand students, no later than September 1st of the following year.

(b)(i) For paraeducators hired for the 2018-19 school year, by September 1, 2020; and

(ii) For paraeducators not hired for the 2018-19 school year, but hired for the 2019-20 school year, by September 1, 2021.

(4))) School districts may collaborate with other school districts or educational service districts to meet the requirements of this section.

--- END ---