BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

State legislators may not use public resources or public moneys of the state or its political subdivisions, including money provided by the legislature, for travel costs or any expenses incurred in relation to the legislator's attendance at a conference, seminar, symposium, or other educational or networking event that is not officially sponsored by a governmental entity in Washington state.

Sec. 2. RCW 44.04.120 and 2009 c 549 s 6002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each member of the senate or house of representatives when serving on official legislative business shall be entitled to receive, in lieu of per diem or any other payment, for each day or major portion thereof in which he or she is actually engaged in legislative business or business of the committee, commission, or council, notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, an allowance in an amount fixed by the secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house, respectively, in accordance with applicable rules and resolutions of each body. Such allowance shall be reasonably calculated to reimburse expenses, exclusive of mileage, which are ordinary and necessary in the conduct of legislative business, recognizing cost variances which are encountered in different locales. The allowance authorized shall not exceed the greater of forty-four dollars per day or the maximum daily amount determined under RCW 43.03.050, as now or hereafter amended. In addition, a mileage allowance shall be paid at the rate per mile provided for in RCW 43.03.060, as now or hereafter amended, when authorized by the house, committee, commission, or council of which he or she is a member and on the business of which he or she is engaged.

(2) For purposes of this section, a legislator is not "actually engaged in legislative business" when attending a conference, seminar, symposium, or other educational or networking event that is not officially sponsored by a governmental entity in Washington state.

--- END ---