BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county required or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may establish a process for reviewing proposals to authorize housing and associated services that provide aid and assistance to individuals and families experiencing homelessness outside of the initially designated urban growth areas when:

(a) The proposal is located within one mile of the urban growth area;

(b) The county has determined that a shortage of land available to house and provide services to people experiencing homelessness exists within the urban growth area; and

(c) The county has identified the need for additional land within a homeless housing plan prepared pursuant to chapter 43.185C RCW.

(2) Proposals to provide housing and associated services for people experiencing homelessness pursuant to this section shall make reasonable accommodation for utility hookups for the provision of water, power, and sewerage services and comply with all other duties in chapter 59.20 RCW. In no case may sewerage services be extended beyond urban growth area boundaries to the proposal.

(3) Proposals to provide housing and associated services for people experiencing homelessness pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any maximum density restrictions.

--- END ---