BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary and when necessary to improve either the safety of the public or the preservation of the state transportation system, which are prioritized in the state transportation system policy goals established in RCW 47.04.280, the department may hire new maintenance and preservation employees and rehire former department maintenance and preservation employees, who have acquired immunities to COVID-19. The department may presume the employee has acquired immunities to COVID-19 if the person either signs a declaration stating that the person had contracted COVID-19 or has proof of a positive COVID-19 test.

(2) To the extent possible, such rehired employees must be restored to their previous level of seniority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---