BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

Public schools with students in any of grades kindergarten through eight may not require students to eat or drink outside school buildings. Students may opt in to eating or drinking outside when the outdoor temperature is 60 degrees or above and there is no precipitation. For the purpose of this section, "public schools" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---