BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 42.56.250, all training curriculum and materials for any certified professional guardianship course or program of a public agency must be made available for copying and disclosure, and are not exempt from public disclosure.

--- END ---