BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends that the study provided for in RCW 36.70A.190, and updates to it periodically thereafter, shall assist in ensuring that cities and counties receive adequate funding for planning for new elements of comprehensive plans and for the adoption of implementing ordinances and development regulations pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW for future comprehensive plan updates.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.190 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish a program of technical and financial assistance and incentives to counties and cities to encourage and facilitate the adoption and implementation of comprehensive plans and development regulations throughout the state.

(2)(a) The department shall evaluate the costs for counties and cities to review and revise their comprehensive plans to assure compliance with this chapter. This evaluation must be completed by December 1, 2022, and updated every five years thereafter. The department shall provide a report of the evaluation to the legislature upon completion of the evaluation. The evaluation must include, at a minimum, the costs for each general jurisdiction size and type, and the costs to complete various types of planning requirements, including:

(i) Meeting the requirements of a new goal in RCW 36.70A.020;

(ii) Meeting the requirements of a new comprehensive plan element in RCW 36.70A.070;

(iii) Updating a critical areas ordinance;

(iv) Updating a shoreline master program ordinance;

(v) Making a minor update of a comprehensive plan element;

(vi) Making a complex update of a comprehensive plan element;

(vii) Updating a development regulation; and

(viii) Implementing a new development regulation.

(b) The department shall consult with the Washington state association of counties and the association of Washington cities as part of the process for performing and completing the evaluation.

(3) The department shall develop a priority list and establish funding levels for planning and technical assistance grants both for counties and cities that plan under RCW 36.70A.040. Priority for assistance shall be based on a county's or city's population growth rates, commercial and industrial development rates, the existence and quality of a comprehensive plan and development regulations, and other relevant factors.

(((3)))(4) The department shall develop and administer a grant program to provide direct financial assistance to counties and cities for the preparation of comprehensive plans under this chapter. The department may establish provisions for county and city matching funds to conduct activities under this subsection. Grants may be expended for any purpose directly related to the preparation of a county or city comprehensive plan as the county or city and the department may agree, including, without limitation, the conducting of surveys, inventories and other data gathering and management activities, the retention of planning consultants, contracts with regional councils for planning and related services, and other related purposes.

(((4)))(5) The department shall establish a program of technical assistance:

(a) Utilizing department staff, the staff of other state agencies, and the technical resources of counties and cities to help in the development of comprehensive plans required under this chapter. The technical assistance may include, but not be limited to, model land use ordinances, regional education and training programs, and information for local and regional inventories; and

(b) Adopting by rule procedural criteria to assist counties and cities in adopting comprehensive plans and development regulations that meet the goals and requirements of this chapter. These criteria shall reflect regional and local variations and the diversity that exists among different counties and cities that plan under this chapter.

(((5)))(6) The department shall provide mediation services to resolve disputes between counties and cities regarding, among other things, coordination of regional issues and designation of urban growth areas.

(((6)))(7) The department shall provide planning grants to enhance citizen participation under RCW 36.70A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2022, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---