BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2022 general election, each county auditor must create video recordings of the following election activities for each general election:

(a) The ballot processing activities described in RCW 29A.40.110;

(b) The ballot inspection and duplication activities described in RCW 29A.60.120 and 29A.60.125; and

(c) All activities that a political party observer is entitled to observe under RCW 29A.60.170, whether or not an observer is present.

(2) Video recordings created under this section must be provided to the office of the secretary of state by December 1st following a general election. The video recordings must be stored by the office of the secretary of state and may not be deleted.

(3) Video recordings created under this section are public records subject to disclosure by the secretary of state as provided in chapter 42.56 RCW and other applicable law. All requests for public disclosure must be made to the secretary of state. County auditors are not required to disclose the video recordings created under this section.

(4) The secretary of state must make available to legislators the video recordings created under this section by January 1st following a general election.

(5) The secretary of state shall provide funding to county auditors to implement the requirements of this section.

--- END ---