BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish a sustainable equitable affordable measured board and appoint 10 to 20 members with a wide range of relevant experience to provide oversight and guide local jurisdictions in achieving goals for expeditious sustainable affordable housing.

(2) The sustainable equitable affordable measured board will be organized to work with jurisdictions and stakeholders to establish a statewide plan to achieve sustainable, equitable, and affordable housing for the state of Washington.

(a) The sustainable equitable affordable measured board shall oversee, guide, and measure outcomes of sustainable, equitable, and affordable housing at the state level.

(b) Counties shall work to coordinate with cities within their boundaries to achieve goals of sustainable, equitable, and affordable housing.

(c) The Puget Sound regional council shall be designated to coordinate oversight for their four-county region.

(3) These entities will track outcomes including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The number of affordable units built and at what affordability level;

(b) Policy changes made at regional and city levels;

(c) Net tax income achieved by city and state due to increased construction; and

(d) Creation of options for local jurisdictions to choose from that achieve local choice while meeting goals for sustainable, equitable, and affordable housing.

(4) Beginning December 2023, the sustainable equitable affordable measured board shall report annually on progress and recommendations for the next steps to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the governor. The report shall include key aspects of finance options, replacement of existing affordable housing with new affordable housing, sustainable housing construction techniques, and any other recommendations the sustainable equitable affordable measured board deems of value.

(5) After two years from the effective date of this section, the sustainable equitable affordable measured board's responsibility shall be expanded to require a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor on solutions for sustainable, equitable, and affordable housing ownership opportunities, including missing middle and equitable ownership opportunities.

--- END ---