BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.533 and 2020 c 330 s 1 and 2020 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.

(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by ((seventy-five))75 percent.

(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least ((twenty))20 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ((ten))10 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least ((twenty))20 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ((ten))10 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e);

(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.

For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional ((twenty-four))24 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all impaired driving enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other impaired driving enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

An offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least ((twenty))20 years, or both;

(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ((ten))10 years, or both;

(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;

(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to all felony crimes;

(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced;

(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before any earned early release time is credited to the offender;

(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.

(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted, solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

(10)(a) For a person age ((eighteen))18 or older convicted of any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by ((one hundred twenty-five))125 percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender.

(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of the felony offense is an element of the offense.

(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW 9.94A.535.

(11) An additional ((twelve))12 months and one day shall be added to the standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons under RCW 9.94A.834.

(12) An additional ((twelve))12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.831.

(13) An additional ((twelve))12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 who is an occupant in the defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other minor child enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. If the addition of a minor child enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions.

(14) An additional ((twelve))12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.832.

(15) An additional 12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.520, vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.522, felony driving under the influence under RCW 46.61.502(6), or felony physical control under the influence under RCW 46.61.504(6), if the defendant was under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug at the time of the offense. This enhancement shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. If the addition of an enhancement under this subsection increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement shall not be reduced.

(16) Regardless of any provisions in this section, if a person is being sentenced in adult court for a crime committed under age ((eighteen))18, the court has full discretion to depart from mandatory sentencing enhancements and to take the particular circumstances surrounding the defendant's youth into account.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.5055 and 2020 c 330 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ((twenty-four))24 consecutive hours nor more than ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court, in its discretion, may order not less than ((fifteen))15 days of electronic home monitoring or a ((ninety-day))90-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device or other separate alcohol monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than ((three hundred fifty dollars))$350 nor more than ((five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars))$5,000. $350 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ((forty-eight))48 consecutive hours nor more than ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court, in its discretion, may order not less than ((thirty))30 days of electronic home monitoring or a ((one hundred twenty))120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program testing as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than ((five hundred dollars))$500 nor more than ((five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars))$5,000. $500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(2) One prior offense in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ((thirty))30 days nor more than ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days and ((sixty))60 days of electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and ((sixty))60 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(a)(i), the court may order a minimum of either ((one hundred eighty))180 days of electronic home monitoring or a ((one hundred twenty-day))120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than ((five hundred dollars))$500 nor more than ((five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars))$5,000. $500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ((forty-five))45 days nor more than ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days and ((ninety))90 days of electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ((ninety))90 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(b)(i), the court may order a minimum of either six months of electronic home monitoring or a ((one hundred twenty-day))120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than ((seven hundred fifty dollars))$750 nor more than ((five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars))$5,000. $750 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(3) Two prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ((ninety))90 days nor more than ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and ((one hundred twenty))120 days of electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and ((one hundred twenty))120 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of ninety days of imprisonment and ((one hundred twenty))120 days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order ((three hundred sixty))360 days of electronic home monitoring or a ((three hundred sixty-day))360-day period of 24/7 sobriety monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000 nor more than ((five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars))$5,000. $1,000 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ((one hundred twenty))120 days nor more than ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and ((one hundred fifty))150 days of electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and ((one hundred fifty))150 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of ((one hundred twenty))120 days of imprisonment and ((one hundred fifty))150 days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order ((three hundred sixty))360 days of electronic home monitoring or a ((three hundred sixty-day))360-day period of 24/7 sobriety monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than ((one thousand five hundred dollars))$1,500 nor more than ((five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars))$5,000. $1,500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(4) Three or more prior offenses in ten years. A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:

(a) The person has three or more prior offenses within ((ten))10 years; or

(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:

(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or

(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).

(5) Monitoring. (a) Ignition interlock device. The court shall require any person convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.

(b) Monitoring devices. If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an alternative source identified by the court. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.

(c) 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In any county or city where a 24/7 sobriety program is available and verified by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the court shall:

(i) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in lieu of such period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring;

(ii) Order the person to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section; or

(iii) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in addition to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(6) Penalty for having a minor passenger in vehicle. If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while one or more passengers under the age of ((sixteen))16 were in the vehicle, the court shall:

(a) Order the use of an ignition interlock or other device for an additional ((twelve))12 months for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 when the person is subject to the penalties under subsection (1)(a), (2)(a), or (3)(a) of this section; and order the use of an ignition interlock device for an additional ((eighteen))18 months for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 when the person is subject to the penalties under subsection (1)(b), (2)(b), (3)(b), or (4) of this section;

(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional ((twenty-four))24 hours of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16, and a fine of not less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000 and not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000 for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen. One thousand dollars))16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;

(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional five days of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16, and a fine of not less than ((two thousand dollars))$2,000 and not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000 for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen. One thousand dollars))16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;

(d) In any case in which the person has two prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional ((ten))10 days of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16, and a fine of not less than ((three thousand dollars))$3,000 and not more than ((ten thousand dollars))$10,000 for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen. One thousand dollars))16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(7) Penalty for being under the influence of multiple intoxicants. If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug the court shall order:

(a) The use of an ignition interlock or other device for an additional 12 months;

(b) An additional 10 days of imprisonment to be served consecutively to all other sentencing provisions; and

(c) An additional $1,000 fine.

(8) Other items courts must consider while setting penalties. In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property;

(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers;

(c) Whether the driver was driving in the opposite direction of the normal flow of traffic on a multiple lane highway, as defined by RCW 46.04.350, with a posted speed limit of ((forty-five))45 miles per hour or greater; and

(d) Whether a child passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 was an occupant in the driver's vehicle.

(((8)))(9)Treatment and information school. An offender punishable under this section is subject to the substance use disorder assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(((9)))(10)Driver's license privileges of the defendant. (a) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:

(i) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(A) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the department for ((ninety))90 days or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a ((ninety-day))90-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for fewer than two days;

(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for less than one year; or

(C) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;

(ii) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:

(A) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for one year or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a ((one hundred twenty))120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license revocation be for fewer than four days;

(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for ((nine hundred))900 days; or

(C) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or

(iii) Penalty for refusing to take test. If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(A) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years;

(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years; or

(C) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.

(b)(i) The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection (((9)))(10) for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.

(ii) If a person has already served a suspension, revocation, or denial under RCW 46.20.3101 for a period equal to or greater than the period imposed under this subsection (9), the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension or revocation under this subsection provided the person has completed the requirements under RCW 46.20.311 and paid the probationary license fee under RCW 46.20.355 by the date specified in the notice under RCW 46.20.245, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice from the court under RCW 36.28A.390 that a participant has been removed from a 24/7 sobriety program, the department must resume any suspension, revocation, or denial that had been terminated early under this subsection due to participation in the program, granting credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 or this section arising out of the same incident.

(d) Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find, on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit, or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license, permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.

(e) For purposes of this subsection (((9)))(10), the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(((10)))(11)Probation of driving privilege. After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.

(((11)))(12)Conditions of probation. (a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state without proof of liability insurance or other financial responsibility for the future pursuant to RCW 46.30.020; (iii) not driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or a THC concentration of 5.00 nanograms per milliliter of whole blood or higher, within two hours after driving; (iv) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol or drug concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drug; and (v) not driving a motor vehicle in this state without a functioning ignition interlock device as required by the department under RCW 46.20.720. The court may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, substance use disorder treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined for ((thirty))30 days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the court for ((thirty))30 days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial then in effect shall be extended by ((thirty))30 days. The court shall notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(((12)))(13)Waiver of electronic home monitoring. A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system. However, if a court determines that an alcohol monitoring device utilizing wireless reporting technology is reasonably available, the court may require the person to obtain such a device during the period of required electronic home monitoring;

(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, use of an ignition interlock device, the 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days.

(((13)))(14)Extraordinary medical placement. An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(((14)))(15)Definitions. For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:

(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.25.110 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(1) or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(vi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(vii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a careless or reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(viii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.09.470(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ix) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.10.490(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(x) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(xi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(xii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(xiii) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (x), (xi), or (xii) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(xiv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance;

(xv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(xvi) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant participate in a chemical dependency treatment program; or

(xvii) A deferred sentence imposed in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred sentence was imposed was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (((14)))(15)(a), the subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;

(b) "Treatment" means substance use disorder treatment licensed or certified by the department of health;

(c) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current offense; and

(d) "Within ((ten))10 years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within ((ten))10 years before or after the arrest for the current offense.

(((15)))(16) All fines imposed by this section apply to adult offenders only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) In a prosecution for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.520, vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.522, driving under the influence under RCW 46.61.502, whether a gross misdemeanor or felony, or actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence under RCW 46.61.504, whether a gross misdemeanor or felony, the prosecution may file a special allegation that the defendant committed the offense while under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug when there is sufficient admissible evidence of this circumstance.

(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed the offense while under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug. If a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to whether the defendant committed the offense while under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug. If no jury is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether the defendant committed the offense while under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.720 and 2020 c 330 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Ignition interlock restriction. The department shall require that a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device:

(a) Pretrial release. Upon receipt of notice from a court that an ignition interlock device restriction has been imposed under RCW 10.21.055;

(b) Ignition interlock driver's license. As required for issuance of an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385;

(c) Deferred prosecution. Upon receipt of notice from a court that the person is participating in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 for a violation of:

(i) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(ii) RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person would be required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person in the event of a conviction;

(d) Post conviction. After any applicable period of mandatory suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, or upon fulfillment of day-for-day credit under RCW 46.61.5055(((9)))(10)(b)(ii) for a suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges:

(i) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance; or

(ii) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person is required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person; or

(e) Court order. Upon receipt of an order by a court having jurisdiction that a person charged or convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific alcohol set point at which the ignition interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time for which ignition interlock use will be required.

(2) Alcohol set point. Unless otherwise specified by the court for a restriction imposed under subsection (1)(e) of this section, the ignition interlock device shall have an alcohol set point that prevents the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.020 or more.

(3) Duration of restriction. A restriction imposed under:

(a) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall remain in effect until:

(i) The court has authorized the removal of the device under RCW 10.21.055; or

(ii) The department has imposed a restriction under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.

(b) Subsection (1)(b) of this section remains in effect during the validity of any ignition interlock driver's license that has been issued to the person.

(c) Subsection (1)(c)(i) or (d)(i) of this section shall be for no less than:

(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this subsection, a period of one year;

(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(i) of this subsection, a period of five years;

(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(ii) of this subsection, a period of ((ten))10 years.

The restriction of a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and who committed the offense while one or more passengers under the age of ((sixteen))16 were in the vehicle shall be extended for an additional period as required by RCW 46.61.5055(6)(a).

The restriction of a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and who committed the offense while under the influence of a combination of intoxicating liquor and any drug or a combination of more than one drug shall be extended for an additional period as required by RCW 46.61.5055(7)(a).

(d) Subsection (1)(c)(ii) or (d)(ii) of this section shall be for a period of no less than six months.

(e) The period of restriction under (c) or (d) of this subsection shall be extended by ((one hundred eighty))180 days whenever the department receives notice that the restricted person has been convicted under RCW 46.20.740 or 46.20.750. If the period of restriction under (c) or (d) of this subsection has been fulfilled and cannot be extended, the department must add a new ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day restriction that is imposed from the date of conviction and is subject to the requirements for removal under subsection (4) of this section.

(f) Subsection (1)(e) of this section shall remain in effect for the period of time specified by the court.

(g) The period of restriction under (c) and (d) of this subsection based on incidents occurring on or after June 9, 2016, must be tolled for any period in which the person does not have an ignition interlock device installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person unless the person receives a determination from the department that the person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device due to a physical disability. The department's determination that a person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial evidence. This determination is subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction. The department may charge a person seeking a medical exemption under this subsection a reasonable fee for the assessment.

(4) Requirements for removal. A restriction imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or approved by the department, certifying the following:

(a) That there have been none of the following incidents in the ((one hundred eighty))180 consecutive days prior to the date of release:

(i) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more unless a subsequent test performed within ((ten))10 minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.04 and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;

(ii) Failure to take any random test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the vehicle was not occupied by the driver at the time of the missed test;

(iii) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of lower than 0.020 unless a subsequent test performed within ((ten))10 minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.020, and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;

(iv) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device; or

(v) Removal of the ignition interlock device by a person other than an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol; and

(b) That the ignition interlock device was inspected at the conclusion of the ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day period by an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol and no evidence was found that the device was tampered with in the manner described in RCW 46.20.750.

(5) Day-for-day credit. (a) The time period during which a person has an ignition interlock device installed in order to meet the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.

(b) The department must also give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period, beginning from the date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates, other than those subject to the employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.

(c) If the day-for-day credit granted under this subsection equals or exceeds the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident, and the person has already met the requirements for removal of the device under subsection (4) of this section, the department may waive the requirement that a device be installed or that the person again meet the requirements for removal.

(6) Employer exemption. (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the installation of an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours. When the department receives a declaration under this subsection, it shall attach or imprint a notation on the person's driving record stating that the employer exemption applies.

(b) The employer exemption does not apply when the employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to and from employment.

(7) Ignition interlock device revolving account. In addition to any other costs associated with the use of an ignition interlock device imposed on the person restricted under this section, the person shall pay an additional fee of ((twenty-one dollars))$21 per month. Payments must be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The company shall remit the additional fee to the department to be deposited into the ignition interlock device revolving account, except that the company may retain ((twenty-five))25 cents per month of the additional fee to cover the expenses associated with administering the fee. The department may waive the monthly fee if the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010.

(8) Foreign jurisdiction. For a person restricted under this section who is residing outside of the state of Washington, the department may accept verification of installation of an ignition interlock device by an ignition interlock company authorized to do business in the jurisdiction in which the person resides, provided the device meets any applicable requirements of that jurisdiction. The department may waive one or more requirements for removal under subsection (4) of this section if compliance with the requirement or requirements would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction, provided the person is in compliance with any equivalent requirement of that jurisdiction. The department may waive the monthly fee required by subsection (7) of this section if collection of the fee would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction.

--- END ---