BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.335 and 2021 c 169 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning December 1, 2020, and until July 1, 2029, cannabis retailer licenses that have been subject to forfeiture, revocation, or cancellation by the board, or cannabis retailer licenses that were not previously issued by the board but could have been issued ((without exceeding the limit on the statewide number of cannabis retailer licenses established before January 1, 2020,)) by the board, may be issued or reissued to an applicant who meets the cannabis retailer license requirements of this chapter.

(b) Beginning in calendar year 2022 and each calendar year through 2029, the board shall make available 38 new cannabis retailer licenses per calendar year to applicants who qualify as social equity applicants.

(c) Beginning in calendar year 2022 and each calendar year through 2029, the board shall make available 25 new marijuana producer and/or processor licenses per calendar year to applicants who qualify as social equity applicants. Applicants for licenses authorized in this subsection (1)(c) may choose to apply for a producer license, a processor license, or both a producer and processor license. Nothing in this subsection prevents each of the 25 persons licensed pursuant to this section per calendar year from being issued both a producer and processor license if they so choose and qualify.

(d) All licenses issued under the social equity program in this section may be for premises located within any city, county, or town in the state that permits the cannabis business activity at the proposed location, regardless of:

(i) Whether a license was originally allocated to or issued in another county, city, or town; and

(ii) The maximum number of retail outlets established by the board for each county under RCW 69.50.345.

(2)(a) In order to be considered for a retail license, a producer license, or a processor license under subsection (1) of this section, an applicant must be a social equity applicant and submit ((a social equity plan))documentation to verify qualification status along with other cannabis ((retailer)) license application requirements to the board. If the application proposes ownership by more than one person, then at least fifty-one percent of the proposed ownership structure must reflect the qualifications of a social equity applicant.

(b) Persons holding an existing cannabis retailer license or title certificate for a cannabis retailer business in a local jurisdiction subject to a ban or moratorium on cannabis retail businesses may apply for a retail license under this section.

(3)(a) In determining the issuance of a license among applicants, the board ((may prioritize applicants based on the extent to which the application addresses the components of the social equity plan)), in consultation with the office of equity and community organizations, shall select a third-party contractor to prioritize applicants and the board shall review applications based on the priority set by the third-party contractor. The third-party contractor shall prioritize applicants based on a scoring rubric developed by the board with input from the social equity in cannabis task force and approved by the office of equity.

(b) The board may deny any application submitted under this subsection if the board determines that((:

(i) The application does not meet social equity goals or does not meet social equity plan requirements; or

(ii) The))the application does not ((otherwise)) meet the licensing requirements of this section or chapter.

(4) The board may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules may include strategies for receiving advice on the social equity program from individuals the program is intended to benefit. Rules ((may))shall also require that licenses awarded under this section be transferred or sold only to individuals or groups of individuals who comply with the requirements for initial licensure as a social equity applicant ((with a social equity plan under this section))for a period of at least five years from the date of transfer or sale.

(5) The annual fee for issuance, reissuance, or renewal for any license under this section must be ((equal to the fee established in RCW 69.50.325))waived.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Cannabis" has the meaning provided for "marijuana" under this chapter.

(b) "Disproportionately impacted area" means a census tract or comparable geographic area that satisfies the following criteria, which may be further defined in rule by the board after consultation with the ((commission on African American affairs))office of equity and other agencies, commissions, and community members as determined by the board:

(i) The area has a high poverty rate;

(ii) The area has a high rate of participation in income-based federal or state programs;

(iii) The area has a high rate of unemployment; and

(iv) The area has a high rate of arrest, conviction, or incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.

(c) "Social equity applicant" means:

(i) An applicant who has at least fifty-one percent ownership and control by one or more individuals who have resided in a disproportionately impacted area for ((a period of time defined in rule by the board after consultation with the commission on African American affairs and other commissions, agencies, and community members as determined by the board;

(ii)))at least six months out of the last 60 years;

(ii) An applicant who has at least 51 percent ownership and control by at least one individual who was disproportionately harmed by the war on drugs as evidenced by rates of arrest for marijuana possession offenses;

(iii) An applicant who has at least fifty-one percent ownership and control by at least one individual who has been convicted of a cannabis offense, a drug offense, or is a family member of such an individual; or

(((iii)))(iv) An applicant who meets criteria defined in rule by the board after consultation with the ((commission on African American affairs and other commissions))office of equity, agencies, and community members as determined by the board.

(d) "Social equity goals" means:

(i) Increasing the number of cannabis ((retailer)) licenses held by social equity applicants from disproportionately impacted areas; and

(ii) Reducing accumulated harm suffered by individuals, families, and local areas subject to severe impacts from the historical application and enforcement of cannabis prohibition laws.

(((e) "Social equity plan" means a plan that addresses at least some of the elements outlined in this subsection (6)(e), along with any additional plan components or requirements approved by the board following consultation with the task force created in RCW 69.50.336. The plan may include:

(i) A statement that the social equity applicant qualifies as a social equity applicant and intends to own at least fifty-one percent of the proposed cannabis retail business or applicants representing at least fifty-one percent of the ownership of the proposed business qualify as social equity applicants;

(ii) A description of how issuing a cannabis retail license to the social equity applicant will meet social equity goals;

(iii) The social equity applicant's personal or family history with the criminal justice system including any offenses involving cannabis;

(iv) The composition of the workforce the social equity applicant intends to hire;

(v) Neighborhood characteristics of the location where the social equity applicant intends to operate, focusing especially on disproportionately impacted areas; and

(vi) Business plans involving partnerships or assistance to organizations or residents with connection to populations with a history of high rates of enforcement of cannabis prohibition.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.335, beginning on the effective date of this section through December 31, 2029, the board may not issue any new cannabis producer, processor, or retailer licenses.

(2) Beginning on the effective date of this section through December 31, 2029, new cannabis licenses under this chapter may be issued only to social equity applicants as described in RCW 69.50.335.

(3) Beginning January 1, 2030, at least 50 percent of the total number of new cannabis licenses issued under this chapter must be issued to applicants who qualify as social equity applicants as described in RCW 69.50.335.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.345 and 2019 c 393 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The state liquor and cannabis board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for marijuana producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce marijuana for sale by marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The state liquor and cannabis board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those marijuana producers who intend to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements if the marijuana producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current marijuana producers do not use all the increased production space, the state liquor and cannabis board may reopen the license period for new marijuana producer license applicants but only to those marijuana producers who agree to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to marijuana producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new marijuana producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) ((Determining))Except as provided in RCW 69.50.335, determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(a) Population distribution;

(b) Security and safety issues;

(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(d) The number of retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The state liquor and cannabis board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a marijuana producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the state liquor and cannabis board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and their labeling requirements;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the state liquor and cannabis board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within Washington state;

(b) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to the advertising;

(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in the advertising; and

(d) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical marijuana endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, establishing accreditation requirements for testing laboratories used by licensees to demonstrate compliance with standards adopted by the state liquor and cannabis board, and prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the state liquor and cannabis board.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.345 and 2019 c 393 s 2 and 2019 c 277 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The state liquor and cannabis board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for marijuana producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce marijuana for sale by marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The state liquor and cannabis board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those marijuana producers who intend to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements if the marijuana producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current marijuana producers do not use all the increased production space, the state liquor and cannabis board may reopen the license period for new marijuana producer license applicants but only to those marijuana producers who agree to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to marijuana producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new marijuana producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) ((Determining))Except as provided in RCW 69.50.335, determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(a) Population distribution;

(b) Security and safety issues;

(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(d) The number of retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The state liquor and cannabis board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a marijuana producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the state liquor and cannabis board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and their labeling requirements;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the state liquor and cannabis board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within Washington state;

(b) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to the advertising;

(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in the advertising; and

(d) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical marijuana endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the state liquor and cannabis board.

Sec. 5. RCW 69.50.540 and 2021 c 334 s 986 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis or as provided in this subsection:

(a) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the health care authority to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) Fifty thousand dollars to the health care authority for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(d)(i) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(ii) One million three hundred twenty-three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 to the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320 for the development and administration of the marijuana authorization database by the department of health;

(iii) Two million four hundred fifty-three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 and two million four hundred twenty-three thousand dollars for fiscal years 2021, 2022, and 2023 to the Washington state patrol for a drug enforcement task force. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium; and

(iv) Ninety-eight thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the department of ecology for research on accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories;

(e) Four hundred sixty-five thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020, four hundred sixty-four thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021, two hundred seventy thousand dollars in fiscal year 2022, and two hundred seventy-six thousand dollars in fiscal year 2023 to the department of ecology for implementation of accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories;

(f) One hundred eighty-nine thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 to the department of health for rule making regarding compassionate care renewals;

(g) Eight hundred eight thousand dollars for each of fiscal years 2020 through 2023 to the department of health for the administration of the marijuana authorization database;

(h) Six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020, six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021, six hundred twenty-one thousand dollars for fiscal year 2022, and six hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars for fiscal year 2023 to the department of agriculture for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in marijuana;

(i) ((One million six hundred fifty thousand dollars for fiscal year 2022 and one million six hundred fifty thousand dollars for fiscal year 2023))Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars annually to the department of commerce to fund ((the marijuana social equity technical assistance competitive grant program))cannabis social equity grants and low-interest loans under RCW 43.330.540; and

(j) One ((hundred sixty-three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2022 and one hundred fifty-nine thousand dollars for fiscal year 2023 to the department of commerce to establish a roster of mentors as part of the cannabis social equity technical assistance grant program under Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1443 (cannabis industry/equity) [chapter 169, Laws of 2021]))million one hundred thousand dollars annually to the department of commerce to make available technical assistance to cannabis license applicants and licensees within the cannabis social equity program, including establishing a roster of mentors to provide technical assistance; and

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the health care authority for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) For each fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and

(B) The Washington poison control center.

(ii) For each fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) Up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) For each fiscal year, except for the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. For each fiscal year, except for the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c). It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For each fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); and

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018, 2019, 2020, and 2021, and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.330.540 and 2021 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The cannabis social equity ((technical assistance)) grant, low-interest loan, and technical assistance program is established and is to be administered by the department.

(2)(a) The ((cannabis social equity technical assistance grant)) program ((must))may award grants to:

(i) ((Cannabis license applicants who are social equity applicants submitting social equity plans under RCW 69.50.335; and

(ii))) Cannabis licensees holding a license issued after June 30, 2020, and before July 25, 2021, who meet the social equity applicant criteria under RCW 69.50.335; and

(ii) Cannabis producers, processors, and retailers licensed under the cannabis social equity program in RCW 69.50.335.

(b) Eligible activities for grants under this subsection (2) include, but are not limited to:

(i) Fees associated with a loan;

(ii) Costs associated with complying with a state or local licensing requirement; and

(iii) Capital and equipment costs.

(c) Grant recipients under this subsection (2) must demonstrate completion of their project within 12 months of receiving a grant, unless a grant recipient requests, and the department approves, additional time to complete the project.

(d) Subject to available funding, the department may issue grant awards of up to $100,000 per eligible applicant.

(e) Eligible applicants may apply for one grant annually, not to exceed a total of three grant awards.

(3) ((The department must award grants primarily based on the strength of the social equity plans submitted by cannabis license applicants and cannabis licensees holding a license issued after June 30, 2020, and before July 25, 2021, but may also consider additional criteria if deemed necessary or appropriate by the department.)) Technical assistance activities eligible for funding include, but are not limited to:

(a) Assistance navigating the cannabis licensure process;

(b) Cannabis-business specific education and business plan development;

(c) Regulatory compliance training;

(d) Financial management training and assistance in seeking financing; and

(e) ((Strengthening a social equity plan; and

(f))) Connecting social equity applicants with established industry members and tribal cannabis enterprises and programs for mentoring and other forms of support.

(4) The department may contract to establish a roster of mentors who are available to support and advise social equity applicants and current licensees who meet the social equity applicant criteria under RCW 69.50.335. Contractors under this section must:

(a) Have knowledge and experience demonstrating their ability to effectively advise eligible applicants and licensees in navigating the state's licensing and regulatory framework or on producing and processing cannabis;

(b) Be a business that is at least 51((% [percent]))percent minority or woman-owned; ((and))

(c) Meet department reporting and invoicing requirements((.

(5))); and

(d) Be approved through the office of equity.

(5)(a) The department may work with participating lenders to make low-interest loans available for licensees who are issued a license under the cannabis social equity program.

(b) The department may reserve a portion of funds allocated under RCW 69.50.540 or received under this section to support loan loss reserves, collateral supports, or other efforts to reduce underwriting risk for participating lenders.

(c) Eligible business-related expenses for applicants under this subsection (5) include:

(i) Capital and equipment costs;

(ii) Commercial property including, but not limited to, purchases and improvements; and

(iii) Operating lines of credit and other costs associated with industry accepted lending practices.

(6) Funding for the cannabis social equity ((technical assistance)) grant, low-interest loan, and technical assistance program must be provided through the dedicated marijuana account under RCW 69.50.540. Additionally, the department may solicit, receive, and expend private contributions to support the ((grant)) program.

(((6)))(7) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

(((7)))(8) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis" has the meaning provided for "marijuana" under RCW 69.50.101.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---