BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An officer or board member must complete a training course regarding federal and state fair housing laws:

(a) Within 60 days of taking office or being elected to the board; and

(b) At intervals of no more than three years for as long as the officer or board member holds the office or serves on the board.

(2)(a) Upon completing the training, an officer or board member must provide to the association a certificate or similar document that, at a minimum, lists the person or entity that conducted the training, contains a brief description of the training, and verifies the date when the officer or board member completed the training.

(b) If no certificate or similar document is made available upon the completion of the training, an officer or board member may verify the completion of the training by an affidavit that contains the information required under (a) of this subsection.

(c) Certificates and affidavits provided to the association under this subsection must be kept as part of the association records for a period of at least five years.

(3) Training required under subsection (1) of this section may be completed remotely with technology including, but not limited to, internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An officer or board member must complete a training course regarding federal and state fair housing laws:

(a) Within 60 days of taking office or being elected to the board; and

(b) At intervals of no more than three years for as long as the officer or board member holds the office or serves on the board.

(2)(a) Upon completing the training, an officer or board member must provide to the association a certificate or similar document that, at a minimum, lists the person or entity that conducted the training, contains a brief description of the training, and verifies the date when the officer or board member completed the training.

(b) If no certificate or similar document is made available upon the completion of the training, an officer or board member may verify the completion of the training by an affidavit that contains the information required under (a) of this subsection.

(c) Certificates and affidavits provided to the association under this subsection must be kept as part of the association records for a period of at least five years.

(3) Training required under subsection (1) of this section may be completed remotely with technology including, but not limited to, internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An officer or board member must complete a training course regarding federal and state fair housing laws:

(a) Within 60 days of taking office or being elected to the board; and

(b) At intervals of no more than three years for as long as the officer or board member holds the office or serves on the board.

(2)(a) Upon completing the training, an officer or board member must provide to the association a certificate or similar document that, at a minimum, lists the person or entity that conducted the training, contains a brief description of the training, and verifies the date when the officer or board member completed the training.

(b) If no certificate or similar document is made available upon the completion of the training, an officer or board member may verify the completion of the training by an affidavit that contains the information required under (a) of this subsection.

(c) Certificates and affidavits provided to the association under this subsection must be kept as part of the association records for a period of at least five years.

(3) Training required under subsection (1) of this section may be completed remotely with technology including, but not limited to, internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 64.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An officer or board member must complete a training course regarding federal and state fair housing laws:

(a) Within 60 days of taking office or being elected to the board; and

(b) At intervals of no more than three years for as long as the officer or board member holds the office or serves on the board.

(2)(a) Upon completing the training, an officer or board member must provide to the association a certificate or similar document that, at a minimum, lists the person or entity that conducted the training, contains a brief description of the training, and verifies the date when the officer or board member completed the training.

(b) If no certificate or similar document is made available upon the completion of the training, an officer or board member may verify the completion of the training by an affidavit that contains the information required under (a) of this subsection.

(c) Certificates and affidavits provided to the association under this subsection must be kept as part of the association records for a period of at least five years.

(3) Training required under subsection (1) of this section may be completed remotely with technology including, but not limited to, internet-based training.

--- END ---