BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.02.010 and 1994 c 216 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any contiguous area containing not less than one thousand five hundred inhabitants lying outside the limits of an incorporated city or town may become incorporated as a city or town operating under Title 35 or 35A RCW as provided in this chapter((: PROVIDED, That no area which lies within five air miles of the boundary of any city having a population of fifteen thousand or more shall be incorporated which contains less than three thousand inhabitants)).

--- END ---