BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.34.010 and 1997 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state capitol committee is established as an interbranch advisory committee of state government. The governor or the governor's designee, ((the lieutenant governor,)) the secretary of state, ((and the commissioner of public lands,))two members of the state senate, and two members of the house of representatives, ex officio, shall constitute the ((state capitol)) committee. The members of the senate and house of representatives must be appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, respectively, from each of the two largest caucuses in the respective bodies.

(2) The committee shall:

(a) Make recommendations to the legislature and the governor that contribute to the attainment of architectural, historical, aesthetic, functional, and environmental excellence in design and maintenance of the state capitol public and historic facilities;

(b) Receive and share advice and recommendations from the work group; and

(c) Advise the department on amendments and modifications to the comprehensive plan for state capitol buildings and grounds created under RCW 79.24.530.

(3) The department shall provide staff support services to the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Committee" means the state capitol committee established in RCW 43.34.010.

(2) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of enterprise services.

(4) "State capitol public and historic facilities" has the meaning in RCW 79.24.710.

(5) "Work group" means the entity established in RCW 43.34.080.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.34.015 and 1997 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((commissioner of public lands))director shall ((be))appoint a person to serve as the secretary of the state capitol committee((, but the committee may appoint a suitable person as acting secretary thereof, and fix his or her compensation)). ((However, all))All records of the committee shall be filed ((in the office of the commissioner of public lands))with the department.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.34.080 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7015 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The capitol campus design technical advisory ((committee))work group is established as an advisory group to the ((capitol)) committee and the director ((of enterprise services to review)). The work group assists the committee by reviewing programs, planning, design, and landscaping of state capitol facilities and grounds and ((to make))by making recommendations that ((will)) contribute to the attainment of architectural, aesthetic, functional, and environmental excellence in design and maintenance of ((capitol facilities on campus and located in neighboring communities))state capitol public and historic facilities.

(2) The ((advisory committee))work group shall consist of the following persons who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director ((of enterprise services)):

(a) Two members must be architects;

(b) ((A))One member must be a landscape architect; ((and))

(c) ((An))One member must be an urban planner;

(d) One member must represent the department of enterprise services;

(e) One member must represent the department of archaeology and historic preservation; and

(f) One member must represent the Washington state arts commission.

(3) The director ((of enterprise services)) shall appoint the chair and vice chair and shall provide the staff and resources necessary for implementing this section. The ((advisory committee))work group shall meet ((at least once every ninety days and at the call of the chair))as often as necessary.

(4) The members of the ((committee))work group shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 44.04.120.

(((3) The advisory committee shall also consist of the secretary of state and two members of the house of representatives, one from each caucus, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, who shall be appointed by the president of the senate.

(4)))(5) The ((advisory committee))work group shall review plans and designs affecting state capitol public and historic facilities as they are developed. The ((advisory committee's))work group's review shall include:

(a) ((The process of solicitation and selection of appropriate professional design services including design-build proposals;

(b))) Compliance with the capitol campus ((master))comprehensive plan and design concepts ((as adopted by the capitol committee))under RCW 79.24.530;

(((c)))(b) The design, siting, and grouping of state capitol public and historic facilities relative to the service needs of state government and the impact upon the local community's economy, environment, traffic patterns, and other factors;

(((d)))(c) The relationship of overall state capitol facility planning to the respective comprehensive plans for long-range urban development of the cities of Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater, and Thurston county; and

(((e)))(d) Landscaping plans and designs, including planting proposals, street furniture, sculpture, monuments, and access to the capitol campus and buildings.

(((5) For development of the property known as the 1063 block, the committee may review the proposal selected by the department of enterprise services but must not propose changes that will affect the scope, budget, or schedule of the project.))

Sec. 5. RCW 43.34.090 and 2015 c 225 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon recommendations from the ((state capitol)) committee and the director ((of the department of enterprise services)), with the advice of the ((capitol campus design advisory committee))work group, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing building may be renamed only after a substantial renovation or a change in the predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building.

(b) A new or existing building may be named or renamed after:

(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the building;

(iii) The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building;

(iv) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;

(v) A Native American tribe located in Washington;

(vi) A group of people or type of person;

(vii) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director ((of the department of enterprise services)).

(c) The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not be removed.

(2) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing public rooms or spaces on the west capitol campus based upon recommendations from the ((state capitol)) committee and the director ((of the department of enterprise services, with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee)), subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing room or space may be renamed only after a substantial renovation;

(b) A new or existing room or space may be named or renamed only after:

(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the room or space;

(iii) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;

(iv) A Native American tribe located in Washington;

(v) A group of people or type of person;

(vi) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director ((of the department of enterprise services)).

(3) When naming or renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this section, consideration must be given to: (a) Any disparity that exists with respect to the gender of persons after whom buildings, rooms, and spaces are named on the state capitol grounds; (b) the diversity of human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's citizenry and history.

(4) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and Capitol Lake.

Sec. 6. RCW 79.24.030 and 2013 c 23 s 260 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of natural resources and the department of natural resources may employ such cruisers, drafters, engineers, architects, or other assistants as may be necessary for the best interests of the state in carrying out the provisions of RCW 79.24.010 through ((79.24.085, and all expenses incurred by the board and department, and all claims against the capitol building construction account shall be audited by the department and presented in vouchers to the state treasurer, who shall draw a warrant therefor against the capitol building construction account as herein provided or out of any appropriation made for such purpose))79.24.060 regarding management of trust lands.

Sec. 7. RCW 79.24.060 and 1985 c 57 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds of such sale of capitol building lands, ((or))and the timber or other materials, shall be paid into the capitol building construction account which is hereby established in the state treasury to be used ((as in this act provided. All contracts for the construction of capitol buildings shall be let after notice for proposals or bids have been advertised for at least four consecutive weeks in at least three newspapers of general circulation throughout the state))for purposes of state capitol buildings as granted to the state of Washington by the United States pursuant to an act of Congress approved February 22, 1889, for capitol building purposes.

Sec. 8. RCW 79.24.087 and 2005 c 330 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

All revenues received from leases and sales of lands, timber, and other products on the surface or beneath the surface of the lands granted to the state of Washington by the United States pursuant to an act of Congress approved February 22, 1889, for capitol building purposes, shall be paid into the "capitol building construction account." Available revenues in this account shall first be ((pledged to))appropriated for state capitol public and historic facilities as defined under RCW 79.24.710.

Sec. 9. RCW 79.24.300 and 2015 c 225 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

((The state capitol committee))Subject to legislative appropriation, the department of enterprise services may construct parking facilities for the state capitol adequate to provide parking space for automobiles, said parking facilities to be either of a single level, multiple level, or both, and to be either on one site or more than one site and located either on or in close proximity to the capitol grounds, though not necessarily contiguous thereto. The ((state capitol committee))department of enterprise services may select such lands as are necessary therefor and acquire them by purchase or condemnation. As an aid to such selection the committee may cause location, topographical, economic, traffic, and other surveys to be conducted, and for this purpose may utilize the services of existing state agencies, may employ personnel, or may contract for the services of any person, firm or corporation. ((In selecting the location and plans for the construction of the parking facilities the committee shall consider recommendations of the director of enterprise services.))

Space in parking facilities may be rented to the officers and employees of the state on a monthly basis at a rental to be determined by the director of enterprise services. The state shall not sell gasoline, oil, or any other commodities or perform any services for any vehicles or equipment other than state equipment, except that the department of enterprise services may operate electric vehicle supply equipment for electric vehicles authorized to park in its lots.

Sec. 10. RCW 79.24.530 and 2015 c 225 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of enterprise services shall develop, amend, and modify ((an overall))as needed a comprehensive plan for the design and establishment of state capitol buildings and grounds ((on the east capitol site)) in accordance with current and prospective requisites of a state capitol befitting the state of Washington. ((The overall plan, amendments and modifications thereto shall be subject to the approval of the state capitol committee.))

Sec. 11. RCW 79.24.560 and 2015 c 225 s 120 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of enterprise services shall have the power to rent, lease, or otherwise use any of the properties ((acquired in the east capitol site))of the state capitol public and historic facilities as defined in RCW 79.24.710, consistent with the assignment or provision of the properties for use by the legislature, state agencies, state officials, and the supreme court.

Sec. 12. RCW 79.24.570 and 2015 c 225 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys received by the department of enterprise services from the management of the ((east)) capitol ((site))campus, excepting (1) funds otherwise dedicated prior to April 28, 1967, (2) parking and rental charges and fines which are required to be deposited in other accounts, and (3) reimbursements of service and other utility charges made to the department of enterprise services, shall be deposited in the capitol purchase and development account ((of the state general fund)).

Sec. 13. RCW 79.24.650 and 1969 ex.s. c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The state capitol committee))Consistent with appropriations and in accordance with RCW 43.19.125, the department of enterprise services shall provide for the construction, remodeling, and furnishing of capitol office buildings, parking facilities, governor's mansion, and such other buildings and facilities as are determined by the department of enterprise services, with advice from the state capitol committee to be necessary to provide space for the legislature by way of offices, committee rooms, hearing rooms, and work rooms, and to provide executive office space and housing for the governor, and to provide executive office space for other elective officials and such other state agencies as may be necessary((, and to pay for all costs and expenses in issuing the bonds and to pay interest thereon during construction of the facilities for which the bonds were issued and six months thereafter)).

Sec. 14. RCW 43.17.070 and 1982 c 40 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There ((shall be))is an administrative committee((s)) of the state government, which shall be known as((: (1) The))the state finance committee ((and (2) the state capitol committee)).

Sec. 15. RCW 79.24.710 and 2015 c 225 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 79.24.720, 79.24.730, 43.01.090, 43.19.500, and 79.24.087, "state capitol public and historic facilities" ((includes))means:

(1) The east, west and north capitol campus grounds, Sylvester park, Heritage park, Marathon park, Centennial park, the Deschutes river basin commonly known as Capitol lake, the interpretive center, Deschutes parkway, and the landscape, memorials, artwork, fountains, streets, sidewalks, lighting, and infrastructure in each of these areas not including state-owned aquatic lands in these areas managed by the department of natural resources under RCW 79.105.010; and

(2) The public spaces and the historic interior and exterior elements of the following buildings: The visitor center, the Governor's mansion, the legislative building, the John L. O'Brien building, the Cherberg building, the Newhouse building, the Pritchard building, the temple of justice, the insurance building, the Dolliver building, capitol court, and the old capitol buildings, including the historic state-owned furnishings and works of art commissioned for or original to these buildings((; and

(3) Other facilities or elements of facilities as determined by the state capitol committee, in consultation with the department of enterprise services)).

Sec. 16. RCW 79.24.720 and 2015 c 225 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of enterprise services is responsible for the stewardship, preservation, operation, and maintenance of the public and historic facilities of the state capitol, ((subject to the policy direction of))in consultation with the state capitol committee ((and the guidance of the capitol campus design advisory committee)). In administering this responsibility, the department shall:

(1) Apply the United States secretary of the interior's standards for the treatment of historic properties;

(2) Seek to balance the functional requirements of state government operations with public access and the long-term preservation needs of the properties themselves; and

(3) Consult with the capitol furnishings preservation committee, the state historic preservation officer, the state arts commission, and the state facilities accessibility advisory committee in fulfilling the responsibilities provided for in this section.

Sec. 17. RCW 47.02.010 and 1984 c 7 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and RCW ((79.24.500))79.24.530 through 79.24.600 to provide for the acquisition of land and the construction of buildings, laboratories, and facilities on the east capitol site for the use of the commission and the department and to finance payment thereof by bonds payable out of special funds from the proceeds of state excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels, or by gifts, bequests, or grants or by such additional funds as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 18. RCW 79.24.600 and 1961 c 167 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If any provision of RCW ((79.24.500))79.24.530 through 79.24.590, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of RCW ((79.24.500))79.24.530 through 79.24.590, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.34.040 (Buildings—Erection—Improvements) and 1965 c 8 s 43.34.040;

(2) RCW 43.82.020 (Approval by capitol committee when real estate located in Thurston county) and 1965 c 8 s 43.82.020;

(3) RCW 79.24.085 (Disposition of money from sales) and 1985 c 57 s 78, 1959 c 257 s 46, & 1909 c 69 s 8;

(4) RCW 79.24.310 (Number and location of facilities) and 1955 c 293 s 2;

(5) RCW 79.24.320 (Appropriations—Parking facilities, laboratories) and 1955 c 293 s 3;

(6) RCW 79.24.330 (Purchase of land for parking facilities authorized) and 1957 c 257 s 1;

(7) RCW 79.24.340 (Purchase of land for parking facilities authorized—Construction of one-level facility) and 1957 c 257 s 2;

(8) RCW 79.24.400 (Sylvester Park—Grant authorized) and 1955 c 216 s 1;

(9) RCW 79.24.410 (Sylvester Park—Subsurface parking facility) and 1955 c 216 s 2;

(10) RCW 79.24.450 (Access to capitol grounds on described route authorized) and 1957 c 258 s 1;

(11) RCW 79.24.500 (Property described) and 1967 ex.s. c 43 s 1 & 1961 c 167 s 1;

(12) RCW 79.24.510 (Area designated as the east capitol site) and 1961 c 167 s 2;

(13) RCW 79.24.520 (Acquisition of property authorized—Means—Other state agencies to assist committee in executing chapter) and 1961 c 167 s 3;

(14) RCW 79.24.540 (State agencies may buy land and construct buildings thereon—Requirements) and 2015 c 225 s 119 & 1961 c 167 s 5; and

(15) RCW 79.24.550 (State buildings to be constructed only on capitol grounds—Exception) and 1961 c 167 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. RCW 79.24.300 is recodified as a section in chapter 43.19 RCW.

--- END ---