BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.38.080 and 2010 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((may work)), in consultation with human trafficking victim advocates ((in developing)), shall determine content pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for informational posters for placement in safety rest areas. The department ((may))must adopt policies for the placement of these posters in safety rest areas and these policies must address, at a minimum, placement of the posters in bathroom stalls.

(2) The posters ((may be))must:

(a) Be printed in a variety of languages ((and));

(b) Include contact information for seeking help, which may include toll-free telephone numbers a person may call for assistance, including the number for the national human trafficking resource center at (888)373-7888 and the number for the Washington state office of crime victims advocacy at (800)822-1067; and

(c) Be made of durable material and permanently affixed.

(3) The department must install the informational posters in every restroom at every safety rest area owned and operated by the department by December 31, 2022.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2023, or one month after installation of informational posters, whichever is sooner, the department must inspect the informational posters as part of its monthly maintenance activities to ensure that the posters are in fair condition and remain legible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department of transportation must make a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the installation of informational posters at safety rest areas by January 15, 2023.

(2) The report must include the number of informational posters installed, the location of the poster installations, and the completion date of the poster installations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---