BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is an endorsement available to any liquor manufacturer licensed in this state under RCW 66.24.140, 66.24.145, 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or 66.24.244 whereby the licensee may contract with licensed liquor distillers, craft distillers, domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic wineries licensed in this state to provide packaging services that include, but are not limited to:

(a) Canning, bottling, and bagging of alcoholic beverages;

(b) Mixing products before packaging;

(c) Repacking of finished products into mixed consumer packs or multipacks; and

(d) Receiving and returning products to the originating liquor licensed businesses as part of a contract in which the contracting liquor licensed party for which the services are being provided retains title and ownership of the products at all times.

(2) Holders of the endorsement authorized under this section:

(a) May contract with other nonliquor licensed businesses if the contract does not include alcohol products;

(b) May not contract directly or indirectly with any retail liquor licensee for the sale of the alcohol products being packaged under this section, unless they are medicinal, culinary, or toilet preparations not usable as beverages, as described in RCW 66.12.070;

(c) May not engage in direct liquor sales to retail liquor licensees on behalf of the contracted party or the contracted party's products, except for the sale of alcohol products described in RCW 66.12.070; and

(d) May not mix or infuse THC, CBD, or any other cannabinoid into any products containing alcohol.

(3) The board shall approve a written request for an endorsement under this section for any authorized licensee in good standing at the time of the request without further requirement for additional licensing or administrative review.

(4) The annual fee for this endorsement is $100.

--- END ---