BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 61.24.008 and 2012 c 185 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A borrower who has been referred to mediation before June 7, 2012, may continue through the mediation process and does not lose his or her right to mediation.

(2) A borrower who has not been referred to mediation as of June 7, 2012, may only be referred to mediation after a notice of default has been issued but no later than ((twenty days from the date a notice of sale is recorded))90 days prior to the date of sale listed in the notice of trustee's sale.

(3) A borrower who has not been referred to mediation as of June 7, 2012, and who has had a notice of sale recorded may only be referred to mediation if the referral is made ((before twenty days have passed from the date the notice of sale was recorded))at least 90 days prior to the date of sale listed in the notice of trustee's sale.

Sec. 2. RCW 61.24.030 and 2021 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be requisite to a trustee's sale:

(1) That the deed of trust contains a power of sale;

(2) That the deed of trust contains a statement that the real property conveyed is not used principally for agricultural purposes; provided, if the statement is false on the date the deed of trust was granted or amended to include that statement, and false on the date of the trustee's sale, then the deed of trust must be foreclosed judicially. Real property is used for agricultural purposes if it is used in an operation that produces crops, livestock, or aquatic goods;

(3) That a default has occurred in the obligation secured or a covenant of the grantor, which by the terms of the deed of trust makes operative the power to sell;

(4) That no action commenced by the beneficiary of the deed of trust is now pending to seek satisfaction of an obligation secured by the deed of trust in any court by reason of the grantor's default on the obligation secured: PROVIDED, That (a) the seeking of the appointment of a receiver, or the filing of a civil case to obtain court approval to access, secure, maintain, and preserve property from waste or nuisance, shall not constitute an action for purposes of this chapter; and (b) if a receiver is appointed, the grantor shall be entitled to any rents or profits derived from property subject to a homestead as defined in RCW 6.13.010. If the deed of trust was granted to secure a commercial loan, this subsection shall not apply to actions brought to enforce any other lien or security interest granted to secure the obligation secured by the deed of trust being foreclosed;

(5) That the deed of trust has been recorded in each county in which the land or some part thereof is situated;

(6) That prior to the date of the notice of trustee's sale and continuing thereafter through the date of the trustee's sale, the trustee must maintain a street address in this state where personal service of process may be made, and the trustee must maintain a physical presence and have telephone service at such address;

(7)(a) That, for residential real property of up to four units, before the notice of trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the trustee shall have proof that the beneficiary is the holder of any promissory note or other obligation secured by the deed of trust. A declaration by the beneficiary made under the penalty of perjury stating that the beneficiary is the holder of any promissory note or other obligation secured by the deed of trust shall be sufficient proof as required under this subsection.

(b) Unless the trustee has violated his or her duty under RCW 61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on the beneficiary's declaration as evidence of proof required under this subsection.

(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to association beneficiaries subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW;

(8) That at least ((thirty))30 days before notice of sale shall be recorded, transmitted or served, written notice of default and, for residential real property of up to four units, the beneficiary declaration specified in subsection (7)(a) of this section shall be transmitted by the beneficiary or trustee to the borrower and grantor at their last known addresses by both first-class and either registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the beneficiary or trustee shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises, a copy of the notice, or personally served on the borrower and grantor. This notice shall contain the following information:

(a) A description of the property which is then subject to the deed of trust;

(b) A statement identifying each county in which the deed of trust is recorded and the document number given to the deed of trust upon recording by each county auditor or recording officer;

(c) A statement that the beneficiary has declared the borrower or grantor to be in default, and a concise statement of the default alleged;

(d) An itemized account of the amount or amounts in arrears if the default alleged is failure to make payments;

(e) An itemized account of all other specific charges, costs, or fees that the borrower, grantor, or any guarantor is or may be obliged to pay to reinstate the deed of trust before the recording of the notice of sale;

(f) A statement showing the total of (d) and (e) of this subsection, designated clearly and conspicuously as the amount necessary to reinstate the note and deed of trust before the recording of the notice of sale;

(g) A statement that failure to cure the alleged default within ((thirty))30 days of the date of mailing of the notice, or if personally served, within ((thirty))30 days of the date of personal service thereof, may lead to recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale, and that the property described in (a) of this subsection may be sold at public auction at a date no less than ((one hundred twenty))120 days in the future, or no less than ((one hundred fifty))150 days in the future if the borrower received a letter under RCW 61.24.031;

(h) A statement that the effect of the recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale will be to (i) increase the costs and fees and (ii) publicize the default and advertise the grantor's property for sale;

(i) A statement that the effect of the sale of the grantor's property by the trustee will be to deprive the grantor of all their interest in the property described in (a) of this subsection;

(j) A statement that the borrower, grantor, and any guarantor has recourse to the courts pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 to contest the alleged default on any proper ground;

(k) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is residential real property of up to four units, a statement, prominently set out at the beginning of the notice, which shall state as follows:

"THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR

LOSING YOUR HOME.

You may be eligible for mediation in front of a neutral third party to help save your home.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. Mediation MUST be requested between the time you receive the Notice of Default and no later than ((twenty days after the Notice of Trustee Sale is recorded))90 days prior to the date of sale listed in the Notice of Trustee's Sale.

DO NOT DELAY. If you do nothing, a notice of sale may be issued as soon as 30 days from the date of this notice of default. The notice of sale will provide a minimum of 120 days' notice of the date of the actual foreclosure sale.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . ."

The beneficiary or trustee shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department for inclusion in the notice;

(l) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is residential real property of up to four units, the name and address of the holder of any promissory note or other obligation secured by the deed of trust and the name, address, and telephone number of a party acting as a servicer of the obligations secured by the deed of trust;

(m) For notices issued after June 30, 2018, on the top of the first page of the notice:

(i) The current beneficiary of the deed of trust;

(ii) The current mortgage servicer for the deed of trust; and

(iii) The current trustee for the deed of trust;

(9) That, for residential real property of up to four units, before the notice of the trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the beneficiary has complied with RCW 61.24.031 and, if applicable, RCW 61.24.163;

(10) That, in the case where the borrower or grantor is known to the mortgage servicer or trustee to be deceased, the notice required under subsection (8) of this section must be sent to any spouse, child, or parent of the borrower or grantor known to the trustee or mortgage servicer, and to any owner of record of the property, at any address provided to the trustee or mortgage servicer, and to the property addressed to the heirs and devisees of the borrower.

(a) If the name or address of any spouse, child, or parent of such deceased borrower or grantor cannot be ascertained with use of reasonable diligence, the trustee must execute and record with the notice of sale a declaration attesting to the same.

(b) Reasonable diligence for the purposes of this subsection (10) means the trustee shall search in the county where the property is located, the public records and information for any obituary, will, death certificate, or case in probate within the county for the borrower and grantor;

(11) Upon written notice identifying the property address and the name of the borrower to the servicer or trustee by someone claiming to be a successor in interest to the borrower's or grantor's property rights, but who is not a party to the loan or promissory note or other obligation secured by the deed of trust, a trustee shall not record a notice of sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.040 until the trustee or mortgage servicer completes the following:

(a) Acknowledges the notice in writing and requests reasonable documentation of the death of the borrower or grantor from the claimant including, but not limited to, a death certificate or other written evidence of the death of the borrower or grantor. The claimant must be allowed ((thirty))30 days from the date of this request to present this documentation. If the trustee or mortgage servicer has already obtained sufficient proof of the borrower's death, it may proceed by acknowledging the claimant's notice in writing and issuing a request under (b) of this subsection.

(b) If the mortgage servicer or trustee obtains or receives written documentation of the death of the borrower or grantor from the claimant, or otherwise independently confirms the death of the borrower or grantor, then the servicer or trustee must request in writing documentation from the claimant demonstrating the ownership interest of the claimant in the real property. A claimant has ((sixty))60 days from the date of the request to present this documentation.

(c) If the mortgage servicer or trustee receives written documentation demonstrating the ownership interest of the claimant prior to the expiration of the ((sixty))60 days provided in (b) of this subsection, then the servicer or trustee must, within ((twenty))20 days of receipt of proof of ownership interest, provide the claimant with, at a minimum, the loan balance, interest rate and interest reset dates and amounts, balloon payments if any, prepayment penalties if any, the basis for the default, the monthly payment amount, reinstatement amounts or conditions, payoff amounts, and information on how and where payments should be made. The mortgage servicers shall also provide the claimant application materials and information, or a description of the process, necessary to request a loan assumption and modification.

(d) Upon receipt by the trustee or the mortgage servicer of the documentation establishing claimant's ownership interest in the real property, that claimant shall be deemed a "successor in interest" for the purposes of this section.

(e) There may be more than one successor in interest to the borrower's property rights. The trustee and mortgage servicer shall apply the provisions of this section to each successor in interest. In the case of multiple successors in interest, where one or more do not wish to assume the loan as coborrowers or coapplicants, a mortgage servicer may require any nonapplicant successor in interest to consent in writing to the application for loan assumption.

(f) The existence of a successor in interest under this section does not impose an affirmative duty on a mortgage servicer or alter any obligation the mortgage servicer has to provide a loan modification to the successor in interest. If a successor in interest assumes the loan, he or she may be required to otherwise qualify for available foreclosure prevention alternatives offered by the mortgage servicer.

(g) (c), (e), and (f) of this subsection (11) do not apply to association beneficiaries subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW; and

(12) Nothing in this section shall prejudice the right of the mortgage servicer or beneficiary from discontinuing any foreclosure action initiated under the deed of trust act in favor of other allowed methods for pursuit of foreclosure of the security interest or deed of trust security interest.

Sec. 3. RCW 61.24.163 and 2018 c 306 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The foreclosure mediation program established in this section applies only to borrowers who have been referred to mediation by a housing counselor or attorney. The referral to mediation may be made any time after a notice of default has been issued but no later than ((twenty days after the date a notice of sale has been recorded))90 days prior to the date of sale listed in the notice of trustee's sale. If the borrower has failed to elect to mediate within the applicable time frame, the borrower and the beneficiary may, but are under no duty to, agree in writing to enter the foreclosure mediation program. The mediation program under this section is not governed by chapter 7.07 RCW and does not preclude mediation required by a court or other provision of law.

(2) A housing counselor or attorney referring a borrower to mediation shall send a notice to the borrower and the department, stating that mediation is appropriate.

(3) Within ((ten))10 days of receiving the notice, the department shall:

(a) Send a notice to the beneficiary, the borrower, the housing counselor or attorney who referred the borrower, and the trustee stating that the parties have been referred to mediation. The notice must include the statements and list of documents and information described in subsections (4) and (5) of this section and a statement explaining each party's responsibility to pay the mediator's fee; and

(b) Select a mediator and notify the parties of the selection.

(4) Within ((twenty-three))23 days of the department's notice that the parties have been referred to mediation, the borrower shall transmit the documents required for mediation to the mediator and the beneficiary. The required documents include an initial homeowner financial information worksheet as required by the department. The worksheet must include, at a minimum, the following information:

(a) The borrower's current and future income;

(b) Debts and obligations;

(c) Assets;

(d) Expenses;

(e) Tax returns for the previous two years;

(f) Hardship information;

(g) Other applicable information commonly required by any applicable federal mortgage relief program.

(5) Within ((twenty))20 days of the beneficiary's receipt of the borrower's documents, the beneficiary shall transmit the documents required for mediation to the mediator and the borrower. The required documents include:

(a) An accurate statement containing the balance of the loan within ((thirty))30 days of the date on which the beneficiary's documents are due to the parties;

(b) Copies of the note and deed of trust;

(c) Proof that the entity claiming to be the beneficiary is the owner of any promissory note or obligation secured by the deed of trust. Sufficient proof may be a copy of the declaration described in RCW 61.24.030(7)(a);

(d) The best estimate of any arrearage and an itemized statement of the arrearages;

(e) An itemized list of the best estimate of fees and charges outstanding;

(f) The payment history and schedule for the preceding ((twelve))12 months, or since default, whichever is longer, including a breakdown of all fees and charges claimed;

(g) All borrower-related and mortgage-related input data used in any net present values analysis. If no net present values analysis is required by the applicable federal mortgage relief program, then the input data required under the federal deposit insurance corporation and published in the federal deposit insurance corporation loan modification program guide, or if that calculation becomes unavailable, substantially similar input data as determined by the department;

(h) An explanation regarding any denial for a loan modification, forbearance, or other alternative to foreclosure in sufficient detail for a reasonable person to understand why the decision was made;

(i) Appraisal or other broker price opinion most recently relied upon by the beneficiary not more than ((ninety))90 days old at the time of the scheduled mediation; and

(j) The portion or excerpt of the pooling and servicing agreement or other investor restriction that prohibits the beneficiary from implementing a modification, if the beneficiary claims it cannot implement a modification due to limitations in a pooling and servicing agreement or other investor restriction, and documentation or a statement detailing the efforts of the beneficiary to obtain a waiver of the pooling and servicing agreement or other investor restriction provisions.

(6) Within ((seventy))70 days of receiving the referral from the department, the mediator shall convene a mediation session in the county where the property is located, unless the parties agree on another location. The parties may agree to extend the time in which to schedule the mediation session. If the parties agree to extend the time, the beneficiary shall notify the trustee of the extension and the date the mediator is expected to issue the mediator's certification.

(7)(a) The mediator may schedule phone conferences, consultations with the parties individually, and other communications to ensure that the parties have all the necessary information and documents to engage in a productive mediation.

(b) The mediator must send written notice of the time, date, and location of the mediation session to the borrower, the beneficiary, and the department at least ((thirty))30 days prior to the mediation session. At a minimum, the notice must contain:

(i) A statement that the borrower may be represented in the mediation session by an attorney or other advocate;

(ii) A statement that a person with authority to agree to a resolution, including a proposed settlement, loan modification, or dismissal or continuation of the foreclosure proceeding, must be present either in person or on the telephone or videoconference during the mediation session; and

(iii) A statement that the parties have a duty to mediate in good faith and that failure to mediate in good faith may impair the beneficiary's ability to foreclose on the property or the borrower's ability to modify the loan or take advantage of other alternatives to foreclosure.

(8)(a) The borrower, the beneficiary or authorized agent, and the mediator must meet in person for the mediation session. However, a person with authority to agree to a resolution on behalf of the beneficiary may be present over the telephone or videoconference during the mediation session.

(b) After the mediation session commences, the mediator may continue the mediation session once, and any further continuances must be with the consent of the parties.

(9) The participants in mediation must address the issues of foreclosure that may enable the borrower and the beneficiary to reach a resolution((,)) including, but not limited to, reinstatement, modification of the loan, restructuring of the debt, or some other workout plan. To assist the parties in addressing issues of foreclosure, the mediator may require the participants to consider the following:

(a) The borrower's current and future economic circumstances, including the borrower's current and future income, debts, and obligations for the previous ((sixty))60 days or greater time period as determined by the mediator;

(b) The net present value of receiving payments pursuant to a modified mortgage loan as compared to the anticipated net recovery following foreclosure;

(c) Any affordable loan modification calculation and net present value calculation when required under any federal mortgage relief program and any modification program related to loans insured by the federal housing administration, the veterans administration, and the rural housing service. If such a calculation is not provided or required, then the beneficiary must provide the net present value data inputs established by the federal deposit insurance corporation and published in the federal deposit insurance corporation loan modification program guide or other net present value data inputs as designated by the department. The mediator may run the calculation in order for a productive mediation to occur and to comply with the mediator certification requirement; and

(d) Any other loss mitigation guidelines to loans insured by the federal housing administration, the veterans administration, and the rural housing service, if applicable.

(10) A violation of the duty to mediate in good faith as required under this section may include:

(a) Failure to timely participate in mediation without good cause;

(b) Failure of the borrower or the beneficiary to provide the documentation required before mediation or pursuant to the mediator's instructions;

(c) Failure of a party to designate representatives with adequate authority to fully settle, compromise, or otherwise reach resolution with the borrower in mediation; and

(d) A request by a beneficiary that the borrower waive future claims he or she may have in connection with the deed of trust, as a condition of agreeing to a modification, except for rescission claims under the federal truth in lending act. Nothing in this section precludes a beneficiary from requesting that a borrower dismiss with prejudice any pending claims against the beneficiary, its agents, loan servicer, or trustee, arising from the underlying deed of trust, as a condition of modification.

(11) If the mediator reasonably believes a borrower will not attend a mediation session based on the borrower's conduct, such as the lack of response to the mediator's communications, the mediator may cancel a scheduled mediation session and send a written cancellation to the department and the trustee and send copies to the parties. The beneficiary may proceed with the foreclosure after receipt of the mediator's written confirmation of cancellation.

(12) Within seven business days after the conclusion of the mediation session, the mediator must send a written certification to the department and the trustee and send copies to the parties of:

(a) The date, time, and location of the mediation session;

(b) The names of all persons attending in person and by telephone or videoconference, at the mediation session;

(c) Whether a resolution was reached by the parties, including whether the default was cured by reinstatement, modification, or restructuring of the debt, or some other alternative to foreclosure was agreed upon by the parties;

(d) Whether the parties participated in the mediation in good faith; and

(e) If a written agreement was not reached, a description of any net present value test used, along with a copy of the inputs, including the result of any net present value test expressed in a dollar amount.

(13) If the parties are unable to reach an agreement, the beneficiary may proceed with the foreclosure after receipt of the mediator's written certification.

(14)(a) The mediator's certification that the beneficiary failed to act in good faith in mediation constitutes a defense to the nonjudicial foreclosure action that was the basis for initiating the mediation. In any action to enjoin the foreclosure, the beneficiary is entitled to rebut the allegation that it failed to act in good faith.

(b) The mediator's certification that the beneficiary failed to act in good faith during mediation does not constitute a defense to a judicial foreclosure or a future nonjudicial foreclosure action if a modification of the loan is agreed upon and the borrower subsequently defaults.

(c) If an affordable loan modification is not offered in the mediation or a written agreement was not reached and the mediator's certification shows that the net present value of the modified loan exceeds the anticipated net recovery at foreclosure, that showing in the certification constitutes a basis for the borrower to enjoin the foreclosure.

(15) The mediator's certification that the borrower failed to act in good faith in mediation authorizes the beneficiary to proceed with the foreclosure.

(16)(a) If a borrower has been referred to mediation before a notice of trustee sale has been recorded, a trustee may not record the notice of sale until the trustee receives the mediator's certification stating that the mediation has been completed. If the trustee does not receive the mediator's certification, the trustee may record the notice of sale after ((ten))10 days from the date the certification to the trustee was due. If, after a notice of sale is recorded under this subsection (16)(a), the mediator subsequently issues a certification finding that the beneficiary violated the duty of good faith, the certification constitutes a basis for the borrower to enjoin the foreclosure.

(b) If a borrower has been referred to mediation after the notice of sale was recorded, the sale may not occur until the trustee receives the mediator's certification stating that the mediation has been completed.

(17) A mediator may charge reasonable fees as authorized by this subsection or as authorized by the department. Unless the fee is waived, the parties agree otherwise, or the department otherwise authorizes, a foreclosure mediator's fee may not exceed ((four hundred dollars))$400 for preparing, scheduling, and conducting a mediation session lasting between one hour and three hours. For a mediation session exceeding three hours, the foreclosure mediator may charge a reasonable fee, as authorized by the department. The mediator must provide an estimated fee before the mediation, and payment of the mediator's fee must be divided equally between the beneficiary and the borrower. The beneficiary and the borrower must tender the loan mediator's fee within ((thirty))30 calendar days from receipt of the department's letter referring the parties to mediation or pursuant to the mediator's instructions.

(18) Beginning December 1, 2012, and every year thereafter, the department shall report annually to the legislature on:

(a) The performance of the program, including the numbers of borrowers who are referred to mediation by a housing counselor or attorney;

(b) The results of the mediation program, including the number of mediations requested by housing counselors and attorneys, the number of certifications of good faith issued, the number of borrowers and beneficiaries who failed to mediate in good faith, and the reasons for the failure to mediate in good faith, if known, the numbers of loans restructured or modified, the change in the borrower's monthly payment for principal and interest and the number of principal write-downs and interest rate reductions, and, to the extent practical, the number of borrowers who report a default within a year of restructuring or modification;

(c) The information received by housing counselors regarding outcomes of foreclosures; and

(d) Any recommendations for changes to the statutes regarding the mediation program.

--- END ---