BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.10.886 and 2011 c 377 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If and to the extent that the state finance committee determines, in consultation with the department of transportation and the tolling authority, that it will be beneficial for the state to issue any bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.883 through 47.10.885 or 47.10.896 and 47.10.899 through 47.10.901 as toll revenue bonds rather than as general obligation bonds, the state finance committee is authorized to issue and sell, upon the request of the department of transportation, such bonds as toll revenue bonds and not as general obligation bonds. Notwithstanding RCW 47.10.883 or 47.10.899, as applicable, each such bond shall contain a recital that payment or redemption of the bond and payment of the interest and any premium thereon is payable solely from and secured solely by a direct pledge, charge, and lien upon toll revenue and is not a general obligation of the state to which the full faith and credit of the state is pledged.

Toll revenue is hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the authority of this section, and the legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the state route number 520 corridor, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor, the Puget Sound Gateway facility, and on any other eligible toll facility designated by the legislature and on which the imposition of tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of the bonds, in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.10.906 and 2019 c 421 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The state finance committee may determine and include in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds under chapter 498, Laws of 2009, chapter 377, Laws of 2011, and chapter 421, Laws of 2019, such terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions as it may deem appropriate in order to assist with the marketing and sale of the bonds, confer rights upon the owners of bonds, and safeguard rights of the owners of bonds including, among other things:

(1) Provisions regarding the maintenance and operation of eligible toll facilities;

(2) The pledges, uses, and priorities of application of toll revenue;

(3) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely by toll revenue as provided by RCW 47.10.886, or shall be payable from and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit of the state as provided in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.883 through 47.10.885;

(4) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely by toll revenue as provided by RCW 47.10.886, or shall be payable from and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise taxes on fuel and vehicle-related fees and the full faith and credit of the state as provided in RCW 47.10.896 and 47.10.899 through 47.10.901;

(5) In consultation with the department of transportation and the tolling authority, financial covenants requiring that the eligible toll facilities must produce specified coverage ratios of toll revenue to debt service on bonds;

(6) The purposes and conditions that must be satisfied prior to the issuance of any additional bonds that are to be payable from and secured by any toll revenue on an equal basis with previously issued and outstanding bonds payable from and secured by toll revenue;

(7) Provisions that bonds for which any toll revenue are pledged, or for which a pledge of any toll revenue may be reserved, may be structured on a senior, parity, subordinate, or special lien basis in relation to any other bonds for which toll revenue is pledged, with respect to toll revenue only; and

(8) Provisions regarding reserves, credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, and payment agreements with respect to bonds.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, covenants and conditions detailing the character of management, maintenance, and operation of eligible toll facilities, insurance for eligible toll facilities, financial management of toll revenue, and disposition of eligible toll facilities must first be approved by the department of transportation.

The owner of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require and compel performance of any duties imposed upon the tolling authority and the department of transportation and their respective officials, including any duties imposed upon or undertaken by them or by their respective officers, agents, and employees, in connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of eligible toll facilities and in connection with the collection, deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of the proceeds of the bonds and toll revenue.

--- END ---