BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.715 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Diploma granting public school districts shall accept high school credits earned by students in grades nine through 12 for participating in the following activities of federally recognized Indian tribes: Tribal recognized activities; traditional tribal education; and leadership development programs. The number of credits an individual student may earn in accordance with this section may not exceed three.

(2) Credits earned by a student and accepted by a school district in accordance with this section must apply toward graduation requirements and may be awarded only in the following subject areas:

(a) Social studies, including history, civics, and ethnic and cultural studies;

(b) Art;

(c) Global languages; and

(d) Electives pertaining to business or natural resource management.

(3) Prior to a school district accepting credit earned by a student in accordance with this section, the board of directors of the school district must adopt a written policy governing the recognition and acceptance of the credits.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section by September 1, 2023. The adoption of the rules, which must precede any school district accepting a credit earned by a student under this section, must address the following and any other issues deemed appropriate by the office of the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) A process for convening government-to-government consultations to establish and periodically revise the terms and conditions for allowing students to earn credit in accordance with this section. The terms and conditions must, at a minimum, address:

(i) The delineation of roles and responsibilities for students, school districts, tribes, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(ii) The establishment of transcripts or other comparable records of learning created by the tribes for students participating in tribal recognized activities, traditional tribal education, and leadership development programs; and

(iii) Accountability measures for school districts and tribes, including academic recordkeeping and auditing measures; and

(b) Ensuring consistency between the state learning standards developed under RCW 28A.655.070 and credits earned by students in accordance with this section.

(5) Beginning November 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall provide a report on the credit earning process established by this section, including participant data and findings and recommendations, to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, and the state board of education.

--- END ---