BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.20.150 and 1999 c 359 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any notice required by this chapter to be given to a tenant shall be served on behalf of the landlord:

(a) By delivering a copy personally to the tenant; ((or))

(b) ((if))By sending a copy by email to the email address provided by the tenant and also sending a copy through the mail addressed to the tenant at the tenant's last known address so long as the following conditions are met:

(i) The rental agreement or other signed document executed by the tenant specifies in bold type that notices will be given to the tenant by email and sent by mail to the tenant's last known address;

(ii) The tenant expressly agrees to receive notices by email and mail to the tenant's last known address;

(iii) The landlord provides the tenant with the email address from which notices will be sent and directs the tenant to modify his or her email settings to allow email from that address to avoid any filtration systems;

(iv) The landlord notifies the tenant of any change in the email address from which notices will be sent prior to the address change; and

(v) The landlord continues or resumes personal delivery to the tenant if the:

(A) Tenant requests by email, in writing, or verbally to receive notices delivered personally;

(B) Landlord receives at least two returned or undeliverable emails;

(C) Landlord does not receive an email or written response within two weeks of any email asking for a written response; or

(D) Landlord is aware of any extended internet outages that may interfere with email delivery; or

(c) If the tenant is absent from the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model by affixing a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and also sending a copy through the mail addressed to the tenant at the tenant's last known address.

(2) Any notice required by this chapter to be given to the landlord shall be served by the tenant in the same manner as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, ((or)) by mail to the landlord at such place as shall be expressly provided in the rental agreement, or by sending a copy by email to the email address provided by the landlord so long as the landlord expressly agrees to receive notices by email.

(3) The landlord shall state in any notice of eviction required by RCW 59.20.080(1) as now or hereafter amended the specific reason for eviction in a clear and concise manner.

--- END ---