BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.04.010 and 1980 c 87 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

Regular sessions of the legislature shall be held annually, commencing on the second Monday of January. During each odd-numbered year, the regular session shall not be more than 60 consecutive days. During each even-numbered year, the regular session shall not be more than one day.

--- END ---