BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A terminally ill patient has a right to visitors as provided in this section and a nursing home may not interfere with this right.

(a) Visitors must be allowed during normal visiting hours established by the nursing home. During normal visiting hours:

(i) A patient may have up to four visitors at a time if the patient is in a private room; and

(ii) A patient may have up to two visitors at a time if the patient is in a semi-private room.

(b) Outside of visiting hours, a terminally ill patient must be permitted one visitor who must be allowed to remain with the patient.

(2) A nursing home may require visitors to wear personal protective equipment that is provided by the nursing home.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Terminally ill patient" means a patient with a progressive disease or condition that is expected to end in death.

(b) "Visitor" includes a family member of the patient such as a spouse, child, grandchild, sibling, or grandparent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A terminally ill patient has a right to visitors as provided in this section and a hospital may not interfere with this right.

(a) Visitors must be allowed during normal visiting hours established by the hospital. During normal visiting hours:

(i) A patient may have up to four visitors at a time if the patient is in a private room; and

(ii) A patient may have up to two visitors at a time if the patient is in a semi-private room.

(b) Outside of visiting hours, a terminally ill patient must be permitted one visitor who must be allowed to remain with the patient.

(2) A hospital may require visitors to wear personal protective equipment that is provided by the hospital.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Terminally ill patient" means a patient with a progressive disease or condition that is expected to end in death.

(b) "Visitor" includes a family member of the patient such as a spouse, child, grandchild, sibling, or grandparent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70.127 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A terminally ill patient has a right to visitors as provided in this section and a hospice care center may not interfere with this right.

(a) Visitors must be allowed during normal visiting hours established by the hospice care center. During normal visiting hours:

(i) A patient may have up to four visitors at a time if the patient is in a private room; and

(ii) A patient may have up to two visitors at a time if the patient is in a semi-private room.

(b) Outside of visiting hours, a terminally ill patient must be permitted one visitor who must be allowed to remain with the patient.

(2) A hospice care center may require visitors to wear personal protective equipment that is provided by the hospice care center.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Terminally ill patient" means a patient with a progressive disease or condition that is expected to end in death.

(b) "Visitor" includes a family member of the patient such as a spouse, child, grandchild, sibling, or grandparent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 70.129 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A terminally ill patient has a right to visitors as provided in this section and a long-term care facility may not interfere with this right.

(a) Visitors must be allowed during normal visiting hours established by the long-term care facility. During normal visiting hours:

(i) A patient may have up to four visitors at a time if the patient is in a private room; and

(ii) A patient may have up to two visitors at a time if the patient is in a semi-private room.

(b) Outside of visiting hours, a terminally ill patient must be permitted one visitor who must be allowed to remain with the patient.

(2) A long-term care facility may require visitors to wear personal protective equipment that is provided by the long-term care facility.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Terminally ill patient" means a patient with a progressive disease or condition that is expected to end in death.

(b) "Visitor" includes a family member of the patient such as a spouse, child, grandchild, sibling, or grandparent.

--- END ---