BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.40.030 and 2014 c 140 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((All))(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, all property must be valued at ((one hundred))100 percent of its true and fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically provided otherwise by law.

(b) For purposes of state property tax levies, all property must be valued at 75 percent of its true and fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically provided otherwise by law.

(2) Taxable leasehold estates must be valued at such price as they would bring at a fair, voluntary sale for cash without any deductions for any indebtedness owed including rentals to be paid.

(3) The true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes (including property upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry) must be based upon the following criteria:

(a) Any sales of the property being appraised or similar properties with respect to sales made within the past five years. The appraisal must be consistent with the comprehensive land use plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, zoning, and any other governmental policies or practices in effect at the time of appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and environmental influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that assumes a land usage or highest and best use not permitted, for that property being appraised, under existing zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes or other government restrictions. The appraisal must also take into account: (i) In the use of sales by real estate contract as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has been increased by reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing terms; and (ii) the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually represents the general effective market demand for property of such type, in the geographical area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed releases or similar seller-developer financing arrangements may not be used as sales of similar property.

(b) In addition to sales as defined in subsection (3)(a) of this section, consideration may be given to cost, cost less depreciation, reconstruction cost less depreciation, or capitalization of income that would be derived from prudent use of the property, as limited by law or ordinance. Consideration should be given to any agreement, between an owner of rental housing and any government agency, that restricts rental income, appreciation, and liquidity; and to the impact of government restrictions on operating expenses and on ownership rights in general of such housing. In the case of property of a complex nature, or being used under terms of a franchise from a public agency, or operating as a public utility, or property not having a record of sale within five years and not having a significant number of sales of similar property in the general area, the provisions of this subsection must be the dominant factors in valuation. When provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing values the property owner must be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at such value.

(c) In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the true and fair value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon must be determined; also the true and fair value of structures thereon, but the valuation may not exceed the true and fair value of the total property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land, growing crops must be excluded. For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "growing crops" does not include marijuana as defined under RCW 69.50.101.

--- END ---