BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.185C RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must create a competitive program to award grants to cities, counties, tribal governments, and nonprofit organizations for the purpose of establishing immediate employment programs for individuals experiencing homelessness.

(2) To qualify for grant funding, the employment program must:

(a) Provide immediate employment for homeless individuals, which may include, but is not limited to, trash pickup, graffiti removal, beautification of public areas, or other services that seek to benefit the community;

(b) Pay participants in cash at the end of each workday at a wage of at least $20 per hour; and

(c) Seek to connect individuals participating in the program with locally available health care, housing, and long-term employment services.

(3) Grant funds may be used for the following:

(a) Wages and benefits for participants and staff;

(b) Food and beverages for participants during the workday;

(c) Incentives for participants to return for additional workdays;

(d) Training and educational costs of staff administering the program; and

(e) Supplies, tools, equipment, clothing, or other items required to operate the program.

(4) In awarding funds, the department must provide geographic distribution on a statewide basis. No individual grant award may exceed $100,000.

(5) Each grantee must submit an annual report to the department summarizing the program's procedures, outcomes, and financial information. By November 1, 2024, the department must submit a review of the grant program to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2025.

--- END ---