BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No person in this state may sell or offer for sale any spirit product that is marketed, labeled, classified, or typed as vodka under 27 C.F.R. Sec. 5.22, if such spirit product or any ingredient, input, or material in, or used in the production of, such spirit product was produced in or imported or sourced from Russia.

(2) This section applies to all persons in this state including but not limited to all licensees, permit holders, and certificate of approval holders under this title.

--- END ---