BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:

(1) Ukrainians are the largest group of European residents in Washington and that from 2000 to 2019 Washington's Ukrainian population grew 69 percent.

(2) Russia has engaged in an unjustified and unprovoked invasion of the sovereign nation of Ukraine.

(3) Washington stands firmly in support of Ukraine's sovereignty, independence, and territorial integrity and very strongly condemns Russia's military actions against Ukraine.

(4) Preventing Washington's investment activity, whether directly or indirectly, from giving any aid to Russia as it commits these egregious acts of violence and human rights violations against the Ukrainian people is a compelling state interest.

(5) Protecting Washington from financing any action against the Ukrainian people is a compelling state interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) All state agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall review all agency contracts to determine if the agency has any contract with an entity described in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section.

(2) All state agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall immediately terminate any existing contract or pending contract, and refrain from entering into any new contracts, with an entity that is determined to be:

(a) Headquartered in Russia or has its principal place of business in Russia; or

(b) Providing any funds or assistance to the Russian government by direct or indirect means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) No state agency, board, commission, or office, including institutions of higher education, may invest public funds with an entity described in section 2(2) (a) or (b) of this act.

(2) All state agencies, boards, commissions, and offices, including institutions of higher education, shall review all investments under their authority to determine whether the state has any investment under their authority with an entity described in section 2(2) (a) or (b) of this act.

(3) If the state agency, board, commission, office, or institution of higher education determines that it has investments under its authority with an entity described in section 2(2) (a) or (b) of this act, it shall divest its money and assets from any investment in such entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 3 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---