BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.230 and 2005 c 365 s 146 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever any human remains shall have been in the lawful
possession of any person, firm, corporation, or association for a
period of ninety days or more, and the relatives of, or persons
interested in, the deceased person shall fail, neglect, or refuse to
direct the disposition, the human remains may be disposed of by the
person, firm, corporation, or association having such lawful possession
thereof, under and in accordance with rules adopted by the cemetery
board and the board of funeral directors and embalmers, not
inconsistent with any statute of the state of Washington or rule
adopted by the state board of health.
(2)(a) The department of veterans affairs may certify that the
deceased person to whom subsection (1) of this section applies was a
veteran or the dependent of a veteran eligible for interment at a
federal or state veterans' cemetery.
(b) Upon certification of eligible veteran or dependent of a
veteran status under (a) of this subsection, the person, firm,
corporation, or association in possession of the veteran's or veteran's
dependent's remains shall transfer the custody and control of the
remains to the department of veterans affairs.
(c) The transfer of human remains under (b) of this subsection does
not create:
(i) A private right of action against the state or its officers and
employees or instrumentalities, or against any person, firm,
corporation, or association transferring the remains; or
(ii) Liability on behalf of the state, the state's officers,
employees, or instrumentalities; or on behalf of the person, firm,
corporation, or association transferring the remains.

--- END ---