BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.48.030 and 1941 c 87 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the filing of such petition for an order of dissolution, the
superior court shall enter an order setting the same for hearing at a
date not less than thirty days from the date of filing, and the ((clerk
of the court of said county)) petitioner shall give notice of such
hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the district is located once a week for three
successive weeks, and by posting in three public places in the county
in which the district is located at least twenty-one days before said
hearing. At least one notice shall be posted in the district. The
notices shall set forth the filing of the petition, its purpose and the
date and place of the hearing thereon.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.070 and 2004 c 64 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of the petition, the ((clerk of the court))
petitioner shall issue a summons, one directed to the child, if the
child is twelve or more years of age, and another to the parents,
guardian, or custodian, and such other persons as appear to the court
to be proper or necessary parties to the proceedings, requiring them to
appear personally before the court at the time fixed to hear the
petition. If the child ((is developmentally disabled)) has a
developmental disability and not living at home, the notice shall be
given to the child's custodian as well as to the child's parent. The
((developmentally disabled)) child with a developmental disability
shall not be required to appear unless requested by the court. When
the custodian is summoned, the parent or guardian or both shall also be
served with a summons. The fact-finding hearing on the petition shall
be held no later than seventy-five days after the filing of the
petition, unless exceptional reasons for a continuance are found. The
party requesting the continuance shall have the burden of proving by a
preponderance of the evidence that exceptional circumstances exist. To
ensure that the hearing on the petition occurs within the seventy-five
day time limit, the court shall schedule and hear the matter on an
expedited basis.
(2) A copy of the petition shall be attached to each summons.
(3) The summons shall advise the parties of the right to counsel.
The summons shall also inform the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian of his or her right to appointed counsel, if indigent, and of
the procedure to use to secure appointed counsel.
(4) The summons shall advise the parents that they may be held
responsible for the support of the child if the child is placed in out-of-home care.
(5) The judge may endorse upon the summons an order directing any
parent, guardian, or custodian having the custody or control of the
child to bring the child to the hearing.
(6) If it appears from affidavit or sworn statement presented to
the judge that there is probable cause for the issuance of a warrant of
arrest or that the child needs to be taken into custody pursuant to RCW
13.34.050, the judge may endorse upon the summons an order that an
officer serving the summons shall at once take the child into custody
and take him or her to the place of shelter designated by the court.
(7) If the person summoned as provided in this section is subject
to an order of the court pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this
section, and if the person fails to abide by the order, he or she may
be proceeded against as for contempt of court. The order endorsed upon
the summons shall conspicuously display the following legend:

NOTICE:
VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER
IS SUBJECT TO PROCEEDING
FOR CONTEMPT OF COURT
PURSUANT TO RCW 13.34.070.
(8) If a party to be served with a summons can be found within the
state, the summons shall be served upon the party personally as soon as
possible following the filing of the petition, but in no case later
than fifteen court days before the fact-finding hearing, or such time
as set by the court. If the party is within the state and cannot be
personally served, but the party's address is known or can with
reasonable diligence be ascertained, the summons may be served upon the
party by mailing a copy by certified mail as soon as possible following
the filing of the petition, but in no case later than fifteen court
days before the hearing, or such time as set by the court. If a party
other than the child is without the state but can be found or the
address is known, or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained,
service of the summons may be made either by delivering a copy to the
party personally or by mailing a copy thereof to the party by certified
mail at least ten court days before the fact-finding hearing, or such
time as set by the court.
(9) Service of summons may be made under the direction of the court
by any person eighteen years of age or older who is not a party to the
proceedings or by any law enforcement officer, probation counselor, or
department employee.
(10)(a) Whenever the court or the petitioning party in a proceeding
under this chapter knows or has reason to know that an Indian child is
involved, the petitioning party shall promptly provide notice to the
child's parent or Indian custodian and to the agent designated by the
child's Indian tribe to receive such notices. Notice shall be by
certified mail with return receipt requested. If the identity or
location of the parent or Indian custodian and the tribe cannot be
determined, notice shall be given to the secretary of the interior in
the manner described in 25 C.F.R. 23.11. If the child may be a member
of more than one tribe, the petitioning party shall send notice to all
tribes the petitioner has reason to know may be affiliated with the
child.
(b) The notice shall: (i) Contain a statement notifying the parent
or custodian and the tribe of the pending proceeding; and (ii) notify
the tribe of the tribe's right to intervene and/or request that the
case be transferred to tribal court.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.080 and 2000 c 122 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall direct the ((clerk)) petitioner to publish
notice in a legal newspaper printed in the county, qualified to publish
summons, once a week for three consecutive weeks, with the first
publication of the notice to be at least twenty-five days prior to the
date fixed for the hearing when it appears by the petition or verified
statement that:
(a)(i) The parent or guardian is a nonresident of this state; or
(ii) The name or place of residence or whereabouts of the parent or
guardian is unknown; and
(b) After due diligence, the person attempting service of the
summons or notice provided for in RCW 13.34.070 has been unable to make
service, and a copy of the notice has been deposited in the post
office, postage prepaid, directed to such person at his or her last
known place of residence. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
is believed to be a resident of another state or a county other than
the county in which the petition has been filed, notice also shall be
published in the county in which the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is believed to reside.
(2) Publication may proceed simultaneously with efforts to provide
service in person or by mail, when the court determines there is reason
to believe that service in person or by mail will not be successful.
Notice shall be directed to the parent, parents, or other person
claiming the right to the custody of the child, if their names are
known. If their names are unknown, the phrase "To whom it may concern"
shall be used, apply to, and be binding upon, those persons whose names
are unknown. The name of the court, the name of the child (or children
if of one family), the date of the filing of the petition, the date of
hearing, and the object of the proceeding in general terms shall be set
forth. There shall be filed with the clerk an affidavit showing due
publication of the notice. The cost of publication shall be paid by
the ((county at a rate not greater than the rate paid for other legal
notices)) state. The publication of notice shall be deemed equivalent
to personal service upon all persons, known or unknown, who have been
designated as provided in this section.

--- END ---