BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.260.030 and 2006 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to the following types of new products
sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state: (a) Automatic
commercial ice cube machines; (b) ((commercial clothes washers; (c)
commercial prerinse spray valves; (d))) commercial refrigerators and
freezers; (((e) metal halide lamp fixtures; (f) single-voltage external
AC to DC power supplies; (g))) (c) state-regulated incandescent
reflector lamps; ((and (h) unit heaters)) (d) wine chillers for use by
an individual; (e) hot water dispensers and minitank electric water
heaters; (f) bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water
dispensers; (g) pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable
electric spas; (h) tub spout diverters; and (i) commercial hot food
holding cabinets. This chapter applies equally to products whether
they are sold, offered for sale, or installed as a stand-alone product
or as a component of another product.
(2) This chapter does not apply to (a) new products manufactured in
the state and sold outside the state, (b) new products manufactured
outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for final
retail sale and installation outside the state, (c) products installed
in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction, or (d)
products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational
vehicles.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.260.040 and 2006 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature establishes the following minimum efficiency
standards for the types of new products set forth in RCW 19.260.030.
(1)(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines must have daily
energy use and daily water use no greater than the applicable values in
the following table:

Equipment type Type of cooling Harvest rate
(lbs. ice/24 hrs.) Maximum
energy use
(kWh/100 lbs.) Maximum condenser
water use
(gallons/100 lbs. ice)

Ice-making head water <500 7.80 - .0055H 200 - .022H

>500<1436 5.58 - .0011H 200 - .022H

>1436 4.0 200 - .022H

Ice-making head air 450 10.26 - .0086H Not applicable

>450 6.89 - .0011H Not applicable

Remote condensing but
not remote compressor air <1000 8.85 - .0038 Not applicable

>1000 5.10 Not applicable

Remote condensing and
remote compressor air <934 8.85 - .0038H Not applicable

>934 5.3 Not applicable

Self-contained models water <200 11.40 - .0190H 191 - .0315H

>200 7.60 191 - .0315H

Self-contained models air <175 18.0 - .0469H Not applicable

>175 9.80 Not applicable

Where H harvest rate in pounds per twenty-four hours which must be reported within 5% of the tested value.
"Maximum water use" applies only to water used for the condenser.

(b) For purposes of this section, automatic commercial ice cube
machines shall be tested in accordance with ARI 810-2003 test method as
published by the air-conditioning and refrigeration institute. Ice-
making heads include all automatic commercial ice cube machines that
are not split system ice makers or self-contained models as defined in
ARI 810-2003.
(2) ((Commercial clothes washers must have a minimum modified
energy factor of 1.26. For the purposes of this section, capacity and
modified energy factor are defined and measured in accordance with the
current federal test method for clothes washers as found at 10 C.F.R.
Sec. 430.23.
(3) Commercial prerinse spray valves must have a flow rate equal to
or less than 1.6 gallons per minute when measured in accordance with
the American society for testing and materials' "Standard Test Method
for Prerinse Spray Valves," ASTM F2324-03.
(4)))(a) Commercial refrigerators and freezers must meet the
applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Doors Maximum Daily Energy Consumption (kWh)

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
refrigerators Solid 0.10V+ 2.04

Transparent 0.12V+ 3.34

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
"pulldown" refrigerators Transparent .126V+ 3.51

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
freezers Solid 0.40V+ 1.38

Transparent 0.75V+ 4.10

Reach-in cabinets that are refrigerator-freezers
with an AV of 5.19 or higher
Solid
0.27AV - 0.71

kWh kilowatt hours
V total volume (ft3)
AV adjusted volume [1.63 x freezer volume (ft3)]+ refrigerator volume (ft3)

(b) For purposes of this section, "pulldown" designates products
designed to take a fully stocked refrigerator with beverages at 90
degrees F and cool those beverages to a stable temperature of 38
degrees F within 12 hours or less. Daily energy consumption shall be
measured in accordance with the American national standards
institute/American society of heating, refrigerating and air-conditioning engineers test method 117-2002, except that the back-
loading doors of pass-through and roll-through refrigerators and
freezers must remain closed throughout the test, and except that the
controls of all appliances must be adjusted to obtain the following
product temperatures.

Product or compartment type Integrated average product temperature in degrees Fahrenheit

Refrigerator 38+ 2

Freezer 0+ 2

(((5) Metal halide lamp fixtures designed to be operated with lamps
rated greater than or equal to 150 watts but less than or equal to 500
watts shall not contain a probe-start metal halide lamp ballast.
(6)(a) Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall meet
the requirements in the following table:

Nameplate output Minimum Efficiency in Active Mode

< 1 Watt 0.49 * Nameplate Output

> or 1 Watt and < or 49 Watts 0.09 * Ln (Nameplate Output)+ 0.49

> 49 Watts 0.84

Maximum Energy Consumption in No-Load Mode

< 10 Watts 0.5 Watts

> or 10 Watts and < or 250 Watts
0.75 Watts

Where Ln (Nameplate Output) - Natural Logarithm of the nameplate output expressed in Watts

(b) For the purposes of this section, efficiency of single-voltage
external AC to DC power supplies shall be measured in accordance with
the United States environmental protection agency's "Test Method for
Calculating the Energy Efficiency of Single-Voltage External AC to DC
and AC to AC Power Supplies," by Ecos Consulting and Power Electronics
Application Center, dated August 11, 2004.
(7))) (3)(a) The lamp electrical power input of state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp
efficacy requirements for federally regulated incandescent reflector
lamps contained in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6295(i)(l)(A)-(B).
(b) The following types of incandescent lamps are exempt from these
requirements:
(i) Lamps rated at fifty watts or less of the following types: BR
30, ER 30, BR 40, and ER 40;
(ii) Lamps rated at sixty-five watts of the following types: BR
30, BR 40, and ER 40; and
(iii) R 20 lamps of forty-five watts or less.
(((8) Unit heaters must be equipped with intermittent ignition
devices and must have either power venting or an automatic flue
damper.))
(4)(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual
must not exceed the applicable requirements listed in the following
table:

Equipment Type Maximum Annual Appliance Energy
Consumption (kWh)

Wine chillers with manual defrost 13.7V + 267

Wine chillers with automatic defrost 17.4V + 344

V = volume in ft3.

(b) Wine chillers shall be tested in accordance with the code of
federal regulations, section 430.23(a) (2005), with the following
modifications:

Standardized temperature as referred to in section 3.2 of appendix A1
shall be 55°F (12.8°C).

The calculation of test cycle energy expended (ET) in section 5.2.1.1
of appendix A1 shall be made using the modified formula:

ET = (EP x 1440 x k)/T

Where:

k = 0.85
(5)(a) The standby energy consumption of bottle-type water
dispensers, and point-of-use water dispensers, dispensing both hot and
cold water, manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall not exceed
1.2 kWh/day.
(b) The test method for water dispensers shall be the environmental
protection agency energy star program requirements for bottled water
coolers version 1.1.
(6)(a) The standby loss of hot water dispensers and minitank
electric water heaters manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall
be not greater than 35 watts.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any water heater:
(i) That is within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6292(a)(4) or
6311(1);
(ii) That has a rated storage volume of less than 20 gallons; and
(iii) For which there is no federal test method applicable to that
type of water heater.
(c) The test method for hot water dispensers is as follows:
(i) Connect the hot water dispenser to a water supply, a power
supply, and a means of measuring energy use. Fill the hot water
dispenser with water and apply the power supply. Control the ambient
temperature in the laboratory at 77°F ± 7°F throughout the test.
(ii) Let the unit operate in standby mode for at least two complete
cycles of thermostat operation, with the thermostat set to 150°F ± 10°F
as described in (c)(iii) of this subsection.
(iii) If the thermostat is adjustable, set it to produce water at
150°F ± 10°F, determined by discharging five oz. of water into an
insulated cup immediately after a thermostat cut out, then measuring
its temperature.
(iv) If the thermostat is adjustable, and the temperature is not
within the tolerance shown in (c)(ii) of this subsection, readjust the
thermostat and allow it to operate in standby mode for two cycles,
measuring the discharge temperature immediately after the second cut
out, as described in (c)(iii) of this subsection.
(v) After the thermostat has been properly adjusted, allow the unit
to operate in standby mode for a minimum of two cycles, then measure
the electricity used (in Wh) during the next twenty-four hours (plus
time for first cut out after twenty-four hours). Begin measuring
electricity usage immediately after a thermostat cut out, and end just
after the first thermostat cut out after twenty-four hours. The total
length of the test will be somewhat longer than twenty-four hours,
depending on the first cut out after twenty-four hours. Divide the
measured electricity used (in Wh) by the time (in hours), to obtain the
standby loss (in watts).
(vi) Record the water temperature measured in (c)(iv) of this
subsection and the standby loss calculated in (c)(v) of this
subsection.
(d) The test method for minitank electric water heaters is as
follows:
(i) Storage tank volume. Determine the storage capacity of the
water heater, in gallons, by subtracting the weight of the empty water
heater from the weight of the water heater when completely filled with
water (with all air eliminated and line pressure applied) and dividing
the resulting net weight by the density of water at the measured
temperature.

V = Wf - Wtρ

Where:

V = the storage capacity in gallons
Wf = the weight of the water heater when full (lb)
Wt = the weight of the empty water heater (lb)
ρ = the density of the water (lb/gal)
(ii) Test set-up
(A) Insulate the water piping, including heat traps, if provided by
the manufacturer, for a length of four feet from the connection to the
appliance with material having a thermal resistance I value of not less
than 4°F x ft2 x hr/Btu. Ensure that the insulation does not contact
any water heater surface except at the location where the pipe
connections penetrate the appliance jacket.
(B) If the manufacturer has not provided a temperature and pressure
relief valve, one shall be installed and insulated.
(C) Maintain the temperature of the supply water at 70°F ± 2°F and
the pressure of the water supply between 40 psi and the maximum
pressure specified by the manufacturer. The accuracy of the pressure
measuring devices shall be within ± 1.0 pound per square inch. The
water heater shall be isolated by use of a shut off valve in the supply
line with an expansion tank installed in the supply line downstream of
the shut off valve. There shall be no shut off means between the
expansion tank and the appliance inlet.
(D) Before starting testing of the water heater, the setting of the
thermostat shall first be obtained by supplying the water in the system
at 70°F ± 2°F and then noting the maximum mean temperature of the water
after the thermostat shuts off the electric supply to be 142°F ± 8°F.
(E) For measuring the energy consumption, instrumentation shall be
installed which measures within ± 2 percent. Voltage shall be within
± 10 percent of the rated voltage.
(F) Three or more temperature sensing means shall be installed
inside the storage tank on the vertical center of each of three or more
non overlapping sections of approximately equal volume from the top to
the bottom of the tank. Each temperature sensing means is to be
located as far as possible from any heat source or other irregularity,
anodic protective device, or water tank or flue wall. The anodic
protective device shall be removed in order to install the temperature
sensing means, and testing shall be carried out with the device
removed. If the temperature sensing means cannot be installed as
specified, placement of the temperature sensing means shall be made at
the discretion of the testing agency so that comparable water
temperature measurements are obtained. A temperature sensing means,
shielded against direct radiation and positioned at the vertical
midpoint of a tank type water heater at a perpendicular distance of
approximately twenty-four inches from the surface of the jacket, shall
be installed in the test room.
(G) The ambient air temperature of the test room shall be
maintained at 75°F ± 10°F. The ambient temperature shall not vary more
than ± 7.0°F from the average during the test, temperature readings
being taken at fifteen-minute intervals and averaged at the end of the
test.
(iii) Standby loss. Fill the water heater with water. Turn on the
electric power to the water heater. After the first cut out, allow the
water heater to remain in the standby mode until the next cut out. At
this time, record the time, ambient temperature, and begin measuring
the electric consumption. Record the maximum mean tank temperature
that occurs after cut out. Record the mean tank temperature and the
ambient air temperature at the end of the first fifteen-minute interval
and at the end of each subsequent fifteen-minute interval. The
duration of this test shall be until the first cut out that occurs
after twenty-four hours. Immediately after the conclusion of the test,
record the total electrical energy consumption, the final ambient air
temperature, and the time duration of the standby loss test (t) in
hours rounded to the nearest one hundredth of an hour and the maximum
mean tank temperature that occurs after cut out. Calculate the average
of the recorded values of the mean tank temperatures and of the ambient
air temperatures taken at the end of each time interval, including the
initial and final values. Determine the difference (ΔT3) between these
two averages by subtracting the latter from the former, and the
differences (ΔT4) between the final and initial mean tank temperatures
by subtracting the latter from the former.

Determine the standby loss (W) using the formula:

W = S x K x V (ΔT1) / (3412 Btu/kWh)

Where:

ΔT1 = 70°F, the nominal difference between mean tank temperature and
the average ambient air temperature
S = standby loss, hr-1
K = 8.25 Btu per gallon °F, the nominal specific heat of water
V = tank capacity expressed in gallons
3412 = conversion factor from kWh to Btu/hr
(7) The following standards are established for pool heaters,
residential pool pumps, and portable electric spas:
(a) Natural gas pool heaters shall not be equipped with constant
burning pilots.
(b) Pool pump motors shall meet the following standards:
(i) Pool pump motors manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, may
not be split-phase or capacitor start -- induction run type.
(ii) Pool pump motors with a capacity of 1 HP or more which are
manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall have the capability of
operating at two or more speeds with a low speed having a rotation rate
that is no more than one-half of the motor's maximum rotation rate.
(iii) Pool pump motor controls manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, shall have the capability of operating the pool pump at at least
two speeds. The default circulation speed shall be the lowest speed,
with a high speed override capability being for a temporary period not
to exceed one normal cycle.
(c) The standby power of portable electric spas manufactured on or
after January 1, 2010, shall be not greater than 5(V2/3) watts where V
= the total volume, in gallons.
(d) The test method for portable electric spas is as follows:
(i) Minimum continuous testing time shall be seventy-two hours.
(ii) The water temperature shall remain at or above the test
temperature of 102°F for the duration of the test.
(iii) The ambient air temperature shall remain at or below the test
temperature of 60°F for the duration of the test.
(iv) The standard cover that comes with the unit shall be used
during the test.
(v) The test shall start when the water temperature has been at
102°F for at least four hours.
(vi) Record the total energy use for the period of test, starting
at the end of the first heating cycle after the four-hour stabilization
period, and finishing at the end of the first heating cycle after
seventy-two hours has elapsed.
(vii) The unit shall remain covered and in the default operation
mode during the test. Energy conserving circulation functions, if
present, must not be enabled if not appropriate for continuous, long-term use.
(viii) Data reported shall include: Spa identification (make,
model, S/N, specifications); volume of the unit in gallons; cover R-value; supply voltage; average relative humidity during test; minimum,
maximum, and average water temperatures during test; minimum, maximum,
and average ambient air temperatures during test; date of test; length
of test (t, in hours); total energy use during the test (P, in Wh); and
standby power (P/t, in watts).
(8)(a) The leakage rate of tub spout diverters shall be no greater
than the applicable requirements shown in the following table:

Maximum Leakage Rate

Appliance Testing Conditions Effective January 1, 2009

When new 0.01 gpm

Tub spout diverters After 15,000 cycles of diverting 0.05 gpm

(b) Showerhead-tub spout diverter combinations shall meet both the
standard for showerheads and the standard for tub spout diverters.
(9)(a) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall be no greater than 40
watts per cubic foot of measured interior volume.
(b) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
shall be determined using ANSI/ASTM F2140-01 standard test method for
the performance of hot food holding cabinets (test for idle energy rate
dry test). Commercial hot food holding cabinet interior volume shall
be calculated using straight line segments following the gross interior
dimensions of the appliance and using the following equation: Interior
height x interior width x interior depth. Interior volume shall not
account for racks, air plenums, or other interior parts.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.260.050 and 2006 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new ((commercial prerinse spray valve, commercial clothes
washer,)) commercial refrigerator or freezer((,)) or state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp((, or unit heater)) manufactured on or
after January 1, 2007, may be sold or offered for sale in the state
unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. No new automatic
commercial ice cube machine((, single-voltage external AC to DC power
supply, or metal halide lamp fixtures)) manufactured on or after
January 1, 2008, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless
the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency
standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(2) On or after January 1, 2008, no new ((commercial prerinse spray
valve, commercial clothes washer,)) commercial refrigerator or
freezer((, single-voltage external AC to DC power supply,)) or state-regulated incandescent reflector lamp((, or unit heater)) manufactured
on or after January 1, 2007, may be installed for compensation in the
state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. On or after January
1, 2009, no new automatic commercial ice cube machine ((or metal halide
lamp fixtures)) manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be
installed for compensation in the state unless the efficiency of the
new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW
19.260.040.
(3) Standards for ((metal halide lamp fixtures and)) state-regulated incandescent reflector lamps are effective on the dates in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, may not be sold or offered in the state unless the efficiency of
the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in
RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers for use by an individual;
(b) Hot water dispensers and minitank electric water heaters;
(c) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(d) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(e) Tub spout diverters; and
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.
(5) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, may not be installed for compensation in the state on or after
January 1, 2011, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers for use by an individual;
(b) Hot water dispensers and minitank electric water heaters;
(c) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(d) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(e) Tub spout diverters; and
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.

--- END ---