BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.300.010 and 2008 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Identification device" means an item that uses radio frequency
identification technology or facial recognition technology.
(2) "Person" means a natural person who resides in Washington.
(3) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.255.010.
(4) "Data" means personal information, numerical values associated
with a person's facial features, or unique personal identifier numbers
stored on an identification device.
(5) "Radio frequency identification" means ((a technology that uses
radio waves to transmit data remotely to readers)) the use of
electromagnetic radiating waves or reactive field coupling in the radio
frequency portion of the spectrum to communicate to or from a tag
through a variety of modulation and encoding schemes to uniquely read
the identity of a radio frequency tag or other data stored on it.
(6) (("Reader" means a scanning device that is capable of using
radio waves to communicate with an identification device and read the
data transmitted by that identification device.
(7))) "Remotely" means that no physical contact between the
identification device and the reader is necessary in order to transmit
data.
(((8))) (7) "Unique personal identifier number" means a randomly
assigned string of numbers or symbols that is encoded on the
identification device and is intended to identify the identification
device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.300 RCW
to read as follows:
Any governmental or business entity that sells or issues to a
consumer an identification device that is not disabled, deactivated, or
removed at the point of sale or issuance must label the identification
device. The label must contain a universally accepted symbol for radio
frequency identification technology or facial recognition technology,
if a universally accepted symbol is available. The label must be
affixed on the identification device or on its packaging and must be
clear and conspicuous.

--- END ---