BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote the
development of renewable energy technologies and the application of
energy efficiency measures by authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds
to finance renewable energy and energy efficiency improvement costs.
The legislature finds that by providing access to low-cost capital to
finance renewable energy and energy efficiency projects, a key barrier
is eliminated.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.180.020 and 1990 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bonds" means the bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness of the commission, the interest paid on which may or may
not qualify for tax exemption.
(2) "Certifying authority" means: (a) For improvements involving
solar electric systems, the Washington climate and rural energy
development center at Washington State University, established under
RCW 28B.30.642; or (b) for all other energy efficiency and renewable
energy improvements, any utility company or other institution qualified
to assess and certify the feasibility and benefit of energy efficiency
and renewable energy improvements in a manner that is efficient and
minimizes the amount of time or cost.
(3) "Code" means the federal internal revenue code of 1954, as now
or hereafter amended, and the regulations and rulings promulgated
thereunder.
(((3))) (4) "Commission" means the Washington state housing finance
commission or any board, body, commission, department, or officer
succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers
conferred upon the commission shall be given by law.
(((4))) (5) "Costs of housing" means all costs related to the
development, design, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
leasing, rehabilitation, and other improvements of housing, as
determined by the commission.
(((5))) (6) "Eligible applicant" means, with respect to the
sustainable energy trust program, an owner of a residential,
agricultural, commercial, state, or municipal property.
(7) "Eligible person" means a person or family eligible in
accordance with standards promulgated by the commission. Such persons
shall include those persons whose income is insufficient to obtain at
a reasonable cost, without financial assistance, decent, safe, and
sanitary housing in the area in which the person or family resides, and
may include such other persons whom the commission determines to be
eligible.
(((6))) (8) "Energy efficiency improvement" means an installation
or modification that is designed to reduce energy consumption in
residential, agricultural, commercial, state, or municipal properties.
The term includes, but is not limited to: Insulation; storm windows
and doors; automatic energy control systems; heating, ventilating, or
air conditioning and distribution system modifications or replacements
in buildings or central plants; caulking and weather stripping; energy
recovery systems; geothermal heat pumps; and day lighting systems.
(9) "Housing" means specific new, existing, or improved residential
dwellings within this state or dwellings to be constructed within this
state. The term includes land, buildings, and manufactured dwellings,
and improvements, furnishings, and equipment, and such other nonhousing
facilities, furnishings, equipment, and costs as may be incidental or
appurtenant thereto if in the judgment of the commission the
facilities, furnishings, equipment and costs are an integral part of
the project. Housing may consist of single-family or multifamily
dwellings in one or more structures located on contiguous or
noncontiguous parcels or any combination thereof. Improvements may
include such equipment and materials as are appropriate to accomplish
energy efficiency within a dwelling. The term also includes a dwelling
constructed by a person who occupies and owns the dwelling, and nursing
homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.
(((7))) (10) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, mortgage deed, deed of
trust, security agreement, or other instrument securing a mortgage loan
and constituting a lien on or security interest in housing. The
property may be held in fee simple or on a leasehold under a lease
having a remaining term, at the time the mortgage is acquired, of not
less than the term of repayment of the mortgage loan secured by the
mortgage. The property may also be housing which is evidenced by an
interest in a cooperative association or corporation if ownership of
the interest entitles the owner of the interest to occupancy of a
dwelling owned by the association or corporation.
(((8))) (11) "Mortgage lender" means any of the following entities
which customarily provide service or otherwise aid in the financing of
housing and which are approved as a mortgage lender by the commission:
A bank, trust company, savings bank, national banking association,
savings and loan association, building and loan association, mortgage
banker, mortgage company, credit union, life insurance company, or any
other financial institution, governmental agency, municipal
corporation, or any holding company for any of the entities specified
in this subsection.
(((9))) (12) "Mortgage loan" means an interest-bearing loan or a
participation therein, made to a borrower, for the purpose of financing
the costs of housing, evidenced by a promissory note, and which may or
may not be secured (a) under a mortgage agreement, (b) under any other
security agreement, regardless of whether the collateral is personal or
real property, or (c) by insurance or a loan guarantee of a third
party. However, an unsecured loan shall not be considered a mortgage
loan under this definition unless the amount of the loan is under two
thousand five hundred dollars.
(13) "Qualified improvement" means an energy efficiency improvement
which has been approved by a certifying authority or a net metering
system as defined under RCW 80.60.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If economically feasible, the commission shall develop and
implement a sustainable energy trust program to provide financing for
qualified improvement projects. In developing the sustainable energy
trust program, the commission shall establish eligibility criteria for
financing that will enable it to choose eligible applicants who are
likely to repay loans made or acquired by the commission and funded
from the proceeds of commission bonds.
(2) The commission shall, if economically feasible:
(a) Issue bonds, as defined in RCW 43.180.020, for the purpose of
financing loans for qualified energy efficiency and renewable energy
improvement projects in accordance with RCW 43.180.150;
(b) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs
and take actions that are necessary and consistent with this chapter to
secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of programs
to promote energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies;
(c) Contract with a certifying authority to accept applications for
energy efficiency and renewable energy improvement projects, to review
applications, including binding fixed price bids for the improvements,
and to approve qualified improvements for financing by the commission.
For solar electric systems, the certifying authority must use an
application certification process similar to the investment cost
recovery incentive application process provided under RCW 82.16.120.
No work by a certifying authority may commence under this section until
a request has been made by the commission; and
(d) Before entering into a contract with a certifying authority as
defined in RCW 43.180.020(2)(b), consult with the Washington State
University energy extension program to determine which potential
improvement technologies are appropriate.
(3) No general fund resources may be expended to implement this
section.

--- END ---