BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a) Wind
energy is an abundant, renewable, and nonpolluting energy resource; (b)
when converted to electricity, wind energy reduces dependence on
nonrenewable energy resources and reduces air and water pollution that
result from conventional sources; (c) distributed small wind energy
systems also enhance the reliability and power quality of the power
grid, reduce peak power demands, increase in-state electricity
generation, diversify the state's energy supply portfolio, and make the
electricity supply market more competitive by promoting consumer
choice; (d) small wind energy systems, designed for on-site home, farm,
and small commercial use, are an excellent technology to help achieve
the goals of increased in-state electricity generation, reduced demand
on the state electric grid, increased consumer energy independence, and
nonpolluting electricity generation; and (e) implementation of
consistent statewide standards to achieve the timely and cost-effective
installation of small wind energy systems is a matter of statewide
concern.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to reduce a known barrier
to small wind energy generation systems, namely, that many local
government jurisdictions have either an outdated permitting process or
code, or no permitting process or code for the safest permitting
standards for small wind energy systems. In order to address this
issue, the legislature intends to create an expedited path for small
wind energy systems that meet the nationally recognized safest
standards contained in this chapter.
(3) The legislature intends that small wind energy systems whose
variations fall outside the parameters prescribed in this chapter must
proceed through a local government permitting process.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter apply to
all local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Local agency" means any county, city, town, or local entity in
the state of Washington with authority to enact construction or
building ordinances or otherwise conduct construction or building
permitting or zoning.
(2) "Meteorological tower" is defined to include the tower, base
plate, anchors, guy cables and hardware, anemometers (wind speed
indicators), wind direction vanes, booms to hold equipment anemometers
and vanes, data logger, instrument wiring, and any telemetry devices
that are used to monitor or transmit wind speed and wind flow
characteristics over a period of time for either instantaneous wind
information or to characterize the wind resource at a given location.
(3) "Owner" means the individual or entity that intends to own and
operate the small wind energy system.
(4) "Rotor diameter" means the cross-sectional dimension of the
circle swept by the rotating blades.
(5) "Small wind energy system" means a wind energy system that:
(a) Is used to generate electricity;
(b) Has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or less; and
(c) Has a total height of one hundred seventy feet or less.
(6) "Total height" means the vertical distance from ground level to
the tip of a wind generator blade when the tip is at its highest point.
(7) "Tower" means the monopole, freestanding, or guyed structure
that supports a wind generator.
(8) "Wind energy system" means equipment that converts and then
stores or transfers energy from the wind into usage forms of energy.
This equipment includes any base, blade, foundation, generator,
nacelle, rotor, tower, transformer, vane, wire, inverter, batteries, or
other component used in the system.
(9) "Wind generator" means blades and associated mechanical and
electrical conversion components mounted on top of the tower.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A local agency may, by ordinance,
provide for the installation of a small wind energy system on parcels
of land of at least one acre in its jurisdiction. The local agency may
establish a process for the issuance of a conditional use permit for a
small wind energy system.
(2) The ordinance may impose conditions on the installation of a
small wind energy system that includes, but is not limited to, notice,
tower height, setback, view protection, aesthetics, aviation, and
design safety requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A local agency that does not adopt an
ordinance under section 3 of this act shall approve applications for
small wind energy systems if all of the following conditions are met:
(a) A wind tower for a small wind energy system must be setback a
distance equal to its total height from:
(i) Any public road right-of-way, unless written permission is
granted by the governmental entity with jurisdiction over the road;
(ii) Any overhead utility lines, unless written permission is
granted by the affected utility;
(iii) All property lines, unless written permission is granted from
the affected land owner or neighbor.
(b) All ground mounted electrical and control equipment must be
labeled or secured to prevent unauthorized access. The tower must be
designed and installed so as to not provide step bolts or a ladder
readily accessible to the public for a minimum height of eight feet
above the ground.
(c) All electrical wires associated with a small wind energy
system, other than wires necessary to connect the wind generator to the
tower wiring, the tower wiring to the disconnect junction box, and the
grounding wires must be located underground.
(d) A wind tower and generator may not be artificially lighted
unless the lighting is required by the federal aviation administration.
(e) The wind generator and tower must remain painted or finished
the color or finish that was originally applied by the manufacturer,
unless approved in the building permit.
(f) All signs, other than the manufacturer's or installer's
identification, appropriate warning signs, or owner identification on
a wind generator, tower, building, or other structure associated with
a small wind energy system visible from any public road are prohibited.
(g) A small wind energy system, including tower, must comply with
all applicable state construction and electrical codes, and the
national electrical code.
(h) Small wind energy systems that connect to an electric utility
must comply with applicable interconnection standards.
(i) Meteorological towers must be permitted under the same
standards, permit requirements, restoration requirements, and permit
procedures as a small wind energy system.
(2) A building permit is required for the installation of a small
wind energy system. The building permit application must be
accompanied by a plot plan that includes the following:
(a) Property lines and physical dimensions of the property;
(b) Location, dimensions, and types of existing major structures on
the property;
(c) Location of the proposed wind system tower;
(d) The right-of-way of any public road that is contiguous with the
property;
(e) Any overhead utility lines;
(f) Wind system specifications, including manufacturer and model,
rotor diameter, tower height, and tower type (freestanding or guyed);
(g) Tower foundation blueprints or drawings; and
(h) Tower blueprint or drawing.
(3) The application for a building permit for a small wind energy
system must be accompanied by the fee required for a building permit
for a permitted accessory use.
(4) A permit issued under this section expires if:
(a) The small wind energy system is not installed and functioning
within twenty-four months from the date the permit is issued; or
(b) The small wind energy system is out-of-service or otherwise
unused for a continuous twelve-month period.
(5) An owner shall submit an application to the local agency for a
building permit for a small wind energy system. The application must
be on a form approved by the local agency and must be accompanied by
two copies of the plot plan identified in subsection (2) of this
section.
(6) The local agency shall issue a permit or deny the application
within one month of the date on which the application is received.
(7) The local agency shall issue a building permit for a small wind
energy system if the application materials show that the proposed small
wind energy system meets the requirements of this chapter.
(8) If the application is approved, the local agency must return
one signed copy of the application with the permit and retain the other
copy with the application.
(9) If the application is rejected, the local agency must notify
the applicant in writing and provide a written statement of the reason
why the application was rejected.
(10) The owner shall conspicuously post the building permit on the
premises so as to be visible to the public at all times until
construction or installation of the small wind energy system is
complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---