BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.010 and 2007 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas that is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel in self-propelled motor vehicles.
(2) "Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to
propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or
reformulated gasoline. Alternative fuel includes, but is not limited
to, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural
gas, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels containing seventy percent
or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels that are derived from biomass,
hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel, nonhazardous motor fuel, or
electricity, excluding onboard electric generation.
(3) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty
acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration
requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal
environmental protection agency and standards established by the
American society of testing and materials.
(4) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and
diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec.
48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.
(5) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(6) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of
ethanol and hydrocarbon of which the ethanol portion is nominally
seventy-five to eighty-five percent denatured fuel ethanol by volume
that complies with the most recent version of American society of
testing and materials specification D 5798.
(7) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state, and any biodiesel fuel.
Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base
motor fuel meets the applicable standards before the addition of the
ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the applicable standards after
the addition of the ethanol.
(8) "Nonhazardous motor fuel" means any fuel of a type distributed
for use in self-propelled motor vehicles that does not contain a
hazardous liquid as defined in RCW 19.122.020.
(9) "Renewable diesel" means a diesel fuel substitute produced from
nonpetroleum renewable sources, including vegetable oils and animal
fats, that meets the registration requirements for fuels and fuel
additives established by the federal environmental protection agency in
40 C.F.R. Part 79 (2008) and meets the requirements of American society
of testing and materials specification D 975.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.112.110 and 2006 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, other than
international fuel tax agreement licensees, dyed special fuel users,
and special fuel distributors, shall provide evidence to the department
of licensing that at least two percent of the total annual diesel fuel
sold in Washington is biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel, following the
earlier of: (a) November 30, 2008; or (b) when a determination is made
by the director, published in the Washington State Register, that
feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a two-percent
requirement.
(2) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, other than
international fuel tax agreement licensees, dyed special fuel users,
and special fuel distributors, shall provide evidence to the department
of licensing that at least five percent of total annual diesel fuel
sold in Washington is biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel, when the
director determines, and publishes this determination in the Washington
State Register, that both in-state oil seed crushing capacity and
feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a three-percent
requirement.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the
determination has been published in the Washington State Register.
(4) The director and the director of licensing shall each adopt
rules, in coordination with each other, for enforcing and carrying out
the purposes of this section.

--- END ---