BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.300.010 and 2008 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means any company that controls, is controlled by,
or is under common control with another company. Affiliate may also
include a supplier, distributor, business partner, or any entity that
effects, administers, or enforces a government or business transaction.
(2) "Identification device" means an item that uses radio frequency
identification technology or facial recognition technology.
(((2))) (3) "Issued" means either:
(a) To have provided the identification device to a person; or
(b) To have placed, requested the placement, or be the intended
beneficiary of the placement of, the identification device in a
product, product packaging, or product inventory mechanism.
(4) "Person" means a natural person who resides in Washington.
(((3))) (5) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.255.010.
(((4) "Data" means personal information, numerical values
associated with a person's facial features, or unique personal
identifier numbers stored on an identification device.
(5))) (6) "Radio frequency identification" means ((a technology
that uses radio waves to transmit data remotely to readers)) the use of
electromagnetic radiating waves or reactive field coupling in the radio
frequency portion of the spectrum to communicate to or from a tag
through a variety of modulation and encoding schemes to uniquely read
the identity of a radio frequency tag or other data stored on it.
(((6) "Reader" means a scanning device that is capable of using
radio waves to communicate with an identification device and read the
data transmitted by that identification device.))
(7) "Remotely reading" means that no physical contact is required
between the identification device and the ((reader is necessary in
order to transmit)) mechanical device that captures data.
(8) "Unique personal identifier number" means a randomly assigned
string of numbers or symbols that is encoded on the identification
device and is intended to identify the identification device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.300 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
governmental or business entity may not remotely read an identification
device using radio frequency identification technology for commercial
purposes, unless that governmental or business entity, or one of their
affiliates, is the same governmental or business entity that issued the
identification device.
(2) This section does not apply to the following:
(a) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
as part of a commercial transaction initiated by the person in
possession of the identification device;
(b) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
for triage or medical care during a disaster and immediate
hospitalization or immediate outpatient care directly relating to a
disaster;
(c) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
by an emergency responder or health care professional for reasons
relating to the health or safety of that person;
(d) Remotely reading or storing data from a person's identification
device issued to a patient for emergency purposes;
(e) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
of a person pursuant to court-ordered electronic monitoring;
(f) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
of a person who is incarcerated in a correctional institution, juvenile
detention facility, or mental health facility;
(g) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
by law enforcement or government personnel who need to read a lost
identification device when the owner is unavailable for notice,
knowledge, or consent, or those parties specifically authorized by law
enforcement or government personnel for the limited purpose of reading
a lost identification device when the owner is unavailable for notice,
knowledge, or consent;
(h) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
by law enforcement personnel who need to read a person's identification
device after an accident in which the person is unavailable for notice,
knowledge, or consent;
(i) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
by a person or entity that in the course of operating its own
identification device system collects data from another identification
device, provided that the inadvertently received data comports with all
of the following:
(i) The data is not disclosed to any other party;
(ii) The data is not used for any purpose; and
(iii) The data is not stored or is promptly destroyed;
(j) Remotely reading or storing data from a person's identification
device in the course of an act of good faith security research,
experimentation, or scientific inquiry including, but not limited to,
activities useful in identifying and analyzing security flaws and
vulnerabilities;
(k) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
by law enforcement personnel who need to scan a person's identification
device pursuant to a search warrant; and
(l) Remotely reading or storing data from an identification device
by a business if it is necessary to complete a transaction.
(3) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.300 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the attorney general shall, on an annual basis, make
recommendations to the legislature on other personally invasive
technologies that may warrant further legislative action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act is found to be
in conflict with federal law or regulations, the conflicting provision
of this act is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and that finding or determination shall not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act.

--- END ---