BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.34.080 and 1990 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The capitol campus design advisory committee is established as
an advisory group to the capitol committee and the director of general
administration to review programs, planning, design, and landscaping of
state capitol facilities and grounds and to make recommendations that
will contribute to the attainment of architectural, aesthetic,
functional, and environmental excellence in design and maintenance of
capitol facilities on campus and located in neighboring communities.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of the following persons
who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor:
(a) Two architects;
(b) A landscape architect; and
(c) An urban planner.
The governor shall appoint the chair and vice-chair and shall
instruct the director of general administration to provide the staff
and resources necessary for implementing this section. The advisory
committee shall meet at least once every ninety days and at the call of
the chair.
The members of the committee shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW
43.03.220 and 44.04.120.
(3) The advisory committee shall also consist of the secretary of
state ((and)); two members of the house of representatives, one from
each caucus, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives((, and)); two members of the senate, one from each
caucus, who shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and the
mayor of the city of Olympia.
(4) The advisory committee shall review plans and designs affecting
state capitol facilities as they are developed. The advisory
committee's review shall include:
(a) The process of solicitation and selection of appropriate
professional design services including design-build proposals;
(b) Compliance with the capitol campus master plan and design
concepts as adopted by the capitol committee;
(c) The design, siting, and grouping of state capitol facilities
relative to the service needs of state government and the impact upon
the local community's economy, environment, traffic patterns, and other
factors;
(d) The relationship of overall state capitol facility planning to
the respective comprehensive plans for long-range urban development of
the cities of Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater, and Thurston county; and
(e) Landscaping plans and designs, including planting proposals,
street furniture, sculpture, monuments, and access to the capitol
campus and buildings.

--- END ---