BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.321 and 2006 c 344 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, and district officers, and for the submission to the voters
of the state, county, city, town, or district of any measure for their
adoption and approval or rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday of November, in the year in which they may be
called. A statewide general election shall be held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each year. However, the
statewide general election held in odd-numbered years shall be limited
to (a) city, town, and district general elections as provided for in
RCW 29A.04.330, or as otherwise provided by law; (b) the election of
federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms in the
membership of either branch of the Congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in
Article II, section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22,
and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and
RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county officers in any county
governed by a charter containing provisions calling for general county
elections at this time; and (e) the approval or rejection of state
measures, including proposed constitutional amendments, matters
pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention, initiative
measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate, referendum
bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for submission
to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may call a special county
election by presenting a resolution to the county auditor prior to the
proposed election date. ((Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section,)) A special election called by the county legislative
authority shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by
such governing body:
(a) The ((first)) second Tuesday ((after the first Monday)) in
February;
(b) ((The second Tuesday in March;
(c))) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(((d))) (c) The third Tuesday in May for tax levies that failed
previously in that calendar year and new bond issues;
(((e))) (d) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29A.04.311;
or
(((f))) (e) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) through (((d))) (c) of this section must be
presented to the county auditor at least ((fifty-two)) forty-five days
prior to the election date. A resolution calling for a special
election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(((e))) (d) or (((f)))
(e) of this section must be presented to the county auditor at least
eighty-four days prior to the election date.
(4) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(((f))) (e) of this section, a special election to validate an excess
levy or bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs
resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such
county special election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner
provided by law.
(5) ((In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential
primary.
(6))) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.330 and 2006 c 344 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.235 and
nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540
RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor prior to the proposed
election date, may call a special election in such city, town, or
district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may
combine, unite, or divide precincts. ((Except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section,)) Such a special election shall be held
on one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The ((first)) second Tuesday ((after the first Monday)) in
February;
(b) ((The second Tuesday in March;
(c))) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(((d))) (c) The third Tuesday in May for tax levies that failed
previously in that calendar year and new bond issues;
(((e))) (d) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW
29A.04.311; or
(((f))) (e) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) through (((d))) (c) of this section must be
presented to the county auditor at least ((fifty-two)) forty-five days
prior to the election date. A resolution calling for a special
election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(((e))) (d) or (((f)))
(e) of this section must be presented to the county auditor at least
eighty-four days prior to the election date.
(4) ((In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(5))) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (((f))) (e) of this
section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue
may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(((e))) (d) and (((f))) (e) of this
section. Such special election shall be conducted and notice thereof
given in the manner provided by law.
(((6))) (5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and
all other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having
different dates for such city, town, and district elections, the
purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for holding
elections.

--- END ---