BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to honor
and recognize the dedication and sacrifices made by the men and women
of Washington state who were killed or missing in action during the
Afghanistan and Iraq wars against terrorism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 73.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director of the department of veterans affairs shall
coordinate the design, construction, and placement of a memorial within
the state capitol grounds, honoring Washington state residents who were
killed or missing in action in the Afghanistan and Iraq wars.
(2) The Afghanistan-Iraq war memorial account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations and
private donations must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the Afghanistan-Iraq war
memorial. Only the director of the department of veterans affairs or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---