BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.120 and 2005 c 447 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall make or cause to be made an unannounced
inspection of all hospitals on average at least every eighteen months.
Every inspection of a hospital may include an inspection of every part
of the premises. The department may make an examination of all phases
of the hospital operation necessary to determine compliance with the
law and the standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(2) The department shall not issue its final report regarding an
unannounced inspection by the department until: (a) The hospital is
given at least two weeks following the inspection to provide any
information or documentation requested by the department during the
unannounced inspection that was not available at the time of the
request; and (b) at least one person from the department conducting the
inspection meets personally with the chief administrator or executive
officer of the hospital following the inspection or the chief
administrator or executive officer declines such a meeting.
(3) Any licensee or applicant desiring to make alterations or
additions to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall,
before commencing such alteration, addition or new construction, comply
with the regulations prescribed by the department.
(4) No hospital licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
shall be required to be inspected or licensed under other state laws or
rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or local ordinances,
relative to hotels, restaurants, lodging houses, boarding houses,
places of refreshment, nursing homes, maternity homes, or psychiatric
hospitals.
(5) To avoid unnecessary duplication in inspections, the department
shall coordinate with the department of social and health services, the
office of the state fire marshal, and local agencies when inspecting
facilities over which each agency has jurisdiction, the facilities
including but not necessarily being limited to hospitals with both
acute care and skilled nursing or psychiatric nursing functions. The
department shall notify the office of the state fire marshal and the
relevant local agency at least four weeks prior to any inspection
conducted under this section and invite their attendance at the
inspection, and shall provide a copy of its inspection report to each
agency upon completion.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.41.122 and 2005 c 447 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Surveys conducted on hospitals by the joint commission on the
accreditation of health care organizations ((or)), the American
osteopathic association ((on hospitals accredited by those bodies)), or
Det Norske Veritas shall be deemed equivalent to a department survey
for purposes of meeting the requirements for the survey specified in
RCW 70.41.120 if the department determines that the applicable survey
standards ((of the joint commission on the accreditation of health care
organizations or the American osteopathic association)) are
substantially equivalent to its own.
(1) Hospitals so surveyed shall provide to the department within
thirty days of learning the result of a survey documentary evidence
that the hospital has been certified as a result of a survey and the
date of the survey.
(2) Hospitals shall make available to department surveyors the
written reports of such surveys during department surveys, upon
request.

--- END ---