BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.010 and 2007 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The measure and mode of compensation of attorneys and counselors,
shall be left to the agreement, expressed or implied, of the parties,
but there shall be allowed to the prevailing party upon the judgment
certain sums ((by way of indemnity)) for the prevailing party's
expenses in the action, which allowances are termed costs, including,
in addition to costs otherwise authorized by law, the following
expenses:
(1) Filing fees;
(2) Fees for the service of process by a public officer, registered
process server, or other means, as follows:
(a) When service is by a public officer, the recoverable cost is
the fee authorized by law at the time of service.
(b) If service is by a process server registered pursuant to
chapter 18.180 RCW or a person exempt from registration, the
recoverable cost is the amount actually charged and incurred in
effecting service;
(3) Fees for service by publication;
(4) Notary fees, but only to the extent the fees are for services
that are expressly required by law and only to the extent they
represent actual costs incurred by the prevailing party;
(5) Reasonable expenses, exclusive of attorneys' fees, incurred in
obtaining reports and records, which are admitted into evidence at
trial or in mandatory arbitration in superior or district court,
including but not limited to medical records, tax records, personnel
records, insurance reports, employment and wage records, police
reports, school records, bank records, and legal files;
(6) Statutory attorney and witness fees; and
(7) To the extent that the court or arbitrator finds that it was
necessary to achieve the successful result, the reasonable expense of
the transcription of depositions used at trial or at the mandatory
arbitration hearing: PROVIDED, That the expenses of depositions shall
be allowed on a pro rata basis for those portions of the depositions
introduced into evidence or used for purposes of impeachment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action for the recovery of money only, the
plaintiff will be considered the prevailing party for the purpose of
awarding costs, including a statutory attorney fee, if: (a) The
defendant makes full or partial payment of the amounts sought by the
plaintiff prior to the entry of judgment; and (b) before such payment
is tendered, the plaintiff has notified the defendant in writing that
the full or partial payment of the amounts sued for might result in an
award of costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "plaintiff" includes a
counter-claimant, cross-claimant, and third-party plaintiff, and
"defendant" includes a party defending a counter-claim, cross-claim, or
third-party claim.
(3) A party may demand, offer, or accept the payment of statutory
costs before the entry of judgment in an action.
(4) This section may not be construed to (a) authorize an award of
costs if the action is resolved by a negotiated settlement or (b) limit
or bar the operation of cost-shifting provisions of other statutes or
court rules.

Sec. 3 RCW 12.20.060 and 2004 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the prevailing party in district court is entitled to
recover costs as authorized in RCW 4.84.010 in a civil action, the
judge shall add the amount thereof to the judgment; in case of failure
of the plaintiff to recover or of dismissal of the action, the judge
shall enter up a judgment in favor of the defendant for the amount of
his or her costs; and in case any party so entitled to costs is
represented in the action by an attorney, the judge shall include
attorney's fees in the amount provided in RCW ((4.84.060)) 4.84.080 as
part of the costs: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the plaintiff shall not be
entitled to such attorney fee unless he or she obtains, exclusive of
costs, a judgment in the sum of fifty dollars or more: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if the plaintiff obtains judgment, exclusive of costs, of
at least fifty dollars but less than two hundred dollars, the judge
shall include attorney fees of one hundred twenty-five dollars as part
of the costs.
(2)(a) In any district court civil action for the recovery of money
only, the plaintiff will be considered the prevailing party for the
purpose of awarding costs, including a statutory attorney fee, if: (i)
The defendant makes full or partial payment of the amounts sought by
the plaintiff prior to the entry of judgment; and (ii) before such
payment is tendered, the plaintiff has notified the defendant in
writing that the full or partial payment of the amounts sued for might
result in an award of costs. The plaintiff is not entitled to a
statutory attorney fee unless the amount prayed for, exclusive of
costs, is fifty dollars or more, and if the amount prayed for,
exclusive of costs, is at least fifty dollars but less than two hundred
dollars, the judgment must include a statutory attorney fee of one
hundred twenty-five dollars as part of the costs.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "plaintiff" includes a
counter-claimant, cross-claimant, and third-party plaintiff, and
"defendant" includes a party defending a counter-claim, cross-claim, or
third-party claim.
(c) A party may demand, offer, or accept payment of statutory costs
before the entry of judgment in an action.
(d) This section may not be construed to (a) authorize an award of
costs if the action is resolved by a negotiated settlement or (b) limit
or bar the operation of cost-shifting provisions of other statutes or
court rules.

--- END ---