BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The tree fruit industry is a vital part of the state's economy;
(2) Products made from tree fruits have helped to keep the tree
fruit industry's competitive edge in the world marketplace;
(3) Aplets and Cotlets are candies made in Washington using apples
and apricots grown in Washington state; and
(4) Aplets and Cotlets have been produced in Washington for over
seventy years and identify Washington state to consumers worldwide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Aplets and Cotlets are designated as the official candy of the
state of Washington.

--- END ---