BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.95.010 and 1985 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of a television reception improvement district,
hereinafter referred to in this chapter as "district", shall be to
serve the public interest, convenience, and necessity in the
construction, maintenance, and operation of television ((and)), FM
radio translator stations, and public safety emergency radio
communications systems, including appropriate electric or electronic
devices for increasing television program distribution, but said
purposes are not meant to include the construction or operation of
television cable systems, commonly known and referred to as cable TV
systems or CATV.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.95.140 and 1985 c 76 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district may translate or retransmit only those signals which
originate from commercial and educational FM radio stations, public
safety emergency radio communications systems, and commercial and
educational television stations which directly provide, within some
portion of the state of Washington, a class A grade or class B grade
contour, as such classes are defined under regulations of the Federal
Communications Commission as of August 9, 1971.

--- END ---