BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.420 and 2005 c 274 s 422 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following information relating to security is exempt from
disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained to
prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(a) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(b) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law that
are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism;
(2) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, or secure facility for persons civilly confined
under chapter 71.09 RCW, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility, secure facility for
persons civilly confined under chapter 71.09 RCW, or any individual's
safety;
(3) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans under RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school;
(4) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities; and
(5) The security section of transportation system safety and
security program plans required under RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300,
36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and 81.112.180.

--- END ---