BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The governor shall convene a work group
to study and make recommendations regarding the practice and discipline
of holistic physicians. The work group shall consist of twelve members
appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) Three physicians representing the Washington state medical
association;
(b) Three physicians who are members of the American college for
advancement in medicine, the American academy of environmental
medicine, or the American holistic medical association;
(c) Three persons who are not physicians selected from a list of
six names submitted by the Washington state medical association; and
(d) Three persons who are not physicians selected from a list of
six names submitted by the physicians appointed in (b) of this
subsection.
(2) The work group shall:
(a) Study the differences between holistic and nonholistic
physicians in terms of diagnostic and treatment methodologies to
determine whether a regulatory definition of a holistic physician is
advisable or feasible;
(b) Examine existing protections provided to physicians under RCW
18.130.180(4) and determine whether additional protections for holistic
physicians are warranted;
(c) Determine whether holistic physicians are being treated fairly
in the disciplinary process by reviewing and comparing:
(i) Prior cases against holistic and nonholistic physicians;
(ii) The number of investigations that were initiated neither by
patient complaint nor allegations of patient harm regarding holistic
and nonholistic physicians;
(iii) The percentage of complaints that led to formal
investigations of holistic and nonholistic physicians; and
(iv) The fairness of procedures and safeguards in the hearings
process with respect to holistic and nonholistic physicians;
(d) Examine and compare the safeguards provided to patients of
holistic and nonholistic physicians to confirm whether the safeguards
provided to patients of holistic physicians meet current professional
standards of patient safety; and
(e) Solicit and consider written comments from the public and
interested stakeholder groups.
(3) The work group shall submit its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by November 15, 2010. In addition to
the findings and recommendations related to the work group's tasks in
subsection (2) of this section, the recommendations shall include the
following, if warranted by the work group's findings:
(a) An identification of regulatory or other mechanisms to
accommodate the use of safe and effective holistic health care services
by physicians; and
(b) Recommendations for:
(i) Protecting the ability of patients to select their physician of
choice;
(ii) Assuring full disclosure of health care approaches and
alternatives; and
(iii) Ensuring fairness in the physician disciplinary process.
(4) The department of health shall provide administrative support
to the work group. The department of health shall also provide
informational support to the work group upon request.
(5) For purposes of this act, "physician" means a person licensed
to practice medicine under chapter 18.71 RCW or a person licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2011.

--- END ---