BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Environmental health hazards associated with lead wheel weights
are a preventable problem. People are exposed to lead fragments and
dust when lead wheel weights fall from vehicles on Washington roadways
and are then abraded and pulverized by traffic. Lead wheel weights on
and alongside roadways can contribute to soil, surface, and groundwater
contamination and pose a hazard to downstream aquatic life.
(2) Lead negatively affects every bodily system. While injurious
to individuals of all ages, it is especially harmful to children,
fetuses, and adults of childbearing age. Effects of lead on a child's
cognitive, behavioral, and developmental abilities may necessitate
large expenditures of public funds for health care and special
education. Irreversible damage to children and subsequent expenditures
could be avoided if exposure to lead is reduced.
(3) There are no federal regulatory controls governing use of lead
wheel weights. The legislature recognizes the state's need to protect
the public from exposure to lead hazards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Environmentally preferred wheel weights" means wheel weights
used for balancing motor vehicle wheels that do not include more than
0.5 percent by weight of any chemical, group of chemicals, or metals of
concern identified by rule under chapter 173-333 WAC.
(3) "Lead wheel weight" means any externally affixed or attached
wheel weight used for balancing motor vehicle wheels and composed of
greater than 0.1 percent lead by weight.
(4) "Person" includes any individual, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture.
(5) "Vehicle" means any motor vehicle registered in Washington with
a wheel diameter of less than 19.5 inches or a gross vehicle weight of
fourteen thousand pounds or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If a wheel weight alternative no longer
meets the criteria of an environmentally preferred wheel weight, tire
distributors and retailers have two years to use existing stock and to
phase in other environmentally preferred wheel weight alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Use of environmentally preferred wheel
weights is required at the time of tire replacement or the tire
balancing after January 1, 2011, for all vehicles registered in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Tire retailers and distributors must recycle
lead wheel weights that are removed by the tire retailers and
distributors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall achieve compliance
with this chapter using the following enforcement sequence:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the implementation under section
4 of this act, the department shall prepare and distribute information
to persons in the tire and wheel weight manufacturing, distribution,
wholesale and retail industries, to the maximum extent practicable, to
assist them in identifying environmentally preferred wheel weights.
(b) The department shall issue a warning letter to a person in the
tire distribution, wholesale, retail, or associated industries that
violates the requirements of this chapter.
(c) The department shall offer information or other appropriate
assistance to the person in (b) of this subsection. If compliance is
not achieved within one year of issuing a warning letter, the
department may assess civil penalties against the person under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Failure of a person that installs wheel weights in compliance
with this chapter is a violation punishable by a civil penalty not to
exceed five hundred dollars for the first violation. A violation
occurs for each vehicle registered in Washington state that does not
comply with this chapter. Persons who are repeat violators are liable
for a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each repeat
offense. Penalties collected under this section must be deposited in
the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.105D.070. The owner
of a vehicle is not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department may adopt rules to fully
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---