BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.12.020 and 1989 c 19 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The adjutant general shall:
(((1) Keep rosters of all active, reserve, and retired officers of
the militia, and all other records, and papers required to be kept and
filed therein, and shall submit to the governor such reports of the
operations and conditions of the organized militia as the governor may
require.
(2))) (1) Subject to the orders of the commander-in-chief, command
the Washington national guard and recruit, train, maintain, and
administer the organized militia of the state of Washington.
(2) Supervise the preparation and submission of any records
required by the federal government, the governor, or as otherwise
required by law.
(3) Maintain records of the organized militia and state military
department as required by law. The adjutant general may deposit
records with the state archivist for historical purposes.
(4) Cause ((the military law, and such other military publications
as may be necessary for the military service, to be prepared and
distributed at the expense of the state, to the departments and units
of the organized militia)) to be published and distributed to the
organized militia at state expense necessary documents or publications,
to include the Washington code of military justice.
(((3))) (5) Keep just and true accounts of all moneys received and
disbursed by ((him or her)) the military department.
(((4))) (6) Attest all commissions issued to military officers of
this state.
(((5) Make out and transmit all militia reports, returns, and
communications prescribed by acts of congress or by direction of the
department of defense and the national guard bureau.
(6) Have a seal, and all copies, orders, records, and papers in his
or her office, duly certified and authenticated under the seal, shall
be evidence in all cases in like manner as if the originals were
produced. The seal now used in the office of the adjutant general
shall be the seal of his or her office and shall be delivered by him or
her to the successor.))
(7) Be the custodian of the seal of the office of adjutant general
and deliver the same to his or her successor. All orders issued from
((his or her)) the office of the adjutant general shall be
authenticated with the seal. Orders or records under the seal shall be
prima facie proof of certification or authenticity.
(((7) Make)) (8) Promulgate in orders such regulations pertaining
to the ((preparation of reports and returns and to the use,
maintenance, care, and preservation of property in possession of the
state for military purposes, whether belonging to the state or to the
United States)) operation and function of the state military department
and organized militia, as in his or her opinion the conditions demand.
(((8))) (9) Attend to the care, preservation, safekeeping, and
repairing of ((the arms, ordinance, accoutrements, equipment, and)) all
((other)) military property belonging to the state, or issued to the
state by the United States for military purposes((, and keep accurate
accounts thereof)). Any property of the state military department
which, after proper inspection, is found unsuitable or no longer needed
for use of the ((state military forces,)) organized militia shall be
disposed of in such manner as the governor shall direct and the
proceeds thereof used for replacements in kind or by other needed
authorized military supplies, and the adjutant general may execute the
necessary instruments of conveyance to effect such sale or disposal.
(((9))) (10) Issue the military property as the necessity of
service requires and make purchases for that purpose. ((No military
property shall be issued or loaned to persons or organizations other
than those belonging to the militia, except as permitted by applicable
state or federal law.
(10) Keep on file in his office the reports and returns of military
units, and all other writings and papers required to be transmitted to
and preserved at the general headquarters of the state militia.
(11) Keep all records of volunteers commissioned or enlisted for
all wars or insurrections, and of individual claims of citizens for
service rendered in these wars or insurrections, and he or she shall
also))
(11) Be the custodian of all ((records,)) military relics,
trophies, colors, and histories ((relating to such wars)) now in
possession of, or which may be acquired by, the state.
(((12) Establish and maintain as part of his or her office a bureau
of records of the services of the organized militia of the state, and
upon request furnish a copy thereof or extract therefrom, attested
under seal of his or her office, and such attested copy shall be prima
facie proof of service, birthplace, and citizenship.
(13))) (12) Keep a record of all real property owned or used by the
state for military purposes, and in connection therewith he or she
shall have sole power to execute all leases to acquire the use of real
property by the state for military purposes, or lease it to other
agencies for use for authorized activities. The adjutant general shall
also have full power to execute and grant easements for rights-of-way
for construction, operation, and maintenance of utility service, water,
sewage, and drainage for such realty.

--- END ---