BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0305 and 1987 c 4 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes the wagering on the outcome of
the roll of dice or the flipping of or matching of coins on the
premises of an establishment engaged in the business of selling food or
beverages for consumption on the premises to determine which of the
participants will pay for coin-operated music on the premises or
certain items of food or beverages served or sold by such establishment
and therein consumed. Such establishments are hereby authorized to
possess dice and dice cups on their premises, but only for use in such
limited wagering. Persons engaged in such limited form of wagering
shall not be subject to the criminal or civil penalties otherwise
provided for in this chapter((: PROVIDED, That minors shall be barred
from engaging in the wagering activities allowed by this chapter)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person under the age of eighteen to play
in authorized gambling activities including, but not limited to,
punchboards, pull-tabs, or card games, or to participate in
fund-raising events. Persons under the age of eighteen may play bingo,
raffles, and amusement game activities only as provided in commission
rules.
(2) A person under the age of eighteen who violates subsection (1)
of this section by engaging in, or attempting to engage in, prohibited
gambling activities commits a class 2 civil infraction under chapter
7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine set out in chapter 7.80 RCW, up to
four hours of community restitution, and any court imposed costs.
(3) Municipal and district courts within the state have
jurisdiction for enforcement of this section, subject to the provisions
of RCW 13.04.030.
(4)(a) An employer may conduct an in-house controlled purchase
program authorized for the purposes of employee training and employer
self-compliance checks.
(b) The civil infraction provisions of this section do not apply to
a person under the age of eighteen who is participating in an in-house
controlled purchase program authorized by the commission under rules
adopted by the commission. Violations occurring under an in-house
controlled purchase program authorized by the commission may not be
used for criminal or administrative prosecution.
(c) An employer who conducts an in-house controlled purchase
program authorized under this section shall provide his or her
employees a written description of the employer's in-house controlled
purchase program. The written description must include notice of
actions an employer may take as a consequence of an employee's failure
to comply with company policies regarding unauthorized persons engaging
in gambling activities during a controlled purchase program authorized
under this section.
(5) A person under the age of eighteen who violates subsection (1)
of this section shall not collect any winnings or recover any losses
arising as a result of unlawfully participating in any gambling
activity. Additionally, any money or anything of value which has been
obtained by, or is owed to, any person under the age of eighteen as a
result of such participation shall be forfeited to the department of
social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse or
its successor and used for a program related to youth problem gambling
awareness, prevention, and/or education. Any person claiming any money
or things of value subject to forfeiture under this subsection will
receive notice and an opportunity for a hearing under RCW 9.46.231.

--- END ---