BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.59 RCW
to read as follows:
An occupational therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase,
store, and administer topical and transdermal medications such as
hydrocortisone, dexamethasone, fluocinonide, topical anesthetics,
lidocaine, magnesium sulfate, and other similar medications for the
practice of occupational therapy as prescribed by a health care
provider with prescribing authority as authorized in RCW 18.59.100.
Administration of medication must be documented in the patient's
medical record. Some medications may be applied by the use of
iontophoresis and phonophoresis. An occupational therapist may not
purchase, store, or administer controlled substances. A pharmacist who
dispenses such drugs to a licensed occupational therapist is not liable
for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the
occupational therapist. Application of a prescribed medication to a
wound as authorized in this statute does not constitute wound care
management.

--- END ---