BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.041 and 2003 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(d) To develop privacy standards for radio frequency identification
technology;
(e) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(((e))) (f) To provide direction concerning strategic planning
goals and objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from
the legislature and the judiciary;
(((f))) (g) To develop and implement a process for the resolution
of appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(((g))) (h) To establish policies for the periodic review by the
department of agency performance which may include but are not limited
to analysis of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(((h))) (i) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled
times, or meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair,
or the director; and
(((i))) (j) To review and approve that portion of the department's
budget requests that provides for support to the board.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board;
and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop privacy standards for state agencies using
radio frequency identification technology for external or internal
purposes. These standards, at a minimum, must ensure that:
(1) A privacy impact assessment is conducted prior to acquisition
to determine what implications its implementation of radio frequency
identification technology could raise for privacy and the protection of
personal data;
(2) Appropriate technical and organizational measures are being
taken by the state agency in order to mitigate any privacy or data
protection risks; and
(3) The type of radio frequency identification technology selected
has an appropriate level of security for its intended application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
If a state agency intends to deploy radio frequency identification
technology for external or internal purposes, the state agency must
certify to the department that its intended use of radio frequency
identification technology is in compliance with the most recent privacy
standards adopted by the board.

--- END ---