BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, for
Washington's families, purchasing a new home is both the greatest
investment they will make and the culmination of their dreams. The
legislature intends that those making the very significant investment
in a new home should receive genuine accountability in return and
should not be expected to bear, particularly on top of the heavy
financial burden of a mortgage, the costs of homebuilder negligence.
Toward that end, and consistent with principles of equal treatment
under the law, the legislature intends that those citizens purchasing
new homes or remodeling their homes receive statutory warranty rights
similar to those purchasing condominiums. Finally, the legislature
intends that anyone purchasing a home within six years of its
construction, including purchasers subsequent to the initial
owner-occupant, be entitled to the common law implied warranty of
habitability to ward against egregious defects in the fundamental
structure of their homes, and intends that this warranty cannot be
contractually waived.
(2) The legislature by this act does not intend to create a cause
of action in tort for defects in the construction of improvements upon
real property intended for residential use, nor does the legislature
intend to overrule the holding in Berschauer/Phillips Constr. Co. v.
Seattle Sch. Dist. No. 1, 124 Wn.2d 816, 881 P.2d 986 (1994) and other
cases in which the courts have held that the economic loss rule applies
to construction defect claims.
(3) This act may be known and cited as the homeowner's bill of
rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A construction professional involved in the construction of
improvements upon residential real property or real property intended
for use as residential real property warrants that the work, and any
part thereof, will be suitable for the ordinary uses of real property
of its type and that the work, and any part thereof, will be:
(a) Free from defective materials;
(b) Constructed in accordance with sound engineering and
construction standards;
(c) Constructed in a workmanlike manner; and
(d) Constructed in compliance with all laws then applicable to the
improvements.
(2) If a construction professional breaches a warranty arising
under this section and the breach results in damage to any portion of
the residential real property, the current owner of the residential
real property may bring a cause of action for damages against the
construction professional. Absence of privity of contract between the
owner and the construction professional is not a defense to the
enforcement of a warranty arising under this section.
(3) In a judicial proceeding for breach of a warranty arising under
this section, the plaintiff must show that the alleged breach has
adversely affected or will adversely affect the performance of that
portion of the property alleged to be in breach. To establish an
adverse effect, the person alleging the breach is not required to prove
that the breach renders the property unfit for occupancy. As used in
this subsection, "adverse effect" must be more than technical and must
be significant to a reasonable person.
(4) Proof of breach of a warranty arising under this section is not
proof of damages. Damages awarded for a breach of a warranty arising
under this section are the cost of repairs. However, if it is
established that the cost of repairs is clearly disproportionate to the
loss in market value caused by the breach, damages are limited to the
loss in market value.
(5)(a) A judicial proceeding for breach of a warranty arising under
this section must be commenced within four years after the cause of
action accrues. This period may not be reduced by either oral or
written agreement, or through the use of contractual claims or notice
procedures that require the filing or service of any claim or notice
prior to the expiration of the period specified in this section.
(b) Except as provided under (c) of this subsection, a cause of
action for breach of a warranty under this section accrues, regardless
of the owner's lack of knowledge of the breach:
(i) In the case of the purchase of newly constructed residential
real property, on the date the initial owner enters into possession of
the property; or
(ii) In the case of existing residential real property upon which
the construction of improvements are made, on the date of substantial
completion of construction or termination of the construction project,
whichever is later.
(c) A cause of action for breach of a warranty under this section
based on a latent structural defect or a latent water penetration
defect accrues when the claimant discovers or reasonably should have
discovered the latent structural defect or latent water penetration
defect.
(d) An action for breach of a warranty under this section is
subject to the time limits provided in RCW 4.16.310.
(6) If a written notice of claim is served under RCW 64.50.020
within the time prescribed for the filing of an action under this
section, the statutes of limitation in this section and any applicable
statutes of repose for construction-related claims are tolled until
sixty days after the period of time during which the filing of an
action is barred under RCW 64.50.020.
(7) The warranties imposed by this section may not be waived,
disclaimed, or limited.
(8) In a judicial proceeding under this section, the court may
award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing party.
(9) This section does not apply to condominiums subject to chapter
64.34 RCW or nonprofit housing developers.
(10) This section does not affect the application of the
requirements imposed under other provisions of this chapter.
(11) The warranties created in this section are in addition to any
other remedies provided by statutory or common law and do not abrogate
or limit such common law or statutory remedies in any way.
(12) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Nonprofit housing developer" means a nonprofit organization or
housing authority that has among its purposes the provision of housing
that is affordable to low-income households.
(b) "Residential real property" means a single-family house or a
duplex occupied by the owner as a residence.
(c) "Substantial completion of construction" means the state of
completion reached when an improvement upon real property may be used
or occupied for its intended use.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.50.010 and 2002 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Action" means any civil lawsuit or action in contract or tort
for damages or indemnity brought against a construction professional to
assert a claim, whether by complaint, counterclaim, or cross-claim, for
damage or the loss of use of real or personal property caused by a
defect in the construction of a residence or in the substantial remodel
of a residence. "Action" does not include any civil action in tort
alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person or persons
resulting from a construction defect.
(2) "Association" means an association, master association, or
subassociation as defined and provided for in RCW 64.34.020(4),
64.34.276, 64.34.278, and 64.38.010(1).
(3) "Claimant" means a homeowner or association who asserts a claim
against a construction professional concerning a defect in the
construction of a residence or in the substantial remodel of a
residence.
(4) "Construction professional" means an architect, builder,
builder vendor, contractor, subcontractor, engineer, or inspector,
including, but not limited to, a dealer as defined in RCW
64.34.020(((12))) and a declarant as defined in RCW 64.34.020(((13))),
performing or furnishing the design, supervision, inspection,
construction, or observation of the construction of any improvement to
real property, whether operating as a sole proprietor, partnership,
corporation, or other business entity. "Construction professional"
does not include an inspector who is an agent or employee of a local
government and is acting in his or her official capacity as an
inspector.
(5) "Homeowner" means: (a) Any person, company, firm, partnership,
corporation, or association who contracts with a construction
professional for the construction, sale, or construction and sale of a
residence; and (b) an "association" as defined in this section.
"Homeowner" includes, but is not limited to, a subsequent purchaser of
a residence from any homeowner.
(6) "Residence" means a single-family house, duplex, triplex,
quadraplex, or a unit in a multiunit residential structure in which
title to each individual unit is transferred to the owner under a
condominium or cooperative system, and shall include common elements as
defined in RCW 64.34.020(6) and common areas as defined in RCW
64.38.010(4).
(7) "Serve" or "service" means personal service or delivery by
certified mail to the last known address of the addressee.
(8) "Substantial remodel" means a remodel of a residence, for which
the total cost exceeds one-half of the assessed value of the residence
for property tax purposes at the time the contract for the remodel work
was made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that as a matter of public policy the
common law warranty of habitability applicable to newly constructed
residential real property should be modified to extend greater
protection to home purchasers. The legislature intends by this section
to modify the common law implied warranty of habitability in two
respects: To extend the implied warranty of habitability to subsequent
purchasers; and to prohibit the waiver, disclaimer, or limitation of
this warranty through contractual agreement. The legislature does not
intend by this act to change any other aspect of the common law implied
warranty of habitability as developed through case law.
(2)(a) The common law implied warranty of habitability for newly
constructed residential real property extends to any homeowner who
purchases the property within six years of its construction, and is not
limited to the initial owner-occupant of the property. A homeowner who
purchases the property subsequent to the initial owner-occupant, and
within six years of the construction of the property, receives the same
protections of the common law implied warranty of habitability as
possessed by the person from whom the property was purchased.
(b) The common law implied warranty of habitability may not be
waived, disclaimed, or limited by contractual agreement. A provision
of any contract for the purchase or sale of newly constructed
residential property that purports to waive, disclaim, or limit the
common law implied warranty of habitability is void and unenforceable.

--- END ---