BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.315 and 2006 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from his or her home
pursuant to this chapter, the agency charged with his or her care may
authorize an evaluation and treatment for the child's routine and
necessary medical, dental, or mental health care, and all necessary
emergency care.
(2)(a) When an infant under one year of age is placed in out-of-home care under this chapter, the department of social and health
services or other supervising agency shall request that the infant's
treating physician test the infant for human immunodeficiency virus, if
the human immunodeficiency virus status of the mother of the infant is:
(i) Known to be positive; or
(ii) Unknown and the department has information indicating that the
mother is at increased risk of human immunodeficiency virus infection.
(b) The department or other supervising agency shall follow the
treating physician's recommendations for any follow-up testing and
treatment necessary for an infant who has tested positive for human
immunodeficiency virus under (a) of this subsection.
(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to an infant
whose parents object to the test on the basis that it conflicts with
their religious tenets and practices. The parents must provide the
department or other supervising agency with a written statement of the
objection, and the statement shall be included in the infant's medical
record.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.24.330 and 1988 c 206 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may undergo HIV testing without the person's consent
except:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 7.70.065 for incompetent persons;
(2) In seroprevalence studies where neither the persons whose blood
is being tested know the test results nor the persons conducting the
tests know who is undergoing testing;
(3) If the department of labor and industries determines that it is
relevant, in which case payments made under Title 51 RCW may be
conditioned on the taking of an HIV antibody test; ((or))
(4) Pursuant to RCW 13.34.315 for infants placed in out-of-home
care under chapter 13.34 RCW; or
(5) As otherwise expressly authorized by this chapter.

--- END ---