BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) Many rural and urban communities, and economically
disadvantaged and minority populations, are medically underserved and
are likely to become even more so if, as predicted by the health
resources and services administration in 2006, a national shortage of
physicians emerges by 2020.
(2) Community health centers provide primary and preventive health
care services for people living in rural and urban medically
underserved communities. Service is provided regardless of a patient's
ability to pay. There are over one hundred thirty community health
center sites in Washington.
(3) Community health centers are already facing a health workforce
crisis. A recent national survey of eight hundred ninety community
health centers found a pronounced shortage of family medicine
physicians, with more than four hundred family medicine vacancies,
forty percent of which had been open for more than seven months. As of
November 13, 2008, there were twenty-one family medicine vacancies at
Sea Mar community health centers in Washington.
(4) Physicians in the United States are licensed by individual
states, all of whom require a degree as a medicinae doctor or doctor of
osteopathy as well as postgraduate training in an accredited residency
program. Following receipt of a medicinae doctor or doctor of
osteopathy degree, residents complete their training in residency
programs in their chosen area of specialty, providing patient care
under the supervision of teaching physicians.
(5) The University of Washington school of medicine has recently
expanded the number of allopathic medical students.
(6) The Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences college of
osteopathic medicine opened in August of 2008 with its first class of
seventy-five osteopathic medical students.
(7) Studies have shown that physicians in this region who do their
postgraduate family medicine residency training at community health
centers are almost twice as likely to subsequently work in underserved
settings and almost four times as likely to subsequently work in a
community health center as compared with physicians who do their family
medicine residency training in other settings.
(8) There are currently thirteen accredited family medicine
residency programs in Washington, only three of which are sponsored or
sited at a community health center.
(9) In order to be accredited, sponsoring and participating
residency sites must provide all residents with appropriate financial
support and benefits to ensure that they are able to fulfill the
responsibilities of their residency program. At each participating
site, there must be a sufficient faculty with documented qualifications
to instruct and supervise all residents at that location.
(10) Medicare dollars have historically provided a significant
source of funding to offset some of the costs associated with educating
medical residents. In 1997, the federal balanced budget act placed a
cap on the number of residency positions that the program supports.
The cap remains today, despite calls by the association of American
medical colleges and others for the elimination of the cap and an
increase in residency positions in order to address the projected
shortage of physicians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Within funds appropriated to the department
of health for this purpose, and with the goal of increasing the number
of family medicine residency positions at community health centers, and
thereby increasing the number of family medicine physicians working in
underserved settings, a family medicine residency training grant
program is created. Grant funds provided for the purpose of increasing
the number of family medicine residency positions at community health
centers shall be disbursed by the department of health to at least
three accredited, three-year family medicine residency programs
sponsored or sited at community health centers in rural or urban
medically underserved areas. In the first year, and each subsequent
year thereafter, family medicine residency programs to which the grant
funds are awarded shall offer at least two first-year postgraduate
residency positions in family medicine. In the second year, and each
subsequent year thereafter, these family medicine residency programs
shall also offer at least two second-year postgraduate residency
positions in family medicine. In the third year, and each subsequent
year thereafter, these family medicine residency programs shall also
offer at least two third-year postgraduate residency positions in
family medicine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a performance audit and evaluation of the
family medicine residency training grant program created in section 3
of this act every five years. The first audit must be conducted by
December 31, 2015. The audit must include a comparison of family
medicine physicians who did their postgraduate family medicine
residency training at community health centers with those who did their
postgraduate family medicine residency training in other programs to
determine whether the location of the family medicine residency
training influenced or affected where the resident ultimately chose to
work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The family medicine residency training
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. No
appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account.
The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW except for moneys used for program administration.
(2) The department of health shall deposit into the account all
moneys received from private contributions for the program. The
account shall be self-sustaining and consist of private contributions
for the family medicine residency training grant program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for grants to
family medicine residency programs sponsored or sited in community
health centers in rural or urban medically underserved areas and costs
associated with program administration by the department of health.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes, in an amount equal
to seven and one-half cents per pack.
(2) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited in
the health services account created in RCW 43.72.900.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.72.900 and 2005 c 518 s 930 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The health services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Subject
to the transfers described in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in
the account may be expended only for maintaining and expanding health
services access for low-income residents, maintaining and expanding the
public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of the
health care system, containing health care costs, and the regulation,
planning, and administering of the health care system.
(2) Funds deposited into the health services account under RCW
82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) shall be used solely as follows:
(a) Five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, and five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated by the legislature for programs
that effectively improve the health of low-income persons, including
efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that harm low-income persons.
The department of health shall submit a report to the legislature on
March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and
illnesses that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making
recommendations to the legislature on which of these programs could
most effectively utilize the funds appropriated under this subsection.
(b) Ten percent of the funds deposited into the health services
account under RCW 82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) remaining after the
appropriation under (a) of this subsection shall be transferred no less
frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco prevention and
control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds transferred
shall be used exclusively for implementation of the Washington state
tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used only to
supplement, and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention and
control account as of January 1, 2001, however, these funds may be used
to replace funds appropriated by the legislature for further
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001. For each state fiscal
year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand
dollars from the tobacco prevention and control account for
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan.
(c) Because of its demonstrated effectiveness in improving the
health of low-income persons and addressing illnesses and diseases that
harm low-income persons, the remainder of the funds deposited into the
health services account under RCW 82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) shall be
appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan enrollment as
provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated under this
subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities
only to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described
in this section.
(3) Prior to expenditure for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, funds deposited into the health services account
under RCW 82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) shall first be transferred to the
following accounts to ensure the continued availability of previously
dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:
(a) To the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520, two million two hundred forty-nine thousand five hundred
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four million
two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred eighty-nine
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six million
nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars
for each biennium thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(2);
(b) To the health services account under this section, nine million
seventy-seven thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2001, seventeen million one hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, thirty-one million
seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two thousand
dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and twenty-eight
million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and
(c) To the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030, two million
two hundred three thousand five hundred dollars for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-four
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter((, as required by RCW 82.24.027(2)(a))).
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the health services account such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account to the state general fund.
(4) Funds deposited into the health services account under section
6 of this act shall be used solely to fund the family medicine
residency training grant program under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
family medicine residency training account, the food animal
veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable
inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship
account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and
science scholarship account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition
propensity account, and the reading achievement account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---