BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.87.010 (Sale, lease or conveyance of real property for
free public parking authorized -- "Municipality" defined) and 1967 ex.s.
c 144 s 2;
(2) RCW 35.87.020 (Notice of intention to sell, lease or convey
real property in business area -- Posting -- Publication -- Preference right
to purchase or lease) and 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 3;
(3) RCW 35.87.030 (Consideration, terms and conditions -- Reversion)
and 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 4; and
(4) RCW 35.87.040 (RCW 35.87.020 inapplicable to sale, lease or
conveyance to federal government or agency or to the state or any
county, city or political subdivision) and 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 5.

--- END ---