BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) It is a class C felony for a nonimmigrant alien residing in
Washington to carry or possess any firearm, without having first
obtained an alien firearm license.
(b) The sheriff of a county shall within sixty days after the
filing of an application of a nonimmigrant alien residing in the state
of Washington, issue an alien firearm license to such person to carry
or possess a firearm for the purposes of hunting and sport shooting.
The permit shall be good for two years or until the nonimmigrant alien
permanently leaves the state. The issuing authority shall not refuse
to accept completed applications for alien firearm licenses during
regular business hours. The applicant's privilege to bear arms may not
be denied, unless the applicant's alien firearm license is in a revoked
status, or the applicant:
(i) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW
9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(ii) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms
pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050,
26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or
26.26.590;
(iii) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial,
appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense; or
(iv) Has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any
court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor.
No nonimmigrant alien convicted of a felony may have his or her
privilege to possess firearms granted unless the person has been
granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under
18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or unless RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.
(c) The issuing authority shall check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database,
the department of social and health services electronic database, and
with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether
the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess
a firearm.
(d) The license application shall bear the full name, residential
address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and
place of birth, race, gender, description, not more than two complete
sets of fingerprints, and signature of the applicant, a copy of the
applicant's passport and visa showing the applicant is in the country
legally, and a valid Washington hunting license or documentation that
the applicant is a member of a sport shooting club.
A signed application for an alien firearm license shall constitute
a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of
social and health services, mental health institutions, and other
health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's
eligibility for an alien firearm license to an inquiring court or law
enforcement agency.
The application for an original license shall include a complete
set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
firearm. The nonimmigrant alien applicant shall be required to produce
a passport and visa as evidence of being in the country legally.
The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by
the department of licensing. The original thereof shall be delivered
to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the
director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six
years, by the authority issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received
under this subsection.
(e) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the two-year
license shall be fifty dollars plus additional charges imposed by the
Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation that
are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit
of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for
the issuance of the license. The fee shall be retained by the issuing
authority.
(f) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option
of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the
option of the issuing authority.
(g) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the
requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political
subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not
required by this section.
(h) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
citizenship or identity on an application for an alien firearm license
is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any
other penalty provided for by law, the alien firearm license of a
person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the
person shall be permanently ineligible for an alien firearm license.
(i) A nonimmigrant alien may apply for an alien firearm license to
the county in which the applicant resides.
(2) It is a class C felony for a nonimmigrant alien, who is not a
resident of Washington or a citizen of Canada, to carry or possess any
firearm unless the alien possesses:
(a) A valid passport and visa showing he or she is in the country
legally;
(b) If required under federal law, an approved United States
department of justice ATF-6 NIA application and permit for temporary
importation of firearms and ammunition by nonimmigrant aliens; and
(c)(i) A valid hunting license issued by a state or territory of
the United States; or
(ii) An invitation to participate in a trade show or sport shooting
event being conducted in this state, another state, or another country
that is contiguous with this state.
(3) It is a class C felony for a citizen of Canada to carry or
possess any firearm unless he or she possesses:
(a) Valid documentation as required for entry into the United
States;
(b) If required under federal law, an approved United States
department of justice ATF-6 NIA application and permit for temporary
importation of firearms and ammunition by nonimmigrant aliens; and
(c)(i) A valid hunting license issued by a state or territory of
the United States; or
(ii) An invitation to participate in a trade show or sport shooting
event being conducted in this state, another state, or another country
that is contiguous with this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.41.070 and 2002 c 302 s 703 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of
any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed
on his or her person within this state for five years from date of
issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business,
sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a
valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state
identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the
previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up
to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license.
The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications
for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.
The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be
denied, unless:
(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the
provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked
status;
(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;
(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding
firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045,
26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060,
26.50.070, or 26.26.590;
(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;
(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from
any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or
(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a
pistol concealed on his or her person.
No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to
possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed
pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from
disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec.
925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.
(2) The issuing authority shall check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database,
the department of social and health services electronic database, and
with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether
the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess
a firearm and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.
This subsection applies whether the applicant is applying for a new
concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.
(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who
has been granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of the
treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive,
transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance
with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by
this chapter.
(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential
address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and
place of birth, race, gender, description, ((not more than two)) a
complete set((s)) of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and
the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card
number if used for identification in applying for the license. A
signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a
waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of
social and health services, mental health institutions, and other
health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's
eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law
enforcement agency.
The application for an original license shall include two complete
sets of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a
United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to produce
a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is
not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the
additional requirements of ((RCW 9.41.170)) section 1 of this act and
produce proof of compliance with ((RCW 9.41.170)) section 1 of this act
upon application. The license ((shall)) may be in triplicate ((and))
or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.
The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the
duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing
and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority
issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an on-line format, all information
received under this subsection.
(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original
five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges
imposed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that are passed on to
the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government
may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of
the license.
The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the
fingerprints of the person licensed;
(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(d) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be
thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose
any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.
The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(c) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged
licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.
(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option
of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the
option of the issuing authority.
(9) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for
renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the
license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date
of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of
the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition
to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of
a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety,
and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of
volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program
conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall
be given to each applicant for a license; and
(b) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter.
(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through
(9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the
sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a
temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under
subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license
issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license
from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall
be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.
(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the
requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political
subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not
required by this section.
(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol
license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition
to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license
of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and
the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol
license.
(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:
(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant
resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;
(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant
resides in an unincorporated area; or
(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.41.097 and 2005 c 274 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, mental health
institutions, and other health care facilities shall, upon request of
a court or law enforcement agency, supply such relevant information as
is necessary to determine the eligibility of a person to possess a
pistol or to be issued a concealed pistol license under RCW 9.41.070 or
to purchase a pistol under RCW 9.41.090.
(2) Mental health information received by: (a) The department of
licensing pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or ((9.41.170)) section 1 of this
act; (b) an issuing authority pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.070; (c)
a chief of police or sheriff pursuant to RCW 9.41.090 or ((9.41.170))
section 1 of this act; (d) a court or law enforcement agency pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, shall not be disclosed except as
provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

Sec. 4 RCW 9.41.0975 and 1996 c 295 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state, local governmental entities, any public or private
agency, and the employees of any state or local governmental entity or
public or private agency, acting in good faith, are immune from
liability:
(a) For failure to prevent the sale or transfer of a firearm to a
person whose receipt or possession of the firearm is unlawful;
(b) For preventing the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person
who may lawfully receive or possess a firearm;
(c) For issuing a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license
to a person ineligible for such a license;
(d) For failing to issue a concealed pistol license or alien
firearm license to a person eligible for such a license;
(e) For revoking or failing to revoke an issued concealed pistol
license or alien firearm license;
(f) For errors in preparing or transmitting information as part of
determining a person's eligibility to receive or possess a firearm, or
eligibility for a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license;
(g) For issuing a dealer's license to a person ineligible for such
a license; or
(h) For failing to issue a dealer's license to a person eligible
for such a license.
(2) An application may be made to a court of competent jurisdiction
for a writ of mandamus:
(a) Directing an issuing agency to issue a concealed pistol license
or alien firearm license wrongfully refused;
(b) Directing a law enforcement agency to approve an application to
purchase wrongfully denied;
(c) Directing that erroneous information resulting either in the
wrongful refusal to issue a concealed pistol license or alien firearm
license or in the wrongful denial of a purchase application be
corrected; or
(d) Directing a law enforcement agency to approve a dealer's
license wrongfully denied.
The application for the writ may be made in the county in which the
application for a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license or
to purchase a pistol was made, or in Thurston county, at the discretion
of the petitioner. A court shall provide an expedited hearing for an
application brought under this subsection (2) for a writ of mandamus.
A person granted a writ of mandamus under this subsection (2) shall be
awarded reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 9.41.170 (Alien's license to carry
firearms -- Exception) and 1996 c 295 s 11, 1994 c 190 s 1, 1979 c 158 s
3, 1969 ex.s. c 90 s 1, & 1953 c 109 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---