BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0277 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
"Raffle," as used in this chapter, means a game in which tickets
bearing an individual number are sold for not more than ((twenty-five))
one hundred dollars each and in which a prize or prizes are awarded on
the basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons
conducting the game, when the game is conducted by a bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization, no person other than a bona fide
member of the organization takes any part in the management or
operation of the game, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the
benefit of any person other than the organization conducting the game.

--- END ---