BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.41.030 and 1996 c 254 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county assessor shall maintain an active and systematic
program of revaluation on a continuous basis, and shall establish a
revaluation schedule which will result in revaluation of all taxable
real property within the county at least once each four years and
physical inspection of all taxable real property within the county at
least once each six years. Each county assessor may disregard any
program of revaluation, if requested by a property owner, and change,
as appropriate, the valuation of real property upon the receipt of a
notice of decision received under RCW 36.70B.130((, 90.60.160,)) or
chapter 35.22, 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW pertaining to the value of
the real property.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2014, all taxable real property
within a county shall be revalued annually and all taxable real
property within a county shall be physically inspected at least once
each six years. This mandate is conditional upon the department of
revenue providing the necessary guidance and financial assistance to
those counties that are not on an annual revaluation cycle so that they
may convert to an annual revaluation cycle including, but not limited
to, appropriate data collection methods and coding, neighborhood and
market delineation, statistical analysis, valuation guidelines, and
training. The department shall assist any county assessor requesting
assistance in the valuation of industrial property estimated to exceed
twenty-five million dollars in real and personal property value.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.41.041 and 2001 c 187 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county assessor shall cause taxable real property to be
physically inspected and valued ((at least once every six years)) in
accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with
and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan shall
provide that a reasonable portion of all taxable real property within
a county shall be revalued and these newly-determined values placed on
the assessment rolls each year. Until January 1, 2014, the department
may approve a plan that provides that all property in the county be
revalued every two years. If the revaluation plan provides for
physical inspection at least once each four years, during the intervals
between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of
such property may be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such
adjustments to be based upon appropriate statistical data. If the
revaluation plan provides for physical inspection less frequently than
once each four years, during the intervals between each physical
inspection of real property, the valuation of such property shall be
adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be
made once each year and to be based upon appropriate statistical data.
The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data
respecting taxable property in their control including data respecting
any sale or purchase of said property within the past five years, the
cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property and other
facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The annual property revaluation grant account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used only for grants as
provided in section 4 of this act.
(2) Any funds remaining in the annual property revaluation grant
account on January 1, 2014, shall be deposited in the general fund.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 84.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall administer a grant program to
assist counties with: (a) Converting to an annual revaluation system
for property tax valuation; (b) replacing computer software used for
revaluations in counties where the software was purchased from
commercial vendors and will not be supported by the vendor or others
after January 1, 2010; or (c) the acquisition of software and integral
hardware in counties currently administering an annual revaluation
program where the assessor's property records are not stored in an
electronic format or where the current software does not have the
capacity to store, manage, and process property record components used
in the valuation process. A county may use grant money to purchase
computer hardware or software, repair or upgrade existing computer
hardware or software, or provide necessary training related to computer
hardware or software. No county is eligible for grants under this
section totaling more than five hundred thousand dollars.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be deemed necessary by the department of revenue, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, from the general
fund solely for expenditure into the annual property revaluation grant
account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be deemed necessary by the department of revenue, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, from the general
fund solely for expenditure into the annual property revaluation grant
account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of two hundred fifty-four thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, from the general fund to the
department of revenue for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The sum of two hundred fifty-four thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, from the general fund to the
department of revenue for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---