BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.210 and 2007 c 203 s 1 and 2007 c 199 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile
committed to its custody. The release date shall be within the
prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW
13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning
offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined
prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term
of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the
juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile
committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days
prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under
this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be
tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented
himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior
approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.
(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the
state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes
that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one
hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or
in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in
rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On
certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are
necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a
sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one
hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release
those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their
sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case
at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is
no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to
release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a
clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing
court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases
have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no
event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted
release under the provisions of this subsection.
(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1)
of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with
a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her
community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that
in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first or second
degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in
the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when
the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary
and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the
ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for
offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for
offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence of
theft of a motor vehicle ((1)), possession of a stolen motor vehicle,
or taking a motor vehicle without permission 1. The decision to place
an offender on parole shall be based on an assessment by the department
of the offender's risk for reoffending upon release. The department
shall prioritize available parole resources to provide supervision and
services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.
(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the
juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this
goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or
using a deadly weapon and refrain from committing new offenses and may
require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric,
drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training,
or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address
where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during
specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;
(vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using
illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when
requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact
with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet
other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance
the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution.
Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory
service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the
community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed
through public or private organizations or through work crews.
(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of
the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to
participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders
participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to
comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection
and shall also be required to comply with the following additional
terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct
that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an
assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements
imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the
intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision
program, the secretary may require day reporting.
(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be
discharged from the department's supervision.
(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof.
If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which
he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the
secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her
parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is
reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to
protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same
conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with
increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of
supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in
(a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of
confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or
county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each
week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v)
the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the
offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the
offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or
second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as
defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the
conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder
of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training
camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.
(b) The secretary may modify parole and order any of the conditions
or may return the offender to confinement for up to twenty-four weeks
if the offender was sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW
9A.44.130 and is known to have violated the terms of parole.
Confinement beyond thirty days is intended to only be used for a small
and limited number of sex offenders. It shall only be used when other
graduated sanctions or interventions have not been effective or the
behavior is so egregious it warrants the use of the higher level
intervention and the violation: (i) Is a known pattern of behavior
consistent with a previous sex offense that puts the youth at high risk
for reoffending sexually; (ii) consists of sexual behavior that is
determined to be predatory as defined in RCW 71.09.020; or (iii)
requires a review under chapter 71.09 RCW, due to a recent overt act.
The total number of days of confinement for violations of parole
conditions during the parole period shall not exceed the number of days
provided by the maximum sentence imposed by the disposition for the
underlying offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.0357. The department shall
not aggregate multiple parole violations that occur prior to the parole
revocation hearing and impose consecutive twenty-four week periods of
confinement for each parole violation. The department is authorized to
engage in rule making pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement this
subsection, including narrowly defining the behaviors that could lead
to this higher level intervention.
(c) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of
parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the
program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of
this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days.
Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state or any county.
(5) A parole officer of the department of social and health
services shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her
supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be
authorized to arrest the person.
(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the
secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform
functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.170 and 2007 c 522 s 953 and 2007 c 241 s 16 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the department of natural resources for planning and
designing consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed
recreation sites, and for planning recreation opportunities on
department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest.
This appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.040 and 2007 c 317 s 2 and 2007 c 187 s 4 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it
includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof.
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission.
(3) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an
employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons,
and does not include any religious or sectarian organization not
organized for private profit.
(4) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or
her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person.
(5) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for
the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning
grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual
aid or protection in connection with employment.
(6) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or
without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for
an employer.
(7) "Marital status" means the legal status of being married,
single, separated, divorced, or widowed.
(8) "National origin" includes "ancestry".
(9) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by,
any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to
accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts
directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed,
color, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, or with any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability, to be treated as not
welcome, accepted, desired, or solicited.
(10) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made
for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or
facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or
lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation
of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or
other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution.
(11) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings,
real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate
cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein.
(12) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal,
brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property,
transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the provision of
brokerage services.
(13) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof
that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a
residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered
for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure, or portion thereof.
(14) "Sex" means gender.
(15) "Sexual orientation" means heterosexuality, homosexuality,
bisexuality, and gender expression or identity. As used in this
definition, "gender expression or identity" means having or being
perceived as having a gender identity, self-image, appearance,
behavior, or expression, whether or not that gender identity, self-image, appearance, behavior, or expression is different from that
traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that person at birth.
(16) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have
been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b)
believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real
estate transaction that is about to occur.
(17) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real
estate transaction.
(18) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or
amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction.
(19) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred.
(20) "Families with children status" means one or more individuals
who have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a
parent or another person having legal custody of such individual or
individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other person having
such legal custody, with the written permission of such parent or other
person. Families with children status also applies to any person who
is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any
individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years.
(21) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or
more elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units.
(22) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts,
components, or elements of a building, including individual dwelling
units and the public and common use areas of a building.
(23) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of
assisting hearing impaired persons.
(24) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purpose of assisting or accommodating a sensory, mental, or physical
disability of a person with a disability.
(25)(a) "Disability" means the presence of a sensory, mental, or
physical impairment that:
(i) Is medically cognizable or diagnosable; or
(ii) Exists as a record or history; or
(iii) Is perceived to exist whether or not it exists in fact.
(b) A disability exists whether it is temporary or permanent,
common or uncommon, mitigated or unmitigated, or whether or not it
limits the ability to work generally or work at a particular job or
whether or not it limits any other activity within the scope of this
chapter.
(c) For purposes of this definition, "impairment" includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) Any physiological disorder, or condition, cosmetic
disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the
following body systems: Neurological, musculoskeletal, special sense
organs, respiratory, including speech organs, cardiovascular,
reproductive, digestive, genitor-urinary, hemic and lymphatic, skin,
and endocrine; or
(ii) Any mental, developmental, traumatic, or psychological
disorder, including but not limited to cognitive limitation, organic
brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning
disabilities.
(d) Only for the purposes of qualifying for reasonable
accommodation in employment, an impairment must be known or shown
through an interactive process to exist in fact and:
(i) The impairment must have a substantially limiting effect upon
the individual's ability to perform his or her job, the individual's
ability to apply or be considered for a job, or the individual's access
to equal benefits, privileges, or terms or conditions of employment; or
(ii) The employee must have put the employer on notice of the
existence of an impairment, and medical documentation must establish a
reasonable likelihood that engaging in job functions without an
accommodation would aggravate the impairment to the extent that it
would create a substantially limiting effect.
(e) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, a limitation is not
substantial if it has only a trivial effect.
(26) "Honorably discharged veteran or military status" means a
person who is:
(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.20.310 and 2008 c 94 s 11 and 2008 c 41 s 3 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12
permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits,
wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(b) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13
permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer
for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may
be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, every alcohol server employed, under contract or otherwise,
at a retail licensed premise shall have issued to them a class 12 or
class 13 permit.
(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued shall be issued in
the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of
another permit holder. The holder shall present the permit upon
request to inspection by a representative of the board or a peace
officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit shall be valid for employment
at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this subsection.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, no licensee
holding a license as authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350,
66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, and 66.24.570 may employ or accept the
services of any person without the person first having a valid class 12
or class 13 permit.
(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose
duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor
shall have a class 12 or class 13 permit.
(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing
a valid alcohol server permit.
(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is
valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless
suspended by the board.
(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of
the following occur:
(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any
of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has
been convicted at any time of a felony; or
(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that
constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.
(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section
does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the
employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises.
The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of
the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee
upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the
license.
(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for
any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol
server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.
(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol
server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept
employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.
(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary
commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for
which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption
with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such
establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2008 c 329 s 921, 2008 c 329 s 920,
2008 c 329 s 919, and 2008 c 328 s 6009 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) ((Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(d))) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department
shall partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups.
The department is authorized to use the following additional strategies
in order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. ((However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars.)) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the
account.
(9) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.55.020 and 1999 c 249 s 802 and 1999 c 151 s 1702
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall develop and adopt management policies for
publicly owned or leased land on the rivers designated by the
legislature as being a part of the state's scenic river system and
within the associated river areas. The commission may adopt rules
identifying river classifications which reflect the characteristics
common to various segments of scenic rivers and may adopt management
policies consistent with local government's shoreline management master
plans appropriate for each such river classification. All such
policies shall be adopted by the commission in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. Any
variance with such a policy by any public agency shall be authorized
only by the approval of the ((department)) commission and shall be made
only to alleviate unusual hardships unique to a given segment of the
system.
(2) Any policies developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall include management plans for protecting ecological,
economic, recreational, aesthetic, botanical, scenic, geological,
hydrological, fish and wildlife, historical, cultural, archaeological,
and scientific features of the rivers designated as being in the
system. Such policies shall also include management plans to encourage
any nonprofit group, organization, association, person, or corporation
to develop and adopt programs for the purpose of increasing fish
propagation.
(3) The ((department)) commission shall identify on a river by
river basis any publicly owned or leased lands which could be included
in a river area of the system but which are developed in a manner
unsuitable for land to be managed as part of the system. The
commission shall exclude lands so identified from the provisions of any
management policies implementing the provisions of this chapter.
(4) The ((department)) commission shall determine the boundaries
which shall define the river area associated with any included river.
With respect to the rivers named in RCW ((79.72.080)) 79A.55.070, the
((department)) commission shall make such determination, and those
determinations authorized by subsection (3) of this section, within one
year of September 21, 1977.
(5) Before making a decision regarding the river area to be
included in the system, a variance in policy, or the excluding of land
from the provisions of the management policies, the ((department))
commission shall hold hearings in accord with chapter 34.05 RCW, with
at least one public hearing to be held in the general locale of the
river under consideration. The commission shall cause to be published
in a newspaper of general circulation in the area which includes the
river or rivers to be considered, a description, including a map
showing such river or rivers, of the material to be considered at the
public hearing. Such notice shall appear at least twice in the time
period between two and four weeks prior to the public hearing.
The ((department)) commission shall seek and receive comments from
the public regarding potential additions to the system, shall initiate
studies, and may submit to any session of the legislature proposals for
additions to the state scenic river system. These proposals shall be
accompanied by a detailed report on the factors which, in the
((department's)) commission's judgment, make an area a worthy addition
to the system.

--- END ---