BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.164.020 and 1995 c 399 s 199 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Energy ((assessment)) audit" means an analysis of a dwelling
unit to determine the need for cost-effective energy conservation
measures as determined by the department.
(3) "Household" means an individual or group of individuals living
in a dwelling unit as defined by the department.
(4) "Low income" means household income ((that is at or below one
hundred twenty-five percent of the federally established poverty
level)), as defined by the department, provided that the definition may
not exceed eighty percent of the median household income, adjusted for
household size, for the county in which the dwelling unit to be
weatherized is located.
(5) "Nonutility sponsor" means any sponsor other than a public
service company, municipality, public utility district, mutual or
cooperative, furnishing gas or electricity used to heat low-income
residences.
(6) "Residence" means a dwelling unit as defined by the department.
(7) "Sponsor" means any entity that submits a proposal under RCW
70.164.040, including but not limited to any local community action
agency, tribal nation, community service agency, or any other
participating agency or any public service company, municipality,
public utility district, mutual or cooperative, or any combination of
such entities that jointly submits a proposal.
(8) "Sponsor match" means the share((, if any,)) of the cost of
weatherization to be paid by the sponsor.
(9) "Sustainable residential weatherization" or "weatherization"
means ((materials or measures, and their installation, that are used to
improve the thermal efficiency of a residence)) activities that use
funds administered by the department for one or more of the following:
(a) Energy and resource conservation; (b) energy efficiency
improvements; (c) repairs, indoor air quality improvements, and health
and safety improvements; and (d) client education. Funds administered
by the department for activities authorized under this subsection (9):
May only be used for the preservation of a dwelling unit occupied by a
low-income household; and must, to the extent feasible, be used to
support and advance sustainable technologies.
(10) "Weatherizing agency" means any approved department grantee,
tribal nation, or any public service company, municipality, public
utility district, mutual or cooperative, or other entity that bears the
responsibility for ensuring the performance of weatherization of
residences under this chapter and has been approved by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.164.040 and 1987 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall solicit proposals for low-income
weatherization programs from potential sponsors. A proposal shall
state the amount of the sponsor match, the amount requested ((from the
low-income weatherization assistance account)), the name of the
weatherizing agency, and any other information required by the
department.
(2)(a) A sponsor may use its own moneys, including corporate or
ratepayer moneys, or moneys provided by landlords, charitable groups,
government programs, the Bonneville Power Administration, or other
sources to pay the sponsor match.
(b) Moneys provided by a sponsor pursuant to requirements in this
section shall be in addition to and shall not supplant any funding for
low-income weatherization that would otherwise have been provided by
the sponsor or any other entity enumerated in (a) of this subsection.
(c) No proposal may require any contribution as a condition of
weatherization from any household whose residence is weatherized under
the proposal.
(d) Proposals shall provide that full levels of all cost-effective
structurally feasible sustainable residential weatherization materials,
measures, and practices, as determined by the department, shall be
installed when a low-income residence is weatherized.
(3)(a) The department may in its discretion accept, accept in part,
or reject proposals submitted. The department shall allocate funds
appropriated from the low-income weatherization assistance account
among proposals accepted or accepted in part so as to:
(i) Achieve the greatest possible expected monetary and energy
savings by low-income households and other energy consumers ((and))
over the longest period of time;
(ii) Identify and correct, to the extent practical, health and
safety problems for residents of low-income households; and
(iii) Leverage, to the extent feasible, environmentally friendly
sustainable technologies, practices, and designs.
(b) The department shall, to the extent feasible, ensure a balance
of participation in proportion to population among low-income
households for: (((a))) (i) Geographic regions in the state; (((b)))
(ii) types of fuel used for heating, except that the department shall
encourage the use of energy efficient sustainable technologies; (((c)))
(iii) owner-occupied and rental residences; and (((d))) (iv) single-family and multifamily dwellings.
(c) The department shall give priority to weatherizing dwelling
units occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below one
hundred twenty-five percent of the federally established poverty level.
(d) The department may allocate funds to a nonutility sponsor
without requiring a sponsor match if the department determines that
such an allocation is necessary to provide the greatest benefits to
low-income residents of the state.
(4)(a) A sponsor may elect to: (i) Pay a sponsor match as a lump
sum at the time of weatherization, or (ii) make yearly payments to the
low-income weatherization assistance account over a period not to
exceed ten years. If a sponsor elects to make yearly payments, the
value of the payments shall not be less than the value of the lump sum
payment that would have been made under (a)(i) of this subsection.
(b) The department may permit a sponsor to meet its match
requirement in whole or in part through providing labor, materials, or
other in-kind expenditures.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.164.050 and 1987 c 36 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is responsible for ensuring that sponsors and
weatherizing agencies comply with the state laws, the department's
rules, and the sponsor's proposal in carrying out proposals.
(2) Before a residence is weatherized, the department shall require
that an energy ((assessment)) audit be conducted.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.164.060 and 1987 c 36 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before a leased or rented residence is weatherized, written
permission shall be obtained from the owner of the residence for the
weatherization. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that: (1)
The benefits of weatherization assistance ((in connection with a leased
or rented residence)), including utility bill reduction, and
preservation of affordable housing stock, accrue primarily to low-income tenants occupying a leased or rented residence; (2) as a result
of weatherization provided under this chapter, the rent on the
residence is not increased and the tenant is not evicted; and (3) as a
result of weatherization provided under this chapter, no undue or
excessive enhancement occurs in the value of the residence. This
section is in the public interest and any violation by a landlord of
the rules adopted under this section shall be an act in trade or
commerce violating chapter 19.86 RCW, the consumer protection act.

--- END ---