BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.85.200 and 2005 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program for salmon and steelhead recovery is established in
Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties within the
habitat areas classified as the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units by the federal national marine fisheries service.
The management board created under subsection (2) of this section is
responsible for developing and overseeing the implementation of the
habitat portion of the salmon and steelhead recovery plan and is
empowered to receive and disburse funds for the salmon and steelhead
recovery initiatives. The management board created pursuant to this
section shall constitute the lead entity and the committee established
under RCW 77.85.050 responsible for fulfilling the requirements and
exercising powers under this chapter.
(2) A management board consisting of fifteen voting members is
created within the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant units.
The members shall consist of one county commissioner or designee from
each of the five participating counties selected by each county
legislative authority; one member representing the cities contained
within the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant units as a voting
member selected by the cities in the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units; a representative of the Cowlitz Tribe appointed by
the tribe; one state legislator elected from one of the legislative
districts contained within the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units selected by that group of state legislators
representing the area; five representatives to include at least one
member who represents private property interests appointed by the five
county commissioners or designees; one hydro utility representative
nominated by hydro utilities and appointed by the five county
commissioners or designees; and one representative nominated from the
environmental community who resides in the lower Columbia
evolutionarily significant units appointed by the five county
commissioners or designees. The board shall appoint and consult a
technical advisory committee, which shall include four representatives
of state agencies one each appointed by the directors of the
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and transportation, and the
commissioner of public lands. The board may also appoint additional
persons to the technical advisory committee as needed. The chair of
the board shall be selected from among the members of the management
board by the five county commissioners or designees and the legislator
on the board. In making appointments under this subsection, the county
commissioners shall consider recommendations of interested parties.
Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments were selected. No action may be brought or maintained
against any management board member, the management board, or any of
its agents, officers, or employees for any noncontractual acts or
omissions in carrying out the purposes of this section.
(3)(a) The management board shall participate in the development of
a habitat recovery plan to implement its responsibilities under (b) of
this subsection. The management board shall consider local watershed
efforts and activities as well as habitat conservation plans in the
development and implementation of the recovery plan. Any of the
participating counties may continue its own efforts for restoring
steelhead habitat. Nothing in this section limits the authority of
units of local government to enter into interlocal agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW or any other provision of law.
(b) The management board is responsible for the development of a
lower Columbia salmon and steelhead habitat recovery plan and for
coordinating and monitoring the implementation of the plan. The
management board will submit all future plans and amendments to plans
to the governor's salmon recovery office for the incorporation of
hatchery, harvest, and hydropower components of the statewide salmon
recovery strategy for all submissions to the national marine fisheries
service. In developing and implementing the habitat recovery plan, the
management board will work with appropriate federal and state agencies,
tribal governments, local governments, and the public to make sure
hatchery, harvest, and hydropower components receive consideration in
context with the habitat component. The management board may work in
cooperation with the state and the national marine fisheries service to
modify the plan, or to address habitat for other aquatic species that
may be subsequently listed under the federal endangered species act.
The management board may not exercise authority over land or water
within the individual counties or otherwise preempt the authority of
any units of local government.
(c) The management board shall prioritize as appropriate and
approve projects and programs related to the recovery of lower Columbia
river salmon and steelhead runs, including the funding of those
projects and programs, and coordinate local government efforts as
prescribed in the recovery plan. The management board shall establish
criteria for funding projects and programs based upon their likely
value in salmon and steelhead recovery. The management board may
consider local economic impact among the criteria, but jurisdictional
boundaries and factors related to jurisdictional population may not be
considered as part of the criteria.
(d) The management board shall assess the factors for decline along
each tributary basin in the lower Columbia. The management board is
encouraged to take a stream-by-stream approach in conducting the
assessment which utilizes state and local expertise, including
volunteer groups, interest groups, and affected units of local
government.
(4) The management board has the authority to hire and fire staff,
including an executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants
and other moneys, disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and
counties about potential code changes and the development of programs
and incentives upon request, pay all necessary expenses, and may choose
a fiduciary agent. The management board shall report on its progress
on a biennial basis to the legislative bodies of the five participating
counties and the state natural resource-related agencies. The
management board shall prepare a final report at the conclusion of the
program describing its efforts and successes in developing and
implementing the lower Columbia salmon and steelhead recovery plan.
The final report shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the legislative bodies of the participating counties,
and the state natural resource-related agencies.
(5) ((The program terminates on July 1, 2010.
(6))) For purposes of this section, "evolutionarily significant
unit" means the habitat area identified for an evolutionarily
significant unit of an aquatic species listed or proposed for listing
as a threatened or endangered species under the federal endangered
species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

--- END ---