BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.12.030 and 1998 c 276 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A tenant of real property for a term less than life is guilty of
unlawful detainer either:
(1) When he or she holds over or continues in possession, in person
or by subtenant, of the property or any part thereof after the
expiration of the term for which it is let to him or her. When real
property is leased for a specified term or period by express or implied
contract, whether written or oral, the tenancy shall be terminated
without notice at the expiration of the specified term or period;
(2) When he or she, having leased property for an indefinite time
with monthly or other periodic rent reserved, continues in possession
thereof, in person or by subtenant, after the end of any such month or
period, when the landlord, more than twenty days prior to the end of
such month or period, has served notice (in manner in RCW 59.12.040
provided) requiring him or her to quit the premises at the expiration
of such month or period;
(3) When he or she continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after a default in the payment of rent, and after notice in
writing requiring in the alternative the payment of the rent or the
surrender of the detained premises, served (in manner in RCW 59.12.040
provided) in behalf of the person entitled to the rent upon the person
owing it, has remained uncomplied with for the period of three days
after service thereof. The notice may be served at any time after the
rent becomes due;
(4) When he or she continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after a neglect or failure to keep or perform any other
condition or covenant of the lease or agreement under which the
property is held, including any covenant not to assign or sublet, than
one for the payment of rent, and after notice in writing requiring in
the alternative the performance of such condition or covenant or the
surrender of the property, served (in manner in RCW 59.12.040 provided)
upon him or her, and if there is a subtenant in actual possession of
the premises, also upon such subtenant, shall remain uncomplied with
for ten days after service thereof. Within ten days after the service
of such notice the tenant, or any subtenant in actual occupation of the
premises, or any mortgagee of the term, or other person interested in
its continuance, may perform such condition or covenant and thereby
save the lease from such forfeiture;
(5) When he or she commits or permits waste upon the demised
premises, or when he or she sets up or carries on thereon any unlawful
business, or when he or she erects, suffers, permits, or maintains on
or about the premises any nuisance, and remains in possession after the
service (in manner in RCW 59.12.040 provided) upon him or her of three
days' notice to quit;
(6) ((A person who)) When he or she, without the permission of the
owner and without having color of title thereto, enters upon land of
another and ((who)) fails or refuses to remove therefrom after three
days' notice, in writing and served upon him or her in the manner
provided in RCW 59.12.040. Such person may also be subject to the
criminal provisions of chapter 9A.52 RCW; ((or))
(7) When he or she commits or permits any gang-related activity at
the premises as prohibited by RCW 59.18.130; or
(8) When he or she, without denominated periodic tenancy or
denominated rental amount or ownership interest, occupies the land of
another and fails or refuses to remove therefrom after twenty days'
notice in writing and served upon him or her in the manner provided in
RCW 59.12.040. This subsection does not apply to agricultural workers.

--- END ---