BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The increased use of ineffective and
inefficient exterior lighting in Washington has generated unnecessary
light pollution and wasteful energy consumption. With the application
of the best available science, engineering knowledge, and technology
available, Washington will be able to reduce sky glow, create
substantial reductions in energy consumption, and protect the nighttime
environment.
Light pollution may be greatly reduced by using properly designed
light fixtures that direct light downward, are properly installed, and
avoid glare and light trespass. These fixtures are called fully
shielded luminaires. With improved optical control and reflector
design, modern fully shielded luminaires deliver the same amount of
light to the ground as older wasteful designs, but use less power, thus
reducing the amount of energy used. This saves money and reduces the
quantity of greenhouse gases released into the environment.
Therefore, in response to these recognized benefits and
circumstances, it is the intent of the legislature to require the state
building code council to convene a technical advisory group to examine
issues and barriers pertaining to these lighting issues.
The legislature further intends the building code council to
develop recommendations for reducing light pollution and to report the
findings of the advisory group. The legislature does not intend to
establish an actual or implied mandate, nor does the legislature intend
to diminish or otherwise affect the regulatory authority of local
governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The director of the state building code
council shall:
(1) Work with interested parties to develop recommendations for a
draft code to address light pollution from luminaires; and
(2) Report these recommendations to the appropriate committees of
the house of representatives and the senate by November 25, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The recommendations developed under section
2 of this act do not apply to:
(1) Temporary lighting required for construction projects and
related to road construction and repair, installation of sewer and
water facilities, and other public infrastructure;
(2) Temporary emergency lighting used by police, fire departments,
or other emergency services;
(3) Hazard warning luminaires required by federal law and federal
regulatory agencies;
(4) Seasonal and decorative lighting displays that use multiple low
wattage bulbs;
(5) Navigation lights used for marine and aviation safety; or
(6) Historical buildings that meet the requirements of RCW
19.27.120.

--- END ---