BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The veterans innovation program is added as a beneficiary of the
lottery under section 3 of this act. The commission shall partner with
the department of veterans affairs to promote veterans as a beneficiary
of the lottery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall partner with the lottery commission to promote
veterans as a beneficiary of the lottery.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.340 and 2005 c 369 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the two funds
most impacted by this potential event are the student achievement fund
and the education construction account. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to use some of the proceeds from the shared game
lottery to make up the difference that the potential state lottery
revenue loss would have on the student achievement fund and the
education construction account. The legislature further intends to use
some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to fund programs and
services related to problem and pathological gambling.
(2) The student achievement fund and the education construction
account are expected to collectively receive one hundred two million
dollars annually from state lottery games other than the shared game
lottery. For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, if the amount of lottery
revenues earmarked for the student achievement fund and the education
construction account is less than one hundred two million dollars, the
commission, after making the transfer required under subsection (3) of
this section, must transfer sufficient moneys from revenues derived
from the shared game lottery into the student achievement fund and the
education construction account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars. The funds transferred from the shared
game lottery account under this subsection must be divided between the
student achievement fund and the education construction account in a
manner consistent with RCW 67.70.240(3).
(3)(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the
shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this
subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net
receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the
sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of
shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments
made to winners.
(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the
problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year
2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to
the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.
(4) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers pursuant to this section shall be deposited
into: (a) The veterans innovations program account created in RCW
43.60A.185 up to a maximum transfer annually of two million dollars;
and (b) after transfers under (a) of this subsection, the general fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.131.406 and 2006 c 343 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2017:
(1) 2006 c 343 § 1 (uncodified);
(2) RCW 43.60A.160 and 2006 c 343 § 3;
(3) RCW 43.60A.165 and 2006 c 343 § 4;
(4) RCW 43.60A.170 and 2006 c 343 § 5;
(5) RCW 43.60A.175 and 2006 c 343 § 6;
(6) RCW 43.60A.180 and 2006 c 343 § 7; ((and))
(7) RCW 43.60A.185 and 2006 c 343 § 8; and
(8) Section 2 of this act.

--- END ---