BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In a prosecution for a sex offense, the
prosecuting attorney shall file a special allegation of internet
facilitation whenever sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense
that could be raised under the evidence, would justify a finding by a
reasonable and objective fact-finder that the defendant used the
internet to facilitate the commission of the offense.
(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the
state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
defendant used the internet to facilitate the commission of the
offense. If a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant
guilty, also find a special verdict as to whether the defendant used
the internet to facilitate the commission of the offense. If no jury
is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether the
defendant used the internet to facilitate the commission of the
offense.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall not withdraw a special
allegation filed under this section without the approval of the court
through an order of dismissal of the allegation. The court may not
dismiss the special allegation unless it finds that the order is
necessary to correct an error in the initial charging decision or that
there are evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation
doubtful.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "internet facilitation" and
"used the internet to facilitate the commission of the offense" mean
that the defendant used a specific internet protocol address or
handheld wireless device to visit or log onto an internet site or sites
to locate, stalk, or communicate with the victim of the crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 When sentencing an offender convicted of a
sex offense committed on or after the effective date of this section
with a finding of internet facilitation under section 1 of this act,
the court, as a condition of any term of community custody imposed
under RCW 9.94A.507, 9.94A.545, 9.94A.670, or 9.94A.715, shall:
(1) Prohibit the offender from accessing or using a computer, or
any other device with internet capability, without the prior written
approval of the department;
(2) Require the offender to submit to unannounced inspections of
his or her computer, or any other device with internet capability, by
a community corrections officer or a computer or information technology
specialist employed by, or under contract with, the department. The
inspection may include, but is not limited to, the retrieval and
copying of all data from the computer or device and any internal or
external peripherals, and removal of the data, computer, device, or
peripheral, to conduct a more thorough inspection;
(3) Require the offender to submit to the installation on the
offender's computer or other device with internet capability, at the
offender's expense, one or more hardware or software systems to monitor
the offender's internet use; and
(4) Require the offender to submit to any other appropriate
restrictions, as determined by the department, concerning his or her
use or access to a computer or other device with internet capability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.94A RCW.

--- END ---