BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Applicants for a general permit under this chapter for aquatic
plant and algae management in freshwater lakes shall, upon sending the
application to the department, ensure that public notice of the
application is given by at a minimum the following methods:
(a) Publishing notice of the application for coverage at least once
per week for two consecutive weeks, at least seven days apart, in a
local newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed
treatment site is located; and
(b) Mailing notice of the application by certified mail to:
(i) Each residence and business owner located on a shoreline
property within one-quarter mile of the proposed treatment site; and
(ii) Each residence and business owner in areas where drift may
occur.
(2) Notices sent under this section must include a statement that
any person desiring to submit written comments concerning an
application for an aquatic plant and algae management general permit
must submit the comments to the department within forty-five days of
completion of the notice requirements in this section. The applicant
shall use the public notice form provided by the department in the
aquatic plant and algae management general permit.
(3) The department shall forward a copy of the decision concerning
an application for an aquatic plant and algae management general permit
to each person who submitted a written request for the decision at the
same time it notifies the applicant.
(4) The department shall post all applications it receives under
this section in a timely manner and in an easily accessible location on
its internet web site. At the same internet location, the department
shall post an e-mail contact link and physical address that the public
may use to submit comments on applications.
(5) The department shall respond in writing to all public comments
it receives concerning an application for an aquatic plant and algae
management general permit prior to issuing a final decision on the
application, provided that the comment was submitted in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Once the department approves an application for an aquatic
plant and algae management general permit, the applicator shall:
(a) Complete copies of the residential and business notice form
provided by the department in the aquatic plant and algae management
general permit;
(b) Mail copies of the residential and business notice form by
certified mail to each residence and business owner specified in
subsection (1)(b) of this section at least ten to twenty-one days prior
to the initial treatment;
(c) Mail, e-mail, or fax a copy of the residential and business
notice form, including the date of distribution, to the appropriate
department regional office contact no later than one business day
following distribution to the residence and business owners specified
in subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(d) Maintain a copy of both the initial public notice submitted in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section and the residential and
business notice form and a list of addresses to which the form was sent
for seven years. The applicator shall hand deliver or mail a copy of
the residential and business notice form and list of recipients to the
department within five business days upon request.
(7) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section and shall develop posting requirements for treatment sites.

--- END ---