BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are no
statutory requirements pertaining to persons who facilitate like-kind
exchanges pursuant to section 1031 of the internal revenue code and
associated treasury regulations. The purpose of this chapter is to
create a statutory framework that provides some consumer protections to
those who entrust money or property to persons acting as exchange
facilitators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) A person or entity "affiliated" with a specific person or
entity, means a person or entity who directly, or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with, the person or entity specified.
(2) "Client" means the taxpayer with whom the exchange facilitator
enters into an agreement as described in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this
section.
(3)(a) "Exchange facilitator" means a person who:
(i)(A) Facilitates, for a fee, an exchange of like-kind property by
entering into an agreement with a taxpayer by which the exchange
facilitator acquires from the taxpayer the contractual rights to sell
the taxpayer's relinquished property located in this state and transfer
a replacement property to the taxpayer as a qualified intermediary, as
defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(4); (B) enters
into an agreement with a taxpayer to take title to a property in this
state as an exchange accommodation titleholder, as defined in internal
revenue service revenue procedure 2000-37; or (C) enters into an
agreement with a taxpayer to act as a qualified trustee or qualified
escrow holder, as both terms are defined under treasury regulation
section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3); or
(ii) Maintains an office in this state for the purpose of
soliciting business as an exchange facilitator.
(b) "Exchange facilitator" does not include:
(i) A taxpayer or a disqualified person, as defined under treasury
regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(k), seeking to qualify for the
nonrecognition provisions of section 1031 of the internal revenue code
of 1986, as amended;
(ii) A financial institution that is (A) acting as a depository for
exchange funds and is not facilitating an exchange or (B) acting solely
as a qualified escrow holder or qualified trustee, as both terms are
defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), and is not
facilitating an exchange;
(iii) A title insurance company, underwritten title company, or
escrow company that is acting solely as a qualified escrow holder or
qualified trustee, as both terms are defined under treasury regulation
section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), and is not facilitating an exchange;
(iv) A person that advertises for and teaches seminars or classes,
or otherwise makes a presentation, to attorneys, accountants, real
estate professionals, tax professionals, or other professionals, when
the primary purpose is to teach the professionals about tax-deferred
exchanges or to train them to act as exchange facilitators;
(v) A qualified intermediary, as defined under treasury regulation
section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(4), who holds exchange funds from the
disposition of relinquished property located outside of this state; or
(vi) An affiliated entity that is used by the exchange facilitator
to facilitate exchanges or to take title to property in this state as
an exchange accommodation titleholder.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "fee" means compensation
of any nature, direct or indirect, monetary or in kind, that is
received by a person or related person, as defined in section 267(b) or
707(b) of the internal revenue code, for any services relating to or
incidental to the exchange of like-kind property.
(4) "Financial institution" means a bank, credit union, savings and
loan association, savings bank, or trust company chartered under the
laws of this state or the United States whose accounts are insured by
the full faith and credit of the United States, the federal deposit
insurance corporation, the national credit union share insurance fund,
or other similar or successor programs.
(5) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, joint venture, association, joint stock company,
trust, or any other form of a legal entity, and includes the agents and
employees of that person.
(6) "Prudent investor standard" means the standard for investment
as described under RCW 11.100.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An exchange facilitator may not bring a suit
or action for the collection of compensation in connection with duties
performed as an exchange facilitator unless the exchange facilitator
alleges and proves that he or she was fully in compliance with this
chapter at the time of the offering to perform or performing an act or
service regulated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided under subsection (2)
of this section, a person who engages in business as an exchange
facilitator shall notify all existing exchange clients whose
relinquished property is located in this state, or whose replacement
property held under a qualified exchange accommodation agreement is
located in this state, of any change in control of the exchange
facilitator. Notification must be provided within ten business days of
the effective date of the change in control by hand delivery,
facsimile, electronic mail, overnight mail, or first-class mail, and
must be posted on the exchange facilitator's internet web site for at
least ninety days following the change in control. The notification
must set forth the name, address, and other contact information of the
transferees.
(2) If an exchange facilitator is a publicly traded company or
wholly owned subsidiary of the publicly traded company and remains a
publicly traded company or wholly owned subsidiary of the publicly
traded company after a change in control, the publicly traded company
or wholly owned subsidiary of the publicly traded company is not
required to notify its existing clients of the change in control.
(3) For purposes of this section, "change in control" means any
transfer of more than fifty percent of the assets or ownership
interests, directly or indirectly, of the exchange facilitator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator shall:
(a) Maintain a fidelity bond or bonds in an amount of not less than
one million dollars executed by an insurer authorized to do business in
this state; or
(b) Deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters
of credit in an amount of not less than one million dollars into an
interest-bearing deposit account or a money market account with the
financial institution of the exchange facilitator's choice. Interest
on that amount accrues to the exchange facilitator; or
(c) Deposit all exchange funds in a qualified escrow account or
qualified trust, as both terms are defined under treasury regulation
section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), with a financial institution and provide
that a withdrawal from that escrow account or trust requires the
exchange facilitator's and the client's written authorization.
(2) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator may
maintain a bond or bonds or deposit an amount of cash or securities or
irrevocable letters of credit in excess of the minimum required amounts
under this section.
(3) The requirements under subsection (1)(a) of this section are
satisfied if the person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator
is listed as a named insured on one or more fidelity bonds that have an
aggregate total of at least one million dollars.
(4) An exchange facilitator must provide evidence to each client
that the requirements of this section are satisfied before entering
into an exchange agreement.
(5) Upon request of a current or prospective client, or the
attorney general under chapter 19.86 RCW, the exchange facilitator must
offer evidence proving that the requirements of this section are
satisfied at the time of the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A person who claims to have sustained
damages by reason of the fraudulent or dishonest acts of an exchange
facilitator or an exchange facilitator's employee may file a claim on
the fidelity bond or approved alternative described in section 5 of
this act to recover the damages.
(2) The remedies provided under this section are cumulative and
nonexclusive and do not affect any other remedy available at law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator shall:
(a) Maintain a policy of errors and omissions insurance in an
amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars executed by
an insurer authorized to do business in this state; or
(b) Deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters
of credit in an amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand
dollars into an interest-bearing deposit account or a money market
account with the financial institution of the exchange facilitator's
choice. Interest on that amount accrues to the exchange facilitator.
(2) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator may
maintain insurance or deposit an amount of cash or securities or
irrevocable letters of credit in excess of the minimum required amounts
under this section.
(3) The requirements under subsection (1)(a) of this section are
satisfied if the person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator
is listed as a named insured on one or more errors and omissions
policies that have an aggregate total of at least two hundred fifty
thousand dollars.
(4) An exchange facilitator must provide evidence to each client
that the requirements of this section are satisfied before entering
into an exchange agreement.
(5) Upon request of a current or prospective client, or the
attorney general under chapter 19.86 RCW, the exchange facilitator must
offer evidence proving that the requirements of this section are
satisfied at the time of the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A person who claims to have sustained
damages by reason of an unintentional error or omission of an exchange
facilitator or an exchange facilitator's employee may file a claim on
the errors and omissions insurance policy or approved alternative
described in section 7 of this act to recover the damages.
(2) The remedies provided under this section are cumulative and
nonexclusive and do not affect any other remedy available at law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator shall act as a custodian for all exchange funds,
including money, property, other consideration, or instruments received
by the exchange facilitator from, or on behalf of, the client, except
funds received as the exchange facilitator's compensation. The
exchange facilitator shall hold the exchange funds in a manner that
provides liquidity and preserves principal, and if invested, shall
invest those exchange funds in investments that meet a prudent investor
standard and satisfy investment goals of liquidity and preservation of
principal. For purposes of this section, a violation of the prudent
investor standard includes, but is not limited to, a transaction in
which:
(a) Exchange funds are knowingly commingled by the exchange
facilitator with the operating accounts of the exchange facilitator,
except that the exchange facilitator's fee may be deposited as part of
the exchange transaction into the same account as that containing
exchange funds, in which event the exchange facilitator must promptly
withdraw the fee;
(b) Exchange funds are loaned or otherwise transferred to any
person or entity, other than a financial institution, that is
affiliated with or related to the exchange facilitator, except that
this subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the transfer of funds from an
exchange facilitator to an exchange accommodation titleholder in
accordance with an exchange contract;
(c) Exchange funds are invested in a manner that does not provide
sufficient liquidity to meet the exchange facilitator's contractual
obligations to its clients, unless insufficient liquidity occurs as the
result of: (i) Events beyond the prediction or control of the exchange
facilitator including, but not limited to, failure of a financial
institution; or (ii) an investment specifically requested by the
client; or
(d) Exchange funds are invested in a manner that does not preserve
the principal of the exchange funds, unless loss of principal occurs as
the result of: (i) Events beyond the prediction or control of the
exchange facilitator; or (ii) an investment specifically requested by
the client.
(2) Exchange funds are not subject to execution or attachment on
any claim against the exchange facilitator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator must administer each of his, her, or its places of
business under the direct management of an officer or an employee who
is either:
(1) An attorney or certified public accountant admitted to practice
in any state or territory of the United States; or
(2) A person who has passed a test specific to the subject matter
of exchange facilitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator shall not, with respect to a like-kind exchange
transaction, knowingly or with criminal negligence:
(1) Make a false, deceptive, or misleading material representation,
directly or indirectly, concerning a like-kind transaction;
(2) Make a false, deceptive, or misleading material representation,
directly or indirectly, in advertising or by any other means,
concerning a like-kind transaction;
(3) Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person;
(4) Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;
(5) Fail to account for any moneys or property belonging to others
that may be in the possession or under the control of the exchange
facilitator;
(6) Commingle funds held for a client in any account that holds the
exchange facilitator's own funds, except as provided in section 9(1)(a)
of this act;
(7) Loan or otherwise transfer exchange funds to any person or
entity, other than a financial institution, that is affiliated with or
related to the exchange facilitator, except for the transfer of funds
from an exchange facilitator to an exchange accommodation title holder
in accordance with an exchange contract;
(8) Keep, or cause to be kept, any money in any bank, credit union,
or other financial institution under a name designating the money as
belonging to the client of any exchange facilitator, unless that money
belongs to that client and was entrusted to the exchange facilitator by
that client;
(9) Fail to fulfill its contractual duties to the client to deliver
property or funds to the taxpayer in a material way unless such a
failure is due to circumstances beyond the control of the exchange
facilitator;
(10) Commit, including commission by its owners, officers,
directors, employees, agents, or independent contractors, any crime
involving fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, embezzlement,
misappropriation of funds, robbery, or other theft of property;
(11) Fail to make disclosures required by any applicable state law;
or
(12) Make any false statement or omission of material fact in
connection with any reports filed by an exchange facilitator or in
connection with any investigation conducted by the department of
financial institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An exchange facilitator must deposit
all client funds in:
(a) For accounts with a value of five hundred thousand dollars or
more, a separately identified account, as defined in treasury
regulation section 1.468B-6(c)(ii), for the particular client or
client's matter, and the client must receive all the earnings credited
to the separately identified account; or
(b) For accounts with a value less than five hundred thousand
dollars, (i) a pooled interest-bearing trust account if the client
agrees to pooling in writing; or (ii) if the client does not agree to
pooling, in a separately identified account, as defined in treasury
regulation section 1.468B-6(c)(ii).
(2) An exchange facilitator must provide the client with written
notification of how the exchange proceeds have been invested or
deposited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator and who violates section 11 (1) through (8) of
this act is guilty of a class B felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A person who engages in business as an
exchange facilitator and who violates section 11 (11) or (12) of this
act is guilty of a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Exchange facilitators must provide the
director of financial institutions with a report of exchange
facilitator activity by December 31, 2009. The director may by rule
create a format for the report, which must cover the period of January
1, 2009, through December 31, 2009. The report may only include the
following information for exchange facilitation activity in Washington
state:
(a) The total number of property exchanges facilitated by the
exchange facilitator;
(b) The total dollar volume of property exchanges facilitated by
the exchange facilitator;
(c) The primary type of business the exchange facilitator engages
in if the primary type of business is not exchange facilitation,
including a description of any required licenses; and
(d) The percentage of the exchange facilitator's business that is
exchange facilitation, both by client and by gross income.
Any information provided by an exchange facilitator in this report
that constitutes a trade secret as defined in RCW 19.108.010 is exempt
from the disclosure requirements in chapters 42.17 and 42.56 RCW,
unless aggregated with information supplied by other exchange
facilitators in such a manner that the individual information of an
exchange facilitator is not identifiable.
(2) Any information produced or obtained in examining an exchange
facilitator under this section is exempt from disclosure as provided in
RCW 42.56.270.
(3) The director must compile the reports from exchange
facilitators and report to the financial institutions and insurance
committee of the house of representatives and the financial
institutions, housing and insurance committee of the senate by January
15, 2010.
(4) This section expires June 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A person who violates this chapter is
subject to civil suit in a court of competent jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for purposes of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This chapter does not affect the
application of chapter 21.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---