BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
practices of body piercing and body art involve an invasive procedure
with the use of needles, single-use disposable sharps, reusable sharps,
instruments, and jewelry. These practices may be dangerous when
improperly sterilized, presenting a risk of infecting the client with
bloodborne pathogens including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B,
and hepatitis C. It is in the interests of the public health, safety,
and welfare to establish requirements in the commercial practice of
body piercing in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1, 3, and
4 of this act and RCW 5.40.050 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Body art" means the practice of physical cosmetic body
adornment including the use of branding and scarification. "Body art"
also includes the intentional production of scars upon the body. "Body
art" does not include any health-related procedures performed by
licensed health practitioners under their scope of practice.
(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane for the purpose of insertion of an object, including
jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar
tissue resulting from or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing"
does not include the use of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce
the earlobe in accordance with the manufacturer's directions and
applicable United States food and drug administration requirements.
"Body piercing" does not include any health-related procedures
performed by licensed health practitioners under their scope of
practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of health shall adopt by rule requirements for
standard universal precautions, as recommended by the United States
centers for disease control and prevention, for preventing the spread
of disease and the sterilization of needles, single-use disposable
sharps, reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used by a person who
practices body piercing or body art.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who practices body piercing or body art must comply
with the rules adopted by the department of health under section 3 of
this act regardless of whether the person's client has agreed to waive
the person's compliance with the rules.
(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 5.40.050 and 2001 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A breach of a duty imposed by statute, ordinance, or administrative
rule shall not be considered negligence per se, but may be considered
by the trier of fact as evidence of negligence; however, any breach of
duty as provided by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule relating
to electrical fire safety, the use of smoke alarms, sterilization of
needles and instruments used in tattooing or electrology as required
under RCW 70.54.350, standard universal precautions for preventing the
spread of disease and sterilization of needles, single-use disposable
sharps, reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used in body piercing
or body art as required under section 3 of this act, or driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, shall be
considered negligence per se.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any exculpatory clause or liability waiver signed by the client
of a practitioner of body piercing or body art as a precondition for
the provision of those services violates public policy to the extent
that the clause or waiver exculpates the practitioner from, or waives
liability for, damages arising from a failure to comply with the rules
adopted by the secretary of health under section 3 of this act. Any
such exculpatory clause or liability waiver signed on or after the
effective date of this act is therefore void as it relates to damages
arising from a failure to comply with the rules adopted by the
secretary of health under section 3 of this act.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by the rules
adopted under section 3 of this act are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. The failure to comply with the rules adopted
under section 3 of this act is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---