BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Capacity" means the electrical capacity that a generator of
eligible distributed generation may produce during regular operations.
(2) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, or a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW that is engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to more than one retail electric
customer in the state.
(4) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(5) "Distributed generation" means a renewable resource where the
generation facility or any integrated cluster of these facilities has
a generating capacity of five megawatts or less.
(6) "Eligible distributed generator" means the distributed
generation located on the premises of an individual, business, or local
government. Distributed generation by an individual, business, or
local governmental entity in the electricity distribution business or
in the gas distribution business is not considered an eligible
distributed generator.
(7) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
19.29A.010.
(8) "Premises" means any residential property, commercial real
estate, or lands owned or leased by an eligible distributed generator
within the service area of a single qualifying utility.
(9) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(10) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth forests where the clearing occurred
after December 7, 2006; (i) byproducts of pulping or wood manufacturing
processes located in Washington, including but not limited to bark,
wood chips, sawdust, and lignin in spent pulping liquors; (j) black
liquors derived from any source; and (k) biomass energy based on animal
waste, food waste, yard waste, or solid organic fuels from wood,
forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include (i) wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth forests; or (iii) municipal solid
waste.
(11) "Small wind turbine" means any wind turbine with a rotor blade
swept area of no more than two thousand square feet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) Beginning six months after the
effective date of legislation that implements power purchase agreement
rates, a qualifying utility shall interconnect an eligible distributed
generator to the utility's distribution systems within one hundred
eighty days of such a request by the owner of an eligible distributed
generator.
(b) A qualifying utility that refuses to connect an eligible
distributed generator to the distribution systems of a qualifying
utility is subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars per
day that the qualifying utility is in violation of this subsection.
(2) The costs associated with the interconnection of eligible
distributed generators must be included in the surcharge under section
3 of this act.
(3) An individual, business, or local governmental entity may not
enter into a power purchase agreement with a qualifying utility if the
individual, business, or local governmental entity is participating in
the investment cost recovery incentive payment program under chapter
82.16 RCW or in the net metering program under chapter 80.60 RCW.
(4) Qualifying utilities shall enter into power purchase agreements
for a term of not less than twenty years to purchase all electricity
from eligible distributed generators in this state.
(5)(a) An eligible distributed generator shall include, at the
owner's expense, all equipment necessary to meet applicable safety,
power quality, and interconnection requirements established by the
national electrical code, national electrical safety code, the
institute of electrical and electronics engineers, and underwriters
laboratories.
(b) The commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the
appropriate governing body, in the case of other electric utilities,
after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment, may adopt by rule
additional safety, power quality, and interconnection requirements for
distributed generators, including limitations on the number of
distributed generators and total capacity of distributed generators
systems that may be interconnected to any distribution feeder line,
circuit, or network that the commission or governing body determines
are necessary to protect public safety and system reliability.
(6) By December 1, 2009, the department, in consultation with the
commission, shall develop and submit recommendations to the legislature
regarding an appropriate power purchase agreement rate structure to
promote the deployment of eligible distributed generators. The
department must recommend to the legislature rates for solar electric
and solar thermal, off-shore and on-shore wind, wave, tidal, biomass,
biogas, geothermal, and hydropower. In developing its rate
recommendations, the department must consider appropriate rates for at
least the following: Small wind systems; large wind systems; free-standing solar power systems; rooftop solar power systems; and façade
cladding solar projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) The commission shall, after notice
and hearing, annually approve a distributed generation factor that is
a nonbypassable surcharge payable by every customer of an investor-owned utility. The surcharge must be payable by all customer classes.
The commission shall set the surcharge at a level sufficient to pay the
costs of electricity purchased under section 2 of this act and any
interconnection costs under section 2 of this act.
(b) The commission shall approve a standard contract to be used in
all power purchase agreements under this chapter. The contract must
include the prices paid for each kilowatt hour generated, the duration
of the contract, and any adjustments of those prices for inflation.
The standard contract must be designed to provide for graduated
payments for electricity supplied by eligible distributed generators.
The graduate payments must be reduced over the twenty-year term of the
contract, equaling zero dollars for the last payment of the contract.
The commission shall provide utilities with standard contracts within
three months after the effective date of legislation that implements
power purchase agreement rates.
(c) The commission shall review the rates every two years and
adjust those rates as necessary to account for inflation, assist in the
profitable development of eligible distributed generators, prevent
excessive profits for eligible distributed generators, and prevent
unnecessary costs to ratepayers. The commission shall reduce the rates
to reflect any federal or state subsidies, tax credits, or other
incentives that an eligible distributed generator is receiving.
(2)(a) The governing board of a consumer-owned utility shall, after
notice and hearing, annually approve a distributed generation factor
that must be a nonbypassable surcharge payable by every customer of the
utility. The surcharge must be payable by all customer classes. The
governing board shall set the surcharge at a level sufficient to pay
the costs of electricity purchased under section 2 of this act and any
interconnection costs under section 2 of this act.
(b) The governing boards of consumer-owned utilities shall, in a
coordinated fashion, develop a standard contract to be used in all
power purchase agreements under this chapter. The contract must
include the prices paid for each kilowatt hour generated, the duration
of the contract, and any adjustments of those prices for inflation.
The standard contract must be designed to provide for graduated
payments for electricity supplied by eligible distributed generators.
The graduate payments must be reduced over the twenty-year term of the
contract, equaling zero dollars for the last payment of the contract.
Governing boards of consumer-owned utilities shall develop the standard
contract within three months of the effective date of legislation that
implements power purchase agreement rates.
(c) Governing boards of consumer-owned utilities shall review the
rates every two years and adjust those rates as necessary to account
for inflation, assist in the profitable development of eligible
distributed generators, prevent excessive profits for eligible
distributed generators, and prevent unnecessary costs to ratepayers.
Governing boards of consumer-owned utilities shall reduce the rates to
reflect any federal or state subsidies, tax credits, or other
incentives that an eligible distributed generator is receiving.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Within two years after the effective
date of legislation that implements power purchase agreement rates, and
every four years thereafter, the commission shall file a report with
the governor and the energy committees of the legislature that includes
all of the following:
(a) The number of new eligible distributed generators in this state
and the environmental effects of the addition of those generators;
(b) Recommendations for legislation and changes to the rates, if
any; and
(c) Actions taken by the commission to implement this chapter.
(2) Within two years after the effective date of legislation that
implements power purchase agreement rates, and every four years
thereafter, the department shall file a report with the governor and
the energy committees of the legislature that includes all of the
following:
(a) The number of new eligible distributed generators in this state
and the environmental effects of the addition of those generators;
(b) Recommendations for legislation and changes to the rates, if
any; and
(c) Actions taken by consumer-owned utilities to implement this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Eligible distributed generators served
by an investor-owned utility shall upon request provide the commission
with any information that may be relevant to the commission performing
its duties under this chapter.
(2) Eligible distributed generators served by a consumer-owned
utility shall upon request provide the department with any information
that may be relevant to the department performing its duties under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department must provide the code
reviser's office with written notification that identifies the
legislation that implements the power purchase agreement rates
referenced in sections 2(1)(a), 3(1)(b), 3(2)(b), and 4 (1) and (2) of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---