BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office shall, in consultation with the advisory committee,
develop a strategic plan to improve its effectiveness in carrying out
the purposes of this chapter, including assisting small minority and
women's business enterprises to succeed in this state. The plan must
be updated at least annually and must include timelines and, at a
minimum, strategies to:
(a) Facilitate communication with and among minority and women's
business enterprises on contracting with the state, including providing
for a central depository of information accessible to small businesses;
(b) Improve outreach to small businesses, including publicizing the
value of certification under this chapter;
(c) Streamline the statewide certification process;
(d) Focus technical assistance under this chapter to small
businesses and certified firms;
(e) Address barriers to inclusion of certified firms in the state
procurement process and increase selection of certified firms as prime
contractors and subcontractors in contracts awarded by state agencies
and educational institutions; and
(f) Develop accountability measures to use in reporting progress by
the office and other state agencies and educational institutions in
achieving the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The office must report on the strategic plan and its assessment
of progress to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature, with a preliminary report by September 1, 2009, and annual
reports beginning December 1, 2009. The report must include relevant
fiscal information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purpose of annual reporting on progress required by section
1 of this act, each state agency and educational institution shall
submit data to the office on the participation by qualified minority
and women-owned and controlled businesses in the agency's or
institution's contracts and other related information requested by the
director. The director shall determine the content and format of the
data and the reporting schedule, which must be at least annually.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.19.041 and 1995 c 269 s 1302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2009, the director ((may)) shall establish ((ad
hoc advisory committees, as necessary,)) an advisory committee on
minority and women's business enterprises to assist in the development
of policies to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to provide
the director with policy advice on current issues.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least six times per year.
Members may participate in a meeting of the advisory committee by means
of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment, in which
all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the
same time. Participation by such means shall constitute presence, in
person, at a meeting.
(3) The advisory committee membership may include up to fifteen
members, subject to the following:
(a) Members must be as diverse and representative as possible of
businesses certified under this chapter and organizations that
represent such businesses.
(b) Membership must reflect statewide geographic distribution of
small businesses.
(c) The number of organizations represented may not exceed the
number of businesses represented.
(4) In addition to the members permitted under subsection (3) of
this section, the advisory committee membership may include nonvoting
representatives of state and local government.

--- END ---