BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.28.011 and 1957 c 278 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Gross revenue" ((shall)) means the amount received from the sale
of electric energy, which also includes any regularly recurring charge
billed to consumers as a condition of receiving electric energy, and
excluding any tax levied by a municipal corporation upon the district
pursuant to RCW 54.28.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies prospectively only.

--- END ---