BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessor shall give notice of any change in the true and fair
value of real property for the tract or lot of land and any
improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal:
PROVIDED, That no such notice shall be mailed during the period from
January 15 to February 15 of each year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no
notice need be sent with respect to changes in valuation of forest land
made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
The notice shall contain a statement of both the prior and the new
true and fair value((, stating separately land and improvement
values,)) and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal to the
board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the meetings of
the board.
The notice shall be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.
If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a security
interest in the real property which is the subject of the notice,
pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, such
taxpayer shall, upon written request of the assessor, supply, within
thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor the name and
address of the person making payments pursuant to the mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person shall
also receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section.
Willful failure to comply with such request within the time limitation
provided for herein shall make such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil
penalty of five thousand dollars. The penalties provided for herein
shall be recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered shall be deposited in the county current expense fund. The
assessor shall make the request provided for by this section during the
month of January.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---