BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that the national historic reserves and
national historical parks located in Washington state are important
cultural and recreational assets for our citizens. Historical parks
and reserves preserve some of the richest historic, archaeological, and
architectural landscapes and cultural resources in the state; places
that play pivotal roles in our region's history. For the public, these
sites offer unmatched educational and recreational opportunities.
Preservation and enhancement of these historical parks and reserves
drives economic development through job creation and tourism, as well
as enhances the livability of our communities and sustains these
historic landscapes and structures for future generations. For these
reasons it is the intent of the legislature to encourage the continued
preservation and enhancement of historical parks and reserves located
in Washington state. Such sites currently consist of the Vancouver
national historic reserve, Ebey's Landing national historic reserve,
Lewis and Clark national historical park, Klondike Gold Rush national
historical park, and San Juan Island national historical park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed by this chapter for approved contributions made
to qualified Washington historical projects.
(a) The credit allowed under this section is limited to
seventy-five percent of the approved contribution made to a project.
(b) The department must keep a running total of all credits
approved under this section and section 3 of this act each calendar
year. The department may not approve any credits under this section or
section 3 of this act that would cause the total amount of approved
credits statewide to exceed three million dollars in any calendar year.
The maximum any one historical park or historic reserve can receive in
contributions under this section or section 3 of this act in a single
year is one million dollars.
(2) For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act:
(a) "Qualified Washington historical projects" include only capital
projects located on or in a federally designated historic reserve or
historical park.
(b) "Capital project" means a project to construct either new
facilities or significant, long-term renewal improvements to existing
facilities. A capital project usually has a useful life of at least
thirteen years and typically requires the involvement of either an
architect or engineer, or both.
(3) Organizations eligible to receive contributions qualifying for
credits under this section include any organization exempt from federal
income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or governmental entities with
a cooperative agreement for development of the park or reserve.
(4) Application for tax credits under this section must be made to
the department before making a contribution to a historic preservation
program. The application must be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application must contain
information regarding the proposed amount of contribution to a
historical project, and other information required by the department to
determine eligibility under this act. The department shall rule on the
application within forty-five days. Applications shall be reviewed in
the order that they are received.
(5) The person or entity must make the contribution before claiming
a credit authorized under this section. A credit that is allowed under
this section, with respect to any taxable year commencing on or after
January 1, 2010, but is not used by a taxpayer may be carried forward
to successive income years until such credit is fully taken. In no
case may a credit that is not used be carried forward for a period of
more than ten years.
(6) Credit under this section is limited to the amount of tax
imposed under this chapter.
(7) Refunds may not be given in place of credits.
(8) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(9) No credit may be earned for contributions made on or after
January 1, 2020.
(10) No credit may be earned for contributions made before January
1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the same requirements and limitations applicable to
the tax credit in section 2 of this act, a credit is allowed against
the tax imposed by this chapter for approved contributions made to
qualified Washington historical projects.
(2) Credit under this section is limited to the amount of tax
imposed under this chapter.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires December 31, 2019.

--- END ---