BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.645 and 1970 ex.s. c 51 s 130 are each amended
to read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 502, and
designated as the Battle Ground highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 5 in the vicinity
north of Vancouver, thence easterly to a junction with state route
number 503 at Battle Ground.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.17.650 and 1991 c 342 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 503 is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 500 at Orchards,
thence northerly to a junction with state route number 502 at Battle
Ground, thence northerly to Amboy, thence northeasterly by way of
Cougar to the Cowlitz-Skamania county line; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 503 in the vicinity
of Yale, thence westerly to a junction with state route number 5 in the
vicinity of Woodland.
That portion of state route number 503 from the junction with state
route number 500 at Orchards, thence northerly to a junction with state
route number 502 at Battle Ground, thence northerly to Amboy is
designated as the Lewisville highway.

--- END ---