BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.01.040 and 1984 c 184 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices,
departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
under their contract of employment with the state government to not
less than one working day of vacation leave with full pay for each
month of employment if said employment is continuous for six months.
Each such subordinate officer and employee shall be entitled under
such contract of employment to not less than one additional working day
of vacation with full pay each year for satisfactorily completing the
first two, three and five continuous years of employment respectively.
To the extent that rates of vacation leave accrual are based upon
total state employment, each contract year or equivalent of full-time
employment in a certificated or classified position with a school
district within the state shall be credited to the state officer or
employee as one year of qualifying service. Qualifying employment with
a school district shall be applied to leave accrual rates effective
July 1, 2009.
Such part time officers or employees of the state government who
are employed on a regular schedule of duration of not less than one
year shall be entitled under their contract of employment to that
fractional part of the vacation leave that the total number of hours of
such employment bears to the total number of hours of full time
employment.
Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices,
departments and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
under his contract of employment with the state government to accrue
unused vacation leave not to exceed thirty working days. Officers and
employees transferring within the several offices, departments and
institutions of the state government shall be entitled to transfer such
accrued vacation leave to each succeeding state office, department or
institution. All vacation leave shall be taken at the time convenient
to the employing office, department or institution: PROVIDED, That if
a subordinate officer's or employee's request for vacation leave is
deferred by reason of the convenience of the employing office,
department or institution, and a statement of the necessity therefor is
filed by such employing office, department or institution with the
appropriate personnel board or other state agency or officer, then the
aforesaid maximum thirty working days of accrued unused vacation leave
shall be extended for each month said leave is so deferred.

--- END ---