BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.143.005 and 1997 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Washington's coastal waters, seabed, and shorelines are among
the most valuable and fragile of its natural resources.
(2) Ocean and marine-based industries and activities, such as
fishing, aquaculture, tourism, and marine transportation have played a
major role in the history of the state and will continue to be
important in the future.
(3) Washington's coastal waters, seabed, and shorelines are faced
with conflicting use demands. Some uses may pose unacceptable
environmental or social risks at certain times.
(4)(a) The state of Washington has primary jurisdiction over the
management of coastal and ocean natural resources within three miles of
its coastline. From three miles seaward to the boundary of the two
hundred mile exclusive economic zone, the United States federal
government has primary jurisdiction. Since protection, conservation,
and development of the natural resources in the exclusive economic zone
directly affect Washington's economy and environment, the state has an
inherent interest in how these resources are managed.
(b) It is the policy of the state of Washington that there be no
leasing of Washington's tidal or submerged lands within three miles of
its coastline, or within three miles seaward to the boundary of the two
hundred mile exclusive economic zone, for purposes of oil or gas
exploration, development, or production.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.143.010 and 1997 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to articulate policies and
establish guidelines for the exercise of state and local management
authority over Washington's coastal waters, seabed, and shorelines.
(2) There shall be no leasing of Washington's tidal or submerged
lands extending from mean high tide seaward ((three)) two hundred miles
along the Washington coast from Cape Flattery south to Cape
Disappointment, nor in Grays Harbor, Willapa Bay, and the Columbia
river downstream from the Longview bridge, for purposes of oil or gas
exploration, development, or production.
(3) When conflicts arise among uses and activities, priority shall
be given to resource uses and activities that will not adversely impact
renewable resources over uses which are likely to have an adverse
impact on renewable resources.
(4) It is the policy of the state of Washington to actively
encourage the conservation of liquid fossil fuels, and to explore
available methods of encouraging such conservation.
(5) It is not currently the intent of the legislature to include
recreational uses or currently existing commercial uses involving
fishing or other renewable marine or ocean resources within the uses
and activities which must meet the planning and review criteria set
forth in RCW 43.143.030. It is not the intent of the legislature,
however, to permanently exclude these uses from the requirements of RCW
43.143.030. If information becomes available which indicates that such
uses should reasonably be covered by the requirements of RCW
43.143.030, the permitting government or agency may require compliance
with those requirements, and appeals of that decision shall be handled
through the established appeals procedure for that permit or approval.
(6) The state shall participate in federal ocean and marine
resource decisions to the fullest extent possible to ensure that the
decisions are consistent with the state's policy concerning the use of
those resources.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.550 and 1983 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within this section the following definitions apply:
(a) "Exploration activity" means reconnaissance or survey work
related to gathering information about geologic features and formations
underlying or adjacent to marine waters;
(b) "Marine waters" include the waters of Puget Sound north to the
Canadian border, the waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, the waters
between the western boundary of the state and the ordinary high water
mark, and related bays and estuaries;
(c) "Vessel" includes ships, boats, barges, or any other floating
craft.
(2) A person desiring to perform oil or natural gas exploration
activities by vessel located on or within marine waters of the state
shall first obtain a permit from the department ((of ecology)). The
department may approve an application for a permit only if it
determines that the proposed activity will not:
(a) Interfere materially with the normal public uses of the marine
waters of the state;
(b) Interfere with activities authorized by a permit issued under
RCW 90.58.140(2);
(c) Injure the marine biota, beds, or tidelands of the waters;
(d) Violate water quality standards established by the department;
((or))
(e) Create a public nuisance; or
(f) Violate the provisions of RCW 43.143.010.
(3) Decisions on an application under subsection (2) of this
section are subject to review only by the pollution control hearings
board under chapter 43.21B RCW.
(4) This section does not apply to activities conducted by an
agency of the United States or the state of Washington.
(5) This section does not lessen, reduce, or modify RCW 90.58.160.
(6) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.
(7) The attorney general shall enforce this section.

--- END ---