BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 73.08.080 and 2005 c 250 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority in each county shall levy, in
addition to the taxes now levied by law, a tax in a sum equal to the
amount which would be raised by not less than one and one-eighth cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and not greater than twenty-seven cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the taxable
property of their respective counties, to be levied and collected as
now prescribed by law for the assessment and collection of taxes, for
the purpose of creating a veterans' assistance fund. Expenditures from
the veterans' assistance fund, and interest earned on balances from the
fund, may be used only for:
(a) The veterans' assistance programs authorized by RCW 73.08.010;
(b) The burial or cremation of a deceased indigent veteran or
deceased family member of an indigent veteran as authorized by RCW
73.08.070; and
(c) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of
the fund as authorized by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If the funds on deposit in the veterans' assistance fund, less
outstanding warrants, on the first Tuesday in September exceed the
expected yield of one and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value against the taxable property of the county, the county
legislative authority may levy a lesser amount. The direct and
indirect costs incurred in the administration of the veterans'
assistance fund shall be computed by the county auditor, or the chief
financial officer in a county operating under a charter, not less than
annually. Following the computation of these direct and indirect
costs, an amount equal to these costs may then be transferred from the
veterans' assistance fund to the county current expense fund.
(3) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section ((may)) shall be reduced ((in the same proportion as the
regular property tax levy of the county is reduced)) as required by
chapter 84.55 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.005 and 2007 sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "limit factor"
means:
(((a))) (i) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(((b))) (ii) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is
authorized under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor
authorized under that section or one hundred one percent;
(((c))) (iii) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred
one percent or one hundred percent plus inflation;
(b) For the portion of the county levy allocated under RCW
73.08.080, "limit factor" means a factor not to exceed one hundred six
percent; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---