BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.84.010 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abuser" means any person who participates, either as a
principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful
financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
(2) "Decedent" means:
(a) Any person whose life is taken by a slayer; or
(b) Any deceased person who, at any time during life in which he or
she was a vulnerable adult, was the victim of financial exploitation by
an abuser.
(3) "Financial exploitation" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 74.34.020, as enacted or hereafter amended.
(4) "Property" includes any real and personal property and any
right or interest therein.
(5) "Slayer" ((shall)) means any person who participates, either as
a principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and
unlawful killing of any other person.
(((2) "Decedent" shall mean any person whose life is so taken.
(3) "Property" shall include any real and personal property and any
right or interest therein.)) (6) "Vulnerable adult" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 74.34.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.84.020 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
No slayer or abuser shall in any way acquire any property or
receive any benefit as the result of the death of the decedent, but
such property shall pass as provided in the sections following.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.84.025 and 1998 c 292 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
Proceeds payable to a slayer or abuser as the beneficiary of any
benefits flowing from one of the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030, by virtue of the decedent's membership in the department of
retirement systems or by virtue of the death of decedent, shall be paid
instead as designated in RCW 41.04.273.

Sec. 4 RCW 11.84.030 and 2008 c 6 s 624 are each amended to read
as follows:
The slayer or abuser shall be deemed to have predeceased the
decedent as to property which would have passed from the decedent or
his or her estate to the slayer or abuser under the statutes of descent
and distribution or have been acquired by statutory right as surviving
spouse or surviving domestic partner or under any agreement made with
the decedent under the provisions of RCW 26.16.120 as it now exists or
is hereafter amended.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.84.040 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
Property which would have passed to or for the benefit of the
slayer or abuser by devise or legacy from the decedent shall be
distributed as if he or she had predeceased the decedent.

Sec. 6 RCW 11.84.050 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) One-half of any property held by the slayer or abuser and the
decedent as joint tenants, joint owners or joint obligees shall pass
upon the death of the decedent to his or her estate, and the other half
shall pass to his or her estate upon the death of the slayer or abuser,
unless the slayer or abuser obtains a separation or severance of the
property or a decree granting partition.
(2) As to property held jointly by three or more persons, including
the slayer or abuser and the decedent, any enrichment which would have
accrued to the slayer or abuser as a result of the death of the
decedent shall pass to the estate of the decedent. If the slayer or
abuser becomes the final survivor, one-half of the property shall
immediately pass to the estate of the decedent and the other half shall
pass to his or her estate upon the death of the slayer or abuser,
unless the slayer or abuser obtains a separation or severance of the
property or a decree granting partition.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not affect any enforceable
agreement between the parties or any trust arising because a greater
proportion of the property has been contributed by one party than by
the other.

Sec. 7 RCW 11.84.060 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.060 are each amended
to read as follows:
Provided the property interest was not obtained through an act of
financial exploitation:
(1) Property in which the slayer or abuser holds a reversion or
vested remainder and would have obtained the right of present
possession upon the death of the decedent shall pass to the estate of
the decedent during the period of the life expectancy of the
decedent((; if he)).
(2) If the slayer or abuser held the particular estate or if the
particular estate is held by a third person it shall remain in his or
her hands for such period.

Sec. 8 RCW 11.84.070 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any interest in property whether vested or not, held by the slayer
or abuser, subject to be divested, diminished in any way or
extinguished, if the decedent survives him or her or lives to a certain
age, shall be held by the slayer or abuser during his or her lifetime
or until the decedent would have reached such age, but shall then pass
as if the decedent had died immediately thereafter.

Sec. 9 RCW 11.84.080 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
As to any contingent remainder or executory or other future
interest held by the slayer or abuser, subject to become vested in him
or her or increased in any way for him or her upon the condition of the
death of the decedent:
(1) If the interest would not have become vested or increased if he
or she had predeceased the decedent, he or she shall be deemed to have
so predeceased the decedent;
(2) In any case the interest shall not be vested or increased
during the period of the life expectancy of the decedent.

Sec. 10 RCW 11.84.090 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.090 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Property appointed by the will of the decedent to or for the
benefit of the slayer or abuser shall be distributed as if the slayer
or abuser had predeceased the decedent.
(2) Property held either presently or in remainder by the slayer or
abuser, subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a
power of revocation or a general power of appointment shall pass to the
estate of the decedent, and property so held by the slayer or abuser,
subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of
appointment to a particular person or persons or to a class of persons,
shall pass to such person or persons, or in equal shares to the members
of such class of persons, exclusive of the slayer or abuser.

Sec. 11 RCW 11.84.100 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Insurance proceeds payable to the slayer or abuser as the
beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on
the life of the decedent, or as the survivor of a joint life policy,
shall be paid instead to the estate of the decedent, unless the policy
or certificate designate some person other than the slayer or abuser or
his or her estate as secondary beneficiary to him or her and in which
case such proceeds shall be paid to such secondary beneficiary in
accordance with the applicable terms of the policy.
(2) If the decedent is beneficiary or assignee of any policy or
certificate of insurance on the life of the slayer or abuser, the
proceeds shall be paid to the estate of the decedent upon the death of
the slayer or abuser, unless the policy names some person other than
the slayer or abuser or his or her estate as secondary beneficiary, or
unless the slayer or abuser by naming a new beneficiary or assigning
the policy performs an act which would have deprived the decedent of
his or her interest in the policy if he or she had been living.

Sec. 12 RCW 11.84.110 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any insurance company making payment according to the terms of its
policy or any bank or other person performing an obligation for the
slayer or abuser as one of several joint obligees shall not be
subjected to additional liability by the terms of this chapter if such
payment or performance is made without written notice, at its home
office or at an individual's home or business address, of the killing
by a slayer or financial exploitation by an abuser.

Sec. 13 RCW 11.84.120 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not affect the rights of any
person who, before the interests of the slayer or abuser have been
adjudicated, purchases or has agreed to purchase, from the slayer or
abuser for value and without notice property which the slayer or abuser
would have acquired except for the terms of this chapter, but all
proceeds received by the slayer or abuser from such sale shall be held
by him or her in trust for the persons entitled to the property under
the provisions of this chapter, and the slayer or abuser shall also be
liable both for any portion of such proceeds which he or she may have
dissipated and for any difference between the actual value of the
property and the amount of such proceeds.

Sec. 14 RCW 11.84.130 and 1965 c 145 s 11.84.130 are each amended
to read as follows:
((The)) Any record of ((his)) conviction ((of)) for having
participated in the ((wilful)) willful and unlawful killing of the
decedent or for conduct constituting financial exploitation against the
decedent, including but not limited to theft, forgery, fraud, identity
theft, robbery, burglary, or extortion, shall be admissible in evidence
against a claimant of property in any civil ((action)) proceeding
arising under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 11.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A final judgment of conviction for the willful and unlawful
killing of the decedent is conclusive for purposes of determining
whether a person is a slayer under this section.
(2) In the absence of a criminal conviction, a superior court
finding by a preponderance of the evidence that a person participated
in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent is conclusive for
purposes of determining whether a person is a slayer under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 11.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A final judgment of conviction for conduct constituting
financial exploitation against the decedent, including but not limited
to theft, forgery, fraud, identity theft, robbery, burglary, or
extortion, is conclusive for purposes of determining whether a person
is an abuser under this section.
(2) In the absence of a criminal conviction, a superior court
finding by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that a person
participated in conduct constituting financial exploitation against the
decedent is conclusive for purposes of determining whether a person is
an abuser under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 11.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In determining whether a person is an abuser for purposes of
this chapter, the court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence that:
(a) The decedent was a vulnerable adult at the time the alleged
financial exploitation took place; and
(b) The conduct constituting financial exploitation was willful
action or willful inaction causing injury to the property of the
vulnerable adult.
(2) A finding of abuse by the department of social and health
services is not admissible for any purpose in any claim or proceeding
under this chapter.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, evidence
of financial exploitation is admissible if it is not inadmissible
pursuant to the rules of evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 11.84 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter:
(1) An abuser is entitled to acquire or receive an interest in
property or any other benefit described in this chapter if the court
determines by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the decedent:
(a) Knew of the financial exploitation; and
(b) Subsequently ratified his or her intent to transfer the
property interest or benefit to that person.
(2) The court may consider the record of proceedings and in its
discretion allow an abuser to acquire or receive an interest in
property or any other benefit described in this chapter in any manner
the court deems equitable. In determining what is equitable, the court
may consider, among other things:
(a) The various elements of the decedent's dispositive scheme;
(b) The decedent's likely intent given the totality of the
circumstances; and
(c) The degree of harm resulting from the abuser's financial
exploitation of the decedent.

Sec. 19 RCW 26.16.120 and 2008 c 6 s 612 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing contained in any of the provisions of this chapter or in
any law of this state, shall prevent both spouses or both domestic
partners from jointly entering into any agreement concerning the status
or disposition of the whole or any portion of the community property,
then owned by them or afterwards to be acquired, to take effect upon
the death of either. But such agreement may be made at any time by
both spouses or both domestic partners by the execution of an
instrument in writing under their hands and seals, and to be witnessed,
acknowledged and certified in the same manner as deeds to real estate
are required to be, under the laws of the state, and the same may at
any time thereafter be altered or amended in the same manner. Such
agreement shall not derogate from the right of creditors; nor be
construed to curtail the powers of the superior court to set aside or
cancel such agreement for fraud or under some other recognized head of
equity jurisdiction, at the suit of either party; nor prevent the
application of laws governing the community property and inheritance
rights of slayers or abusers under chapter 11.84 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 41.04.273 and 1998 c 292 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall
apply:
(a) (("Slayer" means a slayer as defined)) "Abuser" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 11.84.010.
(b) "Decedent" means any person ((whose life is taken by a slayer,
and)) who is entitled to benefits from the Washington state department
of retirement systems by written designation or by operation of law:
(i) Whose life is taken by a slayer; or
(ii) Who is deceased and who, at any time during life in which he
or she was a vulnerable adult, was the victim of financial exploitation
by an abuser, except as provided in section 18 of this act.
(c) "Slayer" means a slayer as defined in RCW 11.84.010.
(2) Property that would have passed to or for the benefit of a
beneficiary under one of the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030
shall not pass to that beneficiary if the beneficiary was a slayer or
abuser of the decedent and the property shall be distributed as if the
slayer or abuser had predeceased the decedent.
(3) A slayer or abuser is deemed to have predeceased the decedent
as to property which, by designation or by operation of law, would have
passed from the decedent to the slayer or abuser because of the
decedent's entitlement to benefits under one of the retirement systems
listed in RCW 41.50.030.
(4)(a) The department of retirement systems has no affirmative duty
to determine whether a beneficiary is, or is alleged to be, a slayer or
abuser. However, upon receipt of written notice that a beneficiary is
a defendant in a civil lawsuit or probate proceeding that alleges the
beneficiary is a slayer or abuser, or is charged with a crime that, if
committed, means the beneficiary is a slayer or abuser, the department
of retirement systems shall determine whether the beneficiary is a
defendant in such a civil ((suit)) proceeding or has been formally
charged in court with the crime, or both. If so, the department shall
withhold payment of any benefits until:
(i) The case or charges, or both if both are pending, are
dismissed;
(ii) The beneficiary is found not guilty in the criminal case or
prevails in the civil ((suit)) proceeding, or both if both are pending;
or
(iii) The beneficiary is convicted or is found to be a slayer or
abuser in the civil ((suit)) proceeding.
(b) If the case or charges, or both if both are pending, are
dismissed or if a beneficiary is found not guilty or prevails in the
civil ((suit)) proceeding, or both if both are pending, the department
shall pay the beneficiary the benefits the beneficiary is entitled to
receive. If the beneficiary is convicted or found to be a slayer or
abuser in a civil ((suit)) proceeding, the department shall distribute
the benefits according to subsection (2) of this section.
(5) ((The slayer's)) Any record of conviction for having
participated in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent or for
conduct constituting financial exploitation against the decedent,
including but not limited to theft, forgery, fraud, identity theft,
robbery, burglary, or extortion, shall be admissible in evidence
against a claimant of property in any civil action arising under this
section.
(6) In the absence of a criminal conviction, a superior court may
determine:
(a) By a preponderance of the evidence whether a person
participated in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent;
(b) By clear, cogent, and convincing evidence whether a person
participated in conduct constituting financial exploitation against the
decedent, as provided in chapter 11.84 RCW.
(7) This section shall not subject the department of retirement
systems to liability for payment made to a slayer or abuser or alleged
slayer or abuser, prior to the department's receipt of written notice
that the slayer or abuser has been convicted of, or the alleged slayer
or abuser has been formally criminally or civilly charged in court
with, the death or financial exploitation of the decedent. If the
conviction or civil judgment of a slayer or abuser is reversed on
appeal, the department of retirement systems shall not be liable for
payment made prior to the receipt of written notice of the reversal to
a beneficiary other than the person whose conviction or civil judgment
is reversed.

Sec. 21 RCW 11.96A.030 and 2008 c 6 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Matter" includes any issue, question, or dispute involving:
(a) The determination of any class of creditors, devisees,
legatees, heirs, next of kin, or other persons interested in an estate,
trust, nonprobate asset, or with respect to any other asset or property
interest passing at death;
(b) The direction of a personal representative or trustee to do or
to abstain from doing any act in a fiduciary capacity;
(c) The determination of any question arising in the administration
of an estate or trust, or with respect to any nonprobate asset, or with
respect to any other asset or property interest passing at death, that
may include, without limitation, questions relating to: (i) The
construction of wills, trusts, community property agreements, and other
writings; (ii) a change of personal representative or trustee; (iii) a
change of the situs of a trust; (iv) an accounting from a personal
representative or trustee; or (v) the determination of fees for a
personal representative or trustee;
(d) The grant to a personal representative or trustee of any
necessary or desirable power not otherwise granted in the governing
instrument or given by law;
(e) An action or proceeding under chapter 11.84 RCW;
(f) The amendment, reformation, or conformation of a will or a
trust instrument to comply with statutes and regulations of the United
States internal revenue service in order to achieve qualification for
deductions, elections, and other tax requirements, including the
qualification of any gift thereunder for the benefit of a surviving
spouse who is not a citizen of the United States for the estate tax
marital deduction permitted by federal law, including the addition of
mandatory governing instrument requirements for a qualified domestic
trust under section 2056A of the internal revenue code, the
qualification of any gift thereunder as a qualified conservation
easement as permitted by federal law, or the qualification of any gift
for the charitable estate tax deduction permitted by federal law,
including the addition of mandatory governing instrument requirements
for a charitable remainder trust; and
(((f))) (g) With respect to any nonprobate asset, or with respect
to any other asset or property interest passing at death, including
joint tenancy property, property subject to a community property
agreement, or assets subject to a pay on death or transfer on death
designation:
(i) The ascertaining of any class of creditors or others for
purposes of chapter 11.18 or 11.42 RCW;
(ii) The ordering of a qualified person, the notice agent, or
resident agent, as those terms are defined in chapter 11.42 RCW, or any
combination of them, to do or abstain from doing any particular act
with respect to a nonprobate asset;
(iii) The ordering of a custodian of any of the decedent's records
relating to a nonprobate asset to do or abstain from doing any
particular act with respect to those records;
(iv) The determination of any question arising in the
administration under chapter 11.18 or 11.42 RCW of a nonprobate asset;
(v) The determination of any questions relating to the abatement,
rights of creditors, or other matter relating to the administration,
settlement, or final disposition of a nonprobate asset under this
title;
(vi) The resolution of any matter referencing this chapter,
including a determination of any questions relating to the ownership or
distribution of an individual retirement account on the death of the
spouse of the account holder as contemplated by RCW 6.15.020(6);
(vii) The resolution of any other matter that could affect the
nonprobate asset.
(2) "Notice agent" has the meanings given in RCW 11.42.010.
(3) "Nonprobate assets" has the meaning given in RCW 11.02.005.
(4) "Party" or "parties" means each of the following persons who
has an interest in the subject of the particular proceeding and whose
name and address are known to, or are reasonably ascertainable by, the
petitioner:
(a) The trustor if living;
(b) The trustee;
(c) The personal representative;
(d) An heir;
(e) A beneficiary, including devisees, legatees, and trust
beneficiaries;
(f) The surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a
decedent with respect to his or her interest in the decedent's
property;
(g) A guardian ad litem;
(h) A creditor;
(i) Any other person who has an interest in the subject of the
particular proceeding;
(j) The attorney general if required under RCW 11.110.120;
(k) Any duly appointed and acting legal representative of a party
such as a guardian, special representative, or attorney-in-fact;
(l) Where applicable, the virtual representative of any person
described in this subsection the giving of notice to whom would meet
notice requirements as provided in RCW 11.96A.120;
(m) Any notice agent, resident agent, or a qualified person, as
those terms are defined in chapter 11.42 RCW; and
(n) The owner or the personal representative of the estate of the
deceased owner of the nonprobate asset that is the subject of the
particular proceeding, if the subject of the particular proceeding
relates to the beneficiary's liability to a decedent's estate or
creditors under RCW 11.18.200.
(5) "Persons interested in the estate or trust" means the trustor,
if living, all persons beneficially interested in the estate or trust,
persons holding powers over the trust or estate assets, the attorney
general in the case of any charitable trust where the attorney general
would be a necessary party to judicial proceedings concerning the
trust, and any personal representative or trustee of the estate or
trust.
(6) "Principal place of administration of the trust" means the
trustee's usual place of business where the day-to-day records
pertaining to the trust are kept, or the trustee's residence if the
trustee has no such place of business.
(7) The "situs" of a trust means the place where the principal
place of administration of the trust is located, unless otherwise
provided in the instrument creating the trust.
(8) "Trustee" means any acting and qualified trustee of the trust.
(9) "Representative" and other similar terms refer to a person who
virtually represents another under RCW 11.96A.120.
(10) "Citation" or "cite" and other similar terms, when required of
a person interested in the estate or trust or a party to a petition,
means to give notice as required under RCW 11.96A.100. "Citation" or
"cite" and other similar terms, when required of the court, means to
order, as authorized under RCW 11.96A.020 and 11.96A.060, and as
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 11.84 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this act are supplemental to, and do not derogate
from, any other statutory or common law proceedings, theories, or
remedies including, but not limited to, the common law allocation of
the burden of proof or production among the parties.

--- END ---