BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
social and health services' current geographical classifications for
setting vendor rates for supported living providers create a
competitive disadvantage for Snohomish county providers compared to
King county providers. Although King and Snohomish counties are often
classified as part of the same metropolitan area for funding purposes,
the current department classifications provide significantly higher
rates for King county vendors. This results in significantly higher
salaries for King county supported living workers. This lures
Snohomish county workers to King county for the higher salaries,
causing an unsustainably high turnover in Snohomish county.
The 2007 vendor rate increases provided a higher rate increase for
King county. This exacerbated an already difficult problem. The
legislature recognizes that the cost of doing business for supported
living providers is nearly identical in King and Snohomish counties.
The legislature intends that Snohomish county supported living vendors
be paid the same rate as King county supported living vendors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.10 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of setting vendor rates for supported living
providers, the department must use the following geographic categories:
(1) Category 1: Snohomish and King counties;
(2) Category 2: Asotin, Chelan, Cowlitz, Benton, Clark, Franklin,
Island, Kitsap, Mason, Pierce, Skagit, Skamania, Spokane, Thurston,
Whatcom, and Yakima counties; and
(3) Category 3: Adams, Clallam, Columbia, Douglas, Ferry, Garfield,
Grant, Grays Harbor, Jefferson, Kittitas, Klickitat, Lewis, Lincoln,
Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Orielle, San Juan, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla
Walla, and Whitman counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---