BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.62.011 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter is intended to provide the exclusive source of local
government entity authority to individually or jointly self-insure
risks, jointly purchase insurance or reinsurance, and to contract for
risk management, claims, and administrative services. This chapter
shall be liberally construed to grant local government entities maximum
flexibility in self-insuring to the extent the self-insurance programs
are operated in a safe and sound manner. This chapter is intended to
require prior approval for the establishment of every individual local
government self-insured employee health and welfare benefit program and
every joint local government self-insurance program. In addition, this
chapter is intended to require every local government entity that
establishes a self-insurance program not subject to prior approval to
notify the state of the existence of the program and to comply with the
regulatory and statutory standards governing the management and
operation of the programs as provided in this chapter. This chapter is
not intended to authorize or regulate self-insurance of unemployment
compensation under chapter 50.44 RCW, or industrial insurance under
chapter 51.14 RCW. It is against the public policy of the state for a
self-insurance program governed by this chapter to pay the cost of
liability or defense costs for claims brought under the public records
act, chapter 42.56 RCW, and the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.62.101 and 2005 c 274 s 316 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All self-insurance programs governed by this chapter may
provide for executive sessions in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW to
consider litigation and settlement of claims when it appears that
public discussion of these matters would impair the program's ability
to conduct its business effectively.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in the
public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, in a claim or action against the
state or a local government entity, no person is entitled to discover
that portion of any funds or liability reserve established for purposes
of satisfying a claim or cause of action, except that the reserve is
discoverable in a supplemental or ancillary proceeding to enforce a
judgment. All other records of individual or joint self-insurance
programs are subject to disclosure in accordance with chapter 42.56
RCW.
(3) In accordance with chapter 42.56 RCW, bargaining groups
representing local government employees shall have reasonable access to
information concerning the experience and performance of any health and
welfare benefits program established for the benefit of such employees.
(4) No self-insurance program governed by this chapter is able to
define the terms under which an entity complies with the public records
act, chapter 42.56 RCW. No self-insurance program governed by this
chapter may cancel or threaten to cancel insurance coverage based upon
an entity's decision, in consultation with its attorneys, to release
public records, including attorney communications, in compliance with
the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---