BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
School districts are prohibited from advertising, marketing, and
otherwise providing unsolicited information about learning programs
offered by the school district, including but not limited to digital
learning programs, part-time enrollment opportunities, and other
alternative learning programs, to students and their parents who have
filed a declaration of intent to cause a child to receive home-based
instruction under RCW 28A.200.010. School districts may respond to
requests for information that are initiated by a parent. This section
does not apply to general mailings or newsletters sent by the school
district to all households in the district.

--- END ---