BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.410 and 2007 c 27 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) RCW 49.17.400 through 49.17.430 apply to cranes used with or
without attachments.
(2) RCW 49.17.400 through 49.17.430 do not apply to:
(a) A crane while it has been converted or adapted for a
nonhoisting or nonlifting use including, but not limited to, power
shovels, excavators, and concrete pumps;
(b) Power shovels, excavators, wheel loaders, backhoes, loader
backhoes, and track loaders when used with or without chains, slings,
or other rigging to lift suspended loads;
(c) Automotive wreckers and tow trucks when used to clear wrecks
and haul vehicles;
(d)(i) Service trucks with mobile lifting devices designed
specifically for use in the power line and electric service industries,
such as digger derricks (radial boom derricks), when used in the power
line and electric service industries for auguring holes to set power
and utility poles, or handling associated materials to be installed or
removed from utility poles;
(ii) Service trucks with mobile lifting devices designed
specifically for use in the telecommunications industry, such as digger
derricks (radial boom derricks), when used in the telecommunications
industry for auguring holes to set utility poles, or handling
associated materials to be installed or removed from utility poles, to
the extent the exemption is not in conflict with standards adopted or
recognized under the authority of the occupational safety and health
act of 1970 (P.L. 91-956; 84 Stat. 1590) as determined by the
department by rule;
(e) Equipment originally designed as vehicle-mounted aerial devices
(for lifting personnel) and self-propelled elevating work platforms;
(f) Hydraulic jacking systems, including telescopic/hydraulic
gantries;
(g) Stacker cranes;
(h) Powered industrial trucks (forklifts);
(i) Mechanic's truck with a hoisting device when used in activities
related to equipment maintenance and repair;
(j) Equipment that hoists by using a come-along or chainfall;
(k) Dedicated drilling rigs;
(l) Gin poles used for the erection of communication towers;
(m) Tree trimming and tree removal work;
(n) Anchor handling with a vessel or barge using an affixed A-frame;
(o) Roustabouts;
(p) Cranes used on-site in manufacturing facilities or powerhouses
for occasional or routine maintenance and repair work; and
(q) Crane operators operating cranes on-site in manufacturing
facilities or powerhouses for occasional or routine maintenance and
repair work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---