BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a significant
number of property owners have been prevented from starting the
production of renewable energy as envisioned in and permitted by
chapter 300, Laws of 2005 due to inaction by boards of directors, or
restraints included in documents governing homeowners', apartment, and
condominium associations. The visual impact of solar collectors on
roofs is similar to skylights. The legislature finds that production
of renewable energy is a national security priority as well as a
significant contributor to the reduction of global climate change. The
legislature intends to remove unnecessary constraints on property
owners who are willing to contribute their personal resources toward
these global, national, and statewide priorities.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.32.010 and 2008 c 114 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Apartment" means a part of the property intended for any type
of independent use, including one or more rooms or spaces located on
one or more floors (or part or parts thereof) in a building, or if not
in a building, a separately delineated place of storage or moorage of
a boat, plane, or motor vehicle, regardless of whether it is destined
for a residence, an office, storage or moorage of a boat, plane, or
motor vehicle, the operation of any industry or business, or for any
other use not prohibited by law, and which has a direct exit to a
public street or highway, or to a common area leading to such street or
highway. The boundaries of an apartment located in a building are the
interior surfaces of the perimeter walls, floors, ceilings, windows and
doors thereof, and the apartment includes both the portions of the
building so described and the air space so encompassed. If the
apartment is a separately delineated place of storage or moorage of a
boat, plane, or motor vehicle the boundaries are those specified in the
declaration. In interpreting declarations, deeds, and plans, the
existing physical boundaries of the apartment as originally constructed
or as reconstructed in substantial accordance with the original plans
thereof shall be conclusively presumed to be its boundaries rather than
the metes and bounds expressed or depicted in the declaration, deed or
plan, regardless of settling or lateral movement of the building and
regardless of minor variance between boundaries shown in the
declaration, deed, or plan and those of apartments in the building.
(2) "Apartment owner" means the person or persons owning an
apartment, as herein defined, in fee simple absolute or qualified, by
way of leasehold or by way of a periodic estate, or in any other manner
in which real property may be owned, leased or possessed in this state,
together with an undivided interest in a like estate of the common
areas and facilities in the percentage specified and established in the
declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended.
(3) "Apartment number" means the number, letter, or combination
thereof, designating the apartment in the declaration as duly recorded
or as it may be lawfully amended.
(4) "Association of apartment owners" or "association" means all of
the apartment owners acting as a group in accordance with the bylaws
and with the declaration as it is duly recorded or as they may be
lawfully amended, or the board of directors or manager acting on behalf
of the apartment owners.
(5) "Board of directors" or "manager" means the individual or body,
regardless of name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the
association.
(6) "Building" means a building, containing two or more apartments,
or two or more buildings each containing one or more apartments, and
comprising a part of the property.
(((6))) (7) "Common areas and facilities", unless otherwise
provided in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully
amended, includes:
(a) The land on which the building is located;
(b) The foundations, columns, girders, beams, supports, main walls,
roofs, halls, corridors, lobbys, stairs, stairways, fire escapes, and
entrances and exits of the building;
(c) The basements, yards, gardens, parking areas and storage
spaces;
(d) The premises for the lodging of janitors or persons in charge
of the property;
(e) The installations of central services such as power, light,
gas, hot and cold water, heating, refrigeration, air conditioning and
incinerating;
(f) The elevators, tanks, pumps, motors, fans, compressors, ducts
and in general all apparatus and installations existing for common use;
(g) Such community and commercial facilities as may be provided for
in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended;
(h) All other parts of the property necessary or convenient to its
existence, maintenance and safety, or normally in common use.
(((7))) (8) "Common expenses" include:
(a) All sums lawfully assessed against the apartment owners by the
association of apartment owners;
(b) Expenses of administration, maintenance, repair, or replacement
of the common areas and facilities;
(c) Expenses agreed upon as common expenses by the association of
apartment owners;
(d) Expenses declared common expenses by the provisions of this
chapter, or by the declaration as it is duly recorded, or by the
bylaws, or as they may be lawfully amended.
(((8))) (9) "Common profits" means the balance of all income,
rents, profits and revenues from the common areas and facilities
remaining after the deduction of the common expenses.
(((9))) (10) "Declaration" means the instrument by which the
property is submitted to provisions of this chapter, as hereinafter
provided, and as it may be, from time to time, lawfully amended.
(((10))) (11) "Governing documents" means the bylaws, declaration,
rules and regulations of the association of apartment owners, or other
written instrument by which the association has authority to exercise
any of the powers provided for in this chapter or to manage, maintain,
or otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.
(12) "Land" means the material of the earth, whatever may be the
ingredients of which it is composed, whether soil, rock, or other
substance, whether or not submerged, and includes free or occupied
space for an indefinite distance upwards as well as downwards, subject
to limitations upon the use of airspace imposed, and rights in the use
of the airspace granted, by the laws of this state or of the United
States.
(((11))) (13) "Limited common areas and facilities" includes those
common areas and facilities designated in the declaration, as it is
duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, as reserved for use of
certain apartment or apartments to the exclusion of the other
apartments.
(((12))) (14) "Majority" or "majority of apartment owners" means
the apartment owners with fifty-one percent or more of the votes in
accordance with the percentages assigned in the declaration, as duly
recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, to the apartments for voting
purposes.
(((13))) (15) "Person" includes any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, trustee, or other legal entity.
(((14))) (16) "Property" means the land, the building, all
improvements and structures thereon, all owned in fee simple absolute
or qualified, by way of leasehold or by way of a periodic estate, or in
any other manner in which real property may be owned, leased or
possessed in this state, and all easements, rights and appurtenances
belonging thereto, none of which shall be considered as a security or
security interest, and all articles of personalty intended for use in
connection therewith, which have been or are intended to be submitted
to the provisions of this chapter.
(((15))) (17) "Percent of the apartment owners" means the apartment
owners with the stated percent or more of the votes in accordance with
the percentages assigned in the declaration, as duly recorded or as it
may be lawfully amended, to the apartments for voting purposes.
(18) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements which rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
including, but not limited to, any substance or device which collects
sunlight for use in:
(a) The heating or cooling of a structure or building;
(b) The heating or pumping of water;
(c) Industrial, commercial, or agricultural processes; or
(d) The generation of electricity.
A solar energy system may be used for purposes in addition to the
collection of solar energy. These uses include, but are not limited
to, serving as a structural member or part of a roof of a building or
structure and serving as a window or wall.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The association may not impair the
ability of an apartment owner to install, construct, maintain, or use
a solar energy system on his or her apartment.
(2) Any provision in the governing documents that impairs the
ability of an apartment owner to install, construct, maintain, or use
a solar energy system on his or her apartment is void and
unenforceable.
(3) If the governing documents require the association to approve
the installation or use of a solar energy system, the application for
approval must be processed and approved by the association in the same
manner as an application for an architectural modification to the
property, and application processing may not be willfully avoided or
delayed with the purpose of unreasonably preventing installation or use
of the solar energy system.
(4) Treatment of solar energy systems in the governing documents
must be reasonable when compared to the manner in which comparable
systems are treated in the same governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An act of the association or provision in
the governing documents is deemed to impair the installation,
construction, maintenance, or use of a solar energy system if it:
(1) Unreasonably delays or prevents installation, construction,
maintenance, or use;
(2) Unreasonably increases the cost of installation, construction,
maintenance, or use;
(3) Decreases designed energy production by more than five percent;
or
(4) Precludes the use of a solar energy system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any fee or cost imposed on an apartment
owner by the association is deemed unreasonable if it is not reasonable
in comparison to the fees or costs charged by the local government
jurisdiction for the permit processing of similar systems or the value
derived from system use.

Sec. 6 RCW 64.34.020 and 2008 c 115 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the declaration and bylaws, unless specifically provided
otherwise or the context requires otherwise, and in this chapter:
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who controls, is controlled by, or
is under common control with the referenced person. A person
"controls" another person if the person: (a) Is a general partner,
officer, director, or employer of the referenced person; (b) directly
or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or
through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to
vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent of the
voting interest in the referenced person; (c) controls in any manner
the election of a majority of the directors of the referenced person;
or (d) has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the
referenced person. A person "is controlled by" another person if the
other person: (i) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer
of the person; (ii) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with
one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns,
controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more
than twenty percent of the voting interest in the person; (iii)
controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of
the person; or (iv) has contributed more than twenty percent of the
capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described
in this subsection are held solely as security for an obligation and
are not exercised.
(2) "Allocated interests" means the undivided interest in the
common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the
association allocated to each unit.
(3) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable by the association
against a unit including, without limitation: (a) Regular and special
assessments for common expenses, charges, and fines imposed by the
association; (b) interest and late charges on any delinquent account;
and (c) costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a
delinquent owner's account.
(4) "Association" or "unit owners' association" means the unit
owners' association organized under RCW 64.34.300, or the board of
directors acting on behalf of the unit owners.
(5) "Board of directors" means the body, regardless of name, with
primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.
(6) "Common elements" means all portions of a condominium other
than the units.
(7) "Common expenses" means expenditures made by or financial
liabilities of the association, together with any allocations to
reserves.
(8) "Common expense liability" means the liability for common
expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to RCW 64.34.224.
(9) "Condominium" means real property, portions of which are
designated for separate ownership and the remainder of which is
designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions.
Real property is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in
the common elements are vested in the unit owners, and unless a
declaration and a survey map and plans have been recorded pursuant to
this chapter.
(10) "Contribution rate" means, in a reserve study as described in
RCW 64.34.380, the amount contributed to the reserve account so that
the association will have cash reserves to pay major maintenance,
repair, or replacement costs without the need of a special assessment.
(11) "Conversion condominium" means a condominium (a) that at any
time before creation of the condominium was lawfully occupied wholly or
partially by a tenant or subtenant for residential purposes pursuant to
a rental agreement, oral or written, express or implied, for which the
tenant or subtenant had not received the notice described in (b) of
this subsection; or (b) that, at any time within twelve months before
the conveyance of, or acceptance of an agreement to convey, any unit
therein other than to a declarant or any affiliate of a declarant, was
lawfully occupied wholly or partially by a residential tenant of a
declarant or an affiliate of a declarant and such tenant was not
notified in writing, prior to lawfully occupying a unit or executing a
rental agreement, whichever event first occurs, that the unit was part
of a condominium and subject to sale. "Conversion condominium" shall
not include a condominium in which, before July 1, 1990, any unit
therein had been conveyed or been made subject to an agreement to
convey to any transferee other than a declarant or an affiliate of a
declarant.
(12) "Conveyance" means any transfer of the ownership of a unit,
including a transfer by deed or by real estate contract and, with
respect to a unit in a leasehold condominium, a transfer by lease or
assignment thereof, but shall not include a transfer solely for
security.
(13) "Dealer" means a person who, together with such person's
affiliates, owns or has a right to acquire either six or more units in
a condominium or fifty percent or more of the units in a condominium
containing more than two units.
(14) "Declarant" means:
(a) Any person who executes as declarant a declaration as defined
in subsection (16) of this section; or
(b) Any person who reserves any special declarant right in the
declaration; or
(c) Any person who exercises special declarant rights or to whom
special declarant rights are transferred; or
(d) Any person who is the owner of a fee interest in the real
property which is subjected to the declaration at the time of the
recording of an instrument pursuant to RCW 64.34.316 and who directly
or through one or more affiliates is materially involved in the
construction, marketing, or sale of units in the condominium created by
the recording of the instrument.
(15) "Declarant control" means the right of the declarant or
persons designated by the declarant to appoint and remove officers and
members of the board of directors, or to veto or approve a proposed
action of the board or association, pursuant to RCW 64.34.308 (4) or
(5).
(16) "Declaration" means the document, however denominated, that
creates a condominium by setting forth the information required by RCW
64.34.216 and any amendments to that document.
(17) "Development rights" means any right or combination of rights
reserved by a declarant in the declaration to: (a) Add real property
or improvements to a condominium; (b) create units, common elements, or
limited common elements within real property included or added to a
condominium; (c) subdivide units or convert units into common elements;
(d) withdraw real property from a condominium; or (e) reallocate
limited common elements with respect to units that have not been
conveyed by the declarant.
(18) "Dispose" or "disposition" means a voluntary transfer or
conveyance to a purchaser or lessee of any legal or equitable interest
in a unit, but does not include the transfer or release of a security
interest.
(19) "Effective age" means the difference between useful life and
remaining useful life.
(20) "Eligible mortgagee" means the holder of a mortgage on a unit
that has filed with the secretary of the association a written request
that it be given copies of notices of any action by the association
that requires the consent of mortgagees.
(21) "Foreclosure" means a forfeiture or judicial or nonjudicial
foreclosure of a mortgage or a deed in lieu thereof.
(22) "Fully funded balance" means the value of the deteriorated
portion of all the reserve components. The fully funded balance for
each reserve component is calculated by multiplying the current
replacement cost of that reserve component by its effective age, then
dividing the result by that reserve component's useful life. The sum
total of all reserve components' fully funded balances is the
association's fully funded balance.
(23) "Governing documents" means the bylaws, declaration of
covenants, conditions, and restrictions, rules and regulations of the
association, or other written instrument by which the association has
authority to exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter or
to manage, maintain, or otherwise affect the property under its
jurisdiction.
(24) "Identifying number" means the designation of each unit in a
condominium.
(((24))) (25) "Leasehold condominium" means a condominium in which
all or a portion of the real property is subject to a lease, the
expiration or termination of which will terminate the condominium or
reduce its size.
(((25))) (26) "Limited common element" means a portion of the
common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of RCW
64.34.204 (2) or (4) for the exclusive use of one or more but fewer
than all of the units.
(((26))) (27) "Master association" means an organization described
in RCW 64.34.276, whether or not it is also an association described in
RCW 64.34.300.
(((27))) (28) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, deed of trust or real
estate contract.
(((28))) (29) "Person" means a natural person, corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, trust, governmental subdivision or
agency, or other legal entity.
(((29))) (30) "Purchaser" means any person, other than a declarant
or a dealer, who by means of a disposition acquires a legal or
equitable interest in a unit other than (a) a leasehold interest,
including renewal options, of less than twenty years at the time of
creation of the unit, or (b) as security for an obligation.
(((30))) (31) "Real property" means any fee, leasehold or other
estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures,
fixtures, and other improvements thereon and easements, rights and
interests appurtenant thereto which by custom, usage, or law pass with
a conveyance of land although not described in the contract of sale or
instrument of conveyance. "Real property" includes parcels, with or
without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with
air or water.
(((31))) (32) "Remaining useful life" means the estimated time, in
years, that a reserve component can be expected to continue to serve
its intended function.
(((32))) (33) "Replacement cost" means the current cost of
replacing, repairing, or restoring a reserve component to its original
functional condition.
(((33))) (34) "Residential purposes" means use for dwelling or
recreational purposes, or both.
(((34))) (35) "Reserve components" means common elements whose cost
of maintenance, repair, or replacement is infrequent, significant, and
impractical to include in an annual budget.
(((35))) (36) "Reserve study professional" means an independent
person suitably qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or
education to prepare a reserve study in accordance with RCW 64.34.380
and 64.34.382.
(((36))) (37) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements which rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source including, but not limited to, any substance or device which
collects sunlight for use in:
(a) The heating or cooling of a structure or building;
(b) The heating or pumping of water;
(c) Industrial, commercial, or agricultural processes; or
(d) The generation of electricity.
A solar energy system may be used for purposes in addition to the
collection of solar energy. These uses include, but are not limited
to, serving as a structural member or part of a roof of a building or
structure and serving as a window or wall.
(38) "Special declarant rights" means rights reserved for the
benefit of a declarant to: (a) Complete improvements indicated on
survey maps and plans filed with the declaration under RCW 64.34.232;
(b) exercise any development right under RCW 64.34.236; (c) maintain
sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the condominium,
and models under RCW 64.34.256; (d) use easements through the common
elements for the purpose of making improvements within the condominium
or within real property which may be added to the condominium under RCW
64.34.260; (e) make the condominium part of a larger condominium or a
development under RCW 64.34.280; (f) make the condominium subject to a
master association under RCW 64.34.276; or (g) appoint or remove any
officer of the association or any master association or any member of
the board of directors, or to veto or approve a proposed action of the
board or association, during any period of declarant control under RCW
64.34.308(4).
(((37))) (39) "Timeshare" shall have the meaning specified in the
timeshare act, RCW 64.36.010(11).
(((38))) (40) "Unit" means a physical portion of the condominium
designated for separate ownership, the boundaries of which are
described pursuant to RCW 64.34.216(1)(d). "Separate ownership"
includes leasing a unit in a leasehold condominium under a lease that
expires contemporaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination
of which will remove the unit from the condominium.
(((39))) (41) "Unit owner" means a declarant or other person who
owns a unit or leases a unit in a leasehold condominium under a lease
that expires simultaneously with any lease, the expiration or
termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium, but
does not include a person who has an interest in a unit solely as
security for an obligation. "Unit owner" means the vendee, not the
vendor, of a unit under a real estate contract.
(((40))) (42) "Useful life" means the estimated time, in years,
that a reserve component can be expected to serve its intended
function.

Sec. 7 RCW 64.34.240 and 1989 c 43 s 2-111 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions
of law, a unit owner:
(1) May make any improvements or alterations to the owner's unit
that do not affect the structural integrity or mechanical or electrical
systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium;
(2) May not change the appearance of the common elements or the
exterior appearance of a unit without permission of the association;
(3) After acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an
adjoining unit may, with approval of the board of directors, remove or
alter any intervening partition or create apertures therein, even if
the partition in whole or in part is a common element, if those acts do
not adversely affect the structural integrity or mechanical or
electrical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the
condominium. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this
subsection is not a relocation of boundaries. The board of directors
shall approve a unit owner's request, which request shall include the
plans and specifications for the proposed removal or alteration, under
this subsection within thirty days, or within such other period
provided by the declaration, unless the proposed alteration does not
comply with this chapter or the declaration or impairs the structural
integrity or mechanical or electrical systems in the condominium. The
failure of the board of directors to act upon a request within such
period shall be deemed approval thereof;
(4) May install, construct, maintain, and use a solar energy system
on the owner's unit. If the governing documents require the
association to approve the installation or use of a solar energy
system, the application for approval must be processed and approved by
the association in the same manner as an application for an
architectural modification to the property, and application processing
may not be willfully avoided or delayed with the purpose of
unreasonably preventing installation or use of the solar energy system.

Sec. 8 RCW 64.34.304 and 2008 c 115 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and
subject to the provisions of the declaration, the association may:
(a) Adopt and amend bylaws, rules, and regulations;
(b) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and
reserves, and impose and collect assessments for common expenses from
unit owners;
(c) Hire and discharge or contract with managing agents and other
employees, agents, and independent contractors;
(d) Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative
proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more unit
owners on matters affecting the condominium;
(e) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
(f) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and
modification of common elements;
(g) Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the
common elements;
(h) Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right,
title, or interest to real or personal property, but common elements
may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest only pursuant to
RCW 64.34.348;
(i) Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or
over the common elements and petition for or consent to the vacation of
streets and alleys;
(j) Impose and collect any payments, fees, or charges for the use,
rental, or operation of the common elements, other than limited common
elements described in RCW 64.34.204 (2) and (4), and for services
provided to unit owners;
(k) Impose and collect charges for late payment of assessments
pursuant to RCW 64.34.364(13) and, after notice and an opportunity to
be heard by the board of directors or by such representative designated
by the board of directors and in accordance with such procedures as
provided in the declaration or bylaws or rules and regulations adopted
by the board of directors, levy reasonable fines in accordance with a
previously established schedule thereof adopted by the board of
directors and furnished to the owners for violations of the
declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association;
(l) Impose and collect reasonable charges for the preparation and
recording of amendments to the declaration, resale certificates
required by RCW 64.34.425, and statements of unpaid assessments;
(m) Provide for the indemnification of its officers and board of
directors and maintain directors' and officers' liability insurance;
(n) Assign its right to future income, including the right to
receive common expense assessments, but only to the extent the
declaration provides;
(o) Join in a petition for the establishment of a parking and
business improvement area, participate in the rate payers' board or
other advisory body set up by the legislative authority for operation
of a parking and business improvement area, and pay special assessments
levied by the legislative authority on a parking and business
improvement area encompassing the condominium property for activities
and projects which benefit the condominium directly or indirectly;
(p) Establish and administer a reserve account as described in RCW
64.34.380;
(q) Prepare a reserve study as described in RCW 64.34.380;
(r) Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or
bylaws;
(s) Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state
by the same type of corporation as the association; and
(t) Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the
governance and operation of the association.
(2) The declaration may not impose limitations on the power of the
association to deal with the declarant which are more restrictive than
the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with
other persons.
(3) The association may not impair the ability of a unit owner to
install, construct, maintain, or use a solar energy system on his or
her unit.
(a) An act of the association or provision in the governing
documents is deemed to impair the installation, construction,
maintenance, or use of a solar energy system if it:
(i) Unreasonably delays or prevents installation, construction,
maintenance, or use;
(ii) Unreasonably increases the cost of installation, construction,
maintenance, or use;
(iii) Decreases designed energy production by more than five
percent; or
(iv) Precludes the use of a solar energy system.
(b) Any fee or cost imposed on a unit owner by the association is
deemed unreasonable if it is not reasonable in comparison to the fees
or costs charged by the local government jurisdiction for the permit
processing of similar systems or the value derived from system use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any provision in the governing documents that impairs the
ability of a unit owner to install, construct, maintain, or use a solar
energy system on his or her unit is void and unenforceable.
(2) Treatment of solar energy systems in the governing documents
must be reasonable when compared to the manner in which comparable
systems are treated in the same governing documents.

Sec. 10 RCW 64.38.010 and 1995 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Homeowners' association" or "association" means a corporation,
unincorporated association, or other legal entity, each member of which
is an owner of residential real property located within the
association's jurisdiction, as described in the governing documents,
and by virtue of membership or ownership of property is obligated to
pay real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance costs, or for
improvement of real property other than that which is owned by the
member. "Homeowners' association" or "association" includes the board
of directors acting on behalf of the owners of residential real
property under this chapter, but does not mean an association created
under chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW.
(2) "Governing documents" means the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, plat, declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions,
rules and regulations of the association, or other written instrument
by which the association has the authority to exercise any of the
powers provided for in this chapter or to manage, maintain, or
otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.
(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the body, regardless of
name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.
(4) "Common areas" means property owned, or otherwise maintained,
repaired or administered by the association.
(5) "Common expense" means the costs incurred by the association to
exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter.
(6) "Residential real property" means any real property, the use of
which is limited by law, covenant or otherwise to primarily residential
or recreational purposes.
(7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements which rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
including, but not limited to, any substance or device which collects
sunlight for use in:
(a) The heating or cooling of a structure or building;
(b) The heating or pumping of water;
(c) Industrial, commercial, or agricultural processes; or
(d) The generation of electricity.
A solar energy system may be used for purposes in addition to the
collection of solar energy. These uses include, but are not limited
to, serving as a structural member or part of a roof of a building or
structure and serving as a window or wall.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The association may not impair the
ability of an owner to install, construct, maintain, or use a solar
energy system on his or her property.
(2) Any provision in the governing documents that impairs the
ability of an owner to install, construct, maintain, or use a solar
energy system on his or her property is void and unenforceable.
(3) If the governing documents require the association to approve
the installation or use of a solar energy system, the application for
approval must be processed and approved by the association in the same
manner as an application for an architectural modification to the
property, and application processing may not be willfully avoided or
delayed with the purpose of unreasonably preventing installation or use
of the solar energy system.
(4) Treatment of solar energy systems in the governing documents
must be reasonable when compared to the manner in which comparable
systems are treated in the same governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 An act of the association or provision in
the governing documents is deemed to impair the installation,
construction, maintenance, or use of a solar energy system if it:
(1) Unreasonably delays or prevents installation, construction,
maintenance, or use;
(2) Unreasonably increases the cost of installation, construction,
maintenance, or use;
(3) Decreases designed energy production by more than five percent;
or
(4) Precludes the use of a solar energy system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Any fee or cost imposed on an owner by the
association is deemed unreasonable if it is not reasonable in
comparison to the fees or costs charged by the local government
jurisdiction for the permit processing of similar systems or the value
derived from system use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 3 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 64.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 11 through 13 of this act are each
added to chapter 64.38 RCW.

--- END ---