BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the school construction assistance grant program described and
authorized by the legislature in the capital appropriations acts for
the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal biennia, and all costs incidental
thereto, the state finance committee is authorized to issue general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of one hundred
thirty-three million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. If the state
finance committee deems it necessary to issue taxable bonds in order to
comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposits otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of financial management if it is determined that any such
transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified
in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the
issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section,
and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject
to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of this act, the state
treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in
the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state
finance committee to be due on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3
of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

Sec. 6 2008 c 328 s 5001 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (08-4-200)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) The legislature has made a commitment to phase in all-day
kindergarten programs beginning with the 2007-08 school year. However,
the legislature finds that one potential barrier to successful
expansion of all-day kindergarten programs may be a lack of facilities
that meet the requirements of an all-day kindergarten program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall examine
alternatives for addressing school facilities needs for all-day
kindergarten programs, including adapting existing unused space,
creating innovative public-private partnerships and partnerships with
early learning providers, shifting the location of current programs
within a district or a school, and temporary, limited use of portables.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
report to the capital budget committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by September 1, 2007,
with recommendations on preferred alternatives and an analysis of the
feasibility and cost of implementing the alternatives.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall review and evaluate the
cost and other implications of changing the current annual release
cycle for the school construction assistance program. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report
resulting from their review and evaluation by December 1, 2008. This
report must include a specific plan for implementing the change in the
2009-2011 biennium.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,394,000))
$152,394,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($769,185,000))
$639,185,000
Common School Reimbursable Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,495,689,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,287,448,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---