BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.010 and 2008 c 329 s 923 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.
(3) All hunters under the age of fourteen are required to be
accompanied by a person age eighteen or older who has satisfied the
requirement to complete a training course as provided in RCW 77.32.155,
or who is not required by the terms of RCW 77.32.155 to complete a
training course, when hunting on land owned by a public entity for wild
animals or wild birds. The accompanying adult hunter must stay within
a physical range that permits continual unaided visual and auditory
communication with the accompanied hunter.
(4) During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium to enable the implementation
of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter 329, Laws of
2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this
section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of
Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member identification
card shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this
section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.160 and 2000 c 107 s 237 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person is guilty of ((an)) a natural resources infraction, which
shall be cited and punished as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW, if the
person:
(1) Fails to immediately record a catch of fish or shellfish on a
catch record card required by RCW 77.32.430, or required by rule of the
commission under this title; ((or))
(2) Fishes for personal use using barbed hooks in violation of any
rule; ((or))
(3) Engages in unaccompanied hunting in violation of the minimum
age requirements established in RCW 77.32.010; or
(4) Violates any other rule of the commission or director that is
designated by rule as an infraction.

--- END ---