BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual recreating on public land where hunting is
allowed must wear hiker orange clothing during any department
authorized big game hunting season applicable to the land in question.
(2) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable under
RCW 77.15.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All public land where multiple recreational uses are allowed
must be posted with signage at all public trailheads during department
authorized big game hunting seasons notifying users of the requirements
of section 1 of this act.
(2) The department shall work with other public landowners or
managers to provide uniform signage and hunting season information as
necessary to comply with this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.160 and 2000 c 107 s 237 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person is guilty of an infraction, which shall be cited and
punished as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW, if the person:
(1) Fails to immediately record a catch of fish or shellfish on a
catch record card required by RCW 77.32.430, or required by rule of the
commission under this title; ((or))
(2) Fishes for personal use using barbed hooks in violation of any
rule; ((or))
(3) Fails to properly wear hiker orange clothing in violation of
section 1 of this act; or
(4) Violates any other rule of the commission or director that is
designated by rule as an infraction.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.08.010 and 2008 c 277 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title or
rules adopted under this title unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(2) "Aquatic invasive species" means any invasive, prohibited,
regulated, unregulated, or unlisted aquatic animal or plant species as
defined under subsections (((48) through (53))) (3), (26), (35), (39),
(52), and (53) of this section, aquatic noxious weeds as defined under
RCW 17.26.020(5)(c), and aquatic nuisance species as defined under RCW
77.60.130(1).
(3) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed, partially
submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species that grows
in or near a body of water or wetland.
(4) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(5) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(6) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(7) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(8) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(9) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(10) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(11) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(12) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(13) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(14) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(15) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(16) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(17) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(18) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(19) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(20) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(21) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(22) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(24) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(25) "Hiker orange clothing" means a minimum of four hundred square
inches of fluorescent orange exterior clothing worn above the waist and
visible from all sides.
(26) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(((26))) (27) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(((27))) (28) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a
license limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(((28))) (29) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled
the qualifications of a resident.
(((29))) (30) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific
Ocean outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the
marine waters of other states and countries.
(((30))) (31) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking,
and places or waters established by rule of the commission for the
lawful hunting, fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game
birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special
restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the
commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish,
take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission. "Open season"
includes the first and last days of the established time.
(((31))) (32) "Person" means and includes an individual; a
corporation; a public or private entity or organization; a local,
state, or federal agency; all business organizations, including
corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals
acting with a common purpose whether acting in an individual,
representative, or official capacity.
(((32))) (33) "Personal use" means for the private use of the
individual taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(((33))) (34) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(((34))) (35) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive
species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited
aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((35))) (36) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(((36))) (37) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing
an individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars
each and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access
to hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(((37))) (38) "Recreational and commercial watercraft" includes the
boat, as well as equipment used to transport the boat, and any
auxiliary equipment such as attached or detached outboard motors.
(((38))) (39) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a
potentially invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been
classified as a regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((39))) (40) "Resident" means:
(a) A person who has maintained a permanent place of abode within
the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an application
for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to continue
residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state; and
(b) A person age eighteen or younger who does not qualify as a
resident under (a) of this subsection, but who has a parent that
qualifies as a resident under (a) of this subsection.
(((40))) (41) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially
harvested salmon, crab, and sturgeon.
(((41))) (42) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of
river mouths.
(((42))) (43) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(((43))) (44) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(((44))) (45) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and
freshwater invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not
be taken except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term
"shellfish" includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of
shellfish species.
(((45))) (46) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh
waters within ordinary high water lines and within the territorial
boundaries of the state.
(((46))) (47) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their
derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or
shellfish.
(((47))) (48) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to
kill, injure, capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(((48))) (49) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or
preserving fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(((49))) (50) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of
hunting using devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(((50))) (51) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage,
or engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife,
or deleterious exotic wildlife.
(((51))) (52) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative
animal species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated
aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((52))) (53) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a
nonnative animal species that has been classified as an unregulated
aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((53))) (54) "Wild animals" means those species of the class
Mammalia whose members exist in Washington in a wild state and the
species Rana catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not
include feral domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family
Muridae of the order Rodentia.
(((54))) (55) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves
whose members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(((55))) (56) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom
whose members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but
is not limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(((56))) (57) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing
and under sixteen years old for hunting.

--- END ---