BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If any person or government agency fails to follow the
requirement of obtaining a hydraulic project approval under this
chapter for a specific project, the department may issue an order to
that person or government agency requiring the person or government
agency to:
(a) Stop work on any or all of the activities subject to the
hydraulic project approval;
(b) Correct or to restore the nonconforming site; or
(c) Both stop work and correct or restore the nonconforming site.
(2) Unless the department extends by rule the maximum time for
filing, a person receiving an order from the department under this
section may file a written petition with the department appealing the
order within twenty days of service of the order. The filed petition
must be treated as an application for an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW. In the event of an appeal, a person or government
agency may seek interim relief from an order under this section as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) This section only applies to instances when the person or
government agency fails to apply for a hydraulic project approval.
This section does not apply to a person or government agency that fails
to carry out any of the requirements or conditions of a hydraulic
project approval issued under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Failure to obtain a hydraulic project approval under this
chapter for a specific project and failure to abide by any stop work or
correction order issued under section 1 of this act may, as an
alternative to the penalties assigned in RCW 77.15.300, be cited by the
department as a civil infraction to be punished as a natural resource
infraction as provided by chapter 7.84 RCW. Each day a project
progresses without obtaining a hydraulic project approval or in
violation of a stop work order represents an individual citable
violation. Any fines issued under this section are supplemental to any
remedies provided by section 1 of this act.
(2) This section only applies to instances when the person or
government agency fails to apply for a hydraulic project approval or
fails to abide by an order issued under section 1 of this act. This
section does not apply to a person or government agency that fails to
carry out any of the requirements or conditions of a hydraulic project
approval issued under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.291 and 2005 c 146 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may levy civil penalties of up to one hundred
dollars per day for violation of any provisions of RCW 77.55.021
relating to the failure of the approval holder to carry out any of the
requirements or conditions of a hydraulic project approval issued under
this chapter. The penalty provided shall be imposed by notice in
writing, either by certified mail or personal service to the person
incurring the penalty, from the director or the director's designee
describing the violation.
(2) Any person incurring any penalty under this ((chapter)) section
may appeal the same under chapter 34.05 RCW to the director. Appeals
shall be filed within thirty days of receipt of notice imposing any
penalty.
(3) The penalty imposed shall become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of a notice imposing the penalty unless an appeal is
filed. Whenever an appeal of any penalty incurred under this chapter
is filed, the penalty shall become due and payable only upon completion
of all review proceedings and the issuance of a final order confirming
the penalty in whole or in part.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid within thirty days
after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon the
request of the director, shall bring an action in the name of the state
of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or of any county
in which such violator may do business, to recover ((such)) the
penalty. In all ((such)) actions under this section, the procedure and
rules of evidence shall be the same as an ordinary civil action. All
penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the state's
general fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities if the person constructs any form of hydraulic project or
performs other work on a hydraulic project and:
(a) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for ((such)) the construction or work; ((or))
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for ((such)) the construction or work; or
(c) Violates a stop work or correction order issued under section
1 of this act.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---