BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.210 and 2000 c 107 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or
utilities in the property.
(3) Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie below lands
owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered for lease by
the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14 RCW with the
proceeds being deposited in the state wildlife ((fund: PROVIDED,
That)) account created in RCW 77.12.170. The commissioner of public
lands shall condition ((such)) leases ((at the request of the
department)) entered into under this section to protect wildlife and
its habitat, at the request of the department.
(4) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department,
the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public
interest.
(5) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(6) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170.
(7) If any undeveloped real property owned, leased, held, or
managed by the department is not available for any specific type of
public access or recreation for more than three consecutive weeks, a
sign indicating the land's closed status must be located in an obvious
location on the land and contain a reference to the relevant state law
or administrative rule supporting that land's closure.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.10.210 and 2003 c 334 s 539 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing increased continuity in the
management of public lands and of facilitating long range planning by
interested agencies, the department is authorized to identify and to
withdraw from all conflicting uses at such times and for such periods
as it shall determine appropriate, limited acreages of public lands
under its jurisdiction.
(2) Acreages ((so)) withdrawn under this section shall be
maintained for the benefit of the public and, in particular, of the
public schools, colleges, and universities, as areas in which may be
observed, studied, enjoyed, or otherwise utilized the natural
ecological systems ((thereon)) on the land, whether ((such)) the
systems be unique or typical to the state of Washington.
(3) Nothing ((herein)) in this section is intended to or shall
modify the department's obligation to manage the land under its
jurisdiction in the best interests of the beneficiaries of granted
trust lands.
(4) If, in the administration of this section, any land owned,
leased, held, or managed by the department is not available for any
specific type of public access or recreation for more than three
consecutive weeks, a sign indicating the land's closed status must be
located in an obvious location on the land and contain a reference to
the relevant state law or administrative rule supporting that land's
closure.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.10.125 and 2003 c 334 s 371 and 2003 c 182 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all state lands
((hereafter)) leased for grazing or agricultural purposes shall be open
and available to the public for purposes of hunting and fishing, and
for nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the board of
natural resources((, unless closed)).
(2) Leased lands may be closed to public entry because ((of)):
(a) There is a fire hazard ((or unless));
(b) The department ((gives)) has given prior written approval and
the area is lawfully posted by the lessee to prohibit hunting and
fishing, and nonconsumptive wildlife activities((, thereon)) in order
to prevent damage to crops or other land cover, to improvements on the
land, to livestock, to the lessee, or to the general public((,)); or
(c) Closure is necessary to avoid undue interference with carrying
forward a departmental or agency program.
(3) In the event any ((such)) lands are ((so)) posted as closed
under this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to hunt or
fish, or pursue nonconsumptive wildlife activities, on any ((such)) of
the posted lands. ((Such)) Posted lands shall not be open and
available for wildlife activities when access could endanger crops on
the land or when access could endanger the person accessing the land.
(4) Any lands closed to any specific type of public access or
recreation for more than three consecutive weeks under this section
must be posted with a sign indicating the land's closed status located
in an obvious location on the land and containing a reference to the
relevant state law or administrative rule supporting that land's
closure.
(5) The department shall insert the provisions of this section in
all new grazing and agricultural leases.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.71.070 and 1991 c 352 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a management plan for each
designated area. The plan shall identify the significant resources to
be conserved consistent with the purposes of this chapter and identify
the areas with potential for low-impact public and environmental
educational uses. ((The plan))
(2) Plans developed under this section shall specify what types of
management activities and public uses that are permitted, consistent
with the conservation purposes of this chapter.
(3) The department shall make ((such)) plans developed under this
section available for review and comment by the public and other state,
tribal, and local agencies, prior to final approval by the
commissioner.
(4) If the plan for an area results in the area being unavailable
for any specific type of public access or recreation for more than
three consecutive weeks, a sign indicating the land's closed status
must be located in an obvious location on the land and contain a
reference to the relevant state law or administrative rule supporting
that land's closure.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.05.305 and 1984 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that it is the continuing policy of
the state of Washington to set aside and manage certain lands within
the state for public park purposes. To comply with public park
purposes, these lands shall be acquired and managed to:
(((1))) (a) Maintain and enhance ecological, aesthetic, and
recreational purposes;
(((2))) (b) Preserve and maintain mature and old-growth forests
containing trees of over ninety years and other unusual ecosystems as
natural forests or natural areas, which may also be used for
interpretive purposes;
(((3))) (c) Protect cultural and historical resources, locations,
and artifacts, which may also be used for interpretive purposes;
(((4))) (d) Provide a variety of recreational opportunities to the
public, including but not limited to use of developed recreation areas,
trails, and natural areas;
(((5))) (e) Preserve and maintain habitat which will protect and
promote endangered, threatened, and sensitive plants, and endangered,
threatened, and sensitive animal species; and
(((6))) (f) Encourage public participation in the formulation and
implementation of park policies and programs.
(2) If, in the administration of this section, any land owned,
leased, held, or managed by the commission is unavailable for any
specific type of public access or recreation for more than three
consecutive weeks, a sign indicating the land's closed status must be
located in an obvious location on the land and contain a reference to
the relevant state law or administrative rule supporting that land's
closure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies prospectively only. Any
land impacted by this act that is signed as closed to access on the
effective date of this section is not required to meet the requirements
of this act until the signs on the land are updated or replaced.
Nothing in this act requires any agency of state government to increase
or change their existing sign update, replacement, or removal
schedules.

--- END ---