BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.56.010 and 1965 c 8 s 43.56.010 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint three ((suitable)) qualified persons
((as a board of commissioners)) to serve on the Washington state
uniform law commission for the promotion of uniformity of legislation
in the United States. ((Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by
appointment by the governor.)) A qualified person is a resident of the
state of Washington and a member of the state bar association of this
or another state, who is or has been a judge, law professor,
legislator, or practicing attorney.
(2) In addition to the members of the commission appointed pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, the governor may appoint to the
commission any person who has served at least twenty years on the
commission and who is a life member in the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws or its successor.
(3) In addition to the members of the commission appointed pursuant
to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the code reviser shall
serve as a member of the commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.56.020 and 1965 c 8 s 43.56.020 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((board)) commission shall ((examine the subjects of
marriage and divorce, insolvency, the descent and distribution of
property, the execution and probate of wills, and other subjects upon
which uniformity of legislation in the various states is desirable, but
which are outside of the jurisdiction of the congress of the United
States)) identify areas of the law in which (a) uniformity in the laws
among the states and other jurisdictions is desirable and practicable
and (b)(i) the congress of the United States lacks jurisdiction to act
or (ii) it is preferable that the several states enact the laws.
((It)) (2) The commissioners, at the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws or its successor, shall confer upon
these matters with the commissioners appointed by other states for the
same purpose and shall consider and draft uniform laws to be submitted
for approval and adoption by the several states((;)).
(3) The commission shall propose to the governor and to the
legislature for approval and adoption the uniform acts developed with
the other commissioners and generally devise and recommend such other
and further courses of action as shall accomplish such uniformity.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.56.040 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 118 are each
amended to read as follows:
No member of the ((board)) commission shall receive any
compensation for ((his)) services, but each member shall be paid travel
expenses incurred in the discharge of official duty in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 ((as now existing or hereafter amended)),
after the account thereof has been audited by the ((board)) commission.
The ((board)) commission shall keep a full account of its
expenditures and shall report it in each report. ((There shall be
allowed such)) The commission shall allow expenses for only one
((annual)) meeting of the ((board)) commission within this state each
year, and shall allow expenses for the members ((in attendance, not
oftener)) to attend, no more than once in each year, ((at)) any
conference of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state
laws, or its successor, outside of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 43.56.050 (Membership -- Code reviser) and
2001 c 205 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---