BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.04.020 and 1996 c 160 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the boundaries of lands between two or more adjoining
proprietors have been lost, or by time, accident or any other cause,
have become obscure, or uncertain, and the adjoining proprietors cannot
agree to establish the same, one or more of the adjoining proprietors
may bring a civil action in equity, in the superior court, for the
county in which such lands, or part of them are situated, and that
superior court, as a court of equity, may upon the complaint, order
such lost or uncertain boundaries to be erected and established and
properly marked.
(2) The superior court may order the parties to utilize mediation
before the civil action is allowed to proceed.
(3) In an action brought under this section, the superior court may
grant injunctive relief or other temporary restraining orders to
prevent the removal of, or damages to, property located on the portion
of land that is in dispute. The court may grant such relief whether or
not the parties are required to utilize mediation before the civil
action is allowed to proceed. The court may also grant such relief
without the requesting party being required to post bond if the court
finds there exists a likelihood that the requesting party will prevail
on the merits of the action brought under this section. The court
shall require a party who violates the order for injunctive relief or
temporary restraining order to pay damages to the injured party.
Nothing in this subsection impairs, modifies, or supplants any other
remedy available at law or equity.

--- END ---