BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.150 and 2006 c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may accept gifts, other than
those specified in subsection((s)) (2) ((and (5))) of this section((,
with an aggregate value in excess of fifty dollars from a single source
in a calendar year or a single gift from multiple sources with a value
in excess of fifty dollars. For purposes of this section, "single
source" means any person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010, whether acting
directly or through any agent or other intermediary, and "single gift"
includes any event, item, or group of items used in conjunction with
each other or any trip including transportation, lodging, and attendant
costs, not excluded from the definition of gift under RCW 42.52.010.
The value of gifts given to an officer's or employee's family member or
guest shall be attributed to the official or employee for the purpose
of determining whether the limit has been exceeded, unless an
independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the
donor and the family member or guest)).
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
following items are presumed not to influence under RCW 42.52.140, and
may be accepted without ((regard to the limit established by))
violating subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;
(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(d) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(e) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(f) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(g) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for deposit in the legislative international trade account
created in RCW ((44.04.270)) 43.15.050;
(h) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for the purpose of promoting the expansion of tourism as
provided for in RCW 43.330.090;
(i) ((Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, solicited on behalf of a national
legislative association, 2006 official conference of the national
lieutenant governors' association, or host committee for the purpose of
hosting an official conference under the circumstances specified in RCW
42.52.820 and section 2, chapter 5, Laws of 2006. Anything solicited
or accepted may only be received by the national association or host
committee and may not be commingled with any funds or accounts that are
the property of any person;
(j))) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(((k))) (j) Unsolicited gifts from dignitaries from another state
or a foreign country that are intended to be personal in nature.
(3) The presumption in subsection (2) of this section is rebuttable
and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving
and acceptance of the item.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection((s)) (2) ((and (5))) of this
section, a state officer or state employee of a regulatory agency or of
an agency that seeks to acquire goods or services who participates in
those regulatory or contractual matters may receive, accept, take, or
seek, directly or indirectly, only the following items from a person
regulated by the agency or from a person who seeks to provide goods or
services to the agency:
(a) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(b) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(c) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(f) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(g) Those items excluded from the definition of gift in RCW
42.52.010 except:
(i) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity;
(ii) Payments for seminars and educational programs sponsored by a
bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade,
or charitable association or institution; and
(iii) Flowers, plants, and floral arrangements.
(((5) A state officer or state employee may accept gifts in the
form of food and beverage on infrequent occasions in the ordinary
course of meals where attendance by the officer or employee is related
to the performance of official duties. Gifts in the form of food and
beverage that exceed fifty dollars on a single occasion shall be
reported as provided in chapter 42.17 RCW.))

--- END ---