BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All enlisted members of grade E1 through E4 of the Washington
national guard who reenlist after August 1, 2009, for a minimum period
of three years, shall be eligible for additional compensation from the
state of Washington in the form of a payment of the monthly premium for
the eligible member for a qualified premium-based health plan,
including dental services, provided for active duty service members,
national guard and reserve members, and other eligible persons. The
state of Washington shall select the qualified premium-based health
plan that applies pursuant to this section.
(2) This compensation described in subsection (1) of this section
shall be paid for the period of the reenlistment.

--- END ---