BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.270 and 2007 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall design and implement an innovation
partnership zone program through which the state will encourage and
support research institutions, workforce training organizations, and
globally competitive companies to work cooperatively in close
geographic proximity to create commercially viable products and jobs.
(2) The director shall designate innovation partnership zones on
the basis of the following criteria:
(a) Innovation partnership zones must have three types of
institutions operating within their boundaries, or show evidence of
planning and local partnerships that will lead to dense concentrations
of these institutions:
(i) Research capacity in the form of a university or community
college fostering commercially valuable research, nonprofit
institutions creating commercially applicable innovations, or a
national laboratory;
(ii) Dense proximity of globally competitive firms in a research-based industry or industries or of individual firms with innovation
strategies linked to (a)(i) of this subsection. A globally competitive
firm may be signified through international organization for
standardization 9000 or 1400 certification, or other recognized
evidence of international success; and
(iii) Training capacity either within the zone or readily
accessible to the zone. The training capacity requirement may be met
by the same institution as the research capacity requirement, to the
extent both are associated with an educational institution in the
proposed zone.
(b) The support of a local jurisdiction, a research institution, an
educational institution, an industry or cluster association, a
workforce development council, and an associate development
organization, port, or chamber of commerce;
(c) Identifiable boundaries for the zone within which the applicant
will concentrate efforts to connect innovative researchers,
entrepreneurs, investors, industry associations or clusters, and
training providers. The geographic area defined should lend itself to
a distinct identity and have the capacity to accommodate firm growth;
(d) The innovation partnership zone administrator must be an
economic development council, port, workforce development council,
city, or county.
(((2))) (3) With respect solely to the research capacity required
in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, the director may waive the
requirement that the research institution be located within the zone.
To be considered for such a waiver, an applicant must provide a
specific plan that demonstrates the research institution's unique
qualifications and suitability for the zone, and the types of jointly
executed activities that will be used to ensure ongoing, face-to-face
interaction and research collaboration among the zone's partners.
(4) On October 1st of each odd-numbered year, the director shall
designate innovation partnership zones on the basis of applications
that meet the legislative criteria, estimated economic impact of the
zone, evidence of forward planning for the zone, and other criteria as
recommended by the Washington state economic development commission.
Estimated economic impact must include evidence of anticipated private
investment, job creation, innovation, and commercialization. The
director shall require evidence that zone applicants will promote
commercialization, innovation, and collaboration among zone residents.
(((3))) (5) Innovation partnership zones are eligible for funds and
other resources as provided by the legislature or at the discretion of
the governor.
(((4))) (6) If the innovation partnership zone meets the other
requirements of the fund sources, then the zone is eligible for the
following funds relating to:
(a) The local infrastructure financing tools program;
(b) The sales and use tax for public facilities in rural counties;
and
(c) Job skills.
(((5))) (7) An innovation partnership zone shall be designated as
a zone for a four-year period. At the end of the four-year period, the
zone must reapply for the designation through the department.
(((6))) (8) If the director finds at any time after the initial
year of designation that an innovation partnership zone is failing to
meet the performance standards required in its contract with the
department, the director may withdraw such designation and cease state
funding of the zone.
(9) The department shall convene annual information sharing events
for innovation partnership zone administrators and other interested
parties.
(((7))) (10) An innovation partnership zone shall provide
performance measures as required by the director, including but not
limited to private investment measures, job creation measures, and
measures of innovation such as licensing of ideas in research
institutions, patents, or other recognized measures of innovation.
(11) The department shall compile a biennial report on the
innovation partnership zone program by December 1st of every even-numbered year. The report shall provide information for each zone on
its: Objectives; funding, tax incentives, and other support obtained
from public sector sources; major activities; partnerships; performance
measures; and outcomes achieved since the inception of the zone or
since the previous biennial report. The Washington state economic
development commission shall review ((annually the individual
innovation partnership zone's performance measures and make
recommendations to the department regarding additional zone designation
criteria)) the department's draft report and make recommendations on
ways to increase the effectiveness of individual zones and the program
overall. The department shall submit the report, including the
commission's recommendations, to the governor and legislature beginning
December 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.280 and 2007 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission shall,
with the advice of an innovation partnership advisory group selected by
the commission((, have oversight responsibility for the implementation
of the state's efforts to further innovation partnerships throughout
the state. The commission shall)):
(a) Provide information and advice to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to assist in the implementation of the
innovation partnership zone program, including criteria to be used in
the selection of grant applicants for funding;
(b) Document clusters of companies throughout the state that have
comparative competitive advantage or the potential for comparative
competitive advantage, using the process and criteria for identifying
strategic clusters developed by the working group specified in
subsection (2) of this section;
(c) Conduct an innovation opportunity analysis to identify (i) the
strongest current intellectual assets and research teams in the state
focused on emerging technologies and their commercialization, and (ii)
faculty and researchers that could increase their focus on
commercialization of technology if provided the appropriate technical
assistance and resources;
(d) Based on its findings and analysis, and in conjunction with the
higher education coordinating board and research institutions:
(i) Develop a plan to build on existing, and develop new,
intellectual assets and innovation research teams in the state in
research areas where there is a high potential to commercialize
technologies. The commission shall present the plan to the governor
and legislature by December 31, ((2007)) 2009. The higher education
coordinating board shall be responsible for implementing the plan in
conjunction with the publicly funded research institutions in the
state. The plan shall address the following elements and such other
elements as the commission deems important:
(A) Specific mechanisms to support, enhance, or develop innovation
research teams and strengthen their research and commercialization
capacity in areas identified as useful to strategic clusters and
innovative firms in the state;
(B) Identification of the funding necessary for laboratory
infrastructure needed to house innovation research teams;
(C) Specification of the most promising research areas meriting
enhanced resources and recruitment of significant entrepreneurial
researchers to join or lead innovation research teams;
(D) The most productive approaches to take in the recruitment, in
the identified promising research areas, of a minimum of ten
significant entrepreneurial researchers over the next ten years to join
or lead innovation research teams;
(E) Steps to take in solicitation of private sector support for the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers and the commercialization
activity of innovation research teams; and
(F) Mechanisms for ensuring the location of innovation research
teams in innovation partnership zones;
(ii) Provide direction for the development of comprehensive
entrepreneurial assistance programs at research institutions. The
programs may involve multidisciplinary students, faculty,
entrepreneurial researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors in building
business models and evolving business plans around innovative ideas.
The programs may provide technical assistance and the support of an
entrepreneur-in-residence to innovation research teams and offer
entrepreneurial training to faculty, researchers, undergraduates, and
graduate students. Curriculum leading to a certificate in
entrepreneurship may also be offered;
(e) Develop performance measures to be used in evaluating the
performance of innovation research teams, the implementation of the
plan and programs under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, and the
performance of innovation partnership zone grant recipients, including
but not limited to private investment measures, business initiation
measures, job creation measures, and measures of innovation such as
licensing of ideas in research institutions, patents, or other
recognized measures of innovation. The performance measures developed
shall be consistent with the economic development commission's
comprehensive plan for economic development and its standards and
metrics for program evaluation. The commission shall report to the
legislature and the governor by ((December 31, 2008)) June 30, 2009, on
the measures developed; and
(f) Using the performance measures developed, perform a biennial
assessment and report, the first of which shall be due December 31,
2012, on:
(i) Commercialization of technologies developed at state
universities, found at other research institutions in the state, and
facilitated with public assistance at existing companies;
(ii) Outcomes of the funding of innovation research teams and
recruitment of significant entrepreneurial researchers;
(iii) Comparison with other states of Washington's outcomes from
the innovation research teams and efforts to recruit significant
entrepreneurial researchers; and
(iv) Outcomes of the grants for innovation partnership zones.
The report shall include recommendations for modifications of chapter
227, Laws of 2007 and of state commercialization efforts that would
enhance the state's economic competitiveness.
(2) The economic development commission and the workforce training
and education coordinating board shall jointly convene a working group
to:
(a) Specify the process and criteria for identification of substate
geographic concentrations of firms or employment in an industry and the
industry's customers, suppliers, supporting businesses, and
institutions, which process will include the use of labor market
information from the employment security department and local labor
markets; and
(b) Establish criteria for identifying strategic clusters which are
important to economic prosperity in the state, considering cluster
size, growth rate, and wage levels among other factors.

--- END ---