BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Lifelong learning accounts are portable
employee-owned and employer-matched savings accounts dedicated to
covering the cost of tuition, fees, books, supplies, and equipment for
working adults seeking education and training to improve their position
in the workforce. The legislature finds that lifelong learning
accounts allow employers and workers to coinvest in their futures. The
legislature further finds that, combined with free career advising,
lifelong learning accounts can make a significant difference in the
lives of workers and their families, as well as for employers in need
of well-trained workers. The legislature intends to facilitate the
creating of lifelong learning accounts for workers in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The workforce training and education coordinating board shall
establish a state lifelong learning account steering committee. The
steering committee shall consist of representatives from the: (a)
Association of Washington business; (b) higher education coordinating
board; (c) state board for community and technical colleges; (d)
department of community, trade, and economic development; (e)
Washington state hospital association; (f) Pacific mountain workforce
development council; (g) private vocational schools; and (h) state and
regional AFL-CIO and SEIU.
(2) The steering committee shall: (a) Develop a policy framework
to establish a statewide lifelong learning account program; (b)
identify technical and budget issues along with recommendations on how
to resolve them; (c) provide for continuing outreach to workers,
employers, and foundations, willing to participate in and fund lifelong
learning accounts; and (d) design a performance accountability system.
(3) The steering committee shall receive staff and logistical
support from the workforce training and education coordinating board.
(4) The steering committee shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010, and every two years
thereafter, regarding the numbers and characteristics of participating
workers and employers, the status of outreach efforts, and other
appropriate performance outcome measures identified by the steering
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
for the use and benefit of the board in support of the lifelong
learning account program, and may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or
income from the public or private sources according to their terms,
unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW
42.17.710.

--- END ---