BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall convene a work group to develop a plan to create a single,
coordinated, collaboratively supported, one-stop college information
web-based portal for students and families planning, preparing, and
applying for, as well as those attending, postsecondary education. The
purpose of the portal is to provide comprehensive information and
applications regarding financial, academic, and career planning,
admissions, scholarships, financial aid, as well as any other
information and services identified by the work group that would
encourage or aid students contemplating their postsecondary education
goals.
(2) The work group shall consist of representatives from the higher
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the council of presidents, the workforce training
and education coordinating board, the independent colleges of
Washington, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
representatives of the public, private, and private vocational colleges
in Washington, and others as may be needed.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Investigate similar ongoing efforts in other states including
what information and services are typically offered, what agency takes
the lead in creating and maintaining the portal, what planning stages
and budgets are associated with portals, how portals are marketed to
maximize usefulness, and whether the states' efforts are increasing
postsecondary participation;
(b) Focus on a portal that is student-centered and does not
presuppose a sophisticated understanding of postsecondary education;
(c) Identify the resources necessary to build and maintain the
portal;
(d) Develop a plan that builds upon existing infrastructure
whenever possible; and
(e) Identify the metrics that can be used to gauge success.
(4) The final report of the work group shall:
(a) Recommend a process and timeline for the creation of the
portal;
(b) Identify costs and savings to students, families, and the
state;
(c) Identify potential issues and roadblocks anticipated in the
creation and maintenance of the portal; and
(d) Propose enabling legislative and administrative solutions.
(5) The board shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---