BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.162.010 and 2007 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established ((to oversee the economic development strategies and
policies of the department of community, trade, and economic
development)) as an agency of the state within the executive branch to
provide the governor and legislature with policy analysis, strategic
planning, program evaluation, and monitoring of the state's economic
development system.
(2)(a) The Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of ((eleven)) thirteen voting members appointed by the governor
as follows: ((Six)) Eight representatives of the private sector, all
of whom must have experience as an employer in this state, one
representative of labor, one representative of port districts, one
representative of four-year state public higher education, one
representative for state community or technical colleges, and one
representative of associate development organizations. The director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development, the
director of the workforce training and education coordinating board,
the commissioner of the employment security department, and the chairs
and ranking minority members of the standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate overseeing economic development policies
shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members.
The chair of the commission shall be a voting member selected by
the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. In selecting the chair, the governor shall
seek a person who understands the future economic needs of the state
and nation and the role the state's economic development system has in
meeting those needs.
(b) In making the appointments, the governor shall consult with
organizations that have an interest in economic development, including,
but not limited to, industry associations, labor organizations,
minority business associations, economic development councils, chambers
of commerce, port associations, tribes, and the chairs of the
legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development.
(c) The members shall be representative of the geographic regions
of the state, including eastern and central Washington, as well as
represent the ethnic diversity of the state. Private sector members
shall represent existing and emerging industries, small businesses,
women-owned businesses, and minority-owned businesses. Members of the
commission shall serve statewide interests while preserving their
diverse perspectives, and shall be recognized leaders in their fields
with demonstrated experience in economic development or disciplines
related to economic development.
(3) Members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure
of the governor for not more than two consecutive three-year terms,
except that, as determined by the governor, the terms of four of the
appointees on the commission on the effective date of this section will
expire in 2010, the terms of four of the appointees on the commission
on the effective date of this section will expire in 2011, and the
terms of three of the appointees on the commission on the effective
date of this section will expire in 2012. Thereafter all terms shall
be for three years. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointments.
(4) The commission may establish committees as it desires, and may
invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members.
(5) The executive director of the commission shall be appointed by
the governor with the consent of the voting members of the commission.
The salary of the executive director shall be set by the governor with
the consent of the commission. The governor may dismiss the executive
director only with the approval of a majority vote of the commission.
The commission, by a majority vote, may dismiss the executive director
with the approval of the governor.
(6) The commission may adopt rules for its own governance.
(7) Members are eligible to receive reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(8) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum
for the purpose of conducting business.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.162.020 and 2007 c 232 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission shall:
(((1))) (a) Concentrate its major efforts on planning,
coordination, evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending
improvements to the state's economic development system using, but not
limited to, the "Next Washington" plan and the global competitiveness
council recommendations;
(((2))) (b) Develop and maintain on a biennial basis a state
comprehensive plan for economic development, including but not limited
to goals, objectives, and priorities for the state economic development
system; identify the elements local associate development organizations
must include in their countywide economic development plans; and review
the state system for consistency with the state comprehensive plan. In
developing the state comprehensive plan for economic development, the
commission shall use, but may not be limited to: Economic, labor
market, and populations trend reports in office of financial management
forecasts; the annual state economic climate report prepared by the
economic climate council; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome
evaluations; the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees as evidenced in formal surveys and other
input;
(((3))) (c) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of
the state economic development system and related state programs;
perform a biennial assessment of the ongoing and strategic economic
development needs of the state; and assess the extent to which the
economic development system and related programs represent a
consistent, coordinated, efficient, and integrated approach to meet
such needs; ((and
(4))) (d) Produce a biennial report to the governor and the
legislature on progress by the commission in coordinating the state's
economic development system and meeting the other obligations of this
chapter, as well as include recommendations for any statutory changes
necessary to enhance operational efficiencies or improve coordination;
(e) Consult, collaborate, and coordinate with other state agencies
and local organizations when developing plans, inventories, and
assessments so as to avoid duplication of effort; and
(f) Have the authority to accept gifts, grants, donations,
sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local
governmental agency or program or any private source and expend the
same for any purpose consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The commission may delegate to the executive director any of
the functions of this section.
(3) The executive director must present a fiscal report to the
commission quarterly for its review and approval.
(4) To maintain its leadership and concentration on strategic
planning, coordination, and assessment of the economic development
system as a whole, the commission shall not take an administrative role
in the delivery of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission fund is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from gifts, grants,
donations, sponsorships, or contributions under RCW 43.162.020 must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
Washington state economic development commission only for purposes
related to carrying out the mission, roles, and responsibilities of the
commission.
(2) Whenever any money, from the federal government or from other
sources, that was not anticipated in the budget approved by the
legislature, has actually been received and is designated to be spent
for a specific purpose, the executive director shall use the
unanticipated receipts process as provided in RCW 43.79.270 to request
authority to spend the money.
(3) The commission shall use the small agency client services
within the office of financial management for accounting, budgeting,
and payroll services.
(4) The commission is subject to audits by the state auditor as
provided under chapter 43.09 RCW.

--- END ---