BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.34.020 and 2008 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) An "act of equity skimming" occurs when:
(a)(i) A person purchases a dwelling with the representation that
the purchaser will pay for the dwelling by assuming the obligation to
make payments on existing mortgages, deeds of trust, or real estate
contracts secured by and pertaining to the dwelling, or by representing
that such obligation will be assumed; and
(ii) The person fails to make payments on such mortgages, deeds of
trust, or real estate contracts as the payments become due, within two
years subsequent to the purchase; and
(iii) The person diverts value from the dwelling by either (A)
applying or authorizing the application of rents from the dwelling for
the person's own benefit or use, or (B) obtaining anything of value
from the sale or lease with option to purchase of the dwelling for the
person's own benefit or use, or (C) removing or obtaining appliances,
fixtures, furnishings, or parts of such dwellings or appurtenances for
the person's own benefit or use without replacing the removed items
with items of equal or greater value; or
(b)(i) The person purchases a dwelling in a transaction in which
all or part of the purchase price is financed by the seller and is (A)
secured by a lien which is inferior in priority or subordinated to a
lien placed on the dwelling by the purchaser, or (B) secured by a lien
on other real or personal property, or (C) without any security; and
(ii) The person obtains a superior priority loan which either (A)
is secured by a lien on the dwelling which is superior in priority to
the lien of the seller, but not including a bona fide assumption by the
purchaser of a loan existing prior to the time of purchase, or (B)
creating any lien or encumbrance on the dwelling when the seller does
not hold a lien on the dwelling; and
(iii) The person fails to make payments or defaults on the superior
priority loan within two years subsequent to the purchase; and
(iv) The person diverts value from the dwelling by applying or
authorizing any part of the proceeds from such superior priority loan
for the person's own benefit or use.
(2) "Distressed home" means either:
(a) A dwelling that is in danger of foreclosure or at risk of loss
due to nonpayment of taxes; or
(b) A dwelling that is in danger of foreclosure or that is in the
process of being foreclosed due to a default under the terms of a
mortgage.
(3) "Distressed home consultant" means a person who:
(a) Solicits or contacts a distressed homeowner in writing, in
person, or through any electronic or telecommunications medium and
makes a representation or offer to perform any service that the person
represents will:
(i) Stop, enjoin, delay, void, set aside, annul, stay, or postpone
a foreclosure sale;
(ii) Obtain forbearance from any servicer, beneficiary, or
mortgagee;
(iii) Assist the distressed homeowner to exercise a right of
reinstatement provided in the loan documents or to refinance a loan
that is in foreclosure or is in danger of foreclosure;
(iv) Obtain an extension of the period within which the distressed
homeowner may reinstate the distressed homeowner's obligation or extend
the deadline to object to a ratification;
(v) Obtain a waiver of an acceleration clause contained in any
promissory note or contract secured by a mortgage on a distressed home
or contained in the mortgage;
(vi) Assist the distressed homeowner to obtain a loan or advance of
funds;
(vii) Save the distressed homeowner's residence from foreclosure;
(viii) Avoid or ameliorate the impairment of the distressed
homeowner's credit resulting from the recording of a notice of trustee
sale, the filing of a petition to foreclose, or the conduct of a
foreclosure sale;
(ix) ((Purchase or obtain an option)) Cause a contract to purchase
an interest in the distressed ((homeowner's residence)) home to be
executed or closed within twenty days of an advertised or docketed
foreclosure sale, unless the distressed homeowner is represented in the
transaction by an attorney or a person licensed under chapter 18.85
RCW;
(x) Arrange for the distressed homeowner to become a lessee or
tenant entitled to continue to reside in the distressed homeowner's
residence, unless (A) the continued residence is for a period of no
more than twenty days after closing, (B) the purpose of the continued
residence is to arrange for and relocate to a new residence, and (C)
the distressed homeowner is represented in the transaction by an
attorney or a person licensed and subject to chapter 18.85 RCW;
(xi) Arrange for the distressed homeowner to have an option to
repurchase the distressed homeowner's residence; or
(xii) Engage in any documentation, grant, conveyance, sale, lease,
trust, or gift by which the distressed homeowner clogs the distressed
homeowner's equity of redemption in the distressed homeowner's
residence; or
(b) Systematically contacts owners of property that court records,
newspaper advertisements, or any other source demonstrate are in
foreclosure or are in danger of foreclosure.
"Distressed home consultant" does not ((mean)) include: A
financial institution((,)); a nonprofit credit counseling service((,));
a licensed attorney, or a person subject to chapter 19.148 RCW((.
"Distressed home consultant" does not include)); a licensed mortgage
broker who, pursuant to lawful activities under chapter 19.146 RCW,
procures a nonpurchase mortgage loan for the distressed homeowner from
a financial institution; or a person licensed as a real estate broker
or salesperson under chapter 18.85 RCW, when rendering real estate
brokerage services under chapter 18.86 RCW, regardless of whether the
person renders additional services that would otherwise constitute the
services of a distressed home consultant, and if the person is not
engaged in activities designed to, or represented to, result in a
distressed home conveyance.
(4) "Distressed home consulting transaction" means an agreement
between a distressed homeowner and a distressed home consultant in
which the distressed home consultant represents or offers to perform
any of the services enumerated in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(5) "Distressed home conveyance" means a transaction in which:
(a) A distressed homeowner transfers an interest in the distressed
home to a distressed home purchaser;
(b) The distressed home purchaser allows the distressed homeowner
to occupy the distressed home; and
(c) The distressed home purchaser or a person acting in
participation with the distressed home purchaser conveys or promises to
convey the distressed home to the distressed homeowner, provides the
distressed homeowner with an option to purchase the distressed home at
a later date, or promises the distressed homeowner an interest in, or
portion of, the proceeds of any resale of the distressed home.
(6) "Distressed home purchaser" means any person who acquires an
interest in a distressed home under a distressed home conveyance.
"Distressed home purchaser" includes a person who acts in joint venture
or joint enterprise with one or more distressed home purchasers in a
distressed home conveyance. A financial institution is not a
distressed home purchaser.
(7) "Distressed homeowner" means an owner of a distressed home.
(8) "Dwelling" means a ((single, duplex, triplex, or four-unit
family residential building)) one-to-four family residence, condominium
unit, residential cooperative unit, residential unit in any other type
of planned unit development, or manufactured home whether or not title
has been eliminated pursuant to RCW 65.20.040.
(9) "Financial institution" means (a) any bank or trust company,
mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or a
lender making federally related mortgage loans, (b) a holder in the
business of acquiring federally related mortgage loans as defined in
the real estate settlement procedures act (RESPA) (12 U.S.C. Sec.
2602), insurance company, insurance producer, title insurance company,
escrow company, or lender subject to auditing by the federal national
mortgage association or the federal home loan mortgage corporation,
which is organized or doing business pursuant to the laws of any state,
federal law, or the laws of a foreign country, if also authorized to
conduct business in Washington state pursuant to the laws of this state
or federal law, (c) any affiliate or subsidiary of any of the entities
listed in (a) or (b) of this subsection, or (d) an employee or agent
acting on behalf of any of the entities listed in (a) or (b) of this
subsection. "Financial institution" also means a licensee under
chapter 31.04 RCW, provided that the licensee does not include a
licensed mortgage broker, unless the mortgage broker is engaged in
lawful activities under chapter 19.146 RCW and procures a nonpurchase
mortgage loan for the distressed homeowner from a financial
institution.
(10) "Homeowner" means a person who owns and ((occupies)) has
occupied a dwelling as his or her primary residence within one hundred
eighty days of the latter of conveyance or mutual acceptance of an
agreement to convey an interest in the dwelling, whether or not his or
her ownership interest is encumbered by a mortgage, deed of trust, or
other lien.
(11) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold, the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed home consulting transaction.
(12) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, mortgage deed, deed of trust,
security agreement, or other instrument securing a mortgage loan and
constituting a lien on or security interest in housing.
(13) "Nonprofit credit counseling service" means a nonprofit
organization described under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue
code, or similar successor provisions, that is licensed or certified by
any federal, state, or local agency.
(14) "Pattern of equity skimming" means engaging in at least three
acts of equity skimming within any three-year period, with at least one
of the acts occurring after June 9, 1988.
(15) "Person" includes any natural person, corporation, joint stock
association, or unincorporated association.
(16) "Resale" means a bona fide market sale of the distressed home
subject to the distressed home conveyance by the distressed home
purchaser to an unaffiliated third party.
(17) "Resale price" means the gross sale price of the distressed
home on resale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---