BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.010 and 2007 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter concerns requirements for new energy resources. This
chapter requires large utilities to obtain ((fifteen)) twenty percent
of their electricity from new renewable resources such as solar and
wind by ((2020)) 2025 and undertake cost-effective energy conservation.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in ((the)) efficiency ((of energy
use, production, or distribution)).
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, that commences operation after March 31, 1999, where((:
(i))) the facility is located ((in the Pacific Northwest; or (ii) the
electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington state on a
real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration services))
within the geographic boundary of the western electricity coordinating
council or its successor entity; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments;
(c) That portion of incremental electricity produced as a result of
efficiency improvements completed after March 31, 1999, attributable to
a qualifying utility's share of the electricity output to hydroelectric
generation projects whose energy output is marketed by the Bonneville
power administration; or
(d) Electricity from a distributed generation facility that uses
currents from freshwater rivers and streams that commenced operations
after March 31, 1999. The generation of electricity may not be
produced as a result of water diversions, impoundments, or dams.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases. For an anaerobic digester,
its nonpower attributes may be separated into avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide, and other greenhouse gases, and into renewable energy
credits.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by fresh water, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) (i) by-products of
pulping or wood manufacturing processes located in Washington that are
not derived from old growth forests, including but not limited to bark,
wood chips, sawdust, and lignin in spent pulping liquors; (j) black
liquors derived from algae and other sources; and (k) biomass energy
based on animal waste, food waste, yard waste, or solid organic fuels
from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do
not include (i) wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) ((black liquor byproduct from paper production; (iii)))
wood from old growth forests; or (((iv))) (iii) municipal solid waste.
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
related to energy end-use, production, and distribution that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, ((using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan,)) each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. Cost-effective conservation
potential includes all achievable cost-effective conservation related
to energy end-use, production, and distribution. In assessing this
potential, the qualifying utility shall use methodologies consistent
with those used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and
conservation planning council in its most recently published regional
power plan. At least every two years thereafter, the qualifying
utility shall review and update this assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) ((Beginning)) By January 1, 2010, each qualifying utility shall
establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for
cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of
achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that
target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each
biennial acquisition target must ((be no lower than)) include: (i) At
least twenty percent of the qualifying utility's ((pro rata share for
that two-year period of its)) cost-effective end-use conservation
potential identified for the subsequent ten-year period; and (ii) at
least twenty percent of the qualifying utility's cost-effective
distribution and production conservation potential identified for the
subsequent ten-year period. In meeting its biennial acquisition
target, a qualifying utility may not use distribution or production
conservation in lieu of end-use conservation. A qualifying utility may
not use incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements to hydroelectric generation projects to meet its biennial
acquisition target.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility ((has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output)) is designed to have a
projected overall thermal conversion efficiency of at least seventy
percent. For the purposes of this section, overall thermal conversion
efficiency means the output of electricity plus usable heat divided by
fuel input. The reduction in load due to high-efficiency cogeneration
shall be((: (i) Calculated as the ratio of the fuel chargeable to
power heat rate of the cogeneration facility compared to the heat rate
on a new and clean basis of a best-commercially available technology
combined-cycle natural gas-fired combustion turbine; and (ii))) counted
towards meeting the biennial conservation target in the same manner as
other production conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least ((three)) four percent of its load by January 1, 2012,
and each year thereafter through December 31, 2015, where the eligible
renewable resources and renewable energy credits are generated by or
derived from generation facilities located in the Pacific Northwest;
(ii) At least ((nine)) ten percent of its load by January 1, 2016,
and each year thereafter through December 31, 2019, where:
(A) At least half of the eligible renewable resources and renewable
energy credits are generated by or derived from generation facilities
located in the Pacific Northwest; and
(B) Any electricity from an eligible renewable resource that is
derived from generation facilities located outside the Pacific
Northwest is delivered to the Bonneville power administration or to the
transmission system of a qualifying utility; ((and))
(iii) At least ((fifteen)) sixteen percent of its load by January
1, 2020, and each year thereafter, where:
(A) At least half of the eligible renewable resources and renewable
energy credits are generated by or derived from generation facilities
located in the Pacific Northwest; and
(B) Any electricity from an eligible renewable resource that is
derived from generation facilities located outside the Pacific
Northwest is delivered to the Bonneville power administration or to the
transmission system of a qualifying utility; and
(iv) At least twenty percent of its load by January 1, 2025, and
each year thereafter, where:
(A) At least half of the eligible renewable resources and renewable
energy credits are generated by or derived from generation facilities
located in the Pacific Northwest; and
(B) Any electricity from an eligible renewable resource that is
derived from generation facilities located outside the Pacific
Northwest is delivered to the Bonneville power administration or to the
transmission system of a qualifying utility.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
((or))
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090; or
(iii) Efficiency improvements to hydroelectric generation projects
attributable to any utility other than the qualifying utility and whose
energy output is marketed by the Bonneville power administration.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) Beginning July 1, 2009, a qualifying utility may acquire
renewable energy credits produced on or after July 1, 2009, from a
biomass energy facility, regardless of the date it commences
operations.
(j) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.285.050 and 2007 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with
an annual target created in RCW 19.285.040(2) for a given year if the
utility invested four percent of its total annual retail revenue
requirement on the incremental costs of eligible renewable resources,
the cost of renewable energy credits, or a combination of both, but a
utility may elect to invest more than this amount.
(b) The incremental cost of an eligible renewable resource is
calculated as the difference between the levelized delivered cost of
the eligible renewable resource, regardless of ownership, compared to
the levelized delivered cost of an equivalent amount of reasonably
available substitute resources that do not qualify as eligible
renewable resources, where the resources being compared have the same
contract length or facility life.
(c) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, for purposes of
this section and RCW 19.285.040(2)(d), an investor-owned utility shall
use its commission-approved total retail revenue requirement resulting
from the utility's most recent general rate case.
(i) For each investor-owned utility, if the commission has not
issued an order in a general rate case for that utility in any of the
three years prior to January 1st of a year for which an annual target
is created in RCW 19.285.040(2), the commission shall calculate the
total annual retail revenue requirement for that utility for that
target year. The total annual retail revenue requirement for each
utility must be calculated based on only the operations of the utility
relating to electricity, and must be updated annually until the
commission issues an order for that utility in a general rate case.
The total annual retail revenue requirement calculated for purposes of
this subsection has no bearing on the commission's rate-making policies
and practices under Title 80 RCW.
(2) An investor-owned utility is entitled to recover all prudently
incurred costs associated with compliance with this chapter. The
commission shall address cost recovery issues of qualifying utilities
that are investor-owned utilities that serve both in Washington and in
other states in complying with this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.285.080 and 2007 c 1 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to ensure the proper
implementation and enforcement of this chapter as it applies to
investor-owned utilities.
(2) The department shall adopt rules concerning only process,
timelines, and documentation to ensure the proper implementation of
this chapter as it applies to qualifying utilities that are not
investor-owned utilities. Those rules include, but are not limited to,
rules associated with a qualifying utility's development of
conservation targets under RCW 19.285.040(1); a qualifying utility's
decision to pursue alternative compliance in RCW 19.285.040(2) (d) or
(((i))) (j) or 19.285.050(1); and the format and content of reports
required in RCW 19.285.070. Nothing in this subsection may be
construed to restrict the rate-making authority of the commission or a
qualifying utility as otherwise provided by law.
(3) The commission and department may coordinate in developing
rules related to process, timelines, and documentation that are
necessary for implementation of this chapter.
(4)(a) Pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, rules needed for the implementation of this chapter must be
adopted by ((December 31, 2007)) June 30, 2010. These rules may be
revised as needed to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter.
(b) Within six months of the adoption by the Pacific Northwest
electric power and conservation planning council of each of its
regional power plans, the department shall initiate and complete rule
making to consider adopting any changes in methodologies used by the
council that would impact a qualifying utility's conservation potential
assessment in accordance with RCW 19.285.040(1).
(c) Within six months of the adoption by the Pacific Northwest
electric power and conservation planning council of each of its
regional power plans, the commission shall initiate and complete rule
making to consider adopting any changes in methodologies used by the
council that would impact a qualifying utility's conservation potential
assessment in accordance with RCW 19.285.040(1).

--- END ---