BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An anaerobic digester that complies with the conditions
specified in this section is exempt from the permitting requirements of
this chapter. To qualify for the exemption, an anaerobic digester must
meet the following conditions:
(a) The owner or operator must provide the department or the
jurisdictional health department with at least thirty days' notice of
intent to operate under the conditions specified in this section, and
comply with any guidelines issued under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The anaerobic digester must process at least fifty percent
livestock manure by volume;
(c) The anaerobic digester may process no more than thirty percent
imported organic waste-derived material by volume, and must comply with
subsection (3) of this section;
(d) The anaerobic digester must comply with design and operating
standards in the natural resources conservation service's conservation
practice standard code 366 in effect as of the effective date of this
section;
(e) Digestate must:
(i) Be managed in accordance with a dairy nutrient management plan
under chapter 90.64 RCW that includes elements necessary to address
management and use of digestate;
(ii) Meet compost quality standards concerning pathogens,
stability, nutrient testing, and metals before it is distributed for
off-site use, or be sent to an off-site permitted compost facility for
further treatment to meet compost quality standards; or
(iii) Be processed or managed in an alternate manner approved by
the department;
(f) The owner or operator must allow inspection by the department
or jurisdictional health department at reasonable times to verify
compliance with the conditions specified in this section; and
(g) The owner or operator must submit an annual report to the
department or the jurisdictional health department concerning use of
nonmanure material in the anaerobic digester and any required
compliance testing.
(2) By August 1, 2009, the department and the department of
agriculture, in consultation with the department of health, shall make
available to anaerobic digester owners and operators clearly written
guidelines for the anaerobic codigestion of livestock manure and
organic waste-derived material. The guidelines must explain the steps
necessary for an owner or operator to meet the conditions specified in
this section for an exemption from the permitting requirements of this
chapter.
(3) Any imported organic waste-derived material must:
(a) Be preconsumer in nature;
(b) Be fed into the anaerobic digester within thirty-six hours of
receipt at the anaerobic digester;
(c) If it is likely to contain animal byproducts, be previously
source-separated at a facility licensed to process food by the United
States department of agriculture, the United States food and drug
administration, the Washington state department of agriculture, or
other applicable regulatory agency;
(d) If it contains bovine processing waste, be derived from animals
approved by the United States department of agriculture food safety and
inspection service and not contain any specified risk material;
(e) If it contains sheep carcasses or sheep processing waste, not
be fed into the anaerobic digester;
(f) Be stored and handled in a manner that protects surface water
and groundwater and complies with best management practices;
(g) Be stored in structures that either comply with the natural
resources conservation service's conservation practice standard code
313 in effect as of the effective date of this section or meet the
construction industry standard of the American concrete institute or
American institute of steel construction for these structures, or be
certified to be effective by a representative of the natural resources
conservation service; and
(h) Be managed to prevent migration of nuisance odors beyond
property boundaries and minimize attraction of flies, rodents, and
other vectors.
(4) Digestate that is managed in accordance with a dairy nutrient
management plan under chapter 90.64 RCW that includes elements
necessary to address management and use of digestate shall no longer be
considered a solid waste. Use of digestate from an anaerobic digester
that complies with the conditions specified in this section is exempt
from the permitting requirements of this chapter.
(5) An anaerobic digester that does not comply with the conditions
specified in this section may be subject to the permitting requirements
of this chapter. In addition, violations of the conditions specified
in this section are subject to provisions in RCW 70.95.315.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a vessel that processes organic
material into biogas and digestate using microorganisms in a
decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container;
(b) "Best management practices" means managerial practices that
prevent or reduce water pollution;
(c) "Digestate" means both solid and liquid substances that remain
following anaerobic digestion of organic material in an anaerobic
digester;
(d) "Imported" means originating off of the farm or other site
where the anaerobic digester is being operated; and
(e) "Organic waste-derived material" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 15.54.270 and any other organic wastes approved by the
department, except for organic waste-derived material collected through
municipal commercial and residential solid waste collection programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2007 c 147 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.95.315, 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144,
90.56.310, and 90.56.330 and chapter 90.76 RCW shall be imposed by a
notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt
requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty
from the department or the local air authority, describing the
violation with reasonable particularity. Within thirty days after the
notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in
writing to the department or the authority for the remission or
mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the
department or authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever
terms the department or the authority in its discretion deems proper.
The department or the authority may ascertain the facts regarding all
such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it
may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a
demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of
information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition of the application for relief from
penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account created by RCW 70.105.180, RCW 90.56.330, which
shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390, and RCW 90.76.080, which shall be credited to the
underground storage tank account created by RCW 90.76.100.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21B.310 and 2004 c 204 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), any order issued by the
department or local air authority pursuant to RCW 43.27A.190,
70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.95.315, 70.105.095, ((43.27A.190,)) 86.16.020,
88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any provision enacted after July 26,
1987, or any permit, certificate, or license issued by the department
may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board if the appeal
is filed with the board and served on the department or authority
within thirty days after the date of receipt of the order. Except as
provided under chapter 70.105D RCW and RCW 90.03.210(2), this is the
exclusive means of appeal of such an order.
(2) The department or the authority in its discretion may stay the
effectiveness of an order during the pendency of such an appeal.
(3) At any time during the pendency of an appeal of such an order
to the board, the appellant may apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the
hearings board for a stay of the order or for the removal thereof.
(4) Any appeal must contain the following in accordance with the
rules of the hearings board:
(a) The appellant's name and address;
(b) The date and docket number of the order, permit, or license
appealed;
(c) A description of the substance of the order, permit, or license
that is the subject of the appeal;
(d) A clear, separate, and concise statement of every error alleged
to have been committed;
(e) A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the requester
relies to sustain his or her statements of error; and
(f) A statement setting forth the relief sought.
(5) Upon failure to comply with any final order of the department,
the attorney general, on request of the department, may bring an action
in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or the
potential violation is about to occur to obtain such relief as
necessary, including injunctive relief, to insure compliance with the
order. The air authorities may bring similar actions to enforce their
orders.
(6) An appealable decision or order shall be identified as such and
shall contain a conspicuous notice to the recipient that it may be
appealed only by filing an appeal with the hearings board and serving
it on the department within thirty days of the date of receipt.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95.170 and 1998 c 156 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided otherwise in RCW 70.95.300, 70.95.305 ((or)),
70.95.306, 70.95.310, or section 1 of this act, after approval of the
comprehensive solid waste plan by the department no solid waste
handling facility or facilities shall be maintained, established, or
modified until the county, city, or other person operating such site
has obtained a permit pursuant to RCW 70.95.180 or 70.95.190.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95.315 and 2005 c 510 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may assess a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed one thousand dollars per day per violation to any person exempt
from solid waste permitting in accordance with RCW 70.95.300,
70.95.305, ((or)) 70.95.306, or section 1 of this act who fails to
comply with the terms and conditions of the exemption. Each such
violation shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in the case of
a continuing violation, each day's continuance shall be a separate and
distinct violation. The penalty provided in this section shall be
imposed pursuant to RCW 43.21B.300.
(2) If a person violates a provision of any of the sections
referenced in subsection (1) of this section, the department may issue
an appropriate order to ensure compliance with the conditions of the
exemption. Such an order may be appealed pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310.

--- END ---