BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) City and town permitting processes must consider impacts to
plant species identified by the natural heritage program established
under RCW 79.70.030 that may reside on a proposed project site.
Consideration of impacts includes, but is not limited to, consulting
with the natural heritage program and associated data banks of the
department of natural resources to determine, or attempt to determine,
whether a plant species identified by the program is located on the
proposed project site.
(2) Cities and towns may not issue permits for project proposals
affecting or likely to affect plant species identified by the natural
heritage program without prior development and implementation of an
appropriate mitigation process for the affected or likely to be
affected plants.
(3) For purposes of this section, "an appropriate mitigation
process" means a process ensuring that: (a) There is no net loss of an
affected plant species; and (b) plant transplanting, when transplanting
is practicable, involves movements of minimal distances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Code city permitting processes must consider impacts to plant
species identified by the natural heritage program established under
RCW 79.70.030 that may reside on a proposed project site.
Consideration of impacts includes, but is not limited to, consulting
with the natural heritage program and associated data banks of the
department of natural resources to determine, or attempt to determine,
whether a plant species identified by the program is located on the
proposed project site.
(2) Code cities may not issue permits for project proposals
affecting or likely to affect plant species identified by the natural
heritage program without prior development and implementation of an
appropriate mitigation process for the affected or likely to be
affected plants.
(3) For purposes of this section, "an appropriate mitigation
process" means a process ensuring that: (a) There is no net loss of an
affected plant species; and (b) plant transplanting, when transplanting
is practicable, involves movements of minimal distances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) County permitting processes must consider impacts to plant
species identified by the natural heritage program established under
RCW 79.70.030 that may reside on a proposed project site.
Consideration of impacts includes, but is not limited to, consulting
with the natural heritage program and associated data banks of the
department of natural resources to determine, or attempt to determine,
whether a plant species identified by the program is located on the
proposed project site.
(2) Counties may not issue permits for project proposals affecting
or likely to affect plant species identified by the natural heritage
program without prior development and implementation of an appropriate
mitigation process for the affected or likely to be affected plants.
(3) For purposes of this section, "an appropriate mitigation
process" means a process ensuring that: (a) There is no net loss of an
affected plant species; and (b) plant transplanting, when transplanting
is practicable, involves movements of minimal distances.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.70.030 and 2003 c 334 s 549 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to set aside, preserve, and protect natural areas within
the state, the department is authorized, in addition to any other
powers, to:
(1) Establish the criteria for selection, acquisition, management,
protection, and use of such natural areas, including:
(a) Limiting public access to natural area preserves consistent
with the purposes of this chapter. Where appropriate, and on a case-by-case basis, a buffer zone with an increased low level of public
access may be created around the environmentally sensitive areas;
(b) Developing a management plan for each designated natural area
preserve. The plan must identify the significant resources to be
conserved consistent with the purposes of this chapter and identify the
areas with potential for low-impact public and environmental
educational uses. The plan must specify the types of management
activities and public uses that are permitted, consistent with the
purposes of this chapter. The department must make the plans available
for review and comment by the public, and state, tribal, and local
agencies, prior to final approval;
(2) Cooperate or contract with any federal, state, or local
governmental agency, private organizations, or individuals in carrying
out the purpose of this chapter;
(3) Consistent with the plan, acquire by gift, devise, purchase,
grant, dedication, or means other than eminent domain, the fee or any
lesser right or interest in real property which shall be held and
managed as a natural area;
(4) Acquire by gift, devise, grant, or donation any personal
property to be used in the acquisition and/or management of natural
areas;
(5) Inventory existing public, state, and private lands in
cooperation with the council to assess possible natural areas to be
preserved within the state;
(6)(a) Maintain a natural heritage program to provide assistance in
the selection and nomination of areas containing natural heritage
resources for registration or dedication. The program shall maintain
a classification of natural heritage resources, an inventory of their
locations, and a data bank for such information.
(b) The department shall cooperate with the department of fish and
wildlife in the selection and nomination of areas from the data bank
that relate to critical wildlife habitats. The department shall also
cooperate with local governments requesting consultation services under
sections 1 through 3 of this act. Information from the data bank shall
be made available to public and private agencies and individuals for
environmental assessment ((and)), proprietary land management purposes,
and permitting processes under sections 1 through 3 of this act. Usage
of the classification, inventory, or data bank of natural heritage
resources for any purpose inconsistent with the natural heritage
program is not authorized;
(7) Prepare a natural heritage plan which shall govern the natural
heritage program in the conduct of activities to create and manage a
system of natural areas that includes natural resources conservation
areas, and may include areas designated under the research natural area
program on federal lands in the state;
(a) The plan shall list the natural heritage resources to be
considered for registration and shall provide criteria for the
selection and approval of natural areas under this chapter;
(b) The department shall provide opportunities for input, comment,
and review to the public, other public agencies, and private groups
with special interests in natural heritage resources during preparation
of the plan;
(c) Upon approval by the council and adoption by the department,
the plan shall be updated and submitted biennially to the appropriate
committees of the legislature for their information and review. The
plan shall take effect ninety days after the adjournment of the
legislative session in which it is submitted unless the reviewing
committees suggest changes or reject the plan; and
(8) Maintain a state register of natural areas containing
significant natural heritage resources to be called the Washington
register of natural area preserves. Selection of natural areas for
registration shall be in accordance with criteria listed in the natural
heritage plan and accomplished through voluntary agreement between the
owner of the natural area and the department. No privately owned lands
may be proposed to the council for registration without prior notice to
the owner or registered without voluntary consent of the owner. No
state or local governmental agency may require such consent as a
condition of any permit or approval of or settlement of any civil or
criminal proceeding or to penalize any landowner in any way for failure
to give, or for withdrawal of, such consent.
(a) The department shall adopt rules as authorized by RCW 43.12.065
and 79.70.030(1) and chapter 34.05 RCW relating to voluntary natural
area registration.
(b) After approval by the council, the department may place sites
onto the register or remove sites from the register.
(c) The responsibility for management of registered natural area
preserves shall be with the preserve owner. A voluntary management
agreement may be developed between the department and the owners of the
sites on the register.
(d) Any public agency may register lands under provisions of this
chapter.

--- END ---