BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall conduct a study using radio frequency
identification or other similar technology to electronically monitor
sex offenders.
(2) The study must include:
(a) An evaluation of the current state of radio frequency
identification technology, including the capabilities and limitations
of subcutaneous radio frequency identification tags;
(b) An identification of the ways in which current subcutaneous
radio frequency identification technology may be used to electronically
monitor sex offenders, including an evaluation of the costs and
benefits of using the technology compared to the costs and benefits of
methods currently being used to monitor sex offenders;
(c) An evaluation of developing subcutaneous radio frequency
identification technologies, such as linking subcutaneous radio
frequency identification tags with global positioning systems, and an
estimate of the time frame in which the developing technologies will be
available; and
(d) An identification of the ways in which developing radio
frequency identification technologies may be used in the future to
electronically monitor sex offenders, including an evaluation of the
costs and benefits of using the technology compared to the costs and
benefits of methods currently being used to monitor sex offenders.
(3) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 31, 2009.

--- END ---