BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that homeless sex
offenders present unique risks to law enforcement, corrections
personnel, and local communities because the offenders' transience
makes them more difficult to track and monitor, makes community
notification more difficult, and inhibits the offenders' ability to
gain employment and access services. The legislature further finds
that locating housing for sex offenders can be highly challenging and
that the department of corrections is therefore frequently forced to
release offenders as homeless once they have served their maximum terms
of confinement. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to
improve public safety by requiring the department of corrections to
seek out innovative ways in which to increase the availability of safe
sex offender housing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of corrections shall
study ways in which to increase the availability of sex offender
housing. The study shall identify specific properties and specific
types of properties that could be used to house released sex offenders
on community custody in a manner that is not detrimental to, or that
increases, community safety. When performing the study, the department
shall, at a minimum, consider the following:
(a) The availability of existing department of corrections
facilities that could be retasked for sex offender housing in a manner
that is not detrimental to community safety;
(b) The availability of other state property that could be used for
sex offender housing in a manner that is not detrimental to community
safety;
(c) The availability of federal, local governmental, or private
property that could be purchased or leased for purposes of sex offender
housing in a manner that is not detrimental to community safety; and
(d) Any legal barriers to utilizing, leasing, or acquiring property
for purposes of sex offender housing.
(2) When performing the study, the department shall consult with
individuals and organizations that have expertise in sex offender
community safety, sex offender housing, and the acquisition and use of
state property including, but not limited to, law enforcement, victims'
advocacy organizations, local governments, organizations that provide
housing to the homeless, community corrections officers, the department
of general administration, and the Washington state institute for
public policy.
(3) The department of corrections shall report its findings to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 1, 2010.

--- END ---