BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of wrongfully removing or tampering with an
electronic monitoring device if he or she:
(a) Is being electronically monitored by the department of
corrections while serving a term of community custody imposed pursuant
to a conviction for a sex offense; and
(b) Without authorization from the department of corrections,
intentionally removes, attempts to remove, tampers with, or attempts to
tamper with any equipment being used in connection with the electronic
monitoring.
(2) Wrongfully removing or tampering with an electronic monitoring
device is a class B felony.
(3) For purposes of this section, "sex offense" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.507 and 2008 c 231 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, ((or)) indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion, or wrongfully removing or tampering with an electronic
monitoring device;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in
the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a); or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW 9.94A.030
(31)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense other than failure to
register.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3)(a) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing
under this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
and a minimum term.
(b) The maximum term shall consist of the statutory maximum
sentence for the offense.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the
minimum term shall be either within the standard sentence range for the
offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was rape of a child in the first degree, rape of a child
in the second degree, or child molestation in the first degree, and
there has been a finding that the offense was predatory under RCW
9.94A.836, the minimum term shall be either the maximum of the standard
sentence range for the offense or twenty-five years, whichever is
greater. If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, or kidnapping in the first
degree with sexual motivation, and there has been a finding that the
victim was under the age of fifteen at the time of the offense under
RCW 9.94A.837, the minimum term shall be either the maximum of the
standard sentence range for the offense or twenty-five years, whichever
is greater. If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced
under this section is rape in the first degree, rape in the second
degree with forcible compulsion, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or kidnapping in the first degree with sexual motivation,
and there has been a finding under RCW 9.94A.838 that the victim was,
at the time of the offense, developmentally disabled, mentally
disordered, or a frail elder or vulnerable adult, the minimum sentence
shall be either the maximum of the standard sentence range for the
offense or twenty-five years, whichever is greater.
(d) The minimum terms in (c)(ii) of this subsection do not apply to
a juvenile tried as an adult pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e) (i) or
(v). The minimum term for such a juvenile shall be imposed under
(c)(i) of this subsection.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.
(b) An offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is subject
to the supervision of the department until the expiration of the
maximum term of the sentence. The department shall monitor the
offender's compliance with conditions of community custody imposed by
the court, department, or board, and promptly report any violations to
the board. Any violation of conditions of community custody
established or modified by the board are subject to the provisions of
RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2008 c 108 s 23 and 2008 c 38 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

Wrongfully Removing or Tampering
with an Electronic Monitoring
Device (section 1 of this act)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW
48.17.063(((3))) (2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(((4))))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---