BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of an inhalant if he
or she possesses an inhalant to intentionally use the inhalant for the
purpose of inducing intoxication to the person who possesses the
inhalant or for the purpose of inducing intoxication to any other
person.
(2) The prohibitions of this section do not apply to any substance
that has been obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid
prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of
his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
under this chapter.
(3) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1
civil infraction punishable under RCW 7.80.120.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Inhalant" means any glue, cement, or other substance that is
capable of causing intoxication and that contains one or more of the
following chemical compounds:
(i) Acetone;
(ii) Amyl acetate;
(iii) Benzol or benzene;
(iv) Butane;
(v) Butyl acetate;
(vi) Butyl alcohol;
(vii) Carbon tetrachloride;
(viii) Chloroform;
(ix) Cyclohexanone;
(x) Difluoroethane;
(xi) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol;
(xii) Ethyl acetate;
(xiii) Hexane;
(xiv) Isopropanol or isopropyl alcohol;
(xv) Isopropyl acetate;
(xvi) Methyl cellosolve acetate;
(xvii) Methyl ethyl ketone;
(xviii) Methyl isobutyl ketone;
(xix) Nitrous oxide;
(xx) Toluol or toluene;
(xxi) Trichloroethylene;
(xxii) Tricresyl phosphate;
(xxiii) Xylol or xylene; or
(xxiv) Any other solvent, material, substance, chemical, or
combination thereof having the property of releasing toxic vapors or
fumes.
(b) "Intoxication" means any mental or physical impairment or
incapacity.

--- END ---