BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2007 c 380 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. ((Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. For
purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating
expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is
approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost
federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary
events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the
control of the county or city receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.)) The rate of tax under this
section ((shall)) may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used,
in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section ((shall))
must be used solely for criminal justice purposes. For the purposes of
this subsection, "criminal justice purposes" means additional police
protection, mitigation of congested court systems, or relief of
overcrowded jails or other local correctional facilities.
(5) Money received under this section ((shall)) must be shared
between the county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent ((shall))
must be retained by the county and forty percent ((shall)) must be
distributed on a per capita basis to cities in the county.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.050 and 2008 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section ((shall)) must be held not more than twelve months
prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the
proposition ((shall)) must state the dollar rate proposed and ((shall))
must clearly state the conditions, if any, which are applicable under
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed
before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in
levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years,
during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy ((shall))
must be used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the
succeeding year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the
dollar rate proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years
and must state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for
determining a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which
need not be the same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for
the district may be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive
years. Elections for this purpose must be held at a primary or general
election. The title of each ballot measure must state the limited
purposes for which the proposed annual increases during the specified
period of up to six consecutive years ((shall)) must be used((, and
funds raised under the levy shall not supplant existing funds used for
these purposes. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds means
the actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the
ballot measure is approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures
excludes lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans,
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract
provisions beyond the control of the taxing district receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures)).
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made shall not exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot
measure under this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the proposition.

--- END ---