BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage the safe use of
the roads by all citizens. In furtherance of this policy and in order
to reduce problematic encounters and interactions between persons with
disabilities and medical and law enforcement personnel, the legislature
further finds and declares that the department of licensing shall work
with interested parties to develop a notification sticker that
interested individuals may place on their vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In cooperation with the Washington state patrol, the department
shall work with interested parties to design a notification sticker
that may be used by an individual who has a disability or impairment
that may affect interactions with medical and law enforcement
personnel. The sticker must be yellow, bear the international symbol
of access, and contain the words "Not a Parking Permit." The
department shall design the sticker to be displayed on the upper left-hand corner of the driver's side front windshield of a vehicle or on
the vehicle's rear license plate, as determined by the department
during the design process. Upon completion, the department shall make
the design available to interested parties.

--- END ---