BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town may not impose a monetary charge on the transfer
of disposable paper shopping bags.
(2) For purposes of this section, "monetary charge" means any
governmental charge, regardless of its characterization as a fee, tax,
surcharge, or other type of monetary imposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A code city may not impose a monetary charge on the transfer of
disposable paper shopping bags.
(2) For purposes of this section, "monetary charge" means any
governmental charge, regardless of its characterization as a fee, tax,
surcharge, or other type of monetary imposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may not impose a monetary charge on the transfer of
disposable paper shopping bags.
(2) For purposes of this section, "monetary charge" means any
governmental charge, regardless of its characterization as a fee, tax,
surcharge, or other type of monetary imposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter authorizes a county or city to impose a tax
on the transfer of disposable paper shopping bags.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature intends this act to be
curative, remedial, and retrospectively applicable to January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The provisions of this act must be liberally
construed to effectuate its intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---