BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.09.5241 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Finding -- Intent) and 1993 c 149 s 1;
(2) RCW 74.09.5243 (Special education programs -- Definitions) and
1994 c 180 s 1 & 1993 c 149 s 2;
(3) RCW 74.09.5245 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Billing agent contract process) and 1993 c 149 s 3;
(4) RCW 74.09.5247 (Special education programs -- Medical services--District as billing agent -- Administrative fee) and 1994 c 180 s 2 &
1993 c 149 s 4;
(5) RCW 74.09.5249 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Billing agent duties) and 1994 c 180 s 3 & 1993 c 149 s 5;
(6) RCW 74.09.5251 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Categories of services -- Reimbursement system) and 1993 c 149 s 6;
(7) RCW 74.09.5253 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Student information -- Report to legislature) and 1994 c 180 s 4 & 1993
c 149 s 7;
(8) RCW 74.09.5254 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Reports to superintendent of public instruction) and 1994 c 180 s 5;
(9) RCW 74.09.5255 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Incentive payments) and 1999 c 318 s 2, 1999 c 318 s 1, & 1994 c 180 s
6; and
(10) RCW 74.09.5256 (Special education programs -- Medical services--Disbursement of revenue) and 1999 c 318 s 4, 1999 c 318 s 3, & 1994 c
180 s 7.

--- END ---