BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is an
information gap between emergency organizations and the general public
in the event of an ongoing emergency situation. The legislature
further finds that the public would be better served by a network that
would provide updated, regional information on the status of ongoing
emergencies; what, if any, protective measures the public should take;
and what resources are available. While providing information during
an emergency is the primary concern, the same network would provide
emergency preparedness and mitigation information before an emergency,
and recovery and mitigation information after an emergency; all of
which will contribute to making the public more prepared during an
emergency response.
(2) The adjutant general shall establish a work group to study how
to enhance the delivery of emergency information to the general public
in the event of an ongoing emergency. The work group shall consist, at
a minimum, of the following members:
(a) Two representatives of the Washington state association of
broadcasters, one representing radio broadcast and one representing
television broadcast;
(b) A representative of the emergency alert system;
(c) A representative of the national weather service;
(d) A representative of the Washington military department
emergency management division;
(e) A representative of a local emergency management organization;
(f) A representative from the 911 advisory committee;
(g) A representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(h) A representative from the field of higher education;
(i) A representative of the department of transportation; and
(j) Two members of a nonprofit, public policy organization
comprised of chief executive officers from the business sector.
(3) The work group shall consider the following issues:
(a) How to create a multilayered, comprehensive, and renewable
approach to delivering updated information in the event of an ongoing
emergency to the general public;
(b) How to use existing alert systems, including but not limited to
systems currently used by the state departments of ecology,
transportation, agriculture, health, and social and health services,
the Washington state patrol, and the state's institutions of higher
education, to coordinate delivery of updated information in the event
of an ongoing emergency;
(c) How to use the national oceanic and atmospheric administration
(NOAA) weather radio system to coordinate delivery of updated
information in the event of an ongoing emergency;
(d) How to create redundancies in the system to ensure that updated
information in the event of an ongoing emergency will be available;
(e) How to improve coordination between the emergency alert system,
NOAA weather radio, local broadcast stations, and other existing
systems to ensure a seamless transfer of information to the public on
an ongoing basis;
(f) How to take advantage of modes of communication beyond radio
and television, such as the internet, cell phone text messaging, and
other new modes to add to the multilayering and redundancy of emergency
messaging;
(g) How to integrate superintendent of public instruction
notification systems in the emergency notification systems;
(h) How to implement the statewide emergency notification system to
ensure its immediate availability to 911 public safety answering points
for local notifications;
(i) How to ensure that utilization of the system includes specific
information delivery to impacted elected officials; and
(j) What types of information the public needs the most in the
aftermath of an emergency.
(4) By December 1, 2009, the adjutant general shall submit a report
to the legislature and the governor indicating recommendations for the
delivery of emergency information to the public.
(5) The definitions in RCW 38.52.010 apply throughout this section.

--- END ---