BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall analyze and, when appropriate, certify
qualifying plans for fish passage improvement projects submitted by
eligible applicants. Only fish passage improvement projects certified
under this section may be publicized by the applicant as department-certified.
(2) The department shall certify plans for fish passage improvement
projects if:
(a) The plans are submitted by an eligible applicant under this
section;
(b) The plans provide for the best achievable outbound juvenile
salmon passage technology for the facility under review;
(c) The plans provide for a level of fish passage and survivorship
for outbound juvenile salmon superior to the minimum regulatory
standards applicable to the facility under review;
(d) The proposed installation and construction elements of the
project are designed in a manner and during a time that maximizes the
protection of fish life;
(e) The construction and materials cost envisioned in the plan
represents a more than insignificant investment given the revenue
generating capacity of the facility under review, and in no case is
estimated to be less than five million dollars.
(3) The department must identify a time to accept public comments
on any submitted plans prior to issuing a formal certification of an
applicant fish passage project. Any comments related to the decision
criteria identified in this section must be considered as part of the
decision process.
(4) Applicants for department certification under this section must
submit their plans for review after the finalization of the plans and
prior to beginning construction on the fish passage improvement
projects. The applicant may contact the department for input during
the plan's development. However, input provided by the department
during the plan development stage is not binding during the plan's
formal evaluation.
(5) All costs incurred by the department in the implementation of
this section must be reimbursed by the applicant for certification. At
the discretion of the department, funds may be collected from the
applicant at the time of application based on estimated expenses or
after the certification decision based on actual accountable costs. In
no case may the department retain payments in excess of actual costs.
(6) Plans for fish passage improvement projects may be submitted
under this section for department certification only from an electric
utility, as defined in RCW 19.29A.010, and only for projects proposed
to be part of a hydroelectric generating facility or complex that is
rated to generate less than thirty megawatts and generates electricity
by diverting water from a river that is habitat to a run or runs of a
salmonid species listed for protection under the federal endangered
species act.
(7) If a submitted plan is not certified by the department, the
applicant may redesign elements of the plan and resubmit the plan to
the department. The department may, but is not required to, provide
information to the applicant as to what changes would increase the
plan's likelihood of future certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in section 1 of this act creates new regulatory
requirements, or changes the existing regulatory requirements, for any
facility in regards to minimum fish passage requirements. Conversely,
section 1 of this act is intended to provide an incentive for eligible
applicants to design fish passage facilities that are more significant
than state and federal law requires. Participation in the department
fish passage certification program created in section 1 of this act is
strictly voluntary and has no bearing on any other state program except
where expressly identified by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The construction and installation of a fish passage improvement
project does not require a permit under this chapter if the project is
certified by the department under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest;
or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments; or
(c) Electricity from a generation facility at which the owner or
manager has fully constructed and installed fish passage improvement
projects certified by the department of fish and wildlife under section
1 of this act.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by fresh water, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy based
on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood pieces
that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black liquor
byproduct from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth forests; or
(iv) municipal solid waste.
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.57.010 and 2005 c 146 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A diversion device used for conducting water from a lake,
river, or stream for any purpose shall be equipped with a fish guard
approved by the director to prevent the passage of fish into the
diversion device. The fish guard shall be maintained at all times when
water is taken into the diversion device. The fish guards shall be
installed at places and times prescribed by the director upon thirty
days' notice to the owner of the diversion device.
(b) A diversion device equipped with a fully constructed fish
passage improvement project certified by the department under section
1 of this act is deemed in compliance with this section. However,
department certification of the fish passage improvement project
accompanying the diversion device is not a necessary element of
compliance with this section and does not represent the minimum
standard for compliance with this section.
(2) Each day the diversion device is not equipped with an approved
fish guard is a separate offense. If within thirty days after notice
to equip a diversion device the owner fails to do so, the director may
take possession of the diversion device and close the device until it
is properly equipped. Expenses incurred by the department constitute
the value of a lien upon the diversion device and upon the real and
personal property of the owner. Notice of the lien shall be filed and
recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the
action is taken.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.57.030 and 2005 c 146 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a dam or other
obstruction across or in a stream shall be provided with a durable and
efficient fishway approved by the director. Plans and specifications
shall be provided to the department prior to the director's approval.
The fishway shall be maintained in an effective condition and
continuously supplied with sufficient water to freely pass fish.
(b) A diversion device equipped with a fully constructed fish
passage improvement project certified by the department under section
1 of this act is deemed in compliance with this section. However,
department certification of the fish passage improvement project
accompanying the diversion device is not a necessary element of
compliance with this section and does not represent the minimum
standard for compliance with this section.
(2)(a) If a person fails to construct and maintain a fishway or to
remove the dam or obstruction in a manner satisfactory to the director,
then within thirty days after written notice to comply has been served
upon the owner, his or her agent, or the person in charge, the director
may construct a fishway or remove the dam or obstruction. Expenses
incurred by the department constitute the value of a lien upon the dam
and upon the personal property of the person owning the dam. Notice of
the lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county
auditor of the county in which the dam or obstruction is situated. The
lien may be foreclosed in an action brought in the name of the state.
(b) If, within thirty days after notice to construct a fishway or
remove a dam or obstruction, the owner, his or her agent, or the person
in charge fails to do so, the dam or obstruction is a public nuisance
and the director may take possession of the dam or obstruction and
destroy it. No liability shall attach for the destruction.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "other obstruction" does not
include tide gates, flood gates, and associated ((man-made)) human-made
agricultural drainage facilities that were originally installed as part
of an agricultural drainage system on or before May 20, 2003, or the
repair, replacement, or improvement of such tide gates or flood gates.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.55.021 and 2008 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, 77.55.051, ((and))
77.55.041, and section 3 of this act, in the event that any person or
government agency desires to undertake a hydraulic project, the person
or government agency shall, before commencing work thereon, secure the
approval of the department in the form of a permit as to the adequacy
of the means proposed for the protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; and
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter.
(3)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (8), (10), and
(12) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon
receipt of a complete application to grant or deny approval of a
permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(4) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be
appealable to the department or the board as specified in RCW 77.55.301
within thirty days of the notice of decision.
(5)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(6) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. The modification becomes
effective unless appealed to the department or the board as specified
in RCW 77.55.301 within thirty days from the notice of the proposed
modification. For hydraulic projects that divert water for
agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the
hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the department to show that changed
conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life.
(7) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to changed
conditions. The request must be processed within forty-five calendar
days of receipt of the written request. A decision by the department
may be appealed to the board within thirty days of the notice of the
decision. For hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(8)(a) The department, the county legislative authority, or the
governor may declare and continue an emergency. If the county
legislative authority declares an emergency under this subsection, it
shall immediately notify the department. A declared state of emergency
by the governor under RCW 43.06.010 shall constitute a declaration
under this subsection.
(b) The department, through its authorized representatives, shall
issue immediately, upon request, oral approval for a stream crossing,
or work to remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore
streambanks, protect fish life, or protect property threatened by the
stream or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of
obtaining a written permit prior to commencing work. Conditions of the
emergency oral permit must be established by the department and reduced
to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided for in this
chapter.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(9) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(10) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(11)(a) For any property, except for property located on a marine
shoreline, that has experienced at least two consecutive years of
flooding or erosion that has damaged or has threatened to damage a
major structure, water supply system, septic system, or access to any
road or highway, the county legislative authority may determine that a
chronic danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify
the department, in writing, when it determines that a chronic danger
exists. In cases of chronic danger, the department shall issue a
permit, upon request, for work necessary to abate the chronic danger by
removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring
banks, restoring road or highway access, protecting fish resources, or
protecting property. Permit requests must be made and processed in
accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(b) Any projects proposed to address a chronic danger identified
under (a) of this subsection that satisfies the project description
identified in RCW 77.55.181(1)(a)(ii) are not subject to the provisions
of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. However,
the project is subject to the review process established in RCW
77.55.181(3) as if it were a fish habitat improvement project.
(12) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.

--- END ---