BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The citizens of Washington state have long
benefited from prescription and nonprescription medicines. These
medicines allow us to live longer, healthier, and more productive
lives. After they have served their intended use, expired or left-over
drugs need to be handled safely and disposed of properly to prevent
harm to people and our environment. The legislature finds that a
convenient, safe, secure, and environmentally sound product stewardship
program for the collection, transportation, and disposal of unwanted
drugs from residential sources may help to avoid accidental poisonings,
decrease illegitimate access to drugs that can lead to abuse, and
protect our surface and groundwater. The legislature further finds
that producers of those drugs are the best entity to provide and
finance the product stewardship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of pharmacy.
(2) "Covered product" means all legend and nonlegend drugs,
including both brand name and generic drugs.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Drug wholesalers" means businesses that sell or distribute for
resale drugs to any entity other than the consumer.
(5) "Drugs" means:
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, the official national formulary, the official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement of
the formulary or those pharmacopoeias;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;
(c) Substances, other than food, intended to affect the structure
or any function of the body of humans or other animals; or
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any substances
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, but not including
medical devices or their component parts or accessories.
(6) "Entity" means a person other than a natural person.
(7) "Generic drug" means a drug that is chemically identical or
bioequivalent to a brand name drug in dosage form, safety, strength,
route of administration, quality, performance characteristics, and
intended use. However, inactive ingredients may vary.
(8) "Legend" or "prescription" drugs means any drugs, including
controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, that are required by any
applicable federal or state law or regulation to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(9) "Nonlegend" or "nonprescription" drugs means any drugs that may
be lawfully sold without a prescription.
(10) "Person" means a firm, sole proprietorship, corporation,
limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, association, cooperative, or other
entity of any kind or nature.
(11) "Plan" means a product stewardship plan required under this
chapter that describes the manner in which a product stewardship
program will be provided.
(12) "Producer" means the person who:
(a) Has legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand of the
covered product or manufactures a generic covered product sold in or
into Washington state. "Producer" does not include a retailer who puts
its store label on a covered product or a pharmacist who compounds a
prescribed individual drug product for a patient;
(b) Imports a covered product branded or manufactured by a producer
that meets the definition under (a) of this subsection and where that
producer has no physical presence in the United States; or
(c) Sells at wholesale a covered product, does not have legal
ownership of the brand, and elects to fulfill the responsibilities of
the producer for that product.
(13) "Product stewardship program" means a program for the
collection, transportation, and either recycling or disposal, or both,
of unwanted products that is financed as well as managed or provided by
the producers of those products.
(14) "Residential sources" includes single and multiple family
residences, and locations where household drugs are unused, unwanted,
disposed, or abandoned, such as hospice services, boarding homes,
schools, foster care, day care, and other locations where either people
or their pet animals, or both, reside on a temporary or permanent
basis. This does not include airport security, drug seizures by law
enforcement, pharmacy waste, business waste, or any other source
identified by the board as a nonresidential or business source.
(15) "Stewardship organization" means a person designated by a
group of producers to act as an agent on behalf of each producer to
operate a product stewardship program.
(16) "Unwanted product" means any covered product no longer wanted
by its owner or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is intended to
be discarded by its owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning January 1, 2012, every
producer of covered products sold in or into Washington state must
participate in a product stewardship program for unwanted products from
residential sources.
(2) Every producer must:
(a) Operate, either individually or jointly with other producers,
a product stewardship program; or
(b) Enter into an agreement with a stewardship organization to
operate, on the producer's behalf, a product stewardship program.
(3) A product stewardship program must be licensed by the board
prior to collecting unwanted covered products from residential sources.
(4) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
must pay all administrative and operational costs associated with their
product stewardship program, including the cost of the collection,
transportation, and disposal of the unwanted products that are
collected from residential sources and the recycling or disposal, or
both, of its related packaging that is collected with the unwanted
product.
(5) A product stewardship program must be provided without charging
any fee at the time of sale of the covered product or at the time the
unwanted products from residential sources are delivered or collected
for disposal.
(6) Unless otherwise approved by the board, each product
stewardship program must accept all unwanted products regardless of who
produces the unwanted product.
(7) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating or intending to operate a product stewardship program must
submit a product stewardship plan to the board prior to engaging in the
collection of unwanted covered products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A product stewardship plan must contain the
following:
(1) Contact information, including:
(a) The individual and the entity submitting the plan; and
(b) A list of all producers participating in the product
stewardship program and their contact information;
(2) A collection system provision that describes:
(a) How unwanted products from residential sources will be
collected in all counties in the state and, at a minimum, in all cities
with populations greater than ten thousand, including if applicable,
the location of each collection site and locations where mailers are
available; and
(b) How the collection system will be convenient and adequate to
serve the needs of residents in both urban and rural areas;
(3) A transportation and disposal system provision that includes
the name, location, permit status, and record of any penalties,
violations, or regulatory orders received in the previous five years by
each transporter and each hazardous waste disposal facility proposed to
be used by the product stewardship program;
(4) Secure tracking and handling provision that includes how the
unwanted products will be safely and securely tracked and handled from
collection through final disposal, and the policies and procedures to
be followed to ensure security;
(5) How patient information on drug packaging will be kept secure
during collection, transportation, and disposal; and
(6) A description of the public education effort and outreach
activities required under section 8 of this act and a methodology for
evaluating the effectiveness of its outreach and program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Product stewardship plans must be
submitted to the board for approval. The initial plans must be
submitted by January 1, 2011. The department of ecology shall consult
with the board on any element of the plan including transportation and
disposal systems, secure tracking and handling, package recycling,
hazardous waste permitting, and public education.
(2) Within ninety days after receipt of a plan, the board shall
approve or reject the plan. If it approves a plan, the board shall
notify the applicant of its approval. If it rejects a plan, the board
shall notify the applicant of its decision and its reasons for
rejecting the plan. An applicant whose plan has been rejected may:
(a) Submit a revised plan within sixty days after receiving notice
of the rejection; or
(b) Appeal the board's decision under the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) At least every four years, a producer, group of producers, or
stewardship organization operating a product stewardship program must
update its product stewardship plan and submit the updated plan to the
board for review.
(4) After January 1, 2011, each new producer and each producer new
to Washington state shall obtain a letter of approval from the board
for a new plan or join an approved plan upon initiating sales in or
into this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Any proposed change to a product
stewardship plan must have prior approval of the board.
(2) The product stewardship program must inform the board of
changes in collection locations and producer participation in a product
stewardship program fifteen days prior to the changes occurring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) On or before June 30, 2013, and in each
subsequent year, every producer, group of producers, or stewardship
organization operating a product stewardship program must prepare and
submit an annual report to the board describing the program's
activities during the previous reporting period. The report must
include the following:
(a) A list of producers participating in the product stewardship
program;
(b) The amount, by weight, of unwanted products collected from
residential sources, including the amount by weight of unwanted
products collected at each drop-off site, if applicable, and the total
amount by weight collected by a mail-back system, if applicable;
(c) A description of the collection system provided in each county
and in all cities with populations greater than ten thousand, including
the location of each collection site and locations where mailers are
provided, if applicable;
(d) The disposal facility or facilities used and facility location
or locations, and the weight of unwanted products collected from
residential sources disposed at each facility;
(e) If packaging is separated from the unwanted product prior to
the disposal of the unwanted product, the amount and percentage of
packaging recycled and the name and location of the material recovery
facility to which it is delivered;
(f) Any penalties, violations, or regulatory orders received during
the reporting period by each transporter and each disposal facility
that was used;
(g) Whether policies and procedures for collecting, transporting,
and disposing of unwanted products, as established in the plan, were
followed during the reporting period, and a description of any
noncompliance;
(h) Whether any safety or security problems occurred during
collection, transportation, or disposal of unwanted products during the
reporting period, and, if so, what changes have or will be made to
policies, procedures, or tracking mechanisms to alleviate the problem
and to improve safety and security in the future;
(i) A description of the public education and outreach activities
implemented during the reporting period, including the methodology used
and the results of evaluating the outreach and program activities;
(j) How the product stewardship program complied with any other
elements in the plan; and
(k) Any other information that the board may reasonably require.
(2) The board must make annual reports available to the public.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "reporting period" means the
period commencing January 1st and ending December 31st of the same
calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A product stewardship program must
promote the use of the program and the proper disposal of drugs so that
collection options are widely understood by customers, pharmacists,
retailers of covered products, and health care practitioners including
doctors and other prescribers.
(2) A product stewardship program must establish a toll-free
telephone number and web site where collection options will be
publicized and prepare educational and outreach materials describing
where and how to return unwanted drugs to the product stewardship
program. These materials must be provided to pharmacies, health care
facilities, and other interested parties for dissemination to
residential sources.
(3) A product stewardship program must annually evaluate the
effectiveness of its outreach and program activities. This evaluation
must include the percentage of residents that are aware of the program
and to what extent residents find the program convenient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Each product stewardship program must
dispose of all unwanted products from residential sources at a
hazardous waste facility. However, unwanted products from residential
sources otherwise retain all other generator exemptions for household
hazardous waste. The hazardous waste facility must be:
(a) Permitted with interim or final status under the Washington
dangerous waste rules;
(b) Authorized to manage hazardous waste by another state with a
hazardous waste program approved by the United States environmental
protection agency; or
(c) Authorized under interim status or permitted by the United
States environmental protection agency.
(2) Product stewardship programs may petition the department of
ecology for approval to use final disposal technologies that provide
superior environmental and human health protection than provided by
current hazardous waste disposal technologies for drugs if and when
those technologies are proven and available. The proposed technology
must provide equivalent protection in each, and superior protection in
one or more, of the following areas:
(a) Monitoring of any emissions or waste;
(b) Worker health and safety;
(c) Air, water, or land emissions contributing to persistent,
bioaccumulative, and toxic pollution; and
(d) Overall impact to the environment and human health.
(3) Each product stewardship program is encouraged to recycle drug
packaging if feasible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The board may refuse, suspend or revoke
the license of a product stewardship program as provided in RCW
18.64.200.
(2) If the board determines that it is necessary to protect the
public from imminent danger, it may immediately amend, suspend, or
cancel approval of a product stewardship plan without giving the person
operating the product stewardship program an opportunity to be heard.
However, the board shall give the person operating the product
stewardship program an opportunity to be heard through proceedings
consistent with RCW 18.64.200 and the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The board shall send a written warning
and a copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement this
chapter to a producer who is not participating in a product stewardship
program approved by the board and whose covered product is being sold
in or into the state.
(2) A producer not participating in a product stewardship program
licensed by the board whose covered product continues to be sold in or
into the state sixty days after receiving a written warning from the
board must be assessed a penalty of ten thousand dollars for each
calendar day that the violation continues.
(3) If an approved plan is not fully implemented within thirty days
of the planned start date, the board shall assess a penalty of five
thousand dollars along with notification to each producer associated
with the product stewardship program. If, after an additional thirty
days, an approved plan is not fully implemented, the board shall assess
a penalty of ten thousand dollars to each producer associated with the
product stewardship program. Subsequent violations occur each thirty
days that the approved plan is not fully implemented.
(4) When a product stewardship program is found to be out of
compliance with: (a) The requirement to update its plan under section
5 of this act; (b) reporting requirements under section 7 of this act;
or (c) notification requirements under section 6 of this act, each
producer in the product stewardship program must first receive a
written warning including a copy of the requirements under this chapter
and must be give thirty days to correct the noncompliance. After
thirty days, each producer in the product stewardship program must be
assessed a penalty of five thousand dollars for the first violation and
ten thousand dollars for the second and each subsequent violation. A
subsequent violation occurs each thirty days of noncompliance with the
requirements under (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(5) A producer or a product stewardship organization may appeal
penalties prescribed under this section under the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) All penalties levied under this section must be deposited into
the pharmaceutical product stewardship program account established
under section 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Beginning in 2011, each drug wholesaler
that sells any covered product in or into the state must provide a list
of producers of the covered product to the board. The list must be
provided in a form determined by the board. Wholesalers must update
the list by January 15th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The board may adopt rules necessary to
implement, administer, and enforce this chapter.
(2) The board, in consultation with the department of ecology, may
establish performance standards for product stewardship programs and
may establish administrative penalties for failure to meet the
standards.
(3) By December 31, 2014, the board shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature concerning the status of the product
stewardship program and recommendations for changes to the provisions
of this chapter.
(4) The board shall annually invite comments from health care
facilities, health care practitioners, pharmacists, local governments,
and citizens on their satisfaction with the services provided by a
product stewardship program. This information must be used by the
board, in consultation with the department of ecology, in reviewing
proposed plan updates and revisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The secretary of the department may
establish fees for administering this chapter as provided under RCW
43.70.250. The fees may be charged to producers or to persons
operating a product stewardship program. All fees charged must be
based on factors relating to administering this chapter. Fees may be
established in amounts to fully recover and not to exceed expenses
incurred by the board in administering this chapter. The board may use
these fee revenues to reimburse the department of ecology for its
costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The pharmaceutical product stewardship
program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from fees and penalties collected under this chapter must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for administering this chapter. Only the secretary of the
department or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If necessary to ensure that money is
available in the pharmaceutical product stewardship program account
created in section 15 of this act for the initial administration of the
product stewardship program for unwanted drugs from residential
sources, the director of the department of ecology may lend moneys from
the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.105D.070 to the
pharmaceutical product stewardship program account. These loaned
moneys may be expended solely for the initial administration of the
program by the board and the department of ecology under this chapter.
The board shall repay the state toxics control account the amount of
moneys loaned plus interest as determined by the state treasurer within
two years of the date of the loan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
must apply for a license from the board to operate a pharmaceutical
product stewardship program under chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 22 of this act). The license entitles the holder to
operate a pharmaceutical product stewardship program for the
collection, transportation, and disposal of unwanted legend and
nonlegend drugs from consumers or residential sources and not business
entities.
(2) The applicant must demonstrate the competence and knowledge to
operate the product stewardship program.
(3) The board shall consider the past history of the applicant, the
firm officers, and employees when considering the application. A
finding of any drug offense is presumptive reason for denial or
revocation of the license by the board.
(4) A license may not be granted prior to approval by the board of
the product stewardship plan required under section 5 of this act.
(5) The license is for a specified period ending on the date to be
determined by the secretary.
(6) A license may be revoked or suspended if a product stewardship
program fails to comply with the approved elements of its product
stewardship plan.
(7) The board, department of ecology, or department of health staff
may access any facilities, property, or records of the product
stewardship program as necessary to conduct inspections or investigate
complaints.

Sec. 18 RCW 69.41.030 and 2003 c 142 s 3 and 2003 c 53 s 323 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or
possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a
physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53
RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed
forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official
duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans
administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under
chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW
when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the
medical quality assurance commission, a physician licensed to practice
medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic
medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine
and surgery, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary
medicine, in any province of Canada which shares a common border with
the state of Washington or in any state of the United States:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale,
delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or
their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the
scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or
warehouseman, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend
drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall
prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the
department of social and health services from selling, delivering,
possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives
prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners.
(2) A pharmaceutical product stewardship program licensed by the
Washington state board of pharmacy may possess and transport drugs
provided that the product stewardship program complies with this
chapter.
(3)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or
possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 19 RCW 18.64.005 and 1990 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Regulate the practice of pharmacy and enforce all laws placed
under its jurisdiction;
(2) Prepare or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading
of, examinations for applicants for pharmacists' licenses;
(3) Establish the qualifications for licensure of pharmacists or
pharmacy interns;
(4) Conduct hearings for the revocation or suspension of licenses,
permits, registrations, certificates, or any other authority to
practice granted by the board, which hearings may also be conducted by
an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW;
(5) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
hearing, or disciplinary proceeding held under this chapter or any
other chapter assigned to the board;
(6) Assist the regularly constituted enforcement agencies of this
state in enforcing all laws pertaining to drugs, controlled substances,
and the practice of pharmacy, or any other laws or rules under its
jurisdiction;
(7) Promulgate rules for the dispensing, distribution, wholesaling,
and manufacturing of drugs and devices and the practice of pharmacy for
the protection and promotion of the public health, safety, and welfare.
Violation of any such rules shall constitute grounds for refusal,
suspension, or revocation of licenses or any other authority to
practice issued by the board;
(8) Adopt rules establishing and governing continuing education
requirements for pharmacists and other licensees applying for renewal
of licenses under this chapter;
(9) Be immune, collectively and individually, from suit in any
action, civil or criminal, based upon any disciplinary proceedings or
other official acts performed as members of such board. Such immunity
shall apply to employees of the department when acting in the course of
disciplinary proceedings;
(10) Suggest strategies for preventing, reducing, and eliminating
drug misuse, diversion, and abuse, including professional and public
education, and treatment of persons misusing and abusing drugs;
(11) Conduct or encourage educational programs to be conducted to
prevent the misuse, diversion, and abuse of drugs for health care
practitioners and licensed or certified health care facilities;
(12) Monitor trends of drug misuse, diversion, and abuse and make
periodic reports to disciplinary boards of licensed health care
practitioners and education, treatment, and appropriate law enforcement
agencies regarding these trends;
(13) Enter into written agreements with all other state and federal
agencies with any responsibility for controlling drug misuse,
diversion, or abuse and with health maintenance organizations, health
care service contractors, and health care providers to assist and
promote coordination of agencies responsible for ensuring compliance
with controlled substances laws and to monitor observance of these laws
and cooperation between these agencies. The department of social and
health services, the department of labor and industries, and any other
state agency including licensure disciplinary boards, shall refer all
apparent instances of over-prescribing by practitioners and all
apparent instances of legend drug overuse to the department. The
department shall also encourage such referral by health maintenance
organizations, health service contractors, and health care providers;
(14) Adopt rules to implement, administer, and enforce the laws on
the collection, transportation, disposal, and possession of unwanted
drugs from residential sources through producer provided and funded
product stewardship programs under chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 22 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide such service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Nothing in this chapter applies to
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, whose pharmaceutical wastes
are disposed of under rules and policies adopted by the department of
ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 16, 20, and 21 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act must be liberally construed to
carry out its purposes and objectives.

--- END ---