BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the linked
deposit program is not accessible to many certified small businesses
that the program was created to serve. The legislature further finds
that the increased involvement of community development financial
institutions in the linked deposit program could increase the
participation of these small businesses. The legislature intends that
the office of minority and women's business enterprises report to the
legislature with an analysis of barriers faced by certified small
businesses that are currently not able to participate in the linked
deposit program and make recommendations on how to overcome those
barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2009, the office of minority
and women's business enterprises shall, in consultation with the state
treasurer and within existing resources, submit a report with
recommendations to the legislature that addresses the following issues:
(1) The availability of sources of capital for certified borrowers,
including the amounts and interest rates for that capital;
(2) The loans that are not being funded for certified borrowers
under the current program and why those loans are not being funded;
(3) The availability of other sources of capital in the marketplace
for those nonfunded loans of certified borrowers, including the amounts
and interest rates for that capital;
(4) Whether there are other institutions that may be willing to
make those loans that are currently not being made to certified
borrowers under the program;
(5) Whether the program could be modified to encourage lenders to
make those loans that are not currently being made to certified
borrowers and whether the cost of those loans would be a barrier;
(6) A review of how other states seek to increase access to capital
for borrowers that traditionally lack access to capital; and
(7) The role community development financial institutions could
play in mitigating the cost of lending to certified borrowers who are
not currently being served by the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---