BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.89.020 and 2006 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Affected producer" means any producer who is subject to this
chapter.
(2))) "Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as the terms
are defined in chapter 66.04 RCW.
(((3))) (2) "Commission" means the Washington beer commission.
(((4))) (3) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(((5))) (4) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's duly authorized representative.
(((6))) (5) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning
with January 1st of any year and ending December 31st.
(((7))) (6) "Producer" means any person or other entity licensed
under Title 66 RCW to produce beer within Washington ((state and who
produces less than one hundred thousand barrels of beer annually per
location)).
(((8))) (7) "Referendum" means a vote by ((affected)) producers
that is conducted by secret ballot.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.89.040 and 2006 c 330 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a petition containing the signatures of five
beer producers from a statewide Washington state craft brewing trade
association or from other ((affected)) producers to implement this
chapter and to determine producer participation in the commission and
assessment under this chapter, the director shall:
(a) Conduct a referendum of beer producers. The requirements of
assent or approval of the referendum are met if:
(i) At least fifty-one percent by numbers of ((affected)) producers
participating in the referendum vote affirmatively; and
(ii) Thirty percent of the ((affected)) producers and thirty
percent of the production have been represented in the referendum to
determine assent or approval of participation and assessment. The
referendum shall be conducted within sixty days of receipt of the
petition; and
(b) Establish a list of beer producers from information provided by
the petitioners, by obtaining information on beer producers from
applicable producer organizations or associations or other sources
identified as maintaining the information. In establishing a current
list of beer producers and their individual production, the director
shall use the beer producer's name, mailing address, and production by
the producer in the preceding fiscal year. Information on each
producer shall be mailed to each beer producer on record with the
director for verification. All corrections shall be filed with the
director within twenty days from the date of mailing. The list of
((affected)) producers shall be kept in a file by the director. The
list shall be certified as a true representation of the referendum
mailing list. Inadvertent failure to notify ((an affected)) a producer
does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter. The
director shall provide the commission the list of ((affected))
producers after assent in a referendum as provided in this section.
(2) If the director determines that the requisite assent has been
given in the referendum conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
the director shall:
(a) Within sixty days after assent of the referendum held, appoint
the members of the commission; and
(b) Direct the commission to put into force the assessment as
provided for in RCW 15.89.110.
(3) If the director determines that the requisite assent has not
been given in the referendum conducted under subsection (1) of this
section, the director shall take no further action to implement or
enforce this chapter.
(4) Upon completion of the referendum conducted under subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall tally the results of the vote
and provide the results to ((affected)) producers. If ((an affected))
a producer disputes the results of a vote, that producer within sixty
days from the announced results, shall provide in writing a statement
of why the vote is disputed and request a recount. Once the vote is
tallied and distributed, all disputes are resolved, and all matters in
a vote are finalized, the individual ballots may be destroyed.
(5) Before conducting the referendum provided for in subsection (1)
of this section, the director may require the petitioners to deposit
with him or her an amount of money as the director deems necessary to
defray the expenses of conducting the referendum. The director shall
provide the petitioners an estimate of expenses that may be incurred to
conduct a referendum before any service takes place. Petitioners shall
deposit funds with the director to pay for expenses incurred by the
department. The commission shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid
to the department when funds become available. However, if for any
reason the referendum process is discontinued, the petitioners shall
reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department up
until the time the process is discontinued.
(6) The director is not required to hold a referendum under
subsection (1) of this section more than once in any twelve-month
period.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.89.050 and 2006 c 330 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint the producer members of the
commission. In making appointments, no later than ninety days before
an expiration of a commission member's term, the director shall call
for recommendations for commission member positions, and the director
shall take into consideration recommendations made by a statewide
Washington state craft brewing trade association or other ((affected))
producers. In appointing persons to the commission, the director shall
seek a balanced representation on the commission that reflects the
composition of the beer producers throughout the state on the basis of
beer produced and geographic location. Information on beer production
by geographic location shall be provided by the commission upon the
director's request.
(2) If a position on the commission becomes vacant due to
resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the
commission shall notify the director and the unexpired term shall
immediately be filled by appointment by the director.
(3) Each member or employee of the commission shall be reimbursed
for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter as
defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule,
reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.89.070 and 2007 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission
through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which
beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the
commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an
exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66
RCW and rules adopted by the liquor control board under which such
events may be conducted;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter;
(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of
the commission and not for any individual producer;
(17) ((Until July 1, 2009,)) Receive such gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to
the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 5 RCW 15.89.100 and 2006 c 330 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall prepare a list of all ((affected))
producers from information available from the liquor control board, the
department, or the producers' association. This list must contain the
names and addresses of ((affected)) producers within this state and the
amount, by barrelage, of beer produced during the period designated by
the commission. A qualified person may, at any time, have his or her
name placed upon the list by delivering or mailing the information to
the commission. This list shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in
accordance with evidence and information available to the commission by
December 31st of each year. For the purposes of giving notice and
holding referendums, the list updated before the date for issuing
notices or ballots is the list of all producers entitled to notice, to
assent or dissent, or to vote. Inadvertent failure to notify a
producer does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.
(2) It is the responsibility of ((affected)) producers to ensure
that their correct address is filed with the commission. It is also
the responsibility of ((affected)) producers to submit production data
to the commission as prescribed by this chapter.
(3) The commission shall develop a reporting system to document
that the ((affected)) producers in this state are reporting quantities
of beer produced and are paying the assessment as provided in RCW
15.89.110.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.89.110 and 2006 c 330 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to referendum in accordance with RCW 15.89.040, there
is levied, and the commission shall collect, upon beer produced by ((an
affected)) a producer, an annual assessment of ten cents per barrel of
beer produced, up to ten thousand barrels per location.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the time, place,
and method for payment and collection of this assessment and provide
for the collection of assessments from ((affected)) producers who ship
directly out-of-state.
(3) The commission may reduce the assessment per ((affected))
producer based upon in-kind contributions to the commission.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.28.010 and 2008 c 94 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall
have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail
business, unless the retail business is owned by a corporation in which
a manufacturer or importer has no direct stock ownership and there are
no interlocking officers and directors, the retail license is held by
a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by a
manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property as a hotel, alcoholic
beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board
reviews the ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved
entities and determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of
control or undue influence over the operation or the retail licensee;
nor shall any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative has any interest unless title to that property is owned
by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no direct stock ownership
and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the retail license
is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by
the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, no manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative shall advance moneys or moneys' worth to a licensed
person under an arrangement, nor shall such licensed person receive,
under an arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth. "Person"
as used in this section only shall not include those state or federally
chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and loan
associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks, or
institutional investors which are not controlled directly or indirectly
by a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized representative
as long as the bank, savings and loan association, or institutional
investor does not influence or attempt to influence the purchasing
practices of the retailer with respect to alcoholic beverages. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, no manufacturer, importer,
distributor, or authorized representative shall be eligible to receive
or hold a retail license under this title, nor shall such manufacturer,
importer, distributor, or authorized representative sell at retail any
liquor as herein defined. A corporation granted an exemption under
this subsection may use debt instruments issued in connection with
financing construction or operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and at one additional off-site retail only
location and nothing in this section shall prohibit a domestic winery
from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the
purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the winery premises. Such
beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject to the taxes imposed
by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting and bonding
requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the board pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by the
brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine
distributor. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a microbrewery
holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.320 from
holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the beer
and/or wine restaurant license. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
a licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own production
under RCW 66.24.145.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and
endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license. This section does not prohibit a brewery or microbrewery
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license or a beer and/or
wine license under chapter 66.24 RCW operated on the premises of the
brewery or microbrewery from holding a second retail only license at a
location separate from the premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits retail licensees with a
caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from
operating on a domestic winery premises.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits an organization qualifying
under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the purpose of constructing and
operating a facility to promote Washington wines from holding retail
licenses on the facility property or leasing all or any portion of such
facility property to a retail licensee on the facility property if the
members of the board of directors or officers of the board for the
organization include officers, directors, owners, or employees of a
licensed domestic winery. Financing for the construction of the
facility must include both public and private money.
(f) Nothing in this section prohibits a bona fide charitable
nonprofit society or association registered under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code, or a local wine industry association
registered under section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code as it
exists on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(g)(i) Nothing in this section prohibits domestic wineries and
retailers licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local wine industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, domestic wineries, and
their products.
(ii) Nothing in this section prohibits: (A) Domestic wineries,
domestic breweries, microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders
licensed under this chapter from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and (B)
retailers licensed under this chapter from listing on their internet
web sites information related to domestic wineries, domestic breweries,
microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders whose products
those retailers sell or promote, including direct links to the domestic
wineries', domestic breweries', microbreweries', and certificate of
approval holders' web sites.
(h) Nothing in this section prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder licensed under RCW 66.24.206(1)(a) for or on behalf
of a licensed retail business when the personal services are (i)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (ii) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring at the premises of a retailer holding a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or beer
restaurant license, or a specialty wine shop license; bottle signings;
and other similar informational or educational activities. A domestic
winery or certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform
any such personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a
domestic winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any
personal service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail
licensee. Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling
may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer,
importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits domestic
wineries and retail licensees from identifying the wineries on private
labels authorized under RCW ((66.24.400,)) 66.24.425((,)) and
66.24.450.
(i) ((Until July 1, 2007, nothing in this section prohibits a
nonprofit statewide organization of microbreweries formed for the
purpose of promoting Washington's craft beer industry as a trade
association registered as a 501(c) with the internal revenue service
from holding a special occasion license to conduct up to six beer
festivals.
(j))) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a manufacturer,
importer, or distributor from entering into an arrangement with any
holder of a sports/entertainment facility license or an affiliated
business for brand advertising at the licensed facility or promoting
events held at the sports entertainment facility as authorized under
RCW 66.24.570.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsections (1)(g) and (h) and
(3)(a) of this section in accordance with the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(5) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not
violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

--- END ---