BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
large, unmet need for affordable housing and affordable housing
assistance in the state of Washington, causing many low-income
individuals and families to be at risk of homelessness. The
legislature declares that a decent and affordable home in a healthy,
safe environment for all economic segments in the state by 2020 should
be a state goal. Furthermore, this goal includes increasing the
percentage of low-income households who are ultimately able to obtain
and retain housing without government subsidies or other public
support.
(2) The legislature finds that the state should provide financial
resources as well as case management to help individuals and families
at risk of homelessness obtain and retain housing and work towards a
goal of self-sufficiency where possible.
(3) The legislature finds that there are many root causes of the
affordable housing shortage and declares that it is critical that such
causes be analyzed, effective solutions be developed, implemented,
monitored, and evaluated, and that these causal factors be eliminated.
The legislature also finds that there is a taxpayer and societal cost
associated with a lack of jobs that pay self-sufficiency standard wages
and a shortage of affordable housing, and that the state must identify
and quantify that cost.
(4) The legislature finds that the support and commitment of all
sectors of the statewide community is critical to accomplishing the
state's affordable housing for all goal. The legislature finds that
the provision of housing and housing-related services should be
administered both at the state level and at the local level. However,
the state should play a primary role in: Providing financial resources
to achieve the goal at all levels of government; researching,
evaluating, benchmarking, and implementing best practices; continually
updating and evaluating statewide housing data; developing a state plan
that integrates the strategies, goals, objectives, and performance
measures of all other state housing plans and programs; coordinating
and supporting county government plans and activities; and directing
quality management practices by monitoring both state and county
government performance towards achieving interim and ultimate goals.
(5) The legislature declares that the systematic and comprehensive
performance measurement and evaluation of progress toward interim goals
and the immediate state affordable housing goal of a decent and
affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for all economic
segments in the state by 2020 is a necessary component of the statewide
effort to end the affordable housing crisis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington affordable housing for all act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created within the department the
state affordable housing for all program. The goal of the program is
a decent and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for all
economic segments in the state by 2020. Additional goals include:
Increasing the percentage of households of all economic segments in the
state who are self-sufficient as defined by the department according to
the self-sufficiency income standard determined under section 19 of
this act; and keeping the rising price of housing for all economic
segments to a rate less than that of the growth in wages for each
economic segment. The department shall develop appropriate performance
measures for all goals. The department shall develop, by county for
each economic segment, the quantity and dollar price of housing needed
and administer the affordable housing for all program. Each county
shall participate in the affordable housing for all program except as
provided in section 8 of this act; however, in the development and
implementation of the program scope and requirements at the county
level, the department shall consider: The funding level to counties,
number of county staff available to implement the program, and
competency of each county to meet the goals of the program; and
establish program guidelines, performance measures, and reporting
requirements appropriate to the existing capacity of the participating
counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Affordable housing" means housing that has a sales price or
rental amount that is within the means of households of all economic
segments. The department shall adopt policies for residential rental
and homeownership housing occupied by extremely low, very low, and low-income households, and for each wage decile by county, that specify the
percentage of household income that may be spent on monthly housing
costs, including utilities other than telephone, to qualify as
affordable housing.
(2) "Affordable housing for all program" means the program
authorized under this chapter, as administered by the department at the
state level and by each county at the local level.
(3) "At risk of homelessness" means any extremely low-income or
very low-income individual or family residing in substandard or
overcrowded housing or who is severely cost burdened, spending more
than fifty percent of their income for their housing, including
utilities other than telephone.
(4) "County" means a county government in the state of Washington
or, except under RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by this act), a city
government or collaborative of city governments within that county if
(a) the county government declines to participate in the affordable
housing program and (b) as described under section 8 of this act, a
city or collaborative of city governments elects to participate in the
program.
(5) "County affordable housing for all plan" or "county plan" means
the plan developed by each county with the goal of ensuring that
households of all economic segments in the county have a decent and
affordable home in a healthy, safe environment by 2020.
(6) "County affordable housing task force" means a county
committee, as described in section 6 of this act, created to prepare
and recommend to its county legislative authority a county affordable
housing for all plan, and also to recommend expenditures of the funds
from the affordable housing for all program surcharge in RCW 36.22.178
(as recodified by this act) and all other sources directed to the
county's affordable housing for all program.
(7) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(9) "Economic segments" means segments of the population divided by
wage deciles.
(10) "Eligible organizations" means eligible organizations as
described in RCW 43.185.060.
(11) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person,
family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is
less than thirty percent of the median family income, adjusted for
household size for the county where the project is located.
(12) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated
persons living together.
(13) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations
created in RCW 35.82.030.
(14) "Local government" means a county or city government in the
state of Washington or, except under RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by
this act), a city government or collaborative of city governments
within that county if (a) the county government declines to participate
in the affordable housing program and (b) as described under section 8
of this act, a city or collaborative of city governments elects to
participate in the program.
(15) "Low-income household," for the purposes of the affordable
housing for all program, means a single person, family, or unrelated
persons living together whose adjusted income is less than eighty
percent of the median household income, adjusted for household size for
the county where the project is located.
(16) "Nonprofit organization" means any public or private nonprofit
organization that: (a) Is organized under federal, state, or local
laws; (b) has no part of its net earnings inuring to the benefit of any
member, founder, contributor, or individual; and (c) has among its
purposes, significant activities related to the provision of decent
housing that is affordable to extremely low-income, very low-income,
low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs
populations.
(17) "Performance evaluation" means the process of evaluating
performance by established objective, measurable criteria according to
the achievement of outlined goals, measures, targets, standards, or
other outcomes using a ranked scorecard from highest to lowest
performance that employs a scale of one to one hundred, one hundred
being the optimal score.
(18) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing
specific measures of success with ultimate and interim goals.
(19) "Quality management program" means a nationally recognized
program using criteria similar or equivalent to the Baldridge criteria.
All local governments receiving over five hundred thousand dollars a
year during the previous calendar year from: State housing-related
funding sources, including the Washington housing trust fund; the
ending homelessness program surcharges in RCW 36.22.179 and 36.22.1791
(as recodified by this act); and any surcharges in chapter 43.185C RCW
and the surcharges in RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by this act), shall
apply to the Washington state quality award program for an independent
assessment of its quality management, accountability, and performance
system, once every three years beginning by January 1, 2011.
(20) "State affordable housing for all plan" or "state plan" means
the plan developed by the department in collaboration with the
affordable housing advisory board with the goal of ensuring that all
economic segments in Washington have a decent and affordable home in a
healthy, safe environment by 2020.
(21) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than
fifty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size
for the county where the project is located.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.185B.040 and 1993 c 478 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the affordable
housing advisory board created in RCW 43.185B.020, prepare and ((from
time to time amend a five-year)) biannually update a state affordable
housing ((advisory)) for all plan with an ultimate goal of achieving a
decent and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for all
economic segments by decile by county in the state by 2020. The state
plan must also incorporate the strategies, objectives, goals, and
performance measures of all other housing-related state plans,
including the state homeless housing strategic plan required under RCW
43.185C.040 and all state housing programs. The state affordable
housing for all plan may be combined with the state homeless housing
strategic plan required under RCW 43.185C.040 or any other existing
state housing plan as long as the requirements of all of the plans to
be merged are met.
(2) The purpose of the state affordable housing for all plan is to:
(a) Document biannually the quantity and price per month need for
affordable housing for each local jurisdiction by economic segment in
the state and the extent to which that need is being met through public
and private sector ((programs, to)) housing efforts;
(b) Outline the development of sound strategies and programs to
provide affordable housing to all economic segments in the state by
2020;
(c) Measure the success of moving people in state government
supported housing programs to self-sufficiency;
(d) Measure the cost-efficiency of government supported housing
programs, including the documentation of the state and local cost per
unit of housing with a goal of reducing the state subsidized portion to
the greatest extent possible;
(e) Establish, evaluate, and report upon performance measures,
goals, and timelines that are determined by the department for the
affordable housing for all program and the state and local affordable
housing for all plans, as well as for all federal, state, and local
housing programs and plans operated or coordinated by the department,
including: (i) Federal block grant programs; (ii) the Washington
housing trust fund; and (iii) all local surcharge funds collected with
the purpose of addressing homelessness and affordable housing; and
(f) Facilitate state and county government planning to meet the
state affordable housing ((needs of the state, and to enable the
development of sound strategies and programs for affordable housing))
for all goal.
((The information in the five-year housing advisory plan must
include:
(a) An assessment of the state's housing market trends;
(b) An assessment of the housing needs for all economic segments of
the state and special needs populations;
(c) An inventory of the supply and geographic distribution of
affordable housing units made available through public and private
sector programs;
(d) A status report on the degree of progress made by the public
and private sector toward meeting the housing needs of the state;
(e) An identification of state and local regulatory barriers to
affordable housing and proposed regulatory and administrative
techniques designed to remove barriers to the development and placement
of affordable housing; and
(f) Specific recommendations, policies, or proposals for meeting
the affordable housing needs of the state.
(2))) (3)(a) The department, in consultation with the affordable
housing advisory board, shall develop recommendations for affordable
housing for all program performance measures, short-term and long-term
goals, and timelines, as well as information to be collected, analyzed,
and reported upon in the state and local affordable housing for all
plans. One performance measure must address the program's
effectiveness in achieving the ultimate goal of a decent and affordable
home in a healthy, safe environment for all economic segments in the
state by 2020. A second specific performance measure must be to ensure
that the rate of growth in the overall price of housing for each
economic segment is less than that of the overall growth in wages for
each economic segment. The department shall present its
recommendations for additional performance measures to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2009.
(b) The department may determine a timeline to implement and
measure each performance measure for the state and county affordable
housing for all programs, except that the state and all counties
participating in the affordable housing for all program must implement
and respond to all performance measures by January 1, 2012, unless the
department determines that a performance measure is not applicable to
a specific county based on parameters and thresholds established by the
department.
(4) The ((five-year)) state affordable housing ((advisory)) for all
plan required under ((subsection (1) of)) this section must be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature on or before
((February 1, 1994)) January 15, 2011, and subsequent updated plans
must be submitted ((every five years)) by January 15th each year
thereafter.
(((b) Each February 1st, beginning February 1, 1995, the department
shall submit an annual progress report, to the legislature, detailing
the extent to which the state's affordable housing needs were met
during the preceding year and recommendations for meeting those needs))
(5) To guide counties in preparation of their county affordable
housing for all plans required under section 7 of this act, the
department shall issue, by December 31, 2010, guidelines for preparing
county plans consistent with this chapter. County plans must include,
at a minimum, the same information reporting and analysis on a local
level and the same performance measures as the state plan.
(6) Biannually, beginning in 2011, the department shall summarize
key information from county plans, including a summary of local city
and county housing program activities and a summary of legislative
recommendations.
(7) Based on changes to the general population and in the housing
market, the department may revise the performance measures and goals of
the state affordable housing for all plan and set goals for years
following December 31, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Each county shall convene a county
affordable housing task force. The task force must be a committee,
made up of volunteers, created to prepare and recommend to the county
legislative authority a county affordable housing for all plan and also
to recommend appropriate expenditures of the affordable housing for all
program funds provided for in RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by this act)
and any other sources directed to the county program. The county
affordable housing task force must include a representative of the
county, a representative from the city with the highest population in
the county, a representative from all other cities in the county with
a population greater than fifty thousand, a member representing
beneficiaries of affordable housing programs, other members as may be
required to maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing
programs and services, and a representative from both a private
nonprofit organization and a private for-profit organization with
experience in very low-income housing. The task force may be the same
as the homeless housing task force created in RCW 43.185C.160 or the
same as another existing task force or other formal committee that
meets the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Except as provided in section 8 of this
act, each county shall direct its affordable housing task force to
prepare and recommend to its county legislative authority a county
affordable housing for all plan for its jurisdictional area. Each
county shall adopt a county plan by June 30, 2011, and update the plan
annually by June 30th thereafter. All county plans must be forwarded
to the department by the date of adoption. County affordable housing
for all plans may be combined with the local homeless housing plans
required under RCW 43.185C.040, county comprehensive plans required
under RCW 36.70A.040, or any other existing plan addressing housing
within a county as long as the requirements of all of the plans to be
merged are met. For counties required or choosing to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, county affordable housing for all plans must be consistent
with the housing elements of comprehensive plans described in RCW
36.70A.070(2). County plans must also be consistent with any existing
local homeless housing plan required in RCW 43.185C.050. County plans
must include a discussion of the effectiveness of linkages and
coordination with county or regional community services and economic
development plans.
(2) County affordable housing for all plans must be primarily
focused on (a) ensuring that households of all economic segments,
including those households at risk of homelessness, in the county
jurisdictional area have a decent and affordable home in a healthy,
safe environment by 2020 with a priority placed on achieving this goal
for low-income households and (b) increasing the percentage of
households who ultimately are able to access affordable housing without
government assistance. County affordable housing for all plans must
include:
(i) At a minimum, the same information, analysis, and performance
measures as the state affordable housing for all plan, including
information and performance measurement data, where available, on state
supported housing programs and all city and county housing programs,
including local housing-related levy initiatives, housing-related tax
exemption programs, and federally funded programs operated or
coordinated by local governments;
(ii) Timelines for the accomplishment of interim goals and targets,
and for the acquisition of projected financing that is appropriate for
outlined goals and targets;
(iii) An identification of challenges to reaching the affordable
housing for all goal;
(iv) A total estimated amount of funds needed to reach the local
affordable housing for all goal and an identification of potential
funding sources; and
(v) State legislative recommendations to enable the county to
achieve its affordable housing for all goals. Legislative
recommendations must be specific and, if necessary, include an
estimated amount of funding required and suggestions of an appropriate
funding source.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Any county may decline to participate in
the affordable housing for all program authorized in this chapter by
forwarding to the department a resolution adopted by the county
legislative authority stating the intention not to participate. A copy
of the resolution must also be transmitted to the county auditor and
treasurer. Counties that decline to participate shall not be required
to establish an affordable housing task force or to create a county
affordable housing for all plan. Counties declining to participate in
the affordable housing for all program shall continue to collect and
utilize the affordable housing for all surcharge for the purposes
described in RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by this act); however, such
counties shall not be allocated any additional affordable housing for
all program funding that is specifically provided for program planning,
implementation, performance and quality management, and administrative
purposes. Counties may opt back into the affordable housing for all
program authorized by this chapter at a later date through a process
and timeline to be determined by the department.
(2) If a county declines to participate in the affordable housing
for all program authorized in this chapter, a city or formally
organized collaborative of cities within that county may forward a
resolution to the department stating its intention and willingness to
operate an affordable housing for all program within its jurisdictional
limits. The department must establish procedures to choose amongst
cities or collaboratives of cities in the event that more than one city
or collaborative of cities express an interest in participating in the
program. Participating cities or collaboratives of cities must fulfill
the same requirements as counties participating in the affordable
housing for all program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A county may subcontract with any other
county, city, town, housing authority, community action agency, or
other nonprofit organization for the execution of programs contributing
to the affordable housing for all goal. All subcontracts must be:
Consistent with the county affordable housing for all plan adopted by
the legislative authority of the county; time limited; and filed with
the department, and must have specific performance terms as specified
by the county. County governments must strongly encourage each
subcontractor under the affordable housing for all program to apply to
the Washington state quality award program for an independent
assessment of its quality management, accountability, and performance
system. This authority to subcontract with other entities does not
affect participating counties' ultimate responsibility for meeting the
requirements of the affordable housing for all program.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.22.178 and 2007 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The surcharge provided for in this section shall be named the
affordable housing for all surcharge.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge authorized by law. The county may retain up to five
percent of these funds collected solely for the collection,
administration, and local distribution of these funds. Of the
remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated through this
surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who will
deposit the funds into the affordable housing for all account created
in RCW 43.185C.190. The department of community, trade, and economic
development must use these funds to provide housing and shelter for
extremely low-income households, including but not limited to grants
for building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects or
units within housing projects that are affordable to extremely low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area
median income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover
ongoing operating expenses.
(2) All of the remaining funds generated by this surcharge will be
retained by the county and be deposited into a fund that must be used
by the county and its cities and towns for eligible housing activities
as described in this subsection that serve very low-income households
with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income. The
portion of the surcharge retained by a county shall be allocated to
eligible housing activities that serve extremely low and very low-income households in the county and the cities within a county
according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities
within the county consistent with countywide and local housing needs
and policies. A priority must be given to eligible housing activities
that serve extremely low-income households with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income. Eligible housing activities
to be funded by these county funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income households with incomes at or below fifty percent of the
area median income, including units for homeownership, rental units,
seasonal and permanent farm worker housing units, and single room
occupancy units;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive housing
trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income households with
incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income, and that
require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating
expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers for housing units that are
affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below fifty
percent of the area median income, to be administered by a local public
housing authority or other local organization that has an existing
rental assistance voucher program, consistent with or similar to the
United States department of housing and urban development's section 8
rental assistance voucher program standards; and
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters.
(3) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(4) All counties shall report at least biannually beginning May 1,
2010, upon receipts and expenditures of the affordable housing for all
surcharge funds created in this section to the department. The
department may require more frequent reports. The report must include
the amount of funding generated by the surcharge, the total amount of
funding distributed to date, the amount of funding allocated to each
eligible housing activity, a description of each eligible housing
activity funded, including information on the income or wage level and
numbers of extremely low, very low, and low-income households the
eligible housing activity is intended to serve, and the outcome or
anticipated outcome of each eligible housing activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter does not require either the
department or any local government to expend any funds to accomplish
the goals of this chapter other than the revenues authorized in this
act and other revenue that may be appropriated by the legislature for
these purposes. However, neither the department nor any local
government may use any funds authorized in this act to supplant or
reduce any existing expenditures of public money to address the
affordable housing shortage.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.185A.100 and 2006 c 349 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department((,)) shall collaborate with the housing finance
commission, the affordable housing advisory board, and all local
governments, housing authorities, and other ((nonprofits)) eligible
organizations receiving state housing funds, affordable housing for all
funds, home security funds, or financing through the housing finance
commission ((shall, by December 31, 2006, and annually thereafter,
review current housing reporting requirements related to housing
programs and services and give)) to include in the state affordable
housing for all plan, by December 31, 2010, recommendations, where
possible:
(1) To streamline and simplify all housing planning, application,
and reporting requirements ((to the department of community, trade, and
economic development, which will compile and present the
recommendations annually to the legislature. The entities listed in
this section shall also give recommendations for additional)); and
(2) For legislative actions that could promote the affordable
housing for all goal and the state goal to end homelessness.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.185.070 and 2005 c 518 s 1802 and 2005 c 219 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which funds from the housing trust
fund or other legislative appropriations are available for use by the
department for the housing assistance program, the department shall
announce to all known interested parties, and through major media
throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days' duration. This announcement shall be made as often as the
director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The
department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the
department. Administrative costs paid out of the housing trust fund
may not exceed five percent of annual revenues available for
distribution to housing trust fund projects. In awarding funds under
this chapter, the department shall provide for a geographic
distribution on a statewide basis.
(2) The department shall give first priority to applications for
projects and activities which utilize existing privately owned housing
stock including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit
public development authorities and public housing authorities as
created in chapter 35.82 RCW. As used in this subsection, privately
owned housing stock includes housing that is acquired by a federal
agency through a default on the mortgage by the private owner. Such
projects and activities shall be evaluated under subsection (3) of this
section. Second priority shall be given to activities and projects
which utilize existing publicly owned housing stock. All projects and
activities shall be evaluated by some or all of the criteria under
subsection (3) of this section, and similar projects and activities
shall be evaluated under the same criteria.
(3) The department shall give preference for applications based on
some or all of the criteria under this subsection, and similar projects
and activities shall be evaluated under the same criteria:
(a) The degree of leveraging of other funds that will occur;
(b) The degree of commitment from programs to provide necessary
habilitation and support services for projects focusing on special
needs populations;
(c) Recipient contributions to total project costs, including
allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and
trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;
(d) Local government project contributions in the form of
infrastructure improvements, and others;
(e) Projects that encourage ownership, management, and other
project-related responsibility opportunities;
(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the
original target group or income level for a period of at least twenty-five years;
(g) The applicant has the demonstrated ability, stability and
resources to implement the project;
(h) The applicant has committed to quality improvement and
submitted an application to the Washington state quality award program
for an independent assessment of its quality management,
accountability, and performance system within the previous three years;
(i) Projects which demonstrate serving the greatest need;
(((i))) (j) Projects that provide housing for persons and families
with the lowest incomes;
(((j))) (k) Projects that provide housing for persons at risk of
homelessness;
(l) Projects serving special needs populations which are under
statutory mandate to develop community housing;
(((k))) (m) Project location and access to employment centers in
the region or area;
(((l))) (n) Projects that provide employment and training
opportunities for disadvantaged youth under a youthbuild or youthbuild-type program as defined in RCW 50.72.020; and
(((m))) (o) Project location and access to available public
transportation services.
(4) The department shall only approve applications for projects for
((mentally ill)) persons with mental illness that are consistent with
a regional support network six-year capital and operating plan.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.185C.010 and 2007 c 427 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Homeless person" means an individual living outside or in a
building not meant for human habitation or which they have no legal
right to occupy, in an emergency shelter, or in a temporary housing
program which may include a transitional and supportive housing program
if habitation time limits exist. This definition includes substance
abusers, people with mental illness, and sex offenders who are
homeless.
(4) "Washington homeless census" or "census" means an annual
statewide census conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities,
counties, community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the
technical support and coordination of the department, to count and
collect ((data on)) information about all homeless individuals in
Washington.
(5) "Home security fund account" means the state treasury account
receiving the state's portion of income from revenue from the sources
established by RCW 36.22.179, RCW 36.22.1791, and all other sources
directed to the homeless housing and assistance program.
(6) "Homeless housing grant program" means the vehicle by which
competitive grants are awarded by the department, utilizing moneys from
the homeless housing account, to local governments for programs
directly related to housing homeless individuals and families,
addressing the root causes of homelessness, preventing homelessness,
collecting data and information on homeless individuals, and other
efforts directly related to housing homeless persons, including
implementing quality management programs.
(7) "Local government" means a county government in the state of
Washington or a city government, if the legislative authority of the
city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for housing
homeless persons within its ((borders)) jurisdiction.
(8) "Housing continuum" means the progression of individuals along
a housing-focused continuum with homelessness at one end and
homeownership at the other.
(9) "Local homeless housing task force" means a voluntary local
committee created to advise a local government on the creation of a
local homeless housing plan and participate in a local homeless housing
program. It must include a representative of the county, a
representative of the largest city located within the county, at least
one homeless or formerly homeless person, such other members as may be
required to maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing
programs and services and if feasible, a representative of a private
nonprofit organization with experience in low-income housing.
(10) "Long-term private or public housing" means subsidized and
unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in which there is no
established time limit for habitation of less than two years.
(11) "Interagency council on homelessness" means a committee
appointed by the governor and consisting of, at least, policy level
representatives of the following entities: (a) The department of
community, trade, and economic development; (b) the department of
corrections; (c) the department of social and health services; (d) the
department of veterans affairs; and (e) the department of health.
(12) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing
specific measures of success against ultimate and interim goals.
(13) "Performance evaluation" means the process of evaluating
performance by established objective, measurable criteria according to
the achievement of outlined goals, measures, targets, standards, or
other outcomes, using a ranked scorecard from highest to lowest
performance that employs a scale of one to one hundred, one hundred
being the optimal score.
(14) "Quality management program" means a nationally recognized
program using criteria similar or equivalent to the Baldridge criteria.
All local governments receiving over five hundred thousand dollars a
year during the previous calendar year from: State housing-related
funding sources, including the Washington housing trust fund; the
ending homelessness program surcharges in RCW 36.22.179 and 36.22.1791;
and any surcharges in this chapter and the surcharges in RCW 36.22.178
(as recodified by this act), shall apply to the Washington state
quality award program for an independent assessment of its quality
management, accountability, and performance system, once every three
years beginning by January 1, 2011.
(15) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public
organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.
(((14))) (16) "Housing authority" means any of the public
corporations created by chapter 35.82 RCW.
(((15))) (17) "Homeless housing program" means the program
authorized under this chapter as administered by the department at the
state level and by the local government or its designated subcontractor
at the local level.
(((16))) (18) "Homeless housing plan" means the ten-year plan
developed by the county or other local government to address housing
for homeless persons.
(((17))) (19) "Homeless housing strategic plan" means the ten-year
plan developed by the department, in consultation with the interagency
council on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board.
(((18))) (20) "Washington homeless client management information
system" means a database of information about homeless individuals in
the state used to coordinate resources to assist homeless clients to
obtain and retain housing and reach greater levels of self-sufficiency
or economic independence when appropriate, depending upon their
individual situations.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.185C.040 and 2005 c 484 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Six months after the first Washington homeless census, the
department shall, in consultation with the interagency council on
homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, prepare and
publish a ten-year homeless housing strategic plan which shall outline
statewide goals and performance measures and shall be coordinated with
the plan for homeless families with children required under RCW
43.63A.650. To guide local governments in preparation of their first
local homeless housing plans due December 31, 2005, the department
shall issue by October 15, 2005, temporary guidelines consistent with
this chapter and including the best available data on each community's
homeless population. Local governments' ten-year homeless housing
plans shall not be substantially inconsistent with the goals and
program recommendations of the temporary guidelines and, when amended
after 2005, the state strategic plan.
(2)(a) Program outcomes and performance measures and goals
((shall)) must be created by the department ((and reflected)) in
consultation with the interagency council on homelessness and a task
force established by the department consisting of the committee chairs
of the appropriate committees of the legislature, representatives
appointed by the director from a minimum of five local task forces
representing both urban and rural areas and communities east and west
of the Cascade mountains, and a representative from a statewide
membership organization that advocates for homeless housing. All
performance measures must have targets and timelines. The task force
must also produce guidelines for local governments regarding methods,
techniques, and data suggested to measure each performance measure.
Performance measures must be included in the department's homeless
housing strategic plan ((as well as)) and all local homeless housing
plans.
(b) Performance measures must be created, at a minimum, to gauge
the success of the state and each local government in the following
areas:
(i) The quality and completeness of the Washington homeless client
management information system database;
(ii) The quality of the performance management systems of state
agencies, local governments, and local government subcontractors
executing programs, as authorized by RCW 43.185C.080(1), that
contribute to the overall goal of ending homelessness; and
(iii) The quality of local homeless housing plans.
Performance measurements are reported upon by city and county
geography, including demographics with yearly or more frequent targets.
(3) Interim goals against which state and local governments'
performance may be measured, including:
(a) By the end of year one, completion of the first census as
described in RCW 43.185C.030;
(b) By the end of each subsequent year, goals common to all local
programs which are measurable and the achievement of which would move
that community toward housing its homeless population; and
(c) By July 1, 2015, reduction of the homeless population statewide
and in each county by fifty percent.
(((3))) (4) The department shall develop a consistent statewide
data gathering instrument to monitor the performance of cities and
counties receiving grants in order to determine compliance with the
terms and conditions set forth in the grant application or required by
the department.
(5) The department shall, in consultation with the interagency
council on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board,
report annually to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature an assessment of the state's performance in furthering the
goals of the state ten-year homeless housing strategic plan and the
performance of each participating local government in creating and
executing a local homeless housing plan which meets the requirements of
this chapter. ((The annual report may include performance measures
such as:
(a) The reduction in the number of homeless individuals and
families from the initial count of homeless persons;
(b) The number of new units available and affordable for homeless
families by housing type;
(c) The number of homeless individuals identified who are not
offered suitable housing within thirty days of their request or
identification as homeless;
(d) The number of households at risk of losing housing who maintain
it due to a preventive intervention;
(e) The transition time from homelessness to permanent housing;
(f) The cost per person housed at each level of the housing
continuum;
(g) The ability to successfully collect data and report
performance;
(h) The extent of collaboration and coordination among public
bodies, as well as community stakeholders, and the level of community
support and participation;
(i) The quality and safety of housing provided; and
(j) The effectiveness of outreach to homeless persons, and their
satisfaction with the program.
(4) Based on the performance of local homeless housing programs in
meeting their interim goals, on general population changes and on
changes in the homeless population recorded in the annual census, the
department may revise the performance measures and goals of the state
homeless housing strategic plan, set goals for years following the
initial ten-year period, and recommend changes in local governments'
plans.))

Sec. 16 RCW 43.185C.050 and 2005 c 484 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Each local homeless housing task force shall prepare and
recommend to its local government legislative authority a ten-year
homeless housing plan for its jurisdictional area which shall be not
inconsistent with the department's statewide temporary guidelines, for
the December 31, 2005, plan, and thereafter the department's ten-year
homeless housing strategic plan and which shall be aimed at eliminating
homelessness, with a minimum goal of reducing homelessness by fifty
percent by July 1, 2015. ((The local government may amend the proposed
local plan and shall adopt a plan by December 31, 2005. Performance in
meeting the goals of this local plan shall be assessed annually in
terms of the performance measures published by the department.))
(b) In addition to the performance measures mandated in RCW
43.185C.040(2), local plans may include specific local performance
measures adopted by the local government legislative authority((,)) and
((may)) must include recommendations for ((any)) state legislation
needed to meet the state or local plan goals. The recommendations must
be specific and must, if funding is required, include an estimated
amount of funding required and suggestions for an appropriate funding
source.
(2) Eligible activities under the local plans include:
(a) Rental and furnishing of dwelling units for the use of homeless
persons;
(b) Costs of developing affordable housing for homeless persons,
and services for formerly homeless individuals and families residing in
transitional housing or permanent housing and still at risk of
homelessness;
(c) Operating subsidies for transitional housing or permanent
housing serving formerly homeless families or individuals;
(d) Services to prevent homelessness, such as emergency eviction
prevention programs, including temporary rental subsidies to prevent
homelessness;
(e) Temporary services to assist persons leaving state institutions
and other state programs to prevent them from becoming or remaining
homeless;
(f) Outreach services for homeless individuals and families;
(g) Development and management of local homeless plans, including
homeless census data collection; identification of goals, performance
measures, strategies, and costs, and evaluation of progress towards
established goals;
(h) Rental vouchers payable to landlords for persons who are
homeless or below thirty percent of the median income or in immediate
danger of becoming homeless; ((and))
(i) Implementing a quality management program and applying to the
Washington state quality award program for an independent assessment of
quality management, accountability, and performance systems or applying
to the full examination Washington state quality award program; and
(j) Other activities to reduce and prevent homelessness as
identified for funding in the local plan.

Sec. 17 RCW 36.22.179 and 2007 c 427 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178 (as
recodified by this act), and except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, an additional surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged
by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in
addition to any other charge allowed by law. The funds collected
pursuant to this section are to be distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee,
and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities
and towns to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, six percent of
which may be used by the county for administrative costs related to its
homeless housing plan and for activities related to performance
evaluation and quality management programs, and the remainder for
programs which directly accomplish the goals of the county's local
homeless housing plan, except that for each city in the county which
elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local
homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under
this section equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the
real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at
least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county
administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which
directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing
plan; of the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for
administrative costs for its homeless housing program.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for
administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including
the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan,
measuring performance and quality management, providing technical
assistance to local governments, and managing the homeless housing
grant program. The remaining eighty-seven and one- half percent is to
be used by the department to:
(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but
not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants
to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental
assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 18 RCW 36.22.1791 and 2007 c 427 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharges authorized in RCW 36.22.178 (as
recodified by this act) and 36.22.179, and except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the county auditor shall charge an
additional surcharge of eight dollars for each document recorded, which
is in addition to any other charge allowed by law. The funds collected
under this section are to be distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall remit ninety percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund six percent of which may be used by the county
for administrative costs related to its homeless housing plan and for
activities related to performance evaluation and quality management
programs, and the remainder for programs that directly accomplish the
goals of the county's local homeless housing plan, except that for each
city in the county that elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to
operate its own homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge
assessed under this section equal to the percentage of the city's local
portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the county must be
transmitted at least quarterly to the city treasurer for use by the
city for program costs that directly contribute to the goals of the
city's homeless housing plan.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use the funds for administering the program established
in RCW 43.185C.020, including the costs of creating and updating the
statewide homeless housing strategic plan, measuring performance and
quality management, providing technical assistance to local
governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program.
Remaining funds may also be used to:
(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but
not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants
to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental
assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall establish two self-sufficiency income
standards based upon the cost of living, including housing costs, which
include mortgage or rent payments and utilities other than telephone,
for each county in the state. The self-sufficiency income standards
must be based upon the costs needed to support: (1) One adult
individual; and (2) two adult individuals and one preschool-aged child
and one school-aged child. These income standards will be translated
into an equivalent hourly wage rate assuming one full-year, full-time
earner for the self-sufficiency income standards for each county. By
December 31, 2009, the department shall deliver to the appropriate
committees of the legislature the self-sufficiency income standards and
a report that details the number and percentage of individuals
statewide and in each county who do not have a good family wage job
and, as a result, earn less than the self-sufficiency income standards,
as well as the number and percentage of individuals statewide and in
each county who have a good family wage job and, as a result, earn an
amount equivalent to or more than the self-sufficiency income
standards.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.185C.150 and 2005 c 484 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not require either the department or any local
government to expend any funds to accomplish the goals of this chapter
other than the revenues authorized in chapter 484, Laws of 2005 and the
revenues authorized in RCW 36.22.1791. However, neither the department
nor any local government may use any funds authorized in chapter 484,
Laws of 2005 or the revenues authorized in RCW 36.22.1791 to supplant
or reduce any existing expenditures of public money for the reduction
or prevention of homelessness or services for homeless persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 RCW 36.22.178, 43.185A.100, and 43.185B.040
are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.--- RCW (created in
section 22 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 4, 6 through 9, and 11
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 43.185C.010.

--- END ---