BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.390 and 2005 c 384 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Starting no later than 2008, and at least once every three
years thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state
quality award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment
of its quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.
(2) Each agency shall provide the governor's office with an
electronic copy of its independent assessment application and any
feedback provided by the independent assessor.

--- END ---