BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to improve the ethical and
moral standards, culture, and conduct of all elected senior leadership
and staff to become the highest in the nation. In addition, the
legislature intends to increase public confidence in the state's
governmental processes, in the legislature, and the leadership of its
public agencies to be the highest in the nation. The legislature also
intends to improve ethics and integrity education and training programs
and to make the ethics and integrity of all clients, partners, and
vendors to be the best in the nation. With this work, the legislature,
elected officials, senior executive leadership, and staff will be
recognized as state and national leaders in ethics and integrity.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.320 and 1994 c 154 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative ethics board shall enforce this chapter and
rules adopted under it with respect to members and employees of the
legislature.
(2) The legislative ethics board shall:
(a) Develop educational materials and training with regard to
legislative ethics for legislators and legislative employees;
(b) Issue advisory opinions;
(c) Adopt rules or policies governing the conduct of business by
the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW
42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of
1994;
(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on
its own motion;
(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;
(f) Recommend suspension or removal to the appropriate legislative
entity, or recommend prosecution to the appropriate authority; ((and))
(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties
appropriate for different types of violations of this chapter and rules
adopted under it;
(h) Develop a legislative plan to provide overall direction and
accountability for legislators and staff;
(i) Coordinate and work with the executive ethics board and the
commission on judicial conduct;
(j) Assess and evaluate the house of representatives' and the
senate's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys and
publish an annual report that shall be made public; and
(k) Solicit outside evaluations, studies, and recommendations for
improvements from academics, nonprofit organizations, the public
disclosure commission, and other entities with expertise in ethics,
integrity, and the public sector.
(3) The board may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under
examination by the board or involved in any hearing;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine witnesses; and
(d) Receive evidence.
(4) Subject to RCW 42.52.540, the board has jurisdiction over any
alleged violation that occurred before January 1, 1995, and that was
within the jurisdiction of any of the boards established under chapter
44.60 RCW. The board's jurisdiction with respect to any such alleged
violation shall be based on the statutes and rules in effect at
(([the])) the time of the violation.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.52.360 and 2005 c 106 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules
adopted under it with respect to statewide elected officers and all
other officers and employees in the executive branch, boards and
commissions, and institutions of higher education.
(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter with
regard to the activities of university research employees as provided
in this subsection.
(a) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.110,
42.52.130, 42.52.140, and 42.52.150, the administrative process shall
be consistent with and adhere to no less than the current standards in
regulations of the United States public health service and the office
of the secretary of the department of health and human services in
Title 42 C.F.R. Part 50, Subpart F relating to promotion of objectivity
in research.
(b) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.080, and
42.52.120, the administrative process shall include a comprehensive
system for the disclosure, review, and approval of outside work
activities by university research employees while assuring that such
employees are fulfilling their employment obligations to the
university.
(c) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.160, the
administrative process shall include a reasonable determination by the
university of acceptable private uses having de minimis costs to the
university and a method for establishing fair and reasonable
reimbursement charges for private uses the costs of which are in excess
of de minimis.
(3) The executive ethics board shall:
(a) Develop and provide educational materials and training;
(b) Adopt rules and policies governing the conduct of business by
the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW
42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of
1994;
(c) Issue advisory opinions;
(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on
its own motion;
(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;
(f) Recommend to the appropriate authorities suspension, removal
from position, prosecution, or other appropriate remedy; ((and))
(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties
appropriate for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it;
(h) Develop a governor's integrity and ethics award program,
including criteria for determining annual award recipients;
(i) Develop a statewide plan to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices;
(j) Coordinate and work with the commission on judicial conduct and
the legislative ethics board;
(k) Assess and evaluate each agency's ethical culture through
employee and stakeholder surveys and publish an annual report on the
results to the public; and
(l) Solicit outside evaluations, studies, and recommendations for
improvements from academics, nonprofit organizations, the public
disclosure commission, or other entities with expertise in ethics,
integrity, and the public sector.
(4) The board may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under
examination by the board or involved in any hearing;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine witnesses; and
(d) Receive evidence.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 42.52.220, the executive ethics board
may review and approve agency policies as provided for in this chapter.
(6) This section does not apply to state officers and state
employees of the judicial branch.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
The governor's integrity and ethics award program is created, to be
administered by the executive ethics board. Annually, the executive
ethics board shall recognize local governments, private sectors
businesses, educational institutions, and nonprofit organizations with
the best ethics and integrity program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
All state officers and employees must attend annual ethics and
integrity training. Failure to fulfill this annual obligations shall
result in the forfeiture of all compensation related to a person's
office or employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each head of agency must develop an annual ethics and integrity
plan for leadership and staff of the agency. The plan must be updated
annually, be made available to the public, and:
(a) Include project management, targets, and timelines;
(b) Integrate with other accountability, ethics, and integrity
programs;
(c) Identify national and international best practices and superior
results;
(d) Identify opportunities for improvement and barriers to success;
(e) Develop public-private partnerships where appropriate; and
(f) Provide an annual report to the legislature that includes
recommendations for improving applicable statutes and existing programs
and results.
(2) In addition, each head of agency must create an independent
advisory committee of employees and citizens.
(3) The governor must perform a government accountability and
performance review on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2010, and every four years thereafter, the
joint legislative audit and review committee must audit the legislative
ethics board and the house of representatives' and the senate's ethics
and integrity programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2010, and every four years thereafter, the
state auditor must audit the executive ethics board.

--- END ---