BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.92.021 and 2007 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a Washington state veterinary board of
governors consisting of seven members, ((five)) three of whom shall be
licensed veterinarians, one of whom shall be a licensed veterinary
technician trained in both large and small animal medicine, and ((one))
three of whom shall be ((a lay)) members of the general public.
(2)(a) The licensed members shall be appointed by the governor. At
the time of their appointment the licensed members of the board must be
actual residents of the state ((in active practice as licensed)) with
an active or retired active license as a practitioner((s)) of
veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, or employed as a licensed
veterinary technician, as applicable, and must be citizens of the
United States. Not more than one licensed veterinary member shall be
from the same congressional district. The board shall not be deemed to
be unlawfully constituted and a member of the board shall not be deemed
ineligible to serve the remainder of the member's unexpired term on the
board solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised
boundaries for congressional districts.
(b) The terms of the ((first)) licensed members of the board shall
be ((as follows: One member for five, four, three, two, and one years
respectively. Thereafter the terms shall be)) for ((five)) three years
((and until their successors are appointed and qualified)).
(c) The ((lay)) members of the general public shall be appointed by
the governor for a ((five)) three-year term ((and until the lay
member's successor is appointed)). The members of the general public
may not have a material or financial interest in the rendering of
veterinary services or have a family member who provides veterinary
services. The governor may stagger the initial terms of the members of
the general public as required to prevent their terms from expiring
simultaneously.
(d) A member may be appointed to serve a second term, if that term
does not run consecutively.
(e) Vacancies in the board shall be filled by the governor, the
appointee to hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The licensed veterinary technician member is a nonvoting member
with respect to board decisions related to the discipline of a
veterinarian involving standard of care.
(4) Officers of the board shall be a chair and a secretary-treasurer to be chosen by the members of the board from among its
members.
(5) At least four voting members of the board, including at least
two members of the general public, shall constitute a quorum at
meetings of the board.
(6) The board must maintain a written record of any closed session
proceedings.
(7) The following are public records for purposes of chapter 42.56
RCW and must be disclosed to the public upon request:
(a) Any worksheet used by a reviewing board member in any part of
the disciplinary process; and
(b) The written record required by subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The board may not use panels in disciplinary actions as
provided in chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.92.046 and 1987 c 150 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter.
(2) In all cases of unprofessional conduct relating to licensees
under this chapter that do not involve clinical expertise or standards
of practice, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.130.020, the
secretary is the disciplining authority responsible for all
disciplinary activities identified in chapter 18.130 RCW that relate to
the evaluation of complaints, performance of investigations, and review
of the results of investigations to determine the appropriate
disposition of a case. The secretary may seek the advice of the board
as necessary when conducting these activities. The board shall conduct
an initial review of each complaint to determine if the case involves
issues of clinical expertise or standards of practice. Within seventy-two hours of receipt of a complaint from the secretary, the board must
identify whether the complaint should be transferred to the secretary.
If the board determines that the case involves issues of clinical
expertise or standards of practice, then the case, upon notice to the
secretary, must become the responsibility of the board under its
authority as a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.050.
(3)(a) In addition to requirements under RCW 18.130.095, the
secretary or the board, as applicable, must provide to the complainant
a written explanation of any determination pertaining to the complaint.
Such actions must include a determination to initiate an investigation,
a determination to close a complaint without investigation, a
determination to close a complaint after investigation, a finding of
unprofessional conduct following a hearing, or a finding that
unprofessional conduct did not occur following a hearing.
(b) Within twenty days of receiving a written explanation from the
secretary or the board relating to a determination identified in (a) of
this subsection, the complainant may appeal the determination to an
administrative law judge for review in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.
(c) Within twenty days of receiving a decision from an
administrative law judge denying an appeal under (b) of this
subsection, the complainant may request judicial review of the decision
in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) Following a successful appeal of a case under subsection (3)(b)
or (c) of this section, the secretary or the board, as appropriate,
shall continue to pursue the case against the license holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any disciplinary proceeding administered under chapter
18.130 RCW in which the secretary or the board issues an order for a
sanction under RCW 18.130.160, other than the revocation of a license,
the sanction must be based on a finding supported by a preponderance of
the evidence that the veterinarian has committed unprofessional conduct
or is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety due to a
physical or mental condition.
(2) In any proceeding in which the secretary or the board issues an
order to revoke a license under RCW 18.130.160, the sanction must be
based on a finding supported by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
that the veterinarian has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable
to practice with reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or
mental condition.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.130.050 and 2008 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 18.130.062 and chapter 18.92 RCW, the
disciplining authority has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter;
(3) To hold hearings as provided in this chapter;
(4) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation, consideration of an application for license, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(5) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(6) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(7) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews and to issue
citations and assess fines for failure to produce documents, records,
or other items in accordance with RCW 18.130.230;
(8) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority. Within fourteen
days of a request by the affected license holder, the disciplining
authority must provide a show cause hearing in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 18.130.135. Consistent with RCW 18.130.370, a
disciplining authority shall issue a summary suspension of the license
or temporary practice permit of a license holder prohibited from
practicing a health care profession in another state, federal, or
foreign jurisdiction because of an act of unprofessional conduct that
is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional conduct
prohibited by this chapter or any of the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040. The summary suspension remains in effect until proceedings
by the Washington disciplining authority have been completed;
(9) To conduct show cause hearings in accordance with RCW
18.130.062 or 18.130.135 to review an action taken by the disciplining
authority to suspend a license or restrict or limit a license holder's
practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(10) To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3)
or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12
RCW to conduct hearings. The disciplining authority shall make the
final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the
disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision
to the presiding officer. Disciplining authorities identified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b) may not delegate the final decision regarding
disposition of the license or imposition of sanctions to a presiding
officer in any case pertaining to standards of practice or where
clinical expertise is necessary;
(11) To use individual members of the boards to direct
investigations and to authorize the issuance of a citation under
subsection (7) of this section. However, the member of the board shall
not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;
(12) To enter into contracts for professional services determined
to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(13) To contract with license holders or other persons or
organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring and
supervision of license holders who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized
purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(14) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;
(15) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder
provided by this chapter. After January 1, 2009, all sanctions must be
issued in accordance with RCW 18.130.390;
(16) To restrict or place conditions on the practice of new
licensees in order to protect the public and promote the safety of and
confidence in the health care system;
(17) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges;
(18) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the
board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction
under this chapter;
(19) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities'
or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a license
holder's practice privilege or employment is terminated or restricted.
Each health facility or service shall produce and make accessible to
the disciplining authority the appropriate records and otherwise
facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be
subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action
pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 5 RCW 18.130.060 and 2008 c 134 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the authority specified in RCW 18.130.050 and
18.130.062 and chapter 18.92 RCW, the secretary has the following
additional authority:
(1) To employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical
staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter. The secretary
must, whenever practical, make primary assignments on a long-term basis
to foster the development and maintenance of staff expertise. To
ensure continuity and best practices, the secretary will regularly
evaluate staff assignments and workload distribution;
(2) Upon the request of a board or commission, to appoint pro tem
members to participate as members of a panel of the board or commission
in connection with proceedings specifically identified in the request.
Individuals so appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as
regular members of the board or commission. Pro tem members appointed
for matters under this chapter are appointed for a term of no more than
one year. No pro tem member may serve more than four one-year terms.
While serving as board or commission members pro tem, persons so
appointed have all the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled
to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular members of the board or commission.
The chairperson of a panel shall be a regular member of the board or
commission appointed by the board or commission chairperson. Panels
have authority to act as directed by the board or commission with
respect to all matters subject to the jurisdiction of the board or
commission and within the authority of the board or commission. The
authority to act through panels does not restrict the authority of the
board or commission to act as a single body at any phase of proceedings
within the board's or commission's jurisdiction. Board or commission
panels may issue final orders and decisions with respect to matters and
cases delegated to the panel by the board or commission. Final
decisions may be appealed as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act;
(3) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses,
and consultants used in any investigation and to establish fees to
witnesses in any agency adjudicative proceeding as authorized by RCW
34.05.446;
(4) To conduct investigations and practice reviews at the direction
of the disciplining authority and to issue subpoenas, administer oaths,
and take depositions in the course of conducting those investigations
and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining authority;
(5) To have the health professions regulatory program establish a
system to recruit potential public members, to review the
qualifications of such potential members, and to provide orientation to
those public members appointed pursuant to law by the governor or the
secretary to the boards and commissions specified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and councils for
professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a); and
(6) To adopt rules, in consultation with the disciplining
authorities, requiring every license holder to report information
identified in RCW 18.130.070.

--- END ---