BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 2003 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public groundwaters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
groundwaters for stock-watering purposes, or for the watering of ((a
lawn or of)) a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in
area, or for single or group domestic uses in an amount not exceeding
five thousand gallons a day, or as provided in RCW 90.44.052, or for an
industrial purpose in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a
day, is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but,
to the extent that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled
to a right equal to that established by a permit issued under the
provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the department
from time to time may require the person or agency making any such
small withdrawal to furnish information as to the means for and the
quantity of that withdrawal: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of
the party making withdrawals of groundwaters of the state not exceeding
five thousand gallons per day, applications under this section or
declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits and
certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

--- END ---