BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The inspection or copying of any nonexempt public record by
persons serving criminal sentences in state, local, or privately
operated correctional facilities may be enjoined if, upon motion by an
agency or its representative or a person named in the record or to whom
the request specifically pertains, the superior court for the county in
which the movant resides or in which the record is maintained, finds
that the request was made to harass or intimidate the agency, its
employees, or any person, or that disclosure of the record would likely
undermine a legitimate penological interest, including the secure and
orderly operation of correctional facilities, the safety or security of
staff, inmates, or others, or the deterrence of criminal activity.
(2) In deciding whether to enjoin a request under subsection (1) of
this section, the court may consider all relevant factors, including,
but not limited to: Other requests by the requestor; the type of
record or records sought; statements offered by the requestor
concerning the purpose for the request; whether disclosure of the
requested records would likely harm any person or vital government
interest; whether the request seeks a significant and burdensome number
of documents; and the impact of disclosure on correctional facility
security and order, the safety or security of correctional facility
staff, inmates, or others, and the deterrence of criminal activity.
(3) The motion proceeding described in this section shall be a
summary proceeding based on affidavits or declarations, unless the
court orders otherwise. The court may enjoin all or any part of the
request or requests, and may enjoin future requests by the same
requestor, or by another person or entity on behalf of the requestor,
for such period as the court deems reasonable. An agency shall not be
liable for penalties under RCW 42.56.550(4) for any period during which
an order under this section is in effect, including during an appeal of
an order under this section, regardless of the outcome of the appeal.

--- END ---