BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that inconsistent
practices in and among counties have resulted in few children in
Washington being afforded adequate legal representation in dependency
proceedings, thereby putting the health, safety, and welfare of
children at risk. The legislature finds that attorneys for children
have different skills and obligations than guardians ad litem and
court-appointed special advocates, especially in forming a confidential
and privileged relationship with a child to provide legal counsel to
the child on issues such as placement options, visitation rights,
educational rights, and access to services while in care and services
available to the child upon aging out of care. Thus, it is in the best
interest of a child who is age twelve or older for the court to
consider whether an attorney should be appointed to advocate for the
child's position and legal rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.100 and 2000 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings.
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background file shall include, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) Training related to the guardian's duties;
(c) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(d) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(e) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause; and
(f) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
The background information report shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program the person shall provide the background information to the
court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a statement
containing: His or her training relating to the duties as a guardian
ad litem; the name of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause; and his or her criminal history as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the
appointment. The background statement shall not include identifying
information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home
addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad
litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or pseudonyms as
necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6) ((If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or
older, or)) (a) The court may, in its discretion, appoint an attorney
to represent the child's position and legal rights if the guardian ad
litem or the court determines that the child needs to be independently
represented by counsel((, the court may appoint an attorney to
represent the child's position)) or if the child requests an attorney
and is age twelve or older. Regardless of any request, if an attorney
has not previously been appointed to represent the child's position and
legal rights, the court shall consider appointment of an attorney for
the child at the first regularly scheduled hearing after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) The date that a dependency petition is filed pursuant to this
chapter on a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) The effective date of this section, for a child who turned
twelve years old before the effective date of this section, and who has
not previously been appointed an attorney to represent the child's
position and legal rights.
If the court orders appointment of an attorney for the child, it
shall set forth on the record the reasons therefor.
(b) If the court does not order appointment of an attorney for the
child at the hearing, it shall:
(i) Set forth on the record the reasons therefor;
(ii) Orally inform the parties, including the child, if present, of
their right to request an attorney for the child at any future point in
the dependency proceeding, direct the caseworker or a party to notify
any absent party, including the child, of that right; and
(iii) Consider whether to appoint an attorney to represent the
child's position and legal rights at all subsequent hearings until an
attorney is appointed or until the dependency is dismissed.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to RCW 13.34.100 shall be deemed a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings before the
court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends and the appointment shall be effective
immediately. The court shall appoint the person recommended by the
program. If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified, the
party may request a review of the appointment by the program. The
program must complete the review within five judicial days and remove
any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the review is not
satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may file a motion
with the court for the removal of the court-appointed special advocate
on the grounds the advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or
unqualified.

--- END ---