BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.92.360 and 2002 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any city or town engaged in the generation, sale, or
distribution of energy is hereby authorized, within limits established
by the Constitution of the state of Washington, to assist the owners of
structures or equipment in financing the acquisition and installation
of materials and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the
conservation or more efficient use of energy in such structures or
equipment pursuant to an energy conservation plan adopted by the city
or town if the cost per unit of energy saved or produced by the use of
such materials and equipment is less than the cost per unit of energy
produced by the next least costly new energy resource which the city or
town could acquire to meet future demand. Any financing authorized
under this chapter shall only be used for conservation purposes in
existing structures, and such financing shall not be used for any
purpose which results in a conversion from one energy source to
another. For the purposes of this section, "conservation purposes in
existing structures" may include projects to allow a municipal electric
utility's customers to generate all or a portion of their own
electricity through the on-site installation of a distributed
electricity generation system that uses as its fuel solar, wind,
geothermal, or hydropower, or other renewable resource that is
available on-site and not from a commercial source. Such projects
shall not be considered "a conversion from one energy source to
another" which is limited to the change or substitution of one
commercial energy supplier for another commercial energy supplier.
Except where otherwise authorized, such assistance shall be limited to:
(((1))) (a) Providing an inspection of the structure or equipment,
either directly or through one or more inspectors under contract, to
determine and inform the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and
installing conservation materials and equipment for which financial
assistance will be approved and the estimated life cycle savings in
energy costs that are likely to result from the installation of such
materials or equipment;
(((2))) (b) Providing a list of businesses who sell and install
such materials and equipment within or in close proximity to the
service area of the city or town, each of which businesses shall have
requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the
products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize such materials in
accordance with the prevailing national standards((.));
(((3))) (c) Arranging to have approved conservation materials and
equipment installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to
the owner of the residential structure and verifying such installation;
and
(((4))) (d) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and
installation of approved conservation materials and equipment. Such
materials and equipment shall be purchased from a private business and
shall be installed by a private business or the owner.
(((5))) (2) Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions
to the utility bill, billed either together with use charge or
separately. Loans shall not exceed ((one hundred twenty)) two hundred
forty months in length.

--- END ---