BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board
of directors of any school district may not rent or lease school
property to a telecommunications company for the siting or placement of
personal wireless service facilities.
(2) Existing contracts for the rental or lease of school property
for the placement of personal wireless service facilities that are
properly executed prior to July 1, 2009, are not impaired by this
section.
(3) For purposes of this section, "personal wireless service" has
the same meaning as in RCW 35.99.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.040 and 1991 c 116 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, every school
district board of directors is authorized to permit the rental, lease,
or occasional use of all or any portion of any surplus real property
owned or lawfully held by the district to any person, corporation, or
government entity for profit or nonprofit, commercial or noncommercial
purposes: PROVIDED, That the leasing or renting or use of such
property is for a lawful purpose and does not interfere with conduct of
the district's educational program and related activities: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the lease or rental agreement entered into shall include
provisions which permit the recapture of the leased or rented surplus
property of the district should such property be needed for school
purposes in the future except in such cases where, due to proximity to
an international airport, land use has been so permanently altered as
to preclude the possible use of the property for a school housing
students and the school property has been heavily impacted by
surrounding land uses so that a school housing students would no longer
be appropriate in that area.
(2) Authorization to rent, lease or permit the occasional use of
surplus school property under this section, RCW 28A.335.050 and
28A.335.090 is conditioned on the establishment by each school district
board of directors of a policy governing the use of surplus school
property.
(3) The board of directors of any school district desiring to rent
or lease any surplus real property owned by the school district shall
publish a written notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the
school district for rentals or leases totalling ten thousand dollars or
more in value. School districts shall not rent or lease the property
for at least forty-five days following the publication of the newspaper
notice.
(4) Private schools shall have the same rights as any other person
or entity to submit bids for the rental or lease of surplus real
property and to have such bids considered along with all other bids:
PROVIDED, That the school board may establish reasonable conditions for
the use of such real property to assure the safe and proper operation
of the property in a manner consistent with board policies.

--- END ---