BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) On or after January 1, 2012, a building
permit may not be issued for a single-family dwelling that does not
include a solar water heater system that meets the standards
established under section 2 of this act unless a city or county
building code enforcement authority approves a variance. A variance
may only be approved if a city or county building code officer attests
that:
(a) Installation is impracticable due to poor solar resource;
(b) Installation is cost-prohibitive based upon a life-cycle cost-benefit analysis that incorporates the average residential utility bill
and the cost of the new solar water heater system with a life cycle
that does not exceed fifteen years;
(c) A substitute renewable energy system is used as the primary
energy source for heating water. For the purposes of this section, a
renewable energy system means a new system that captures and converts
a renewable source of energy, such as wind, heat, or light from the sun
into: (i) A usable source of thermal or mechanical energy; (ii)
electricity; or (iii) fuel; or
(d) A demand water heater device is installed and at least one
other gas appliance is installed in the dwelling. For the purposes of
this section, demand water heater means a gas-tankless instantaneous
water heater that provides hot water only as it is needed.
(2) A request for a variance must be submitted to the city or
county building code enforcement authority on an application prescribed
by the state building code council and must include, but not be limited
to, a description of the location of the property and justification for
the approval of a variance using the criteria established by the state
building code council under section 2 of this act. A variance is
deemed approved if not denied within thirty working days after receipt
of the variance application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2009, the state building code
council, in consultation with the energy policy division of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, shall:
(1) Adopt standards for solar water heater systems to include, but
not be limited to, specifications for the performance, materials,
components, durability, longevity, proper sizing, installation, and
quality; and
(2) Establish an application for a variance and the criteria for
which a variance is permitted by a city or county building code
enforcement authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning January 15, 2013, city and
county building code enforcement authorities shall report to the state
building code council for the previous calendar year regarding:
(a) The number of solar water heater systems installed;
(b) The number of variances issued; and
(c) A description of why the variances were issued.
(2) Beginning January 31, 2013, the state building code council
shall report annually to the energy policy division of the department
of community, trade, and economic development and the legislature
regarding:
(a) The number of solar water heater systems installed statewide
and by city and county building code enforcement jurisdictions for the
previous calendar year;
(b) The number of variances issued statewide and by city and county
building code enforcement jurisdictions for the previous calendar year;
and
(c) An analysis of the reasons variances were approved by city and
county building code enforcement authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 19.27 RCW.

--- END ---