BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
solar water heating components, including repair and replacement parts
for such components, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving such components.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of solar water heating components; repair and replacement parts for
such components; or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving such components.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2009.

--- END ---