BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carryout bag" means a bag that is provided by a retail store
to a customer at the point of sale. "Carryout bag" does not include a
bag used solely to contain the following:
(a) Fresh meat and fresh meat products, including but not limited
to pork, beef, seafood, and poultry;
(b) Fruit or vegetables;
(c) Nuts or other bulk items;
(d) Dairy products;
(e) Ice; or
(f) Cooked foods.
(2) "Compostable plastic carryout bag" means any carryout bag that
meets the applicable standards of compostable plastic as adopted by the
American society of testing and materials (ASTM) international on the
effective date of this section and is green in color to distinguish the
bag from a plastic bag that is not compostable.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Person" means any public or private corporation,
copartnership, sole proprietorship, association, firm, or individual.
(5) "Recyclable paper carryout bag" means any paper bag that is
able to be recycled.
(6) "Recycle" means the act of transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill
disposal or incineration.
(7) "Retail store" means a place of business for the sale of goods
or commodities directly to consumers.
(8) "Reusable carryout bag" means any carryout bag that is made of
durable plastic that is at least 2.25 mils thick and is specifically
designed and manufactured for multiple reuse, or is made of reusable
machine-washable textile materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning January 1, 2013, a person who
owns or operates a retail store may not provide a carryout bag for free
or for charge to a consumer unless the carryout bag is either a
compostable plastic carryout bag, a recyclable paper carryout bag, or
a reusable carryout bag.
(2) Retail stores operating in violation of this section are
subject to a class 4 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. Each
calendar day of operation in violation of this section comprises a new
violation.
(3) The department shall develop guidelines identifying the
specifications of carryout bags allowed under this section. Persons
who own or operate a retail store and are providing carryout bags
consistent with the guidelines are deemed to be in compliance with this
section.
(4) This section does not apply to carryout bags in a retailer's
existing on-site inventory as of January 1, 2013.
(5) The department may adopt rules as necessary for the purpose of
implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state of Washington fully occupies and
preempts the entire field of retail store carryout bag regulation
within the boundaries of the state. Cities, towns, and counties or
other municipalities may enact only those laws and ordinances relating
to retail store carryout bags that are consistent with this chapter.
Local laws and ordinances that are inconsistent with, more restrictive
than, or exceed the requirements of state law may not be enacted and
are preempted and repealed, regardless of the nature of the code,
charter, or home rule status of such a city, town, county, or
municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---