BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the goal of the legislature that new
state construction projects or state construction projects that are
considered substantial redevelopment adhere to the 65/10/0 project
design standard and will not significantly harm the aquatic environment
and anadromous fisheries. To meet these goals the legislature intends
to do the following:
(1) Eliminate storm water discharge to all surface waters from
greenfields construction projects on all types of soil by all state
agencies including but not limited to the department of transportation,
the parks and recreation commission, the department of general
administration, and the department of corrections;
(2) Preserve habitat for aquatic life within a watershed with
innovative construction design and development techniques; and
(3) Foster broad community acceptance of the use of significantly
less impervious surface and greater natural habitat conservation on
sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
However, additional definitions not included in this section are
included in the department of ecology's 2005 Stormwater Management
Manual for Western Washington and the Low Impact Development Technical
Guidance for Puget Sound, published by the Puget Sound action team.
(1) "Effective impervious surface" means impervious surface that is
connected to surface water directly or with a conveyance device, such
as a ditch or pipe.
(2) "Forest restoration" means the process of restoring native
vegetation, soils, and mulch on disturbed land with the intent of
eventually achieving a forested condition. A bioretention facility
designed with deeply restored soils and predominated by native
vegetation may be classified as restored forest.
(3) "Forested area" means an area characterized by the presence of
undisturbed soils and vegetation cover that was likely present prior to
the immigration of Europeans to the United States over substantially
the entire site. If original vegetation cover is unknown, it is
assumed to be a conifer forest characterized by a predominance of
evergreen trees with undisturbed soils.
(4) "Greenfields" means sites that have never been developed or
sites in the process of redevelopment that will have substantially all
existing structures removed.
(5) "Hardscapes" includes impervious surfaces or pervious pavement
systems.
(6) "Overland flow" means precipitation that is collected and
conveyed on the surface of the ground or in other man-made conveyance
systems such as ditches and pipes. "Overland flow" does not include
precipitation that falls directly on naturally occurring water bodies.
(7) "65/10/0 project design" means a project site that, after
completion, retains permanently a minimum of sixty-five percent of the
site as forest or restored forest; the total impervious area is limited
to ten percent; the runoff from the developed portion of the site is
fully dispersed in the retained forest preserve; zero overland flow
discharge is allowed from the site; has no runoff collection and
conveyance systems such as ditches and pipes; and meets other
engineering criteria protecting health, safety, and welfare.
(8) "Substantial redevelopment" means any reconstruction,
rehabilitation, addition, or other improvement to a structure, the
total cost of which equals or exceeds fifty percent of the market value
of the structure before the start of construction of the improvement.
(9) "Total impervious area" includes the sum of areas in which
water cannot penetrate such as compacted soils, impervious concrete,
and impervious roof tops. Pervious pavement and vegetated rooftops do
not count toward total impervious area. Rooftops where at least fifty
percent of annual rainfall is harvested and used for domestic purposes
may not be counted as impervious areas.
(10) "Zero effective impervious surface" means impervious surface
reduction and isolation such that no runoff is generated and
traditional drainage collection systems are not necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In order to accomplish the intent of this
chapter, all new state construction projects or state construction
projects that are considered substantial redevelopment must meet the
following criteria:
(1) Site design must conform to the 65/10/0 project design
standard.
(2) A maximum of thirty-five percent of a site proposed for
development by a state agency may be developed. Of this percentage,
the state construction project design may be guided but not limited by
practices found in the most recent version of Low Impact Development
Technical Guidance Manual for Puget Sound, published by the Puget Sound
action team.
(3) The sixty-five percent of the site that will remain in or be
restored to a forested condition may not be isolated as a tract but
must be integrated within the project to serve as the recipient of
precipitation from hardscapes.
(4) Soil types may not be a factor in the practicality of employing
the 65/10/0 project design standard.
(5) The state construction project may not threaten public health
or safety.
(6) Local development regulations may not impede state construction
projects designed to meet design criteria set forth in this section.
(7) The state construction project is consistent with generally
accepted engineering and design criteria, except as necessary to
achieve the purposes set forth in this section. The deviation from
accepted engineering and design criteria may not lessen protection of
life and property but rather these needs must be met in alternate ways.
(8) The state construction project must promote one or more of the
following:
(a) An innovative site design that furthers the purposes of this
section;
(b) Increased on-site storm water retention that uses a variety of
native vegetation;
(c) The project does not allow density greater or less than what
would otherwise be allowed under city or county regulations and does
not allow any relaxation of the critical areas regulation; or
(d) 65/10/0 project design requirements discharge project
requirements:
(i) To reduce impervious area, one-way roads must be employed where
practical;
(ii) Bioretention facilities must be the principal method for
treating and retaining storm water; and
(iii) On a forested site, grading of a site is not allowed except
for road and walk footprints, building pads, driveways, and parking
areas unless the grading is absolutely necessary for project
feasability.
(9) With the exception of state highways, all roads, shoulders,
turnouts for emergency vehicles, parking stalls, driveways, and similar
structures must be constructed with a wearing surface consisting of
some type of approved pervious pavement, such as concrete without
fines, or an interlocking concrete paver system with drainage openings
to facilitate rainwater infiltration.
(10) The lowest floor elevation of any structure must be a minimum
of twenty-four inches above existing grade for ten feet in any
direction.
(11) On class C and D soils, foundations for structures must be
"no-excavation" type, such as piles or pin-pile footings.
(12) Generally, roof gutters are not permitted, except for over
entryways, unless the roof gutters are a part of a cistern collection
system.
(13) Roof runoff must be either infiltrated at the roof dripline or
collected in cisterns and used for domestic purposes.
(14) The state shall provide manuals for maintenance of low-impact
facilities.
(15) All structures must be provided with fire sprinkling systems.
(16) Noncombustible siding and roofing materials for all structures
and enclosed underfloor areas are required.
(a) Gutters and downspouts should generally be avoided, but if used
must be constructed of noncombustible material;
(b) Exterior walls of buildings or structures must be constructed
with materials approved for a minimum of one-hour-rated fire-resistive
construction on the exterior side or constructed with approved
noncombustible materials. These materials must extend from the top of
the foundation to the underside of the roof sheathing; and
(c) Buildings or structures must have all underfloor areas enclosed
to the ground, with exterior walls that meet the requirements of (b) of
this subsection. However, complete enclosure may be omitted where the
underside of all exposed floors and all exposed structural columns,
beams, and supporting walls are protected as required for exterior
one-hour-rated fire-resistive construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---