BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
industries are world-class leaders in the emerging solar electric
industry and the Northwest has an anticipated regional shortfall of
four to five hundred megawatts in the electric supply as predicted by
the Northwest power planning council.
The legislature finds that this shortfall is projected to occur,
even with the expected development of all available wind energy,
conservation, and energy efficiency measures that are available to the
region. The legislature recognizes the immediate need and regional
benefits of developing indigenous diverse carbon-free resources. The
legislature finds that locally sited carbon-free electricity generation
offers the best, least costly method of keeping energy generation
dollars in our local economies, while reducing the ultimate impacts of
electricity usage.
Solar technologies made in Washington are among the most carbon-free technologies in the world. State energy policies should recognize
that development of carbon-neutral technologies benefit all residents
of Washington state.
The legislature finds that residential development of solar
electric technologies is proceeding as anticipated by earlier
legislation implemented by the department of revenue and the climate
and rural energy development center at Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642.
The legislature intends to help meet the anticipated energy
shortfalls in an environmentally responsible manner. The legislature
intends to encourage all businesses, other commercial enterprises, and
local governments to invest in locally sited carbon-free generation.
The legislature intends to provide commercial incentives for the
greater use of locally created and installed solar electric
technologies, to support, retain, and grow existing local industries,
and further, to create new opportunities for carbon-free electric
generation technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carbon-free commercial scale energy generation account" means
the account established in section 5 of this act and administered by
the department to reimburse commercial scale solar projects for
measured carbon-free economic development kilowatt-hours. The
measurements must be made by a utility revenue meter.
(2)(a) "Commercial customer-generated solar electricity" means the
alternating current electricity that is generated by a system that
converts sunlight into electricity and is located on the real property
of a commercial enterprise, registered not-for-profit, or local
government that is also provided electricity generated by a light and
power business. A system located on a leasehold qualifies under this
definition. Federal facilities do not qualify under this definition
unless the property is leased to a nonfederal organization.
(b) "Commercial customer-generated solar electricity" does not
include electricity generated by a light and power business with
greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas
distribution business.
(3) "Solar electric energy system" means a system that produces
commercial customer-generated solar electricity.
(4) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any business, not-for-profit, or local
governmental entity, not in the light and power business or in the gas
distribution business, may apply to the light and power business
serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year beginning July 1,
2009, for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour
from a solar electric energy system installed on its property if they
have not applied for any other Washington renewable energy production-based incentive during that program year. No incentive may be paid for
kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2009, or after July 1, 2020.
(2)(a) Before submitting the application for the incentive
authorized under this section for the first time, the applicant must
submit to the department and to the climate and rural energy
development center at Washington State University, a certification in
a form and manner prescribed by the department that includes, but is
not limited to, the following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the solar
electric energy system;
(ii) The tax registration number of the applicant;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of commercial customer-generated solar electricity;
(iv) The nameplate rating of the solar electric energy system; and
(v) That the electricity may be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification, the
department must advise the applicant in writing whether the commercial
customer-generated solar electricity system qualifies for an incentive
under this section. The department may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center at Washington State University to
determine eligibility for the incentive. A system certification and
the information contained in the certification are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(3)(a) By August 1st of each year, an applicant for the incentive
authorized under this section must submit a certification to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system in a form and manner
prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the solar
electric energy system;
(ii) The tax registration number of the applicant;
(iii) The date of the letter from the department stating that the
solar electric energy system is eligible for the incentive under this
section;
(iv) The nameplate rating of the solar electric energy system; and
(v) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
solar electric energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification,
the light and power business serving the situs of the system must
notify the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The light and power business may consult with
the climate and rural energy development center at Washington State
University to determine eligibility for the incentive payment. An
incentive certification and the information contained in the
certification are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) A person receiving an incentive payment must keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. These records must be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the light and power business or department it
appears that an incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the
correct amount of incentive payable, the light and power business may
assess against the person for the amount found to have been paid in
excess of the correct amount of incentive payable and may add thereto
interest on the amount. Interest must be assessed in the manner that
the department assesses interest upon delinquent tax under RCW
82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable, the light and power business
may authorize additional payment.
(4) The investment cost recovery incentive must be at a rate of
thirty-eight cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless
requests exceed the amount available in the carbon-free commercial
scale energy generation account. If total annual requests for payments
from the investment cost recovery incentive under this section exceed
the amount of funds available, the incentive payments must be reduced
proportionately.
(5) No commercial system, business, not-for-profit, or local
governmental entity is eligible for incentives for more than twenty
thousand dollars per utility revenue meter at the system location per
year. This does not preclude multiple metered systems at one location.
(6) The environmental attributes of the solar electric energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department must reimburse a light
and power business from the carbon-free commercial scale energy
generation account in an amount equal to investment cost recovery
incentive payments made to its commercial customer-generated solar
electricity generating customers in any fiscal year under section 3 of
this act. The payment must be in a form and manner as required by the
department. Payments not claimed in one fiscal year may not be claimed
in a subsequent year.
(2) For any business that has claimed credit for amounts that
exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under section 3 of
this act, the reimbursement claimed for the excess payments are
immediately due and payable. The department must assess interest but
not penalties on the payments claimed. Interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the payment was claimed, and accrue until the
over paid amount is reclaimed.
(3) Obligation of payments under this section expire July 1, 2020,
and payments may not be claimed after June 30, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The carbon-free commercial scale energy
generation account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from appropriations made to the account must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
payments for commercial customer-generated solar electricity as defined
in this chapter and for administrative costs incurred by the department
and the Washington State University climate and rural development
center. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Using existing sources of information,
the department of revenue must report to the house of representatives
appropriations committee, the house of representatives committee
responsible for energy issues, the senate committee on ways and means,
and the senate committee responsible for energy issues by December 1,
2012. The report must measure the impacts of this act, including the
total number of solar energy system manufacturing companies in the
state, any change in the number of solar energy system manufacturing
companies in the state, and the effect on the number of jobs created
for Washington residents, and such other factors as the department of
revenue selects.
(2) The department of revenue may not conduct any new surveys to
provide the report required in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---