BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall accept applications to register to
vote from youth who are at least thirteen years of age and who meet all
the requirements to vote, except age. The names of the youth
registrants shall not be entered into the voter registration database
until thirty days before an election in which they will be eligible to
vote. Youth registrants shall receive all voter pamphlets and an
advisory ballot for statewide and federal elections.
(2) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to implement this
program.
(3) For the purposes of this section, an "advisory ballot" is a
ballot that contains all the statewide and federal races, as well as
initiatives, but which will be incapable of being counted.

--- END ---