BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
No later than thirty days after satisfactory completion of any
additional work or portion of any additional work by a contractor on a
public works project, the state or municipality shall issue a change
order to the contract for the full dollar amount of the work not in
dispute between the state or municipality and the contractor. If the
state or municipality does not issue such a change order within the
thirty days, interest must accrue on the dollar amount of the
additional work satisfactorily completed and not in dispute until a
change order is issued. The state or municipality shall pay this
interest at a rate of one percent per month. For the purposes of this
section, additional work is work beyond the scope defined in the
contract between the contractor and the state or municipality.

--- END ---