BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.155 and 2008 c 130 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
((two)) three hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster
process includes the limited public works process authorized under
subsection (3) of this section and any local government authorized to
award contracts using the small works roster process under this section
may award contracts using the limited public works process under
subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of
the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials
and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred fifty thousand dollars
to ((two)) three hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local
government that chooses to solicit bids from less than all the
appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must also
notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works roster
that quotations on the work are being sought. The government has the
sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state
agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars using
the limited public works process provided under this subsection.
Public works projects awarded under this subsection are exempt from the
other requirements of the small works roster process provided under
subsection (2) of this section and are exempt from the requirement that
contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW
39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW 39.04.010. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request.
A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a
list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the
previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration
number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited
public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government
may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter
39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby
assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the
limited public works project, however the state agency or authorized
local government shall have the right of recovery against the
contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may use the
limited public works process of subsection (3) of this section to
solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses that
are registered contractors with gross revenues under one million
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax return.
(b) A state agency or authorized local government may adopt
additional procedures to encourage small businesses that are registered
contractors with gross revenues under two hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax returns to submit
quotations or bids on small works roster contracts.
(6) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.08.120 and 2008 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All material and work required by a port district not meeting
the definition of public work in RCW 39.04.010(4) may be procured in
the open market or by contract and all work ordered may be done by
contract or day labor.
(2)(a) All such contracts for work meeting the definition of
"public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which exceeds
((two)) three hundred thousand dollars, shall be awarded using a
competitive bid process. The contract must be awarded at public
bidding upon notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in
the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon which
bids will be received, calling for bids upon the work, plans and
specifications for which shall then be on file in the office of the
commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for bids on
such work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by
the bidder. The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or
public works may be waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption
contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.
(b) For all contracts related to work meeting the definition of
"public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4) that are estimated at ((two)) three
hundred thousand dollars or less, a port district may let contracts
using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155 in lieu of
advertising for bids. Whenever possible, the managing official shall
invite at least one proposal from a minority contractor who shall
otherwise qualify under this section.
When awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals
from the small works roster, the managing official shall give weight to
the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it
would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall be
distributed equally among contractors, including minority contractors,
on the small works roster.

--- END ---