BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.901 and 1992 c 223 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) RCW 39.76.011, 60.28.011, 60.28.021, 60.28.051, 39.04.250,
and 39.04.900 are applicable to all public works contracts entered into
on or after September 1, 1992, relating to the construction of any work
of improvement.
(((2) RCW 39.76.010, 60.28.010, 60.28.020, and 60.28.050 are
applicable to all public works contracts entered into prior to
September 1, 1992, relating to the construction of any work of
improvement.))

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.040 and 2007 c 210 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it shall be the duty
of the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of
public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor
from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a
"Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in
excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages shall include:
(a) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(b) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers
entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated
number of workers in each classification.
Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved
by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to said officer. Unless otherwise
authorized by the department of labor and industries, each voucher
claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project estimate shall
state that the prevailing wages have been paid in accordance with the
prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay prevailing wages on
file with the public agency. Following the final acceptance of a
public works project, it shall be the duty of the officer charged with
the disbursement of public funds, to require the contractor and each
and every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to
submit to such officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid" before the funds
retained according to the provisions of RCW ((60.28.010)) 60.28.011 are
released to the contractor. Each affidavit of wages paid must be
certified by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to said officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency shall require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW ((60.28.010)) 60.28.011. Within thirty days of
receipt of the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall
submit the affidavit of wages paid to the industrial statistician of
the department of labor and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the awarding agency shall pay the wages due directly to the
claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages
stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take
action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or
subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an
awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two
thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the
procedures required by RCW 39.12.040(1).

Sec. 3 RCW 39.12.050 and 2001 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any contractor or subcontractor who files a false statement or
fails to file any statement or record required to be filed under this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter, shall, after a
determination to that effect has been issued by the director after
hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW, forfeit as a civil penalty the sum of
five hundred dollars for each false filing or failure to file, and
shall not be permitted to bid, or have a bid considered, on any public
works contract until the penalty has been paid in full to the director.
The civil penalty under this subsection shall not apply to a violation
determined by the director to be an inadvertent filing or reporting
error. Civil penalties shall be deposited in the public works
administration account.
To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor has not paid wages
at the rate due pursuant to RCW 39.12.020, and a finding to that effect
has been made as provided by this subsection, such unpaid wages shall
constitute a lien against the bonds and retainage as provided in RCW
18.27.040, 19.28.041, 39.08.010, and ((60.28.010)) 60.28.011.
(2) If a contractor or subcontractor is found to have violated the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section for a second time within
a five year period, the contractor or subcontractor shall be subject to
the sanctions prescribed in subsection (1) of this section and shall
not be allowed to bid on any public works contract for one year. The
one year period shall run from the date of notice by the director of
the determination of noncompliance. When an appeal is taken from the
director's determination, the one year period shall commence from the
date of the final determination of the appeal.
The director shall issue his or her findings that a contractor or
subcontractor has violated the provisions of this subsection after a
hearing held subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.12.065 and 2001 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon complaint by an interested party, the director of labor
and industries shall cause an investigation to be made to determine
whether there has been compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted hereunder, and if the investigation indicates that a violation
may have occurred, a hearing shall be held in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. The director shall issue a written determination including
his or her findings after the hearing. A judicial appeal from the
director's determination may be taken in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW, with the prevailing party entitled to recover reasonable costs and
attorneys fees.
A complaint concerning nonpayment of the prevailing rate of wage
shall be filed with the department of labor and industries no later
than thirty days from the acceptance date of the public works project.
The failure to timely file such a complaint shall not prohibit a
claimant from pursuing a private right of action against a contractor
or subcontractor for unpaid prevailing wages. The remedy provided by
this section is not exclusive and is concurrent with any other remedy
provided by law.
(2) To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor has not paid
the prevailing rate of wage under a determination issued as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, the director shall notify the agency
awarding the public works contract of the amount of the violation
found, and the awarding agency shall withhold, or in the case of a
bond, the director shall proceed against the bond in accordance with
the applicable statute to recover, such amount from the following
sources in the following order of priority until the total of such
amount is withheld:
(a) The retainage or bond in lieu of retainage as provided in RCW
((60.28.010)) 60.28.011;
(b) If the claimant was employed by the contractor or subcontractor
on the public works project, the bond filed by the contractor or
subcontractor with the department of labor and industries as provided
in RCW 18.27.040 and 19.28.041;
(c) A surety bond, or at the contractor's or subcontractor's option
an escrow account, running to the director in the amount of the
violation found; and
(d) That portion of the progress payments which is properly
allocable to the contractor or subcontractor who is found to be in
violation of this chapter. Under no circumstances shall any portion of
the progress payments be withheld that are properly allocable to a
contractor, subcontractor, or supplier, that is not found to be in
violation of this chapter.
The amount withheld shall be released to the director to distribute
in accordance with the director's determination.
(3) A contractor or subcontractor that is found, in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section, to have violated the requirement to pay
the prevailing rate of wage shall be subject to a civil penalty of not
less than one thousand dollars or an amount equal to twenty percent of
the total prevailing wage violation found on the contract, whichever is
greater, and shall not be permitted to bid, or have a bid considered,
on any public works contract until such civil penalty has been paid in
full to the director. If a contractor or subcontractor is found to
have participated in a violation of the requirement to pay the
prevailing rate of wage for a second time within a five-year period,
the contractor or subcontractor shall be subject to the sanctions
prescribed in this subsection and as an additional sanction shall not
be allowed to bid on any public works contract for two years. Civil
penalties shall be deposited in the public works administration
account. If a previous or subsequent violation of a requirement to pay
a prevailing rate of wage under federal or other state law is found
against the contractor or subcontractor within five years from a
violation under this section, the contractor or subcontractor shall not
be allowed to bid on any public works contract for two years. A
contractor or subcontractor shall not be barred from bidding on any
public works contract if the contractor or subcontractor relied upon
written information from the department to pay a prevailing rate of
wage that is later determined to be in violation of this chapter. The
civil penalty and sanctions under this subsection shall not apply to a
violation determined by the director to be an inadvertent filing or
reporting error. To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor has
not paid the prevailing wage rate under a determination issued as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, the unpaid wages shall
constitute a lien against the bonds and retainage as provided herein
and in RCW 18.27.040, 19.28.041, 39.08.010, and ((60.28.010))
60.28.011.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.76.020 and 1981 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW ((39.76.010)) 39.76.011 does not apply to the following:
(1) Interagency or intergovernmental transactions;
(2) Amounts payable to employees or prospective employees of state
agencies or local governmental units as reimbursement for expenses;
(3) Belated claims for any time of delinquency after July 31
following the second year of the fiscal biennium;
(4) Claims subject to a good faith dispute, when before the date of
timely payment, notice of the dispute is:
(a) Sent by certified mail;
(b) Personally delivered; or
(c) Sent in accordance with procedures in the contract;
(5) Delinquencies due to natural disasters, disruptions in postal
or delivery service, work stoppages due to labor disputes, power
failures, or any other cause resulting from circumstances clearly
beyond the control of the unit of local government or state agency;
(6) Contracts entered before July 26, 1981; and
(7) Payment from any retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 and
chapter 41.24 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 60.28.011 and 2007 c 494 s 504 and 2007 c 218 s 92 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Public improvement contracts shall provide, and public bodies
shall reserve, a contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the
moneys earned by the contractor as a trust fund for the protection and
payment of: (a) The claims of any person arising under the contract;
and (b) the state with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82
RCW which may be due from such contractor.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract shall have a lien upon
moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant
shall be given within forty-five days of completion of the contract
work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract shall be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
shall issue a check representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable
to the bank or trust company and the contractor jointly. This check
shall be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the contractor
and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities shall be
held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities shall be paid to
the contractor as the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body. The
public body shall accept a bond meeting these requirements unless the
public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing to accept it. This
bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims and liens and
in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages
in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of
the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting
the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of sixty days
following the completion. In the event that the work is terminated
before final completion as provided in this section, the public body
may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same contractor to
perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount equal to or
less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this
chapter are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and
regulations in conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
((60.28.020)) 60.28.021 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department
of transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes shall be
certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty
days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue and the material suppliers and laborers filing claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
39.10.210. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the project has
been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the
work, the public body may accept the completion of the subcontract.
The public body must give public notice of this acceptance. After a
forty-five day period for giving notice of liens, and compliance with
the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021, the public body may
release that portion of the retained funds associated with the
subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the forty-five
day period are not valid.
(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in RCW 39.10.210.

Sec. 7 RCW 60.28.040 and 1985 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The amount of all taxes, increases and penalties due or to become
due under Title 82 RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees with respect to a public improvement contract
wherein the contract price is ((twenty)) thirty-five thousand dollars
or more shall be a lien prior to all other liens upon the amount of the
retained percentage withheld by the disbursing officer under such
contract, except that the employees of a contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees who have not been paid the prevailing wage
under such a public improvement contract shall have a first priority
lien against the bond or retainage prior to all other liens. The
amount of all other taxes, increases and penalties due and owing from
the contractor shall be a lien upon the balance of such retained
percentage remaining in the possession of the disbursing officer after
all other statutory lien claims have been paid.

Sec. 8 RCW 60.28.080 and 1982 c 170 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any delay in issuance of notice to proceed or in
construction following an award of any public construction contract is
primarily caused by acts or omissions of persons or agencies other than
the contractor and a preliminary, special or permanent restraining
order of a court of competent jurisdiction is issued pursuant to
litigation and the appropriate public contracting body does not elect
to delete the completion of the contract as provided by RCW
((60.28.010(3))) 60.28.011(7), the appropriate contracting body will
issue a change order or force account directive to cover reasonable
costs incurred by the contractor as a result of such delay. These
costs shall include but not be limited to contractor's costs for wages,
labor costs other than wages, wage taxes, materials, equipment rentals,
insurance, bonds, professional fees, and subcontracts, attributable to
such delay plus a reasonable sum for overhead and profit.
In the event of a dispute between the contracting body and the
contractor, arbitration procedures may be commenced under the
applicable terms of the construction contract, or, if the contract
contains no such provision for arbitration, under the then obtaining
rules of the American Arbitration Association.
If the delay caused by litigation exceeds six months, the
contractor may then elect to terminate the contract and to delete the
completion of the contract and receive payment in proportion to the
amount of the work completed plus the cost of the delay. Amounts
retained and accumulated under RCW ((60.28.010)) 60.28.011 shall be
held for a period of ((thirty)) forty-five days following the election
of the contractor to terminate. Election not to terminate the contract
by the contractor shall not affect the accumulation of costs incurred
as a result of the delay provided above.
(2) This section shall not apply to any contract awarded pursuant
to an invitation for bid issued on or before July 16, 1973.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 39.04.140 (Contracts affected by increase in price of
petroleum products -- Termination -- Continuation with contracting agency
sharing increased costs -- Conditions) and 1974 ex.s. c 194 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.76.010 (Interest on unpaid public contracts -- Timely
payment) and 1981 c 68 s 1;
(3) RCW 60.28.010 (Retained percentage -- Labor and material lien
created -- Bond in lieu of retained funds -- Termination before
completion -- Chapter deemed exclusive -- Release of ferry contract
payments -- Projects of farmers home administration) and 2007 c 218 s 91,
1986 c 181 s 6, 1984 c 146 s 1, 1982 c 170 s 1, & 1981 c 260 s 14;
(4) RCW 60.28.020 (Excess over lien claims to contractor) and 2007
c 218 s 93, 1975 1st ex.s. c 104 s 2, 1970 ex.s. c 38 s 2, 1967 ex.s.
c 26 s 23, 1955 c 236 s 2, & 1921 c 166 s 2; and
(5) RCW 60.28.050 (Duties of disbursing officer upon final
acceptance of contract) and 1982 c 170 s 2, 1970 ex.s. c 38 s 3, 1967
ex.s. c 26 s 24, & 1955 c 236 s 5.

--- END ---