BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.470 and 1999 c 214 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall contract, to the extent that funds are
appropriated for this purpose, for case management services and such
other services as the secretary deems necessary to assist offenders
identified under RCW 72.09.370 for participation in the offender
reentry community safety program. The contracts may be with regional
support networks or any other qualified and appropriate entities.
(2) The case manager has the authority to assist these offenders in
obtaining the services, as set forth in the plan created under RCW
72.09.370(2), for up to five years. The services may include
coordination of mental health services, assistance with unfunded
medical expenses, obtaining chemical dependency treatment, housing,
employment services, educational or vocational training, independent
living skills, parenting education, anger management services, and such
other services as the case manager deems necessary.
(3) The legislature intends that funds appropriated for the
purposes of RCW 72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section
and distributed to the regional support networks are to supplement and
not to supplant general funding. Funds appropriated to implement RCW
72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section are not to be
considered available resources as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not
subject to the ((statutory distribution formula)) priorities, terms, or
conditions in the appropriations act established pursuant to RCW
71.24.035.
(4) The offender reentry community safety program was formerly
known as the community integration assistance program.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.480 and 2002 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensed service provider or regional support network, acting
in the course of the provider's or network's duties under this chapter,
is not liable for civil damages resulting from the injury or death of
another caused by a ((dangerous mentally ill offender)) participant in
the offender reentry community safety program who is a client of the
provider or network, unless the act or omission of the provider or
network constitutes:
(a) Gross negligence;
(b) Willful or wanton misconduct; or
(c) A breach of the duty to warn of and protect from a client's
threatened violent behavior if the client has communicated a serious
threat of physical violence against a reasonably ascertainable victim
or victims.
(2) In addition to any other requirements to report violations, the
licensed service provider and regional support network shall report an
offender's expressions of intent to harm or other predatory behavior,
regardless of whether there is an ascertainable victim, in progress
reports and other established processes that enable courts and
supervising entities to assess and address the progress and
appropriateness of treatment.
(3) A licensed service provider's or regional support network's
mere act of treating a ((dangerous mentally ill offender)) participant
in the offender reentry community safety program is not negligence.
Nothing in this subsection alters the licensed service provider's or
regional support network's normal duty of care with regard to the
client.
(4) The limited liability provided by this section applies only to
the conduct of licensed service providers and regional support networks
and does not apply to conduct of the state.
(5) For purposes of this section, (("dangerous mentally ill
offender")) "participant in the offender reentry community safety
program" means a person who has been identified under RCW 72.09.370 as
an offender who: (a) Is reasonably believed to be dangerous to himself
or herself or others; and (b) has a mental disorder.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.370 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 362 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The offender reentry community safety program is established to
provide intensive services to offenders identified under this
subsection and to thereby promote public safety. The secretary shall
identify offenders in confinement or partial confinement who: (a) Are
reasonably believed to be dangerous to themselves or others; and (b)
have a mental disorder. In determining an offender's dangerousness,
the secretary shall consider behavior known to the department and
factors, based on research, that are linked to an increased risk for
dangerousness of ((mentally ill)) offenders with mental illnesses and
shall include consideration of an offender's chemical dependency or
abuse.
(2) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section,
a team consisting of representatives of the department of corrections,
the division of mental health, and, as necessary, the indeterminate
sentence review board, other divisions or administrations within the
department of social and health services, specifically including the
division of alcohol and substance abuse and the division of
developmental disabilities, the appropriate regional support network,
and the providers, as appropriate, shall develop a plan, as determined
necessary by the team, for delivery of treatment and support services
to the offender upon release. In developing the plan, the offender
shall be offered assistance in executing a mental health directive
under chapter 71.32 RCW, after being fully informed of the benefits,
scope, and purposes of such directive. The team may include a school
district representative for offenders under the age of twenty-one. The
team shall consult with the offender's counsel, if any, and, as
appropriate, the offender's family and community. The team shall
notify the crime victim/witness program, which shall provide notice to
all people registered to receive notice under RCW 9.94A.612 or
72.09.712 of the proposed release plan developed by the team. Victims,
witnesses, and other interested people notified by the department may
provide information and comments to the department on potential safety
risk to specific individuals or classes of individuals posed by the
specific offender. The team may recommend: (a) That the offender be
evaluated by the ((county)) designated mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.05 RCW; (b) department-supervised community
treatment; or (c) voluntary community mental health or chemical
dependency or abuse treatment.
(3) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section,
the team shall determine whether or not an evaluation by a ((county))
designated mental health professional is needed. If an evaluation is
recommended, the supporting documentation shall be immediately
forwarded to the appropriate ((county)) designated mental health
professional. The supporting documentation shall include the
offender's criminal history, history of judicially required or
administratively ordered involuntary antipsychotic medication while in
confinement, and any known history of involuntary civil commitment.
(4) If an evaluation by a ((county)) designated mental health
professional is recommended by the team, such evaluation shall occur
not more than ten days, nor less than five days, prior to release.
(5) A second evaluation by a ((county)) designated mental health
professional shall occur on the day of release if requested by the
team, based upon new information or a change in the offender's mental
condition, and the initial evaluation did not result in an emergency
detention or a summons under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(6) If the ((county)) designated mental health professional
determines an emergency detention under chapter 71.05 RCW is necessary,
the department shall release the offender only to a state hospital or
to a consenting evaluation and treatment facility. The department
shall arrange transportation of the offender to the hospital or
facility.
(7) If the ((county)) designated mental health professional
believes that a less restrictive alternative treatment is appropriate,
he or she shall seek a summons, pursuant to the provisions of chapter
71.05 RCW, to require the offender to appear at an evaluation and
treatment facility. If a summons is issued, the offender shall remain
within the corrections facility until completion of his or her term of
confinement and be transported, by corrections personnel on the day of
completion, directly to the identified evaluation and treatment
facility.
(8) The secretary shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---