BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.76.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.060 are
each amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 9A.76.070 and 9A.76.080, "relative" means a person:
(1)(a) Who was under the age of eighteen at the time of the
offense, and is related as husband or wife, brother or sister, parent
or grandparent, child or grandchild, step-child or step-parent to the
person to whom criminal assistance is rendered; or
(b) Who provides emergency medical assistance and who is related to
the same person as husband or wife, brother or sister, parent or
grandparent, child or grandchild, stepchild or stepparent to whom
criminal assistance is rendered; and
(2) Who does not render criminal assistance to another person in
one or more of the means defined in subsections (4), (5), or (6) of RCW
9A.76.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known as Randy's law.

--- END ---