BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.06.020 and 1999 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The court shall have three divisions, one of which shall be
headquartered in Seattle, one of which shall be headquartered in
Spokane, and one of which shall be headquartered in Tacoma:
(1) The first division shall have twelve judges from three
districts, as follows:
(a) District 1 shall consist of King county and shall have eight
judges;
(b) District 2 shall consist of Snohomish county and shall have two
judges; and
(c) District 3 shall consist of Island, San Juan, Skagit, and
Whatcom counties and shall have two judges.
(2) The second division shall have ((seven)) eight judges from the
following districts:
(a) District 1 shall consist of Pierce county and shall have three
judges;
(b) District 2 shall consist of Clallam, Grays Harbor, Jefferson,
Kitsap, Mason, and Thurston counties and shall have ((two)) three
judges;
(c) District 3 shall consist of Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Pacific,
Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties and shall have two judges.
(3) The third division shall have five judges from the following
districts:
(a) District 1 shall consist of Ferry, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, and Stevens counties and shall have two judges;
(b) District 2 shall consist of Adams, Asotin, Benton, Columbia,
Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and shall
have one judge;
(c) District 3 shall consist of Chelan, Douglas, Kittitas,
Klickitat, and Yakima counties and shall have two judges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The judicial position created by section 1 of this act shall become
effective only if that position is specifically funded and is
referenced by division and district in an omnibus appropriations act.

--- END ---