BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.150 and 1961 c 15 s 82.32.150 are each amended
to read as follows:
((All taxes, penalties, and interest shall be paid in full before
any action may be instituted in any court to contest all or any part of
such taxes, penalties, or interest.)) No restraining order or
injunction shall be granted or issued by any court or judge to restrain
or enjoin the collection of any tax or penalty or any part thereof,
except upon the ground that the assessment thereof was in violation of
the Constitution of the United States or that of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.180 and 1997 c 156 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, except one who has failed to keep and preserve books,
records, and invoices as required in this chapter and chapter 82.24
RCW, ((having paid any tax as required and)) feeling aggrieved by the
amount of the tax may appeal to the superior court of Thurston county,
within the time limitation for a refund provided in chapter 82.32 RCW
or, if an application for refund has been made to the department within
that time limitation, then within thirty days after rejection of the
application, whichever time limitation is later. In the appeal the
taxpayer shall set forth the amount of the tax imposed upon the
taxpayer which the taxpayer concedes to be the correct tax and the
reason why the tax should be reduced or abated. The appeal shall be
perfected by serving a copy of the notice of appeal upon the department
within the time herein specified and by filing the original thereof
with proof of service with the clerk of the superior court of Thurston
county.
The trial in the superior court on appeal shall be de novo and
without the necessity of any pleadings other than the notice of appeal.
At trial, the burden shall rest upon the taxpayer to prove that the tax
as paid by the taxpayer is incorrect, either in whole or in part, and
to establish the correct amount of the tax. In such proceeding the
taxpayer shall be deemed the plaintiff, and the state, the defendant;
and both parties shall be entitled to subpoena the attendance of
witnesses as in other civil actions and to produce evidence that is
competent, relevant, and material to determine the correct amount of
the tax that should be paid by the taxpayer. Either party may seek
appellate review in the same manner as other civil actions are appealed
to the appellate courts.
It shall not be necessary for the taxpayer to protest against the
payment of any tax or to make any demand to have the same refunded or
to petition the director for a hearing in order to appeal to the
superior court, but no court action or proceeding of any kind shall be
maintained by the taxpayer to recover any tax paid, or any part
thereof, except as herein provided.
The provisions of this section shall not apply to any tax payment
which has been the subject of an appeal to the board of tax appeals
with respect to which appeal a formal hearing has been elected.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.190 and 1996 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, by its order, may hold in abeyance the
collection of tax from any taxpayer or any group of taxpayers when a
question bearing on their liability for tax hereunder is pending before
the courts. The department may impose such conditions as may be deemed
just and equitable ((and)); however, the department may not require
payment of taxes, interest, and penalties before any action may be
instituted in any court to contest all or any part of such taxes,
interest, or penalties. If a final judgment is entered against the
taxpayer for payment of any tax or penalty, the department shall
require the payment of interest at the rate of three-quarters of one
percent of the amount of the tax for each thirty days or portion
thereof from the date upon which such tax became due until the date of
payment.
(2) Interest imposed under this section for periods after January
1, 1997, shall be computed on a daily basis at the rate as computed
under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the
first day of January of each year. Interest for taxes held in abeyance
under this section before January 1, 1997, but outstanding after
January 1, 1997, shall not be recalculated but shall remain at
three-quarters of one percent per each thirty days or portion thereof.

--- END ---