BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may purchase five passenger-only ferries using the
design-build procurement process under this chapter. The design-build
procurement process must be consistent with procedures used by the
department for highway construction contracts, ensuring that best
practices are employed to speed vessel delivery and contain costs. In
order to prequalify for this bid, the bidder must be able to design
ferries that produce a sufficiently low wake and provide high-speed
transit through Rich Passage in the Puget Sound and can be delivered
within two years of a notice to proceed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and
before the expenditure of funds for the purposes described in RCW
47.66.070, twenty-five million dollars deposited into the multimodal
transportation account must be transferred to the passenger ferry
account created under RCW 47.60.645 for the purposes described in
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of twenty-five million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2011, from the passenger ferry account to the
department of transportation for the purposes described in section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---