BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
uniform debt management services act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the director of the department of
financial institutions.
(2) "Affiliate":
(a) With respect to an individual, means:
(i) The spouse of the individual;
(ii) A sibling of the individual or the spouse of a sibling;
(iii) An individual or the spouse of an individual who is a lineal
ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or the individual's
spouse;
(iv) An aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, first cousin, niece,
nephew, grandniece, or grandnephew, whether related by the whole or the
half blood or adoption, or the spouse of any of them; or
(v) Any other individual occupying the residence of the individual;
and
(b) With respect to an entity, means:
(i) A person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled
by, or is under common control with the entity;
(ii) An officer of, or an individual performing similar functions
with respect to, the entity;
(iii) A director of, or an individual performing similar functions
with respect to, the entity;
(iv) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, a person that receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars from the entity in either the current year or the
preceding year or a person that owns more than ten percent of, or an
individual who is employed by or is a director of, a person that
receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars from the
entity in either the current year or the preceding year;
(v) An officer or director of, or an individual performing similar
functions with respect to, a person described in (b)(i) of this
subsection;
(vi) The spouse of, or an individual occupying the residence of, an
individual described in (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection; or
(vii) An individual who has the relationship specified in (a)(iv)
of this subsection to an individual or the spouse of an individual
described in (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection.
(3) "Agreement" means an agreement between a provider and an
individual for the performance of debt management services.
(4) "Bank" means a financial institution, including a commercial
bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and
trust company, engaged in the business of banking, chartered under
federal or state law, and regulated by a federal or state banking
regulatory authority.
(5) "Business address" means the physical location of a business,
including the name and number of a street.
(6) "Certified counselor" means an individual certified by a
training program or certifying organization, approved by the
administrator, that authenticates the competence of individuals
providing education and assistance to other individuals in connection
with debt management services in which an agreement contemplates that
creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment,
default, or delinquency.
(7) "Certified debt specialist" means an individual certified by a
training program or certifying organization, approved by the
administrator, that authenticates the competence of individuals
providing education and assistance to other individuals in connection
with debt management services in which an agreement contemplates that
creditors will settle debts for less than the full principal amount of
debt owed.
(8) "Concessions" means assent to repayment of a debt on terms more
favorable to an individual than the terms of the contract between the
individual and a creditor.
(9) "Day" means calendar day.
(10) "Debt management services" means services as an intermediary
between an individual and one or more creditors of the individual for
the purpose of obtaining concessions, but does not include:
(a) Legal services provided in an attorney-client relationship by
an attorney licensed or otherwise authorized to practice law in this
state;
(b) Accounting services provided in an accountant-client
relationship by a certified public accountant licensed to provide
accounting services in this state; or
(c) Financial planning services provided in a financial planner-client relationship by a member of a financial planning profession
whose members the administrator, by rule, determines are:
(i) Licensed by this state;
(ii) Subject to a disciplinary mechanism;
(iii) Subject to a code of professional responsibility; and
(iv) Subject to a continuing education requirement.
(11) "Entity" means a person other than an individual.
(12) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable standards of fair dealing.
(13) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity. The term does
not include a public corporation, government, or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(14) "Plan" means a program or strategy in which a provider
furnishes debt management services to an individual and which includes
a schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the individual and
used to pay debts owed by the individual.
(15) "Principal amount of the debt" means the amount of a debt at
the time of an agreement.
(16) "Provider" means a person that provides, offers to provide, or
agrees to provide debt management services directly or through others.
(17) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(18) "Settlement fee" means a charge imposed on or paid by an
individual in connection with a creditor's assent to accept in full
satisfaction of a debt an amount less than the principal amount of the
debt.
(19) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic sound, symbol, or process.
(20) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(21) "Trust account" means an account held by a provider that is:
(a) Established in an insured bank;
(b) Separate from other accounts of the provider or its designee;
(c) Designated as a trust account or other account designated to
indicate that the money in the account is not the money of the provider
or its designee; and
(d) Used to hold money of one or more individuals for disbursement
to creditors of the individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter does not apply to an
agreement with an individual who the provider has no reason to know
resides in this state at the time of the agreement.
(2) This chapter does not apply to a provider to the extent that
the provider:
(a) Provides or agrees to provide debt management, educational, or
counseling services to an individual who the provider has no reason to
know resides in this state at the time the provider agrees to provide
the services; or
(b) Receives no compensation for debt management services from or
on behalf of the individuals to whom it provides the services or from
their creditors.
(3) This chapter does not apply to the following persons or their
employees when the person or the employee is engaged in the regular
course of the person's business or profession:
(a) A judicial officer, a person acting under an order of a court
or an administrative agency, or an assignee for the benefit of
creditors;
(b) A bank;
(c) An affiliate, as defined in section 2(2)(b)(i) of this act, of
a bank if the affiliate is regulated by a federal or state banking
regulatory authority; or
(d) A title insurer, escrow company, or other person that provides
bill paying services if the provision of debt management services is
incidental to the bill paying services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, a provider may not provide debt
management services to an individual who it reasonably should know
resides in this state at the time it agrees to provide the services,
unless the provider is registered under this chapter.
(2) If a provider is registered under this chapter, subsection (1)
of this section does not apply to an employee or agent of the provider.
(3) The administrator shall maintain and publicize a list of the
names of all registered providers.
(4) A provider whose agreements contemplate that creditors will
reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or
delinquency or whose agreements contemplate that creditors will settle
debts for less than the full principal amount of debt owed may be
registered only if it is:
(a) Organized and properly operating as a not-for-profit entity
under the law of the state in which it was formed; and
(b) Exempt from taxation under the internal revenue code (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An application for registration as a
provider must be in a form prescribed by the administrator.
(2) Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, an application for registration as a provider must
be accompanied by:
(a) The fee established by the administrator;
(b) The bond required by section 13 of this act;
(c) Identification of all trust accounts required by section 22 of
this act and an irrevocable consent authorizing the administrator to
review and examine the trust accounts;
(d) Evidence of insurance in the amount of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars:
(i) Against the risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other
misconduct on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or
agent of the applicant;
(ii) Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in
this state and rated at least an "A" or equivalent by a nationally
recognized rating organization approved by the administrator;
(iii) With a deductible, not exceeding five thousand dollars;
(iv) Payable for the benefit of the applicant, Washington state,
and individuals who are residents of Washington state, as their
interests may appear; and
(v) Not subject to cancellation by the applicant or the insurer
until sixty days after written notice has been given to the
administrator;
(e) Proof of:
(i) Registration for a master business license with the department
of revenue; and
(ii) Filing with the secretary of state any documents to be filed
for that type of business entity; and
(f) If the applicant is exempt from taxation under the internal
revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501), evidence of that status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An application for registration must be
signed under oath and include:
(1) The applicant's name, principal business address and telephone
number, and all other business addresses in this state, e-mail
addresses, and internet web site addresses;
(2) All names under which the applicant conducts business;
(3) The address of each location in this state at which the
applicant will provide debt management services or a statement that the
applicant will have no such location;
(4) The name and home address of each officer and director of the
applicant and each person that owns at least ten percent of the
applicant;
(5) Identification of every jurisdiction in which, during the five
years immediately preceding the application:
(a) The applicant or any of its officers or directors has been
licensed or registered to provide debt management services; or
(b) Individuals have resided when they received debt management
services from the applicant;
(6) A statement describing, to the extent it is known or should be
known by the applicant, any material civil or criminal judgment or
litigation and any material administrative or enforcement action by a
governmental agency in any jurisdiction against the applicant, any of
its officers, directors, owners, or agents, or any person who is
authorized to have access to the trust account required by section 22
of this act;
(7) The applicant's financial statements, audited by an accountant
licensed to conduct audits, for each of the two years immediately
preceding the application or, if it has not been in operation for the
two years preceding the application, for the period of its existence;
(8) Evidence of accreditation by an independent accrediting
organization approved by the administrator;
(9) Evidence that, within twelve months after initial employment,
each of the applicant's counselors becomes certified as a certified
counselor or certified debt specialist;
(10) A description of the three most commonly used educational
programs that the applicant provides or intends to provide to
individuals who reside in this state and a copy of any materials used
or to be used in those programs;
(11) A description of the applicant's financial analysis and
initial budget plan, including any form or electronic model, used to
evaluate the financial condition of individuals;
(12) A copy of each form of agreement that the applicant will use
with individuals who reside in this state;
(13) The schedule of fees and charges that the applicant will use
with individuals who reside in this state;
(14) At the applicant's expense, the results of a criminal records
check, including fingerprints, conducted within the immediately
preceding twelve months, covering every officer of the applicant and
every employee or agent of the applicant who is authorized to have
access to the trust account required by section 22 of this act;
(15) The names and addresses of all employers of each director
during the ten years immediately preceding the application;
(16) A description of any ownership interest of at least ten
percent by a director, owner, or employee of the applicant in:
(a) Any affiliate of the applicant; or
(b) Any entity that provides products or services to the applicant
or any individual relating to the applicant's debt management services;
(17) A statement of the amount of compensation of the applicant's
five most highly compensated employees for each of the three years
immediately preceding the application or, if it has not been in
operation for the three years preceding the application, for the period
of its existence;
(18) The identity of each director who is an affiliate, as defined
in section 2(2) (a) or (b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii) of this
act, of the applicant; and
(19) Any other information that the administrator reasonably
requires to perform the administrator's duties under section 9 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An applicant or registered provider shall
notify the administrator within ten days after a change in the
information specified in section 5(2) (d) or (f) or 6 (1), (3), (6),
(12), or (13) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Except for the information required by
section 6 (7), (14), and (17) of this act and the addresses required by
section 6(4) of this act, the administrator shall make the information
in an application for registration as a provider available to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (2) and (4) of this section, the administrator shall issue
a certificate of registration as a provider to a person that complies
with sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(2) If an applicant has otherwise complied with sections 5 and 6 of
this act, including a timely effort to obtain the information required
by section 6(14) of this act, but the information has not been
received, the administrator may issue a temporary certificate of
registration. The temporary certificate shall expire no later than one
hundred eighty days after issuance.
(3) The administrator may deny registration if:
(a) The application contains information that is materially
erroneous or incomplete;
(b) An officer, director, or owner of the applicant has been
convicted of a crime, or suffered a civil judgment, involving
dishonesty or the violation of state or federal securities laws;
(c) The applicant or any of its officers, directors, or owners has
defaulted in the payment of money collected for others; or
(d) The administrator finds that the financial responsibility,
experience, character, or general fitness of the applicant or its
owners, directors, employees, or agents does not warrant belief that
the business will be operated in compliance with this chapter.
(4) The administrator shall deny registration if with respect to an
applicant that is organized as a not-for-profit entity or has obtained
tax-exempt status under the internal revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501),
the applicant's board of directors is not independent of the
applicant's employees and agents.
(5) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, a board of directors is not independent for purposes
of subsection (4) of this section if more than one-fourth of its
members:
(a) Are affiliates of the applicant, as defined in section 2(2) (a)
or (b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii); or
(b) After the date ten years before first becoming a director of
the applicant, were employed by or directors of a person that received
from the applicant more than twenty-five thousand dollars in either the
current year or the preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The administrator shall approve or deny
an initial registration as a provider within one hundred twenty days
after an application is filed. In connection with a request pursuant
to section 6(19) of this act for additional information, the
administrator may extend the one hundred twenty-day period for not more
than sixty days. Within seven days after denying an application, the
administrator, in a record, shall inform the applicant of the reasons
for the denial.
(2) If the administrator denies an application for registration as
a provider or does not act on an application within the time prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, the applicant may appeal and request
a hearing.
(3) Subject to sections 11(4) and 34 of this act, a registration as
a provider is valid for one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A provider must obtain a renewal of its
registration annually.
(2) An application for renewal of registration as a provider must
be in a form prescribed by the administrator, signed under oath, and:
(a) Be filed no fewer than thirty and no more than sixty days
before the registration expires;
(b) Be accompanied by the fee established by the administrator and
the bond required by section 13 of this act;
(c) Contain the matter required for initial registration as a
provider by section 6 (8) and (9) of this act, and a financial
statement, audited by an accountant licensed to conduct audits, for the
applicant's fiscal year immediately preceding the application;
(d) Disclose any changes in the information contained in the
applicant's application for registration or its immediately previous
application for renewal, as applicable. If an application is otherwise
complete and the applicant has made a timely effort to obtain the
information required by section 6(14) of this act, but the information
has not been received, the administrator may issue a temporary renewal
of registration. The temporary renewal shall expire no later than one
hundred eighty days after issuance;
(e) Supply evidence of insurance in an amount equal to the larger
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or the highest daily balance in
the trust account required by section 22 of this act during the six-month period immediately preceding the application:
(i) Against risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other misconduct
on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or agent of the
applicant;
(ii) Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in
this state and rated not less than "A" or equivalent by a nationally
recognized rating organization approved by the administrator;
(iii) With a deductible, not exceeding five thousand dollars;
(iv) Payable for the benefit of the applicant, Washington state,
and individuals who are residents of Washington state, as their
interests may appear; and
(v) Not subject to cancellation by the applicant or the insurer
until sixty days after written notice has been given to the
administrator;
(f) Disclose the total amount of money received by the applicant
pursuant to plans during the preceding twelve months from or on behalf
of individuals who reside in this state and the total amount of money
distributed to creditors of those individuals during that period;
(g) Disclose, to the best of the applicant's knowledge, the gross
amount of money accumulated during the preceding twelve months pursuant
to plans by or on behalf of individuals who reside in this state and
with whom the applicant has agreements; and
(h) Provide any other information that the administrator reasonably
requires to perform the administrator's duties under this section.
(3) Except for the information required by section 6 (7), (14), and
(17) of this act and the addresses required by section 6(4) of this
act, the administrator shall make the information in an application for
renewal of registration as a provider available to the public.
(4) If a registered provider files a timely and complete
application for renewal of registration, the registration remains
effective until the administrator, in a record, notifies the applicant
of a denial and states the reasons for the denial.
(5) If the administrator denies an application for renewal of
registration as a provider, the applicant, within thirty days after
receiving notice of the denial, may appeal and request a hearing under
chapter 34.05 RCW. Subject to section 34 of this act, while the appeal
is pending the applicant shall continue to provide debt management
services to individuals with whom it has agreements. If the denial is
affirmed, subject to the administrator's order and section 34 of this
act, the applicant shall continue to provide debt management services
to individuals with whom it has agreements until, with the approval of
the administrator, it transfers the agreements to another registered
provider or returns to the individuals all unexpended money that is
under the applicant's control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If a provider holds a license or
certificate of registration in another state authorizing it to provide
debt management services, the provider may submit a copy of that
license or certificate and the application for it instead of an
application in the form prescribed by section 5(1), 6, or 11(2) of this
act. The administrator shall accept the application and the license or
certificate from the other state as an application for registration as
a provider or for renewal of registration as a provider, as
appropriate, in this state if:
(1) The application in the other state contains information
substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an
application submitted in this state;
(2) The applicant provides the information required by section 6
(1), (3), (10), (12), and (13) of this act; and
(3) The applicant, under oath, certifies that the information
contained in the application is current or, to the extent it is not
current, supplements the application to make the information current.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Except as otherwise provided in section
14 of this act, a provider that is required to be registered under this
chapter shall file a surety bond with the administrator, which must:
(a) Be in effect during the period of registration and for two
years after the provider ceases providing debt management services to
individuals in this state; and
(b) Run to this state for the benefit of this state and of
individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt
management services from the provider, as their interests may appear.
(2) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, a surety bond filed under subsection (1) of this
section must:
(a) Be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars or other larger or
smaller amount that the administrator determines is warranted by the
financial condition and business experience of the provider, the
history of the provider in performing debt management services, the
risk to individuals, and any other factor the administrator considers
appropriate;
(b) Be issued by a bonding, surety, or insurance company authorized
to do business in this state and rated not less than "A" by a
nationally recognized rating organization; and
(c) Have payment conditioned upon noncompliance of the provider or
its agent with this chapter.
(3) If the principal amount of a surety bond is reduced by payment
of a claim or a judgment, the provider shall immediately notify the
administrator and, within thirty days after notice by the
administrator, file a new or additional surety bond in an amount set by
the administrator. The amount of the new or additional bond must be at
least the amount of the bond immediately before payment of the claim or
judgment. If for any reason a surety terminates a bond, the provider
shall immediately file a new surety bond in the amount of fifty
thousand dollars or other amount determined pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section.
(4) The administrator or an individual may obtain satisfaction out
of the surety bond procured pursuant to this section if:
(a) The administrator assesses expenses under section 32(1)(a) of
this act, issues a final order under section 33(1)(b) of this act, or
recovers a final judgment under section 33 (1)(d) or (e) or (4) of this
act; or
(b) An individual recovers a final judgment pursuant to section 35
(1), (2) or (3)(a), (b), or (d) of this act.
(5) If claims against a surety bond exceed or are reasonably
expected to exceed the amount of the bond, the administrator, on the
initiative of the administrator or on petition of the surety, shall,
unless the proceeds are adequate to pay all costs, judgments, and
claims, distribute the proceeds in the following order:
(a) To satisfaction of a final order or judgment under section 33
(1)(b), (d), (e), or (4) of this act;
(b) To final judgments recovered by individuals pursuant to section
35 (1), (2), or (3)(a), (b), or (d) of this act, pro rata;
(c) To claims of individuals established to the satisfaction of the
administrator, pro rata; and
(d) If a final order or judgment is issued under section 33(1) of
this act, to the expenses charged pursuant to section 32(2)(a) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Instead of the surety bond required by
section 13 of this act, a provider may deliver to the administrator, in
the amount required by section 13(2) of this act, and, except as
otherwise provided in (b)(i) of this subsection, payable or available
to this state and to individuals who reside in this state when they
agree to receive debt management services from the provider, as their
interests may appear, if the provider or its agent does not comply with
this chapter:
(a) A certificate of insurance:
(i) Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in
this state and rated at least an "A" or equivalent by a nationally
recognized rating organization approved by the administrator; and
(ii) With no deductible, or if the provider supplies a bond in the
amount of five thousand dollars, a deductible not exceeding five
thousand dollars; or
(b) With the approval of the administrator:
(i) An irrevocable letter of credit, issued or confirmed by a bank
approved by the administrator, payable upon presentation of a
certificate by the administrator stating that the provider or its agent
has not complied with this chapter; or
(ii) Bonds or other obligations of the United States or guaranteed
by the United States or bonds or other obligations of this state or a
political subdivision of this state, to be deposited and maintained
with a bank approved by the administrator for this purpose.
(2) If a provider furnishes a substitute pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section, the provisions of section 13 (1), (3), (4), and (5) of
this act apply to the substitute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A provider shall act in good faith in all
matters under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A provider that is required to be
registered under this chapter shall maintain a toll-free communication
system, staffed at a level that reasonably permits an individual to
speak to a certified counselor, certified debt specialist, or customer
service representative, as appropriate, during ordinary business hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Before providing debt management
services, a registered provider shall give the individual an itemized
list of goods and services and the charges for each. The list must be
clear and conspicuous, be in a record the individual may keep whether
or not the individual assents to an agreement, and describe the goods
and services the provider offers:
(a) Free of additional charge if the individual enters into an
agreement;
(b) For a charge if the individual does not enter into an
agreement; and
(c) For a charge if the individual enters into an agreement, using
the following terminology, as applicable, and format:
Set up fee. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
dollar amount of fee
Monthly service fee. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount
Settlement fee. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount
Goods and services in addition to those provided in connection with
a plan. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(item) dollar amount or method of determining amount
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(item) dollar amount or method of determining amount.
(2) A provider may not furnish debt management services unless the
provider, through the services of a certified counselor or certified
debt specialist:
(a) Provides the individual with reasonable education about the
management of personal finance;
(b) Has prepared a financial analysis; and
(c) If the individual is to make regular, periodic payments:
(i) Has prepared a plan for the individual;
(ii) Has made a determination, based on the provider's analysis of
the information provided by the individual and otherwise available to
it, that the plan is suitable for the individual and the individual
will be able to meet the payment obligations under the plan; and
(iii) Believes that each creditor of the individual listed as a
participating creditor in the plan will accept payment of the
individual's debts as provided in the plan.
(3) Before an individual assents to an agreement to engage in a
plan, a provider shall:
(a) Provide the individual with a copy of the analysis and plan
required by subsection (2) of this section in a record that identifies
the provider and that the individual may keep whether or not the
individual assents to the agreement;
(b) Inform the individual of the availability, at the individual's
option, of assistance by a toll-free communication system or in person
to discuss the financial analysis and plan required by subsection (2)
of this section; and
(c) With respect to all creditors identified by the individual or
otherwise known by the provider to be creditors of the individual,
provide the individual with a list of:
(i) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan
and grant concessions;
(ii) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan
but not grant concessions;
(iii) Creditors that the provider expects not to participate in the
plan; and
(iv) All other creditors.
(4) Before an individual assents to an agreement, the provider
shall inform the individual, in a record that contains nothing else,
that is given separately, and that the individual may keep whether or
not the individual assents to the agreement:
(a) Of the name and business address of the provider;
(b) That plans are not suitable for all individuals and the
individual may ask the provider about other ways, including bankruptcy,
to deal with indebtedness;
(c) That establishment of a plan may adversely affect the
individual's credit rating or credit scores;
(d) That nonpayment of debt may lead creditors to increase finance
and other charges or undertake collection activity, including
litigation;
(e) Unless it is not true, that the provider may receive
compensation from the creditors of the individual; and
(f) That, unless the individual is insolvent, if a creditor settles
for less than the full amount of the debt, the plan may result in the
creation of taxable income to the individual, even though the
individual does not receive any money.
(5) If a provider may receive payments from an individual's
creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual's creditors
will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or
delinquency, the provider may comply with subsection (4) of this
section by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black
lines:

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

(1) Debt management plans are not right for all individuals, and
you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including
bankruptcy, to deal with your debts.
(2) Using a debt management plan may make it harder for you to
obtain credit.
(3) We may receive compensation for our services from your
creditors.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Name and business address of provider

(6) If a provider will not receive payments from an individual's
creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual's creditors
will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or
delinquency, a provider may comply with subsection (4) of this section
by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

(1) Debt management plans are not right for all individuals, and
you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including
bankruptcy, to deal with your debts.
(2) Using a debt management plan may make it harder for you to
obtain credit.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Name and business address of provider

(7) If an agreement contemplates that creditors will settle debts
for less than the full principal amount of debt owed, a provider may
comply with subsection (4) of this section by providing the following
disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

(1) Our program is not right for all individuals, and you may ask
us to provide information about bankruptcy and other ways to deal with
your debts.
(2) Nonpayment of your debts under our program may:
(a) Hurt your credit rating or credit scores;
(b) Lead your creditors to increase finance and other charges; and
(c) Lead your creditors to undertake activity, including lawsuits,
to collect the debts.
(3) Reduction of debt under our program may result in taxable
income to you, even though you will not actually receive any money.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Name and business address of provider

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) A provider may satisfy the requirements
of section 17, 19, or 27 of this act by means of the internet or other
electronic means if the provider obtains a consumer's consent in the
manner provided by section 101(c)(1) of the federal act.
(2) The disclosures and materials required by sections 17, 19, and
27 of this act shall be presented in a form that is capable of being
accurately reproduced for later reference.
(3) With respect to disclosure by means of an internet web site,
the disclosure of the information required by section 17(4) of this act
must appear on one or more screens that:
(a) Contain no other information; and
(b) The individual must see before proceeding to assent to
formation of an agreement.
(4) At the time of providing the materials and agreement required
by sections 17 (3) and (4), 19, and 27 of this act, a provider shall
inform the individual that upon electronic, telephonic, or written
request, it will send the individual a written copy of the materials,
and shall comply with a request as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) If a provider is requested, before the expiration of ninety
days after an agreement is completed or terminated, to send a written
copy of the materials required by section 17 (3) and (4), 19, or 27 of
this act, the provider shall send them at no charge within three
business days after the request, but the provider need not comply with
a request more than once per calendar month or if it reasonably
believes the request is made for purposes of harassment. If a request
is made more than ninety days after an agreement is completed or
terminated, the provider shall send within a reasonable time a written
copy of the materials requested.
(6) A provider that maintains an internet web site shall disclose
on the home page of its web site or on a page that is clearly and
conspicuously connected to the home page by a link that clearly reveals
its contents:
(a) Its name and all names under which it does business;
(b) Its principal business address, telephone number, and e-mail
address, if any; and
(c) The names of its principal officers.
(7) Subject to subsection (8) of this section, if a consumer who
has consented to electronic communication in the manner provided by
section 101 of the federal act withdraws consent as provided in the
federal act, a provider may terminate its agreement with the consumer.
(8) If a provider wishes to terminate an agreement with a consumer
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, it shall notify the
consumer that it will terminate the agreement unless the consumer,
within thirty days after receiving the notification, consents to
electronic communication in the manner provided in section 101(c) of
the federal act. If the consumer consents, the provider may terminate
the agreement only as permitted by section 19(1)(f)(vii) of this act.
(9) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Federal act" means the electronic signatures in global and
national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.).
(b) "Consumer" means an individual who seeks or obtains goods or
services that are used primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) An agreement must:
(a) Be in a record;
(b) Be dated and signed by the provider and the individual;
(c) Include the name of the individual and the address where the
individual resides;
(d) Include the name, business address, and telephone number of the
provider;
(e) Be delivered to the individual immediately upon formation of
the agreement; and
(f) Disclose:
(i) The services to be provided;
(ii) The amount, or method of determining the amount, of all fees,
individually itemized, to be paid by the individual;
(iii) The schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the
individual, including the amount of each payment, the date on which
each payment is due, and an estimate of the date of the final payment;
(iv) If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors:
(A) Each creditor of the individual to which payment will be made,
the amount owed to each creditor, and any concessions the provider
reasonably believes each creditor will offer; and
(B) The schedule of expected payments to each creditor, including
the amount of each payment and the date on which it will be made;
(v) Each creditor that the provider believes will not participate
in the plan and to which the provider will not direct payment;
(vi) How the provider will comply with its obligations under
section 27(1) of this act;
(vii) That the provider may terminate the agreement for good cause,
upon return of unexpended money of the individual;
(viii) That the individual may cancel the agreement as provided in
section 20 of this act;
(ix) That the individual may contact the administrator with any
questions or complaints regarding the provider; and
(x) The address, telephone number, and internet address or web site
of the administrator.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(e) of this section, delivery of
an electronic record occurs when it is made available in a format in
which the individual may retrieve, save, and print it and the
individual is notified that it is available.
(3) If the administrator supplies the provider with any information
required under subsection (1)(f)(x) of this section, the provider may
comply with that requirement only by disclosing the information
supplied by the administrator.
(4) An agreement must provide that:
(a) The individual has a right to terminate the agreement at any
time, without penalty or obligation, by giving the provider written or
electronic notice, in which event:
(i) The provider will refund all unexpended money that the provider
or its agent has received from or on behalf of the individual for the
reduction or satisfaction of the individual's debt;
(ii) With respect to an agreement that contemplates that creditors
will settle debts for less than the principal amount of debt, the
provider will refund sixty-five percent of any portion of the set up
fee that has not been credited against the settlement fee; and
(iii) All powers of attorney granted by the individual to the
provider are revoked and ineffective;
(b) The individual authorizes any bank in which the provider or its
agent has established a trust account to disclose to the administrator
any financial records relating to the trust account; and
(c) The provider will notify the individual within five days after
learning of a creditor's final decision to reject or withdraw from a
plan and that this notice will include:
(i) The identity of the creditor; and
(ii) The right of the individual to modify or terminate the
agreement.
(5) An agreement may confer on a provider a power of attorney to
settle the individual's debt for no more than fifty percent of the
principal amount of the debt. An agreement may not confer a power of
attorney to settle a debt for more than fifty percent of that amount,
but may confer a power of attorney to negotiate with creditors of the
individual on behalf of the individual. An agreement must provide that
the provider will obtain the assent of the individual after a creditor
has assented to a settlement for more than fifty percent of the
principal amount of the debt.
(6) An agreement may not:
(a) Provide for application of the law of any jurisdiction other
than the United States and this state;
(b) Except as permitted by section 2 of the federal arbitration act
(9 U.S.C. Sec. 2), contain a provision that modifies or limits
otherwise available forums or procedural rights, including the right to
trial by jury, that are generally available to the individual under law
other than this chapter;
(c) Contain a provision that restricts the individual's remedies
under this chapter or law other than this chapter; or
(d) Contain a provision that:
(i) Limits or releases the liability of any person for not
performing the agreement or for violating this chapter; or
(ii) Indemnifies any person for liability arising under the
agreement or this chapter.
(7) All rights and obligations specified in subsection (4) of this
section and section 20 of this act exist even if not provided in the
agreement. A provision in an agreement which violates subsection (4),
(5), or (6) of this section is void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) An individual may cancel an agreement
before midnight of the third business day after the individual assents
to it, unless the agreement does not comply with subsection (2) of this
section or section 19 or 28 of this act, in which event the individual
may cancel the agreement within thirty days after the individual
assents to it. To exercise the right to cancel, the individual must
give notice in a record to the provider. Notice by mail is given when
mailed.
(2) An agreement must be accompanied by a form that contains in
bold-face type, surrounded by bold black lines:

Notice of Right to Cancel

You may cancel this agreement, without any penalty or obligation, at
any time before midnight of the third business day that begins the day
after you agree to it by electronic communication or by signing it.
To cancel this agreement during this period, send an e-mail to (E-mail
address of provider) or mail or deliver a signed, dated copy of this
notice, or any other written notice to (Name of provider) at (Address
of provider) before midnight on (Date).
If you cancel this agreement within the three-day period, we will
refund all money you already have paid us.
You also may terminate this agreement at any later time, but we may not
be required to refund fees you have paid us.
I cancel this agreement,

. . . . . . . . . . . .
Print your name

. . . . . . . . . . . .
Signature

. . . . . . . . . . . .
Date

(3) If a personal financial emergency necessitates the disbursement
of an individual's money to one or more of the individual's creditors
before the expiration of three days after an agreement is signed, an
individual may waive the right to cancel. To waive the right, the
individual must send or deliver a signed, dated statement in the
individual's own words describing the circumstances that necessitate a
waiver. The waiver must explicitly waive the right to cancel. A
waiver by means of a standard form record is void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Unless the administrator, by rule, provides
otherwise, the disclosures and documents required by this chapter must
be in English. If a provider communicates with an individual primarily
in a language other than English, the provider must furnish a
translation into the other language of the disclosures and documents
required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) All money paid to a provider by or on
behalf of an individual for distribution to creditors pursuant to an
agreement is held in trust. Within two business days after receipt,
the provider shall deposit the money in a trust account established for
the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is furnishing debt
management services.
(2) Money held in trust by a provider is not property of the
provider or its designee. The money is not available to creditors of
the provider or designee, except an individual from whom or on whose
behalf the provider received money, to the extent that the money has
not been disbursed to creditors of the individual.
(3) A provider shall:
(a) Maintain separate records of account for each individual to
whom the provider is furnishing debt management services;
(b) Disburse money paid by or on behalf of the individual to
creditors of the individual as disclosed in the agreement, except that:
(i) The provider may delay payment to the extent that a payment by
the individual is not final; and
(ii) If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors,
the disbursement must comply with the due dates established by each
creditor; and
(c) Promptly correct any payments that are not made or that are
misdirected as a result of an error by the provider or other person in
control of the trust account and reimburse the individual for any costs
or fees imposed by a creditor as a result of the failure to pay or
misdirection.
(4) A provider may not commingle money in a trust account
established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is
furnishing debt management services with money of other persons.
(5) A trust account must at all times have a cash balance equal to
the sum of the balances of each individual's account.
(6) If a provider has established a trust account pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the provider shall reconcile the trust
account at least once a month. The reconciliation must compare the
cash balance in the trust account with the sum of the balances in each
individual's account. If the provider or its designee has more than
one trust account, each trust account must be individually reconciled.
(7) If a provider discovers, or has a reasonable suspicion of,
embezzlement or other unlawful appropriation of money held in trust,
the provider immediately shall notify the administrator by a method
approved by the administrator. Unless the administrator by rule
provides otherwise, within five days thereafter, the provider shall
give notice to the administrator describing the remedial action taken
or to be taken.
(8) If an individual terminates an agreement or it becomes
reasonably apparent to a provider that a plan has failed, the provider
shall promptly refund to the individual all money paid by or on behalf
of the individual which has not been paid to creditors, less fees that
are payable to the provider under section 23 of this act.
(9) Before relocating a trust account from one bank to another, a
provider shall inform the administrator of the name, business address,
and telephone number of the new bank. As soon as practicable, the
provider shall inform the administrator of the account number of the
trust account at the new bank.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) A provider may not impose directly or
indirectly a fee or other charge on an individual or receive money from
or on behalf of an individual for debt management services except as
permitted by this section.
(2) A provider may not impose charges or receive payment for debt
management services until the provider and the individual have signed
an agreement that complies with sections 19 and 28 of this act.
(3) If an individual assents to an agreement, a provider may not
impose a fee or other charge for educational or counseling services, or
the like, except as otherwise provided in this subsection and section
28(4) of this act. The administrator may authorize a provider to
charge a fee based on the nature and extent of the educational or
counseling services furnished by the provider.
(4) Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, the following rules apply:
(a) If an individual assents to an agreement that contemplates that
creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment,
default, or delinquency, the provider may charge:
(i) A fee not exceeding fifty dollars for consultation, obtaining
a credit report, setting up an account, and the like; and
(ii) A monthly service fee, not to exceed ten dollars times the
number of creditors remaining in a plan at the time the fee is
assessed, but not more than fifty dollars in any month.
(b) If an individual assents to an agreement that contemplates that
creditors will settle debts for less than the principal amount of the
debt, a provider may charge:
(i) Subject to section 19(4) of this act, a fee for consultation,
obtaining a credit report, setting up an account, and the like, in an
amount not exceeding the lesser of four hundred dollars and four
percent of the debt in the plan at the inception of the plan; and
(ii) A monthly service fee, not to exceed ten dollars times the
number of creditors remaining in a plan at the time the fee is
assessed, but not more than fifty dollars in any month.
(c) A provider may not impose or receive fees under (a) and (b) of
this subsection.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in section 28(4) of this act, if
an individual does not assent to an agreement, a provider may receive
for educational and counseling services it provides to the individual
a fee not exceeding one hundred dollars or, with the approval of the
administrator, a larger fee. The administrator may approve a fee
larger than one hundred dollars if the nature and extent of the
educational and counseling services warrant the larger fee.
(5) If, before the expiration of ninety days after the completion
or termination of educational or counseling services, an individual
assents to an agreement, the provider shall refund to the individual
any fee paid under subsection (4)(d) of this section.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, if an agreement contemplates that creditors will settle an
individual's debts for less than the principal amount of the debt,
compensation for services in connection with settling a debt may not
exceed, with respect to each debt:
(a) Thirty percent of the excess of the principal amount of the
debt over the amount paid the creditor pursuant to the agreement, less
(b) To the extent it has not been credited against an earlier
settlement fee:
(i) The fee charged under subsection (4)(b)(i) of this section; and
(ii) The aggregate of fees charged under subsection (4)(b)(ii) of
this section.
(7) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this section, if a payment to a provider by an individual
under this chapter is dishonored, a provider may impose a reasonable
charge on the individual, not to exceed the lesser of twenty-five
dollars and the amount permitted by law other than this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A provider may not solicit a voluntary
contribution from an individual or an affiliate of the individual for
any service provided to the individual. A provider may accept
voluntary contributions from an individual but, until thirty days after
completion or termination of a plan, the aggregate amount of money
received from or on behalf of the individual may not exceed the total
amount the provider may charge the individual under section 23 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) If a provider imposes a fee or other
charge or receives money or other payments not authorized by section 23
or 24 of this act, the individual may void the agreement and recover as
provided in section 35 of this act.
(2) If a provider is not registered as required by this chapter
when an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable
by the individual.
(3) If an individual voids an agreement under subsection (2) of
this section, the provider does not have a claim against the individual
for breach of contract or for restitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 (1) If an individual who has entered into
an agreement fails for sixty days to make payments required by the
agreement, a provider may terminate the agreement.
(2) If a provider or an individual terminates an agreement, the
provider shall immediately return to the individual:
(a) Any money of the individual held in trust for the benefit of
the individual; and
(b) Sixty-five percent of any portion of the set up fee received
pursuant to section 23(4)(b) of this act which has not been credited
against settlement fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) A provider shall provide the accounting
required by subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Upon cancellation or termination of an agreement; and
(b) Before cancellation or termination of any agreement:
(i) At least once each month; and
(ii) Within five business days after a request by an individual,
but the provider need not comply with more than one request in any
calendar month.
(2) A provider, in a record, shall provide each individual for whom
it has established a plan an accounting of the following information:
(a) The amount of money received from the individual since the last
report;
(b) The amounts and dates of disbursement made on the individual's
behalf, or by the individual upon the direction of the provider, since
the last report to each creditor listed in the plan;
(c) The amounts deducted from the amount received from the
individual;
(d) The amount held in reserve; and
(e) If, since the last report, a creditor has agreed to accept as
payment in full an amount less than the principal amount of the debt
owed by the individual:
(i) The total amount and terms of the settlement;
(ii) The amount of the debt when the individual assented to the
plan;
(iii) The amount of the debt when the creditor agreed to the
settlement; and
(iv) The calculation of a settlement fee.
(3) A provider shall maintain records for each individual for whom
it provides debt management services for five years after the final
payment made by the individual and produce a copy of them to the
individual within a reasonable time after a request for them. The
provider may use electronic or other means of storage of the records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) A provider may not, directly or
indirectly:
(a) Misappropriate or misapply money held in trust;
(b) Settle a debt on behalf of an individual for more than fifty
percent of the principal amount of the debt owed a creditor, unless the
individual assents to the settlement after the creditor has assented;
(c) Take a power of attorney that authorizes it to settle a debt,
unless the power of attorney expressly limits the provider's authority
to settle debts for not more than fifty percent of the principal amount
of the debt owed a creditor;
(d) Exercise or attempt to exercise a power of attorney after an
individual has terminated an agreement;
(e) Initiate a transfer from an individual's account at a bank or
with another person unless the transfer is:
(i) A return of money to the individual; or
(ii) Before termination of an agreement, properly authorized by the
agreement and this chapter, and for:
(A) Payment to one or more creditors pursuant to an agreement; or
(B) Payment of a fee;
(f) Offer a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation
to an individual for executing an agreement;
(g) Offer, pay, or give a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other
compensation to a person for referring a prospective customer, if the
person making the referral has a financial interest in the outcome of
debt management services provided to the customer, unless neither the
provider nor the person making the referral communicates to the
prospective customer the identity of the source of the referral;
(h) Receive a bonus, commission, or other benefit for referring an
individual to a person;
(i) Structure a plan in a manner that would result in a negative
amortization of any of an individual's debts, unless a creditor that is
owed a negatively amortizing debt agrees to refund or waive the finance
charge upon payment of the principal amount of the debt;
(j) Compensate its employees on the basis of a formula that
incorporates the number of individuals the employee induces to enter
into agreements;
(k) Settle a debt or lead an individual to believe that a payment
to a creditor is in settlement of a debt to the creditor unless, at the
time of settlement, the individual receives a certification by the
creditor that the payment is in full settlement of the debt;
(l) Make a representation that:
(i) The provider will furnish money to pay bills or prevent
attachments;
(ii) Payment of a certain amount will permit satisfaction of a
certain amount or range of indebtedness; or
(iii) Participation in a plan will or may prevent litigation,
garnishment, attachment, repossession, foreclosure, eviction, or loss
of employment;
(m) Misrepresent that it is authorized or competent to furnish
legal advice or perform legal services;
(n) Represent in its agreements, disclosures required by this
chapter, advertisements, or internet web site that it is a:
(i) Not-for-profit entity unless it is organized and properly
operating as a not-for-profit entity under the law of the state in
which it was formed; or
(ii) Tax-exempt entity unless it has received certification of tax-exempt status from the internal revenue service and is properly
operating as a not-for-profit entity under the law of the state in
which it was formed;
(o) Take a confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess
judgment against an individual; or
(p) Employ an unfair, unconscionable, or deceptive act or practice,
including the knowing omission of any material information.
(2) If a provider furnishes debt management services to an
individual, the provider may not, directly or indirectly:
(a) Purchase a debt or obligation of the individual;
(b) Receive from or on behalf of the individual:
(i) A promissory note or other negotiable instrument other than a
check or a demand draft; or
(ii) A postdated check or demand draft;
(c) Lend money or provide credit to the individual, except as a
deferral of a settlement fee at no additional expense to the
individual;
(d) Obtain a mortgage or other security interest from any person in
connection with the services provided to the individual;
(e) Except as permitted by federal law, disclose the identity or
identifying information of the individual or the identity of the
individual's creditors, except to:
(i) The administrator, upon proper demand;
(ii) A creditor of the individual, to the extent necessary to
secure the cooperation of the creditor in a plan; or
(iii) The extent necessary to administer the plan;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in section 23(6) of this act,
provide the individual less than the full benefit of a compromise of a
debt arranged by the provider;
(g) Charge the individual for or provide credit or other insurance,
coupons for goods or services, membership in a club, access to
computers or the internet, or any other matter not directly related to
debt management services or educational services concerning personal
finance; or
(h) Furnish legal advice or perform legal services, unless the
person furnishing that advice to or performing those services for the
individual is licensed to practice law.
(3) This section does not authorize any person to engage in the
practice of law.
(4) A provider may not receive a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or
other compensation, directly or indirectly, for advising, arranging, or
assisting an individual in connection with obtaining, an extension of
credit or other service from a lender or service provider, except for
educational or counseling services required in connection with a
government-sponsored program.
(5) Unless a person supplies goods, services, or facilities
generally and supplies them to the provider at a cost no greater than
the cost the person generally charges to others, a provider may not
purchase goods, services, or facilities from the person if an employee
or a person that the provider should reasonably know is an affiliate of
the provider:
(a) Owns more than ten percent of the person; or
(b) Is an employee or affiliate of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 No later than thirty days after a provider
has been served with notice of a civil action for violation of this
chapter by or on behalf of an individual who resides in this state at
either the time of an agreement or the time the notice is served, the
provider shall notify the administrator in a record that it has been
sued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 (1) If a provider whose agreements
contemplate that creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late
payment, default, or delinquency advertises debt management services,
it shall disclose, in an easily comprehensible manner, that using a
debt management plan may make it harder for the individual to obtain
credit.
(2) If a provider whose agreements contemplate that creditors will
settle for less than the full principal amount of debt advertises debt
management services, it shall disclose, in an easily comprehensible
manner, the information specified in section 17(4) (c) and (d) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 If a provider delegates any of its duties
or obligations under an agreement or this chapter to another person,
including an independent contractor, the provider is liable for conduct
of the person which, if done by the provider, would violate the
agreement or this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 (1) The administrator may act on its own
initiative or in response to complaints and may receive complaints,
take action to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter, refer
cases to the attorney general, and seek or provide remedies as provided
in this chapter.
(2) The administrator may investigate and examine, in this state or
elsewhere, by subpoena or otherwise, the activities, books, accounts,
and records of a person that provides or offers to provide debt
management services, or a person to which a provider has delegated its
obligations under an agreement or this chapter, to determine compliance
with this chapter. Information that identifies individuals who have
agreements with the provider shall not be disclosed to the public. In
connection with the investigation, the administrator may:
(a) Charge the person the reasonable expenses necessarily incurred
to conduct the examination;
(b) Require or permit a person to file a statement under oath as to
all the facts and circumstances of a matter to be investigated; and
(c) Seek a court order authorizing seizure from a bank at which the
person maintains a trust account required by section 22 of this act,
any or all money, books, records, accounts, and other property of the
provider that is in the control of the bank and relates to individuals
who reside in this state.
(3) The administrator may adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The administrator may enter into cooperative arrangements with
any other federal or state agency having authority over providers and
may exchange with any of those agencies information about a provider,
including information obtained during an examination of the provider.
(5) The administrator, by rule, shall establish reasonable fees to
be paid by providers for the expense of administering this chapter.
(6) The administrator, by rule, shall adopt dollar amounts instead
of those specified in sections 2, 5, 9, 13, 23, 33, and 35 of this act
to reflect inflation, as measured by the United States bureau of labor
statistics consumer price index for all urban consumers or, if that
index is not available, another index adopted by rule by the
administrator. The administrator shall adopt a base year and adjust
the dollar amounts, effective July 1st of each year, if the change in
the index from the base year, as of December 31st of the preceding
year, is at least ten percent. The dollar amount must be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars, except that the amounts in section 23
of this act must be rounded to the nearest dollar.
(7) The administrator shall notify registered providers of any
change in dollar amounts made pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section and make that information available to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 (1) The administrator may enforce this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter by taking one or more of
the following actions:
(a) Ordering a provider or a director, employee, or other agent of
a provider to cease and desist from any violations;
(b) Ordering a provider or a person that has caused a violation to
correct the violation, including making restitution of money or
property to a person aggrieved by a violation;
(c) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, imposing on a provider or a person that has caused
a violation a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars for each
violation;
(d) Prosecuting a civil action to:
(i) Enforce an order; or
(ii) Obtain restitution or an injunction or other equitable relief,
or both;
(e) Intervening in an action brought under section 35 of this act.
(2) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, if a person violates or knowingly authorizes,
directs, or aids in the violation of a final order issued under
subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the administrator may impose
a civil penalty not exceeding twenty thousand dollars for each
violation.
(3) The administrator may maintain an action to enforce this
chapter in any county.
(4) The administrator may recover the reasonable costs of enforcing
this chapter under subsections (1) through (3) of this section,
including attorneys' fees based on the hours reasonably expended and
the hourly rates for attorneys of comparable experience in the
community.
(5) In determining the amount of a civil penalty to impose under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the administrator shall consider
the seriousness of the violation, the good faith of the violator, any
previous violations by the violator, the deleterious effect of the
violation on the public, the net worth of the violator, and any other
factor the administrator considers relevant to the determination of the
civil penalty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 (1) The administrator may suspend, revoke,
or deny renewal of a provider's registration if:
(a) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed when the
registrant applied for registration as a provider, would have been a
reason for denying registration;
(b) The provider has committed a material violation of this chapter
or a rule or order of the administrator under this chapter;
(c) The provider is insolvent;
(d) The provider or an employee or affiliate of the provider has
refused to permit the administrator to make an examination authorized
by this chapter, failed to comply with section 32(2)(b) of this act
within fifteen days after request, or made a material misrepresentation
or omission in complying with section 32(2)(b) of this act; or
(e) The provider has not responded within a reasonable time and in
an appropriate manner to communications from the administrator.
(2) If a provider does not comply with section 22(6) of this act,
or if the administrator otherwise finds that the public health or
safety or general welfare requires emergency action, the administrator
may order a summary suspension of the provider's registration,
effective on the date specified in the order.
(3) If the administrator suspends, revokes, or denies renewal of
the registration of a provider, the administrator may seek a court
order authorizing seizure of any or all of the money in a trust account
required by section 22 of this act, books, records, accounts, and other
property of the provider which are located in this state.
(4) If the administrator suspends or revokes a provider's
registration, the provider may appeal and request a hearing under
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "insolvent" means:
(a) Having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of
business other than as a result of good faith dispute;
(b) Being unable to pay debts as they become due; or
(c) Being insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy
law (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 (1) If an individual voids an agreement
pursuant to section 25(2) of this act, the individual may recover in a
civil action all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the
individual pursuant to the agreement, except amounts paid to creditors,
in addition to the recovery under subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this
section.
(2) If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to section 25(1)
of this act, the individual may recover in a civil action three times
the total amount of the fees, charges, money, and payments made by the
individual to the provider, in addition to the recovery under
subsection (3)(d) of this section.
(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, an individual with
respect to whom a provider violates this chapter may recover in a civil
action from the provider and any person that caused the violation:
(a) Compensatory damages for injury, including noneconomic injury,
caused by the violation;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section
and subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, with respect to a violation of section 17, 19, 20,
21, 22, 23, 24, 27, or 28 (1), (2), or (4) of this act, the greater of
the amount recoverable under subsection (1) of this section or five
thousand dollars;
(c) Punitive damages; and
(d) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(4) In a class action, except for a violation of section 28(1)(e)
of this act, the minimum damages provided in subsection (3)(b) of this
section do not apply.
(5) In addition to the remedy available under subsection (3) of
this section, if a provider violates an individual's rights under
section 20 of this act, the individual may recover in a civil action
all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the individual pursuant
to the agreement, except for amounts paid to creditors.
(6) A provider is not liable under this section for a violation of
this chapter if the provider proves that the violation was not
intentional and resulted from a good faith error notwithstanding the
maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. An
error of legal judgment with respect to a provider's obligations under
this chapter is not a good faith error. If, in connection with a
violation, the provider has received more money than authorized by an
agreement or this chapter, the defense provided by this subsection is
not available unless the provider refunds the excess within two
business days of learning of the violation.
(7) The administrator shall assist an individual in enforcing a
judgment against the surety bond or other security provided under
section 13 or 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 If an act or practice of a provider
violates both this chapter and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade
or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, an individual may not recover under both for the
same act or practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 (1) An action or proceeding brought
pursuant to section 33 (1), (2), or (3) of this act must be commenced
within four years after the conduct that is the basis of the
administrator's complaint.
(2) An action brought pursuant to section 35 of this act must be
commenced within two years after the latest of:
(a) The individual's last transmission of money to a provider;
(b) The individual's last transmission of money to a creditor at
the direction of the provider;
(c) The provider's last disbursement to a creditor of the
individual;
(d) The provider's last accounting to the individual pursuant to
section 27(1) of this act;
(e) The date on which the individual discovered or reasonably
should have discovered the facts giving rise to the individual's claim;
or
(f) Termination of actions or proceedings by the administrator with
respect to a violation of this chapter.
(3) The period prescribed in subsection (2)(e) of this section is
tolled during any period during which the provider or, if different,
the defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented information
required by this chapter to be disclosed to the individual, if the
information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the
liability of the defendant under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 In applying and construing this act,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the
law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 This act modifies, limits, and supersedes
the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act
(15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede
section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)) or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Transactions entered into before the
effective date of this act and the rights, duties, and interests
resulting from them may be completed, terminated, or enforced as
required or permitted by a law amended, repealed, or modified by this
act as though the amendment, repeal, or modification had not occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.28.010 (Definitions) and 1999 c 151 s 101, 1979 c 156 s
1, 1970 ex.s. c 97 s 1, & 1967 c 201 s 1;
(2) RCW 18.28.080 (Fees for debt adjusting services -- Limitations--Requirements) and 1999 c 151 s 102, 1979 c 156 s 4, 1967 ex.s. c 141 s
2, & 1967 c 201 s 8;
(3) RCW 18.28.090 (Excess charges -- Contract void -- Return of
payments) and 1999 c 151 s 103 & 1967 c 201 s 9;
(4) RCW 18.28.100 (Contract requirements) and 1999 c 151 s 104,
1979 c 156 s 5, & 1967 c 201 s 10;
(5) RCW 18.28.110 (Debt adjuster -- Functions required to be
performed) and 1999 c 151 s 105, 1979 c 156 s 6, & 1967 c 201 s 11;
(6) RCW 18.28.120 (Debt adjuster -- Prohibited acts) and 1999 c 151
s 106 & 1967 c 201 s 12;
(7) RCW 18.28.130 (Legal services -- Rendering or obtaining -- Using
name of attorney -- Prohibited) and 1999 c 151 s 107 & 1967 c 201 s 13;
(8) RCW 18.28.140 (Assignment of wages not prohibited) and 1999 c
151 s 108 & 1967 c 201 s 14;
(9) RCW 18.28.150 (Trust account for payments by debtor--Disbursements) and 1999 c 151 s 109, 1979 c 156 s 8, & 1967 c 201 s 15;
(10) RCW 18.28.165 (Investigations) and 1999 c 151 s 110 & 1979 c
156 s 7;
(11) RCW 18.28.180 (Administrative procedure act to govern
administration) and 1967 c 201 s 18;
(12) RCW 18.28.185 (Violations -- Unfair practice under chapter 19.86
RCW) and 1979 c 156 s 10;
(13) RCW 18.28.190 (Violations -- Penalty) and 1999 c 151 s 111 &
1967 c 201 s 19;
(14) RCW 18.28.200 (Violations -- Injunctions) and 1967 c 201 s 20;
(15) RCW 18.28.210 (Violations -- Assurance of discontinuance--Effect) and 1967 c 201 s 21;
(16) RCW 18.28.220 (Violation of injunction -- Civil penalty) and
1967 c 201 s 22;
(17) RCW 18.28.900 (Saving prior contracts) and 1967 c 201 s 23;
and
(18) RCW 18.28.910 (Severability -- 1967 c 201) and 1967 c 201 s 24.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 Sections 1 through 40 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---