BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.010 and 2007 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
means the preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency
functions, other than functions for which the military forces are
primarily responsible, to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and
recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering
from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all hazards,
whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide support
for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of
residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.
(2) "Local organization for emergency services or management" means
an organization created in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter by state or local authority to perform local emergency
management functions.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any county, city or town.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any person who is registered with a
local emergency management organization or the department and holds an
identification card issued by the local emergency management director
or the department for the purpose of engaging in authorized emergency
management activities or is an employee of the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof who is called upon to perform
emergency management activities.
(5) "Injury" as used in this chapter shall mean and include
accidental injuries and/or occupational diseases arising out of
emergency management activities.
(6)(a) "Emergency or disaster" as used in all sections of this
chapter except RCW 38.52.430 shall mean an event or set of
circumstances which: (i) Demands immediate action to preserve public
health, protect life, protect public property, or to provide relief to
any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii) reaches
such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(b) "Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that
requires a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response as a result of a violation of one of the
statutes enumerated in RCW 38.52.430.
(7) "Search and rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing,
or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity any person
who becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result
of a natural, technological, or human caused disaster, including
instances involving searches for downed aircraft when ground personnel
are used. Nothing in this section shall affect appropriate activity by
the department of transportation under chapter 47.68 RCW.
(8) "Executive head" and "executive heads" means the county
executive in those charter counties with an elective office of county
executive, however designated, and, in the case of other counties, the
county legislative authority. In the case of cities and towns, it
means the mayor in those cities and towns with mayor-council or
commission forms of government, where the mayor is directly elected,
and it means the city manager in those cities and towns with council
manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate an
executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.
(9) "Director" means the adjutant general.
(10) "Local director" means the director of a local organization of
emergency management or emergency services.
(11) "Department" means the state military department.
(12) "Emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public
agency's use of emergency services during an emergency or disaster as
defined in subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(13) "Expense of an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430
means reasonable costs incurred by a public agency in reasonably making
an appropriate emergency response to the incident, but shall only
include those costs directly arising from the response to the
particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include the costs of
providing police, coroner, fire fighting, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as
the salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.
(14) "Public agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal
corporation, district, town, or public authority located, in whole or
in part, within this state which provides or may provide fire fighting,
police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.
(15) "Incident command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene
functional management system that establishes common standards in
organization, terminology, and procedures; provides a means (unified
command) for the establishment of a common set of incident objectives
and strategies during multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while
maintaining individual agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility,
and accountability; and is a component of the national interagency
incident management system; or (b) an equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.
(16) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 82.14B.020.
(17) "Volunteer search and rescue organization" means any group or
entity formed for the purpose of participating in the search for and
provision of aid to people in distress or imminent danger. A volunteer
search and rescue organization is deemed authorized if the chief law
enforcement officer for the political subdivision in which aid is
needed has approved its participation in search and rescue activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The volunteer search and rescue account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account is
established to reimburse any authorized volunteer search and rescue
organization operating within the state for costs incurred in assisting
law enforcement in search and rescue activities.
(a) The appropriate official of the department is authorized to
make expenditures from the volunteer search and rescue account without
an appropriation.
(b) Reimbursable costs are limited to actual operational expenses.
A volunteer search and rescue organization may not collect more than
the actual operational expenses from any source or combination of
sources.
(2) The volunteer search and rescue account consists of all revenue
collected from a surcharge of twenty-five cents which shall be
collected on the sale of all licenses, permits, tags, and stamps
required by chapter 77.32 RCW.
(a) Receipts from the surcharge shall be deposited in the volunteer
search and rescue account.
(b) State and county officers receiving any moneys collected
pursuant to this section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be
credited to the volunteer search and rescue account.
(3) Any authorized volunteer search and rescue organization shall
have the right to make a claim on the volunteer search and rescue
account for reimbursement of costs incurred in the performance of
search and rescue activities within the state. Claims for
reimbursement shall be submitted to the department for immediate
consideration.
(4) The department shall establish rules for:
(a) The procedure through which claims shall be submitted;
(b) The procedure through which claims shall be paid;
(c) The procedure through which an individual who is charged a fee
for reimbursement by a volunteer search and rescue organization under
section 3 of this act may appeal.
(5) Any claim for reimbursement that has been certified by the
chief law enforcement officer of the political subdivision in which the
search and rescue activity occurred shall be eligible for payment by
the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any authorized volunteer search and
rescue organization may seek reimbursement for costs incurred from each
person for whose benefit search and rescue activities were conducted,
provided that:
(a) Reasonable care was not exercised by the individuals for whose
benefit the search and rescue activities are conducted; or
(b) Applicable laws were violated by the individuals.
(2) For the purposes of implementing this section, the department
is authorized to determine whether reasonable care was exercised by the
individuals for whose benefit the search and rescue activities were
conducted.
(3) The volunteer search and rescue organization may not collect
more than five hundred dollars from an individual under this section
and may not collect more than the actual cost of the search and rescue
activities from all of the individuals for whose benefit the activities
are conducted.
(4) Any individual who is charged a fee for reimbursement under
this section may appeal the charge or the amount of the fee to the
department.
(5) For the purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
following circumstances are evidence of reasonable care:
(a) The individuals possessed experience and used equipment that
was appropriate for the known conditions of weather and terrain.
(b) The individuals used or attempted to use locating devices or
cellular telephones when appropriate.
(c) The individuals notified responsible persons or organizations
of the expected time of departure and the expected time of return and
the planned location or route of activity.
(d) The individuals possessed maps and orienteering equipment and
used trails or other routes that were appropriate for the conditions.
(6) A volunteer search and rescue organization shall not seek
reimbursement from any person who was not at fault or who took
reasonable precautions but still required search and rescue services.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.050 and 2003 c 389 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All recreational licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required
by this title and raffle tickets authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW
shall be issued under the authority of the commission.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of
recreational licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets, and
for the collection, payment, and handling of license fees and
surcharges, terms and conditions to govern dealers, and dealers' fees.
(3)(a) A transaction fee on recreational documents issued through
an automated licensing system may be set by the commission and
collected from licensees. The department may authorize all or part of
such fee to be paid directly to a contractor providing automated
licensing system services. Fees retained by dealers shall be uniform
throughout the state.
(b) The department shall authorize dealers to collect and retain
dealer fees of at least two dollars for purchase of a standard hunting
or fishing recreational license document, except that the commission
may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of tags or when a licensee buys
a license that involves a stamp or display card format rather than a
standard department licensing document form.
(4) A surcharge of twenty-five cents shall be imposed on all
recreational documents issued under the authority of the commission to
fund the volunteer search and rescue account created under section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 38.52 RCW.

--- END ---