BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0331 and 1991 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes any person to conduct or operate
amusement games when licensed and operated pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted by the commission at
such locations as the commission may authorize. The rules shall
provide for at least the following:
(1) Persons other than bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organizations shall conduct amusement games only after obtaining a
special amusement game license from the commission.
(2) Amusement games may be conducted under such a license only as
a part of, and upon the site of:
(a) Any agricultural fair as authorized under chapter 15.76 or
36.37 RCW; or
(b) A civic center of a county, city, or town; or
(c) A world's fair or similar exposition that is approved by the
bureau of international expositions at Paris, France; or
(d) A community-wide civic festival held not more than once
annually and sponsored or approved by the city, town, or county in
which it is held; or
(e) A commercial exposition organized and sponsored by an
organization or association representing the retail sales and service
operators conducting business in a shopping center or other commercial
area developed and operated for retail sales and service, but only upon
a parking lot or similar area located in said shopping center or
commercial area for a period of no more than seventeen consecutive days
by any licensee during any calendar year; or
(f) An amusement park. An amusement park is a group of activities,
at a permanent location, to which people go to be entertained through
a combination of various mechanical or aquatic rides, theatrical
productions, motion picture, and/or slide show presentations with food
and drink service. The amusement park must include at least five
different mechanical, or aquatic rides, three additional activities,
and the gross receipts must be primarily from these amusement
activities; or
(g) Within a regional shopping center. A regional shopping center
is a shopping center developed and operated for retail sales and
service by retail sales and service operators and consisting of more
than six hundred thousand gross square feet not including parking
areas. Amusement games conducted as a part of, and upon the site of,
a regional shopping center shall not be subject to the prohibition on
revenue sharing set forth in RCW 9.46.120(2); or
(h) A location that possesses a valid license from the Washington
state liquor (([control])) control board and prohibits minors on their
premises; or
(i) Movie theaters, bowling alleys, miniature golf course
facilities, and amusement centers. For the purposes of this section an
amusement center shall be defined as a permanent location whose primary
source of income is from the operation of ten or more amusement
devices; or
(j) Any business whose primary activity is to provide food service
for on premises consumption and who offers family entertainment which
includes at least three of the following activities: Amusement
devices; theatrical productions; mechanical rides; motion pictures; and
slide show presentations; or
(k) Other locations as the commission may authorize.
(3) No amusement games may be conducted in any location except in
conformance with local zoning, fire, health, and similar regulations.
In no event may the licensee conduct any amusement games at any of the
locations set out in subsection (2) of this section without first
having obtained the written permission to do so from the person or
organization owning the premises or an authorized agent thereof, and
from the persons sponsoring the fair, exhibition, commercial
exhibition, or festival, or from the city or town operating the civic
center, in connection with which the games are to be operated.
(4) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement games at the
location described in subsection (2)(g) of this section, without, at
the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all
hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting
school-age minors from entry during school hours, maintaining full-time
personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily
machine maintenance, and providing for hours for the close of business
at such location that are no later than 10:00 p.m. on Fridays and
Saturdays and on all other days that are the same as those of the
regional shopping center in which the licensee is located.
(5) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement game at a
location described in subsection (2)(i) or (j) of this section,
without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision
during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location,
prohibiting school-age minors from playing licensed amusement games
during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose
responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine
maintenance, and prohibiting minors from playing the amusement games
after 10:00 p.m. on any day.

--- END ---