BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.21.040 and 1989 c 373 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 7.21.050, a punitive
sanction for contempt of court may be imposed only pursuant to this
section.
(2)(a) An action to impose a punitive sanction for contempt of
court shall be commenced by a complaint or information filed by the
prosecuting attorney or city attorney charging a person with contempt
of court and reciting the punitive sanction sought to be imposed.
(b) If there is probable cause to believe that a contempt has been
committed, the prosecuting attorney or city attorney may file the
information or complaint on his or her own initiative or at the request
of a person aggrieved by the contempt.
(c) A request that the prosecuting attorney or the city attorney
commence an action under this section may be made by a judge presiding
in an action or proceeding to which a contempt relates. If required
for the administration of justice, the judge making the request may
appoint a special counsel to prosecute an action to impose a punitive
sanction for contempt of court.
A judge making a request pursuant to this subsection shall be
disqualified from presiding at the trial.
(d) If the alleged contempt involves disrespect to or criticism of
a judge, that judge is disqualified from presiding at the trial of the
contempt unless the person charged consents to the judge presiding at
the trial.
(3) The court may hold a hearing on a motion for a remedial
sanction jointly with a trial on an information or complaint seeking a
punitive sanction.
(4) A punitive sanction may be imposed for past conduct that was a
contempt of court even though similar present conduct is a continuing
contempt of court.
(5) If the defendant is found guilty of contempt of court under
this section, the court may impose for each separate contempt of court
a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or imprisonment ((in the
county jail)) for not more than one year, or both.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.21.050 and 1989 c 373 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The judge presiding in an action or proceeding may summarily
impose either a remedial or punitive sanction authorized by this
chapter upon a person who commits a contempt of court within the
courtroom if the judge certifies that he or she saw or heard the
contempt. The judge shall impose the sanctions immediately after the
contempt of court or at the end of the proceeding and only for the
purpose of preserving order in the court and protecting the authority
and dignity of the court. The person committing the contempt of court
shall be given an opportunity to speak in mitigation of the contempt
unless compelling circumstances demand otherwise. The order of
contempt shall recite the facts, state the sanctions imposed, and be
signed by the judge and entered on the record.
(2) A court, after a finding of contempt of court in a proceeding
under subsection (1) of this section may impose for each separate
contempt of court a punitive sanction of a fine of not more than five
hundred dollars or imprisonment ((in the county jail)) for not more
than thirty days, or both, or a remedial sanction set forth in RCW
7.21.030(2). A forfeiture imposed as a remedial sanction under this
subsection may not exceed more than five hundred dollars for each day
the contempt continues.

--- END ---