BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any organization that exclusively provides representation or
services to retired members of the Washington state retirement systems
and has membership dues deducted through the department of retirement
systems has the right to request the department to assist in doing
blind mailings to retirees twice each year. The mailings must provide
information to members of the retirement systems eligible for
membership in the retiree organization regarding services offered by
the retiree organization. The retiree organization must provide all
printed materials to be mailed and envelopes to a mail processing
center and pay all costs for generating mailing labels, inserting
materials into envelopes, sealing, labeling, and delivering materials
to be mailed to a bulk mail center or post office. The organization
must use its own bulk mail permit and pay all postage costs.
(2) The department must provide requested retiree data for
addressing the envelopes to the mail center under a secure data share
agreement with the mail center under which neither the organizations
nor any other entity has direct access to any names or addresses. The
department has no obligation to approve or disapprove, or in any other
way take any responsibility for, the content of the mailings. Only
organizations that meet the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section and have legal authority to provide services to retirement
system retirees have the right to request assistance with blind
mailings.

--- END ---