BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.38.080 and 2008 c 237 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter, the use
of fuel for:
(a) Street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in
motor vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, or any
county or municipality;
(b) Publicly owned firefighting equipment;
(c) Special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;
(d) Power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any
motor vehicle which is accurately measured by metering devices that
have been specifically approved by the department or which is
established by any of the following formulae:
(i) Pumping propane, or fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from
a farm or dairy farm storage tank by a power take-off unit on a
delivery truck, at a rate determined by the department: PROVIDED, That
claimant when presenting his or her claim to the department in
accordance with this chapter, shall provide to the claim, invoices of
propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other appropriate
information as may be required by the department to substantiate his or
her claim;
(ii) Operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a
load compactor on a garbage truck at the rate of twenty-five percent of
the total gallons of fuel used in such a truck; or
(iii) The department is authorized to establish by rule additional
formulae for determining fuel usage when operating other types of
equipment by means of power take-off units when direct measurement of
the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also authorized to
adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter;
(e) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States
government;
(f) Heating purposes;
(g) Moving a motor vehicle on a public highway between two pieces
of private property when said moving is incidental to the primary use
of the motor vehicle;
(h) Transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs by a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under
chapter 81.66 RCW;
(i) Vehicle refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment
powered by separate motors from separate fuel tanks;
(j) The operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to
logging operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the
boundaries of a federal area if the federal government requires a fee
for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the
proceeds of which are reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in
the federal area, or requires maintenance or construction work to be
performed on the highway for the privilege of operating the motor
vehicle on the highway; and
(k) Waste vegetable oil as defined under RCW 82.08.0205 if the oil
is used to manufacture biodiesel.
(2) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter the
removal or entry of special fuel under the following circumstances and
conditions:
(a) If it is the removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the
entry or sale of, a special fuel if all of the following apply:
(i) The person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other
than a dyed special fuel user or international fuel tax agreement
licensee;
(ii) For a removal from a terminal, the terminal is a licensed
terminal; and
(iii) The special fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking
requirements of this chapter;
(b) If it is an entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of
taxable special fuel transferred to a refinery or terminal and the
persons involved, including the terminal operator, are licensed; and
(c)(i) If it is a special fuel that, under contract of sale, is
shipped to a point outside this state by a supplier by means of any of
the following:
(A) Facilities operated by the supplier;
(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or
forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment
to the out-of-state point;
(C) Delivery by the supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this
state for a port outside this state and actually exported from this
state in the vessel.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(c):
(A) "Carrier" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and
includes both common and contract carriers; and
(B) "Forwarding agent" means a person or firm engaged in the
business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its
shipment.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
privately owned urban passenger transportation system and carriers as
defined by chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW shall be exempt from the
provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes.
For the purposes of this section "privately owned urban passenger
transportation system" means every privately owned transportation
system((, publicly or privately owned,)) having as its principal source
of revenue the income from transporting persons for compensation by
means of motor vehicles ((and/or)) or trackless trolleys, each having
a seating capacity for over fifteen persons over prescribed routes in
such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles ((and/or)) or
trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other
such motor vehicles ((and/or)) or trackless trolleys subject to routing
by the same transportation system, shall not extend for a distance
exceeding twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the
county in which the original starting points of such motor vehicles are
located: PROVIDED, That no refunds or credits shall be granted on
special fuel used by any privately owned urban transportation vehicle,
or vehicle operated pursuant to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW, on any
trip where any portion of ((said)) the trip is more than twenty-five
road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in which ((said))
the trip originated.
(4) Every publicly owned and operated urban passenger
transportation system is exempt from the provisions of this chapter
that require the payment of special fuel taxes. For the purposes of
this subsection, "publicly owned and operated urban passenger
transportation systems" include public transportation benefit areas
under chapter 36.57A RCW, metropolitan municipal corporations under
chapter 36.56 RCW, city-owned transit systems under chapter 35.58 RCW,
county public transportation authorities under chapter 36.57 RCW,
unincorporated transportation benefit areas under chapter 36.57 RCW,
and regional transportation authorities under chapter 81.112 RCW.

--- END ---