BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.684 and 2008 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of discriminating against consumers' choices in
the placement or use of a home in such a manner that is not equally
applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403
standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the purposes of
siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory built homes, or
homes built to any other state construction or local design standard.
However, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any city
or town may require that:
(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;
(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as
specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of
the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete
product which can be either load bearing or decorative;
(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards
applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the
manufactured home is to be located;
(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and
(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements
for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
A city with a population of one hundred thirty-five thousand or
more may choose to designate its building official as the person
responsible for issuing all permits, including department of labor and
industries permits issued under chapter 43.22 RCW in accordance with an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, for alterations,
remodeling, or expansion of manufactured housing located within the
city limits under this section.
(2) A city or town may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of ((mobile homes
or manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured housing))
manufactured/mobile homes in manufactured/mobile home communities((, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, which)) that were legally in existence before
June 12, 2008, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the
((mobile home or)) manufactured/mobile home. This does not preclude a
city or town from restricting the location of a ((mobile home or
manufactured home in mobile home parks or manufactured housing))
manufactured/mobile home in manufactured/mobile home communities for
any other reason including, but not limited to, failure to comply with
fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state laws related to
((mobile homes and)) manufactured/mobile homes.
(3) Except as provided under subsection (4) of this section, a city
or town may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect, directly or
indirectly, of preventing the entry or requiring the removal of a
recreational vehicle used as a primary residence in manufactured/mobile
home communities.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to any local
ordinance or state law that:
(a) Imposes fire, safety, or other regulations related to
recreational vehicles;
(b) Requires utility hookups in manufactured/mobile home
communities to meet state or federal building code standards for
manufactured/mobile home communities; or
(c) Includes both of the following provisions:
(i) A recreational vehicle must contain at least one internal
toilet and at least one internal shower; and
(ii) If the requirement in (c)(i) of this subsection is not met, a
manufactured/mobile home community must provide toilets and showers.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "manufactured/mobile home
community" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.
(6) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(((4))) (7) This section does not affect the authority granted
under chapter 43.22 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.21.312 and 2008 c 117 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A code city may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of discriminating against consumers' choices in
the placement or use of a home in such a manner that is not equally
applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403
standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the purposes of
siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory built homes, or
homes built to any other state construction or local design standard.
However, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any code
city may require that:
(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;
(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as
specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of
the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete
product which can be either load bearing or decorative;
(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards
applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the
manufactured home is to be located;
(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and
(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements
for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
A code city with a population of one hundred thirty-five thousand
or more may choose to designate its building official as the person
responsible for issuing all permits, including department of labor and
industries permits issued under chapter 43.22 RCW in accordance with an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, for alterations,
remodeling, or expansion of manufactured housing located within the
city limits under this section.
(2) A code city may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of ((mobile homes
or manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured housing))
manufactured/mobile homes in manufactured/mobile home communities((, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, which)) that were legally in existence before
June 12, 2008, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the
((mobile home or)) manufactured/mobile home. This does not preclude a
code city from restricting the location of a ((mobile home or
manufactured home in mobile home parks or manufactured housing))
manufactured/mobile home in manufactured/mobile home communities for
any other reason including, but not limited to, failure to comply with
fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state laws related to
((mobile homes and)) manufactured/mobile homes.
(3) Except as provided under subsection (4) of this section, a code
city may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect, directly or
indirectly, of preventing the entry or requiring the removal of a
recreational vehicle used as a primary residence in manufactured/mobile
home communities.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to any local
ordinance or state law that:
(a) Imposes fire, safety, or other regulations related to
recreational vehicles;
(b) Requires utility hookups in manufactured/mobile home
communities to meet state or federal building code standards for
manufactured/mobile home communities or recreational vehicle parks; or
(c) Includes both of the following provisions:
(i) A recreational vehicle must contain at least one internal
toilet and at least one internal shower; and
(ii) If the requirement in (c)(i) of this subsection is not met, a
manufactured/mobile home community must provide toilets and showers.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "manufactured/mobile home
community" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.
(6) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(((4))) (7) This section does not affect the authority granted
under chapter 43.22 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.01.225 and 2008 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of discriminating against consumers' choices in
the placement or use of a home in such a manner that is not equally
applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403
standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the purposes of
siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory built homes, or
homes built to any other state construction or local design standard.
However, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
county may require that:
(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;
(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as
specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of
the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete
product which can be either load bearing or decorative;
(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards
applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the
manufactured home is to be located;
(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and
(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements
for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
(2) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of ((mobile homes
or manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured housing))
manufactured/mobile homes in manufactured/mobile home communities, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, which were legally in existence before June
12, 2008, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the ((mobile
home or)) manufactured/mobile home. This does not preclude a county
from restricting the location of a ((mobile home or manufactured home
in mobile home parks or manufactured housing)) manufactured/mobile home
in manufactured/mobile home communities for any other reason including,
but not limited to, failure to comply with fire, safety, or other local
ordinances or state laws related to ((mobile homes and))
manufactured/mobile homes.
(3) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of preventing the entry or requiring the
removal of a recreational vehicle used as a primary residence in
manufactured/mobile home communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030,
unless the recreational vehicle fails to comply with the fire, safety,
or other local ordinances or state laws related to recreational
vehicles.
(4) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(((4))) (5) This section does not affect the authority granted
under chapter 43.22 RCW.

--- END ---