BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the death of a tenant and the subsequent default in the
payment of rent by the tenant, the landlord may immediately enter and
take possession of any property of the tenant found on the premises and
may store the property in a reasonably secure place. A landlord must
treat the personal property as abandoned as described in RCW 59.18.310.
(2) Upon the death of a tenant, a person may not enter the tenant's
unit and remove personal property and household goods, other than
burial clothes, a pet, the deceased tenant's will, or any perishable
items, without a certified copy of any testamentary letters or
affidavit of successor as described in RCW 11.62.010 or otherwise
meeting the requirements of RCW 11.62.010.
(3) If at the time of a tenant's death there is no other person
listed on the lease and at any time after forty days from the date of
the tenant's death, a person who has possession of any personal
property belonging to the decedent shall deliver the personal property
to a person claiming to be a successor of the decedent upon the receipt
of proof of death and an affidavit made by the person claiming to be
the successor of the decedent that meets the requirements of RCW
11.62.010.
(4) If, after forty days but no later than forty-five days after
the tenant's death, a successor does not claim the deceased tenant's
personal property but a closest surviving relation of the deceased
tenant exists and claims possession of the tenant's personal property,
the surviving relation must fill out a dated, signed, and notarized
affidavit of next of kin that includes: The date that the decedent
passed away; the nature of the surviving relation's relationship to the
decedent; and a statement that he or she is the closest surviving
relative (a) asking for the possession and location of the decedent's
personal property and (b) indemnifying and holding harmless the rental
unit's owner, its agents, employees, or principal from a third party
who claims the right to the decedent's personal property.

--- END ---