BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.14.110 and 2001 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the
district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid
procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and
contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal
sealed bidding shall not be required for:
(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the
cost will not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars. However,
whenever the estimated cost does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, the
commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW
39.04.190 to award contracts;
(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or
improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated
cost will not exceed the sum of ((two thousand five hundred)) forty
thousand dollars, which includes the costs of labor, material, and
equipment;
(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155; and
(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.61.135 and 2001 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of
five thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive
bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of park
commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation where the district is located at least once thirteen days
before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed
proposals for such work, plans, and specifications which must at the
time of publication of such notice be on file in the office of the
board of park commissioners subject to the public inspection. The
notice shall state generally the work to be done and shall call for
proposals for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the board of
park commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.
Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or
postal money order payable to the order of the metropolitan park
district for a sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid,
or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of
the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state,
conditioned that the bidder will pay the metropolitan park district as
liquidated damages the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder
enters into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid
shall be considered unless accompanied by such check, cash, or bid
bond. At the time and place named such bids shall be publicly opened
and read and the board of park commissioners shall proceed to canvass
the bids and may let such contract to the lowest responsible bidder
upon plans and specifications on file or to the best bidder submitting
the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of park
commissioners may reject all bids for good cause and readvertise and in
such case all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the
bidders. If the contract is let, then all checks, cash, or bid bonds
shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the successful bidder,
which shall be retained until a contract is entered into for doing the
work, and a bond to perform such work furnished with sureties
satisfactory to the board of park commissioners in the full amount of
the contract price between the bidder and the metropolitan park
district in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter into
the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond within ten
days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the bidder is
the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the amount
thereof shall be forfeited to the metropolitan park district. If the
bidder fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's
bid, and the board of park commissioners deems it necessary to take
legal action to collect on any bid bond required by this section, then
the metropolitan park district is entitled to collect from the bidder
any legal expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned
thereby. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, a metropolitan park district may let contracts using the small
works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost in excess of forty thousand dollars, shall be by
contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using
the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials,
supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars
or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure
for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this
section, a metropolitan park district may let contracts for purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on
current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the
materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established
in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable
to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for
purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.
(5) The park board may waive the competitive bidding requirements
of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained
within RCW 39.04.280 applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 3 RCW 57.08.050 and 2003 c 145 s 1 and 2003 c 60 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of
ten thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive bidding.
Before awarding any such contract the board of commissioners shall
publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the
district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such
work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of
such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners
subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the
work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be
sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day
and hour named therein.
Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or
postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied
by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with
a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned
that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount
specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in
accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place
named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such
contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications
on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and
specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for
good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid
bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then
all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except
that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract
shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners
in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the
commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter
into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond
within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the
bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails
to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the
board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to
collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district
shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder
who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is
made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works
roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost in excess of ((ten)) forty thousand dollars, shall be by
contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using
the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials,
supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars
or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure
for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts for purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on
current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the
materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established
in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable
to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for
purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.
(5) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.

--- END ---