BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.020 and 2005 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial agricultural purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial ((activities)) agricultural purposes
as may be established by rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to commercial agricultural ((uses))
purposes, which has produced a gross income from commercial
agricultural ((uses)) purposes equivalent to, as of January 1, 1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from commercial agricultural ((uses)) purposes" includes, but is not
limited to, the wholesale value of agricultural products donated to
nonprofit food banks or feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
commercial agricultural ((uses)) purposes which has produced a gross
income as of January 1, 1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter.
Parcels of land described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection
shall, upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a
surviving spouse, be subject to the limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(d) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
commercial agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation,
provided such incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the
classified land and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the
production, preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in
conjunction with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands
shall also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is
not contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of
farming operations being conducted on land qualifying under this
section as "farm and agricultural lands"; or
(e) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
commercial agricultural purposes.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
shall mean the contract vendee.
(6) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property
held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but
otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, shall be considered
contiguous.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.
(9) "Commercial agricultural purpose" includes the commercial:
Raising; harvesting; feeding; breeding; managing; selling; care; or
training of an agricultural product or agricultural commodity where the
owner or lessee intends to obtain through lawful means, a monetary
profit from cash income. For the purposes of this section,
"agricultural product" and "agricultural commodity," used
interchangeably in this section, means those plants and animals useful
to humans and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops,
dairy and dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock,
including breeding, grazing, and recreational equine use, fruits,
vegetables, flowers, seeds, grasses, freshwater fish and fish products,
apiaries and apiary products, equine and other similar products, or any
other product which incorporates the use of food, feed, fiber, or fur,
and includes cultivated land for which there has been an investment of
greater than one hundred dollars per acre for the production of an
agricultural product prior to that product being planted or reaching
maturity with an expectation of harvest within fifteen years. No state
agency, county, or municipality may impose definitions more restrictive
than those defined under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively to taxes
levied for collection in 2008 as well as prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---