BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the
fourth degree if:
(a) The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with
the physical custody of a child or other dependent person, a person who
has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the
basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child
or other dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and
(b) The person with criminal negligence, abandons the child or
other dependent person; and
(c) As a result of being abandoned, the person either (i) creates
an imminent and substantial risk of bodily harm to the child or other
dependent person, or (ii) causes bodily harm or extreme emotional
distress manifested by more than transient physical symptoms.
(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not
subject to criminal liability under this section.
(3) For purposes of this section, the term "child" means any person
under the age of eight.
(4) Abandonment of a dependent person in the fourth degree is a
misdemeanor.

--- END ---