BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2007 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2009-10 academic year and ending
with the ((2008-09)) 2015-16 academic year, reductions or increases in
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2009-10 academic year and ending
with the ((2008-09)) 2015-16 academic year, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges may
reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than
resident undergraduates, including summer school students and students
in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in
full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions
or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's
programs, campuses, courses, or students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with ((2009-10)) 2016-17,
other than summer term, shall be as charged during the ((2008-09))
2015-16 academic year unless different rates are adopted by the
legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years ((2003-04 through 2008-09)) 2009-10
through 2015-16, the University of Washington shall use an amount
equivalent to ten percent of all revenues received as a result of law
school tuition increases beginning in academic year ((2000-01 through
academic year 2008-09)) 2009-10 through academic year 2015-16 to assist
needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years ((2003-04 through 2008-09)) 2009-10
through 2015-16, institutions of higher education shall use an amount
equivalent to ten percent of all revenues received as a result of
graduate academic school tuition increases beginning in academic year
((2003-04 through academic year 2008-09)) 2009-10 through academic year
2015-16 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.

--- END ---