BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules to take effect on January 1, 2010,
to classify ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, and phenylpropanolamine as
Schedule III controlled substances. The Schedule III classification
may be modified by the board if the board, upon consultation with state
and local law enforcement, finds that Schedule III restrictions on
products containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine
do not significantly reduce the prevalence of the illegal manufacture
of methamphetamine in Washington.
(2)(a) This section does not apply to products that the board, upon
application of a manufacturer, exempts by rule because the product is
formulated to effectively prevent conversion of the active ingredient
into methamphetamine or its salts or precursors. The board shall
collaborate with the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol during the rule-making process.
(b) Upon notification of the forensic laboratory services bureau of
the Washington state patrol that it has probable cause to believe that
a product exempted under (a) of this subsection does not effectively
prevent conversion of the active ingredient into methamphetamine or its
salts or precursors, the board may issue a summary suspension of the
exemption for the product pending the completion of the rule-making
process to permanently revoke the exemption.
(3) Records of transactions involving products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine are subject to
inspection by the board and law enforcement agencies. A person
required to make or maintain records of transactions involving products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine shall
forward the records to a law enforcement agency if directed to do so by
that agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.4013 and 2003 c 53 s 334 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a
valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this chapter.
(2) It is an affirmative defense which the defendant must prove by
a preponderance of the evidence to a charge of violating subsection (1)
of this section by unlawfully possessing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine that the person:
(a) Obtained the ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine
lawfully;
(b) Possessed no more than six grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
or phenylpropanolamine, the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or a combination of
any of these substances; and
(c) Possessed the ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine under circumstances that are consistent with
typical medicinal or household use, as indicated by factors that
include, but are not limited to, storage location, purchase date,
possession of the products in a variety of strengths, brands, types or
purposes, and expiration dates.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates
this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective January 1,
2010:
(1) RCW 69.43.105 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Sales restrictions--Exceptions -- Penalty) and 2005
c 388 s 2;
(2) RCW 69.43.110 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Sales restrictions -- Penalty) and 2005 c 388 s 4,
2004 c 52 s 5, & 2001 c 96 s 9;
(3) RCW 69.43.120 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Possession of more than fifteen grams -- Penalty--Exceptions) and 2001 c 96 s 10;
(4) RCW 69.43.130 (Exemptions--Pediatric products--Products
exempted by the state board of pharmacy) and 2004 c 52 s 7 & 2001 c 96
s 11; and
(5) RCW 69.43.170 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Pilot project to record retail transactions--Penalty) and 2005 c 388 s 8.

--- END ---