BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.470 and 2007 c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through
the program authorized in this section, the department shall provide
affordable health care coverage to children under the age of nineteen
who reside in Washington state and whose family income at the time of
enrollment is not greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services, and effective
January 1, 2009, and only to the extent that funds are specifically
appropriated therefor, to children whose family income is not greater
than three hundred percent of the federal poverty level. In
administering the program, the department shall take such actions as
may be necessary to ensure the receipt of federal financial
participation under the medical assistance program, as codified at
Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's
health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal
social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now
available or may become available in the future. The department and
the caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload
and costs of the program established in this section.
(2) The department shall accept applications for enrollment for
children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility
based on current family income. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. The
application and annual renewal processes shall be designed to minimize
administrative barriers for applicants and enrolled clients, and to
minimize gaps in eligibility for families who are eligible for
coverage. If a change in family income results in a change in program
eligibility, the department shall transfer the family members to the
appropriate programs and notify the family with respect to any change
in premium obligation, without a break in eligibility. The department
shall use the same eligibility redetermination and appeals procedures
as those provided for children on medical assistance programs. The
department shall modify its eligibility renewal procedures to lower the
percentage of children failing to annually renew. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on its progress
in this regard by December 2007.
(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for
families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of
the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to children under this section shall be the same as that
provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW
74.09.520.
(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under
this section shall be through contracts with managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522 except when utilization patterns
suggest that fee-for-service purchasing could produce equally effective
and cost-efficient care. However, the department shall make every
effort within available resources to purchase health care coverage for
uninsured children whose families have access to dependent coverage
through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source when it is
cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent
with requirements of Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social
security act. To the extent allowable under federal law, the
department shall require families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a condition of participating in the program
established under chapter 5, Laws of 2007, when it is cost-effective
for the state to do so. Families who enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage under chapter 5, Laws of 2007 shall be accounted for
separately in the annual report required by RCW 74.09.053.
(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the
department shall develop and implement a schedule of premiums for
children's health care coverage due to the department from families
with income greater than two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. For families with income greater than two hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level, the premiums shall be established in
consultation with the senate majority and minority leaders and the
speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. Premiums
shall be set at a reasonable level that does not pose a barrier to
enrollment. The amount of the premium shall be based upon family
income and shall not exceed the premium limitations in Title XXI of the
federal social security act. Premiums shall not be imposed on children
in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as articulated in RCW 74.09.055.
(b) Beginning January 1, ((2009)) 2010, the department shall offer
families whose income is greater than three hundred percent of the
federal poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care coverage
for their children ((through the programs administered under this
section)) without a premium subsidy from the state. The amount paid by
the family shall be in an amount equal to the rate paid by the state to
the managed health care system for coverage of the child, including any
associated and administrative costs to the state of providing coverage
for the child.
(i) The activities and operations of the children's health coverage
program under this subsection, including those of managed health care
systems to the extent of their participation in the program, are exempt
from the provisions of Title 48 RCW, except:
(A) The coverage is subject to RCW 48.21.200 and is excess to the
benefits payable under the terms of any insurance policy issued to or
on the behalf of an enrollee that provides payments toward medical
expenses without a determination of liability for the injury.
(B) Managed health care systems are subject to the provisions of
RCW 48.43.022, 48.43.500 through 48.43.535, 48.43.545, and 48.43.550.
(ii) The activities and operations of the children's health
coverage program under this subsection are subject to the provisions of
RCW 43.70.235, 70.02.045, 70.02.110, and 70.02.900.
(iii) Persons appointed or authorized to solicit applications for
enrollment in nonsubsidized state children's health coverage, including
employees of the department, must comply with chapter 48.17 RCW. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "solicit" does not include
distributing information and applications for nonsubsidized state
children's health coverage and responding to questions.
(iv) Amounts paid to a managed health care system by the department
for providing health care services pursuant to this subsection must
comply with RCW 48.14.0201.
(6) The department shall undertake a proactive, targeted outreach
and education effort with the goal of enrolling children in health
coverage and improving the health literacy of youth and parents. The
department shall collaborate with the department of health, local
public health jurisdictions, the office of (([the])) the superintendent
of public instruction, the department of early learning, health
educators, health care providers, health carriers, and parents in the
design and development of this effort. The outreach and education
effort shall include the following components:
(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of
coverage, including media campaigns;
(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based
outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based
outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to
be covered;
(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from
the free and reduced-price lunch program, the department of early
learning child care subsidy program, the department of health's women,
infants, and children program, and the early childhood education and
assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but not
enrolled in coverage;
(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government
entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families
apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the
populations least likely to be covered. The department shall provide
informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify
any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;
(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform
parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of
health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services,
including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed
under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency
services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and
immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to
department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing
chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good
nutrition and physical activity;
(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon
clear outcome measures that are included in contracts with entities
that undertake components of the outreach and education effort;
(g) A feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system, and to develop data linkages with
the office of (([the])) the superintendent of public instruction for
free and reduced-price lunch enrollment information and the department
of early learning for child care subsidy program enrollment
information. The department shall submit a feasibility study on the
implementation of the requirements in this subsection to the governor
and legislature by July 2008.
(7) The department shall take action to increase the number of
primary care physicians providing dental disease preventive services
including oral health screenings, risk assessment, family education,
the application of fluoride varnish, and referral to a dentist as
needed.
(8) The department shall monitor the rates of substitution between
private-sector health care coverage and the coverage provided under
this section and shall report to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2010.

--- END ---