BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.04.030 and 2005 c 290 s 1 and 2005 c 238 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, the juvenile courts in this
state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings:
(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as
provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;
(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as
provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through
((13.34.170)) 13.34.161;
(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship
as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;
(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in
RCW 13.32A.170;
(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed
offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in
RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:
(i) The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction of a particular
juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;
(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for
the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;
(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish,
boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by
a juvenile sixteen years of age or older and would, if committed by an
adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which
instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have
jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad
litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age:
PROVIDED, That if such an alleged offense or infraction and an alleged
offense or infraction subject to juvenile court jurisdiction arise out
of the same event or incident, the juvenile court may have jurisdiction
of both matters: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the jurisdiction under this
subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a "decline" for purposes
of RCW 13.40.110(1) or (e)(i) of this subsection: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That courts of limited jurisdiction which confine juveniles for an
alleged offense or infraction may place juveniles in juvenile detention
facilities under an agreement with the officials responsible for the
administration of the juvenile detention facility in RCW 13.04.035 and
13.20.060;
(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a
violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter
28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has
assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW
13.04.0301; or
(v) The juvenile is sixteen or seventeen years old on the date the
alleged offense is committed and the alleged offense is:
(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile
has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious
violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III)
three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class
A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the
second degree, all of which must have been committed after the
juvenile's thirteenth birthday and prosecuted separately;
(C) Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997;
(D) Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1,
1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more
prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or
(E) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on or
after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed with
a firearm.
(I) In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction, except as provided in (e)(v)(E)(II) of this
subsection.
(II) The juvenile court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the
disposition of any remaining charges in any case in which the juvenile
is found not guilty in the adult criminal court of the charge or
charges for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the
adult criminal court of a lesser included offense that is not also an
offense listed in (e)(v) of this subsection. The juvenile court shall
enter an order extending juvenile court jurisdiction if the juvenile
has turned eighteen years of age during the adult criminal court
proceedings pursuant to RCW 13.40.300. However, once the case is
returned to juvenile court, the court may hold a decline hearing
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 to determine whether to retain the case in
juvenile court for the purpose of disposition or return the case to
adult criminal court for sentencing.
If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the
juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state
may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered
upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of
establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;
(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in
chapter 13.24 RCW;
(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW
13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained
eighteen years of age;
(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian
custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian
and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises
exclusive jurisdiction;
(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed
by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW
74.13.042; and
(j) Relating to judicial determinations and permanency planning
hearings involving developmentally disabled children who have been
placed in out-of-home care pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement
between the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the
department of social and health services.
(2) The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the
superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as
provided in RCW 26.12.010.
(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the family court over child custody proceedings under chapter
26.10 RCW and parenting plans or residential schedules under chapter
26.09 RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.
(4) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under
subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained
pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in
RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.062 and 2007 c 413 s 4 and 2007 c 409 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective
services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when
child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into
custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective
services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parent, guardian,
or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into
custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title, including the right to a shelter care
hearing, as soon as possible. Notice must be provided in an
understandable manner and take into consideration the parent's,
guardian's, or legal custodian's primary language, level of education,
and cultural issues.
(b) In no event shall the notice required by this section be
provided to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian more than twenty-four hours after the child has been taken into custody or twenty-four
hours after child protective services has been notified that the child
has been taken into custody.
(2)(a) The notice of custody and rights may be given by any means
reasonably certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited
to, written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial
notification is provided by a means other than writing, child
protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide
written notification.
(b) The written notice of custody and rights required by this
section shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been placed in temporary custody under the
supervision of Child Protective Services (or other person or agency).
You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your
interests.
1. A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of
the time your child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays. You should call the court at (insert appropriate
phone number here) for specific information about the date, time,
and location of the court hearing.
2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the
hearing. Your right to representation continues after the shelter care
hearing. You have the right to records the department intends to rely
upon. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to child
protective services and other agencies, tell you about the law, help
you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot
afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get
a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local
procedure) .
3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf,
to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision
based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.
4. If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the
right to have the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a
superior court judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten days
after the entry of the decision of the court commissioner, file with
the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided in RCW
2.24.050.
You should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not
come, the judge will not hear what you have to say.
You may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more
information about your child. The caseworker's name and telephone
number are: (insert name and telephone number) .
5. You have a right to a case conference to develop a written
service agreement following the shelter care hearing. The service
agreement may not conflict with the court's order of shelter care. You
may request that a multidisciplinary team, family group conference, or
prognostic staffing be convened for your child's case. You may
participate in these processes with your counsel present.
6. If your child is placed in the custody of the department of
social and health services or other supervising agency, immediately
following the shelter care hearing, the court will enter an order
granting the department or other supervising agency the right to
inspect and copy all health, medical, mental health, and education
records of the child, directing health care providers to release such
information without your further consent, and granting the department
or supervising agency or its designee the authority and responsibility,
where applicable, to:
(1) Notify the child's school that the child is in out-of-home
placement;
(2) Enroll the child in school;
(3) Request the school transfer records;
(4) Request and authorize evaluation of special needs;
(5) Attend parent or teacher conferences;
(6) Excuse absences;
(7) Grant permission for extracurricular activities;
(8) Authorize medications which need to be administered during
school hours and sign for medical needs that arise during school hours;
and
(9) Complete or update school emergency records.
7. A dependency petition begins a judicial process which, if the
court finds your child dependent, could result in substantial
restrictions including the entry or modification of a parenting plan or
residential schedule, nonparental custody order or decree, guardianship
order, or the permanent loss of your parental rights."

Upon receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian shall acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared
by child protective services. If the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for lack of a signature
shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made a part of
the court's file in the dependency action.
If after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child
protective services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the
parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or
sent to the last known address of the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian.
(3) If child protective services is not required to give notice
under this section, the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter
shall make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or
legal custodian of the time and place of any shelter care hearing,
request that they be present, and inform them of their basic rights as
provided in RCW 13.34.090.
(4) Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in
this section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the
whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. If such
reasonable efforts are not successful, or the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian does not appear at the shelter care hearing, the
petitioner shall testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:
(a) The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to
advise, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian; and
(b) Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made,
and how it was made, including the substance of any oral communication
or copies of written materials used.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.155 and 2000 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court hearing the dependency petition may hear and
determine issues related to chapter 26.10 RCW in a dependency
proceeding as necessary to facilitate a permanency plan for the child
or children as part of the dependency disposition order or a dependency
review order or as otherwise necessary to implement a permanency plan
of care for a child. The parents, guardians, or legal custodian of the
child must agree, subject to court approval, to establish a permanent
custody order. This agreed order may have the concurrence of the other
parties to the dependency including the supervising agency, the
guardian ad litem of the child, and the child if age twelve or older,
and must also be in the best interests of the child. If the petitioner
for a custody order under chapter 26.10 RCW is not a party to the
dependency proceeding, he or she must agree on the record or by the
filing of a declaration to the entry of a custody order. Once an order
is entered under chapter 26.10 RCW, and the dependency petition
dismissed, the department shall not continue to supervise the
placement.
(2) The court hearing the dependency petition may hear and
determine matters agreed to by the child's parents for the
establishment or modification of a parenting plan under chapter 26.09
RCW as part of the dependency disposition or dependency review
proceedings when doing so will implement a permanent plan of care for
the child and result in dismissal of the dependency.
(a) The dependency court shall adhere to procedural requirements
under chapter 26.09 RCW and must make a written finding that the
parenting plan established or modified by the dependency court under
this section is in the child's best interests.
(b) When hearing and determining matters agreed to by the child's
parents regarding custody, the child's residential schedule, the
allocation of parental decision-making authority, and dispute
resolution, the dependency court may:
(i) Appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the
child when the court believes the appointment is necessary to protect
the best interest of the child; and
(ii) Appoint an attorney to represent the interests of the child
with respect to provisions for the parenting plan.
(c) The dependency court may interview the child in chambers to
ascertain the child's wishes as to the child's residential schedule in
a proceeding for the entry or modification of a parenting plan under
this section. The court may permit counsel to be present at the
interview. The court shall cause a record of the interview to be made
and to become part of the court record of the dependency case and the
case under chapter 26.09 RCW.
(d) In any parenting plan agreed to by the parents and entered or
modified in juvenile court under this section, all issues pertaining to
child support and the division of marital property shall be referred to
or retained by the family law department of the superior court.
(3) Any court order determining issues under chapter 26.10 RCW is
subject to modification upon the same showing and standards as a court
order determining Title 26 RCW issues.
(((3))) (4) Any order entered in the dependency court establishing
or modifying a permanent legal custody order or, parenting plan, or
residential schedule under chapters 26.09 and 26.10 RCW shall also be
filed in the chapter 26.10 RCW action by the prevailing party, and in
the chapter 26.09 RCW action, by the petitioning or moving party. If
the petitioning or moving party has been found indigent and appointed
counsel at public expense in the dependency proceeding, no filing fees
shall be imposed by the clerk. Once filed, any order, parenting plan,
or residential schedule establishing or modifying permanent legal
custody of a child shall survive dismissal of the dependency
proceeding.

--- END ---