BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.04.061 and 1999 c 105 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town lying adjacent to a fire protection district may
be annexed to such district if at the time of the initiation of
annexation the population of the city or town is 100,000 or less. The
legislative authority of the city or town may initiate annexation by
the adoption of an ordinance stating an intent to join the fire
protection district and finding that the public interest will be served
thereby. If the board of fire commissioners of the fire protection
district shall concur in the annexation, notification thereof shall be
transmitted to the legislative authority or authorities of the counties
in which the city or town and the district are situated.
(2) When a city or town is located in two counties, and at least
eighty percent of the population resides in one county, all of that
portion of the city lying in that county and encompassing eighty
percent of the population may be annexed to a fire protection district
if at the time of the initiation of annexation the proposed area lies
adjacent to a fire protection district, and the population of the
proposed area is greater than five thousand but less than ten thousand.
The legislative authority of the city or town may initiate annexation
by the adoption of an ordinance stating an intent to join the fire
protection district and finding that the public interest will be served
thereby. If the board of fire commissioners of the fire protection
district shall concur in the annexation, notification thereof must be
transmitted to the legislative authority or authorities of the counties
in which the city or town and the district are situated.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.04.071 and 2006 c 344 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in the city, partial city as set
forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town and in the fire protection district
at the next date according to RCW 29A.04.321, and shall cause notice of
the election to be given as provided for in RCW 29A.52.351.
The election on the annexation of the city, partial city as set
forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town into the fire protection district
shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in which
the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town and
the fire protection district are located in accordance with the general
election laws of the state. The results thereof shall be canvassed by
the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person is entitled
to vote at the election unless he or she is a qualified elector in the
city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town or unless
he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially
the following form:

"Shall the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or
town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a part of . . . . . . fire
protection district?

YES. . . . . . . . . .
NO . . . . . . . . . . "

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the city,
partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town and a majority
of the persons voting on the proposition in the fire protection
district vote in favor thereof, the city, partial city as set forth in
RCW 52.04.061(2), or town shall be annexed and shall be a part of the
fire protection district.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.04.081 and 1984 c 230 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annual tax levies authorized by chapter 52.16 RCW shall be
imposed throughout the fire protection district, including any city,
partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town annexed thereto.
Any city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town
annexed to a fire protection district is entitled to levy up to three
dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation less
any regular levy made by the fire protection district or by a library
district under RCW 27.12.390 in the incorporated area: PROVIDED, That
the limitations upon regular property taxes imposed by chapter 84.55
RCW apply.

Sec. 4 RCW 52.04.091 and 1989 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any city, code city, partial city as set forth in RCW
52.04.061(2), or town is annexed to a fire protection district under
RCW 52.04.061 and 52.04.071, thereafter, any territory annexed by the
city shall also be annexed and be a part of the fire protection
district.

Sec. 5 RCW 52.04.101 and 1979 ex.s. c 179 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative body of such a city, partial city as set forth in
RCW 52.04.061(2), or town which has annexed to such a fire protection
district, may, by resolution, present to the voters of such city,
partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town a proposition to
withdraw from said fire protection district at any general election
held at least three years following the annexation to the fire
protection district. If the voters approve such a proposition to
withdraw from said fire protection district, the city, partial city as
set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town shall have a vested right in the
capital assets of the district proportionate to the taxes levied within
the corporate boundaries of the city, partial city as set forth in RCW
52.04.061(2), or town and utilized by the fire district to acquire such
assets.

Sec. 6 RCW 52.04.111 and 1986 c 254 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any city, code city, partial city as set forth in RCW
52.04.061(2), or town is annexed to a fire protection district under
RCW 52.04.061 and 52.04.071, any employee of the fire department of
such city, code city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or
town who (1) was at the time of annexation employed exclusively or
principally in performing the powers, duties, and functions which are
to be performed by the fire protection district (2) will, as a direct
consequence of annexation, be separated from the employ of the city,
code city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town, and
(3) can perform the duties and meet the minimum requirements of the
position to be filled, then such employee may transfer his employment
to the fire protection district as provided in this section and RCW
52.04.121 and 52.04.131.
For purposes of this section and RCW 52.04.121 and 52.04.131,
employee means an individual whose employment with a city, code city,
partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town has been
terminated because the city, code city, partial city as set forth in
RCW 52.04.061(2), or town was annexed by a fire protection district for
purposes of fire protection.

Sec. 7 RCW 52.04.121 and 1994 c 73 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An eligible employee may transfer into the fire protection
district civil service system, if any, or if none, then may request
transfer of employment under this section by filing a written request
with the board of fire commissioners of the fire protection district
and by giving written notice to the legislative authority of the city,
code city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town.
Upon receipt of such request by the board of fire commissioners the
transfer of employment shall be made. The employee so transferring
will (a) be on probation for the same period as are new employees of
the fire protection district in the position filled, but if the
transferring employee has already completed a probationary period as a
firefighter prior to the transfer, then the employee may only be
terminated during the probationary period for failure to adequately
perform assigned duties, not meeting the minimum qualifications of the
position, or behavior that would otherwise be subject to disciplinary
action, (b) be eligible for promotion no later than after completion of
the probationary period, (c) receive a salary at least equal to that of
other new employees of the fire protection district in the position
filled, and (d) in all other matters, such as retirement, vacation, and
sick leave, have all the rights, benefits, and privileges to which he
or she would have been entitled as an employee of the fire protection
district from the beginning of employment with the city, code city,
partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town fire department:
PROVIDED, That for purposes of layoffs by the annexing fire agency,
only the time of service accrued with the annexing agency shall apply
unless an agreement is reached between the collective bargaining
representatives of the employees of the annexing and annexed fire
agencies and the annexing and annexed fire agencies. The city, code
city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town shall,
upon receipt of such notice, transmit to the board of fire
commissioners a record of the employee's service with the city, code
city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town which
shall be credited to such employee as a part of the period of
employment in the fire protection district. All accrued benefits are
transferable provided that the recipient agency provides comparable
benefits. All benefits shall then accrue based on the combined
seniority of each employee in the recipient agency.
(2) As many of the transferring employees shall be placed upon the
payroll of the fire protection district as the district determines are
needed to provide services. These needed employees shall be taken in
order of seniority and the remaining employees who transfer as provided
in this section and RCW 52.04.111 and 52.04.131 shall head the list for
employment in the civil service system in order of their seniority, to
the end that they shall be the first to be reemployed in the fire
protection district when appropriate positions become available:
PROVIDED, That employees who are not immediately hired by the fire
protection district shall be placed on a reemployment list for a period
not to exceed thirty-six months unless a longer period is authorized by
an agreement reached between the collective bargaining representatives
of the employees of the annexing and annexed fire agencies and the
annexing and annexed fire agencies.

Sec. 8 RCW 52.04.131 and 1986 c 254 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a city, code city, partial city as set forth in RCW
52.04.061(2), or town is annexed to a fire protection district and as
a result any employee is laid off who is eligible to transfer to the
fire protection district pursuant to this section and RCW 52.04.111 and
52.04.121, the city, code city, partial city as set forth in RCW
52.04.061(2), or town shall notify the employee of the right to
transfer and the employee shall have ninety days to transfer employment
to the fire protection district.

--- END ---