BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.320 and 2005 c 419 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who suffers damage to livestock as a result of
actions described in RCW 16.52.205 or any owner of livestock who
suffers damage as a result of a willful, unauthorized act described in
RCW 9A.56.080 or 9A.56.083 may bring an action against the person or
persons committing the act ((in a court of competent jurisdiction)).
(2)(a) An action may be brought by a person who loses the
opportunity to harvest an agricultural crop on leased land against the
owner of the land if the owner of the land damages the crops, excludes
the lessee, or otherwise makes harvest impossible or prohibitively
difficult prior to the default termination date stated in the lease if
the owner of the land knows, or should know, that the lessee has
planted the land with an agricultural crop.
(b) Actions may be brought by a person under this subsection if the
person is the named lessee, a sublessee, or a transferee of the lease,
regardless of lease terms regarding subletting or transfer.
(c) Actions may be brought by a person under this subsection
regardless of lease terms allowing early termination dates.
(3) Actions brought under this section must be brought in a court
of competent jurisdiction and be for exemplary damages up to three
times the actual damages sustained, plus attorney's fees.
(4) As used in this section, "livestock" means the animals
specified in RCW 9A.56.080.

--- END ---