BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof
as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are
hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages,
and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for
other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2009, and ending June 30, 2011, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2010" or "FY 2010" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010.
(b) "Fiscal year 2011" or "FY 2011" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2011.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,379,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,957,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,874,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,884,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for
projects included on the committee's 2009-11 work plan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall conduct a review of the effect of risk management practices on
tort payouts. This review shall include an analysis of the state's
laws, policies, procedures, and practices as they relate to the conduct
of post-incident reviews and the impact of such reviews on the state's
conduct and liability.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall conduct a review of the state's workplace safety and health
program. The review shall examine workplace safety inspection,
enforcement, training, and outreach efforts compared to other states
and federal programs; analyze workplace injury and illness rates and
trends in Washington; identify factors that may influence workplace
safety and health; and identify practices that may improve workplace
safety and health and/or impact insurance costs.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall prepare an evaluation of the implementation of legislation
designed to improve communication, collaboration, and expedited
medicaid attainment with regard to persons released from confinement
who have mental health or chemical dependency disorders. The review
shall evaluate the implementation of: (a) Chapter 166, Laws of 2004
(E2SSB 6358); (b) sections 507 and 508 of chapter 504, Laws of 2005
(E2SSB 5763); (c) sections 12 and 13 of chapter 503, Laws of 2005
(E2SHB 1290); and (d) section 8 of chapter 359, Laws of 2007 (2SHB
1088). The departments of corrections and social and health services,
the administrative office of the courts, institutions for mental
disease, city and county jails, city and county courts, county clerks,
and mental health and chemical dependency treatment providers shall
provide the committee with information necessary for the study.
(5) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of the
state's recreational boating programs. This review shall include
examination of the following:
(a) Revenue sources for state recreational boating programs;
(b) Expenditures for state boating programs;
(c) Methods of administrating state recreational boating programs,
including the roles of both state and local government entities; and
(d) Approaches other states have taken to funding and administering
their recreational boating programs.
The committee shall complete the review by October 31, 2010.
(6) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2338 (growth management hearings boards).
(7) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall examine the operations of
employment and day services as provided by the department of social and
health services, division of developmental disabilities and
administered by the counties. The examination shall include a thorough
review of the contracts for all services including, but not limited to,
employment services, day services, child development services and other
uses of state dollars for county administration of services to the
developmentally disabled. In its final report, due to the legislature
by September 1, 2010, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall provide: A description of how funds are used and the rates paid
to vendors, and a recommendation on best practices the agency may use
for the development of a consistent, outcome-based contract for
services provided under contract with the counties.
(8) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a study of the
relationship between the cost of school districts and their enrollment
size. The study shall be completed by June 2010 and shall include:
(a) An analysis of how categories of costs vary related to size,
including but not limited to facility costs, transportation costs,
educational costs, and administrative costs;
(b) A review of other factors that may impact costs, such as
revenues available from local levies and other sources, geographic
dispersion, demographics, level of services received from educational
service districts, and whether districts operate a high school;
(c) Case studies on the change in cost patterns occurring after
school district consolidations and for school districts operating under
state oversight condition specified in RCW 28A.505.110; and
(d) A review of available research on nonfinancial benefits and
impacts associated with school and school district size.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,927,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Health Care Authority Administrative Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $735,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,269,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the continued study of local
government liabilities for postretirement medical benefits for members
of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system.
(2) $51,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state actuary
to contract with the Washington state institute for public policy for
a study of the disability benefits provided to the plan 2 and plan 3
members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, and the school employees' retirement system. Among
the options the institute shall examine include statutory changes to
the retirement systems and insurance products. The institute shall
report its findings and recommendations to the select committee on
pension policy by November 1, 2009.
(3) $20,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely to assist the University of Washington
medical center and Harborview medical center with the financial
reporting of their postretirement benefits liabilities.
(4) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the office of the state actuary to
conduct an independent assessment of alternatives for assuring the
long-term financial solvency of the guaranteed education tuition
program including suspension of the program. In conducting this
review, the office may contract for assistance, and shall consult with
the higher education coordinating board, the operating budget
committees of the legislature, the office of financial management, and
the state's public colleges and universities. The office shall report
findings, an assessment of the major alternatives, and suggested
actions to the governor and to the relevant legislative committees by
November 15, 2009.
(5) $735,000 of the health care authority administrative account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state actuary to conduct
a study, directly or by contract, of the cost of providing health
benefits for public employees. The study shall conduct a comparison of
the actuarial value of health benefits provided to employees of
Washington state retirement systems-participating employers, and the
cost of those benefits to employees and employers. All state
retirement system participating employers shall provide data requested
by the state actuary to conduct the study, including the ages and
genders of covered employees and dependents, counts of covered
employees by medical conditions, eligibility criteria, plan design, and
costs to employers and employees by employee tier. By December 15,
2010, the state actuary shall report the findings of the study to the
governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,651,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,519,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,610,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,029,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,639,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, and
redistricting commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,912,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,948,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,860,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,924,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,922,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,793,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,895,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,688,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,032,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,082,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,114,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,607,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,812,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,676,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,693,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public
instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection.
Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the
number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school
districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW
28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the
performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW
28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $8,253,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $5,700,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for modernization and integration of
the judicial information system.
(a) Of this amount, $1,700,000 is for the development of a
comprehensive enterprise-level information technology strategy and
detailed business and operational plans in support of that strategy,
and $4,000,000 is to continue to modernize and integrate current
systems and enhance case management functionality on an incremental
basis.
(b) The amount provided in this subsection may not be expended
without prior approval by the judicial information system committee in
consultation with the information services board. The administrator
shall regularly submit project plan updates for approval to the
judicial information system committee and the information services
board.
(c) The judicial information system committee and the information
services board shall review project progress on a regular basis and may
require quality assurance plans. The judicial information systems
committee and the information services board shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1,
2011, on the status of the judicial information system modernization
and integration, and the consistency of the project with the state's
architecture, infrastructure and statewide enterprise view of service
delivery.
(5) $3,000,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts, and at state judicial agencies. The administrator for
the courts shall prioritize equipment replacement purchasing and shall
fund those items that are most essential or critical. By October 1,
2010, the administrative office of the courts shall report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees on expenditures for equipment
under this subsection.
(6) $12,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1954 (sealing juvenile records). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(8) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

Sec. 115 2009 c 4 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,385,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,592,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,923,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,900,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.
(2) The amounts provided include funding for expert and
investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,175,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,105,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,440,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,880,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,876,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,256,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with
currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new
jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major
companies currently housed in the state.
(2)(a) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the governor
shall convene a joint legislative and executive task force on coal
fired power plants.
(i) The members of the task force shall consist of:
(A) One member from each of the major caucuses of the senate, or
their designees, as appointed by the president of the senate;
(B) One member from each of the major caucuses of the house, or
their designees, as appointed by the speaker of the house; and
(C) The governor's designee.
(ii) The task force shall be chaired by the governor's designee.
(iii) Staff from the state energy office at the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the department of revenue,
and from the legislature as available, shall support the task force.
(b) The task force shall evaluate alternatives for how existing
coal-fired power plants can meet the state's greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard as required by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5735.
(i) The task force shall review information on:
(A) The availability of alternative power production technologies;
(B) The timelines for planning, design, permitting, and
construction of new power facilities;
(C) The construction and operation costs of alternatives; and
(D) Options for financing and cost recovery, including private
joint ventures, government incentives, long-term purchase options,
public power, and private-public partnerships.
(ii) The task force shall consider:
(A) the long-term needs for the supply of electricity in western
Washington;
(B) The generation and transmission needs required to meet future
supplies and sustain the electrical grid;
(C) Existing government incentives for power facilities; and
(D) Options for retaining jobs during a transition to cleaner
energy facilities.
(iii) The task force shall identify barriers and opportunities for
how existing coal-fired power plants can meet the state's emissions
performance standard, and make recommendations for policies and
incentives that could facilitate or accelerate meeting the requirements
of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5735.
(iv) The task force shall solicit information and advice from a
broad range of experts, including representatives of:
(A) Coal-fired power plants in Washington state, and the coal-fired
power industry;
(B) Clean energy industry associations;
(C) Public and investor-owned utilities that supply electricity;
(D) Financial institutions that invest in generation of
electricity;
(E) Environmental groups that focus on clean energy;
(F) Federal and state agencies with jurisdiction or expertise in
generation and distribution of electricity; and
(G) Others as needed.
(v) The governor shall invite representatives from the Bonneville
power administration and the Northwest power and conservation council
to participate on the task force.
(4) By December 1, 2010, the task force shall submit a report to
the governor and appropriate standing committees of the legislature,
with recommendations for policies or incentives that would facilitate
and accelerate the ability of existing coal-fired power plants to meet
the state's greenhouse gas emissions performance standard. The task
force recommendations must include timelines for interim decision
points and other benchmarks needed to meet the requirements of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5735 in an orderly fashion,
including consideration of the following targets:
(a) By 2012, a determination of the potential for long-term
sequestration of carbon emissions in geological formations near
existing coal-fired power plants;
(b) By 2015, a determination of the feasibility for deploying
large-scale capture and sequestration of greenhouse gas emissions, and
if determined not feasible, what alternatives will be pursued to meet
the performance standard; and
(c) By 2018, a decision on the type of clean energy facility needed
to meet the state's emission performance standard, including actions
taken by such date to ensure compliance with the standard in a timely
fashion.
(5) By June 30, 2011, and every year thereafter, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide a progress
report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature on the
actions undertaken pursuant to this section, including actions by the
owner or operator of the coal-fired power plants to progress toward
compliance with the state's emissions performance standard pursuant to
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5735.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $788,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,267,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,264,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,370,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,444,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,121,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,863,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,777,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,715,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,101,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,897,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,076,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2009-2011 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) The appropriations in this section are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6122 (election
costs).
(4) The secretary of state shall not reduce the services provided
by the talking book and Braille library below the service level
provided in fiscal year 2008.
(5) In implementing budget reductions, the office of the secretary
of state must make its first priority to maintain funding for the
elections division.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC
AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $729,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,061,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $722,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $729,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) By November 1 of each fiscal year of the 2009-11 biennium, the
state auditor shall report to the senate and house of representatives
committees on ways and means on state expenditure savings achieved from
the implementation of performance audits conducted by the state
auditor. It is the intent of the legislature to reduce the 2009-11
legislative transfers from the performance audits of government
accounts to recognize actual reductions achieved in expenditures from
the state treasury as a result of these performance audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $212,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,325,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,654,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,026,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,346,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,515,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,136,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(4) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(5) $40,000 of the fiscal year 2010 general fund--state
appropriation and $40,000 of the fiscal year 2011 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5850 (human trafficking violations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $779,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $772,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,551,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $13,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2106 (improving child welfare outcomes
through the phased implementation of strategic and proven reforms). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,240,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,938,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,540,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,266,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,990,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,003,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $439,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,286,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,498,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Independent Youth Housing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Community Preservation and Development Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,166,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,382,000
Manufacturing Innovation and Modernization
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
Community and Economic Development Fee
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,833,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,372,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,602,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,520,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,521,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities.
(2) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit
them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the
program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms
included in the original loan agreements.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement section 2(7) of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1959 (land use and transportation
planning for marine container ports).
(4) $102,000 of the building code council account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of sections 3
and 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5854 (built
environment pollution). If sections 3 and 7 of the bill are not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5)(a) $10,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for training and technical assistance associated with low
income weatherization programs. Subject to federal requirements, the
department shall provide: (i) Up to $4,000,000 to the state board for
community and technical colleges to provide workforce training related
to weatherization and energy efficiency; (ii) up to $3,000,000 to the
Bellingham opportunity council to provide workforce training related to
energy efficiency and weatherization; and (iii) up to $3,500,000 to
community-based organizations and to community action agencies
consistent with the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2227 (evergreen jobs act). Any funding remaining shall be
expended in project 91000013, weatherization, in the omnibus capital
appropriations act, Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (capital budget).
(b) $6,787,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the state energy program, including not less than
$5,000,000 to provide credit enhancements consistent with the
provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (energy
efficiency in buildings).
(c) Of the general fund--federal appropriation the department shall
provide: $14,500,000 to the Washington State University for the
purpose of making grants for pilot projects providing community-wide
urban, residential, and commercial energy efficiency upgrades
consistent with the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5649 (energy efficiency in buildings); $500,000 to Washington
State University to conduct farm energy assessments. In contracting
with the Washington State University for the provision of these
services, the total administration of Washington State University and
the department shall not exceed 3 percent of the amounts provided.
(d) $38,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for deposit in the energy recovery act account to establish a
revolving loan program, consistent with the provisions of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2289 (expanding energy freedom program).
(e) $10,646,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided pursuant to the energy efficiency and conservation block grant
under the American reinvestment and recovery act. The department may
use up to $3,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection to
provide technical assistance for energy programs administered by the
agency under the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(6) $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5560 (state agency climate leadership). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) Associate development organizations receiving funding through
the appropriations in this section shall work with the community and
technical colleges to better align workforce and economic development
programs within industry clusters identified by the associate
development associations as necessary to deploy funds in response to
high-demand fields and consistent with Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5809 (revising unemployment compensation and workforce
training provisions). The workforce programs should be consistent with
industry clusters identified by the associate development organization
and approved by a private industry partner within the industry cluster.
(8) $22,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program and is
contingent upon the department transferring: $1,200,000 to the
department of corrections for security threat mitigation, $2,336,000 to
the department of corrections for offender reentry, $1,960,000 to the
Washington state patrol for law enforcement activities, $2,087,000 to
the department of social and health services, division of alcohol and
substance abuse for drug courts, and $428,000 to the department of
social and health services for sex abuse recognition training. The
remaining funds shall be distributed by the department to local
jurisdictions.
(9) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to KCTS public
television to support Spanish language programming and the V-me Spanish
language channel.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(11) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5840 (energy independence). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6015 (commercialization of technology). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) By June 30, 2011, the department shall request information
that describes what jurisdictions have adopted, or are in the process
of adopting, plans that address RCW 36.70A.020 and helps achieve the
greenhouse gas emission reductions established in RCW 70.235.020. This
information request in this subsection applies to jurisdictions that
are required to review and if necessary revise their comprehensive
plans by December 1, 2011, in accordance with RCW 36.70A.130.
(14) During the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the department shall allot
all of its appropriations subject to allotment by object, account, and
expenditure authority code to conform with the office of financial
management's definition of an option 2 allotment. For those funds
subject to allotment but not appropriation, the agency shall submit
option 2 allotments to the office of financial management.
(15) A county receiving funds pursuant to RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179,
and 36.22.1791, shall, within that funding:
(a) Beginning July 1, 2009, include a life-cycle cost analysis
program as one of the criteria in deciding which proposals to award
funds. "Life-cycle cost analysis" means an analysis of the total
discounted dollar cost of owning, operating, maintaining, and disposing
of a building or building system to compare the cost of capital
developments to vouchers, and to compare the cost of two or more
competing development proposals.
(b) By September 30, 2009, and September 30, 2010, submit to the
department of community, trade, and economic development a report
describing the distribution of the funds. The report shall include:
(i) A description of the process used by the county for allocating
funds;
(ii) The use of funds including, but not limited to, housing
vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(iii) The criteria used for making funding allocation decisions.
(c) By December 1st of each year, the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall prepare a report to the
legislature and the office of financial management compiling the
reports submitted under (b) of this subsection. For the funds
collected under RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, and 36.22.1791, and allocated
by the department to entities other than counties, this report must
also include:
(i) A description of the process used by the department for
allocating funds;
(ii) The use of funds including, but not limited to, housing
vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(iii) The criteria used for making funding allocation decisions.
(16) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the state's
participation in the Pacific Northwest economic region.
(17) The Washington state economic development commission shall
review existing state infrastructure programs which are focused on
economic development and provide analysis, findings, and
recommendations to the legislature and governor on preferred policy
priorities and funding options for existing programs and possible
revised or new programs to best ensure successful state economic
efforts which are: (a) Aligned with the state's comprehensive plan for
economic development; (b) responding to emerging economic conditions
and opportunities; (c) improving local capacity; (d) maximizing results
through partnerships and leveraging private capital; and (e) providing
accountability to the public, the executive branch, and the legislative
branch. The commission shall submit its report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2009.
(18) $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of crime victims
advocacy. These funds shall be contracted with the 39 county
prosecuting attorneys' offices to support victim-witness services. The
funds must be prioritized to ensure a full-time victim-witness
coordinator in each county. The office may retain only the amount
currently allocated for this activity for administrative costs.
(19) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(20) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(21) $371,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $371,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the northwest agriculture
business center.
(22) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties. Pass-through grants
shall continue to be funded under 2007-09 policy.
(23) $212,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1172 (development rights transfer). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1797 (rural and resource lands study). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(25) $69,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2227 (evergreen jobs act). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(26) $350,000 of the community development and preservation
authority account--state appropriation is provided solely for a grant
to a community development authority established under chapter 43.167
RCW. The community preservation and development's board of directors
may contract with nonprofit community organizations to aid in
mitigating the effects of increased public impact on urban
neighborhoods due to events in stadia that have a capacity of over
50,000 spectators.
(27) $300,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with a
community group to build local community capacity and economic
development within the state by strengthening political relationships
between economically distressed communities and governmental
institutions. The community group shall identify opportunities for
collaboration and initiate activities and events that bring community
organizations, local governments, and state agencies together to
address the impacts of poverty, political disenfranchisement, and
economic inequality on communities of color. These funds must be
matched by other nonstate sources on an equal basis.
(28) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(29) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in
the homeless family shelter program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,163,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,792,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,597,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,127,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health partnership plan).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(2) The office of financial management shall conduct a study on
alternatives for consolidating or transferring activities and
responsibilities of the state lottery commission, state horse racing
commission, state liquor control board, and the state gambling
commission to achieve cost savings and regulatory efficiencies. In
conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult
with the legislative fiscal committees. Further, the office of
financial management shall establish an advisory group to include, but
not be limited to, representatives of affected businesses, state
agencies or entities, local governments, and stakeholder groups. The
office of financial management shall submit a final report to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by November 15, 2009.
(3) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for a study of the feasibility of closing
state institutional facilities and a plan on eliminating beds in the
state institutional facility inventory. The office of financial
management shall contract with consultants with expertise related to
the subject matters included in this study. The office of financial
management and the consultants shall consult with the department of
social and health services, the department of corrections, stakeholder
groups that represent the people served in these institutions, labor
organizations that represent employees who work in these institutions
and other persons or entities with expertise in the areas being
studied.
(a) For the purposes of this study, "state institutional
facilities" means facilities operated by the department of corrections
to house persons convicted of a criminal offense, Green Hill school and
Maple Lane school operated by the department of social and health
services juvenile rehabilitation administration, and residential
habilitation centers operated by the department of social and health
services.
(b) In conducting this study, the consultants shall consider the
following factors as appropriate:
(i) The availability of alternate facilities including alternatives
and opportunities for consolidation with other facilities, impacts on
those alternate facilities, and any related capital costs;
(ii) The cost of operating the facility, including the cost of
providing services and the cost of maintaining or improving the
physical plant of the facility;
(iii) The geographic factors associated with the facility,
including the impact of the facility on the local economy and the
economic impact of its closure, and alternative uses for a facility
recommended for closure;
(iv) The costs associated with closing the facility, including the
continuing costs following the closure of the facility;
(v) Number and type of staff and the impact on the facility staff
including other employment opportunities if the facility is closed;
(vi) The savings that will accrue to the state from closure or
consolidation of a facility and the impact any closure would have on
funding the associated services; and
(vii) For the residential habilitation centers, the impact on
clients in the facility being recommended for closure and their
families, including ability to get alternate services and impact on
being moved to another facility.
(c) The office of financial management shall submit a final report
to the governor and the ways and means committees of the house of
representatives and senate by November 1, 2009. The report shall
provide a recommendation and a plan to eliminate 1,580 beds in the
department of corrections facilities, 235 beds from juvenile
rehabilitation facilities, and 250 funded beds in the residential
habilitation centers through closure or consolidation of facilities.
The report shall include an assessment of each facility studied, where
and how the services should be provided, and any costs or savings
associated with each recommendation. In considering the
recommendations of the report, the governor and the legislature shall
not consider closure of any state institutional facility unless the
report recommended the facility for closure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,473,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,025,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,716,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,741,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,776,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,504,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $148,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5303 (transferring
members of retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $66,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided for the department of
retirement systems to make revisions to various administrative
processes as necessary to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5688 (registered domestic partners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $12,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5542 or House Bill
No. 1678 (minimum disability benefits). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $45,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1445 (Washington state patrol retirement
system domestic partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $45,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
House Bill No. 1616 (law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2 domestic partners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) $56,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1548 (military service credit purchases). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $35,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1953 (department of fish and wildlife enforcement
officers' past service credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,412,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,505,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,904,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,109,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5368 (annual property revaluation). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $5,453,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,242,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of revenue enhancement
strategies. The strategies must include increased out-of-state
auditing and compliance, the purchase of third party data sources for
enhanced audit selection, and increased traditional auditing and
compliance efforts.
(3) $3,127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,737,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6173
(sales tax compliance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1597
(tax administration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,581,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,471,000 of the state investment board expense account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development of a risk management
information system, with the intent that further expenditures for this
project be made only by appropriation.
(2) The state investment board shall include funding for any future
salary increases authorized under RCW 43.33A.100 in the agency's budget
request submitted in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW in advance of
granting related salary increases. The biennial salary survey required
under RCW 43.33A.100 shall also be provided to the office of financial
management and to the fiscal committees of the legislature as part of
the state investment board's biennial budget submittal, and shall
include the total amount of compensation increases proposed, as well as
recommended salary ranges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,364,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,368,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,732,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000
City and Town Research Services -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,515,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $811,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,738,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,044,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,408,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $28,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $28,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
purposes of section 8 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5854 (built environment pollution). If section 8 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,104,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,104,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,824,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,733,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purposes of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1701 (high-speed internet), including
expenditure for deposit to the community technology opportunity
account. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) The department shall implement some or all of the following
strategies to achieve savings on information technology expenditures
through: (a) Holistic virtualization strategies; (b) wide-area network
optimization strategies; (c) replacement of traditional telephone
communications systems with alternatives; and (d) migration of external
voice mail systems to internal voice mail systems coordinated by the
department. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature semiannually on
progress made towards the implementation of savings strategies and the
savings realized to date. No later than June 30, 2011, the department
shall submit a final report on its findings and savings realized to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,943,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,978,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,921,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $410,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5480 (discount health plans). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $598,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5195 (life settlements model act). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $551,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5346 (health care administration simplification). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,123,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the commission
is authorized to increase licensing fees during the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium as necessary to support the appropriation in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,817,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,506,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,306,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to open five new state
stores.
(2) $40,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liquor control board to open ten new contract
stores.
(3) $3,059,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to increase state and
local revenues from new retail strategies including opening nine state
stores on Sunday, opening state liquor stores on seven holidays,
opening six mall locations during the holiday season, and increasing
lottery sales.
(4) $173,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the Engrossed House Bill No. 2040 (beer and wine
regulation commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) If Senate Bill No. 6065 is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
liquor revolving account appropriation in this section shall be
increased by $728,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,306,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,194,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,536,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,244,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,290,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,101,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,598,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,194,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,263,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Military Department Active State Service Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $856,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,194,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $91,263,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2009-2011 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) $144,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $856,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery costs
associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2009-2011 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $85,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(c) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the military department to
contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to operate a
statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the entire amount
for 2-1-1 and shall use any of the funds for administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,128,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,130,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $30,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1329 (child care center
bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,418,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,653,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,465,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $44,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $22,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1090 (human
remains). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,674,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,549,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,223,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,127,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,995,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,122,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP), the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county, during the
2009-2011 biennium. The amount of funding assigned to the pilot
projects from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost
assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program,
actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled in
the pilot project, times the number of clients enrolled in the pilot
project. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department may:
(a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set forth in
RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for individuals
enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.
(5) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2010, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2010 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management.
(6) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,241,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,248,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $496,509,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $828,000
Home Security Fund Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,389,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,140,094,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for intensive family preservation
services as defined in RCW 74.14C.010 and for evidence-based services
that prevent out-of-home placement and reduce length of stay in the
child welfare system.
(2) $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-
affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secure crisis residential
centers. Within appropriated amounts, the department shall collaborate
with providers to maintain no less than forty-five beds that are
geographically representative of the state. The department shall
examine current secure crisis residential staffing requirements,
flexible payment options, center specific waivers, and other
appropriate methods to accomplish this outcome.
(5) A maximum of $76,831,000 of the general fund--state
appropriations and $56,901,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriations for the 2009-11 biennium shall be expended for
behavioral rehabilitative services and these amounts are provided
solely for this purpose. The department shall work with behavioral
rehabilitative service providers to decrease the length of stay through
improved emotional, behavioral, or medical outcomes for children in
behavioral rehabilitative services in order to achieve the appropriated
levels.
(a) Contracted providers shall act in good faith and accept the
hardest to place children, to the greatest extent possible, in order to
improve their emotional, behavioral, or medical conditions.
(b) The department and the contracted provider shall mutually agree
and establish an exit date for when the child is to exit the behavioral
rehabilitative service provider. The department and the contracted
provider should mutually agree, to the greatest extent possible, on a
viable placement for the child to go to once the child's treatment
process has been completed. The child shall exit only when the
emotional, behavioral, or medical condition has improved or if the
provider has not shown progress toward the outcomes specified in the
signed contract at the time of exit. This subsection (b) does not
prevent or eliminate the department's responsibility for removing the
child from the provider if the child's emotional, behavioral, or
medical condition worsens or is threatened.
(c) The department is encouraged to use performance-based contracts
with incentives directly tied to outcomes described in this section.
The contracts should incentivize contracted providers to accept the
hardest to place children and incentivize improvement in children's
emotional, mental, and medical well-being within the established exit
date. The department is further encouraged to increase the use of
behavioral rehabilitative service group homes, wrap around services to
facilitate and support placement of youth with relatives, and other
means to control expenditures.
(d) The total foster care per capita amount shall not increase more
than four percent in the 2009-11 biennium and shall not include
behavioral rehabilitative service.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $32,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 465, Laws of 2007
(child welfare).
(9) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for continuum of care services.
$100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners and $25,000 of
this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2010.
$100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners and $25,000 of
this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2011.
(10) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $368,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to contract with medical professionals for
comprehensive safety assessments of high-risk families. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. $800,000 of this amount is for comprehensive safety
assessments for families receiving in-home child protective services or
family voluntary services. $800,000 of this amount is for
comprehensive safety assessments of families with an infant age birth
to fifteen days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance
exposed and the department received an intake referral related to the
infant due to the substance exposure.
(11) $7,970,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $7,711,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $5,177,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for court-ordered supervised visits
between parents and dependent children and for sibling visits. The
department shall work collaboratively with the juvenile dependency
courts to stay within appropriations without impeding reunification
outcomes between parents and dependent children. The department shall
report to the legislative fiscal committees quarterly, the number of
children in foster care who receive supervised visits, their frequency,
length of time of each visit, and whether reunification is attained.
(12) $1,789,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for street youth program services.
(13) $1,584,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,584,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,586,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to recruit foster
parents. The recruitment efforts shall include collaborating with
community-based organizations and current or former foster parents to
recruit foster parents.
(14) $725,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for children's administration to
contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster
care educational outreach. Funding is provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems. Funding shall be prioritized to regions
with high numbers of foster care youth and/or regions where backlogs of
youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist.
(15) $1,300,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for HOPE beds.
(16) $5,300,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the crisis residential centers.
(17) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the children's administration administrative
expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that these reductions
shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall contract for a pilot project with family and community
networks in Whatcom county and up to four additional counties to
provide services. The pilot project shall be designed to provide a
continuum of services that reduce out-of-home placements and the
lengths of stay for children in out-of-home placement. The department
and the community networks shall collaboratively select the additional
counties for the pilot project and shall collaboratively design the
contract. Within the framework of the pilot project, the contract
shall seek to maximize federal funds. The pilot project in each county
shall include the creation of advisory and management teams which
include members from neighborhood-based family advisory committees,
residents, parents, youth, providers, and local and regional department
staff. The Whatcom county team shall facilitate the development of
outcome-based protocols and policies for the pilot project and develop
a structure to oversee, monitor, and evaluate the results of the pilot
projects. The department shall report the costs and savings of the
pilot project to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1 of each year.
(19) $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to contract
with a nonprofit entity for a reunification pilot project in Whatcom
and Skagit counties. The contract for the reunification pilot project
shall include a rate of $46.16 per hour for evidence-based
interventions, in combination with supervised visits, to provide 3,564
hours of services to reduce the length of stay for children in the
child welfare system. The contract shall also include evidence-based
intensive parenting skills building services and family support case
management services for 38 families participating in the reunification
pilot project. The contract shall include the flexibility for the
nonprofit entity to subcontract with trained providers.
(20) $303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $257,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1961
(increasing adoptions act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to contract
with an agency that is working in partnership with, and has been
evaluated by, the University of Washington school of social work to
implement promising practice constellation hub models of foster care
support.
(22) The legislature intends for the department to reduce the time
a child remains in the child welfare system. The department shall
establish a measurable goal and report progress toward meeting that
goal to the legislature by January 15 of each fiscal year of the 2009-11 fiscal biennium. To the extent that actual caseloads exceed those
assumed in this section, it is the intent of the legislature to address
those issues in a manner similar to all other caseload programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,870,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,081,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,565,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,896,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,113,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7)(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant, rather
than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds,
community juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency
disposition alternative funds, the special sex offender disposition
alternative funds, the mental health disposition alternative,
sentencing disposition alternative, and evidence-based program
expansion grants to juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth
adjudicated in the juvenile justice system. Evidence-based programs,
based on the criteria established by the Washington state institute for
public policy, and disposition alternatives will be funding priorities.
Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by juvenile
rehabilitation administration, based on criteria established in
consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the
juvenile courts.
By September 1, 2009, a committee with four members, in
consultation with Washington state institute for public policy, shall
develop a funding formula that takes into account the juvenile courts
average daily population of program eligible youth in conjunction with
the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or
disposition alternative. The committee shall have one representative
from the juvenile rehabilitation administration, one representative
from the office of financial management, one representative from the
office of the administrator of the courts, and one representative from
the juvenile courts. Decision making will be by majority rule.
By September 1, 2010, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall provide a report to the office of financial management and
the legislature on the administration of the block grant authorized in
this subsection. The report shall include the criteria used for
allocating the funding as a block grant and the participation targets
and actual participation in the programs subject to the block grant.
(b) By December 1, 2009, the committee established in (a) of this
subsection, in consultation with Washington state institute for public
policy, shall propose to the office of financial management and the
legislature changes in the process of funding and managing, including
accountability and information collection and dissemination, grants to
juvenile courts for serving youth adjudicated in the juvenile court
system use in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011. The proposal shall
include, but is not limited to: A process of making a block grant of
funds consistent with (a) of this subsection; a program of data
collection and measurement criteria for receiving the funds which will
include targets of the number of youth served in identified evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives in which the juvenile
courts and office of the administrator of the courts will have
responsibility for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data; and necessary changes to the
Washington administrative code.
(c) Within the funds provided for criminal justice analysis in
section 610(4) of this act, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall conduct an analysis of the costs per participant of
evidence-based programs by the juvenile courts and by December 1, 2009,
shall report the results of this analysis to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the juvenile courts, office of the
administrator of the courts, the office of financial management, and
the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(8) $3,700,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants
to community-based organizations to provide at-risk youth intervention
services, including but not limited to, case management, employment
services, educational services, and street outreach intervention
programs. Projects funded should focus on preventing, intervening, and
suppressing behavioral problems and violence while linking at-risk
youth to pro-social activities. The department may not expend more
than $1,850,000 per fiscal year. The costs of administration must not
exceed four percent of appropriated funding for each grant recipient.
Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration on the number and types of youth served, the services
provided, and the impact of those services upon the youth and the
community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,677,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,619,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $463,180,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,868,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,041,344,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $113,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $113,689,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$11,606,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2009 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $11,606,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for implementation of high-intensity
program for active community treatment (PACT) teams, and other proven
program approaches that the department concurs will enable the regional
support network to achieve significant reductions in the number of beds
the regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 617 per day during the
first quarter of fiscal year 2010, and 587 per day thereafter. Beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. The department shall separately charge
regional support networks for persons served in the PALS program.
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(f) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(g) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(h) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(i) The department shall return to the Spokane regional support
network fifty percent of the amounts assessed against the network
during the last six months of calendar year 2009 for state hospital
utilization in excess of its contractual limit. The regional support
network shall use these funds for operation during its initial months
of a new sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility that will enable
the network to reduce its use of the state hospital, and for diversion
and community support services for persons with dementia who would
likely otherwise require care at the state hospital.
(j) The department is directed to identify and implement program
efficiencies and benefit changes in its delivery of medicaid managed-care services that are sufficient to operate within the state and
federal appropriations in this section. Such actions may include but
are not limited to methods such as adjusting the care access standards;
improved utilization management of ongoing, recurring, and high-intensity services; and increased uniformity in provider payment rates.
The department shall ensure that the capitation rate adjustments
necessary to accomplish these efficiencies and changes are distributed
uniformly and equitably across all regional support networks statewide.
The department is directed to report to the relevant legislative fiscal
and policy committees at least thirty days prior to implementing rate
adjustments reflecting these changes.
(k) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which
the public mental health managed care system will operate during the
five years beginning in fiscal year 2011, the department should seek to
estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and
effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental
health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of
where in the state they live. Actual prior period spending in a
regional administrative area shall not be a key determinant of future
payment rates. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature on its proposed new waiver and mental health managed care
rate-setting approach by October 1, 2009, and again at least sixty days
prior to implementation of new capitation rates.
(l) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(m) The legislature intends and expects that regional support
networks and contracted community mental health agencies shall make all
possible efforts to, at a minimum, maintain current compensation levels
of direct care staff. Such efforts shall include, but not be limited
to, identifying local funding that can preserve client services and
staff compensation, achieving administrative reductions at the regional
support network level, and engaging stakeholders on cost-savings ideas
that maintain client services and staff compensation. For purposes of
this section, "direct care staff" means persons employed by community
mental health agencies whose primary responsibility is providing direct
treatment and support to people with mental illness, or whose primary
responsibility is providing direct support to such staff in areas such
as client scheduling, client intake, client reception, client records-keeping, and facilities maintenance.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,679,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,017,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,300,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,870,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,866,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,819,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,142,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,773,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,511,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $1,511,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
children's evidence based mental health services. Funding is
sufficient to continue serving children at the same levels as fiscal
year 2009.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,123,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,155,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,608,000

(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall provide reports to the legislature and governor on May 31, 2010,
and January 31, 2011, concerning the waiting periods experienced for
competency evaluations and competency restoration treatment during the
nine month periods ending on March 31, 2010, and December 31, 2010,
respectively.
The reports shall state, by county, the average number of days over
the reporting period spent by the defendant between the signing of the
court order and distribution of report: (i) In jail; (ii) in the state
hospital; and (iii) waiting for the order and supporting documents to
be received by the department. By state hospital catchment, the report
shall also state these averages on a monthly basis. With respect to
competency evaluations, the report shall separate evaluations ordered
to occur in a jail, evaluations ordered to occur in the community,
evaluations ordered to occur in a state hospital, and evaluations
transferred to the state hospital which were originally ordered to
occur in another setting. The department shall state the percentage of
defendants that were found by the department to be competent following
each type of evaluation. The department shall also state how many
evaluations referrals contained a request for evaluation of insanity
and diminished capacity, and what proportion of defendants for whom
this evaluation was requested were found by the department to meet the
criteria for these defenses.
With respect to competency restoration, the report shall separate
restoration referrals by stage of competency restoration and state the
percentage of defendants found by the department to be competent at the
conclusion of each stage.
The report shall identify factors which have caused delays in the
completion of competency evaluations, and analyze a sample of cases in
which evaluation time exceeded the standard deviation. The report
shall provide recommendations as to what measures state or local
governments may take to improve the speed of competency evaluations,
and identify any statutory or regulatory barriers that obstruct the
evaluation process.
(b) The department is authorized and encouraged to continue its
contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
provide a longitudinal analysis of long-term mental health outcomes as
directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance
audit); to build upon the evaluation of the impacts of chapter 214,
Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders); and to assess program outcomes
and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health pilot projects
as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,050,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,549,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $851,610,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,533,209,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients. In doing so, the
department shall comply with all maintenance of effort requirements
contained in the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to develop
and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor
contract for employment and day services by April 1, 2011. The rates
paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made consistent. In
its description of activities the agency shall include activity
listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services, day
services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $5,593,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,002,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $14,701,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are at risk of institutionalization or who are aging out
of other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based
waiver program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate
need for increased services. First priority shall be given to children
who are at risk of institutionalization. The department shall ensure
that the average cost per day for all program services other than
start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the number
of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver
programs, the department will strive to limit new client placement
expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be
accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess funds,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(e)(i) $493,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,741,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community services for persons
with developmental disabilities who also have community protection
issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (A)
clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (B) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (C) clients participating in the community protection
program; and (D) mental health crisis diversion outplacements. The
department shall ensure that the average cost per day for all program
services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $349 per day in
fiscal year 2010 and $356 per day in fiscal year 2011. In order to
maximize the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness
of the waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds if the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated.
(ii) The department shall electronically report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal
year quarter, the number of persons served with these additional
community services, where they were residing, what kinds of services
they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for
all community services to support these clients.
(f) $302,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $1,592,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for health care benefits pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(g)(i) $682,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,651,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,678,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(ii) The federal portion of the amounts in this subsection (g) is
contingent upon federal approval of participation in contributions to
the trust and shall remain unallotted and placed in reserve status
until the office of financial management and the department of social
and health services receive federal approval.
(iii) Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
(g) shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(h) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department may expand the new freedom waiver program to accommodate new
waiver recipients throughout the state. As possible, and in compliance
with current state and federal laws, the department shall allow current
waiver recipients to transfer to the new freedom waiver.
(i) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1), the
department shall implement all necessary rules to facilitate the
transfer to a department home and community-based services (HCBS)
waiver of all eligible individuals who (i) currently receive services
under the existing state-only employment and day program or the
existing state-only residential program, and (ii) otherwise meet the
waiver eligibility requirements. The amounts appropriated are
sufficient to ensure that all individuals currently receiving services
under the state-only employment and day and state-only residential
programs who are not transferred to a department HCBS waiver will
continue to receive services.
(j) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for in-home
clients.
(k) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(l) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided by a family
member, pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state
payments for in-home care).
(m) Within the appropriations of this section, the department shall
reduce all seventeen payment levels of the seventeen-level payment
system from the fiscal year 2009 levels for boarding homes, boarding
homes contracted as assisted living, and adult family homes. Excluded
from the reductions are exceptional care rate add-ons. The long-term
care program may develop add-ons to pay exceptional care rates to adult
family homes and boarding homes with specialty contracts to provide
support for the following specifically eligible clients:
(i) Persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might otherwise
require nursing home or hospital care;
(ii) Persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementia who
might otherwise require nursing home care; and
(iii) Persons with co-occurring mental illness and long-term care
needs who are eligible for expanded community services and who might
otherwise require state and local psychiatric hospital care.
Within amounts appropriated, exceptional add-on rates for AIDS/HIV,
dementia specialty care, and expanded community services may be
standardized within each program.
(n) The amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a reduction
in funds available for employment and day services. In administering
this reduction the department shall negotiate with counties and their
vendors so that this reduction, to the greatest extent possible, is
achieved by reducing vendor rates and allowable contract administrative
charges (overhead) and not through reductions to direct client services
or direct service delivery or programs.
(o) Within the amounts allotted for employment and day services in
this section, the department shall prioritize the funding of employment
services for students graduating from high school during fiscal years
2010 and 2011. However, nothing in this subsection is intended to
displace services for other recipients of employment services.
(p) As part of the needs assessment instrument, the department may
collect data on family income for minor children with developmental
disabilities and all individuals who are receiving state-only funded
services. The department may ensure that this information is collected
as part of the client assessment process.
(q) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, waiver clients
must receive employment and day services as authorized by their waiver,
such as pathway to employment, while waiting for paid employment to be
developed. The department shall establish and maintain a consistent
proposed policy for minimum direct service hours for clients, minimum
hours of support, time frames for seeking paid employment, and services
provided under pathway to employment while paid employment is sought.
In order to maximize the number of clients served, the department may
serve additional nonwaiver clients with unspent funds for waiver
clients, provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not
exceed the amounts estimated.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,612,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,185,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,160,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,441,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,398,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(c) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.
(d) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,428,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,388,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,188,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this subsection reflect reductions targeted
specifically to state government administrative costs. These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,066,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,096,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this subsection are
available solely for the infant toddler early intervention program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,667,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $698,622,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,814,099,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,373,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,120,577,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $156.37 for
fiscal year 2010 and shall not exceed $158.74 for fiscal year 2011,
including the rate add-on described in subsection (12) of this section.
There will be no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in
fiscal years 2010 and 2011. The economic trends and conditions factor
or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter
74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either
fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic
trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial
appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the
component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46
RCW.
(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2010 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2011.
(3) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(4) Within the appropriations of this section, the department shall
reduce all seventeen payment levels of the seventeen-level payment
system from the fiscal year 2009 levels for boarding homes, boarding
homes contracted as assisted living, and adult family homes. Excluded
from the reductions are exceptional care rate add-ons. The long-term
care program may develop add-ons to pay exceptional care rates to adult
family homes and boarding homes with specialty contracts to provide
support for the following specifically eligible clients:
(a) Persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might otherwise
require nursing home or hospital care;
(b) Persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementia who might
otherwise require nursing home care; and
(c) Persons with co-occurring mental illness and long-term care
needs who are eligible for expanded community services and who might
otherwise require state and local psychiatric hospital care.
Within amounts appropriated, exceptional add-on rates for AIDS/HIV,
dementia specialty care, and expanded community services may be
standardized within each program.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients. In doing so, the
department shall comply with all maintenance of effort requirements
contained in the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(6) $536,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,830,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits pursuant to
a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(7)(a) $1,212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $2,934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, and $2,982,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(b) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $660,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $810,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for transfer from the department to the training
partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for infrastructure and
instructional costs associated with training of individual providers,
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the
exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers established
under RCW 74.39A.270.
(c) The federal portion of the amounts in this subsection is
contingent upon federal approval of participation in contributions to
the trust and shall remain unallotted and placed in reserve status
until the office of financial management and the department of social
and health services receive federal approval.
(d) Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may expand the new freedom waiver program to accommodate new waiver
recipients throughout the state. As possible, and in compliance with
current state and federal laws, the department shall allow current
waiver recipients to transfer to the new freedom waiver.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for in-home
clients.
(11) $3,955,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $10,190,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(12) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(13) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(14) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(15) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(16) The department shall contract for housing with service models,
such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service delivery and
responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by clustering hours
for clients that live in close proximity to each other.
(17) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided by a family
member, pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state
payments for in-home care).
(18) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,099,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,697,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No.
2194 (extraordinary medical placement for offenders). The department
shall work in partnership with the department of corrections to
identify services and find placements for offenders who are released
through the extraordinary medical placement program. The department
shall collaborate with the department of corrections to identify and
track cost savings to the department of corrections, including medical
cost savings and to identify and track expenditures incurred by the
aging and disability services program for community services and by the
medical assistance program for medical expenses. A joint report
regarding the identified savings and expenditures shall be provided to
the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2010. If this bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) Sufficient funding is provided in this section for the
department to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1935
(adult family homes). During the 2009-11 biennium, the initial
licensing fee for an adult family home shall be set at $900.00. During
the 2009-11 biennium, the annual licensing renewal fee shall be set at
$100.00.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,621,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,286,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,140,367,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,343,330,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $303,196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $309,755,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, $29,136,000 of the administrative contingency
account--state appropriation, and $778,606,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the
WorkFirst program. The department shall use moneys from the
administrative contingency account for WorkFirst job placement services
provided by the employment security department. Within the amounts
provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide
assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families. In addition, within the amounts
provided for WorkFirst the department shall:
(a) Establish a career services work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report electronically by October 1, 2009, to the
fiscal committees of the legislature containing a spending plan for the
WorkFirst program. The plan shall identify how spending levels in the
2009-2011 biennium will be adjusted to stay within available federal
grant levels and the appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity;
(e) Maintain the fiscal year 2009 grant standard for the temporary
assistance for needy families grant.
(2) The department and the office of financial management shall
electronically report quarterly the expenditures, maintenance of effort
allotments, expenditure amounts, and caseloads for the WorkFirst
program to the legislative fiscal committees.
(3) $84,856,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $95,173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for cash assistance and other
services to recipients in the general assistance--unemployable program.
Within these amounts:
(a) The department shall aggressively pursue opportunities to
transfer general assistance unemployable clients to general assistance
expedited coverage and to facilitate client applications for federal
supplemental security income when the client's incapacities indicate
that he or she would be likely to meet the federal disability criteria
for supplemental security income. The department shall initiate and
file the federal supplemental security income interim agreement as
quickly as possible in order to maximize the recovery of federal funds;
(b) The department shall review the general assistance caseload to
identify recipients that would benefit from assistance in becoming
naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal
supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high
priority for naturalization funding through the department;
(c) The department shall actively coordinate with local workforce
development councils to expedite access to worker retraining programs
for general assistance unemployable clients in those regions of the
state with the greatest number of such clients;
(d) By July 1, 2009, the department shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a
process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veteran's
services. This agreement must include outstationing department of
veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations
in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans'
services; and
(e) In addition to any earlier evaluation that may have been
conducted, the department shall intensively evaluate those clients who
have been receiving general assistance unemployable benefits for twelve
months or more as of July 1, 2009, or thereafter, if the available
medical and incapacity related evidence indicates that the client is
unlikely to meet the disability standard for federal supplemental
security income benefits. The evaluation shall identify services
necessary to eliminate or minimize barriers to employment, including
mental health treatment, substance abuse treatment and vocational
rehabilitation services. The department shall expedite referrals to
chemical dependency treatment, mental health and vocational
rehabilitation services for these clients.
(f) The appropriations in this subsection reflect a change in the
earned income disregard policy for general assistance unemployable
clients. It is the intent of the legislature that the department shall
adopt the temporary assistance for needy families earned income policy
for general assistance unemployable.
(4) The department shall report to the legislature on outcomes of
the reorganization of the office of refugee and immigrant assistance.
The report shall include information on efficiencies and outcomes
related to client services, training and technical assistance to
providers, and administrative oversight prior to the year of the
reorganization compared to the outcomes achieved following the
reorganization. In addition to self reporting the department shall
solicit comments relevant to this report from service providers and the
report shall include their responses. To increase transparency and
understanding of the office's funding practices, the report shall also
include information on the base budgets of funding sources for services
provided by the office of refugee and immigrant assistance. A
preliminary report shall be due to the legislature by December 1, 2009.
A final report shall be due June 1, 2010.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(6)(a) $3,550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for refugee employment services, of
which $2,650,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through
to statewide refugee assistance organizations for limited English
proficiency pathway services; and $3,550,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for refugee
employment services, of which $2,650,000 is provided solely for the
department to pass through to statewide refugee assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(b) The legislature intends that the appropriation in this
subsection for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium will maintain funding for
refugee programs at a level at least equal to expenditures on these
programs in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium.
(7) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the economic services administration's
administrative expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that
these reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,117,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,772,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,671,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,719,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,747,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $334,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible and general assistance-unemployable
patients.
(3) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,597,387,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,984,797,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,210,672,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,903,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,824,601,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(4) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,110,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation and
$1,105,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2011 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(7) $9,818,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $9,865,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2009-11 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2009, and by November 1,
2010, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program, (b) one half
of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005,
and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005
to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist
in the 2009-11 biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a
hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as
described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess
amounts to the state when requested. $6,570,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010, which is appropriated in
section 204(1) of this act, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, which is appropriated in section
204(1) of this act, are provided solely for state grants for the
participating hospitals. Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this
section for the remaining state grants for the participating hospitals.
(9) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(10) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(11) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is at least
equivalent to the benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(12) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $93,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to pursue a federal Medicaid waiver
pursuant to Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health
partnership plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) The department shall require managed health care systems that
have contracts with the department to serve medical assistance clients
to limit any reimbursements or payments the systems make to providers
not employed by or under contract with the systems to no more than the
medical assistance rates paid by the department to providers for
comparable services rendered to clients in the fee-for-service delivery
system.
(14) Appropriations in this section are sufficient for the
department to continue to fund family planning nurses in the community
services offices.
(15) The department, in coordination with stakeholders, will
conduct an analysis of potential savings in utilization of home
dialysis. The department shall present its findings to the appropriate
house of representatives and senate committees by December 2010.
(16) A maximum of $166,875,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $38,389,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation may be expended in the fiscal biennium for the general
assistance-unemployable medical program, and these amounts are provided
solely for this program. Of these amounts, $10,749,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $10,892,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for payments to
hospitals for providing outpatient services to low income patients who
are recipients of general assistance-unemployable. Pursuant to RCW
74.09.035, the department shall not expend for the general assistance
medical care services program any amounts in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection.
(17) If the department determines that it is feasible within the
amounts provided in subsection (16) of this section, and without the
loss of federal disproportionate share hospital funds, the department
shall contract with the carrier currently operating a managed care
pilot project for the provision of medical care services to general
assistance-unemployable clients. Mental health services shall be
included in the services provided through the managed care system. If
the department determines that it is feasible, effective October 1,
2009, in addition to serving clients in the pilot counties, the carrier
shall expand managed care services to clients residing in at least the
following counties: Spokane, Yakima, Chelan, Kitsap, and Cowlitz. If
the department determines that it is feasible, the carrier shall
complete implementation into the remaining counties. Total per person
costs to the state, including outpatient and inpatient services and any
additional costs due to stop loss agreements, shall not exceed the per
capita payments projected for the general assistance-unemployable
eligibility category, by fiscal year, in the February 2009 medical
assistance expenditures forecast. The department, in collaboration
with the carrier, shall seek to improve the transition rate of general
assistance clients to the federal supplemental security income program.
(18) The department shall evaluate the impact of the use of a
managed care delivery and financing system on state costs and outcomes
for general assistance medical clients. Outcomes measured shall
include state costs, utilization, changes in mental health status and
symptoms, and involvement in the criminal justice system.
(19) The department shall report to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature by June 1, 2010, on its progress toward
achieving a twenty percentage point increase in the generic
prescription drug utilization rate.
(20) State funds shall not be used by hospitals for advertising
purposes.
(21) The department shall seek a medicaid state plan amendment to
create a professional services supplemental payment program for
University of Washington medicine professional providers no later than
July 1, 2009. The department shall apply federal rules for identifying
the shortfall between current fee-for-service medicaid payments to
participating providers and the applicable federal upper payment limit.
Participating providers shall be solely responsible for providing the
local funds required to obtain federal matching funds. Any incremental
costs incurred by the department in the development, implementation,
and maintenance of this program will be the responsibility of the
participating providers. Participating providers will retain the full
amount of supplemental payments provided under this program, net of any
potential costs for any related audits or litigation brought against
the state. The department shall report to the governor and the
legislative fiscal committees on the prospects for expansion of the
program to other qualifying providers as soon as feasibility is
determined but no later than December 31, 2009. The report will
outline estimated impacts on the participating providers, the
procedures necessary to comply with federal guidelines, and the
administrative resource requirements necessary to implement the
program. The department will create a process for expansion of the
program to other qualifying providers as soon as it is determined
feasible by both the department and providers but no later than June
30, 2010.
(22) $9,350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $8,313,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $20,371,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.
(23) $506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $657,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1373 (children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) Pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(a)(25), the department shall
pursue insurance claims on behalf of medicaid children served through
its in-home medically intensive child program under WAC 388-551-3000.
The department shall report to the Legislature by December 31, 2009, on
the results of its efforts to recover such claims.
(25) The department may, on a case-by-case basis and in the best
interests of the child, set payment rates for medically intensive home
care services to promote access to home care as an alternative to
hospitalization. Expenditures related to these increased payments
shall not exceed the amount the department would otherwise pay for
hospitalization for the child receiving medically intensive home care
services.
(26) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $1,580,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to continue children's health coverage outreach and
education efforts under RCW 74.09.470. These efforts shall rely on
existing relationships and systems developed with local public health
agencies, health care providers, public schools, the women, infants,
and children program, the early childhood education and assistance
program, child care providers, newborn visiting nurses, and other
community-based organizations. The department shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available
to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under
the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(27) The department, in conjunction with the office of financial
management, shall reduce outpatient and inpatient hospital rates and
implement a prorated inpatient payment policy. In determining the
level of reductions needed, the department shall include in its
calculations services paid under fee-for-service, managed care, and
certified public expenditure payment methods; but reductions shall not
apply to payments for psychiatric inpatient services or payments to
critical access hospitals.
(28) The department will pursue a competitive procurement process
for antihemophilic products, emphasizing evidence-based medicine and
protection of patient access without significant disruption in
treatment.
(29) The department will pursue several strategies towards reducing
pharmacy expenditures including but not limited to increasing generic
prescription drug utilization by 20 percentage points and promoting
increased utilization of the existing mail-order pharmacy program.
(30) The department shall reduce reimbursement for over-the-counter
medications while maintaining reimbursement for those over-the-counter
medications that can replace more costly prescription medications.
(31) The department shall seek public-private partnerships and
federal funds that are or may become available to implement health
information technology projects under the federal American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009.
(32) The department shall target funding for maternity support
services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates
of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth
weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or
developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness,
unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African
American or Native American race.
(33) The department shall direct graduate medical education funds
to programs that focus on primary care training.
(34) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $53,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1845 (medical
support obligations).
(35) $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $583,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $864,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2194
(extraordinary medical placement for offenders). The department shall
work in partnership with the department of corrections to identify
services and find placements for offenders who are released through the
extraordinary medical placement program. The department shall
collaborate with the department of corrections to identify and track
cost savings to the department of corrections, including medical cost
savings, and to identify and track expenditures incurred by the aging
and disability services program for community services and by the
medical assistance program for medical expenses. A joint report
regarding the identified savings and expenditures shall be provided to
the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2010. If this bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(36) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section to provide
full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D
prescription drug copayment coverage in accordance with RCW 74.09.520.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,452,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,127,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,553,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,979,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The vocational rehabilitation program
shall coordinate closely with the economic services program to serve
general assistance unemployable clients who are referred for
eligibility determination and vocational rehabilitation services, and
shall make every effort, within the requirements of the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973, to serve these clients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,027,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,137,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,549,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,843,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,407,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,526,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,325,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(1) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to the
family policy council. The family policy council shall reevaluate
staffing levels and administrative costs to ensure to the extent
possible a maximum ratio of grant moneys provided and administrative
costs.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to the
council on children and families. The council on children and families
shall reevaluate staffing levels and administrative costs to ensure to
the extent possible a maximum ratio of grant moneys provided and
administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,431,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,472,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,494,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,397,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,295,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,138,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,302,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,261,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,525,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) In order to maximize the funding appropriated for the basic
health plan, the health care authority is directed to make
modifications that will reduce the total number of subsidized enrollees
to approximately 65,000 by January 1, 2010. In addition to the reduced
enrollment, other modifications may include changes in enrollee premium
obligations, changes in benefits, enrollee cost-sharing, and
termination of the enrollment of individuals concurrently enrolled in
a medical assistance program as provided in Substitute House Bill No.
2341.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5360 (community collaboratives). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
section shall lapse.
(6) The department shall seek public-private partnerships and
federal funds that are or may become available to implement health
information technology projects under the federal American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,802,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,814,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,299,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,453,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,453,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,926,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,146,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,176,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,974,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,874,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,922,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for 10 additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2010 and 10 additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2011.
(2) $1,191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to continue to develop, maintain, and
operate the jail booking and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide
automated victim information and notification system (SAVIN).
(3) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall:
(a) Enter into performance-based agreements with units of local
government to ensure that registered offender address and residency are
verified:
(i) For level I offenders, every twelve months;
(ii) For level II offenders, every six months; and
(iii) For level III offenders, every three months.
For the purposes of this subsection, unclassified offenders and
kidnapping offenders shall be considered at risk level I unless in the
opinion of the local jurisdiction a higher classification is in the
interest of public safety.
(b) Collect performance data from all participating jurisdictions
sufficient to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of the address
and residency verification program; and
(c) Submit a report on the effectiveness of the address and
residency verification program to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 31,
each year.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up
to three percent of the amount provided in this subsection for the cost
of administration. Any funds not disbursed for address and residency
verification or retained for administration may be allocated to local
prosecutors for the prosecution costs associated with failing-to-register offenses.
(4) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2078 (persons with developmental disabilities
in correctional facilities or jails). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,224,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,237,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,162,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,979,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,764,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,281,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,537,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,693,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,650,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees related to factory assembled structures, contractor
registration, electricians, plumbers, asbestos removal, boilers,
elevators, and manufactured home installers. These increases are
necessary to support expenditures authorized in this section,
consistent with chapters 43.22, 18.27, 19.28, and 18.106 RCW, RCW
49.26.130, and chapters 70.79, 70.87, and 43.22A RCW.
(2) $424,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$76,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of a community agricultural worker safety
grant at the department of agriculture. The department shall enter
into an interagency agreement with the department of agriculture to
implement the grant.
(3) $4,850,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to continue the program of safety and health as
authorized by RCW 49.17.210 to be administered under rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, provided that projects funded involve
workplaces insured by the medical aid fund, and that priority is given
to projects fostering accident prevention through cooperation between
employers and employees or their representatives.
(4) $150,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to evaluate and recommend improvements to the
rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, including analyzing how risks are
pooled, the effect of including worker premium contributions in
adjustment calculations, incentives for accident and illness
prevention, return-to-work practices, and other sound risk-management
strategies that are consistent with recognized insurance principles.
(5) The department shall continue to conduct utilization reviews of
physical and occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit. The
department shall continue to report performance measures and targets
for these reviews on the agency web site. The reports are due
September 30th for the prior fiscal year and must include the amount
spent and the estimated savings per fiscal year.
(6) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department of labor and industries'
administrative expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that
these reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing administrative costs only.
(7) $500,000 of the accident account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to oversee and assist the department's
implementation of improvements to the rating plan under chapter 51.18
RCW, in collaboration with the department and with the department's
work group of retrospective rating and workers' compensation
stakeholders. The independent experts will validate the impact of
recommended changes on retrospective rating participants and
nonparticipants, confirm implementation technology changes, and provide
other implementation assistance as determined by the department.
(8) $194,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5346 (health care
administrative procedures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $131,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$128,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5613 (stop work orders).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $68,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$68,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5688 (registered domestic
partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $320,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$147,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5873 (apprenticeship
utilization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $183,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5895 (residential real property). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $394,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$394,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6035 (retrospective rating
plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $269,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $183,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1393 (residential
construction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, $606,000 of the accident account--state appropriation, and
$600,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1555 (underground
economy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $574,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$579,000 of the medical account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1402 (industrial
insurance appeals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,917,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,822,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,885,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,943,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,842,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,491,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $648,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,069,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,878,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall collaborate with the department of social
and health services to identify and assist eligible general assistance
unemployable clients to access the federal department of veterans
affairs benefits.
(b) $648,000 of the veterans innovations program account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue support
for returning combat veterans through the veterans innovation program,
including emergency financial assistance through the defenders' fund
and long-term financial assistance through the competitive grant
program.
(c) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,638,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,845,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,791,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,734,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,008,000
The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,229,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,221,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,879,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,169,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,871,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,846,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,218,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $603,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,531,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,723,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,817,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,519,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,117,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,525,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,884,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,974,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and RCW 43.70.250, the department is
authorized to establish fees by the amount necessary to fully support
the cost of activities related to the administration of long-term care
worker certification. The department is further authorized to increase
fees by the amount necessary to implement the regulatory requirements
of the following bills: House Bill No. 1414 (health care assistants),
House Bill No. 1740 (dental residency licenses), and House Bill No.
1899 (retired active physician licenses).
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
of health shall continue operations of the pesticide incident report
and tracking review panel.
(4) $764,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the medical quality assurance commission to
maintain disciplinary staff and associated costs sufficient to reduce
the backlog of disciplinary cases and to continue to manage the
disciplinary caseload of the commission.
(5) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and
regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There
shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program. The department shall convene the
midwifery advisory committee on a quarterly basis to address issues
related to licensed midwifery.
(6) Funding for the human papillomavirus vaccine shall not be
included in the department's universal vaccine purchase program in
fiscal year 2010. Remaining funds for the universal vaccine purchase
program shall be used to continue the purchase of all other vaccines
included in the program until May 1, 2010, or until state funds are
exhausted, at which point state funding for the universal vaccine
purchase program shall be discontinued. Funds from section 317 of the
federal public health services act direct assistance shall not be used
in lieu of state funds.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department, in collaboration with
the department of social and health services, shall maximize the use of
existing federal funds, including section 317 of the federal public
health services act direct assistance as well as federal funds that may
become available under the American recovery and reinvestment act, in
order to continue to provide immunizations for low-income, nonmedicaid
eligible children up to three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level in state-sponsored health programs.
(8) The department shall eliminate outreach activities for the
health care directives registry and use the remaining amounts to
maintain the contract for the registry and minimal staffing necessary
to administer the basic entry functions for the registry.
(9) Funding in this section reflects a temporary reduction of
resources for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium for the state board of health
to conduct health impact reviews.
(10) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 43.70.125, the department is
authorized to adopt rules to establish a fee schedule to apply to
applicants for initial certification surveys of health care facilities
for purposes of receiving federal health care program reimbursement.
The fees shall only apply when the department has determined that
federal funding is not sufficient to compensate the department for the
cost of conducting initial certification surveys. The fees for initial
certification surveys may be established as follows: Up to $1,815 for
ambulatory surgery centers, up to $2,015 for critical access hospitals,
up to $980 for end stage renal disease facilities, up to $2,285 for
home health agencies, up to $2,285 for hospice agencies, up to $2,285
for hospitals, up to $520 for rehabilitation facilities, up to $690 for
rural health clinics, and up to $7,000 for transplant hospitals.
(11) Funding for family planning grants for fiscal year 2011 is
reduced in the expectation that federal funding shall become available
to expand coverage of services for individuals through programs at the
department of social and health services. In the event that such
funding is not provided, the legislature intends to continue funding
through a supplemental appropriation at fiscal year 2010 levels.
(12) $16,000,000 of the tobacco prevention and control account--state appropriation is provided solely for local health jurisdictions
to conduct core public health functions as defined in RCW 43.70.514.
(13) $100,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1414
(health care assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $42,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1740
(dentistry license issuance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(15) $23,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1899
(retired active physician licenses). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(16) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $67,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1510 (birth
certificates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(17) $31,000 of the health professions account is provided for the
implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5850 (human
trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $282,000 of the health professions account is provided for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5752 (dentists cost
recovery). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $106,000 of the health professions account is provided for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5601 (speech language
assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) Sufficient funds are provided in this section to continue the
health care WorkForce survey pursuant to RCW 43.70.695.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,622,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,318,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,940,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the support of a statewide
council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members
representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs,
current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of
city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will
investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a
history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their
mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training
needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $459,575,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,070,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,131,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,536,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,283,272,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2009-11 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(f) The appropriations in this subsection are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of the following bills: Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6183 (illegal alien offenders), Engrossed House Bill
No. 2194 (extraordinary medical placement), Senate Bill No. 6167
(crimes against property), Senate Bill No. 5525 (state
institutions/release), chapter 147, Laws of 2009 (Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5987) (corrections department personnel), and Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6160 (criminal justice sentencing).
(g) A political subdivision which is applying for funding to
mitigate one-time impacts associated with construction or expansion of
a correctional institution, consistent with WAC 137-12A-030, may apply
for the mitigation funds in the fiscal biennium in which the impacts
occur or in the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
(h) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the department,
jointly with the department of social and health services, shall
identify the number of offenders released through the extraordinary
medical placement program, the cost savings to the department of
corrections, including estimated medical cost savings, and the costs
for medical services in the community incurred by the department of
social and health services. The department and the department of
social and health services shall jointly report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature by November 30, 2010.
(i) $11,863,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $11,864,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,336,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely for in-prison evidence-based programs
and for the reception diagnostic center program as part of the offender
re-entry initiative.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,122,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,982,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,854,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $2,083,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,083,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5525
(state institutions/release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(c) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely as a matching amount of state funds for a
federal second chance act grant and is contingent upon receipt of
$750,000 of federal funding under the second chance act.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5288 (supervision of offenders).
(e) $2,791,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for evidence-based community
programs and for community justice centers as part of the offender re-entry initiative.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,565,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,139,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $132,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,455,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,544,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,125,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,239,000

The amounts appropriated in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: Sufficient amounts are
appropriated in this section to support contracts for services that
provide employment support and help with life activities for deaf and
blind individuals in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $978,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the sentencing
guidelines commission, in partnership with the courts, shall develop a
plan to implement an evidence-based system of community custody for
adult felons that will include the consistent use of evidence-based
risk and needs assessment tools, programs, supervision modalities, and
monitoring of program integrity. The plan for the evidence-based
system of community custody shall include provisions for identifying
cost-effective rehabilitative programs; identifying offenders for whom
such programs would be cost-effective; monitoring the system for cost-effectiveness; and reporting annually to the legislature. In
developing the plan, the sentencing guidelines shall consult with: The
Washington state institute for public policy; the legislature; the
department of corrections; local governments; prosecutors; defense
attorneys; victim advocate groups; law enforcement; the Washington
federation of state employees; and other interested entities. The
sentencing guidelines commission shall report its recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), during the 2009-11
biennium, the reports required by RCW 9.94A.480(2) and 9.94A.850(2) (d)
and (h) shall be prepared within the available funds and may be delayed
or suspended at the discretion of the commission.
(b) The commission shall submit the analysis described in section
15 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5288 no later than December
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,054,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,561,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,825,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,904,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
Employment Service Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,195,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $731,885,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $55,029,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions and department services to employers and job seekers.
(2) $32,067,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to fund the replacement of the unemployment
insurance tax information system (TAXIS) for the employment security
department. This section is subject to section 902 of this act.
(3) $110,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Senate Bill No. 5804 (leaving part time work voluntarily). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $1,263,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Senate Bill No. 5963 (unemployment insurance). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) $159,000 of the unemployment compensation account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1555 (underground economy) from funds made available to the state
by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
(6) $293,000 of the administrative contingency--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 2227 (evergreen jobs act). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $7,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No.
5809 (WorkForce employment and training). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $864,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,166,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,190,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,452,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,668,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,679,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,965,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,554,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $706,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,670,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,727,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,730,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,433,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,298,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,413,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,930,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,843,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,688,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,783,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,699,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,940,000
Emissions Reduction Assistance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $240,000 of the woodstove education and enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for citizen outreach efforts to
improve understanding of burn curtailments, the proper use of wood
heating devices, and public awareness of the adverse health effects of
woodsmoke pollution.
(3) $3,000,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for contracted toxic-site cleanup actions at sites
where multiple potentially liable parties agree to provide funding.
(4) $3,600,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the standby emergency rescue tug stationed at Neah
Bay.
(5) $811,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for oversight of toxic cleanup at facilities that
treat, store, and dispose of hazardous wastes.
(6) $1,456,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for toxic cleanup at sites where willing parties
negotiate prepayment agreements with the department and provide
necessary funding.
(7) $558,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation and
$3,000,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation are
provided solely for grants and technical assistance to Puget Sound-area
local governments engaged in updating shoreline master programs.
(8) $950,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for measuring water and habitat
quality to determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery,
beginning in fiscal year 2011.
(9) RCW 70.105.280 authorizes the department to assess reasonable
service charges against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate,
or dispose of dangerous or extremely hazardous waste that involves both
a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component.
Service charges may not exceed the costs to the department in carrying
out the duties in RCW 70.105.280. The current service charges do not
meet the costs of the department to carry out its duties. Pursuant to
RCW 43.135.055 and 70.105.280, the department is authorized to increase
the service charges no greater than 18 percent for fiscal year 2010 and
no greater than 15 percent for fiscal year 2011. Such service charges
shall include all costs of public participation grants awarded to
qualified entities by the department pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5) for
facilities at which such grants are recognized as a component of a
community relations or public participation plan authorized or required
as an element of a consent order, federal facility agreement or agreed
order entered into or issued by the department pursuant to any federal
or state law governing investigation and remediation of releases of
hazardous substances. Public participation grants funded by such
service charges shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other
grants made pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5). Costs for the public
participation grants shall be billed individually to the mixed waste
facility associated with the grant.
(10) The department is authorized to increase the following fees in
the 2009-2011 biennium as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Environmental lab accreditation, dam safety and inspection, biosolids
permitting, air emissions new source review, and manufacturer
registration and renewal.
(11) $813,000 of the air pollution control account--state
appropriation and $49,000 of the emissions reduction account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5735 (reducing greenhouse gas
emissions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $63,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(13) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for watershed planning
implementation grants to continue ongoing efforts to develop and
implement water agreements in the Nooksack Basin and the Bertrand
watershed. These amounts are intended to support project
administration; monitoring; negotiations in the Nooksack watershed
between tribes, the department, and affected water users; continued
implementation of a flow augmentation project; plan implementation in
the Fishtrap watershed; and the development of a water bank.
(15) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to provide watershed planning
implementation grants for WRIA 32 to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1580 (pilot local water management program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting the
trust water rights program and processing trust water right transfer
applications that improve instream flow.
(17)(a) The department shall convene a stock water working group
that includes: Legislators, four members representing agricultural
interests, three members representing environmental interests, the
attorney general or designee, the director of the department of ecology
or designee, the director of the department of agriculture or designee,
and affected federally recognized tribes shall be invited to send
participants.
(b) The group shall review issues surrounding the use of permit-exempt wells for stock-watering purposes and may develop
recommendations for legislative action.
(c) The working group shall meet periodically and report its
activities and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2009.
(18) $22,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5282 (bisphenol A use). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) $73,000 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1413 (water discharge fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) The department shall continue to work with the Columbia Snake
River irrigators' association to determine how seasonal water operation
and maintenance conservation can be utilized. In implementing this
proviso, the department shall also consult with the Columbia River
policy advisory group as appropriate.
(21) The department shall track any changes in costs, wages, and
benefits that would have resulted if House Bill No. 1716 (public
contract living wages), as introduced in the 2009 regular session of
the legislature, were enacted and made applicable to contracts and
related subcontracts entered into, renewed, or extended during the
2009-11 biennium. The department shall submit a report to the house of
representatives commerce and labor committee and the senate labor,
commerce, and consumer protection committee by December 1, 2011. The
report shall include data on any aggregate changes in wages and
benefits that would have resulted during the 2009-11 biennium.
(22) Within amounts appropriated in this section the department
shall develop recommendations by December 1, 2009, for a convenient and
effective mercury-containing light recycling program for residents,
small businesses, and small school districts throughout the state. The
department shall consider options including but not limited to, a
producer-funded program, a recycler-supported or recycle fee program,
a consumer fee at the time of purchase, general fund appropriations, or
a currently existing dedicated account. The department shall involve
and consult with stakeholders including persons who represent
retailers, waste haulers, recyclers, mercury-containing light
manufacturers or wholesalers, cities, counties, environmental
organizations and other interested parties. The department shall
report its findings and recommendations for a recycling program for
mercury-containing lights to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.
(23) During the 2009-11 biennium, the department shall implement
its cost reimbursement authority for processing water right
applications using a competitive bidding process. For each cost
reimbursement application, the department shall obtain cost proposals
and other necessary information from at least three prequalified costs
reimbursement consultants and shall select the lowest responsive
bidder.
(24) $140,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state appropriation is provided solely for grants to cities, counties,
tribes, special purpose districts, and state agencies for capital and
operational expenses used to manage and study excessive saltwater algae
with an emphasis on the periodic accumulation of sea lettuce on Puget
Sound beaches.
(25) By December 1, 2009, the department in consultation with local
governments shall conduct a remedial action grant financing
alternatives report. The report shall address options for financing the
remedial action grants identified in the department's report, entitled
"House Bill 1761, Model Toxics Control Accounts Ten-Year Financing
Plan" and shall include but not be limited to the following: (a)
Capitalizing cleanup costs using debt insurance; (b) capitalizing
cleanup costs using prefunded cost-cap insurance; (c) other contractual
instruments with local governments; and (d) an assessment of overall
economic benefits of the remedial action grants funded using the
instruments identified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,541,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,944,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,902,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,558,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,842,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Recreation Resources Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,802,000
NOVA Program Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,278,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(2) $1,500,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2109 (state parks and recreation funding). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) Proceeds received from voluntary donations given by motor
vehicle registration applicants shall be used solely for the operation
and maintenance of state parks.
(4) The commission shall actively pursue transferring ownership of
state parks to local governments, tribes, or other entities that have
expressed an interest in operating the park. The commission shall
provide biannual updates of this effort to the office of financial
management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.
The first report shall be submitted no later than December 1, 2009.
(5) With the passage of Substitute House Bill No. 2339 (state parks
system donation), the legislature finds that it has provided sufficient
funds to ensure that all state parks remain open during the 2009-11
biennium. The commission shall not close state parks unless the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, or revenue collections are
insufficient to fund the ongoing operation of state parks. By January
10, 2010, the commission shall provide a report to the legislature on
their budget and resources related to operating parks for the remainder
of the biennium.
(6) The commission shall work with the department of general
administration to evaluate the commission's existing leases with the
intention of increasing net revenue to state parks. The commission
shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees no later than September 30, 2009, a list of leases
the commission proposes be managed by the department of general
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,511,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,558,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,431,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,805,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,934,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $244,000 of the general fund-- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2157 (salmon recovery). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) The recreation and conservation office, under the direction of
the salmon recovery funding board, shall assess watershed and regional-scale capacity issues relating to the support and implementation of
salmon recovery. The assessment shall examine priority setting and
incentives to further promote coordination to ensure that effective and
efficient mechanisms for delivery of salmon recovery funding board
funds are being utilized. The salmon recovery funding board shall
distribute its operational funding to the appropriate entities based on
this assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,074,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,707,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,234,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,939,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,330,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,490,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,757,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,877,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $848,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $844,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,744,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,381,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,928,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $884,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,194,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $422,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to implement a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2011-2013 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2011.
(5) $66,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1972 (outdoor
recreation info). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $1,232,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1778 (fish
and wildlife). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(9) The department of fish and wildlife shall dispose of all fixed
wing aircraft it currently owns. The proceeds from the aircraft shall
be deposited into the state wildlife account. Disposal of the aircraft
must occur no later than June 30, 2010.
(10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for an electron project fish passage study
consistent with the recommendations and protocols contained in the 2008
electron project downstream fish passage final report.
(11) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) If sufficient new revenues are not identified to continue
hatchery operations, within the constraints of legally binding tribal
agreements, the department shall dispose of, by removal, sale, lease,
reversion, or transfer of ownership, the following hatcheries:
McKernan, Colville, Omak, Bellingham, Arlington, and Mossyrock.
Disposal of the hatcheries must occur by June 30, 2011, and any
proceeds received from disposal shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account. Within available funds, the department shall provide
quarterly reports on the progress of disposal to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature. The first report shall be submitted no later than
September 30, 2009.
(13) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,275,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,857,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,731,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,371,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,765,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,236,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,543,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,217,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,951,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,490,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,336,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $569,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,643,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,834,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,299,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $11,128,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $11,128,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts provided
in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a
quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $600,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for removal of derelict and abandoned
vessels that have the potential to contaminate Puget Sound.
(5) $666,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 2165 (forest biomass energy
project). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010 and $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1038 (specialized forest products). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $440,000 of the state general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $440,000 of the state general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp at the level provided in
fiscal year 2008. The department shall consider using up to $2,000,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation to support and utilize
correctional camp crews to implement natural resource projects approved
by the federal government for federal stimulus funding.
(8) The department of natural resources shall dispose of the King
Air aircraft it currently owns. Disposal of the aircraft must occur no
later than June 30, 2010, and the proceeds from the sale of the
aircraft shall be deposited into the natural resources equipment
revolving fund. At the expiration of current leases, the department
shall lease facilities in eastern Washington sufficient to house the
necessary aircraft, mechanics, and pilots used for forest fire
prevention and suppression.
(9) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,616,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,295,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,565,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,559,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,298,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,588,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for funding to the Pacific county noxious weed
control board to eradicate remaining spartina in Willapa Bay.
(2) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $6,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) The department is authorized to establish or increase the
following fees in the 2009-11 biennium as necessary to meet the actual
costs of conducting business: Christmas tree grower licensing, nursery
dealer licensing, plant pest inspection and testing, and commission
merchant licensing.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
of agriculture shall convene meetings with the dairy industry
representatives and affected groups to consider alternatives for
stabilizing farm milk prices. The department of agriculture shall
provide a report of findings to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management no later than
December 15, 2009.
(5) $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Bill No. 5005 (naturally raised beef cattle). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,223,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,194,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,623,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $896,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for measuring water and habitat quality to
determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery.
(2) $896,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for activities that contribute to
Puget Sound protection and recovery, including provision of independent
advice and assessment of the state's oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, including review of existing
activities and recommendations for any necessary improvements. The
partnership may carry out this function through an existing committee,
such as the ecosystem coordination board or the leadership council, or
may appoint a special advisory council. Because this is a unique
statewide program, the partnership may invite participation from
outside the Puget Sound region.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.
(4) The Puget Sound partnership shall work with Washington State
University and the environmental protection agency to secure funding
for the beach watchers program.
(5) $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to support public education and
volunteer programs. The partnership is directed to distribute the
majority of funding as grants to local organizations, local
governments, and education, communication, and outreach network
partners. The partnership shall track progress for this activity
through the accountability system of the Puget Sound partnership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 Transfers from natural resource funds in
part VIII of this act are intended to support natural resource
agencies.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,668,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,712,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,056,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,586,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,047,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,718,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,692,000
Business and Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,270,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Funeral Directors And Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $885,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,828,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees for cosmetologists, funeral directors, cemeteries, court
reporters and appraisers. These increases are necessary to support the
expenditures authorized in this section, consistent with RCW 43.24.086.
(2) $1,352,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5391 (tattoo and body piercing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $289,000 of the architects' license account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5529
(architects). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $358,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6126
(professional athletics). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,468,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,366,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,401,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,568,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,022,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,122,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,245,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,717,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,371,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) The state patrol shall implement a cost recovery method to
fully recover costs for operating the two king air airplanes. Users of
the plane, including the state patrol and the governor's office, shall
be charged an appropriate amount to cover all operating and maintenance
costs of the plane. The state patrol shall report on this method, the
rates being charged, total operational expenses, and information
regarding usage of the planes to the office of financial management and
the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(4) The 2010 legislature will review the use of king air planes by
the executive branch and the adequacy of funding in this budget
regarding maintaining and operating the planes to successfully
accomplish their mission.
(5) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the agency's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs.
(6) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(7) $48,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1621 (consumer loan companies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,798,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,969,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,571,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,338,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $22,532,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $21,023,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is for state agency
operations.
(a) $11,792,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $11,325,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection (1)(a), the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, consistent with WAC
392-121-182 (alternative learning experience requirements) which
requires documentation of alternative learning experience student
headcount and full-time equivalent (FTE) enrollment claimed for basic
education funding, shall provide, via the monthly report of school
district enrollment, accurate monthly headcount and FTE enrollments for
students in internet alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as
well as information about resident and serving districts.
(iii) $927,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $941,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for research and development
activities associated with the development of options for new school
finance systems, including technical staff, reprogramming, and analysis
of alternative student funding formulae. Within this amount is
$150,000 for the state board of education for further development of
accountability systems, and $150,000 for the professional educator
standards board for continued development of teacher certification and
evaluation systems.
(b) $965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(c) $5,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,264,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,070,000 in fiscal year 2010 and $1,070,000 in fiscal year
2011 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board, including administering the alternative
routes to certification program, pipeline for paraeducators conditional
scholarship loan program, and the retooling to teach math conditional
loan program;
(ii) $3,431,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,431,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board. Of
these amounts:
(A) $500,000 each year is for conditional scholarships to
candidates seeking an endorsement in special education, math, science,
or bilingual education;
(B) $2,372,000 for fiscal year 2010 and $2,372,000 for fiscal year
2011 are for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math, science, special
education or bilingual education;
(C) Any remaining amounts in this subsection (c) shall be used to
continue existing alternative routes to certification programs; and
(D) Candidates seeking math and science endorsements under (A) and
(B) of this subsection shall receive priority for funding;
(iii) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the recruiting Washington teachers program;
(iv) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 provided in this subsection are for $4,000 conditional
loan stipends for paraeducators participating in the pipeline for
paraeducators program;
(v) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for conditional stipends for certificated teachers
pursuing a mathematics or science endorsement under the retooling to
teach mathematics or science program. The conditional stipends shall
be for endorsement exam fees as well as stipends for teachers who must
also complete coursework; and
(vi) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided for the implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5973 (student achievement gap). The professional
educator standards board (PESB) will convene a workgroup to identify a
list of model standards for cultural competency and make
recommendations to the education committees of the legislature on the
strengths and weaknesses of those standards. Funding is also included
here in the amount of $10,000 for the PESB to develop an interagency
agreement with the center for the improvement of student learning to
participate.
(d) $1,099,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for replacement of the
apportionment system, which includes the processes that collect school
district budget and expenditure information, staffing characteristics,
and the student enrollments that drive the funding process.
(e) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,227,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the creation of a statewide
data base of longitudinal student information. This amount is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in section
902 of this act.
(f) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
education public-private partnership.
(g) To the maximum extent possible, in adopting new agency rules or
making any changes to existing rules or policies related to the fiscal
provisions in the administration of part V of this act, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to request
approval through the normal legislative budget process.
(h) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 (enacting the interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children).
(i) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5410 (online learning).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(2) $12,836,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $12,407,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $55,890,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are for statewide programs.
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a school safety training
program provided by the criminal justice training commission. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety
personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(iii) $9,670,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(iv) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the school safety center in
the office of the superintendent of public instruction subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(v) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the youth suicide prevention
program.
(vi) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
(i) $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications
network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures
and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing
and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(ii) $1,475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,045,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $435,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data
system to include financial, student, and educator data. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction will convene a data governance
group to create a comprehensive needs-requirement document, conduct a
gap analysis, and define operating rules and a governance structure for
K-12 data collections. A preliminary report shall be submitted to the
fiscal committees and the education policy committees of the house of
representatives and senate by November 2009.
(iii) $1,656,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,483,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 of the American recovery and
reinvestment act (ARRA) 2009 funds for education technology are
provided solely for distribution to school districts, by formula, as
provided in the ARRA and related federal guidelines. $4,139,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation of the American recovery and
reinvestment act (ARRA) 2009 funds for education technology shall be
awarded to local education agencies through a competitive grant
process.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the special services pilot
project to include up to seven participating districts. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate these funds to
the district or districts participating in the pilot program according
to the provisions of RCW 28A.630.016.
(ii) $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(iii) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(iv) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for incentive grants for districts
and pilot projects to develop preapprenticeship programs. Incentive
grant awards up to $10,000 each shall be used to support the program's
design, school/business/labor agreement negotiations, and recruiting
high school students for preapprenticeship programs in the building
trades and crafts.
(v) $3,219,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the dissemination of the
navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The funding shall support
electronic student planning tools and software for analyzing the impact
of navigation 101 on student performance, as well as grants to a
maximum of one hundred school districts each year, based on progress
and need for the implementation of the navigation 101 program. The
implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section of school
districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(vi) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of a statewide
program for comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and
retrieval.
(vii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for program initiatives to address
the educational needs of Latino students and families. Using the full
amounts of the appropriations under this subsection (2)(c)(vii), the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with
the Seattle community coalition of compana quetzal to provide for three
initiatives: (A) Early childhood education; (B) parent leadership
training; and (C) high school success and college preparation programs.
(viii) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a pilot project to encourage
bilingual high school students to pursue public school teaching as a
profession. Using the full amounts of the appropriation under this
subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall contract with the Latino/a educational achievement project (LEAP)
to work with school districts to identify and mentor not fewer than
fifty bilingual students in their junior year of high school,
encouraging them to become bilingual instructors in schools with high
English language learner populations. Students shall be mentored by
bilingual teachers and complete a curriculum developed and approved by
the participating districts.
(ix) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to enhance the reading skills of
students with dyslexia by implementing the findings of the dyslexia
pilot program. Funds shall be used to provide information and training
to classroom teachers and reading specialists, for development of a
dyslexia handbook, and to take other statewide actions to improve the
reading skills of students with dyslexia. The training program shall
be delivered regionally through the educational service districts.
(x) $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to support vocational student
leadership organizations.
(xi) $25,000 of the general--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 are provided solely for the communities in school program in
Pierce county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,083,217,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,103,543,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,186,760,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2009-10 and
2010-11 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii)(A) Fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional staff
units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 for
districts that enroll fewer than 25 percent of their total full-time
equivalent student enrollment in grades K-4 in digital or online
learning programs defined in WAC 392-121-182.
(B) All other districts shall be allocated a minimum of forty-nine
certificated instructional staff units per 1,000 full-time-equivalent
(FTE) students in grades K through four, and shall be allocated
additional certificated instructional staff units to equal the
documented staffing level in grades K through four, up to a maximum of
fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per
1,000 FTE students.
(C) Certificated instructional staff allocations in this subsection
(2)(a)(ii) exceeding the statutory minimums established in RCW
28A.150.260 shall not be considered part of basic education.
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 5-12;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2010-11 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2009-10 and 2010-11
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
58.75 average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.43 percent in the 2009-10 school year and 14.43 percent in the 2010-11 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 16.58 percent in the
2009-10 school year and 16.58 percent in the 2010-11 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (g) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$10,179 per certificated staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a
maximum of $10,445 per certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $24,999 per certificated
staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a maximum of $25,449 per
certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $19,395 per certificated
staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a maximum of $19,744 per
certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $607.44 for the 2009-10 and
2010-11 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide additional
service year credits to educational staff associates pursuant to
chapter 403, Laws of 2007.
(10)(a) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $7,288,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2010 and 2011
as follows:
(i) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2010
and a maximum of $577,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2011;
(ii) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2010 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2011 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(iii) A maximum of $404,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies; and
(iv) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs.
(b) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6
FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws
of 2007.
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 4.0 percent from the 2008-09 school year to the
2009-10 school year and 4.0 percent from the 2009-10 school year to the
2010-11 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (g) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on April 22, 2009, at 08:22 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
April 22, 2009, at 08:22 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 14.43 percent for school year 2009-10 and
14.43 percent for school year 2010-11 for certificated staff and for
classified staff 16.58 percent for school year 2009-10 and 16.58
percent for the 2010-11 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff

For School Year 2009-10

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

0 34,237 35,162 36,120 37,080 40,161 42,145 41,047 44,128 46,115

1 34,698 35,635 36,606 37,608 40,721 42,695 41,503 44,617 46,589

2 35,137 36,083 37,064 38,144 41,248 43,242 41,963 45,067 47,061

3 35,589 36,545 37,536 38,650 41,749 43,791 42,398 45,494 47,538

4 36,033 37,031 38,028 39,180 42,297 44,354 42,855 45,971 48,030

5 36,492 37,494 38,501 39,718 42,823 44,921 43,319 46,425 48,523

6 36,963 37,943 38,984 40,262 43,352 45,462 43,794 46,885 48,993

7 37,790 38,786 39,841 41,187 44,324 46,491 44,685 47,820 49,989

8 39,002 40,052 41,132 42,590 45,768 48,016 46,086 49,266 51,512

9 41,363 42,497 44,008 47,260 49,584 47,503 50,757 53,081

10 43,877 45,498 48,794 51,195 48,995 52,291 54,692

11 47,032 50,399 52,849 50,528 53,897 56,345

12 48,517 52,048 54,571 52,122 55,545 58,068

13 53,737 56,335 53,773 57,234 59,831

14 55,434 58,165 55,471 59,042 61,663

15 56,877 59,679 56,913 60,577 63,266

16 or more 58,014 60,871 58,051 61,788 64,531

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff

For School Year 2010-11

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

0 34,237 35,162 36,120 37,080 40,161 42,145 41,047 44,128 46,115

1 34,698 35,635 36,606 37,608 40,721 42,695 41,503 44,617 46,589

2 35,137 36,083 37,064 38,144 41,248 43,242 41,963 45,067 47,061

3 35,589 36,545 37,536 38,650 41,749 43,791 42,398 45,494 47,538

4 36,033 37,031 38,028 39,180 42,297 44,354 42,855 45,971 48,030

5 36,492 37,494 38,501 39,718 42,823 44,921 43,319 46,425 48,523

6 36,963 37,943 38,984 40,262 43,352 45,462 43,794 46,885 48,993

7 37,790 38,786 39,841 41,187 44,324 46,491 44,685 47,820 49,989

8 39,002 40,052 41,132 42,590 45,768 48,016 46,086 49,266 51,512

9 41,363 42,497 44,008 47,260 49,584 47,503 50,757 53,081

10 43,877 45,498 48,794 51,195 48,995 52,291 54,692

11 47,032 50,399 52,849 50,528 53,897 56,345

12 48,517 52,048 54,571 52,122 55,545 58,068

13 53,737 56,335 53,773 57,234 59,831

14 55,434 58,165 55,471 59,042 61,663

15 56,877 59,679 56,913 60,577 63,266

16 or more 58,014 60,871 58,051 61,788 64,531

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 2 and the salary schedules in subsection
(4)(a) of this section include one learning improvement day. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds only if the
learning improvement day has been added to the 180-day contract year.
If fewer days are added, the additional learning improvement allocation
shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional day shall be limited to
specific activities identified in the state required school improvement
plan related to improving student learning that are consistent with
education reform implementation, and shall not be considered part of
basic education. The principal in each school shall assure that the
days are used to provide the necessary school-wide, all staff
professional development that is tied directly to the school
improvement plan. The school principal and the district superintendent
shall maintain documentation as to their approval of these activities.
The length of a learning improvement day shall not be less than the
length of a full day under the base contract. The superintendent of
public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere to the
intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($4,215,000)
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,172,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,963,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary adjustments shall be provided to all
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act. These
adjustments shall ensure a minimum salary allocation for certificated
administrative staff of $57,986 in the 2009-10 school year and $57,986
in the 2010-11 school year.
(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 503(2)(b) of this act. These salary adjustments ensure a
minimum salary allocation for classified staff of $31,865 in the 2009-10 school year and $31,865 in the 2010-11 school year.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates 13.79 percent for the
2009-10 school year and 13.79 percent for the 2010-11 school year for
certificated staff and 13.08 percent for the 2009-10 school year and
13.08 percent for the 2010-11 school year for classified staff.
(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or
decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Changes for special education result from changes in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act. The appropriations in this section provide
incremental fringe benefit alterations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2009-10 2010-11

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0 $0

Highly Capable (per formula student) ($1.49) ($1.49)

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) ($3.93) ($3.93)

Learning Assistance (per formula student) ($1.18) ($1.18)

(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) $44,188,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$732.00 per month for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $745.00
per month for the 2009-10 school year and $768.00 per month for the
2010-11 school year. The adjustments to health insurance benefits are
at the following rates:

School Year

2009-10 2010-11

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.12 $0.33

Highly Capable (per formula student) $0.82 $2.22

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $2.10 $5.83

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $0.54 $1.49

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,070,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $614,427,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $878,000 of this fiscal year 2010 appropriation
and a maximum of $894,000 of the fiscal year 2011 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $48.15 per weighted mile in the 2009-10 school
year and $48.40 per weighted mile in the 2010-11 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.
(6) Funding levels in this section reflect reductions from the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1292 (authorizing waivers
from the one hundred eighty-day school year requirement in order to
allow four-day school weeks).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,988,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,306,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the 2011 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005 (requiring
school breakfast programs in certain schools).
(4) $1,588,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation of
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) funds is provided
solely for equipment assistance to school food authorities (SFAs)
participating in the national school lunch program (NSLP). Local SFAs
may apply to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
receive grants in accordance with provisions of the ARRA. As
stipulated in the ARRA, priority will be given to SFAs for equipment
for schools in which at least 50 percent of the students are eligible
for free or reduced-priced meals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,959,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $652,388,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $656,052,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,155,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $73,668,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the federal safety net
awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal
appropriation in this subsection (8) in any fiscal year, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards. In the determination of need, the committee shall require
that districts demonstrate that they are maximizing their eligibility
for all state and federal revenues related to services for special
education-eligible students. Awards associated with (b) and (c) of
this subsection shall not exceed the total of a district's specific
determination of need.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) Using criteria developed by the committee, the committee shall
then consider extraordinary costs associated with communities that draw
a larger number of families with children in need of special education
services. The safety net awards to school districts shall be adjusted
to reflect amounts awarded under (b) of this subsection.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999. The state
safety net oversight committee shall ensure that safety net
documentation and awards are based on current medicaid revenue amounts.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review and streamline the application process to access safety net
funds, provide technical assistance to school districts, and annually
survey school districts regarding improvement to the process.
(12) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(13) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(14) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(15) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(16) $221,357,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation of
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 funds is provided solely
for the individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA), Part B, for
distribution to school districts. The funds' use is to be consistent
with the current IDEA, Part B statutory and regulatory requirements.
(17) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
2011, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended to support a special education ombudsman program within the
office of superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,394,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,395,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,789,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) $3,355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for regional professional
development related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support. The office of superintendent of public
instruction shall also allocate to each educational service district
additional amounts provided in section 504 of this act for compensation
increases associated with the salary amounts and staffing provided in
this subsection (2).
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,921,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,997,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,284,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $429,202,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $176,284,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) fiscal stabilization funds
to restore state reductions for local effort assistance payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,943,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,992,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,935,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $329,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $329,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,437,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,867,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $401.08 per funded
student for the 2009-10 school year and $401.08 per funded student for
the 2010-11 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of 2.314 percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2010 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2011 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.
(4) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2010 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2011 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,181,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,512,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,626,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,431,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $36,806,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $34,516,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund --
federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning
(WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of retake
assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and implementation
of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or
around June 10th of each year.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the design of the state
assessment system and the implementation of end of course assessments
for high school math.
(3) $1,014,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and
benefits for the equivalent of two additional professional development
days for fourth and fifth grade teachers during the 2008-2009 school
year. The allocations shall be made based on the calculations of
certificated instructional staff units for fourth and fifth grade
provided in section 502 of this act and on the calculations of
compensation provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Districts
may use the funding to support additional days for professional
development as well as job-embedded forms of professional development.
(4) $3,241,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits
for the equivalent of three additional professional development days
for middle and high school math and science teachers during the 2008-2009 school year, as well as specialized training for one math and
science teacher in each middle school and high school during the 2008-2009 school year. Districts may use the funding to support additional
days for professional development as well as job-embedded forms of
professional development.
(5) $3,850,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a math and science instructional
coaches program pursuant to chapter 396, Laws of 2007. Funding shall
be used to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities for up to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math and twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school science in each year of
the biennium; and up to $300,000 may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to administer and coordinate the
program.
(6) $1,781,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,943,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide allocations to districts for middle
and junior high school students in accordance with the funding formulas
provided in section 502 of this act. If Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5676 is enacted the allocations are formula-driven, otherwise the
office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall adjust funding to stay
within the amounts provided in this subsection.
(7) $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(8) $1,579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
Funding shall be distributed to the various LASER activities in a
manner proportional to LASER program spending during the 2007-2009
biennium.
(9) $81,010,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in chapter
400, Laws of 2007. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary
full-day program in a recipient school shall count as one-half of one
full-time equivalent student for the purpose of making allocations
under this subsection. Although the allocations are formula-driven,
the office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit the number of
recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts appropriated each
fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided in this
subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten programs for
20 percent of kindergarten enrollment. Funding priority shall be given
to schools with the highest poverty levels, as measured by prior year
free and reduced priced lunch eligibility rates in each school.
Additionally, as a condition of funding, school districts must agree to
provide the full-day program to the children of parents who request it
in each eligible school. For the purposes of calculating a school
district levy base, funding provided in this subsection shall be
considered a state block grant program under RCW 84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(10) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(11) $105,754,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(12) $3,046,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,046,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Funding in this
subsection may be used for focused assistance programs for individual
schools as well as school districts.
(13) $30,702,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(14) $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to eliminate the lunch co-pay for
students in grades kindergarten through third grade that are eligible
for reduced price lunch.
(15) $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for: (a) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the
breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c)
for additional assistance for school districts initiating a summer food
service program.
(16) $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2009 through August 31, 2011.
(17) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(18) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(19) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operation of the center
for the improvement of student learning pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(20) $250,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the office
of the superintendent of public instruction's statewide director of
technology position.
(21)(a) $28,270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $36,513,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher beginning in the 2007-08 school year and adjusted for inflation
in each school year thereafter in which Initiative 732 cost of living
adjustments are provided. National board certified teachers who become
public school principals shall continue to receive this bonus for as
long as they are principals and maintain the national board
certification;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner; and
(iv) During the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years, and within the
available appropriation, certificated instructional staff who have met
the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from
the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current
assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment.
The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW
28A.405.415. The assessment fee for national certification is provided
in addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive
certification after three years are required to repay the assessment
fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment, as set by
the national board for professional teaching standards and administered
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define
the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment,
including applicable fees.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits.
(22) $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. This funding
may additionally be used to support FIRST Robotics programs.
(23) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the local farms-healthy kids
program as described in chapter 215, Laws of 2008.
(24) $2,348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are appropriated for a beginning educator support
program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for
grant funding beginning in the 2009-10 school year. The superintendent
shall implement this program in 5 to 15 school districts and/or
regional consortia. The program provided by a district and/or regional
consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified
mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning
teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for
mentors and new teachers to work together, and teacher observation time
with accomplished peers. $250,000 may be used to provide state-wide
professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning
educators. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
to establish and operate a research-based beginning educator support
program no later than August 31, 2009. OSPI must evaluate the
program's progress and may contract for this work. A report to the
legislature about the beginning educator support program is due
November 1, 2010.
(25) $4,400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of diagnostic assessments, consistent with the recommendations of the
Washington assessment of student learning work group.
(26) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5414 (statewide assessments and curricula).
(27) $530,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $530,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,994,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,937,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,263,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,194,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $901.46 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2009-10 school year and $901.46 in
the 2010-11 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,067,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,237,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,925,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,980,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $795,209,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $281.71 per funded student for the
2009-10 school year and $282.63 per funded student for the 2010-11
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to the amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to school districts
with high concentrations of poverty and English language learner
students, subject to the following rules and conditions:
(i) To qualify for additional funding under this subsection, a
district's October headcount enrollment in grades kindergarten through
grade twelve must have at least twenty percent enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program based on an average of the
program headcount taken in October and May of the prior school year;
and must also have at least forty percent eligible for free or reduced
price lunch based on October headcount enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve in the prior school year.
(ii) Districts meeting the specifications in (d)(i) of this
subsection shall receive additional funded students for the learning
assistance program at the rates specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section. The number of additional funded student units shall be
calculated by subtracting twenty percent from the district's percent
transitional bilingual instruction program enrollment as defined in
(d)(i) of this subsection, and the resulting percent shall be
multiplied by the district's kindergarten through twelve annual average
full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school year.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(4) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.
(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for the implementation of extended learning programs required
in chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(6) $51,970,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $77,955,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 of American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) Title I, Part A funds are in addition
to regular Title I, Part A allocations solely for allocation to
eligible school districts in accordance with the guidelines of ARRA.
(7) $48,981,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation from the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) is for school
improvement. This consists of 4 percent, or $5,413,000 of the Title I,
Part A recovery funds which must be set aside for school improvement as
well as $43,568,000 in additional school improvement funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,101,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,295,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,396,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $131.16 per FTE student for the 2009-10 school year and $99.32 per FTE student for the 2010-11 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(4) $200,295,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) fiscal stabilization funds to restore
state reductions for the student achievement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund and state student achievement fund
appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction for
state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this
act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 605
through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.
(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(4) The colleges of education for institutions with appropriations
in sections 606 through 611 shall develop a plan, by October 30, 2009,
to increase the number of math and science teacher endorsements and
certificates granted by the institution. The plan shall address the
college's math and science teacher endorsement and certification
completion goal for each of the next six years, beginning with the
2010-2011 academic year, and shall be reported to the governor, the
relevant policy committees of the legislature, the higher education
coordinating board (HECB) and the professional educator standards board
(PESB). Plan components may address: Student advising practices,
increased outreach and recruitment efforts to under-represented
populations, linkages with university mathematics and science
departments, and implementation of redesigned, innovative endorsement
and certification programs. To accomplish this work, enrollments may
need to be shifted from low-need endorsement and certificate areas to
math and science. A report shall be made each October 30th to the HECB
and PESB regarding the degree to which plan goals have been met and
activities undertaken to support those outcomes.
(5) In accordance with RCW 28B.10.920 through 28B.10.922, the state
performance agreement committee and each public four-year institution
of higher education shall develop performance agreements for the period
September 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015. The agreements shall reflect
the level of state, tuition, and other resources appropriated or
authorized for each institution in this act and in the omnibus 2009-11
omnibus capital budget act, as well as reasonably anticipated changes
in such resources for the two subsequent biennia as required to
accomplish the higher education master plan as adopted by the
legislature. The agreements shall build upon each institution's actual
performance relative to the 2011 targets previously negotiated between
the institution, the higher education coordinating board, and the
office of financial management, and shall include measurable
performance targets, benchmarks, and goals in areas including but not
limited to:
(a) Student enrollment levels, by campus;
(b) Baccalaureate and advanced degree production;
(c) Baccalaureate and advanced degree production in high employer-demand fields;
(d) Undergraduate retention and graduation rates;
(e) Time-to-degree for students entering as freshmen, and as upper-division transfers;
(f) Efficiency to degree; and
(g) Capital investment as required to (i) maintain existing
capacity, and (ii) meet enrollment targets in accordance with the
master plan as adopted by the legislature.
Each institution shall report progress toward its performance targets
during the preceding academic year to the state performance agreement
committee prior to November 1, 2010. The higher education coordinating
board shall consolidate and summarize the institutional reports, and
provide them to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2010.
(6) To facilitate transparency and compliance with the American
recovery and reinvestment act, the institutions of higher education
receiving state and federal appropriations under sections 605 through
611 of this act shall allot anticipated state, federal, and tuition
expenditures by budget program and fiscal year. The office of
financial management shall notify the legislative ways and means
committees of the proposed allotments at least ten days prior to their
approval.
(7) To the extent permitted by the applicable personnel system
rules, and to the extent collectively bargained with represented
employees, institutions of higher education are encouraged to achieve
the reductions in full-time-equivalent employment and payroll levels
necessary to operate within this budget through strategies that will
minimize impacts on employees, their families, their communities, and
short- and longer-term accomplishment of institutional mission.
Institutions are encouraged to utilize strategies such as reduced work-hours per day or week, voluntary leave without pay, and temporary
furloughs that enable employees to maintain permanent employment
status. Institutions are further encouraged to implement such
strategies in ways that will enable employees to maintain full
insurance benefits, full retirement service credit, and a living wage.
(8)(a) For institutions receiving appropriations in section 605 of
this act the only allowable salary increases provided are those with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
staff retention, to the extent permitted by Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5460, and House Bill No. 2328.
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW,
salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) For each institution of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 606 through 611 of this act:
(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
staff retention, to the extent permitted by Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5460 and House Bill No. 2328; and
(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from other sources
to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff,
teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of
financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not
including employees under RCW 28B.16.015, to the extent permitted by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 and House Bill No. 2328. Any
salary increase granted under the authority of this subsection
(8)(c)(ii) shall not be included in an institution's salary base for
future state funding. It is the intent of the legislature that state
general fund support for an institution shall not increase during the
current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases
authorized under this subsection (8)(c)(ii).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) Within the funds appropriated in this
act, each institution of higher education is expected to enroll and
educate at least the following numbers of full-time equivalent state-supported students per academic year:

2009-10
Annual Average 2010-11
Annual Average

University of Washington 36,546 37,162

Washington State University 22,250 22,250

Central Washington University 8,477 8,734

Eastern Washington University 8,469 8,808

The Evergreen State College 4,213 4,213

Western Washington University 11,373 11,762

State Board for Community &
Technical Colleges

Adult Students 139,237 139,237

Running Start Students 11,558 11,558

(2) In achieving or exceeding these enrollment targets, each
institution shall seek to:
(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at branch campuses;
(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that
enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college
campuses; and
(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is
limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core
academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs
duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.
(3) By September 1, 2009, each institution shall report to the
higher education committees and the relevant fiscal committees of the
legislature on its plans for achieving the objectives in this section.
(4) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment,
the University of Washington and Washington State University shall
notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time
student equivalent enrollments budgeted for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS. In
order to operate within the state funds appropriated in this act, the
governing boards of the state research universities, the state regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College are authorized to adopt
and adjust tuition and fees for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 academic years
as provided in this section:
(1) Each governing board may increase the tuition fees, as defined
in RCW 28B.15.020, charged to resident undergraduate students by no
more than fourteen percent over the amounts charged to resident
undergraduate students for the prior academic year.
(2) Each governing board is authorized to increase tuition charges
to graduate and professional students, and to nonresident undergraduate
students, by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing
board.
(3) Each governing board is authorized to increase summer quarter
or semester tuition fees for resident and nonresident undergraduate,
graduate, and professional students pursuant to RCW 28B.15.067.
(4) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase charges
for fee-based, self-sustaining degree programs, credit courses,
noncredit workshops and courses, and special contract courses by
amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(5) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
services and activities fees for all categories of students as provided
in RCW 28B.15.069.
(6) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
technology fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.069.
(7) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase special
course and lab fees, and health and counseling fees, to the extent
necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost of the
course or service.
(8) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
administrative fees such as but not limited to those charged for
application, matriculation, special testing, and transcripts by amounts
judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(9) In addition to the 3.5 percent of tuition and services and
activities fees used for institutional financial aid as required by RCW
28B.15.820, each governing board shall assure that at least one-seventh
of the additional tuition revenue that would otherwise be collected as
a result of resident undergraduate tuition increases in excess of seven
percent per year is used to provide additional financial aid to
resident undergraduate students. Each institution shall report to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1,
2009, and again by December 1, 2010, demonstrating how it has modified
financial aid policies and practices during the current academic year
to accomplish this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGES. In order to operate within the state funds appropriated in
this act, the state board for community and technical colleges and the
trustees of the state's community and technical colleges are authorized
to adopt and adjust tuition and fees for the 2009-10 and 2010-11
academic years as provided in this section:
(1) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
resident undergraduate students by no more than seven percent over the
amounts charged to resident undergraduates during the prior academic
year. The board may increase tuition fees under this subsection
differentially based on student credit hour load, provided that the
overall increase in average tuition revenue per student does not exceed
seven percent each year.
(2) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
resident undergraduates enrolled in upper division applied
baccalaureate programs by no more than fourteen percent over the
amounts charged during the prior academic year.
(3) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
nonresident students by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the
board.
(4) The trustees of the technical colleges are authorized to either
(a) increase operating fees by no more than the percentage increases
authorized for community colleges by the state board; or (b) fully
adopt the tuition fee charge schedule adopted by the state board for
community colleges.
(5) For the 2009-10 academic year, the trustees of the technical
colleges are authorized to increase building fees by four cents per
clock hour and by sixty-two cents per credit hour. For the 2010-11
academic year, the trustees are authorized to increase building fees by
four cents per clock hour and by sixty-nine cents per credit hour. The
purpose of these increases is to progress toward parity with the
building fees charged students attending the community colleges.
(6) The state board is authorized to increase the maximum allowable
services and activities fee as provided in RCW 28B.15.069. The
trustees of the community and technical colleges are authorized to
increase services and activities fees up to the maximum level
authorized by the state board.
(7) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase charges for fee-based, self-sustaining
programs such as summer session, international student contracts, and
special contract courses by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.
(8) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase special course and lab fees to the
extent necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost
of the course or service.
(9) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase administrative fees such as but not
limited to those charged for application, matriculation, special
testing, and transcripts by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,071,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,509,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,171,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,374,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2010 and at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2011.
(2) $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(3) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $3,500,000 is
provided solely for the student achievement initiative.
(4) When implementing the appropriations in this section, the state
board and the trustees of the individual community and technical
colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(5) Within the board's 2009-11 biennial budget allocation to
Bellevue College, and pursuant to RCW 28B.50.810, the college may
implement, on a tuition and fee basis, an additional applied
baccalaureate degree in interior design. This program is intended to
provide students with additional opportunities to earn baccalaureate
degrees and to respond to emerging job and economic growth
opportunities. The program reviews and approval decisions required by
RCW 28B.50.810 (3) and (4) shall be completed by July 31, 2009, so that
the degree may be offered during the 2009-10 academic year.
(6) In accordance with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board's 2008 Kitsap region higher education center study,
the state board shall facilitate development of university centers by
allocating thirty 2-year and 4-year partnership full-time enrollment
equivalencies to Olympic College and ten 2-year and 4-year partnership
full-time enrollment equivalencies to Peninsula College. The colleges
shall use the allocations to establish a partnership with a
baccalaureate university or universities for delivery of upper division
degree programs in the Kitsap region. The Olympic and Peninsula
Community College districts shall additionally work together to ensure
coordinated development of these and other future baccalaureate
opportunities through coordinated needs assessment, planning, and
scheduling.
(7) By September 1, 2009, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
office of financial management shall review and to the extent necessary
revise current 2009-11 performance measures and targets based on the
level of state, tuition, and other resources appropriated or authorized
in this act and in the omnibus 2009-11 omnibus capital budget act. The
boards and the office of financial management shall additionally
develop new performance targets for the 2011-13 and the 2013-15 biennia
that will guide and measure the community and technical college
system's contributions to achievement of the state's higher education
master plan goals.
(8) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the hospital employee
education and training program under which labor, management, and
college partnerships develop or expand and evaluate training programs
for incumbent hospital workers that lead to careers in nursing and
other high-demand health care occupations. The board shall report
student progress, outcomes, and costs to the relevant fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by November 2009 and November 2010.
(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass
mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community
and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as
mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online
information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.
(10) $1,112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the state board to enhance
online distance learning and open courseware technology. Funds shall
be used to support open courseware, open textbooks, open licenses to
increase access, affordability and quality of courses in higher
education. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
select the most appropriate courses to support open courseware based
solely upon criteria of maximizing the value of instruction and
reducing costs of textbooks and other instructional materials for the
greatest number of students in higher education, regardless of the type
of institution those students attend.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,552,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,130,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,730,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,408,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,712,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,524,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $659,506,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center for
facilitation, support, and analysis to support the nurse staffing
steering committee in its work to apply best practices related to
patient safety and nurse staffing.
(5) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the University of Washington
geriatric education center to provide a voluntary adult family home
certification program. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Individuals completing the
requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and the voluntary adult family home
certification program shall be issued a certified adult family home
license by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this subsection.
(6) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,578,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,163,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,772,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,696,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,209,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) When implementing reductions for fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, Washington State University shall minimize reductions to
extension services and agriculture extension services. Agriculture
extension includes:
(a) Faculty with extension appointments working within the
following departments in the college of agricultural, human, and
natural resource sciences with extension appointments: Animal
sciences, crop and soil sciences, entomology, horticulture, and plant
pathology;
(b) The portion of county extension educators' appointments
assigned to the "agricultural programs" area;
(c) Staff with extension appointments and extension operating
allocations located at the irrigated agriculture research and extension
center (Prosser), northwest Washington research and extension center
(Mt. Vernon), and tree fruit research and extension center (Wenatchee);
and
(d) Extension contributions to the center for precision
agricultural systems, center for sustaining agriculture and natural
resources, and the agriculture weather network.
(4) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for research related to honeybee
colony collapse disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,685,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,796,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,522,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,090,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the northwest
autism center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,284,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,580,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,975,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,076,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,915,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,512,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,865,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,366,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,193,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the college shall maintain, and endeavor to
increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) At least $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the labor
education and research center.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to report to the legislature regarding efficient and
effective programs and policies. The report shall calculate the return
on investment to taxpayers from evidence-based prevention and
intervention programs and policies that influence crime, K-12 education
outcomes, child maltreatment, substance abuse, mental health, public
health, public assistance, employment, and housing. The institute for
public policy shall provide the legislature with a comprehensive list
of programs and policies that improve these outcomes for children and
adults in Washington and result in more cost-efficient use of public
resources. The institute shall submit interim reports by December 15,
2009, and October 1, 2010, and a final report by June 30, 2011. The
institute may receive additional funds from a private organization for
the purpose of conducting this study.
(5) To the extent federal or private funding is available for this
purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy and the
center for reinventing public education at the University of Washington
shall examine the relationship between participation in pension systems
and teacher quality and mobility patterns in the state. The department
of retirement systems shall facilitate researchers' access to necessary
individual-level data necessary to effectively conduct the study. The
researchers shall ensure that no individually identifiable information
will be disclosed at any time. An interim report on project findings
shall be completed by November 15, 2010, and a final report shall be
submitted to the governor and to the relevant committees of the
legislature by October 15, 2011.
(6) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the Washington
center for undergraduate education.
(7) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to examine the need for and methods to increase the
availability of nonfood items, such as personal hygiene supplies,
soaps, paper products, and other items, to needy persons in the state.
The study shall examine existing private and public programs that
provide such products, and develop recommendations for the most cost-effective incentives for private and public agencies to increase local
distribution outlets and local and regional networks of supplies. A
final report shall be delivered to the legislature and the governor by
December 1, 2009.
(8) $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided to the Washington state institute for
public policy to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2106 (child
welfare outcomes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $23,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5882 (racial disproportionality). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute of
public policy to evaluate the adequacy of and access to financial aid
and independent living programs for youth in foster care. The
examination shall include opportunities to improve efficiencies within
these programs. The institute shall report its findings by December 1,
2009.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to conduct an assessment of the general assistance
unemployable program and other similar programs. The assessment shall
include a review of programs in other states that provide similar
services and will include recommendations on promising approaches that
both improve client outcomes and reduce state costs. A report is due
by December 1, 2009.
(12) To the extent funds are available, the Washington state
institute for public policy is encouraged to continue the longitudinal
analysis of long-term mental health outcomes directed in chapter 334,
Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit), to build upon the
evaluation of the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill
offenders); and to assess program outcomes and cost effectiveness of
the children's mental health pilot projects as required by chapter 372,
Laws of 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,141,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,752,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,885,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,036,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,814,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,611,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,203,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,352,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,166,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the higher
education coordinating board shall complete a system design planning
project that defines how the current higher education delivery system
can be shaped and expanded over the next ten years to best meet the
needs of Washington citizens and businesses for high quality and
accessible post-secondary education. The board shall propose policies
and specific, fiscally feasible implementation recommendations to
accomplish the goals established in the 2008 strategic master plan for
higher education. The project shall specifically address the roles,
missions, and instructional delivery systems both of the existing and
of proposed new components of the higher education system; the extent
to which specific academic programs should be expanded, consolidated,
or discontinued and how that would be accomplished; the utilization of
innovative instructional delivery systems and pedagogies to reach both
traditional and nontraditional students; and opportunities to
consolidate institutional administrative functions. The study
recommendations shall also address the proposed location, role,
mission, academic program, and governance of any recommended new
campus, institution, or university center. During the planning
process, the board shall inform and actively involve the chairs from
the senate and house of representatives committees on higher education,
or their designees. The board shall report the findings and
recommendations of this system design planning project to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(2) $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the higher education
coordinating board to administer Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2021 (revitalizing student financial aid). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1946 (regarding higher education online
technology). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the higher education
coordinating board to contract with the Pacific Northwest university of
health sciences to conduct training and education of health care
professionals to promote osteopathic physician services in rural and
underserved areas of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,711,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,124,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,229,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $191,704,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $232,929,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, $80,190,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation, and $2,446,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid payments
under the state need grant; the state work study program including up
to a four percent administrative allowance; the Washington scholars
program; and the Washington award for vocational excellence. State
need grant, Washington award for vocational excellence, and state work
study awards shall be adjusted to offset the cost of the resident
undergraduate tuition increases authorized under this act. The
Washington scholars program shall provide awards sufficient to offset
ninety percent of the total tuition and fee award.
(2)(a) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility
for the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at
or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted
for family size. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the
estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected
increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for
students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median
shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount
granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent
for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65
percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI;
60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent
MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70
percent MFI.
(b) Grant awards for students at private four-year colleges shall
be set at the same level as the student would receive if attending one
of the public research universities.
(3) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is for the
future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program. $500,000 of
this amount is provided to support state work study positions for
students to intern in secondary schools and classrooms.
(4) $3,872,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the passport to college
scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.117 RCW. The higher
education coordinating board shall contract with a college scholarship
organization with expertise in managing scholarships for low-income,
high-potential students and foster care children and young adults to
administer the program. Of the amount in this subsection, $39,000 is
provided solely for the higher education coordinating board for
administration of the contract and the remaining shall be contracted
out to the organization for the following purposes:
(a) $384,000 is provided solely for program administration, and
(b) $3,449,000 is provided solely for student financial aid for up
to 151 students and to fund student support services. Funds are
provided for student scholarships, provider training, and for incentive
payments to the colleges they attend for individualized student support
services which may include, but are not limited to, college and career
advising, counseling, tutoring, costs incurred for students while
school is not in session, personal expenses, health insurance, and
emergency services.
(5) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the health professional
scholarship and loan program. The funds provided in this subsection
shall be: (a) Prioritized for health care deliver sites demonstrating
a commitment to serving the uninsured; and (b) allocated between loan
repayments and scholarships proportional to current program
allocations.
(6) For fiscal year 2010 and fiscal year 2011, the board shall
defer loan or conditional scholarship repayments to the future teachers
conditional scholarship and loan repayment program for up to one year
for each participant if the participant has shown evidence of efforts
to find a teaching job but has been unable to secure a teaching job per
the requirements of the program.
(7) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for community scholarship matching grants and its
administration. To be eligible for the matching grant, nonprofit
groups organized under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code must demonstrate they have raised at least $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. Groups may receive no more than one $2,000 matching grant per
year and preference shall be given to groups affiliated with
scholarship America. Up to a total of $46,000 per year of the amount
appropriated in this section may be awarded to a nonprofit community
organization to administer scholarship matching grants, with preference
given to an organization affiliated with scholarship America.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for state need grants provided to
students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or
the equivalent semester credits. Total state expenditures on this
program shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(9) $3,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the gaining early awareness and
readiness for undergraduate programs project.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,587,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,262,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,405,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $142,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $88,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1355 (opportunity internships). Of these
amounts, $82,000 for fiscal year 2010 and $28,000 for fiscal year 2011
are to be contracted to the higher education coordinating board for
administration of state need grant program coordination and for
enhancement of existing administration and tracking tools to
accommodate opportunity internship students eligible for state need
grants. It is expected that the federal funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be from among the workforce investment act statewide
discretionary funds available for projects in support of disadvantaged
youth. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2227 (evergreen jobs act). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,598,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,611,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,209,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,478,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,045,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,859,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $366,382,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $55,696,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $55,696,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services. This appropriation temporarily reduces
the number of slots for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium for the early
childhood education and assistance program. The department shall
reduce slots where providers serve both federal headstart and early
childhood education and assistance program children, to the greatest
extent possible, in order to achieve no reduction of slots across the
state. The amounts in this subsection also reflect reductions to the
administrative expenditures for the early childhood education and
assistance program. The department shall reduce administrative
expenditures, to the greatest extent possible, prior to reducing early
childhood education and assistance program slots. Of these amounts,
$10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial amount of state matching
dollars required to receive federal child care and development fund
grant dollars.
(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided to the department to contract with Thrive by Five, Washington
for a pilot project for a quality rating and improvement system to
provide parents with information they need to choose quality child care
and education programs and to improve the quality of early care and
education programs. The department in collaboration with Thrive by
Five shall operate the pilot projects in King, Yakima, Clark, Spokane,
and Kitsap counties. The department shall use child care development
fund quality money for this purpose.
(3) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $850,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for child care resource and referral network services.
The general fund--federal funding represents moneys from the American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (child care development block
grant).
(4) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the career and wage ladder program created by
chapter 507, Laws of 2005. The general fund--federal funding
represents moneys from the American recovery and reinvestment act of
2009 (child care development block grant).
(5) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to work with
stakeholders and the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to identify and test a kindergarten assessment process and tools in
geographically diverse school districts. School districts may
participate in testing the kindergarten assessment process on a
voluntary basis. The department shall report to the legislature on the
kindergarten assessment process not later than January 15, 2011.
Expenditure of amounts provided in this subsection is contingent on
receipt of an equal match from private sources. As matching funds are
made available, the department may expend the amounts provided in this
subsection.
(6) $1,600,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the department to fund programs to improve the
quality of infant and toddler child care through training, technical
assistance, and child care consultation.
(7) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1329 (child care center collective bargaining). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to partially fund the
child care subsidies paid by the department of social and health
services on behalf of the department of early learning.
(10) The department shall use child care development fund money to
satisfy the federal audit requirement of the improper payments act
(IPIA) of 2002. In accordance with the IPIA's rules, the money spent
on the audits will not count against the five percent state limit on
administrative expenditures.
(11) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with
the office of financial management and the department of social and
health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload
for the working connections child care program to the legislative
fiscal committees. The report shall also identify the number of cases
participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and
working connections child care.
(12) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,902,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,908,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,928,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,738,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $271,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is provided solely for the school for the
blind to offer short course programs, allowing students the opportunity
to leave their home schools for short periods and receive intensive
training. The school for the blind shall provide this service to the
extent that it is funded by contracts with school districts and
educational services districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,592,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,656,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,774,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $210,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the operation of the shared reading video outreach
program. The school for the deaf shall provide this service to the
extent it is funded by contracts with school districts and educational
service districts.
(2) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1879 (deaf and hard of hearing). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,876,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,883,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,923,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,736,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce
spending in those areas that shall have the least impact on
implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,592,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,636,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,228,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce
spending in those areas that shall have the least impact on
implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 621 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,655,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,267,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce
spending in those areas that shall have the least impact on
implementing its mission.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $854,991,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $901,265,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,707,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,136,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,619,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,772,081,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,543,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,171,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,171,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,885,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,463,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,811,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,507,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,258,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,273,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT --
FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,558,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,645,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account. $5,000,000 of the
appropriation is provided for emergency fire suppression by the
department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT -- COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated to support public health services, including public
health nursing:

Health District FY 2010
FY 2011 FY 2010-11
Biennium

Adams County Health District $30,951 $30,951 $61,902

Asotin County Health District $67,714 $67,714 $135,428

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,165,612 $1,165,612 $2,331,224

Chelan-Douglas Health District $184,761 $184,761 $369,522

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department $141,752 $141,752 $283,504

Southwest Washington Health District $1,084,473 $1,084,473 $2,168,946

Columbia County Health District $40,529 $40,529 $81,058

Cowlitz County Health Department $278,560 $278,560 $557,120

Garfield County Health District $15,028 $15,028 $30,056

Grant County Health District $118,595 $118,596 $237,191

Grays Harbor Health Department $183,870 183,870 $367,740

Island County Health Department $91,892 $91,892 $183,784

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $85,782 $85,782 $171,564

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $9,531,747 $9,531,747 $19,063,494

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $554,669 $554,669 $1,109,338

Kittitas County Health Department $92,499 $92,499 $184,998

Klickitat County Health Department $62,402 $62,402 $124,804

Lewis County Health Department $105,801 $105,801 $211,602

Lincoln County Health Department $29,705 $29,705 $59,410

Mason County Department of Health Services $95,988 $95,988 $191,976

Okanogan County Health District $63,458 $63,458 $126,916

Pacific County Health Department $77,427 $77,427 $154,854

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $2,820,590 $2,820,590 $5,641,180

San Juan County Health and Community Services $37,531 $37,531 $75,062

Skagit County Health Department $223,927 $223,927 $447,854

Snohomish Health District $2,258,207 $2,258,207 $4,516,414

Spokane County Health District $2,101,429 $2,101,429 $4,202,858

Northeast Tri-County Health District $110,454 $110,454 $220,908

Thurston County Health Department $600,419 $600,419 $1,200,838

Wahkiakum County Health Department $13,773 $13,772 $27,545

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $172,062 $172,062 $344,124

Whatcom County Health Department $855,863 $855,863 $1,711,726

Whitman County Health Department $78,733 $78,733 $157,466

Yakima Health District $623,797
$623,797 $1,247,594

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $24,000,000 $24,000,000 $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS.
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a
monthly basis beginning July 1, 2009, consistent with chapter 41.45
RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement
systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters
2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,800,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,570,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,860,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the water pollution control revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2010. The sum of
one hundred twenty-five million dollars or so much thereof as may be
available on June 30, 2010, from the total amount of unspent fiscal
year 2010 state general fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts
expressly placed into unallotted status by this act, is appropriated
for the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this
section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed one hundred
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2011. The sum of
one hundred twenty-five million dollars or so much thereof as may be
available on June 30, 2011, from the total amount of unspent fiscal
year 2011 state general fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts
expressly placed into unallotted status by this act, is appropriated
for the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this
section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed one hundred
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for allocation to counties that are eligible for
funding for chemical dependency or substance abuse treatment programs
pursuant to RCW 70.96A.325.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SMALL AGENCY TECHNOLOGY POOL
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the data processing revolving account for the small
agency technology pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,312,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,615,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,927,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the capitol building construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--TRANSITIONAL HOUSING OPERATING AND RENT ACCOUNT
Home Security Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the transitional housing operating and rent account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,870,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the general administration services account for
payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with
the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement,
project number 20081007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Special Account Retirement System Contribution
Increase Revolving Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
increase agency and institution appropriations and public school
funding allocations to reflect increased employer contribution rates in
the public employees' retirement system and the school employees'
retirement system as a result of the provisions of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6157 (calculating compensation for public retirement
purposes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this section shall lapse.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys to dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys to each
dedicated fund or account from the special account retirement
contribution increase revolving account in accordance with schedules
provided by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMMUNITY PRESERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the community preservation and development authority
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--VETERANS INNOVATIONS PROGRAM ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the veterans innovations program account.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,268,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,771,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,281,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating
safety and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,854,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for distribution
to counties for publicly funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,544,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,288,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,374,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,622,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,564,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,950,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation for
distribution to local taxing jurisdictions to mitigate
the unintended revenue redistribution effect of the
sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,038,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for the
Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,308,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for the
Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,676,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,435,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for additional
liquor profits distribution to local
governments . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,677,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,870,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,351,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2009-11 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,543,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2009-11 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control funds
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,296,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest
reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,566,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $10,400,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$10,400,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling and Litter Control Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $15,340,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$14,400,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,740,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $37,060,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$36,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,060,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $93,362,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$100,401,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,763,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $5,050,000 for fiscal year 2010
and $5,050,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,600,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,500,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,500,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed by more
than $26,000,000 the actual amount of the annual
payment to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,098,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
$26,000,000 less than the actual amount of the strategic
contribution supplemental payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,170,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline sales and
use tax account, $31,447,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$33,591,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,038,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For transfer
to the state convention and trade center operations
account, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2010 and $3,100,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $11,000,000 in fiscal
year 2010 and $11,000,000 in fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,961,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Judicial Information Systems Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,500,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Emergency Water Projects Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $390,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $5,550,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$5,550,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,100,000
Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $2,978,000 for fiscal year 2010
and $2,978,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,956,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,194,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $4,194,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,388,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $184,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $184,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,000,000
Budget Stabilization Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,130,000
Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $31,000,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$31,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
city-county assistance account, $5,000,000 on
July 1, 2009, and $5,000,000 on July 1, 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $4,000,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $4,000,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Performance Audits of Government Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $22,120,000 in fiscal year
2010 and $7,120,000 in fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,240,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2007-2009 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 (1) The legislature intends to continue
the work that began in 2007 with the creation of the information
technology work group.
(2) The vice-chair of the house ways and means committee, the chair
of the general government appropriations committee, and the respective
ranking minority members of these two committees shall convene a work
group with representation that includes other interested legislators
from the house of representatives and the senate, and representatives
of the office of the governor, the office of financial management, the
department of information services, state agency chief information
officers, and the technology sector.
(3) The work group will:
(a) Review the findings and recommendations of the 2008-2009 state
information technology study;
(b) Consider how to implement some or all of the study's
recommendations; and
(c) Consider ways the state may improve the administration and
coordination of state information technology and achieve budgetary
efficiencies.
(4) Staff support for the work group shall be provided by the house
of representatives office of program research and the senate committee
services to the extent senators participate in the work group.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(6) The expenses of the work group shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Work group expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(7) The work group may report its findings and recommendations, if
any, in the form of draft legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERPRISE
SERVICES. Agencies may make use of the department of information
services when acquiring information technology services, products, and
assets.
"Information technology services" means the acquisition,
provisioning, or approval of hardware, software, and purchased or
personal services provided by the department of information services.
If an information technology enterprise service is provided by the
department, or an agency has a specific requirement to acquire
hardware, software, or purchased or personal services directly, the
agency shall consult with the department of information services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 CENTRAL SERVICES. The governor shall
convene a work group consisting of representatives from the central
service agencies and their clients to collaborate on methods for
providing commonly needed services to state agencies, including, but
not limited to: Human resource management, employee benefits, payroll,
accounting, purchasing, information technology, real estate services,
facility management, building and grounds maintenance, fleet
management, printing services, and office mail distribution. The work
group should consider the experience of other states and large
organizations and should identify opportunities to improve service
delivery and reduce costs, including, but not limited to:
(1) Simplifying processes and gaining efficiencies;
(2) Using a shared, common service model;
(3) Centralizing services or activities which may lead to
consolidating or eliminating existing programs or state agencies; and
(4) Revising agencies' authority or governance structures.
The work group shall submit a proposal that improves the delivery
of central services to state agencies, including changes to the current
governance structure, organizational changes that improves and
simplifies service delivery, and any statutory changes that may be
necessary to the governor by October 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 NATURAL RESOURCES ORGANIZATIONS. The
governor shall convene a work group consisting of representatives from
the natural resource agencies. The work group shall consider the
experience of other states and their organizational structures to
identify consolidation opportunities to improve service delivery and
reduce costs. The work group shall submit a comprehensive written
recommendation to the governor and the office of financial management
by September 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION.
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under this
act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, agencies
shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that
expenditures are either in, or consistent with, the 2020 action agenda.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT, SEPARATION, AND
DOWNSHIFTING INCENTIVES. As a management tool to reduce costs and make
more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity
and morale, agencies may implement a voluntary retirement, separation,
and/or downshifting incentive program that is cost neutral or results
in cost savings over a two year period following the commencement of
the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director
of financial management.
Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary
retirement, separation, and/or downshifting incentives and options
according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of
financial management, in consultation with the department of personnel
and the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but
are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary separation or
retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary workweek or work
hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or temporary separation
for development purposes. An employee does not have a contractual
right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section.
Offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of
personnel and the department of retirement systems. Agencies are
required to submit a report by June 30, 2011, to the legislature and
the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved
incentive program. The report should include information on the
details of the program including resulting service delivery changes,
agency efficiencies, the cost of the incentive per participant, the
total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings
over the 2009-11 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 ADMINISTRATIVE REDUCTIONS. (1) The
appropriations in this act reflect significant reductions in the
appropriations for the administrative expenses of state government. It
is the intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. Agencies shall review their
management costs and reduce expenditures on salaries and benefits for
management positions as part of these administrative reductions.
(2) To the extent permitted by the applicable personnel system
rules, and to the extent collectively bargained with represented
employees where applicable, the agencies and institutions of state
government are encouraged to achieve the reductions in full-time-equivalent employment and payroll levels necessary to operate within
these appropriations through strategies that will minimize impacts on
employees, their families, their communities, and short- and long-term
accomplishment of the agency's mission. Agencies are encouraged to use
strategies such as reduced work-hours per day or week, voluntary leave
without pay, and temporary furloughs that enable employees to maintain
permanent employment status. Agencies are further encouraged to
implement such strategies in ways that will enable employees to
maintain full insurance benefits, full accrual of retirement service
credit, and a living wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS.
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
nonrepresented and represented state employee health benefits for state
agencies, including institutions of higher education and are subject to
the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $745 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2010. For fiscal year 2011 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $768 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065. During the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the board may only
authorize benefit plans and premium contributions for an employee and
the employee's dependents that are the same, regardless of an
employee's status as represented or nonrepresented under the personnel
system reform act of 2002.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(d) The conditions in this section apply to benefits for
nonrepresented employees, employees represented by the super coalition,
and represented employees outside of the super coalition, including
employees represented under chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2010, through the remainder of the
2009-11 fiscal biennium, the subsidy shall be $182.89.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $59.59 per month beginning
September 1, 2009, and $64.90 beginning September 1, 2010;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $59.59 each month beginning September 1, 2009, and
$64.90 beginning September 1, 2010, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION
RATES. The appropriations for school districts and state agencies,
including institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to agency appropriations to reflect savings resulting from
changes to pension funding as provided in Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6161 (actuarial funding of pension systems). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT
IMPAIRED. Nothing in this act or chapter 5 (ESSB 5460), Laws of 2009
prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of
the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining
agreement in effect on the effective date of chapter 5, Laws of 2009
(February 18, 2009).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 FIRST-TIME HOME BUYERS. To accelerate
the receipt of federal tax credits for first-time home buyers provided
in the 2009 American recovery and relief act, the state housing finance
commission is authorized to obtain services from a qualified public
depositary. The housing finance commission and the state treasurer are
further authorized to enter into an agreement with the selected public
depositary to receive an off-setting deposit of up to $25,000,000 in
state funds. The off-setting deposit shall be made at market rates.
Deposit can only be made from May 1, 2009, until the expiration of the
federal tax credit if an established account with a minimum value of
$400,000, at least $200,000 of which must be cash, exists to finance
first losses, and funds are used consistent with federal requirements.

Sec. 918 RCW 2.68.020 and 2005 c 282 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information
system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of
providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and
providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary.
The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the
purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and
other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and
administration of information services, telecommunications, systems,
software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal
and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 919 RCW 28A.160.130 and 1991 c 114 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a fund on deposit with each county treasurer
for each school district of the county, which shall be known as the
transportation vehicle fund. Money to be deposited into the
transportation vehicle fund shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(a) The balance of accounts held in the general fund of each school
district for the purchase of approved transportation equipment and for
major transportation equipment repairs under RCW 28A.150.280. The
amount transferred shall be the balance of the account as of September
1, 1982;
(b) Reimbursement payments provided for in RCW 28A.160.200 except
those provided under RCW 28A.160.200(((4))) (3) that are necessary for
contracted payments to private carriers;
(c) Earnings from transportation vehicle fund investments as
authorized in RCW 28A.320.300; and
(d) The district's share of the proceeds from the sale of
transportation vehicles, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) Funds in the transportation vehicle fund may be used for the
following purposes:
(a) Purchase of pupil transportation vehicles pursuant to RCW
28A.160.200 and 28A.150.280;
(b) Payment of conditional sales contracts as authorized in RCW
28A.335.200 or payment of obligations authorized in RCW 28A.530.080,
entered into or issued for the purpose of pupil transportation
vehicles;
(c) Major repairs to pupil transportation vehicles;
(d) For the 2009-2011 biennium, a school district that is wholly
contained on an island and has a student enrollment greater than two
hundred fifty students and fewer than five hundred and fifty students
may transfer from the transportation vehicle fund to the school
district's general fund such amounts as necessary for instructional
costs.
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules which
shall establish the standards, conditions, and procedures governing the
establishment and use of the transportation vehicle fund. The rules
shall not permit the transfer of funds from the transportation vehicle
fund to any other fund of the district, except as provided under
subsection (2)(d) of this section.

Sec. 920 RCW 28B.105.110 and 2008 c 329 s 908 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all money received for
the GET ready for math and science scholarship program from
appropriations and private sources. The account shall be
self-sustaining.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students and for purchases of GET units. Purchased GET units
shall be owned and held in trust by the board. Expenditures from the
account shall be an equal match of state appropriations and private
funds raised by the program administrator. During the ((2007-09))
2009-2011 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account not to exceed
five percent may be used by the program administrator to carry out the
provisions of RCW 28B.105.090.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 921 RCW 35.104.060 and 2007 c 251 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out
its purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers, including
the authority may:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(b) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments,
with any public or private entity or person, in accordance with this
chapter;
(c) Employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, financial
advisors, auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and
such other personnel as are necessary or desirable to implement this
chapter;
(d) Establish such special funds, and control deposits to and
disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation
of this chapter;
(e) Enter into contracts with public and private entities for
research to be conducted in this state;
(f) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(g) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the
purposes of this chapter; and
(h) Hire staff and pay administrative costs; however, such expenses
shall be paid from moneys provided by the sponsoring local government
and moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests and the interest
earned on the authority's accounts and investments. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, up to ten percent of the amounts received under
RCW 82.14.480 may be used by a health services and sciences authority
for the purposes of subsections (1)(c) and (h) of this section.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this
chapter, the authority is empowered to:
(a) Use the authority's public moneys, leveraging those moneys with
amounts received from other public and private sources in accordance
with contribution agreements, to promote bioscience-based economic
development, and to advance new therapies and procedures to combat
disease and promote public health;
(b) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into
contribution agreements with private entities and public entities to
receive moneys in consideration of the authority's promise to leverage
those moneys with the revenue generated by the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.480 and contributions from other public entities and private
entities, in order to use those moneys to promote bioscience-based
economic development and advance new therapies and procedures to combat
disease and promote public health;
(c) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use
pursuant to this chapter to promote bioscience-based economic
development and advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease
and promote public health;
(d) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
consistent with its purpose, including the segregation of revenues into
separate funds and accounts;
(e) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract to promote
bioscience-based economic development and advance new therapies and
procedures to combat disease and promote public health. Grant
agreements shall specify the deliverables to be provided by the
recipient pursuant to the grant. Grants to private entities may only
be provided under a contractual agreement that ensures the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention, or the delivery of services that provide for the public
health, safety, and welfare. The authority shall solicit requests for
funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as: (i)
The quality of the proposed research; (ii) its potential to improve
health outcomes, with particular attention to the likelihood that it
will also lower health care costs, substitute for a more costly
diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough treatment for
a particular disease or condition; (iii) its potential to leverage
additional funding; (iv) its potential to provide health care benefits;
(v) its potential to stimulate employment; and (vi) evidence of public
and private collaboration;
(f) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists,
industrialists, and others familiar with health sciences and services;
and
(g) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process
of grant application, review, and reward.
(3) The records of the authority shall be subject to audit by the
office of the state auditor.

Sec. 922 RCW 38.52.106 and 2008 c 329 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Nisqually earthquake account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from tax revenues, budget transfers
or appropriations, federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful
source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support state and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts associated with the
Nisqually earthquake. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake account
to the disaster response account for fire suppression and mobilization
costs. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be used to support disaster response and recovery efforts
associated with flood and storm damage. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually
earthquake account to the disaster response account for disaster
response and recovery efforts associated with flood and storm damage.

Sec. 923 RCW 41.48.060 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 112 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a special account in the state
treasury to be known as the OASI contribution account. Such account
shall consist of and there shall be deposited in such account: (a) All
contributions and penalties collected under RCW 41.48.040 and
41.48.050; (b) all moneys appropriated thereto under this chapter; (c)
any property or securities belonging to the account; and (d) all sums
recovered upon the bond of the custodian or otherwise for losses
sustained by the account and all other moneys received for the account
from any other source. All moneys in the account shall be mingled and
undivided. Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the governor is
vested with full power, authority and jurisdiction over the account,
including all moneys and property or securities belonging thereto, and
may perform any and all acts whether or not specifically designated,
which are necessary to the administration thereof and are consistent
with the provisions of this chapter. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the OASI contribution account may also be
transferred into the OASI revolving fund.
(2) The OASI contribution account shall be established and held
separate and apart from any other funds of the state and shall be used
and administered exclusively for the purpose of this chapter.
Withdrawals from such account shall be made for, and solely for (a)
payment of amounts required to be paid to the secretary of the treasury
pursuant to an agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030; (b) payment
of refunds provided for in RCW 41.48.040(3); and (c) refunds of
overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political subdivision
or instrumentality.
(3) From the OASI contribution account the custodian of the fund
[account] shall pay to the secretary of the treasury such amounts and
at such time or times as may be directed by the governor in accordance
with any agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030 and the social
security act.
(4) The treasurer of the state shall be ex officio treasurer and
custodian of the OASI contribution account and shall administer such
account in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the
directions of the governor and shall pay all warrants drawn upon it in
accordance with the provisions of this section and with the regulations
as the governor may prescribe pursuant thereto.

Sec. 924 RCW 41.50.110 and 2008 c 329 s 911 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43,
and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its
proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the
retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing
biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be
computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire
expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the
employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the
entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to
include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the
end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department
of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are
its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be
made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department.
However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of
billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said
billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia,
the legislature may transfer from the department of retirement systems'
expense fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 925 RCW 43.03.310 and 1998 c 164 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials
shall study the relationship of salaries to the duties of members of
the legislature, all elected officials of the executive branch of state
government, and all judges of the supreme court, court of appeals,
superior courts, and district courts, and shall fix the salary for each
respective position.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in RCW 43.03.305 and this section,
the commission shall be solely responsible for its own organization,
operation, and action and shall enjoy the fullest cooperation of all
state officials, departments, and agencies.
(3) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
their services, but shall be eligible to receive a subsistence
allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among
their number. The commission shall set a schedule of salaries by an
affirmative vote of not less than nine members of the commission.
(5) The commission shall file its initial schedule of salaries for
the elected officials with the secretary of state no later than the
first Monday in June, 1987, and shall file a schedule biennially
thereafter. Each such schedule shall be filed in legislative bill
form, shall be assigned a chapter number and published with the session
laws of the legislature, and shall be codified by the statute law
committee. The signature of the chair of the commission shall be
affixed to each schedule submitted to the secretary of state. The
chair shall certify that the schedule has been adopted in accordance
with the provisions of state law and with the rules, if any, of the
commission. Such schedules shall become effective ninety days after
the filing thereof, except as provided in Article XXVIII, section 1 of
the state Constitution. State laws regarding referendum petitions
shall apply to such schedules to the extent consistent with Article
XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
(6) Before the filing of any salary schedule, the commission shall
first develop a proposed salary schedule and then hold no fewer than
four regular meetings as defined by chapter 42.30 RCW to take public
testimony on the proposed schedule within the four months immediately
preceding the filing. In the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the commission
shall hold no more than two regular meetings as defined by chapter
42.30 RCW to take public testimony on the proposed schedule within the
four months immediately preceding the filing. At the last public
hearing that is held as a regular meeting on the proposed schedule, the
commission shall adopt the salary schedule as originally proposed or as
amended at that meeting that will be filed with the secretary of state.
(7) All meetings, actions, hearings, and business of the commission
shall be subject in full to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.
(8) Salaries of the officials referred to in subsection (1) of this
section that are in effect on January 12, 1987, shall continue until
modified by the commission under this section.

Sec. 926 RCW 43.08.190 and 2008 c 329 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040 or 43.84.092(4). The allocation
shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed
under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall
establish a uniform allocation rate based on the appropriations for the
treasurer's office.
During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 927 RCW 43.09.260 and 1995 c 301 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The examination of the financial affairs of all local
governments shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the
state auditor shall determine. However, an examination of the
financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at least once
in every three years, and an examination of individual local government
health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance
programs shall be made at least once every two years.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall
conduct audits no more often than once every two years of local
governments with annual general fund revenues of ten million dollars or
less and no findings of impropriety for the three-year period
immediately preceding the audit period. This subsection does not
prohibit the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address
suspected fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the local
government governing body; or (c) as required by federal laws or
regulations.
(3) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(4) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern the
auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation of
the various classifications of local governments; a designation of the
frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a description
of events which cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.
(5) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to the
financial condition and resources of the local government; whether the
Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of the
local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have been
properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
(6) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in the
office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the local
government. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance
with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general. If any
such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in
office on the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty
days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney
general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal action as is
proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the same to final
determination to carry into effect the findings of the examination.
(7) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

Sec. 928 RCW 43.09.282 and 2008 c 328 s 6007 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of centralized funding, accounting, and
distribution of the costs of the audits performed on local governments
by the state auditor, there is hereby created an account entitled the
municipal revolving account. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the account. All moneys received by the state auditor or by any
officer or employee thereof shall be deposited with the state treasurer
and credited to the municipal revolving account. Only the state
auditor or the auditor's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. No appropriation is required for expenditures. The state
auditor shall keep such records as are necessary to detail the auditing
costs attributable to the various types of local governments. ((During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
municipal revolving account to the Washington state heritage center
account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.))
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall reduce
the municipal revolving account charges for financial audits performed
on local governments by five percent.

Sec. 929 RCW 43.09.475 and 2006 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The performance audits of government account is hereby created in
the custody of the state treasurer. Revenue identified in RCW
82.08.020(5) and 82.12.0201 shall be deposited in the account. Money
in the account shall be used to fund the performance audits and follow-
up performance audits under RCW 43.09.470 and shall be expended by the
state auditor in accordance with chapter 1, Laws of 2006. Only the
state auditor or the state auditor's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the performance audits of government
account to the state general fund such amounts as deemed to be
appropriate or necessary.

Sec. 930 RCW 43.10.180 and 2007 c 522 s 951 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall keep such records as are necessary
to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served
and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate
accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and
agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs
incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.
(2) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, all
expenses for administration of the office of the attorney general shall
be allocated to and paid from the legal services revolving fund in
accordance with accounting procedures prescribed by the director of
financial management.

Sec. 931 RCW 43.17.390 and 2005 c 384 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Starting ((no later than 2008)) in 2012, and at least once every
three years thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state
quality award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment
of its quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.

Sec. 932 RCW 43.19.501 and 2008 c 328 s 6016 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the
state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account
may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by
the department of general administration in Thurston county. For the
2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for predesign
identified in section 1037, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the Thurston county capital facilities account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account.

Sec. 933 RCW 43.21A.667 and 2005 c 464 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The freshwater aquatic algae control account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW 88.02.050 must
be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may only be
used as provided in this section. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) Funds in the freshwater aquatic algae control account may be
appropriated to the department to develop a freshwater aquatic algae
control program. Funds must be expended as follows:
(a) As grants to cities, counties, tribes, special purpose
districts, and state agencies to manage excessive freshwater algae,
with priority for the treatment of lakes in which harmful algal blooms
have occurred within the past three years; and during the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium to provide grants for sea lettuce research and removal
to assist Puget Sound communities that are impacted by hyperblooms of
sea lettuce; and
(b) To provide technical assistance to applicants and the public
about aquatic algae control.
(3) The department shall submit a biennial report to the
appropriate legislative committees describing the actions taken to
implement this section along with suggestions on how to better fulfill
the intent of chapter 464, Laws of 2005. The first report is due
December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
The universal vaccine purchase account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Receipts from public and private sources for the
purpose of increasing access to vaccines for children may be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account must be used
exclusively for the purchase of vaccines, at no cost to health care
providers in Washington, to administer to children under nineteen years
old who are not eligible to receive vaccines at no cost through federal
programs. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 935 RCW 43.79.201 and 1995 c 399 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions
account is hereby created, in the state treasury, into which account
there shall be deposited all moneys arising from the sale, lease or
transfer of the land granted by the United States government to the
state for charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions
by section 17 of the enabling act, or otherwise set apart for such
institutions, except all moneys arising from the sale, lease, or
transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of such land
assigned for the support of the University of Washington by chapter 91,
Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.
(2) If feasible, not less than one-half of all income to the
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account
shall be appropriated for the purpose of providing housing, including
repair and renovation of state institutions, for persons ((who are
mentally ill, developmentally disabled)) with mental illness or
developmental disabilities, or youth who are blind, deaf, or otherwise
disabled. If moneys are appropriated for community-based housing, the
moneys shall be appropriated to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for the housing assistance program under chapter
43.185 RCW. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 936 RCW 43.79.460 and 2009 c 4 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated
to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures from the account.
(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may
create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable
to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial
management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.
Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the
authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for
the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state,
such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish
new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or
incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.
(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state
general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a
fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board
reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations
for:
(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the
extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have
been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program.
"Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for
which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third
parties or other entities;
(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;
(c) A specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an
appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not
achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or
limitation;
(d) Debt service on state obligations; and
(e) State retirement system obligations.
(4) The office of financial management, after consulting with the
legislative fiscal committees, shall report to the treasurer the amount
of savings incentives achieved. By December 1, ((1998)) 2010, and each
December 1st thereafter, the office of financial management shall
submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the
implementation of this section. The report shall (a) evaluate the
impact of this section on agency reversions and end-of-biennium
expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency expenditures from the
savings recovery account. The office of financial management is
relieved from having to submit a report by December 1, 2008.
(5) For fiscal year 2009, the legislature may transfer from the
savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state
general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008.

Sec. 937 RCW 43.79.480 and 2005 c 424 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the health services account for the purposes set forth
in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco prevention and control account for
purposes set forth in this section. The legislature shall transfer
amounts received as strategic contribution payments as defined in RCW
43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery fund created in RCW
43.350.070. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer less than the entire strategic contribution payments.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the
state general fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 938 RCW 43.83B.360 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 33 are each amended
to read as follows:
The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 43.83B.300,
and 43.83B.355 through 43.83B.375 shall be deposited in the state
emergency water projects revolving account, hereby created in the state
treasury, and shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in
RCW 43.83B.300, and 43.83B.355 through 43.83B.375 and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of such bonds. During
the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
state emergency water projects revolving account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 939 RCW 43.135.045 and 2007 c 520 s 6035 and 2007 c 484 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The student achievement fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(2) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the education construction fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.

Sec. 940 RCW 43.155.050 and 2008 c 328 s 6002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. ((For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used
for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of
2005, for the infrastructure investment system implementation plan
identified in section 1022, chapter 328, Laws of 2008; for the interest
rate buy-down pilot program identified in section 1004, chapter 328,
Laws of 2008; and for the housing assistance, weatherization, and
affordable housing program identified in section 1005, chapter 328,
Laws of 2008.)) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general
fund and the city-county assistance account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. ((Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2).)) Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. ((The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.))

Sec. 941 RCW 43.215.125 and 2008 c 164 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Within existing funds)) For the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, to
the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the department
shall develop a proposal for implementing a statewide Washington head
start program. To the extent possible while maintaining quality
standards, the proposal should align the state early childhood
education and assistance program with federal head start program
eligibility criteria, guidelines, performance standards, and
methods/processes for ensuring continuous improvement in program
quality. In this proposal, the department shall make recommendations
that:
(a) Identify federal head start program guidelines, performance
measures and standards, or other requirements for which state
flexibility would be recommended. This shall include an analysis of
how state flexibility may impact outcomes for children and how that
flexibility might deviate from outcomes associated with the federal
standards. Areas to be examined must include, but are not limited to,
transportation requirements, service hour configurations, delivery
methods, and impact on rural programs;
(b) Provide comparative data regarding child performance,
readiness, and educational outcomes for Washington's existing head
start and early childhood education and assistance programs;
(c) Determine the alignment between head start standards and the
recommendations of Washington learns;
(d) Identify any change in the state early childhood education and
assistance program laws that would be required to implement the
Washington head start proposal;
(e) Identify additional resources needed to meet federal guidelines
and standards. Areas to be examined must include, but are not limited
to: Per-child funding levels, professional development and training
needs, facilities needs, and technical assistance;
(f) Identify state early childhood education and assistance
programs that do and do not offer full-day, full-year services to
children, and what transition steps would be needed for these programs
to operate in the same manner as federal head start programs;
(g) Provide steps for phasing-in the Washington head start
proposal;
(h) Include a timeline, strategy, and funding needs to implement a
statewide, state-supported early head start program as a component of
the Washington head start proposal; and
(i) Detail the process the department would take with the regional
office of federal head start in identifying any exceptions or waivers
needed to provide flexibility and maintain high quality standards.
(2) In developing its recommendations for this proposal, the
department shall seek, where appropriate and available, training or
technical assistance from the appropriate regional office of federal
head start in order to maximize nonstate resources that might be
available for the consultative work and research involved with
developing this proposal. The department also shall consult with and
solicit input from:
(a) State early childhood education and assistance program
providers on Indian reservations and across the state, including
providers who operate solely state-supported programs;
(b) Tribal governments operating head start programs and early head
start programs in the state to ensure that the needs of Indian and
Alaskan native children and their families are incorporated into the
recommendations of the proposal, especially as they pertain to
standards or guidelines around language acquisition, school readiness,
availability and need for services among Indian and Alaskan native
children and their families, and curriculum development; and
(c) Providers operating migrant and seasonal head start programs in
the state in order to address the needs of the children of migrant and
seasonal farmworker families.
(3) The department shall make recommendations on how it would
periodically review the standards and guidelines within the Washington
head start program, including incorporation of the latest research and
information on early childhood development as well as any new
innovations that may further improve outcomes to low-income children
and their families.
(4) The department's recommendations on a Washington head start
proposal shall include how the proposal aligns with the department's
current statutory duties. The recommendations shall also include any
other options that may improve the quality of state-supported early
learning programs.
(5) The department shall deliver its report to the governor and
legislature by December 1, 2009.

Sec. 942 RCW 43.325.040 and 2007 c 348 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from appropriations made to the account and any loan
payments of principal and interest derived from loans made under this
chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for assistance for projects consistent with this chapter
or otherwise authorized by the legislature.
(2) The green energy incentive account is created in the state
treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All receipts
from appropriations made to the green energy incentive account shall be
deposited into the account, and may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for:
(a) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;
(b) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids, including grants provided
for the electrification program set forth in RCW 43.325.110; and
(c) Demonstration projects developed with state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and local governments that result in the
design and building of a hydrogen vehicle fueling station.
(3) Any state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom
account is prohibited from retaining greater than three percent of any
funding provided from the energy freedom account for administrative
overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting
the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is
designed to produce unless this provision is waived in writing by the
director.
(4) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not a state
agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is prohibited
from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding provided
from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or other
deductions not directly associated with conducting the research,
projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to
produce.
(5) Subsections (2) through (4) of this section do not apply to
assistance awarded for projects under RCW 43.325.020(3).
(6) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the energy freedom account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 943 RCW 43.330.250 and 2008 c 329 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
economic development commission, may authorize expenditures from the
account.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund a minimum of one staff position for the economic
development commission and to cover any other operational costs of the
commission.
(4) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys in
the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.
(5) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Workforce development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; and
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited
to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be
provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention.
(6) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the business or facility to secure funding from other
state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state
support;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(7) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended
from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or
facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.
(8) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds
fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of fifteen
million dollars shall be transferred to the education construction
account.

Sec. 944 RCW 46.09.170 and 2007 c 522 s 953 and 2007 c 241 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the ((2007-09)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance in the NOVA account to the department of natural resources
((for planning and designing)) to install consistent off-road vehicle
signage at department-managed recreation sites, and ((for planning)) to
implement the recreation opportunities on department-managed lands in
the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest, and to the state parks and
recreation commission for maintenance and operation of parks and to
improve accessibility for boaters and off-road vehicle users. This
appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 945 RCW 46.66.080 and 2007 c 199 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington auto theft prevention authority account is
created in the state treasury, subject to appropriation. All revenues
from the traffic infraction surcharge in RCW 46.63.110(7)(b) and all
receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from
public and private sources to support the activities of the auto theft
prevention authority must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for activities relating to motor
vehicle theft, including education, prevention, law enforcement,
investigation, prosecution, and confinement. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account for criminal justice
purposes and community building.
(2) The authority shall allocate moneys appropriated from the
account to public agencies for the purpose of establishing,
maintaining, and supporting programs that are designed to prevent motor
vehicle theft, including:
(a) Financial support to prosecution agencies to increase the
effectiveness of motor vehicle theft prosecution;
(b) Financial support to a unit of local government or a team
consisting of units of local governments to increase the effectiveness
of motor vehicle theft enforcement;
(c) Financial support for the procurement of equipment and
technologies for use by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of
enforcing motor vehicle theft laws; and
(d) Financial support for programs that are designed to educate and
assist the public in the prevention of motor vehicle theft.
(3) The costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of the
moneys in the account in any one year so that the greatest possible
portion of the moneys available to the authority is expended on
combating motor vehicle theft.
(4) Prior to awarding any moneys from the Washington auto theft
prevention authority account for motor vehicle theft enforcement, the
auto theft prevention authority must verify that the financial award
includes sufficient funding to cover proposed activities, which
include, but are not limited to: (a) State, municipal, and county
offender and juvenile confinement costs; (b) administration costs; (c)
law enforcement costs; (d) prosecutor costs; and (e) court costs, with
a priority being given to ensuring that sufficient funding is available
to cover state, municipal, and county offender and juvenile confinement
costs.
(5) Moneys expended from the Washington auto theft prevention
authority account under subsection (2) of this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other moneys that are available for motor
vehicle theft prevention.
(6) Grants provided under subsection (2) of this section constitute
reimbursement for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

Sec. 946 RCW 50.16.010 and 2009 c 4 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(viii) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) ((During the 2007-2009 biennium)) Except as provided in (d) of
this subsection, moneys available in the administrative contingency
fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW
50.24.014(((1)(a))), shall be expended ((as appropriated by the
legislature for the (i) cost of the job skills or worker retraining
programs at the community and technical colleges and administrative
costs at the state board for community and technical colleges, and (ii)
reemployment services such as business and project development
assistance, local economic development capacity building, and local
economic development financial assistance at the department of
community, trade, and economic development, and the remaining
appropriation)) upon the direction of the commissioner, with the
approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such
expenditure is necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d)(i) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys available in
the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for: (A) The cost of the job skills or
worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and
administrative costs at the state board for community and technical
colleges; and (B) reemployment services such as business and project
development assistance, local economic development capacity building,
and local economic development financial assistance at the department
of community, trade, and economic development. The remaining
appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.
(ii) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended by the
department of social and health services as appropriated by the
legislature for employment and training services and programs in the
WorkFirst program, and for the administrative costs of state agencies
participating in the WorkFirst program. The remaining appropriation
may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.
(4) Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a)
may only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified
in this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 947 RCW 66.08.170 and 2002 c 371 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund", which
shall consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the board. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by
the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an
amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law
shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state
treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the
liquor revolving fund. During the ((2001-2003)) 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the liquor revolving
account to the state general fund ((such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the fund and reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings)) and
may direct an additional amount of liquor profits to be distributed to
local governments. Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional
distribution of liquor profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may reduce the excess fund distributions that
otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. Disbursements from the
revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly
authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall
be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such
fund.

Sec. 948 RCW 67.40.040 and 2008 c 329 s 917 and 2008 c 328 s 6011
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170, and during the
((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state convention and trade center account ((to the Washington
housing trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the account; and during the 2007-2009 biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state convention and trade center account)) to the
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
account;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center;
(iv) For debt service for the acquisition, design, and construction
and retrofit of the museum of history and industry museum property or
other future expansions of the convention center as approved by the
legislature; and
(v) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this section,
starting in fiscal year 2008, and except for the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium in which no transfers shall be made, the state treasurer shall
transfer:
(a) The sum of four million dollars, or as much as may be available
pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the state
convention and trade center account to the tourism enterprise account,
with the maximum transfer being four million dollars per fiscal year;
and
(b) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much as may be
available pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the
state convention and trade center account to the tourism development
and promotion account, with the maximum transfer being five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year.
(6)(a) Funds required for debt service payments and reserves for
bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030; for debt service authorized under RCW
67.40.170; and for the issuance and sale of financial instruments
associated with the acquisition, design, construction, and retrofit of
the museum of history and industry museum property or for other future
expansions of the center, as approved by the legislature, shall be
maintained within the state convention and trade center account.
(b) Except for during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, during which
no reserve shall be retained, no less than six million one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per year shall be retained in the state
convention and trade center account for funding capital maintenance as
required by the center's long-term capital plan, facility enhancements,
unanticipated replacements, and operating reserves for the convention
center operation. This amount shall be escalated annually as follows:
(i) Four percent for annual inflation for capital maintenance,
repairs, and replacement;
(ii) An additional two percent for enhancement to the facility; and
(iii) An additional three percent for growth in expenditure due to
aging of the facility and the need to maintain an operating reserve.
(c) Sufficient funds shall be reserved within the state convention
and trade center account to fund operating appropriations for the
annual operation of the convention center.

Sec. 949 RCW 67.70.190 and 2005 c 427 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unclaimed prizes shall be retained in the state lottery account for
the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days after the
drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end of the
game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize within this
time, all rights to the prize shall be extinguished, and the prize
shall be retained in the state lottery fund for further use as prizes,
except that one-third of all unclaimed prize money shall be deposited
in the economic development strategic reserve account created in RCW
43.330.250.
On July 1, 2009, June 30, 2010, and June 30, 2011, all unclaimed
prize money retained in the state lottery fund in excess of three
million dollars, excluding amounts distributed to the economic
development strategic reserve account, shall be transferred into the
state general fund.

Sec. 950 RCW 70.93.180 and 2005 c 518 s 939 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the "waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account". Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide, for the
biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the
department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the
funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for
waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local
governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving
program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used
to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;
(b) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding
programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities
by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the
department of ecology; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction
and recycling efforts.
(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling
programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to
provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the
department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of
reaching a zero litter goal.
(4) During the ((2005-2007)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and
litter control account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, this transfer shall be treated as an
expenditure for litter collection.

Sec. 951 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2008 c 329 s 921, 2008 c 329 s 920,
2008 c 329 s 919, and 2008 c 328 s 6009 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; ((and))
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150; and
(xiii) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, shoreline update
technical assistance.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) ((Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(d))) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department
shall partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups.
The department is authorized to use the following additional strategies
in order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) Except during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall
be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be
adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The
primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by
persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to
implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities.
((However, during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, funding may not be
granted to entities engaged in lobbying activities, and applicants may
not be awarded grants if their cumulative grant awards under this
section exceed two hundred thousand dollars.)) No grant may exceed
sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys
appropriated for public participation from either account which are not
expended at the close of any biennium shall revert to the state toxics
control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia,
the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to
((the state toxics control)) either the state general fund or the oil
spill prevention account, or both such amounts as reflect excess fund
balance in the account.
(9) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the local
toxics control account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at
Neah Bay, local government shoreline update grants, private and public
sector diesel equipment retrofit, and oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response activities.
(10) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 952 RCW 71.24.310 and 2006 c 333 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and
this chapter can be most efficiently and effectively implemented as
part of the regional support network defined in RCW 71.24.025. For
this reason, the legislature intends that the department and the
regional support networks shall work together to implement chapter
71.05 RCW as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2006, regional support networks shall recommend to
the department the number of state hospital beds that should be
allocated for use by each regional support network. The statewide
total allocation shall not exceed the number of state hospital beds
offering long-term inpatient care, as defined in this chapter, for
which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act.
(2) If there is consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of state hospital beds that should be allocated
for use by each regional support network, the department shall contract
with each regional support network accordingly.
(3) If there is not consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of beds that should be allocated for use by each
regional support network, the department shall establish by emergency
rule the number of state hospital beds that are available for use by
each regional support network. The emergency rule shall be effective
September 1, 2006. The primary factor used in the allocation shall be
the estimated number of ((acutely and chronically mentally ill)) adults
with acute and chronic mental illness in each regional support network
area, based upon population-adjusted incidence and utilization.
(4) The allocation formula shall be updated at least every three
years to reflect demographic changes, and new evidence regarding the
incidence of acute and chronic mental illness and the need for long-term inpatient care. In the updates, the statewide total allocation
shall include (a) all state hospital beds offering long-term inpatient
care for which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act;
plus (b) the estimated equivalent number of beds or comparable
diversion services contracted in accordance with subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) The department is encouraged to enter performance-based
contracts with regional support networks to provide some or all of the
regional support network's allocated long-term inpatient treatment
capacity in the community, rather than in the state hospital. The
performance contracts shall specify the number of patient days of care
available for use by the regional support network in the state
hospital.
(6) If a regional support network uses more state hospital patient
days of care than it has been allocated under subsection (3) or (4) of
this section, or than it has contracted to use under subsection (5) of
this section, whichever is less, it shall reimburse the department for
that care. The reimbursement rate per day shall be the hospital's
total annual budget for long-term inpatient care, divided by the total
patient days of care assumed in development of that budget.
(7) One-half of any reimbursements received pursuant to subsection
(6) of this section shall be used to support the cost of operating the
state hospital and, during calendar year 2009, implementing new
services that will enable a regional support network to reduce its
utilization of the state hospital. The department shall distribute the
remaining half of such reimbursements among regional support networks
that have used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of
care at that hospital, proportional to the number of patient days of
care not used.

Sec. 953 RCW 74.08A.340 and 2008 c 329 s 922 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall operate the
Washington WorkFirst program authorized under RCW 74.08A.200 through
74.08A.330, 43.330.145, 43.215.545, and 74.25.040, and chapter 74.12
RCW within the following constraints:
(1) The full amount of the temporary assistance for needy families
block grant, plus qualifying state expenditures as appropriated in the
biennial operating budget, shall be appropriated to the department each
year in the biennial appropriations act to carry out the provisions of
the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330,
43.330.145, 43.215.545, and 74.25.040, and chapter 74.12 RCW.
(2)(a) The department may expend funds defined in subsection (1) of
this section in any manner that will effectively accomplish the outcome
measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 with the following exception:
Beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium, funds that constitute the
working connections child care program, child care quality programs,
and child care licensing functions.
(b) Beginning in the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
shall appropriate and the departments of early learning and social and
health services shall expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this
section that constitute the working connections child care program,
child care quality programs, and child care licensing functions in a
manner that is consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410.
(c) No more than fifteen percent of the amount provided in
subsection (1) of this section may be spent for administrative
purposes. For the purpose of this subsection, "administrative
purposes" does not include expenditures for information technology and
computerization needed for tracking and monitoring required by P.L.
104-193. The department shall not increase grant levels to recipients
of the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and
43.330.145 and chapter 74.12 RCW, except as authorized in the omnibus
appropriations act for the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium.
(3) The department shall implement strategies that accomplish the
outcome measures identified in RCW 74.08A.410 that are within the
funding constraints in this section. Specifically, the department
shall implement strategies that will cause the number of cases in the
program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and 43.330.145
and chapter 74.12 RCW to decrease by at least fifteen percent during
the 1997-99 biennium and by at least five percent in the subsequent
biennium. The department may transfer appropriation authority between
funding categories within the economic services program in order to
carry out the requirements of this subsection.
(4) The department shall monitor expenditures against the
appropriation levels provided for in subsection (1) of this section.
The department shall quarterly make a determination as to whether
expenditure levels will exceed available funding and communicate its
finding to the legislature. If the determination indicates that
expenditures will exceed funding at the end of the fiscal year, the
department shall take all necessary actions to ensure that all services
provided under this chapter shall be made available only to the extent
of the availability and level of appropriation made by the legislature.

Sec. 954 RCW 74.13.621 and 2005 c 439 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall establish an
oversight committee to monitor, guide, and report on kinship care
recommendations and implementation activities. The committee shall:
(a) Draft a kinship care definition that is restricted to persons
related by blood, marriage, or adoption, including marriages that have
been dissolved, or for a minor defined as an "Indian child" under the
federal Indian child welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), the
definition of "extended family member" under the federal Indian child
welfare act, and a set of principles. If the committee concludes that
one or more programs or services would be more efficiently and
effectively delivered under a different definition of kin, it shall
state what definition is needed, and identify the program or service in
the report. It shall also provide evidence of how the program or
service will be more efficiently and effectively delivered under the
different definition. The department shall not adopt rules or policies
changing the definition of kin without authorizing legislation;
(b) Monitor and provide consultation on the implementation of
recommendations contained in the 2002 kinship care report, including
but not limited to the recommendations relating to legal and respite
care services and resources;
(c) Partner with nonprofit organizations and private sector
businesses to guide a public education awareness campaign; and
(d) Assist with developing future recommendations on kinship care
issues.
(2) The department shall consult with the oversight committee on
its efforts to better collaborate and coordinate services to benefit
kinship care families.
(3) The oversight committee must consist of a minimum of thirty
percent kinship caregivers, who shall represent a diversity of kinship
families. Statewide representation with geographic, ethnic, and gender
diversity is required. Other members shall include representatives of
the department, representatives of relevant state agencies,
representatives of the private nonprofit and business sectors, child
advocates, representatives of Washington state Indian tribes as defined
under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), and
representatives of the legal or judicial field. Birth parents, foster
parents, and others who have an interest in these issues may also be
included.
(4) To the extent funding is available, the department may
reimburse nondepartmental members of the oversight committee for costs
incurred in participating in the meetings of the oversight committee.
(5) The kinship care oversight committee shall update the
legislature and governor annually on committee activities, with the
first update due by January 1, 2006.
(6) This section expires ((January 1, 2010)) June 30, 2011.

Sec. 955 RCW 77.12.820 and 1997 c 422 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The eastern Washington pheasant enhancement account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts under RCW 77.12.810
must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account are subject to
legislative appropriation and shall be used for the purpose of funding
the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement program. The department
may use moneys from the account to improve pheasant habitat or to
purchase or produce pheasants. Except as otherwise provided in the
omnibus appropriations act for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, not less
than eighty percent of expenditures from the account must be used to
purchase or produce pheasants. The eastern Washington pheasant
enhancement account funds must not be used for the purchase of land.
The account may be used to offer grants to improve pheasant habitat on
public or private lands that are open to public hunting. The
department may enter partnerships with private landowners, nonprofit
corporations, cooperative groups, and federal or state agencies for the
purposes of pheasant habitat enhancement in areas that will be
available for public hunting.

Sec. 956 RCW 77.32.010 and 2008 c 329 s 923 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.
(3) During the ((2007-09)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 957 RCW 79.64.040 and 2007 c 522 s 958 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way
issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands,
provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from
agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection
with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands
other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable
waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department
pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of
navigable waters.
(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the
moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the
contract harvesting sale.
(5) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of this
section may be increased up to thirty percent by the board((, provided
the total amount deducted does not exceed the total appropriations in
the operating and capital budgets for the fiscal period. At the end of
the fiscal period, any amounts deducted in excess of the appropriations
shall be transferred to the appropriate beneficiary distribution
accounts)).

Sec. 958 RCW 79A.25.080 and 2007 c 241 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys transferred to the recreation resource account from the
marine fuel tax refund account may be used when appropriated by the
legislature, as well as any federal or other funds now or hereafter
available, to pay the office and necessary administrative and
coordinative costs of the recreation and conservation funding board
established by RCW 79A.25.110. All moneys so transferred, except those
appropriated as aforesaid, shall be divided into two equal shares and
shall be used to benefit watercraft recreation in this state as
follows:
(((1))) (a) One share as grants to state agencies for (((a))) (i)
acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine
recreation land, (((b))) (ii) capital improvement and renovation of
marine recreation land, including periodic dredging in accordance with
subsection (((3))) (2) of this section, if needed, to maintain or make
the facility more useful, or (((c))) (iii) matching funds in any case
where federal or other funds are made available on a matching basis for
purposes described in (a)(i) or (((b))) (ii) of this subsection;
(((2))) (b) One share as grants to public bodies to help finance
(((a))) (i) acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in,
marine recreation land, or (((b))) (ii) capital improvement and
renovation of marine recreation land, including periodic dredging in
accordance with subsection (((3))) (2) of this section, if needed, to
maintain or make the facility more useful. A public body is authorized
to use a grant, together with its own contribution, as matching funds
in any case where federal or other funds are made available for
purposes described in (a)(i) or (((b))) (ii) of this subsection. The
board may prescribe further terms and conditions for the making of
grants in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(((3))) (2) For the purposes of this section "periodic dredging" is
limited to dredging of materials that have been deposited in a channel
due to unforeseen events. This dredging should extend the expected
usefulness of the facility for at least five years.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
recreation resource account to the state parks and recreation
commission for maintenance and operation of parks and to improve
accessibility for boaters and off-road vehicle users. This
appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section.

Sec. 959 RCW 79.105.150 and 2008 c 299 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2009-11
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands
enhancement account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
excess fund balance of the account.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 960 RCW 80.36.430 and 2004 c 254 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded by
a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access lines and by
funds from any federal government or other programs for this purpose.
Switched access lines are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The telephone
assistance excise tax shall be applied equally to all residential and
business access lines not to exceed fourteen cents per month. The
department shall submit an approved annual budget for the Washington
telephone assistance program to the department of revenue no later than
March 1st prior to the beginning of each fiscal year. The department
of revenue shall then determine the amount of telephone assistance
excise tax to be placed on each switched access line and shall inform
local exchange companies and the utilities and transportation
commission of this amount no later than May 1st. The department of
revenue shall determine the amount of telephone assistance excise tax
by dividing the total of the program budget funded by the telephone
assistance excise tax, as submitted by the department, by the total
number of switched access lines in the prior calendar year. The
telephone assistance excise tax shall be separately identified on each
ratepayer's bill as the "Washington telephone assistance program." All
money collected from the telephone assistance excise tax shall be
transferred to a telephone assistance fund administered by the
department.
(2) Local exchange companies shall bill the fund for their expenses
incurred in offering the telephone assistance program, including
administrative and program expenses. The department shall disburse the
money to the local exchange companies. The department is exempted from
having to conclude a contract with local exchange companies in order to
effect this reimbursement. The department shall recover its
administrative costs from the fund. The department may specify by rule
the range and extent of administrative and program expenses that will
be reimbursed to local exchange companies.
(3) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development for an amount
not to exceed eight percent of the prior fiscal year's total revenue
for the administrative and program expenses of providing community
service voice mail services. The community service voice mail service
may include toll-free lines in community action agencies through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no
charge.
(4) During the 2009-2011 biennium, the department shall enter into
an agreement with the military department for one million dollars to
support the WIN 211 program.

Sec. 961 RCW 86.26.007 and 2005 c 518 s 947 are each amended to
read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the general
fund to the flood control assistance account. Each biennium thereafter
the state treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the
general fund to the flood control assistance account, except that
during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall
transfer two million dollars from the general fund to the flood control
assistance account. Moneys in the flood control assistance account may
be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 962 Section 940 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 963 Section 946 of this act expires June 30,
2016.

(End of part)

PART X
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2009 c 4 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,807,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,053,000))
$35,483,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,420,000))
$70,850,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the legislature to contract
for an independent economic and actuarial analysis of health care
reform proposals pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6333.
The results of this evaluation will be submitted to the governor, the
health and fiscal policy committees of the legislature, and the work
group by December 15, 2008.

Sec. 1002 2009 c 4 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,092,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,765,000))
$16,813,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,857,000))
$32,905,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for chapter 34, Laws of 2007
(Senate Bill No. 5351, court of appeals judges' travel).
(2) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $376,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1003 2009 c 4 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,659,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,239,000))
$33,294,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,558,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,694,000))
$23,713,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,923,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,423,000))
$157,497,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs. Funding distributed in this subsection shall not
be used to supplant existing local funding for the court-appointed
special advocates program.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $1,500,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,500,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court
for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035.
The office of the administrator for the courts shall develop an
interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on
the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified
mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of
process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.
(3)(a) $1,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,641,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $6,612,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $6,612,000 of
the public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in
need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for
the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(4) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(5) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of the juror pay pilot
and research project.
(6) $830,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving interpreter services
at the trial court level.
(a) Of these amounts, $170,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $170,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts in
developing and implementing language assistance plans. The
administrator of the courts, in consultation with the interpreter
commission, shall adopt language assistance plan standards consistent
with chapters 2.42 and 2.43 RCW. The standards shall include
guidelines on local community input, provisions on notifying court
users on the right and methods to obtain an interpreter, information on
training for judges and court personnel, procedures for identifying and
appointing an interpreter, access to translations of commonly used
forms, and processes to evaluate the development and implementation of
the plan.
(b) Of these amounts, $610,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $950,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts with
interpreter services. In order to be eligible for assistance, a trial
court must have completed a language assistance plan consistent with
the standards established in (a) of this subsection that is approved by
the administrator of the courts and submit the amounts spent annually
on interpreter services for fiscal years 2005, 2006, and 2007. The
funding in this subsection (b) shall not be used to supplant existing
funding and cannot be used for any purpose other than assisting trial
courts with interpreter services. At the end of the fiscal year,
recipients shall report to the administrator of the court the amount
the trial court spent on interpreter services.
(c) $50,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely to the administrator of the courts for
administration of this subsection. By December 1, 2009, the
administrator of the courts shall report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature: (i) The number of trial courts
in the state that have completed a language assistance plan; (ii) the
number of trial courts in the state that have not completed a language
assistance plan; (iii) the number of trial courts in the state that
received assistance under this subsection, the amount of the
assistance, and the amount each trial court spent on interpreter
services for fiscal years 2005 through 2008 and fiscal year 2009 to
date.
(7) $443,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $543,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. Within the amounts provided:
(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for developing training materials for the
family court liaisons.
(b) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for reimbursement costs related to
the family law handbook;
(c) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to counties to
provide guardian ad litem services for the indigent for a reduced or
waived fee;
(d) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementing the data tracking
provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution).
(8)(a) $20,458,000 of the judicial information systems account--state appropriation is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the core case management system. In expending the
funds provided within this subsection, the following conditions must
first be satisfied before any subsequent funds may be expended:
(i) Completion of feasibility studies detailing linkages between
the objectives of the core case management system and the following:
The technology efforts required and the impacts of the new investments
on existing infrastructure and business functions, including the
estimated fiscal impacts to the judicial information systems account
and the near general fund accounts; the alignment of critical system
requirements of varying size courts at the municipal, district, and
superior court level with their respective proposed business processes
resulting from business process engineering, and detail on the costs
and other impacts to the courts for providing critical business
requirements not addressed by new common business processes; the
specific requirements and business process needs of state agencies
dependent on data exchange with the judicial information system; and
the results from a proof of implementation phase; and
(ii) Discussion with and presentation to the department of
information systems and the information services board regarding the
impact on the state agencies dependent on successful data exchange with
the judicial information system and the results of the feasibility
studies.
(b) The judicial information systems committee shall provide
quarterly updates to the appropriate committees of the legislature and
the department of information systems on the status of implementation
of the core case management system.
(c) The legislature respectfully requests the judicial information
systems committee invite representatives from the state agencies
dependent on successful data exchange to their regular meetings for
consultation as nonvoting members.
(9) $534,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No.
5320 (public guardianship office). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $29,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(11) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2822 (family and juvenile court). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2903 (access coordinator). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $207,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(14) $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the 53rd superior court judge position
in King county. The amounts provided in this subsection shall be
expended only if the judge is appointed and serving on the bench.

Sec. 1004 2009 c 4 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,863,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,782,000))
$21,205,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,279,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,337,000))
$8,442,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,342,000
Election Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,511,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,128,000))
$118,884,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,290,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,556,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29A.52.330.
(4)(a) $2,465,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,501,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2007-09 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for humanities Washington's "we
the people" community conversations program.
(6) $575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for settlement costs and attorney fees
resulting from the resolution of Washington Association of Churches, et
al. v. Reed, United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Seattle, Case No. CV06-0726RSM.

Sec. 1005 2009 c 4 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,541,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,960,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,228,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($229,579,000))
$231,391,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($249,295,000))
$251,107,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $9,446,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increases in salaries and benefits
of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2007. This funding is
provided solely for increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems, and shall not be used for the performance
management program or to fund general administration. The attorney
general shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by October
1, 2008, and provide detailed demographic information regarding
assistant attorneys general who received increased salaries and
benefits as a result of the appropriation. The report shall include at
a minimum information regarding the years of service, division
assignment within the attorney general's office, and client agencies
represented by assistant attorneys general receiving increased salaries
and benefits as a result of the amount provided in this subsection.
The report shall include a proposed salary schedule for all assistant
attorneys general using the same factors used to determine increased
salaries under this section. The report shall also provide initial
findings regarding the effect of the increases on recruitment and
retention of assistant attorneys general.
(4) $69,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $44,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972
(surface mining reclamation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $110,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3274 (port district contracting). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $346,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of sections 2 and
3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term
well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $492,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(9) The agency shall submit a staffing model that supports the need
for increased resources due to casework associated with the sexually
violent predator population to the office of financial management and
the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31, 2008.
(10) The attorney general shall deposit to the health services
account at least $680,000 from the cy pres monetary portion of the
consent decree in settlement of the consumer protection act litigation
against Caremark Rx, LLC (King county superior court cause no. 08-2-06098-5). These moneys shall be expended pursuant to legislative
appropriation consistent with the terms of the consent decree.

Sec. 1006 2009 c 4 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,485,000))
$33,835,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,934,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,121,000))
$83,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to continue the agricultural pilot programs that identify
projects to enhance farm income and improve natural resource
protection. Specific work will include project outreach and
refinement, stakeholder support, staffing the oversight committee,
seeking federal and private match funding, and further refining the
list of projects to be recommended for funding.
(2) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $254,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to fund "proof-of-concept" model and projects recommended by the
oversight committee, as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $505,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the association of Washington
cities and the Washington state association of counties for improving
project permitting and mitigation processes.
(4) $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to develop statewide multiagency permits for transportation
infrastructure and other projects that integrate local, state, and
federal permit requirements and mitigation standards.
(5) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5122 (regulatory assistance programs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement chapter 139, Laws of
2007 (student transportation funding) which requires development of two
options for a new K-12 pupil transportation funding formula.
(7) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for financial assistance to local
government agencies in counties representing populations of fewer than
350,000 residents for the acquisition and development of streamlined
permitting technology infrastructure through an integrated business
portal approach. Grant awards may not exceed $100,000 per local
government agency per fiscal year. The funding must be used to acquire
and implement permit tracking systems that can support and are
compatible with a multijurisdictional, integrated approach. Prior to
granting funds, the office of regulatory assistance shall ensure that
the proposed systems and technology are based on open-industry
standards, allow for future integration of processes and sharing of
data, and are extendable.
(8) $474,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of sections
50 through 57 (health resources strategy) of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health
care). If the bill is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement section 3 of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5248 (preserving the viability of agricultural lands).
Funds are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus center to
examine conflicts between agriculture activities and critical areas
ordinances. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The education data center within the office of financial
management may convene a work group to assess the feasibility, costs,
and benefits of a higher education data system that uses privacy-protected student-level data.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
establish and provide staff support for the Washington citizens' work
group on health care reform, pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6333.
(12) $11,372,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the Washington assessment of student learning (WASL)
and related activities and is in addition to the funding amounts
provided in section 511 of this act. The funding provided in this
subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
office of financial management shall develop an interagency agreement
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
expenditure of these funds based on a quarterly allotment schedule.
Before releasing funds to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction each quarter, the office of financial management shall
ensure compliance with this subsection. Effective with the 2009
administration of the Washington assessment of student learning, while
maintaining the reliability and validity of the assessment, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall redesign the
assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in
all grades except high school by shortening test administration,
reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions,
and potentially decreasing the number of items utilized in the
assessment, particularly in grades tested under the requirements of the
federal no child left behind act. In selecting and developing the new
contractual obligations for the assessment contractor beginning in
fiscal year 2009, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall preserve legislative authority to set the student
learning assessment policy and potentially make minor or significant
changes to that policy in the future with the least amount of adverse
fiscal and other impacts to the state as possible. In doing this, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall advise and
consult with the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature and the Washington assessment of student learning work
group created in this subsection. Within the amounts appropriated in
this subsection, a legislative work group on the Washington assessment
of student learning is established. The work group will consist of a
maximum of nine members. Legislative members shall be appointed by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives
and shall represent the two largest caucuses of both the senate and the
house of representatives. The purpose of this work group is to review
and evaluate the current assessment system by January 1, 2009, and
potentially make recommendations to improve it. Of the amount provided
in this section, $150,000 is provided solely for costs associated with
hiring independent technical experts to advise the Washington
assessment of student learning work group created in this subsection.
(13) Through prior legislation, many state activities that protect
the general public by safeguarding health, safety, employees, and
consumers are supported by fees assessed on items such as licensing,
registration, certification, and inspections. Moreover, higher
education, workforce training, and a number of other government
services are supported at least in part by fees assessed on those who
participate in these programs. Therefore, the office of financial
management shall conduct a review and analysis of all fees for which
the legislature has delegated to state agencies and institutions of
higher education the ability to establish and determine the amount,
either upon initial establishment or subsequent increases. Fees, as
used in this subsection, has the same meaning as used in RCW
43.135.055. The objective of the review and analysis is to document
the level of fees paid over the past five years, the cost of those
programs over that same time period, and, to the extent available, the
effectiveness of the activity in meeting its performance targets. The
review and analysis shall include the following information:
(a) Information about the program, including the statutory
authority for the program, date enacted, and the parties that benefit
from the program; and
(b) Information about the program fees, including name and
description of the fees, the parties that bear the cost of the fees,
the methodology for determining the fees, and whether the fees directly
fund the program; and
(c) Financial related information, including an assessment of the
program's fee amount assessed over the past five years, the scope of
the program and related costs over the past 5 years, and whether the
program's expenditures are subject to appropriation or allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW; and
(d) To the extent available, information on the program activities
and related performance measures that may assist in assessing the
effectiveness of the program in achieving its goals.
The office of financial management shall report its findings to the
governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1,
2008.
(14) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $305,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1007 2009 c 4 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,702,000))
$32,163,000

Sec. 1008 2009 c 4 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,003,000))
$97,782,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,788,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($212,544,000))
$207,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for the implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 1002 (taxation of vessels). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1891
(prescription drugs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(3)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to conduct a study of the taxation
of electronically delivered products. The legislature recognizes that
chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007,
relates to specific types of electronically delivered products and does
not address the taxation of numerous other types of electronically
delivered products. Therefore, a policy question remains concerning
the sales and use taxation of other electronically delivered products.
(b)(i) To perform the study, the department of revenue shall be
assisted by a committee. The committee shall include four legislative
members appointed as follows:
(A) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate; and
(B) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The department of revenue shall appoint additional members
with balanced representation from different segments of government and
industry, and shall consider representation from the following areas:
Small and large businesses that generate, deliver, or use
electronically delivered products; financial institutions; insurers;
persons with expertise in tax law in an academic or private sector
setting; and persons experienced in working with computers and
electronically delivered products. The department of revenue shall
appoint additional members from the department with expertise in the
excise taxation of electronically delivered products.
(iii) The committee shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(iv) The department and committee shall review the following
issues: The provision of explicit statutory definitions for
electronically delivered products; the current excise tax treatment of
electronically delivered products in the state of Washington and other
states as well as the tax treatment of these products under the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement; the administration, costs, and
potential recipients of the tax exemptions provided in chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007; and
alternatives to the excise taxation of electronically delivered
products.
(v) Legislative members of the committee are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the committee, except those representing an employer or organization,
are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The department shall report its preliminary findings and
recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 30, 2007. The department shall provide the final report of
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by September 1, 2008.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6809 (working families tax exemption). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse. This
subsection does not constitute approval of the exemption under section
2, chapter . . . (ESSB 6809), Laws of 2008 or authorize payments of
remittances.
(5) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
3104 (domestic partnerships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $214,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1009 2009 c 4 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($557,000))
$783,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,651,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,893,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,692,000))
$41,918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the temporary emergency food
assistance program.
(2) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1332 (affordable
housing).
(3) $391,000 of the general administration services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of costs associated with the planning of agency moves
out of the general administration building.
(4) The department shall work with the office of financial
management to develop a plan that balances revenues and expenditures
for each line of business within the general administration services
account. State agency rates developed for the 2009-2011 biennium must
equitably and reasonably reflect the actual cost of services provided
to state agencies including the appropriate allocation of agency
overhead costs. By August 31, 2008, the department shall submit to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature financial statements for each line of business that shall
inform the basis for agency rate development for the forthcoming
biennium.
(5) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature that responds
to each of the state auditor's motor pool audit recommendations by
August 31, 2008. This report shall consist of recommendations that
have been adopted by the department, progress made towards achieving
those recommendations not yet completed, and justification for why the
department is unable to fulfill any of the recommendations in the
report.

Sec. 1010 2009 c 4 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,574,000))
$2,924,000

Sec. 1011 2009 c 4 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,910,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,430,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($194,556,000))
$196,556,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($209,896,000))
$211,896,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $91,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5859 (retail liquor licenses). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $2,070,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to operate an
additional 29 state stores on Sundays by September 1, 2007. The board
shall determine the impacts on sales as a result of operating the
additional stores on Sunday. In doing so, the liquor control board
shall also examine the sales of state and contract liquor stores in
proximity to those stores opened on Sundays to determine whether Sunday
openings have reduced the sales of other state and contract liquor
stores that are not open on Sundays. The board shall present this
information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 31, 2009.

Sec. 1012 2009 c 4 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,353,000))
$11,526,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,334,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,293,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,454,000))
$27,820,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,757,000))
$98,441,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $814,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($556,000))
$215,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,269,000))
$1,382,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($309,599,000))
$324,594,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($24,454,000)) $27,820,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation and (($86,757,000)) $98,441,000 of the disaster
response account -- federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2007-2009
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($556,000)) $215,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($1,269,000)) $1,382,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
response and recovery costs associated with the February 28, 2001,
earthquake. The military department shall submit a report quarterly to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing earthquake recovery costs, including: (a)
Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from the previous
estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining
costs to be paid; and (e) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and
by amount paid on behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The
military department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office
of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $61,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall implement Substitute House Bill No. 1507 (uniformed service
shared leave).
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the military department to
contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to operate a
statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the entire amount
for 2-1-1 and shall not take any of the funds for administrative
purposes.
(6) $200,000 of the enhanced 911 account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to recommend an appropriate funding
mechanism for the implementation of next generation 911. The
department shall consult with the utilities and transportation
commission, the department of revenue, local governments, and
representatives from companies providing telecommunications services in
order to complete the report required under this subsection. The
department may also consult with other public safety and medical
associations in order to complete the study. The department shall
submit the report to the finance committee and the technology, energy,
and communications committee of the house of representatives, and the
ways and means committee and the water, energy, and telecommunications
committee of the senate, by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 1013 2009 c 4 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,893,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,878,000))
$1,924,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,771,000))
$3,817,000

Sec. 1014 2008 c 329 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,773,000))
$39,769,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,523,000))
$93,519,000

(End of part)

PART XI
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 1101 2008 c 329 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health
services shall initially be allotted as required by this act.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of
moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in
this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP), the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county, during the
2007-2009 biennium. The amount of funding assigned to the pilot
projects from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost
assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program,
actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled in
the pilot project, times the number of clients enrolled in the pilot
project. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department may:
(a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set forth in
RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for individuals
enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.
(5)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2008)) 2009,
unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2008)) 2009 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year
((2008)) 2009 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the
medical assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and
child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that
are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall not
transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 1102 2009 c 4 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,353,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($338,838,000))
$340,780,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($490,314,000))
$500,718,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,251,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,298,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,163,363,000))
$1,175,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the category of services
titled "intensive family preservation services."
(2) $945,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,020 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $429,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase services provided through children's
advocacy centers.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(10) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1472 (child welfare).
(11) $858,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $809,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5774
(background checks), including sections 6 and 7. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $4,962,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $9,548,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a statewide automated child welfare information system.
(13) $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $55,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5321 (child
welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $680,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $594,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1334 (child welfare proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $2,237,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,918,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $118,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1287
(foster children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy to study evidence-based,
cost-effective programs and policies to reduce the likelihood of
children entering and remaining in the child welfare system, including
both prevention and intervention programs. If the department does not
receive $100,000 in matching funds from a private organization for the
purpose of conducting this study, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The study shall be completed by April 30,
2008. The department shall cooperate with the institute in
facilitating access to data in their administrative systems. The board
of the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust the due
date for this project as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(18) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $407,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $48,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1131 (passport to college). This includes funding to develop,
implement, and administer a program of educational transition planning
for youth in foster care as specified in the bill. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) The department shall continue spending levels for continuum of
care in region one at the same level allotted during the 2005-2007
biennium.
(20) Within the amounts provided, the department shall develop and
implement a two-tiered reimbursement rate schedule for children from
birth through twenty-four months of age and children twenty-five months
of age through age five served by the medicaid treatment child care
program. The department shall work in collaboration with contracted
providers of the program to develop the rate schedule, taking into
consideration such factors as higher staff level and small group size
requirements for each age group. The department shall implement the
rate schedule no later than January 1, 2008, and neither reimbursement
rate in the two-tiered schedule shall be lower than the reimbursement
rate level from the 2007 fiscal year.
(21) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1624 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 384, Laws of 2007.
(23) The department shall work with the exclusive bargaining
representative for the children's administration social workers to
prioritize social worker tasks and devise methods by which to alleviate
from the social workers' workload lower priority tasks. Discussions on
methods shall include the use of contracting services and home support
specialists. The department and the bargaining representative shall
jointly report their efforts to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by submitting a progress report no later than July 1, 2008,
and a final report by November 15, 2008.
(24) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
largest nonprofit organization in the state conducting education and
outreach on RCW 13.34.360, the safety of newborn children law.
(25) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $184,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to contract with medical professionals for
comprehensive safety assessments of high-risk families. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. $400,000 of this amount is for comprehensive safety
assessments for families receiving in-home child protective services or
family voluntary services. $400,000 of this amount is for
comprehensive safety assessments of families with an infant age birth
to fifteen days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance
exposed and the department received an intake referral related to the
infant due to the substance exposure.
(26) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $29,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6206 (child fatality). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(27) $857,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $140,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 3145 (foster parent licensing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $415,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $264,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the hiring of staff to expedite the phase-in of the
state's policy of a private and individual face-to-face visit each
month with children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and
their caregivers.
(29) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement sections 2 and 3 of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term well-being). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(30) The appropriations in this section provide specific funds to
implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6792 (dependency
matters).
(31) $812,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $256,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to hire additional staff to perform
child health education and tracking screens.
(32) $1,829,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $578,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract with ((nonprofit))
organizations to facilitate twice-monthly visits between siblings
living apart from each other in out-of-home care.
(33) The department shall not close any secure crisis residential
center facilities. The total number of statewide secure crisis
residential center beds is reduced from 63 to 44.

Sec. 1103 2009 c 4 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,822,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,716,000))
$82,553,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,662,000))
$5,870,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,898,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,414,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,975,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,078,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,446,000))
$228,491,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $353,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice
assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,078,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,078,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation and $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended
to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services
(CJS) formula.
(3) $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and $2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided
in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,506,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $2,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,947,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs or other programs with a positive
benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County juvenile courts
shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding
for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide
grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment
costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $787,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide a
block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile
services funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition to county juvenile courts, or groups of courts,
including the Pierce county juvenile court. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall
jointly write criteria for awarding and administering block grants to
county juvenile courts. In developing the criteria, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall seek
the advice of the Washington state institute for public policy. The
criteria shall address, but not be limited to:
(a) The selection of courts for participation in the block grant;
(b) The types of evidence-based programs and practices to which the
funds will be applied. The evidence-based programs and practices shall
either be consistent with those cost-beneficial options identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy in its October 2006
report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates," or be new
approaches that have the potential to demonstrate positive returns for
the taxpayer; and
(c) The protocols for participating courts to collect information
on the effectiveness of programs funded under the block grant,
including: (i) Developing intermediate client outcomes based on the
risk assessment tool currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration; (ii)
reporting treatment outcomes including a process evaluation to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council by
June 20, 2008, and an outcome evaluation of recidivism and benefit-cost
results submitted within eighteen months of the initiation of the
treatment, when follow-up data are available. The courts shall develop
these evaluations in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy; and (iii) documenting the process for
managing block grant funds on a quarterly basis and provide this report
to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy
council.
(8) $73,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $98,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1104 2009 c 4 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,382,000))
$298,118,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($396,996,000))
$414,136,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,157,000))
$18,732,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,027,267,000))
$1,036,718,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $103,989,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $122,119,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. Reductions to fiscal
year 2009 allocations shall be distributed proportionally to each
regional support network's percentage of the total state population.
To the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending
shall be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for development and initial implementation
of high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams,
and other proven program approaches that the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2008. Beginning January 1, 2009, the number of
nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at
eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic
beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 777 per day during the first and second quarters of
fiscal year 2008, and 677 per day from January 2008 through August
2008. Beginning September 2008, the number of nonforensic beds
allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 647 per day until May 2009, at which time the bed
allocation shall be 617 beds per day. Beginning January 2008, beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. Beginning that month, the department shall
separately charge regional support networks for persons served in the
PALS program.
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(f) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement. The department is authorized to transfer up
to $418,000 of these amounts each fiscal year to the economic services
program for purposes of facilitating prompt access after their release
from confinement to medical and income assistance services for which
defendants and offenders may be eligible.
(g) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,091,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants for innovative mental
health service delivery projects. Such projects may include, but are
not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for integrated health
care and behavioral health services for general assistance recipients.
These amounts shall supplement, and not supplant, local or other
funding currently being used for activities funded under the projects
authorized in this subsection. The department shall not terminate
early any grant that was contracted under this subsection prior to
January 1, 2009, for the use of funds during fiscal year 2009.
(h) The department is authorized to continue to expend federal
block grant funds and special purpose federal grants through direct
contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks, and to allocate such funds through such formulas as it shall
adopt.
(i) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(j) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(k) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(l) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,961,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,289,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely to enable the department to contract
with Pierce county human services for the provision of community mental
health services to include crisis triage, evaluation and treatment, and
mobile crisis services. The legislature intends this to be one-time
funding while a replacement regional support network is being secured.
The department is authorized to reserve $402,000 general fund--state
and $201,000 general fund--local of these amounts for reasonable costs
incurred by Pierce county for the provision of mental health crisis and
related services that exceed reimbursement levels contracted by the
department. In order to receive these funds, Pierce county must
demonstrate to the department that the total cost of mental health
services provided by the county in accordance with formal agreements
has exceeded the revenues received from the department and third-party
payers for these services. The department shall determine the
documentation that is required.
(m) $504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(n) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement a comprehensive plan for reducing its utilization
of eastern state hospital. Key elements of the plan, which shall be
developed and implemented in consultation with and with the assistance
of the department, may include but shall not be limited to development
of additional crisis triage, crisis stabilization, and evaluation and
treatment beds; provision of housing assistance for high-utilizers of
hospital and jail services who are at risk of homelessness;
implementation of an intensive outpatient treatment team for persons
with co-occurring disorders and other special needs; and delivery of
respite care to assist elderly individuals avoid or return home after
hospitalization. Spokane regional support network shall receive a
proportional share of the fiscal year 2009 nonmedicaid rate reduction
out of its base funding distribution.
(o) The department shall return to the Spokane regional support
network fifty percent of the amounts assessed against the network
during fiscal year 2009 for state hospital utilization in excess of its
contractual limit. The regional support network shall use these funds
for start-up and operation during its initial months of a new sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility that will enable the network to
reduce its use of the state hospital.
(p) The department shall not reduce medicaid capitation rates below
those in effect as of December 15, 2008.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,340,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,272,000))
$126,164,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,552,000))
$148,501,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,302,000))
$66,521,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($486,524,000))
$486,584,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(c) $18,575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to operate on a temporary basis
five additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals.
(d) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for safety training and for
protective equipment for staff at eastern and western state hospitals.
Protective equipment shall include shields, helmets, gloves, and body
protection.
(e) $304,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(e)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(f) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to pilot a direct care nurse
staffing plan for two high incident wards at eastern state hospital and
four high incident wards at western state hospital. The pilot provides
funding to fully staff registered nurses, licensed practical nurses,
and mental health technicians in accordance with the state psychiatric
hospitals direct care staffing review and recommendations. The
department shall have the authority to fill the positions with any mix
of these direct care nursing staff so long as a good faith effort is
made to first hire and recruit positions in accordance with the direct
care nurse staffing plan. The department shall monitor outcomes for
improved patient and staff safety and provide a written report to the
legislature by October 1, 2009.
(g) $617,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $334,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to cover additional operating
costs related to the October 11, 2007, laundry fire at western state
hospital.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,892,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,269,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,437,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,189,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 4, 7,
10, and other provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088
(children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds are
also appropriated in sections 207 and 209 of this act for
implementation of 5, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1088.
(b) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $80,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely as one-time funding to make available a mental health
train the trainer first aid course consisting of twelve hours of
instruction based upon a program created by the department of
psychiatry, University of Melbourne in Australia. The course will
provide training to members of the public related to: (i) Giving
appropriate initial help and support to a person suffering from a
mental disorder and responding to mental health crisis situations; and
(ii) depression, anxiety disorders, psychosis, and substance use
disorder, including recognizing symptoms, possible causes or risk
factors, and evidenced-based treatment options. Participants in the
first aid course will train others to provide the training.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,500,000))
$4,477,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,557,000))
$7,580,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,023,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), to build upon the evaluation of the impacts
of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders), and to assess
program outcomes and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health
pilot projects as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with a
facilitator to coordinate a review and make recommendations on:
(i) Ward sizes at eastern and western state hospitals and patient
case mix by ward;
(ii) Discharge practices for state hospitals to include the child
and study treatment center; and
(iii) Community placements to include placements for adults and
children.
By October 15, 2008, the department shall provide to the
legislature recommendations for system improvement to include a
cost/benefit analysis. The department shall include representation
from regional support networks in the review and development of
recommendations for discharge practices and community placements.

Sec. 1105 2009 c 4 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,327,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($362,407,000))
$343,503,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($653,802,000))
$693,402,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,365,440,000))
$1,386,136,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, $615,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $892,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$2,546,011 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $532.00 in
fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 in fiscal year 2009.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $4,903,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $9,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $15,016,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are at risk of institutionalization or who are aging out
of other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based
waiver program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate
need for increased services. First priority shall be given to children
who are at risk of institutionalization. The department shall ensure
that the average cost per day for all program services other than
start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the number
of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver
programs, the department will strive to limit new client placement
expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be
accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess funds,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(d) $2,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,961,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,849,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for
(i) clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (iii) clients participating in the community
protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis diversion
outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$349 in fiscal year 2008 and $356 in fiscal year 2009. In order to
maximize the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department will strive to
limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted
daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional clients may be
served with excess funds if the total projected carry-forward
expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall
implement the four new waiver programs such that decisions about
enrollment levels and the amount, duration, and scope of services
maintain expenditures within appropriations. The department shall
electronically report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of
persons served with these additional community services, where they
were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving prior to
placement, and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support these clients.
(e) $13,198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $16,354,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,579,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for family support programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities. Of the amounts provided
in this subsection (e), $696,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are for state-only services
for individuals with developmental disabilities, as described in Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). By
January 1, 2008, and by November 1, 2008, the department shall provide
a status report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the individual and family services program for people
with developmental disabilities, which shall include the following
information: The number of applicants for funding; the total number of
awards; the number and amount of both annual and one-time awards,
broken down by household income levels; and the purpose of the awards.
(f) $1,692,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $3,645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $2,397,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients. The
legislature finds that some waiver clients are not receiving employment
services that are authorized under their waivers. Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, waiver clients must receive services as
authorized by their waiver, such as pathway to employment, while
waiting for paid employment to be developed. The department shall work
with the counties to establish a consistent proposed policy for minimum
direct service hours for clients, minimum hours of support, time frames
for seeking paid employment, and services provided under pathway to
employment while paid employment is sought. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on this proposal by November 1, 2008,
including estimated fiscal impacts and an option for making the policy
budget neutral for the current level of clients served. In order to
maximize the number of clients served, the department may serve
additional nonwaiver clients with unspent funds for waiver clients,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated.
(g) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(h)(i) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent for boarding homes,
effective July 1, 2007, including those currently receiving exceptional
care rates; and by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, for adult
family homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates.
(ii) The department shall implement phase one of full
implementation of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community
residential providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are
sufficient to increase adult family home provider payment rates on
average, effective July 1, 2008, including those currently receiving
exceptional care rates, and to adjust adult family home rates for the
first phase of a seventeen CARE level payment system. Effective July
1, 2008, the provider payment rate allocation for boarding homes
contracted as assisted living shall be the provider's June 30, 2008,
payment rate allocation, and the provider payment rate for boarding
homes contracted as ARCs and EARCs shall be adjusted to reflect phase
one of a seventeen CARE level payment system. This will be in effect
until such time as the rates are consistent between adult family homes
and boarding homes for delivery of the same patient care levels.
(iii) Amounts provided in this section and in section 206 of this
act are sufficient to assist adult family home providers with the cost
of paying liability insurance.
(i) (($921,000)) $494,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 and (($963,000)) $518,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and
implementation of a federal home and community-based care waiver to
provide intensive behavior support services to up to one hundred
children with developmental disabilities who have intense behaviors,
and their families.
(i) To receive services under the waiver, the child must have a
developmental disability and: (A) Meet an acuity measure, as
determined by the department, indicating that the child is at high risk
of needing an out-of-home placement; (B) be eligible for developmental
disabilities services and a home and community-based care waiver
program; (C) reside in his or her family home or temporarily in an
out-of-home placement with a plan to return home; and (D) have family
that demonstrates the willingness to participate in the services
offered through the waiver, and is not subject to a pending child
protective services referral.
(ii) The department shall authorize, contract for, and evaluate the
provision of intensive in-home services that support the ability of the
child to remain at home with their parents or relatives. Intensive
behavior support services under the waiver shall be provided directly
or by contract, and may include, but are not limited to: (A) Behavior
consultation and management, therapies and respite care; (B) minor home
or motor vehicle modifications and transportation; (C) specialized
nutrition and clothing; (D) training of families and other individuals
working with the child; and (E) inclusion in community activities.
(j) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the purpose of settling all claims in
the Washington Federation of State Employees, et. al v. State of
Washington, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 05-2-02422-4. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the release of all
claims in this case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection (j). If settlement is not executed by
June 30, 2008, the appropriation in this subsection (j) shall lapse.
(k) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall review current infant-toddler early intervention services
statewide and report to the office of financial management by November
1, 2008, and the appropriate committees of the legislature on a
recommended consistent funding approach per child for the 2009-11
biennium, recognizing the new level of funding anticipated by school
district participation. The recommendations must also include a budget
neutral option for the current level of clients served.
(l) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for state-only employment services for
young adults with developmental disabilities who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation.
(m) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1), the
department shall implement all necessary rules to facilitate the
transfer to a department home and community-based services (HCBS)
waiver of all eligible individuals who (i) currently receive services
under the existing state-only employment and day program, and (ii)
otherwise meet the waiver eligibility requirements. The amounts
appropriated are sufficient to ensure that all individuals currently
receiving services under the state-only employment and day program who
are not transferred to a department HCBS waiver will continue to
receive services.
(n) ((Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1), the
department shall define in-home personal care services to include a
client's ability to manage their personal care worker as identified by
characteristics in the functional assessment. Clients whose
assessments demonstrate they are able to manage their own plan of care
are not eligible for personal care through a home care agency. The
department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(o) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
adult day health services.))
(o) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided by a family
member pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state
payments for in-home care).

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,825,000))
$65,359,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,338,000))
$184,387,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,629,000))
$22,203,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($356,875,000))
$358,032,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for services provided to community
clients provided by licensed professionals at the state rehabilitation
centers. The division shall submit claims for reimbursement for
services provided to clients living in the community to medical
assistance or third-party health care coverage, as appropriate, and
shall implement a system for billing clients without coverage.
(c) $642,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.
(d) The department shall ((not reduce and shall)) continue to
provide ((subsidies to clients of)) professional services at the
residential habilitation centers ((professional providers to support
the treatment of developmentally disabled clients who do not reside in
a residential habilitation center, but shall not expand eligibility for
these services)) to eligible community clients within appropriation
limits.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,953,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As part of the needs assessment instrument, the department
shall collect data on family income for minor children with
developmental disabilities and all individuals who are receiving
state-only funded services. The department shall ensure that this
information is collected as part of the client assessment process.
(2) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $399,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,809,000))
$21,033,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,841,000))
$21,065,000

Sec. 1106 2009 c 4 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($707,293,000))
$655,024,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,569,912,000))
$1,628,163,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,525,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,212,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,004,610,000))
$3,010,592,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $10,456,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
$11,370,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009, and $26,778,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers
who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a
week. The state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
eligible participating worker per month shall be no greater than
$532.00 in fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 per month in fiscal year 2009.
(2)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $159.34 for
fiscal year 2008 and shall not exceed (($163.72)) $164.85 for fiscal
year 2009, including the rate add-on described in subsection (9) of
this section. For all nursing facilities, the direct care, therapy
care, support services, and operations component rates established in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions by 3.2 percent effective July 1, 2007, and by 1.99
percent effective July 1, 2008.
(b) $1,835,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $2,574,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for restoration of the statewide weighted average
nursing facility payment rate up to the payment rate specified in (a)
of this subsection.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2008; up to $16,000,000 of increased asset value
completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2009((; and up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2010)).
(((4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a
duplication of services for persons receiving care in long-term care
settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW. The
department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide adult day
health services.))
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(7) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $3,134,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase compensation for low-wage workers in
nursing homes beginning July 1, 2008. Within the funds provided, the
department shall provide an add-on per resident day per facility based
on the total funding divided by the total number of fiscal year 2009
medicaid patient days as forecasted by the caseload forecast council,
not to exceed $1.57. The department may reduce the level of add-on if
necessary to fit within this appropriation if the caseload forecasted
days increase from the February 2008 forecast. The add-on shall be
used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified
nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides,
housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose
statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar
year 2006, according to cost report data. The add-on may also be used
to address resulting wage compression for related job classes
immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. The
department shall implement reporting requirements and a settlement
process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(10) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department is
authorized to expand the number of boarding homes and adult family
homes that receive exceptional care rates for persons with Alzheimer's
disease and related dementias who might otherwise require nursing home
care. The department may expand the number of licensed boarding home
facilities that specialize in caring for such conditions by up to 100
beds. Effective July 1, 2008, the department shall be authorized to
provide adult family homes that specialize in caring for such
conditions with exceptional care rates for up to 50 beds. The
department will develop standards for adult family homes to qualify for
such exceptional care rates in order to enhance consumer choice.
(11) $1,212,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2055 (traumatic brain injury). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12)(a) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to
increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent for boarding homes,
effective July 1, 2007, including those currently receiving exceptional
care rates; and by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, for adult
family homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates.
(b) The department shall implement phase one of full implementation
of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community residential
providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to
increase adult family home provider payment rates on average, effective
July 1, 2008, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates, and to adjust adult family home rates for the first phase of a
seventeen CARE level payment system. Effective July 1, 2008, the
provider payment rate allocation for boarding homes contracted as
assisted living shall be the provider's June 30, 2008, payment rate
allocation, and the provider payment rate for boarding homes contracted
as ARCs and EARCs shall be adjusted to reflect phase one of a seventeen
CARE level payment system. This will be in effect until such time as
the rates are consistent between adult family homes and boarding homes
for delivery of the same patient care levels.
(c) Amounts provided in this section and in section 205 of this act
are sufficient to assist adult family home providers with the cost of
paying liability insurance.
(13) The department shall contract for housing with service models,
such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service delivery and
responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by clustering hours
for clients that live in close proximity to each other.
(14) $2,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,002,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement sections 4 and 8 of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6220
(nurse delegation) or sections 11 and 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) Within the funds appropriated in the section, the department
shall establish one statewide hourly rate to reimburse home care
agencies for the costs related to state clients for hours worked by
direct care workers in receiving mandatory training. The statewide
hourly rate shall be based on the hourly wage paid to individual
providers plus mandatory taxes plus an adjustment based on the formula
created under RCW 74.39A.310.
(17) ((Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall define in-home personal care services to include a
client's ability to manage their personal care worker as identified by
characteristics in the functional assessment. Clients whose
assessments demonstrate they are able to manage their own plan of care
are not eligible for personal care through a home care agency. The
department shall adopt rules to implement this section)) The department
shall not pay a home care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW for
personal care services provided by a family member pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state payments for in-home
care).
(18) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $1,002,000 reduction in
administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.
(19) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for clients
in nonresidential settings.

Sec.1107 2009 c 4 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $586,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($464,586,000))
$467,807,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,168,223,000))
$1,219,837,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,233,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,257,003,000))
$2,311,838,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $344,694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($362,304,000)) $218,162,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($733,276,000))
$505,967,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts
provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide
assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families. Within the amounts provided for the
WorkFirst program, the department shall:
(a) Establish a career services work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report by October 1, 2007, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2007-2009 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity;
(e) For fiscal year 2009, increase the temporary assistance for
needy families grant standard by three percent to account for increased
housing costs.
(2) Up to $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 of the amounts in subsection (1) of this section
are for the WorkFirst pathway to engagement program. The department
shall collaborate with community partners and represented staff to
identify additional services needed for WorkFirst clients in sanction
status. The department shall contract with qualified community-based
organizations to deliver such services, provided that such services are
complimentary to the work of the department and are not intended to
supplant existing staff or services. The department shall also
contract with community-based organizations for the provision of
services for WorkFirst clients who have been terminated after six
months of sanction. Contracts established pursuant to this subsection
shall have a performance-based component and shall include both
presanction termination and postsanction termination services. Clients
shall be able to choose whether or not to accept the services. The
department shall develop outcome measures for the program related to
outreach and reengagement, reduction of barriers to employment, and
client feedback and satisfaction. Nothing in this subsection is
intended to modify a collective bargaining agreement under chapter
41.80 RCW or to change the state's responsibility under chapter 41.80
RCW. The department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on program
implementation and outcomes. The department also shall report on
implementation of specialized caseloads for clients in sanction status,
including average caseload size, referral process and criteria, and
expected outcomes for specialized caseloads.
(3) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $396,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of section 8 of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1088 (children's mental health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1009 (child support schedule). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase naturalization
services. These amounts shall supplement and not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase limited English
proficiency pathway services. These amounts shall supplement and not
supplant state and federal resources currently provided by the
department for this purpose.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,782,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $6,431,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5244 (deficit reduction act). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall: (a) Increase the state supplemental payment by $1.77 per month
beginning July 1, 2007, and by an additional $1.83 per month beginning
July 1, 2008, for SSI clients who reside in nursing facilities,
residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and who receive a
personal needs allowance; and (b) decrease other state supplemental
payments.
(9) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department for the data
tracking provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6016 (workfirst program). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to award grants
to small mutual assistance associations or small community-based
organizations that contract with the department for immigrant and
refugee assistance services. The funds shall be awarded to demonstrate
the impact of providing funding for a case worker in the community
organization on the refugees' economic self-sufficiency through the
effective use of social services, and financial and medical assistance.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $850,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase the gross income limits for eligibility for
programs authorized under RCW 74.04.500 and 74.08A.120 to 200 percent
of the federal poverty level. The department shall adjust its rules
and information technology systems to make the eligibility change
effective October 1, 2008.
(14) The department, in conjunction with the House Bill No. 1290
work group, shall identify and analyze barriers preventing city,
county, and state referrals of persons potentially eligible for
expedited application processing authorized under RCW 74.09.555. The
department, in conjunction with the House Bill No. 1290 work group,
shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than November 15, 2008.
(15) $656,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to the department to increase immigration
and naturalization services. These funds shall not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(16) The department shall not increase the child care copayment for
families above 82 percent of the federal poverty level.
(17) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $516,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1108 2009 c 4 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,049,000))
$55,324,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($168,949,000))
$177,314,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,083,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,555,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,186,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,186,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,464,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,396,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($369,661,000))
$379,301,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,785,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers for the provision of this
program. For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the
program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) $11,113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $14,490,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $14,269,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of chemical
dependency treatment services for adult medicaid eligible and general
assistance-unemployable patients authorized under the 2005-07 biennial
appropriations act. By September 30, 2007, the department shall submit
an expenditure and program report relating to the patients receiving
treatment and other services pursuant to the funding provided in this
subsection (2), as well as to other patients receiving treatment funded
by the department. The report shall be submitted to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature. Subsequent updates to this report shall be
provided by January 31 and July 31 of each fiscal year of the 2007-09
biennium. The reports shall include, but not necessarily be limited
to, the following information: (a) The number and demographics
(including categories) of patients served; (b) geographic distribution;
(c) modality of treatment services provided (i.e. residential or
out-patient); (d) treatment completion rates; (e) funds spent; and (f)
where applicable, the estimated cost offsets in medical assistance on
a total and per patient basis.
(3) $698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $154,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion authorized under
the 2005-07 biennial appropriations act of chemical dependency
treatment services for minors who are under 200 percent of the federal
poverty level. The department shall monitor the number and type of
clients entering treatment, for purposes of determining potential cost
offsets.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
the following: (a) To continue an existing pilot program in Pierce
county limited to individuals who began chemical dependency treatment
using the prometa protocol prior to March 11, 2008; and (b) to contract
with an independent evaluator who will, to the extent possible,
evaluate the Pierce county pilot, as well as summarize other research
on the efficacy of the prometa protocol.
(5) $4,449,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment account
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6665 (crisis response), to continue existing pilot
programs and to expand the intensive crisis response pilot to Spokane
county. The continuation and expansion of the pilot programs expires
June 30, 2009. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
adult care and low-income treatment and detoxification services.
(7) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to support
the families in recovery program.
(8) The department shall not reduce and shall continue the student
employment program.
(9) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding for living allowances to clients in treatment under RCW
74.50.050.
(10) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding to drug courts for treatment.
(11) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $76,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(12) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to secure
and provide for evaluation training for assessing children with fetal
alcohol spectrum disorders (FASD).

Sec. 1109 2009 c 4 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,533,431,000))
$1,453,789,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,439,060,000))
$4,669,537,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,946,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($392,857,000))
$364,314,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,883,000))
$1,727,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,376,726,000))
$8,498,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is at least
equivalent to the benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,111,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,110,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,591,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds
under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of the
available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share
of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively
smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal
medicaid program.
(7) $10,546,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $10,546,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $19,725,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2007-2009 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2007, and by November 1,
2008, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2008 and fiscal
year 2009, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain (a)
one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital
cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by
medical assistance; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal portion
of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under
federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established
using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims
submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the
program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a
baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total
of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid
during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program,
and (b) disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 that pertain to
fiscal year 2005. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed within two years after the end of the related fiscal year.
To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has
received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in
this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the
state when requested. $61,728,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, and
(($47,745,000)) $46,490,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section
204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, are provided solely
for state grants for the participating hospitals.
(9) $4,399,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($6,391,000)) $6,094,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($55,384,000)) $53,470,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of a replacement system for the existing
medicaid management information system. The amounts are conditioned on
the department satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(11) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(12) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(13) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings.
(14) $1,688,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to incorporate a mental health
service component to the pilot project established pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section. Addition of the mental health service
component authorized in this subsection is contingent upon the managed
care contractor or the participating counties providing, alone or in
combination, matching funds in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to
one-ninth of the amounts appropriated in this subsection. The mental
health service component may include care coordination, mental health
services, and integrated medical and mental health service delivery for
general assistance clients with mental health disorders, as well as
primary care provider training and education. The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2009, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality
measures associated with the pilot projects during calendar year 2007
and 2008. To the extent possible, the report shall address any impact
that the mental health services component has had upon clients' use of
medical services, including but not limited to primary care physician's
visits, emergency room utilization, and prescription drug utilization.
(15) $341,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,054,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,461,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1201 (foster care youth medical). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(16) $6,728,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $8,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D prescription drug copayment
coverage in accordance with chapter 3, Laws of 2007 (part D copayment
drug program).
(17) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
financial impact associated with continuing to cover brand name
medications versus the same medication in its generic form. The study
shall account for all rebates paid to the state on each product studied
up until the point where the generic form is less expensive, net of
federally required rebates. The department shall submit its report to
the legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2007.
(18) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the first two years of a four-year project by the Seattle-King county health department to improve
management of symptoms and reduce complications related to asthma among
medicaid eligible children. The department shall contract with the
Seattle-King county health department to have trained community health
workers visit medicaid eligible children in their homes to identify and
reduce exposure to asthma triggers, improve clients' self-management
skills, and coordinate clients' care with their primary care and
specialty providers. The contract shall include an evaluation of the
impact of the services provided under the contract on urgent
physician's visits, emergency room utilization, and inpatient
hospitalization.
(19) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development and implementation
of an outreach program as provided in chapter 5, Laws of 2007 (Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093, health services for children).
(a) By December 15, 2007, the department shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress of
implementing the following activities:
(i) Feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system;
(ii) Development of data linkages with the office of superintendent
of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch enrollment
information and the department of early learning for child care subsidy
program enrollment information;
(iii) Informing insurers and providers when their enrollees'
eligibility is going to expire so insurers and providers can help
families reenroll;
(iv) Outreach contracts with local governmental entities, community
based organizations, and tribes;
(v) Results of data sharing with outreach contractors, and other
contracted entities such as local governments, community-based
organizations, tribes, health care providers, and insurers to engage,
enroll, and reenroll identified children;
(vi) Results of efforts to maximize federal matching funds,
wherever possible; and
(vii) Plans for sustaining outreach programs proven to be
successful.
(b)(i) Within the amounts provided under this subsection (19),
sufficient funding is provided to the department to develop and
implement in conjunction with the employment security department a plan
that would:
(A) Allow applicants and recipients of unemployment insurance to
request assistance with obtaining health coverage for household
members; and
(B) Authorize the exchange of information between the employment
security department and the department of social and health services to
more efficiently determine eligibility for health coverage under
chapter 74.09 RCW.
(ii) The plan developed in (b)(i) of this subsection should address
permissible uses of federal employment security funding and
infrastructure, identification of any necessary statutory changes, and
cost information. The department shall submit the plan in a report to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2008.
(20) $640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a medicare advantage program.
The department shall:
(a) Pay the premiums associated with enrollment in a medicare
advantage plan for those full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries, as
defined in RCW 74.09.010, who were enrolled on or before November 14,
2006 in a medicare advantage plan sponsored by an entity accredited by
the national committee for quality assurance and for whom the
department had been paying Part C premium as of November 2006; and
(b) Undertake, directly or by contract, a study to determine the
cost-effectiveness of paying premiums for enrollment of full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries in medicare advantage plans in lieu of
paying full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries' medicare cost-sharing.
The study shall compare the cost and health outcomes experience,
including rates of nursing home placement and costs for groups of full
benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are enrolled in medicare
advantage plans, in medicare special needs plan or in medicare fee-for-service. The study shall compare the health status and utilization of
health and long-term care services for the three groups, and the impact
of access to a medical home and specialty care, over a period of two
years to determine any differences in health status, health outcomes,
and state expenditures that result. The department shall submit the
results of the study to the governor and the legislature by June 30,
2009. The department is authorized to accept private cash and in-kind
donations and grants to support the study and evaluation.
(c) Track enrollment and expenditures for this population on
department monthly management reports.
(21) The department may not transition to managed care delivery any
population that has been primarily served under fee-for-service
delivery unless the department first conducts a cost-effectiveness
evaluation of the transition, including an evaluation of historical
data on utilization patterns, and finds that the transition would
result in a more effective and cost-efficient form of service delivery,
pursuant to RCW 74.09.470. Any such finding must be provided to the
governor and the legislature no less than ninety days before the
transition begins.
(22) $756,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, $1,261,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,448,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections
5, 7, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088 (children's
mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $566,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon comm/health care). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(24) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department of social and health
services, in consultation with the health care authority and the
employment security department, to prepare and submit a report and
recommendations to the governor and the legislature related to coverage
of low-wage workers enrolled on state plans who are employed by
employers with more than fifty employees. The report shall address
multiple approaches, including but not limited to the proposal included
in House Bill No. 2094 (taxpayer health care fairness act). The
discussion of each approach included in the report should identify how
the approach would further the goal of shared responsibility for
coverage of low-wage workers, obstacles to implementation and options
to address them, and estimated implementation costs. The report shall
be submitted on or before November 15, 2007. The agencies shall
establish a workgroup, which shall be closely involved and consulted in
the development of the report and recommendations under this
subsection. The workgroup shall include the following participants:
Persons or organizations representing large employers in the retail,
agricultural and grocery trades, other large employers, organizations
representing employees of large employers, organizations representing
low-wage employees of large employers, state and local governmental
entities as employers, and organizations representing employees of
state and local governmental entities. In addition, the workgroup
shall include three members from each of the two largest caucuses of
the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker, and three
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate.
(25) $1,883,000 of the tobacco prevention and control account--state appropriation and $1,742,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are for the provision of smoking cessation benefits
pursuant to Senate Bill No. 6421 (smoking cessation). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(26) As part of the five-year plan on state purchasing to improve
health care quality under chapter 259, Laws of 2007, the department, in
collaboration with the department of health, shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining a strategy to
improve immunization rates for all children in the state, including but
not limited to vaccine administration fee increases and pay-for-performance incentives. The department shall submit the report to the
governor and the health policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 1, 2008.
(27) Within existing funds, the department shall evaluate the
fiscal impact of the federal upper limits on medicaid reimbursement to
pharmacies implemented under the federal deficit reduction act, and
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(28)(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a feasibility study to examine
processes and systems that would expeditiously link persons released
from confinement in state and local correctional facilities and
institutions for mental diseases to medical assistance benefits for
which they qualify. The study shall present an analysis of the costs
and benefits associated with:
(i) Suspending eligibility for persons who were receiving medical
assistance at the time their confinement began, such that upon the
person's release from confinement, medical assistance benefits would
immediately resume without the filing of a new application. In the
evaluation of eligibility suspension, the department shall examine
process modifications that would allow confined persons to recertify
eligibility before or immediately after release from confinement;
(ii) Improving the efficiency and expanding the scope of the
expedited medical assistance reinstatement and eligibility
determination process established under RCW 74.09.555, including
extending the process to persons other than those with mental
disorders, both for persons who had been previously eligible before
confinement and for persons who had not been eligible before
confinement;
(iii) Providing medical and mental health evaluations to determine
disability for purposes of the medical assistance program before the
person's release from confinement; and
(iv) Notifying the department in a timely manner when a person who
has been enrolled in medical assistance is confined in a state
correctional institution or institution for mental diseases or is
released from confinement.
(b) In conducting the study, the department shall collaborate with
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
department of corrections, the regional support networks, department
field offices, institutions for mental diseases, and correctional
institutions. The department shall submit the study to the governor
and the legislature by November 15, 2008.
(29) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of the agency's responsibilities in
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (patient-centered
primary care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(30) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
family planning nurses and supplies at community services offices.
(31) The department shall not eliminate and shall continue to
provide a nurse hotline for foster parents.
(32) The department shall not reduce and shall provide medical
assistance to children under three-hundred percent of the federal
poverty level.
(33) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
maternity support services to pregnant and postpartum women.
(34) ((The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
provide transportation services to patients receiving adult day health
services.
(35))) The department shall continue children's health coverage
outreach and education efforts. These efforts shall rely on existing
relationships and systems developed to implement the program under RCW
74.09.470, such as those with local public health agencies, health care
providers, public schools, the women, infants, and children program,
the early childhood education and assistance program, child care
providers, newborn visiting nurses, and other community-based
organizations. The department shall seek public-private partnerships
and federal funds that may become available to provide on-going support
for outreach and education efforts.
(((36))) (35) The department shall reduce expenditures on
pharmaceuticals and durable medical equipment.
(((37))) (36) The department shall not reduce hospital rates.
(((38))) (37) In addition to other reductions, the reduced
appropriations in this section reflect an additional $1,062,000
reduction in administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing state government administrative costs).
These administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not
affect direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1110 2009 c 4 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,543,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,182,000))
$8,170,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,975,000))
$100,521,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,791,000))
$122,325,000

Sec. 1111 2009 c 4 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,216,000))
$51,478,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,722,000))
$103,984,000

Sec. 1112 2009 c 4 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,085,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,540,000))
$53,620,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,302,000))
$53,864,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($164,927,000))
$166,569,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $235,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and $111,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections 2 and
3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term
well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1113 2009 c 4 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,934,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,497,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,478,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($291,795,000))
$289,124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($611,331,000))
$609,160,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) Appropriations in this act include specific funding for health
records banking under section 10 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission).
(5) $11,934,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $11,834,000 of the health services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
funding for health care services provided through local community
clinics.
(6) $784,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $540,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, and $8,200,000 of the state health care authority
administrative account--state appropriation are provided for the
development of a new benefits administration and insurance accounting
system.
(7) $2,000,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the authority to provide
one-time competitive grants to community health centers to increase the
number of adults served on an ongoing basis. Each clinic receiving
grant funding shall report annually, beginning December 2008, on key
adult access indicators established by the authority, including but not
limited to increases in the number of low-income adults served.
(8) $1,639,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for section 5 of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1569 (health insurance partnership
board) and related provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care).
(9) $664,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of the
Washington quality forum, pursuant to section 9 of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the
section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $600,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of the state employee health pilot, pursuant to section 41 of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If
the section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $250,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for continuation
of the community health collaborative grant program in accordance with
chapter 67, Laws of 2006 (E2SSB 6459). The applicant organizations
must assure measurable improvements in health access within their
service region, demonstrate active collaboration with key community
partners, and provide two dollars in matching funds for each grant
dollar awarded.
(12) $731,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $977,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dental
residency program, including maintenance of the existing residency
positions and the establishment of six additional resident positions in
fiscal year 2008 (four in eastern Washington and two in the Seattle
area), and five additional positions in fiscal year 2009.
(13) Appropriations in this act include funding for sections 14
(reducing unnecessary emergency room use) and 40 (state employee health
program) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission).
(14) $100,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of the
agency's responsibilities in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2549 (patient-centered primary care). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1114 2009 c 4 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,377,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,580,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,523,000))
$1,723,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,480,000))
$8,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $115,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6776
(whistleblower protections). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1115 2009 c 4 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,963,000))
$18,045,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,964,000))
$18,046,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,947,000))
$36,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $82,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and $82,000 of the medical aid
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for implementation of chapter 280, Laws of 2008 (industrial insurance
orders).

Sec. 1116 2009 c 4 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,680,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,445,000))
$21,320,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,322,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,361,000))
$50,236,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $2,390,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,809,000)) $1,684,000 of the
public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for ten additional basic law enforcement
academies in fiscal year 2008 and ((nine)) eight additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2009.
(3) $1,044,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,191,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs to continue to develop, maintain, and operate the jail booking
and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide automated victim
information and notification system (SAVIN).
(4) $28,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 10, Laws of 2007 (SSB 5191, missing persons).
(5) $5,400,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $6,922,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $150,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely to deliver multi-disciplinary team training sessions
aimed at improving the coordination of, and communication between,
agencies involved in the investigation of child fatality, child sexual
abuse, child physical abuse, and criminal neglect cases.
(7) $25,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 (gang-related
offenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for support of the coalition of small police agencies
major crimes task force. The purpose of this task force is to pool its
resources and to establish an efficient and cooperative approach in
addressing major violent crimes.
(9) $20,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (forest
fires/property access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $5,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address
and residency of all registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
under RCW 9A.44.130. The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall:
(a) Enter into performance-based agreements with units of local
government to ensure that registered offender address and residency are
verified:
(A) For level I offenders, every twelve months;
(B) For level II offenders, every six months; and
(C) For level III offenders, every three months.
For the purposes of this subsection, unclassified offenders and
kidnapping offenders shall be considered at risk level I unless in the
opinion of the local jurisdiction a higher classification is in the
interest of public safety.
(b) Collect performance data from all participating jurisdictions
sufficient to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of the address
and residency verification program.
(c) Submit a report on the effectiveness of the address and
residency verification program to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate by September 1,
2009.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up
to three percent of the amount provided in this subsection for the cost
of administration. Any funds not disbursed for address and residency
verification or retained for administration may be allocated to local
prosecutors for the prosecution costs associated with failing to
register offenses.
(11) $750,000 of the public safety and education fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2712 (criminal
street gangs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a grant program to pay for the costs
of local law enforcement agencies participating in specialized crisis
intervention training.

Sec. 1117 2009 c 4 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,716,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,624,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,393,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,525,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $908,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,104,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,948,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,295,000))
$232,617,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($235,445,000))
$235,766,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($597,307,000))
$597,950,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,413,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for conducting utilization reviews of physical and
occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit and the associated
administrative costs, including those of entering data into the
claimant's file. The department shall develop and report performance
measures and targets for these reviews to the office of financial
management. The reports are due September 30th for the prior fiscal
year and must include the amount spent and the estimated savings per
fiscal year.
(2) $2,247,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5920
(vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $822,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for vocational services professional staff salary
adjustments necessary to recruit and retain positions required for
anticipated changes in work duties as a result of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5920 (vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Compensation for anticipated changes to work duties is subject
to review and approval by the director of the department of personnel
and is subject to collective bargaining.
(4) $8,000,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to establish a program of safety and health as
authorized by RCW 49.17.210 to be administered under rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, provided that projects funded involve
workplaces insured by the medical aid fund, and that priority is given
to projects fostering accident prevention through cooperation between
employers and employees or their representatives.
(5) $600,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to evaluate and recommend improvements to the
rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, including analyzing how risks are
pooled, the effect of including worker premium contributions in
adjustment calculations, incentives for accident and illness
prevention, return-to-work practices, and other sound risk-management
strategies that are consistent with recognized insurance principles.
(6) $181,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$181,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5443 (workers'
compensation claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $558,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290
(workers' compensation advisory committees). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $104,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $104,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $361,000
of the accident account--state appropriation, and $361,000 of the
medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5675 (workers'
compensation benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $730,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(10) $437,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$437,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5053
(industrial insurance ombudsman). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $74,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$74,000 of the medical aid--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5915 (notices to
employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $605,000 of the accident account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study of the incidence of
permanent total disability pensions in the state's workers'
compensation system. To conduct the study, the department shall
contract with an independent researcher that has demonstrated expertise
in workers' compensation systems. When selecting the independent
researcher, the department shall consult the labor and business members
of the workers' compensation advisory committee and, if the labor and
business members of the workers' compensation advisory committee agree
on a particular independent researcher, the department shall select
that independent researcher. The study must consider causes of the
recent increase in permanent total disability cases, future anticipated
permanent total disability trends, a comparison of Washington's
permanent total disability claims experience and injured workers with
other states and jurisdictions, the impact of the standard for finding
workers employable on the incidence of permanent total disability
pensions, and the impact of vocational rehabilitation under RCW
51.32.095 on the incidence of permanent total disability pensions. The
department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory
committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee,
and the senate labor, commerce, research and development committee on
the results of the study on or before July 1, 2008.
(13) $1,089,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of chapter 27, Laws of 2007 (ESHB 2171, crane
safety).
(14) $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$192,000 of the manufactured home installation training account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 2118
(mobile/manufactured homes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $107,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$107,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6839 (workers' compensation
coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) (($224,000)) $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $741,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation, and $741,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(17) $408,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$72,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2602 (victims' employment
leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $3,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6246
(industrial insurance claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to conduct a review of
the need for regulation of general and specialty contractors involved
in the repair, alteration, or construction of single-family homes using
the public interest criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010 and as
generally described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 3349
(residential contractors). By October 1, 2008, the department and the
department of licensing shall report their findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.
(20) ((The department of labor and industries shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the employment security department to expend
funds from the family leave insurance account for the implementation of
the family leave insurance program.
(21))) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section and by
not more than 5.53 percent in fiscal year 2008: Boiler inspection
permits and fees; boiler permit fees; plumbers' continuing education;
and plumbers' licensing and examination fees.
(21) $256,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$256,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of chapter 280, Laws of 2008 (industrial
insurance orders).

Sec. 1118 2009 c 4 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,124,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,926,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,060,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,264,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,476,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,025,000))
$1,332,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,317,000))
$3,640,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000
Veteran Estate Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,581,000))
$18,211,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $560,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5164 (veterans' conservation corps). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(b) The department shall not reduce field service contracts.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,484,000))
$4,833,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,120,000))
$43,207,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,569,000))
$32,241,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,121,000))
$88,229,000

Sec. 1119 2009 c 4 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,232,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,596,000))
$80,719,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,065,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($119,875,000))
$135,219,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,000))
$215,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,726,000))
$69,054,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,606,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,041,000
Public Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,027,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,460,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,055,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,918,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,122,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,729,000))
$46,398,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,846,000))
$47,846,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,025,690,000))
$1,033,225,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
its fee-supported programs in excess of the fiscal growth factor
pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and RCW 43.70.250, the department is further
authorized to increase fees in its fee-supported programs as necessary
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section, as specifically authorized in LEAP Document
DOH-2008, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program on March 11, 2008.
(2) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) $877,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1099
(dental professions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2304 (cardiac care services). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $138,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an evaluation of chronic care
provider training.
(6) $51,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (sex education). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1837 (nonambulatory persons). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $201,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2087 (health care facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for public service announcements
regarding childhood lead poisoning, information pamphlets, rule
development, and for early identification of persons at risk of having
elevated blood-lead levels, which includes systematically screening
children under six years of age and other target populations identified
by the department. Priority will be given to testing children and
increasing the registry in the lead surveillance program.
(10) $101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $81,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $6,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (ambulatory surgical facilities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $55,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1397 (massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $58,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5398
(specialty hospitals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $224,000 of the oyster reserve land account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $571,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $458,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1106 (hospital acquired infections). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,000,000 of the public health services
account--state appropriation are provided solely for department of
health-funded family planning clinics to increase the capacity of the
clinics to provide family planning and reproductive health services to
low-income men and women who are not otherwise eligible for services
through the department of social and health services medical assistance
program and for clinical or other health services associated with
sexually transmitted disease testing through the infertility prevention
project. Funds appropriated and expended under this subsection for
fiscal year 2009 shall be distributed in a manner that allocates
funding to department of health-funded family planning clinics based
upon the percentage of medical assistance family planning waiver
clients in calendar year 2005 who received services from a provider
located in the geographic area served by the department of
health-funded clinic. Of these amounts, the department is authorized
to expend up to $1,000,000 of its general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 for services provided in fiscal year 2008, if
necessary, to offset reductions in federal funding.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for one-time funding to purchase and store antiviral
medications to be used in accordance with the state pandemic influenza
response plan. These drugs are to be purchased through the United
States department of health and human services to take advantage of
federal subsidies.
(17) $147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of health to
provide relevant information on measures taken to facilitate expanded
use of reclaimed water pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the lifelong AIDS alliance to
restore lost federal funding.
(19) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for medical nutritional therapy
for people with HIV/AIDS and other low-income residents in King county
with chronic illnesses.
(20) $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the neurodevelopmental center
system, which provides therapy and medical services for young, low-income children with developmental disabilities.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to continue the autism task force
established by chapter 259, Laws of 2005, through June 30, 2008. The
task force shall:
(a) Review and continue to refine criteria for regional autism
centers throughout Washington state based on community needs in each
area, and address the role of autism centers within the larger context
of developmental disabilities;
(b) Prioritize its December 2006 recommendations and develop an
implementation plan for the highest priorities. The plan should detail
how systems will coordinate to improve service and avoid duplication
between state agencies including the department of social and health
services, department of health, office of superintendent of public
instruction, as well as school districts, autism centers, and local
partners and providers. The plan shall also estimate the costs of the
highest priority recommendations and report to the legislature and
governor by December 1, 2007;
(c) Compile information for and draft the "Washington Service
Guidelines for Individuals with Autism - Birth Through Lifespan" book
described in the task force's recommendations. Funding to print and
distribute the book is expected to come from federal or private
sources; and
(d) Monitor the federal combating autism act and its funding
availability and make recommendations on applying for grants to assist
in implementation of the 2006 task force recommendations. The
department of health shall be the lead agency in providing staff for
the task force. The department may seek additional staff assistance
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
committee staff of the legislature. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses.
(22) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the
Washington state hepatitis C strategic plan.
(23) $142,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5403 (animal massage practitioners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(24) $174,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5503 (athletic trainers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $75,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5292 (physical therapist assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(26) $94,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6032 (medical use of marijuana). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $386,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $384,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5894 (large on-site sewage
systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $1,721,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of sections 11 and 12 (medical
information) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). If the sections are not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $10,000,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $10,000,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for distribution to local health jurisdictions and for the costs
of administering the public health related sections of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health
care), subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) During the month of January 2008, and January 2009, the
department of health shall distribute funds appropriated in this
section to local health jurisdictions, less an amount not to exceed
five percent for the costs of administering the public health related
sections of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). The amount of funding for
distribution to a jurisdiction before the administrative deduction
shall be the greater of: (i) One hundred thousand dollars; or (ii) (A)
a base level of funding of seventy-five thousand dollars plus the per
capita amount, for a jurisdiction with a population of four hundred
thousand persons or fewer; or (B) a base level of funding of twenty-five thousand dollars plus the per capita amount, for a jurisdiction
with a population greater than four hundred thousand persons. Amounts
distributed under this subsection must be used to fund core public
health functions of statewide significance as defined in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on
health care).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Per capita amount" means an amount equal to seven million five
hundred thousand dollars multiplied by the proportion of the population
of the jurisdiction in the previous calendar year to the population of
the state in the previous calendar year.
(ii) "Population" means the number of persons as last determined by
the office of financial management. If the jurisdiction comprises a
single county, "population" means the number of persons in the county.
For a jurisdiction comprising two or more counties, "population" means
the number of persons in all counties comprising the jurisdiction.
(iii) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.
(c) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
subsection.
(30) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for an evaluation of the economic
benefits to the state's health care system of the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program under chapter 18.50 RCW. In particular, the
department shall contract with a consultant to conduct a review of
existing research literature on whether these economic benefits exceed
the state expenditures to subsidize the cost of the midwifery licensing
and regulatory program under RCW 43.70.250. The evaluation shall
include an assessment of the economic benefits to consumers who elect
to have out-of-hospital births with midwives, including any reduced use
of procedures that increase the costs of childbirth. The department
shall submit the report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature by January 1, 2008.
(31) $147,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of health to
convene a work group to develop recommendations regarding the need to
regulate those individuals currently registered with the department of
health as counselors. The department of health shall submit
recommendations of the work group to the legislature and governor by
November 15, 2007. Based on the recommendations of the work group, the
department of health shall draft credentialing guidelines for all
registered counselors by January 1, 2008. Guidelines shall include
education in risk assessment, ethics, professional standards, and
deadlines for compliance.
(32) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(33) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the senior falls prevention pilot
program, pursuant to section 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs).
(34) $585,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state breast and
cervical health program to increase the provider reimbursement rate for
digital mammographies to the medicare equivalent rate.
(35) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the child death review program. The
program shall be transferred from the community and family health
division to the injury prevention division within the department.
(36) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the northwest sickle cell
collaborative program.
(37) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $154,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the restoration of
maxillofacial/cleft palate teams in Yakima, Spokane, Seattle, and
Tacoma.
(38) $17,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6220
(nurse delegation) or sections 11 and 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(39) $11,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6439
(radiologist assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(40) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $4,261,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Fourth
Substitute House Bill No. 1103 (health professions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(41) $558,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2674 (counselor credentialing). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(42) The department of licensing and the department of health shall
jointly review and report to the appropriate policy committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008, recommendations for implementing a
process of holding in abeyance for up to six months following the
conclusion of active duty service the expiration of, and currency
requirements for, professional licenses and certificates for
individuals who have been called to active duty military service.
(43) The higher education coordinating board, the department of
licensing, and the department of health shall jointly review and report
to appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1,
2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the extent to which
veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills sets and
education required while in service to certification, licensure, and
degree requirements.
(44) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $80,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2647
(children's safe products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(45) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6340 (water
system program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(46) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2549 (patient-centered care). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(47) $96,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2881 (practice of dentistry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(48) $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory
program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There shall be no
change to the current annual fees for new or renewed licenses for the
midwifery program. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory
committee on a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed
midwifery.
(49) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington colon health program.
Through the program, the department shall provide grants to
participating counties to provide free colorectal screening exams to
individuals fifty to sixty-four years old who are below two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level.
(50) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $90,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1120 2008 c 329 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. (((1))) The appropriations to
the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the
programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1,
((2008)) 2009, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2008))
2009 between programs. The department shall not transfer funds, and
the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer,
unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to
the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not
federal funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations
from appropriation levels. The written notification shall include a
narrative explanation and justification of the changes((, along with
expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both
before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.
(2) The department may transfer up to $15,000,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 into fiscal year 2008,
if deemed necessary by the department and approved in advance by the
director of financial management. The director of financial management
shall notify the fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven
days prior to approving a transfer under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the transfer including allotment detail by program, budget object, and
budget unit for both fiscal years, both before and after any
transfers)).

Sec. 1121 2009 c 4 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,545,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,652,000))
$52,320,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,467,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($114,620,000))
$114,288,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $9,389,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of phase three of the
department's offender-based tracking system replacement project. This
amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of
section 902 of this act.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and support
of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.
(c) $169,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No.
1001 (auto theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422 (incarcerated parents).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(e) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(f) $314,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for four additional staff to
collect and analyze data for programs funded through the offender
reentry initiative and collect, analyze, and disseminate information
required by the GMAP process, performance audits, data requests, and
quality assessments and assurances.
(g) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6244 (conversion of facilities to house violators of community
supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(h) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2712 (criminal street gangs). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($601,402,000))
$616,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($647,608,000))
$655,534,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,157,000))
$3,941,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,338,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,271,689,000))
$1,294,399,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2007-09 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(f) $358,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $980,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(g) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1097 (vulnerable adults). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(h) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1319 (correctional agency employee). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(i) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1592 (sentence review board). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(j) $544,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $496,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of individual
reentry plans to prepare offenders for release into the community as
generally described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157
(offender recidivism). Individual reentry plans shall be based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool.
The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a series of
individual plans that combine to meet the requirements. The individual
reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate;
(ii) A description of the offender's education, certifications,
work experience, skills, and training; and
(iii) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, and family reunification. The individual
reentry plan shall be updated as appropriate during the period of
incarceration, and prior to the inmate's release to address public
safety concerns, consistency with the offender risk management level
assigned by the department, housing, and connecting with a community
justice center in the area in which the offender will be residing, if
a community justice center is located in that area.
(iv) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,157,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,881,000))
$146,344,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,319,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,370,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,943,000))
$301,406,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(c) $1,167,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and
operation of community justice centers by the department as generally
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender
recidivism). At a minimum, a community justice center shall include:
(i) A violator program to allow the department to utilize a range
of available sanctions for offenders who violate conditions of their
supervision;
(ii) An employment opportunity program to assist an offender in
finding employment;
(iii) On-site services or resources for connecting offenders with
services such as mental health and substance abuse treatment,
transportation, training, family reunification, and community services;
and
(iv) The services of a transition coordinator to facilitate
connections between the former offender and the community. The
transition coordinator shall provide information to former offenders
regarding services available to them in the community including, but
not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, education,
vocational training, parent education, financial literacy, treatment
for substance abuse, mental health, anger management, and shall assist
offenders in their efforts to access needed services.
(v) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,357,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,358,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $124,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,082,000))
$29,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,118,000))
$64,079,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for expenditures
related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 1122 2009 c 4 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,375,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,584,000))
$18,757,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,545,000))
$23,718,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for an adjustment to the agency lease
rate for space occupied and parking in the Tacoma Rhodes center. The
department of general administration shall increase lease rates to meet
the cash gain/loss break-even point for the Tacoma Rhodes center
effective July 1, 2007.
(2) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding for contracted services that provide employment support and
help with life activities for deaf and blind individuals in King
county.

Sec. 1123 2009 c 4 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,967,000))
$320,249,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,578,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,907,000))
$273,138,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,843,000
Family Leave Insurance Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,764,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($610,193,000))
$685,706,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.
(2) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to chapter
133, Laws of 2005 (unemployment insurance).
(3) $23,162,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions and department services to employers and job seekers.
(4) $372,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5653 (self-employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $12,054,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to fund the unemployment insurance tax
information system (TAXIS) technology initiative for the employment
security department.
(6) $430,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to replace high-risk servers used by the
unemployment security department.
(7) $503,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to provide a system to track computer
upgrades and changes for the unemployment security department.
(8) $183,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from the amounts made
available to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act
(Reed Act). This amount is authorized to conduct a feasibility study
to integrate job search data systems.
(9) $2,331,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for hardware and software to ensure the
ongoing, reliable operation of the telecenters.
(10) $488,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for the relocation of the WorkSource office
in Lakewood.
(11) $1,764,000 of the family leave insurance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the family leave
insurance program.
(((a) The amount provided in this subsection assumes that, in
developing the information technology systems to support the payment of
benefits, the department will incorporate the claim filing and benefit
payment efficiencies recommended by the joint legislative task force on
family leave insurance in Part III of its final report dated January
23, 2008, including:
(i) Eliminating the option for awarding attorney fees and costs for
administrative hearings;
(ii) Authorizing claims for benefits to be filed in the six-week
period beginning on the first day of the calendar week in which the
individual is on family leave;
(iii) Not requiring claimants to verify the birth of a child or the
placement of a child for adoption;
(iv) Including an attestation from the claimant that written notice
has been provided to the employer of the intention to take family
leave; and
(v) Not deducting and withholding federal income taxes from benefit
payments.
(b) In addition, the department shall incorporate the following
claim filing and benefit payment efficiencies:
(i) Define "qualifying year" to mean the first four of the last
five completed calendar quarters or, if eligibility is not established,
the last four completed calendar immediately preceding the first day of
the application year;
(ii) Allow individuals to file a claim for benefits in the six-week
period beginning on the first day of the calendar year in which the
individual is on family leave; and
(iii) After an initial family leave insurance benefit is paid,
subsequent payments must be made biweekly, rather than semimonthly,
thereafter.))
(12) $222,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2815 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $155,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely to implement Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART XII
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 1201 2009 c 4 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,044,000))
$1,017,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,086,000))
$2,059,000

Sec. 1202 2009 c 4 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,109,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,748,000))
$45,561,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,013,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,618,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,207,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,151,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,588,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,604,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $694,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,137,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,493,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,247,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,235,000))
$95,125,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,952,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,022,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,635,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,396,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,834,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,306,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,205,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,680,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,690,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,271,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,141,000))
$454,844,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $209,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $200,000 of the general fund--private local
appropriation are provided solely to implement activities associated
with a regional haze program. Funds shall be collected and expended in
accordance with the terms of the contract entered into with affected
businesses and the department of ecology.
(3) $2,000,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to local governments outside of Puget
Sound for municipal storm water programs, including but not limited to,
implementation of phase II municipal storm water permits, source
control for toxics in association with cleanup of contaminated sediment
sites, and source control programs for shellfish protection districts
where storm water is a significant contributor.
(4) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is further
authorized to increase the following fees in fiscal year 2009 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section: Wastewater discharge permit, not
more than 5.57 percent; dam periodic inspection permit, not more than
5.57 percent; dam construction permit, not more than 5.57 percent; and
mixed waste management, not more than 14.14 percent.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $927,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve the performance of
wetland mitigation. Of this amount, $55,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support
a wetland in Whatcom county. The program will engage local, state, and
federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and others in the
creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures to protect
habitat functions and values while accommodating urban growth in the
region. Priority shall be given to state and local government
partnerships for wetland characterization. The department shall issue
a report of its findings and recommendations on how wetland mitigation
success can be improved to the office of financial management and the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature.
(6) $260,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot project to provide
grants to two local government jurisdictions located in the Puget Sound
area to improve compliance with existing environmental laws. Grant
funds shall be used for providing information on existing requirements,
providing technical assistance necessary to comply on a voluntary
basis, and taking enforcement action.
(8) $1,257,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5881 (water
power license fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(9) $694,000 of the underground storage tank account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5475 (underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(10) $2,026,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for local governments located near
hazardous waste clean-up sites, including Duwamish Waterway,
Commencement Bay, and Bellingham Bay, to work with small businesses and
citizens to safely manage hazardous and solid wastes to prevent the
contamination.
(11) $876,000 of the state toxics control account and $876,000 of
the local toxics control account are provided solely for public
participation grants related to toxic cleanup sites within and around
Puget Sound.
(12) $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement watershed plans. Of
this amount, $313,650 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support the implementation
of the WRIA 1 watershed plan and the Bertrand watershed improvement
district plan, including but not limited to implementation of the
Nooksack River basin stream gauging program, study of the feasibility
of a public utility district pipeline in the Bertrand watershed, study
and construction of water storage and augmentation in the Bertrand
watershed, and preparation and development of the next subbasin
watershed plan agreed to by the Bertrand instream flow policy group.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop, by
rule, guidelines for the appropriate siting and operation of geoduck
aquaculture operations to be included in any master program under the
shorelines management act. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for convening a stakeholder group
to recommend establishing a sustainable statewide regional CBRNE/Hazmat
response capability.
(15) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement key recommendations
and actions identified in the "Washington's Ocean Action Plan:
Enhancing Management of Washington State's Ocean and Outer Coast". The
department shall provide a progress report on implementing this plan to
the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 31,
2008.
(16) $464,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to oversee
beach seaweed removal in the west Seattle Fauntleroy community. The
department may spend up to $25,000 of this amount for its cost of
administration.
(18) $693,000 of the state toxics control account is provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5421 (environmental
covenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(19) $99,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a marshland study of key areas
of salmon habitat along the Snohomish river estuary.
(20) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $19,000 of the oil spill prevention account
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(21) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
U.S. institute for environmental conflict resolution, a federal agency,
to develop a pilot water management process with three federally
recognized treaty Indian tribes. $50,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the northwest
Indian fisheries commission to help establish the pathway for the
process in federal agencies.
(22) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to continue the pilot water pathways
project through the remainder of the biennium. The department will
work with the northwest Indian fisheries commission and the U.S.
institute on environmental conflict resolution to find resolution on
persistent water policy issues between tribes and nontribal entities.
(23) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $241,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(24) $53,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5552 (penalties for oil spills). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to convene a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, composed of a balanced
representation from interested state regulatory agencies, Native
American tribes, local governments and the environmental and shellfish
farming communities. The group will be facilitated by the office of
regulatory assistance and will address federal, state, and local
regulatory issues related to shellfish farming.
(26) Within the appropriations provided in this section for the
development of water supplies in the Columbia river basin, the
department shall assist county governments located east of the crest of
the Cascade mountain range that: Have an international border; or
border a county with an international boundary and a county with four
hundred thousand or more residents, to identify water supply projects
to compete for funding from the Columbia river basin water management
program. The department shall provide technical assistance as needed
to further refine priority projects identified by these counties. The
department shall consider and balance regional water supply needs in
its funding allocation decisions made as a part of this program.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for coordinating with the University of
Washington to assess the current energy profile of Washington state
pulp and paper mills. The energy consumption and energy generation
capability will be determined for both steam and electrical power. In
addition, the sources and types of fuels used in various boilers will
be assessed.
(28) $195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support a collaborative process to
design a proposed comprehensive water management structure for the
Walla Walla river basin. The proposed structure should address the
allocation of functions, authorities, resource requirements, and issues
associated with interstate watershed management of the basin. Invited
participants should include but not be limited to the confederated
tribes of the Umatilla Indian reservation; appropriate state agencies;
and Walla Walla basin interests such as municipalities, irrigation
districts, conservation districts, fisheries, agriculture, economic
development, and environmental representatives. A report outlining the
proposed governance and water management structure shall be submitted
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2008.
(29) $333,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2647 (children's safe products). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(30) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,027,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2815 (reducing greenhouse gases emissions in the
Washington economy). In participating in the western climate
initiative under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2815, the
director of the department shall seek to ensure that the design for a
regional multisector market-based system confers equitable economic
benefits and opportunities to electric utilities operating in
Washington by having that system recognize at least the following: (a)
Voluntary investments made by Washington utilities in energy efficiency
measures; (b) emission reduction benefits that other state and
provincial participants in the western climate initiative derive from
consuming renewable energy generated in Washington; and (c) adverse
impacts that climate change uniquely has upon the capabilities of
hydroelectric power generation. Washington state's representatives to
the western climate initiative process shall advocate for a regional
multisector market-based design that addresses competitive
disadvantages that could be experienced by in-region industries as
compared to industries in states or countries that do not have
greenhouse gas reduction programs that are substantively equivalent to
the system designed under the western climate initiative process. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(31) Within the appropriations provided in this section the
department shall ensure that standard statewide protocols for surface
water monitoring are developed and included in status and trends
monitoring to utilize information from other entities, including other
state agencies, local governments, and volunteer groups.
(32)(a) $2,000,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to affected counties
as defined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874
(Columbia river water) to mitigate for negative impacts caused by
releases of Lake Roosevelt water for the purposes described in that
bill. The criteria for allocating these funds shall be developed by
the department in consultation with affected local governments.
(b) $150,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for the department to retain a
contractor to perform an independent analysis of legislative options to
protect rural communities in northeast Washington from disproportionate
economic, agricultural, and environmental impacts when upstream water
rights are purchased and transferred for use, or idled and used as
mitigation, in a downstream watershed or county. Before retaining a
contractor, the department shall consult with affected counties as
defined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
river water). The contractor selected shall conduct the independent
analysis and develop a report describing options and recommended
actions. The department of ecology shall provide the report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(c) If Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
river water delivery) is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(33) $210,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to clean up naturally occurring
asbestos from Swift Creek.
(34) $80,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to create a
stakeholder advisory committee to review and develop recommendations to
help businesses achieve a fifty percent toxics reduction use goal. The
committee shall: (a) Review and make recommendations to improve the
effectiveness and delivery of technical assistance in pollution
prevention planning; (b) develop recommendations for strategies to
encourage moving away from "end-of-pipe" pollution reduction approaches
to increase hazardous waste prevention throughout the state; and (c)
review and make recommendations on revising the hazardous waste
planning fee under RCW 70.95E.030, including opportunities to provide
incentives that reward businesses for toxic use reduction successes in
meeting a fifty percent toxics use reduction goal. The committee shall
report its findings and recommendations to the fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 1,
2008.
(35) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6805
(relating to promoting farm and forest land preservation and
environmental restoration through conservation markets). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(36) RCW 70.105.280 authorizes the department to assess reasonable
service charges against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate,
or dispose of dangerous or extremely hazardous waste that involves both
a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component.
Service charges may not exceed the costs to the department in carrying
out the duties in RCW 70.105.280. The current service charges do not
meet the costs of the department to carry out its duties. Pursuant to
RCW 43.135.055 and 70.105.280, the department is authorized to increase
the service charges no greater than 10% for fiscal year 2009.

Sec. 1203 2009 c 4 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,970,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,503,000))
$45,508,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,731,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,559,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,829,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,334,000))
$38,584,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,943,000))
$146,198,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for project scoping and cost estimating
for the agency's 2009-11 capital budget submittal.
(4) $2,255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for costs associated with relocating the
commission's Tumwater headquarters office.
(5) $272,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with
relocating the commission's eastern Washington regional headquarters
office.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for replacing vehicles and equipment.
(7) $1,611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,428,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for planned and emergency
maintenance of park facilities.
(8) $1,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the recreational boating safety
program.
(9) $954,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,007,000)) $932,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
operations of Cama Beach state park.
(10) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5219 (weather and avalanche center). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $264,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($217,000)) $132,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish a
pilot lifeguard program at Lake Sammamish and Nolte state parks. The
department shall complete a comprehensive risk analysis to determine if
expansion of the lifeguard program or other drowning risk reduction
measures should be implemented. The department shall report its
findings to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by July 1, 2009. The department shall
fully implement this program as intended in this subsection.
(14) $455,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a long-range plan for Fort Worden state park, including architectural and site
design guidelines, business and operations implementation, site and
facilities use plan, and for the department to convene a task force to
recommend alternative governance structures for the park.
(15) $1,600,000 of the parks renewal stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for operating state parks, developing
and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance,
enhancing park stewardship and other state park purposes, pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2275 (raising funds for state parks).
Expenditures from the amount provided in this subsection shall not
exceed actual revenues received under Substitute House Bill No. 2275.
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(16) (($40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(17))) $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for one-time financial assistance
to the northwest weather and avalanche center, administered by the
United States forest service, to keep the center operational through
the remainder of the biennium.
(((18))) (17) Funds in this section are sufficient for continued
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5010 (foster
home pass). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1204 2009 c 4 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,158,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,062,000))
$49,094,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,270,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,184,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,022,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $323,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,992,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $753,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $842,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,549,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,279,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,187,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,478,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,911,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $483,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,000))
$240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($340,078,000))
$340,080,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall use the department of printing for
printing needs. Funds provided in this section may not be used to
staff or fund a stand-alone printing operation.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(6) The department shall assist the office of regulatory assistance
in implementing activities consistent with the governor's regulatory
improvement program. The department shall support and provide
expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and business
interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes involving
state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(7) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.
(8) $609,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to implement a pilot
project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation to
develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus Woods
and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of lake
fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to state
and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the Columbia
River water supply program.
(a) For the purposes of the pilot project:
(i) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(ii) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(iii) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy
the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus
Woods;
(iv) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(v) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The director, in collaboration with the Colville Tribes, shall
provide an interim report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008. The
report shall describe the status of the pilot project, and make
recommendations as needed to fully implement the project, pursuant to
the state and tribal agreement on Lake Rufus Woods.
(9) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue the ballast water
management program in Puget Sound and expand the program to include the
Columbia river and coastal ports.
(10) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for hatchery facility maintenance
improvements.
(11) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $409,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for estimates of juvenile
abundance of federally listed salmon and steelhead populations. The
department shall report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with a letter stating
the use and measurable results of activities that are supported by
these funds.
(12) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the strategic budget and
accountability program.
(13) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(14) Prior to submitting its 2009-11 biennial operating and capital
budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office of
financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery
scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This review
shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG
recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on
their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the
recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed
requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The
department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of
financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by
October 1, 2008.
(15) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5447 (coastal Dungeness crab). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(17) $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $204,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5923 (aquatic invasive species). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(19) $352,000 of the wildlife rehabilitation account is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5188 (wildlife
rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of fish and
wildlife to participate in the upper Columbia salmon recovery plan
implementation, habitat conservation plan hatchery committees, and the
priest rapids salmon and steelhead agreement hatchery technical
committee.
(21)(a) Within existing funds, the department of fish and wildlife
shall sell the upper 20-acre parcel of the Beebe springs property.
(b) Proceeds from the sale are to be used to develop the Beebe
springs natural interpretive site. Up to $300,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
the development of the Beebe springs natural interpretive site. The
department shall not expend more than the amount received from the sale
proceeds.
(22) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2049 (marine resource committees). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study of introducing oxygen
to the waters of Hood Canal. The study shall propose a location in a
small marine area where a large number of bottom-dwelling fish species
exist, and analyze the impact of injected dissolved oxygen on aquatic
life. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the results of the study and recommend whether to
proceed with a project to inject oxygen into Hood Canal.
(24) $1,310,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to replace state wildlife account funds
for the engineering program and $610,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 are provided solely to replace state
wildlife account funds for the hydraulic project permitting program,
including the development of a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic
project approval program to make the program self supporting. Fees may
be based on factors relating to the complexity of the permit issuance.
The fees received by the department must be deposited into the state
wildlife account and shall be expended exclusively for the purposes of
the hydraulic project permitting program. By December 1, 2008, the
department shall provide a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic
project approval program to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(25) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to the department to work in cooperation
with the department of natural resources to assist with the
implementation of the wild horse coordinated resource management plan.
Implementation may include providing grant funding to other state and
nonstate entities as needed.
(26) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to develop
siting guidelines for power generation facilities, provide technical
assistance for permitting, support voluntary compliance with the
guidelines, and to conduct bird and wildlife assessments on state lands
most eligible for wind power leases.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop and maintain an
electronic database for aquatic farmer registration. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(28) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall not make a
permanent closure of any hatchery facility currently in operation.
(29) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2008.
(30) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(31) The department shall complete an inventory of department
purchased or leased lands acquired for mixed agriculture and fish and
wildlife habitat and provide for each purchase or lease agreement the
cost and date of the agreement, the previous use of the land, any
agreement or deed specifying continuing use of the land, and the
current management cost and status of each parcel of purchased or
leased lands. The department shall provide the inventory to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(32) $289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $301,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for selective fisheries.
(33) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for removal of derelict gear in Washington
waters.
(34) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a review of the effectiveness of the
department's existing hydraulic project approval process and
environmental outcomes.
(35) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement the 2008 Wiley Slough
restoration project report to the legislature recommendation to
establish a private farmland, public recreation partnership that would
provide farmland preservation, waterfowl management, and public
recreational access.
(36) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Ebey Island property management costs.
(37)(a) A work group on Electron dam salmon passage is established,
with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The department of fish and wildlife shall appoint at least
one representative from each of the following entities: The department
of fish and wildlife, Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and Puget Sound
energy.
(b) The department of fish and wildlife shall provide staff support
to the work group.
(c) The work group shall study possible enhancements for improving
outbound juvenile salmon passage at Electron dam on the Puyallup river.
(d) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(e) The expenses of the work group, other than travel expenses of
legislative members, shall be paid within existing funds from the
department of fish and wildlife.
(f) The work group shall present its findings and recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2009.
(g) This subsection expires January 1, 2009.
(38) As part of its 2009-11 biennial budget request, the department
shall submit a report detailing the methodology for determining the
value of payment in lieu of taxes as provided in RCW 79.70.130. At a
minimum, the report will show the number of acres subject to the
payment in lieu of taxes, the tax rates assumed by each affected
county, and the resulting value of the state general fund obligation.
(39) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6821 (fish and wildlife
information).
(40) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6227
(outer coast marine resources committees). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(41) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6231
(marine protected areas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1205 2009 c 4 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,328,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,695,000))
$65,720,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,855,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,603,000))
$57,647,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,196,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,523,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,897,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,633,000))
$95,426,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,279,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,650,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,046,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($321,807,000))
$339,669,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,021,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,043,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $13,920,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($13,542,000)) $30,292,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $5,000,000 of the disaster
response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster response
account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency
indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and
administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining
accounts and appropriations.
(3) Fees approved by the department of natural resources and the
board of natural resources in the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $199,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forests, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(5) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. The department shall compile the outcomes of these grants
annually and submit them to the office of financial management by
September 1 of 2008 and 2009.
(6) $400,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department shall prepare a feasibility study that analyzes
applicable business processes and develops the scope, requirements, and
alternatives for replacement of the department's current suite of
payroll-support systems. The department shall use an independent
consultant to assist with the study, and shall submit the completed
analysis to the office of financial management, the department of
personnel, and the department of information services by August 1,
2008.
(8) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue interagency agreements
with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology
for forest and fish report field implementation tasks.
(9) All department staff serving as recreation-management trail
stewards shall be noncommissioned.
(10) $112,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts. The
department may enter into agreements with federal agencies to eradicate
spartina from private lands that may provide a source of reinfestation
to public lands.
(11) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to convene and
staff a work group to study issues related to wildfire prevention and
protection. The work group shall be composed of members representing
rural counties in eastern and western Washington, fire districts,
environmental protection organizations, industrial forest landowners,
the agricultural community, the beef industry, small forest landowners,
the building industry, realtors, the governor or a designee, the
insurance commissioner or a designee, the office of financial
management, the state fire marshal or a designee, the state building
code council, and the commissioner or public lands or a designee. The
work group shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2008.
(12) $249,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(13) $2,000,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6044 (derelict vessels). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(14) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $14,000 of the forest development account--state appropriation
and $52,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the removal of one or two
large floating dry docks off Lake Washington near the Port Quendall
site in north Renton.
(17) $547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $22,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state
appropriation and $22,000 of the resources management cost account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (surface mining reclamation). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely to extend the 2005-2007 contract with
the University of Washington college of forestry resources for
additional research and technical assistance on the future of
Washington forests. Reports shall be submitted by June 30, 2009, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the following topics:
(a) An exploration of the potential markets for renewable energy
from biomass from Washington forests, especially from material removed
from eastern Washington forests as part of forest health improvement
efforts. This exploration shall assess the feasibility of converting
large amounts of underutilized forest biomass into useful products and
green energy by providing required analyses needed to efficiently
collect and deliver forest biomass to green energy end users. The role
of transportation and processing infrastructure in developing markets
for such material for both clean energy and value-added products shall
be included in the exploration. The college shall coordinate with
Washington State University efforts to identify what new biological,
chemical, and engineering technologies are emerging for converting
forest biomass to clean and efficient energy.
(b) Recommendations for the college's northwest environmental forum
for retaining the highest valued working forest lands at risk of
conversion to nonforest uses. These recommendations should include an
examination of means to enhance biodiversity through strategic
retention of certain lands, as well as economic incentives for
landowners to retain lands as working forests and provide ecosystem
services. The recommendations shall consider the health and value of
the forest lands, the rate of loss of working forest lands in the area,
the risk to timber processing infrastructure from continued loss of
working forest lands, and the multiple benefits derived from retaining
working forest lands. The recommendations shall prioritize forest
lands in the Cascade foothills, which include the area generally
encompassing the nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range
and drainages lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above
mean sea level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King,
Pierce, Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(20) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Chelan county, as the chair of
the Stemilt partnership, to perform the following:
(a) Work with private and public land management entities to
identify and evaluate land ownership possibilities;
(b) Allocate up to $10,000 to the department of fish and wildlife
to perform technical studies, baseline assessments, environmental
review, due diligence, and similar real estate evaluations; and
(c) Implement real estate transactions based on the results of the
studies.
(21) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for health benefits to Washington
conservation corps employees.
(22) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff support for the natural
heritage program to integrate, analyze, and provide bird area
information, and for state designations and mapping support, among
other activities.
(23) $48,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall participate in a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, convened by the department
of ecology. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $150,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5445 (cost-reimbursement agreements). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with
the Puget Sound partnership to complete a final habitat conservation
plan for state-owned aquatic lands and an environmental impact
statement by June 2009.
(26) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2844 (urban forestry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to complete maps of lower Hood Canal,
including subsurface geologic layers, lithology, digital layers, and
maps to identify liquifiable sediments for hazard mitigation. The
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on maps that were produced by December 1, 2008.
(28) As part of its 2009-11 biennial budget request, the department
shall submit a report detailing the methodology for determining the
value of payment in lieu of taxes as provided in RCW 79.70.130. At a
minimum, the report will show the number of acres subject to the
payment in lieu of taxes, the tax rates assumed by each affected
county, and the resulting value of the state general fund obligation.
(29) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to supplement other available funds for an
analysis of whether forest practices rules (including rules for harvest
on potentially unstable slopes, road construction and maintenance, and
post-harvest slash treatment) effectively protect public resources and
public safety from landslides, and other storm-related impacts. The
analysis is to be accomplished using the forest practices board
adaptive management process. The cooperative monitoring, evaluation,
and research (CMER) committee of the adaptive management program shall
submit a report of its preliminary analysis and conclusions to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008. The
forest practices board shall submit a complete report of the CMER study
on the effectiveness of current prescriptions and practices by June 30,
2009. This amount is ongoing solely to make improvements to the
state's geological survey.
(30) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2472 (recreational opportunities).

Sec. 1206 2009 c 4 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,655,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,098,000))
$3,898,000
State Toxics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,510,000))
$1,710,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $600,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($1,400,000)) $1,200,000 of the water quality
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,500,000 of
the general fund--private/local appropriation are provided solely for
the education of citizens through attracting and utilizing volunteers
to engage in activities that result in environmental benefits.
(2) $2,208,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $370,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $560,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,155,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, then $2,208,000 of the water quality
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the
water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009,
$1,155,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $500,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
appropriated to the office of the governor for operation of the Puget
Sound action team.
(3) To implement the 2007-09 Puget Sound biennial plan required by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership),
funding is provided solely for Puget Sound recovery activities in the
budgets of selected agencies and institutions of higher education,
including the department of agriculture, department of community, trade
and economic development, conservation commission, department of
ecology, department of fish and wildlife, department of health,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, department of natural
resources, state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound
partnership, University of Washington, and Washington State University.
During the 2007-09 biennium, moneys are provided solely for these
agencies and institutions of higher education as provided for in
((LEAP)) OFM document ((PSAT-2007)) PSP-2009.
(4) $305,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 ((and $305,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are)) is provided solely for an outcome monitoring
program first for Puget Sound and Washington's coastline and then
across the remaining salmon recovery regions across the state.
(5) $852,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $231,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $900,000 of the state toxics
control account appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the 2020 action agenda.

(End of part)

PART XIII
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 1301 2009 c 4 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,334,000))
$32,288,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,629,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,680,000))
$5,681,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,687,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,133,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,010,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,007,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,429,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,057,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,109,000))
$119,064,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $282,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $357,000 of the fingerprint identification
account--state appropriation are provided solely for workload
associated with implementation of the federal Adam Walsh Act -- the
Children's Safety and Violent Crime Reduction Act of 2006.
(2) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of performing
criminal history and background checks activities. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of
the criminal history and background check activities.
(3) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(4) $350,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement the provisions of Senate
Bill No. 6119 (firefighter apprenticeship training program). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for efforts to reduce the number of
convicted offender biological samples awaiting DNA analysis.
(6) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5642 (cigarette
ignition).

(End of part)

PART XIV
EDUCATION
Sec. 1401 2009 c 4 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,605,000))
$38,708,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,231,000))
$152,334,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((A maximum of)) $11,920,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and ((a maximum of $12,019,000))
$10,152,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are for the operation and expenses of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Within the amounts provided in
this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary
accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong
understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive
the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The students selected for
the award must demonstrate understanding through completion of at least
one of the classroom-based civics assessment models developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, and through leadership in the
civic life of their communities. The superintendent shall select two
students from eastern Washington and two students from western
Washington to receive the award, and shall notify the governor and
legislature of the names of the recipients.
(2) $1,080,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($815,000)) $796,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities. Within the amounts provided, the
board shall implement the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education) for which it is
responsible, including: (a) Develop a comprehensive set of
recommendations for an accountability system; (b) adopt high school
graduation requirements aligned with international performance
standards in mathematics and science and, in conjunction with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, identify no more
than three curricula that are aligned with these standards; and (c)
review all requirements related to the high school diploma as directed
by section 405, chapter 263, Laws of 2006.
(3) $4,779,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($6,248,000)) $5,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the
professional educator standards board for the following:
(a) $930,000 in fiscal year 2008 and $1,257,000 in fiscal year 2009
are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board, including administering the alternative
routes to certification program, pipeline for paraeducators conditional
scholarship loan program, and the retooling to teach math conditional
loan program. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(a),
the professional educator standards board shall: (i) Revise the
teacher mathematics endorsement competencies and alignment of teacher
tests to the updated competencies; (ii) review teacher preparation
requirements in cultural understanding and make recommendations for
strengthening these standards; (iii) create a new professional level
teacher assessment; (iv) expand the alternative routes to teacher
certification program for business professionals and instructional
assistants who will teach math and science; (v) revise requirements for
college and university teacher preparation programs to match a new
knowledge- and skill-based performance system; and (vi) test
implementation of a revised teacher preparation program approach that
is classroom experience-intensive and performance-based;
(b) $3,269,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,966,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board. Of
the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b):
(i) $500,000 each year is provided solely for conditional
scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in special education,
math, science, or bilingual education;
(ii) $2,210,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $3,230,000 for fiscal year
2009 are for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math, science, special
education or bilingual education;
(iii) Remaining amounts in this subsection (3)(b) shall be used to
continue existing alternative routes to certification programs; and
(iv) Candidates seeking math and science endorsements under (i) and
(ii) of this subsection (3)(b) shall receive priority for funding;
(c) $236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington
teachers program established in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation);
(d) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 provided in this subsection (3) are for $4,000
conditional loan stipends for paraeducators participating in the
pipeline for paraeducators established in Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education); and
(e) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for conditional stipends for certificated teachers
pursuing a mathematics or science endorsement under the retooling to
teach mathematics or science program established in Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). The
conditional stipends shall be for endorsement exam fees as well as
stipends for teachers who must also complete coursework.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the professional educator standards board (PESB) to convene a work
group to develop recommendations for increasing teacher knowledge,
skills, and competencies to address the needs of English language
learner students, pursuant to Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673
(student learning opportunities).
(5) $425,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,975,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for replacement of the apportionment system, which
includes the processes that collect school district budget and
expenditure information, staffing characteristics, and the student
enrollments that drive the funding process.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
direct services and support to schools around an integrated,
interdisciplinary approach to instruction in conservation, natural
resources, sustainability, and human adaptation to the environment.
Specific integration efforts will focus on science, math, and the
social sciences. Integration between basic education and career and
technical education, particularly agricultural and natural sciences
education, is to be a major element.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the creation of a statewide data base of longitudinal student
information. This amount is conditioned on the department satisfying
the requirements in section 902 of this act.
(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
comprehensive cultural competence and anti-bias education programs for
educators and students. The office of superintendent of public
instruction shall administer grants to school districts with the
assistance and input of groups such as the anti-defamation league and
the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is to
promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be
coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.
(10) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5843 (regarding educational data and data systems).
(11) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1052 (legislative
youth advisory council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1422 (children and families of incarcerated parents).
(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098
(Washington college bound scholarship). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297
(regarding providing medically and scientifically accurate sexual
health education in schools).
(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a program to recognize the work of outstanding classified staff in
school districts throughout the state.
(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a full-time director of skills centers within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(17) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract
with the northwest educational research laboratory (NWREL) to conduct
two educational studies. Specifically, NWREL shall:
(a) Conduct a study regarding teacher preparation, training, and
coordinated instructional support strategies for English language
learners, as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). An
interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final report is due
December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the governor, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate
early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the legislature;
and
(b) Conduct a study of the effectiveness of the K-3 demonstration
projects as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). An
interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final report is due
December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the governor, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate
early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the legislature.
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract
with Washington State University social and economic sciences research
center (WSU-SESRC) to conduct to educational research studies. The
WSU-SESRC shall:
(a) Conduct a study which reviews chapter 207, Laws of 2002
(bullying in schools), evaluate the outcomes resulting from the
legislation, and to make recommendations for continued improvement.
The study shall, at a minimum, determine: (i) Whether the policies
have been developed and implemented in all elementary, middle, and high
schools; (ii) whether there has been any measurable improvement in the
safety and civility of schools' climate and environment as a result of
the legislation; (iii) whether there are still issues that need to be
addressed in light of the original intent of the legislation; and (iv)
recommended actions to be taken at the school, district, and state
level to address the identified issues. Additionally, WSU-SESRC shall
research and identify effective programs and the components of
effective programs. A report shall be submitted to the education
committees of the legislature and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction by September 1, 2008.
(b) Conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science
instructional coach program as described in Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). Findings
shall include an evaluation of the coach development institute,
coaching support seminars, and other coach support activities;
recommendations with regard to the characteristics required of the
coaches; identification of changes in teacher instruction related to
coaching activities; and identification of the satisfaction level with
coaching activities as experienced by classroom teachers and
administrators. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009. Both the interim and final report
shall be presented to the governor, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature.
(19) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for additional costs incurred by the state board of education in
reviewing proposed math standards and curriculum.
(20) During the 2007-09 biennium, to the maximum extent possible,
in adopting new agency rules or making any changes to existing rules or
policies related to the fiscal provisions in the administration of part
V of this act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall attempt to request approval through the normal legislative budget
process.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a comprehensive analysis of math and science teacher supply and
demand issues by the professional educator standards board. By
December 1, 2008, the professional educator standards board shall
submit a final report to the governor and appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature, that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Specific information on the current number of math and science
teachers assigned to teach mathematics and science both with and
without appropriate certification in those subjects by region and
statewide; (b) projected demand information by detailing the number of
K-12 mathematics and science teachers needed by the 2010-11 school year
by region and statewide; (c) specific recommendations on how the demand
will be met through recruitment programs, alternative route
certification programs, potential financial incentives, retention
strategies, and other efforts; and (d) identification of strategies,
based on best practices, to improve the rigor and productivity of
state-funded mathematics and science teacher preparation programs. As
part of the final report, the professional educator standards board and
the Washington state institute for public policy shall provide
information from a study of differential pay for teachers in high-demand subject areas such as mathematics and science, including the
design, successes, and limitations of differential pay programs in
other states. In order for the professional educator standards board
to quantify demand, each school district shall provide to the board, by
a date and in a format specified by the board, the number of teachers
assigned to teach mathematics and science, both with and without
appropriate certification and endorsement in those subjects, and the
number of mathematics and science teaching vacancies needing to be
filled, and the board shall include this data, by district, in its
analysis.
(22) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6556 (anaphylactic
policy).
(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6742 (guidelines
for students with autism) and Substitute Senate Bill No. 6743
(training for students with autism).
(24) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5100 (health insurance information for students).
(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2722
(achievement gap for African-American students). The center for the
improvement of student learning will convene an advisory committee to
conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for African-American
students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing the gap pursuant
to goals under the federal no child left behind act for all groups of
students to meet academic standards by 2014; and identify performance
measures to monitor adequate yearly progress. A study update shall be
submitted by September 15, 2008, and the committee's final report shall
be submitted by December 30, 2008, to the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the governor, the P-20
council, the basic education finance task force, and the education
committees of the legislature.
(26) Within the appropriations in this section specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2598 (online
mathematics curriculum).
(27) Within the appropriations in this section specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2635 (school
district boundaries and organization).
(28) Within the appropriations in this section specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 3129 (online
learning programs for high school students to earn college credit).
(29) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of superintendent of public instruction to assign at
least one full-time equivalent staff position to serve as the world
language supervisor.
(30) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(31) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the school safety center in the office of the superintendent of
public instruction subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(b) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the safety center advisory committee to develop and distribute a
pamphlet to promote internet safety for children, particularly in
grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet shall be posted on the
superintendent of public instruction's web site. To the extent
possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in schools throughout the
state and in other areas accessible to youth, including but not limited
to libraries and community centers.
(34) $9,670,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the
institute for community leadership. The program shall provide a
request for proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding, for
nonviolence leadership workshops serving at least 12 school districts
with direct programming in 36 elementary, middle, and high schools
throughout Washington state.
(36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a pilot youth suicide prevention and information program. The
office of superintendent of public instruction will work with selected
school districts and community agencies in identifying effective
strategies for preventing youth suicide.
(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for programs to improve safety and emergency preparedness and planning
in public schools, as generally described in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5097. The superintendent of public instruction shall design and
implement the grant program in consultation with the educational
service districts, the school safety advisory committee, and the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The funding
shall support grants to school districts for the development and
updating of comprehensive safe school plans, school safety training,
and the conducting of safety-related drills. As a condition of
receiving these funds, school districts must ensure that schools (a)
conduct at least one lockdown and one shelter in place safety drill
each school year, and (b) send updated school mapping database
information on an annual basis to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.
(38) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington state school directors' association to mediate and
facilitate a school disciplinary action task force to review and make
recommendations on a model policy regarding the use of physical force
in schools. The model policy shall be submitted to the appropriate
policy committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(39) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12
sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school
utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities
of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and
advanced technical support for the network.
(40) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
coordinate, in collaboration with educational service districts, a
system of outreach to school districts not currently maximizing their
eligibility for federal e-rate funding through the schools and
libraries program administered by the federal communications
commission. By December 15, 2008, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall issue a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature identifying school districts that were eligible but did not
apply for e-rate funding for the last two years, and an estimate of the
amounts for which they were eligible in those years. The report shall
also include recommendations for following-up on the findings relative
to the e-rate program contained in the state auditor's performance
audit of educational service districts completed September, 2007.
(41) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is to
expand the special services pilot project to include up to seven
participating districts. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.016.
(42) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.
(43) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for vocational student leadership organizations.
(44) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington civil liberties education program.
(45) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds
shall be used to support community involvement officers that recruit,
train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as
achievers scholars.
(46) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia pilot reading program in up to five
school districts.
(47) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for developing and disseminating curriculum and other materials
documenting women's role in World War II.
(48) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for incentive grants for districts and pilot projects to develop
preapprenticeship programs. Incentive grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(49) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the dissemination of the Navigation 101 curriculum to all
districts, including disseminating electronic student planning tools
and software for analyzing the impact of the implementation of
Navigation 101 on student performance, and grants to at least one
hundred school districts each year for the implementation of the
Navigation 101 program. The implementation grants will be limited to
a maximum of two years and the school districts selected shall
represent various regions of the state and reflect differences in
school district size and enrollment characteristics.
(50) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the enhancement of civics education. Of this amount, $25,000 each
year is provided solely for competitive grants to school districts for
curriculum alignment, development of innovative civics projects, and
other activities that support the civics assessment established in
chapter 113, Laws of 2006.
(51) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1573
(authorizing a statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and retrieval).
(52) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the communities in school program in Pierce county.
(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for support and expansion of the mentoring advanced placement program
in current operation in southwest Washington.
(54) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for program initiatives to address the educational needs of Latino
students and families. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with the Seattle community coalition of
compana quetzal to provide for three initiatives: (a) Early childhood
education; (b) parent leadership training; and (c) high school success
and college preparation programs. Campana quetzal shall report to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 2009,
regarding impact of the programs on addressing the academic achievement
gap, including high school drop-out rates and college readiness rates,
for Latino students.
(55) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2870
(professional development for instructional assistants). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(56) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a pilot project to encourage bilingual high school students to
pursue public school teaching as a profession. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with the Latino/a
educational achievement project (LEAP) to work with school districts to
identify and mentor not fewer than fifty bilingual students in their
junior year of high school, encouraging them to become bilingual
instructors in schools with high English language learner populations.
Students shall be mentored by bilingual teachers and complete a
curriculum developed and approved by the participating districts.
(57) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional (($225,000)) $122,000 reduction in
administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1402 2009 c 4 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,436,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,477,998,000))
$4,510,419,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,373,000))
$9,387,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,265,714,000))
$9,298,149,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2008-09 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (g)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(i) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (i) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
58.75 average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.11 percent in the 2007-08 school year and 16.75 percent in the 2008-09 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 17.04 percent in the
2007-08 school year and 18.72 percent in the 2008-09 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,703 per certificated staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a
maximum of $10,178 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $23,831 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $24,999 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $18,489 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $19,395 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $555.20 for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) $1,870,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,421,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1432 (granting service credit to educational
staff associates for nonschool employment).
(10) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($16,620,000))
$16,634,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years
2008 and 2009 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $547,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2008
and a maximum of $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2009;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2008 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2009 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $393,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) (($9,373,000)) $9,387,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is provided solely for allocations for equipment
replacement in vocational programs and skills centers. Each year of
the biennium, the funding shall be allocated based on $75 per full-time
equivalent vocational student and $125 per full-time equivalent skills
center student.
(f) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5790 (regarding
skills centers).
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.7 percent from the 2006-07 school year to the
2007-08 school year and 6.0 percent from the 2007-08 school year to the
2008-09 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(13) The appropriation levels in part V of this act assume
implementation of the reimbursement provisions of Senate Bill No. 6450
(school district reimbursement of performance audits).

Sec. 1403 2008 c 329 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,280,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($405,228,000))
$407,478,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($275,000))
$276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($566,783,000))
$569,034,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($500,195,000)) $502,039,000 is provided solely for the
following:
(a) A cost of living adjustment of 3.7 percent effective September
1, 2007, and another 3.9 percent effective September 1, 2008, pursuant
to Initiative Measure No. 732.
(b) An additional .5 percent cost of living adjustment is provided
above the amount required by Initiative Measure No. 732, effective
September 1, 2008.
(c) Additional salary increases as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary increases shall be provided to all 262
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule. These additional
salary increases will result in a decrease in the number of
grandfathered districts from the current thirty-four to twenty-four in
the 2007-08 school year and to twelve in the 2008-09 school year.
(d) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional
salary increases shall ensure a minimum salary allocation for
certificated administrative staff of $54,405 in the 2007-08 school year
and $57,986 in the 2008-09 school year.
(e) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional salary increases
ensure a minimum salary allocation for classified staff of $30,111 in
the 2007-08 school year and $31,865 in the 2008-09 school year.
(f) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates 13.47 percent for the
2007-08 school year and 16.11 percent for the 2008-09 school year for
certificated staff and 13.54 percent for the 2007-08 school year and
15.22 percent for the 2008-09 school year for classified staff.
(g) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(h) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $1.08 $2.46

Highly Capable (per formula student) $11.13 $25.51

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $29.80 $68.33

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $7.00 $18.86

(i) The appropriations in this section include $925,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and (($2,314,000)) $2,322,000 for fiscal year 2009 for salary
increase adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) (($66,591,000)) $66,719,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $682.54 per month for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $707.00 per month for the 2007-08 school year and $732.00
per month for the 2008-09 school year. The adjustments to health
insurance benefit allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.22 $0.45

Highly Capable (per formula student) $1.50 $3.05

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $3.96 $8.01

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $0.86 $2.05

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 1404 2008 c 329 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,409,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,510,000))
$291,499,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($574,919,000))
$589,908,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $848,000 of this fiscal year 2008 appropriation
and a maximum of $878,000 of the fiscal year 2009 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $44.84 per weighted mile in the 2007-08 school
year and $45.68 per weighted mile in the 2008-09 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) $25,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for temporary assistance to school
districts for pupil transportation programs. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the joint
legislative audit and review committee, will develop a method of
allocating these funds to school districts. The allocation method
shall be based primarily on the findings and analysis from the joint
legislative and audit review committee's K-12 pupil transportation
study completed in December 2006.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.

Sec. 1405 2008 c 329 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($581,925,000))
$580,312,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,692,000))
$438,852,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,575,647,000))
$1,577,194,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt the full
cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and
recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k),
chapter 372, Laws of 2006, and ensure that all school districts adopt
the method beginning in the 2007-08 school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, (($53,926,000)) $56,553,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the federal
safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the
federal appropriation in this subsection (8) in any fiscal year, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards. In the determination of need, the committee shall require
that districts demonstrate that they are maximizing their eligibility
for all state and federal revenues related to services for special
education-eligible students. Awards associated with (b) and (c) of
this subsection shall not exceed the total of a district's specific
determination of need.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) Using criteria developed by the committee, the committee shall
then consider extraordinary costs associated with communities that draw
a larger number of families with children in need of special education
services. The safety net awards to school districts shall be adjusted
to reflect amounts awarded under (b) of this subsection.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999. The state
safety net oversight committee shall ensure that safety net
documentation and awards are based on current medicaid revenue amounts.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review and streamline the application process to access safety net
funds, provide technical assistance to school districts, and annually
survey school districts regarding improvement to the process.
(12) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(13) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
2009, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended to support a special education ombudsman program within the
office of superintendent of public instruction. The purpose of the
program is to provide support to parents, guardians, educators, and
students with disabilities. The program will provide information to
help families and educators understand state laws, rules, and
regulations, and access training and support, technical information
services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program will provide
data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the office of
superintendent of public instruction, school districts, educational
service districts, state need projects, and the parent and teacher
information center. Within the appropriations in this section there is
sufficient funding provided to also provide at least a half-time
support staff position for the special education ombudsman program.
(15) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(16) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(17) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(18) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(19) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.

Sec. 1406 2008 c 329 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,555,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($220,100,000))
$224,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($423,655,000))
$428,069,000

Sec. 1407 2008 c 329 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,105,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,764,000))
$21,664,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,869,000))
$40,769,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $187,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($133,797)) $329,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain at
least one certificated instructional staff and related support services
at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to
support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to
furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 1408 2008 c 329 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,383,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,788,000))
$8,776,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,171,000))
$17,159,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $372.15 per funded
student for the 2007-08 school year and (($378.13)) $378.32 per funded
student for the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of 2.314 percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 1409 2008 c 329 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,595,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,560,000))
$68,924,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,243,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,398,000))
$179,762,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $824.12 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2007-08 school year and $840.64 in
the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.
(6) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260, during the 2007-09 biennium, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall not make exit
of the transitional bilingual program contingent on passing both the
Washington language proficiency test and the Washington assessment of
student learning without prior legislative approval.

Sec. 1410 2009 c 4 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,272,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,636,000))
$84,663,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,568,000))
$158,499,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($421,366,000))
$427,324,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $19,716,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($20,948,000)) $22,096,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $1,350,000 of the education legacy
trust account--state appropriation, and (($15,870,000)) $18,236,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of the Washington assessments of student
learning (WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of
retake assessments for high school students who are not successful in
one or more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to
implement the certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent
of public instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on
development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals
procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student
WASL results, on or around June 10th of each year. In addition to the
amounts provided for the Washington assessments of student learning in
this subsection, $11,372,000 is also included in the appropriations to
the office of financial management in this act for an interagency
agreement with the office of superintendent of public instruction for
the expenditure of those funds based on compliance with certain
requirements.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 3166 (design of the state assessment system and the Washington
assessment of student learning), including section 3 of the act
providing for end-of-course tests in math. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $1,630,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of diagnostic assessments, subject to the following terms and
conditions:
(a) A maximum of $2,540,000 of the funding provided in this
subsection shall support the development and implementation of
voluntary classroom-based diagnostic assessments and progress
monitoring tools for all subject areas included in the WASL by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(b) $2,360,000 of the funding provided in this subsection is for
allocations to school districts to purchase assessment tools which
supplement the system of diagnostic tests developed by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction as described in (a) of this
subsection.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
second grade assessments.
(5) $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and)) is provided solely for (a) the tenth grade
mathematics assessment tool that: (i) Presents the mathematics
essential learnings in segments for assessment; (ii) is comparable in
content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics WASL when all segments
are considered together; (iii) is reliable and valid; and (iv) can be
used to determine a student's academic performance level; (b) tenth
grade mathematics knowledge and skill learning modules to teach middle
and high school students specific skills that have been identified as
areas of difficulty for tenth grade students; and (c) making the
modules available on-line.
(6) $1,966,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $2,337,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation are provided solely to develop a system of mathematics
and science standards and instructional materials that are
internationally competitive and consistent with emerging best practices
research. Funding in this subsection shall fund all of the following
specific projects:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in mathematics as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education). Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
mathematics selected by the board, and convening education
practitioners and community members in an advisory capacity regarding
revised standards in mathematics.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic mathematics curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised
mathematics standards.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in science as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education. Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
science selected by the board, and convening education practitioners
and community members in an advisory capacity regarding revised
standards in science.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic science curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised science
standards.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate science textbooks, instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the
revised science standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted,
results will be shared with science teachers, other educators, and
community members.
(f) Funding is provided for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to develop WASL knowledge and skill learning modules
to assist students performing at tenth grade level 1 and level 2 in
science.
(g) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is
provided solely to the state board of education to increase capacity to
implement the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education) and Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(7) $8,950,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits for the
equivalent of two additional professional development days each school
year for fourth and fifth grade teachers. The allocations shall be
made based on the calculations of certificated instructional staff
units for fourth and fifth grade provided in section 502 of this act
and on the calculations of compensation provided in sections 503 and
504 of this act. Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are
intended to be formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant
budget drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008. In the
2007-08 school year, the professional development activities funded by
this subsection shall be focused on development of mathematics
knowledge and instructional skills and on improving instruction in
science. In the 2008-09 school year, the additional professional
development shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international mathematics and science standards and curriculum.
Districts may use the funding to support additional days for
professional development as well as job-embedded forms of professional
development.
(8) $13,058,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits for the
equivalent of three additional professional development days for middle
and high school math teachers and the equivalent of three additional
professional development days for middle and high school science
teachers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules to determine the number of math and science teachers in
middle and high schools within each district. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008. Districts may use the funding to
support additional days for professional development as well as job-embedded forms of professional development, consistent with the
following:
(a) For middle school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on development of basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills and the additional science professional
development shall focus on examination of student science assessment
data and identification of science knowledge and skill areas in need of
additional instructional attention. For middle school teachers during
the 2008-09 school year the additional math professional development
shall focus on skills related to implementing the new international
mathematics standards and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international science standards.
(b) For high school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on skills related to implementing state math learning
modules, the segmented math class/assessment program, the collection of
evidence alternative assessment, and basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills, and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to examination of student
science assessment data and identification of science knowledge and
skill areas in need of additional instructional attention. For high
school teachers during the 2008-09 school year the additional math
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international mathematics standards and the additional science
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international science standards.
(9) $17,491,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
for allocations to districts for specialized professional development
in math for one math teacher and one science teacher in each middle
school and one math teacher and one science teacher in each high
school. The allocations shall be based on five additional professional
development days per teacher and an additional allocation per teacher
of $1,500 for training costs. In order to generate an allocation under
this subsection, a teacher must participate in specialized professional
development that leads to the implementation of mathematics and science
courses that add new rigor to the math and science course offerings in
the school. Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are intended
to be formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant budget
drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008.
(10) $5,376,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a math and science instructional
coaches program pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education). Funding shall be used
to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math in the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years and twenty-five instructional coaches in middle
and high school science in the 2008-09 school years; and up to $300,000
may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to administer and coordinate the program. Each instructional coach
will receive five days of training at a coaching institute prior to
being assigned to serve two schools each. These coaches will attend
meetings during the year to further their training and assist with
coordinating statewide trainings on math and science.
(11) $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide allocations to
districts for middle and junior high school students in accordance with
the funding formulas provided in section 502 of this act. Although the
allocations are formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall
consider the funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and
shall adjust funding to stay within the amounts provided in this
subsection.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science,
technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across
the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high
school teachers each year professional development training for
implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
program in their schools.
(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for in-service training and educational programs conducted by the
Pacific science center and for the Washington state leadership
assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership
coordinated at the Pacific science center.
(14) $51,701,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill 5841 (enhancing student learning
opportunities and achievement). The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary
full-day program in a recipient school shall count as one-half of one
full-time equivalent student for the purpose of making allocations
under this subsection. Although the allocations are formula-driven,
the office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit the number of
recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts appropriated each
fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided in this
subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten programs for
10 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2007-08 school year and 20
percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2008-09 school year. Funding
priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty levels, as
measured by prior year free and reduced priced lunch eligibility rates
in each school. Additionally, as a condition of funding, school
districts must agree to provide the full-day program to the children of
parents who request it in each eligible school. For the purposes of
calculating a school district levy base, funding provided in this
subsection shall be considered a state block grant program under RCW
84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for support of a full-day kindergarten "lighthouse" resource program at
the Bremerton school district, as provided in Engrossed Second Senate
Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and
achievement). The purpose of the program is to provide technical
assistance to districts in the initial stages of implementing a high
quality full-day kindergarten program.
(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants for three demonstration projects for kindergarten through
grade three. The purpose of the grants is to implement best practices
in developmental learning in kindergarten through third grade pursuant
to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement).
(17) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants to school districts to implement emerging best practices
activities in support of classroom teachers' instruction of students,
with a first language other than English, who struggle with acquiring
academic English skills, as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and
achievement). Best practices shall focus on professional development
for classroom teachers and support of instruction for English language
learners in regular classrooms. School districts qualifying for these
grants shall serve a student population that reflects many different
first languages among their students. The Northwest educational
research laboratory (NWREL) shall evaluate the effectiveness of the
practices supported by the grants as provided in section 501 of this
act. Recipients of these grants shall cooperate with NWREL in the
collection of program data.
(19) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for training of paraprofessional classroom assistants and certificated
staff who work with classroom assistants as provided in RCW
28A.415.310.
(20) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and for a mentor
academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used
each fiscal year to operate a mentor academy to help districts provide
effective training for peer mentors. Funds for the teacher assistance
program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number of
first year beginning teachers.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals,
and program administrators.
(22) $105,765,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a principal support program. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction may contract with an independent organization to
administer the program. The program shall include: (a) Development of
an individualized professional growth plan for a new principal or
principal candidate; and (b) participation of a mentor principal who
works over a period of between one and three years with the new
principal or principal candidate to help him or her build the skills
identified as critical to the success of the professional growth plan.
Within the amounts provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support
additional participation of secondary principals.
(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for focused
assistance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall conduct educational audits of low-performing schools and enter
into performance agreements between school districts and the office to
implement the recommendations of the audit and the community. Each
educational audit shall include recommendations for best practices and
ways to address identified needs and shall be presented to the
community in a public meeting to seek input on ways to implement the
audit and its recommendations.
(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a high school and school district improvement program modeled after
the office of the superintendent of public instruction's existing
focused assistance program in subsection (25)(b) of this section. The
state funding for this improvement program will match an equal amount
committed by a nonprofit foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded
program.
(26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for summer accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of
public instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff
with training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall offer at least one institute specifically for
improving instruction in mathematics in fiscal years 2008 and 2009 and
at least one institute specifically for improving instruction in
science in fiscal year 2009.
(27) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the evaluation of mathematics textbooks, other instructional
materials, and diagnostic tools to determine the extent to which they
are aligned with the state standards. Once the evaluations have been
conducted, results will be shared with math teachers, other educators,
and community members for the purposes of validating the conclusions
and then selecting up to three curricula, supporting materials, and
diagnostic instruments as those best able to assist students to learn
and teachers to teach the content of international standards. In
addition, the office of the superintendent shall continue to provide
support and information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based reading programs.
(28) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the mathematics helping corps subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(29) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the improvement of reading achievement and implementation of
research-based reading models. The superintendent shall evaluate
reading curriculum programs and other instructional materials to
determine the extent to which they are aligned with state standards.
A report of the analyses shall be made available to school districts.
The superintendent shall report to districts the assessments that are
available to screen and diagnose reading difficulties, and shall
provide training on how to implement a reading assessment system.
Resources may also be used to disseminate grade level expectations and
develop professional development modules and web-based materials.
(30) $30,706,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(31) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to award five grants to parent, community, and
school district partnership programs that will meet the unique needs of
different groups of students in closing the achievement gap. The
legislature intends that the pilot programs will help students meet
state learning standards, achieve the skills and knowledge necessary
for college or the workplace, reduce the achievement gap, prevent
dropouts, and improve graduation rates.
(a) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(b) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2009 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support
and award Washington community learning center program grants pursuant
to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the elimination of the lunch co-pay for students in grades
kindergarten through third grade that are eligible for reduced price
lunch.
(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the development of mathematics support activities provided by
community organizations in after school programs. Pursuant to Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education), the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall administer grants to community organizations that partner with
school districts to provide these activities and develop a mechanism to
report program and student success.
(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for: (a) The meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the breakfast co-pay for students
eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c) for additional assistance for
school districts initiating a summer food service program.
(36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate
reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts
that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading
programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading
corps programs. Grants provided under this section may be used by
school districts for expenditures from September 2007 through August
31, 2009.
(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of care for
children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of
care program exists in the area in which the school district is
located, the local plan shall provide for coordination with existing
programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant funds shall be
allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(38) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on
school district technology development, promoting standards for school
district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology
support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate
a process to facilitate the evaluation and provision of online
curriculum courses to school districts which includes the following:
Creation of a general listing of the types of available online
curriculum courses; a survey conducted by each regional educational
technology support center of school districts in its region regarding
the types of online curriculum courses desired by school districts; a
process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best online
courses in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and
assistance to school districts in procuring and providing the courses
to students.
(39) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools,
assessment data, and other information that assists schools and
teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(40) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the operation of the center for the improvement of student learning
pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(41) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for one-time allocations for technology upgrades and improvements. The
funding shall be allocated based on $3,000 for each elementary school,
$6,000 for each middle or junior high school, and $11,000 for each high
school. In cases where a particular school's grade span or
configuration does not fall into these categories, the office of
superintendent of public instruction will develop an allocation to that
school that recognizes the unique characteristics but maintains the
proportionate allocation identified in this subsection.
(42) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for costs associated with office of the superintendent of public
instruction establishing a statewide director of technology position
pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education).
(43)(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher in fiscal year 2008 and adjusted for inflation in fiscal year
2009. Beginning in the 2007-2008 school year and thereafter, national
board certified teachers who become public school principals shall
continue to receive this bonus for as long as they are principals and
maintain the national board certification;
(ii) During the 2007-2008 school year, for national board certified
teachers who teach in schools where at least 70 percent of student
headcount enrollment is eligible for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program, an additional $5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump
sum. Beginning in the 2008-2009 school year and thereafter, an
additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board
certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at
least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch; and
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits. Unless Senate Bill No. 6657 (salary
bonuses for individuals certified by the national board for
professional teaching standards) is enacted by June 30, 2008, the
annual bonus shall not be included in the definition of "earnable
compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "the percent of the student
headcount enrollment eligible for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program" shall be defined as: (i) For the 2007-08 and the 2008-09 school years, schools in which the prior year percentage of students
eligible for the federal free and reduced price lunch program meets the
criteria specified in subsection (41)(a)(ii) of this section; and (ii)
in the 2008-09 school year, any school that met the criterion in (c)(i)
of this subsection in the 2007-08 school year.
(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the office
of superintendent of public instruction shall revise rules to allow
teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching at the
Washington school for the deaf or Washington school for the blind, to
receive the annual bonus amounts specified in this subsection if they
are otherwise eligible.
(44) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6377
(career and technical education).
(45) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for an allocation of four dollars and nine
cents per full-time equivalent student, or as much as the funding in
this subsection will allow, to maintain and improve library materials,
collections, and services. The funding provided in this subsection
shall be used to augment current funding for librarian programs
provided through basic education and other existing funding mechanisms.
In order to receive allocations under this section, school districts
must agree that to the maximum extent possible they will ensure that
library programs and services are equitably provided throughout the
district.
(46) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483 (local
farms-healthy kids and communities).
(47) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6673 (student learning opportunities) which requires the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to explore online curriculum
support in languages other than English.
(48) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants to five skills centers to develop and plan for
implementation of integrated English language development/career skills
programs that pair English language development teachers with
career/technical education instructors in the classroom. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction and skill center staff shall
work with the state board for community and technical colleges I-BEST
program staff and local community and technical college program staff
to develop the program to assure critical program elements are included
and that the skill center programs provide a seamless transition for
high school students to the community and technical college programs
for students choosing that pathway. The request for proposal or grant
application shall be issued no later than May 1, 2008, so that grant
recipients can begin program planning and development efforts on July
1, 2008. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
resulting implementation plans to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(49) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for support of public high schools' participation in the FIRST robotics
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue grants not to exceed $10,000 per school to be used for teacher
stipends, registration fees, equipment, and other costs associated with
direct participation in the program. High-poverty schools and schools
starting up robotics programs shall be given priority in funding.
(50) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional (($499,000)) $602,000 reduction in
administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 1411 2009 c 4 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,654,000))
$86,268,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,660,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($559,648,000))
$561,262,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $220.34 per funded student for the
2007-08 school year and $265.08 per funded student for the 2008-09
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund -- state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(e) If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673 (student learning
opportunities) is enacted by June 30, 2008, in addition to the amounts
allocated in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, an additional amount
shall be allocated to school districts with high concentrations of
poverty and English language learner students beginning in the 2008-2009 school year, subject to the following rules and conditions:
(i) To qualify for additional funding under this subsection, a
district's October headcount enrollment in grades kindergarten through
grade twelve must have at least twenty percent enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program based on an average of the
program headcount taken in October and May of the prior school year;
and must also have at least forty percent eligible for free or reduced
price lunch based on October headcount enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve in the prior school year.
(ii) Districts meeting the specifications in (e)(i) of this
subsection shall receive additional funded students for the learning
assistance program at the rates specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section. The number of additional funded student units shall be
calculated by subtracting twenty percent from the district's percent
transitional bilingual instruction program enrollment as defined in
(e)(i) of this subsection, and the resulting percent shall be
multiplied by the district's kindergarten through twelve annual average
full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school year.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673
(student learning opportunities) which establishes the extended
learning program to provide additional instructional services for
eligible students in grades eight, eleven, and twelve during the
regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at other times in order
to meet the needs of these students. This funding is in addition to
the estimated $986,000 of associated compensation increases associated
with this legislation in section 504 of this act.

Sec. 1412 2009 c 4 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,369,000
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,910,000))
$74,910,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $860,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $450.00 per FTE student for the 2007-
08 school year and $458.10 per FTE student for the 2008-09 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly schedule defined in RCW
28A.505.220.

Sec. 1413 2008 c 329 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION. (1) Appropriations
made in this act to the office of superintendent of public instruction
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent
allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between
sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2008)) 2009,
unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the
director of financial management, the superintendent of public
instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal
year ((2008)) 2009 among the following programs to meet the
apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these
programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments;
pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional
education programs; transitional bilingual programs; and learning
assistance programs.
(3) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(End of part)

PART XV
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 1501 2009 c 4 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,727,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,000))
$350,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,181,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,513,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,371,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($788,818,000))
$788,868,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,744,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 625 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 625 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009. Of these, 165 FTEs in 2008 and 165 FTEs in 2009 are expected to
be graduate student FTEs.
(2) $6,975,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science undergraduate enrollments
by 250 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs expanded shall
include mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in math
and science programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, authorized by chapter 70.220 RCW.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at the
University of Washington by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students
in this program.
(6) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish the state
climatologist position.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center to identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support,
a process to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2007.
Work will continue after the submission of the initial report, to
include continuing research and the development of financial and policy
options and a progress report on fact finding efforts and stakeholder
positions due December 1, 2008.
(8) $3,830,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at
the University of Washington. Consistent with the medical and dental
school extension program appropriations at Washington State University
and Eastern Washington University, funding is provided to expand
classes at the University of Washington. Medical and dental students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane and the second year of courses at the University of
Washington in Seattle.
(9) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the University
of Washington are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 8,850;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 1,380;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 3,610;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 74.7 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 76.0 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 93.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92 percent
at the Seattle campus and 92.5 percent at the Bothell and Tacoma
campuses, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
subsection.
The University of Washington shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(10) $750,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to increase participation in international learning
opportunities, particularly for students with lower incomes who would
otherwise not have the chance to study, work, or volunteer outside the
United States.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(12) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for coastal marine research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(13) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for increased education, training,
and support services for the families of children with autism, and for
the production and distribution of digital video discs in both English
and Spanish about strategies for working with people with autism.
(14) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support for the
department of global health.
(15) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(16) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the rural technology initiative
(initiative) at the University of Washington and the transportation
research group (group) at the Washington State University to conduct an
economic analysis of the costs to safely provide log hauling services.
The initiative will be the lead investigator and administer the
project. Neither the University of Washington nor the Washington State
University may make a deduction for administrative costs. The project
shall rely upon the Washington state patrol for determination of basic
safe characteristics, consistent with applicable state and federal law.
The analysis shall include:
(a) An estimate of log haulers' cost to operate and maintain a
basic and safe log truck without operator including:
(i) Variable costs such as fuel, etc;
(ii) Quasi-variable costs such as:
(A) Tires, brakes, wrappers, and other safety related equipment;
(B) Vehicle insurance, taxes, fees, etc;
(C) Maintenance costs such as oil, lubrication, and minor repairs;
and
(D) Depreciation and replacement costs;
(b) The source of these cost estimates where possible should be
independent vendors of equipment and services or already existing
studies;
(c) A calculation of costs for safe operation expressed as per
mile, hour or load volume including consideration for regional
differences as well as off-road vs. on-road;
(d) An evaluation of comparable trucking services; and
(e) A review of log truck safety statistics in Washington state.
In conducting the analysis, the initiative shall consult with the
northwest log truckers cooperative, the Washington trucking
association, the Washington contract loggers association, the
Washington farm forestry association, and the Washington forest
protection association. By June 30, 2008, the initiative shall provide
a report of its findings to the legislature and governor and distribute
the findings to interested industry groups.
(17) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Burke museum to support
science and social science educational programs including public
outreach programs, new educational programs and resources, web-based
interactive learning experiences, teacher training, and traveling
educational opportunities.
(18) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences.
(19) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
to gather data and conduct research associated with preparing the
basin-wide assessment and to solicit nominations for review and
submittal to the Washington academy of sciences for the creation of the
Puget Sound science panel pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
(20)(a) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the University of Washington
school of law loan repayment assistance program endowment fund. The
University of Washington shall conduct fund-raising activities to
increase private sector support of the endowment program and $250,000
of the appropriation in this subsection is contingent on a private
sector match. Funds in the law school repayment assistance program
endowment fund shall be used to provide graduates who pursue careers in
public interest legal positions with payment assistance toward their
student loan debt.
(b) The University of Washington law school shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2010, information about the loan repayment
assistance program. The report shall contain at least the following
information:
(i) A financial summary of the endowment program;
(ii) The number of individuals receiving assistance from the
program and information related to the positions in which these
individuals are working;
(iii) Any available information regarding the effect of the loan
repayment assistance program on student recruitment and enrollment; and
(iv) Other information the school of law deems relevant to the
evaluation of the program.
(c) In its rules for administering the program, the school of law
must make provision for cases of hardship or exceptional circumstances,
as defined by the school of law. Examples of such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, family leave, medical leave, illness
or disability, and loss of employment.
(d) The loan repayment assistance program must be available to
otherwise eligible graduates of the law school who work in positions
with nonprofit organizations or government agencies. Such positions
must be located within Washington state. Government agencies shall
include the various branches of the military.
(21) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
geriatric education center to develop a voluntary adult family home
certification program. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Individuals completing the
requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and the voluntary adult family home
certification program shall be issued a certified adult family home
license by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this subsection.
(22) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center for implementation of section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3123 (nurse staffing). If section 5 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(23) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to establish an e-Science institute that
will provide infrastructure and consulting expertise to university
researchers in advanced computational techniques needed to capture,
store, organize, access, mine, visualize, and interpret massive data
sets.
(24) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for incentive grants to support medical
research or medical training projects focused upon improvement of
services to persons with developmental disabilities. The university
shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2008, on incentive grants awarded, and other efforts to improve
training for medical students in treating persons with developmental
disabilities.
(25) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, the
University of Washington shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 1502 2009 c 4 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,272,000))
$45,275,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,219,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($113,512,000))
$113,515,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,474,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase general enrollments by 70 FTE students in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 211 FTE enrollments in fiscal
year 2009. At least 30 of the additional fiscal year 2009 enrollments
are expected to be graduate students.
(2) $1,816,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is to increase math and science
enrollments by 105 FTE students in fiscal year 2008 and by an
additional 89 FTE students in fiscal year 2009. The university shall
provide data to the office of financial management regarding math and
science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science enrollment programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $1,801,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase high-demand undergraduate enrollments by
85 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 70 FTE
students in fiscal year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but
are not limited to, bilingual education and information technology.
The university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Central
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Central
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,050;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 49;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 196;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 51.1 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.3 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 78.2 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 86.6
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Central Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1497
(Central Washington University operating fee waivers). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, this appropriation shall lapse.
(7) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(8) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, Central
Washington University shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 1503 2009 c 4 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,008,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,533,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,333,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,874,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain and update a
scholarship clearinghouse that lists every public and private
scholarship available to Washington students)) Within the funds
appropriated in this section, the board shall maintain and update a
scholarship clearing house that lists every public and private
scholarship available to Washington students. The higher education
coordinating board shall develop a web-based interface for students and
families as well as a common application for these scholarships.
(2) (($339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of)) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) (($200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of)) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (the passport to college promise). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) (($152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for administration of)) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement
conditional scholarships.
(5) ((Except for moneys provided in this section for specific
purposes, and to the extent that the executive director finds that the
agency will not require the full amount appropriated for a fiscal year
in this section, the unexpended appropriation shall be transferred to
the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140 for
purposes of fulfilling unfunded scholarship commitments that the board
made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(6))) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to implement a capital facility and technology capacity study
which will compare the 10-year enrollment projections with the capital
facility requirements and technology application and hardware capacity
needed to deliver higher education programs for the period 2009-2019.
The higher education coordinating board shall:
(a) Develop the study in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges, four-year universities, and the
Washington independent colleges;
(b) Determine the 10-year capital facilities and technology
application and hardware investment needed by location to deliver
higher education programs to additional student FTE;
(c) Estimate operational and capital costs of the additional
capacity; and
(d) Report findings to the legislature on October 1, 2008.
(((7) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the board to)) (6) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall prepare a program
and operating plan for a higher education center in the Kitsap county
area. The plan shall be developed in consultation with an advisory
committee of civic, business, and educational leaders from Clallam,
Jefferson, Kitsap, and Mason counties. It shall include a projection
of lower and upper division and graduate enrollment trends in the study
area; a review of assessments of employer needs; an inventory of
existing and needed postsecondary programs; recommended strategies for
promoting active program participation in and extensive program
offerings at the center by public and private baccalaureate
institutions; and an estimate of operating and capital costs for the
creation and operation of the center. The board shall submit its
findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature by
December 1, 2008.
(((8) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of)) (7) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement Engrossed
House Bill No. 2641 (education performance agreements). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((9))) (8) The higher education coordinating board, the department
of licensing, and the department of health shall jointly review and
report to appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December
1, 2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the extent to
which veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills sets and
education required while in service to certification, licensure, and
degree requirements.
(((10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the higher education coordinating
board to)) (9) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the board
shall convene interested parties from Snohomish, Island, and Skagit
counties to consider the November 2007 site options and recommendations
for a new campus of the University of Washington in Snohomish county.
The three local communities shall develop a consensus recommendation on
a single preferred site and present the recommendation to the higher
education coordinating board. The higher education coordinating board
shall then present the single preferred site recommendation to the
appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees by December 1,
2008.

Sec. 1504 2009 c 4 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,286,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,498,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,113,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,188,000))
$106,588,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,085,000))
$471,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $154,760,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $178,707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $49,902,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $40,050,000 of the education legacy
trust account appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,886,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for student
financial aid payments under the state need grant; the state work study
program including a four percent administrative allowance; the
Washington scholars program; and the Washington award for vocational
excellence. All four programs shall increase grant awards sufficiently
to offset the full cost of the resident undergraduate tuition increases
authorized under this act.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall be expanded to include students with family
incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income,
adjusted for family size. Awards for students with incomes between 66
percent and 70 percent of the state median shall be 50 percent of the
award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the
median.
(3) To the extent that the executive director determines that the
agency will not award the full amount appropriated in subsection (1) of
this section for a fiscal year, unexpended funds shall be transferred
to the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140
for purposes first of fulfilling the unfunded scholarship commitments
that the board made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(4) $7,400,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for investment to fulfill the scholarship
commitments that the state incurs in accordance with Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $2,500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the gaining early awareness
and readiness for undergraduate programs project to at least 25
additional school districts.
(6) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to increase the future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program
by at least 35 students per year. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to support state work study positions for students to intern in
secondary math and science classrooms.
(7) (($2,336,000)) $736,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1131
(passport to college). Funds are provided for student scholarships,
and for incentive payments to the colleges they attend for
individualized student support services which may include, but are not
limited to, college and career advising, counseling, tutoring, costs
incurred for students while school is not in session, personal
expenses, health insurance, and emergency services. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for community scholarship matching grants and its
administration. To be eligible for the matching grant, nonprofit
groups organized under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code must demonstrate they have raised at least $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. Groups may receive no more than one $2,000 matching grant per
year and preference shall be given to groups affiliated with
scholarship America. Up to a total of $46,000 per year of the amount
appropriated in this section may be awarded to a nonprofit community
organization to administer scholarship matching grants, with preference
given to an organization affiliated with scholarship America.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1179 (state need grant). State need grants
provided to students enrolled in just three to five credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, shall not exceed
the amounts appropriated in this subsection. By November 1 of each
year, the board shall report to the office of financial management and
to the operating budget committees of the house of representatives and
senate on the number of eligible but unserved students enrolled in just
three to five quarterly credits, or the semester equivalent, and the
estimated cost of serving them. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $5,000,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1779 (GET ready for math and science). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the health professional scholarship
and loan program. The funds provided in this subsection (a) shall be
prioritized for health care deliver sites demonstrating a commitment to
serving the uninsured; and (b) shall be allocated between loan
repayments and scholarships proportional to current program
allocations.

Sec. 1505 2009 c 4 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,120,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($192,192,000))
$200,692,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($323,680,000))
$332,180,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $47,919,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $56,437,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services.
(a) Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial
amount of state matching dollars required to receive federal child care
and development fund grant dollars.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the number of children receiving early
childhood education and assistance program services by 2,250 slots.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the minimum provider per slot payment to
$6,500 in fiscal year 2008. Any provider receiving slot payments
higher than $6,500 shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor rate increase in
fiscal year 2008. All providers shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor
rate increase in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,825,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to: (a) Develop a quality rating
and improvement system; and (b) pilot the quality rating and
improvement system in multiple locations. Four of the pilot sites are
to be located within the following counties: Spokane, Kitsap, King, and
Yakima. The department shall analyze and evaluate the pilot sites and
report initial findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008. Prior
to statewide implementation of the quality rating and improvement
system, the department of early learning shall present the system to
the legislature and the legislature shall formally approve the
implementation of the system through the omnibus appropriations act or
by statute or concurrent resolution.
(3) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
child care referral services.
(4) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers. This
includes funding for the department to conduct a random sample survey
of parents to determine the types of early learning services and
materials parents are interested in receiving from the state. The
department shall report the findings to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2008.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a child care consultation
pilot program linking child care providers with evidence-based and best
practice resources regarding caring for infants and young children who
present behavior concerns.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($500,000)) $400,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the
child care career and wage ladder program created by chapter 507, Laws
of 2005.
(7) $172,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to purchase licensing
capability from the department of social and health services through
the statewide automated child welfare information system.
(8) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,100,000)) $1,025,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a childcare
grant program for public community colleges and public universities.
A community college or university that employs collectively bargained
staff to operate childcare programs may apply for up to $25,000 per
year from the department per each type of the following programs: Head
start, childcare, early childhood assistance and education. The
funding shall only be provided for salaries for collectively bargained
employees.
(9) Beginning October 1, 2007, the department shall be the lead
agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund
grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care
licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs
associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a
portion of this grant to the department of social and health services
to partially fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of
social and health services on behalf of the department of early
learning.
(10) Prior to the development of an early learning information
system, the department shall submit to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature a completed feasibility study and a
proposal approved by the department of information systems and the
information services board. The department shall ensure that any
proposal for the early learning information system includes the cost
for modifying the system as a result of licensing rule changes and
implementation of the quality rating and improvement system.
(11) The department, in conjunction with the early learning
advisory council, shall report by June 30, 2009, to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the following:
(a) Administration of the state training and registry system,
including annual expenditures, participants, and average hours of
training provided per participant; and
(b) An evaluation of the child care resource and referral network
in providing information to parents and training and technical
assistance to child care providers.
(12) The department shall use child care development fund money to
satisfy the federal audit requirement of the improper payments act
(IPIA) of 2002. In accordance with the IPIA's rules, the money spent
on the audits will not count against the five percent state limit on
administrative expenditures.
(13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department of early learning to
work with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
collaborate with thrive by five Washington, to study and make
recommendations regarding the implementation of a statewide
kindergarten entry assessment. The department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall jointly submit a report with
recommendations for implementing the kindergarten entry assessment to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2008. In the study and development of the
recommendations, the department shall:
(a) Consult with early learning experts, including research and
educator associations, early learning and kindergarten teachers, and
Washington Indian tribes;
(b) Identify a preferred kindergarten entry assessment based on
research and examples of other assessments, and which is sensitive to
cultural and socioeconomic differences influencing the development of
young children;
(c) Recommend a plan for the use of the assessment in a pilot phase
and a voluntary use phase, and recommend a time certain when school
districts must offer the assessment;
(d) Recommend how to report the results of the assessment to
parents, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the department of early learning in a common format, and for a
methodology for conducting the assessments;
(e) Analyze how the assessment could be used to improve instruction
for individual students entering kindergarten and identify whether and
how the assessment results could be used to improve the early learning
and K-12 systems, including the transition between the systems;
(f) Identify the costs of the assessment, including the time
required to administer the assessment; and
(g) Recommend how to ensure that the assessment shall not be used
to screen or otherwise preclude children from entering kindergarten if
they are otherwise eligible.
(14) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for encouraging private match investment
for innovative, existing local early learning coalitions to achieve one
or more of the following:
(a) Increase communities' abilities to implement their business
plans for comprehensive local and regional early learning systems;
(b) Involve parents in their children's education;
(c) Enhance coordination between the early childhood and K-12
system; or
(d) Improve training and support for raising the level of child
care givers' professional skills to ensure that children are healthy
and ready to succeed in school and life.

Sec. 1506 2009 c 4 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,969,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,069,000))
$6,135,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,599,000))
$13,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to defend the state's interpretive
position in the case of Delyria & Koch v. Washington State School for
the Blind.
(2) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one-half of one percent effective
July 1, 2008.

Sec. 1507 2009 c 4 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,858,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,764,000))
$8,792,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,938,000))
$17,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $84,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the operation of the shared
reading video outreach program. The school for the deaf shall provide
this service to the extent it is funded by contracts with school
districts and educational service districts.
(2) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one-half of one percent effective
July 1, 2008.

Sec. 1508 2009 c 4 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,454,000))
$2,434,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,382,000))
$1,518,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,538,000))
$6,654,000

(End of part)

PART XVI
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1601 2008 c 329 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $823,274,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($696,324,000))
$690,224,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,970,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,902,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,589,000))
$2,590,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,536,743,000))
$1,530,644,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2008.

Sec. 1602 2008 c 329 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,535,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,135,000))
$5,136,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,135,000))
$5,136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,805,000))
$32,807,000

Sec. 1603 2008 c 329 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,848,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,728,000))
$27,729,000
School Construction and Skills Centers Building
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($135,967,000))
$136,147,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($190,543,000))
$190,774,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2008.

Sec. 1604 2008 c 329 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,546,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
School Construction and Skills Centers Building
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,640,000))
$3,649,000

Sec. 1605 2008 c 329 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$9,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is for the
purpose of making allocations to the Washington state patrol for any
Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in
response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and
43.43.964.

Sec. 1606 2008 c 329 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$3,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$9,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 705 of this act.

Sec. 1607 2008 c 329 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of financial management, except as
otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) George E. Linkenhoker, claim number SCJ 2008-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,628
(b) Charles A. Gardner, claim number SCJ 2008-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,715
(c) Judd Hurst, claim number SCJ 2008-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000
(d) Thomas J. Nelson, claim number SCJ 2008-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000
(e) William R. Sauters, Jr., claim number
SCJ 2008-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,408
(f) Michael E. Greene, claim number SCJ 2008-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500
(g) Jeffery A. Cobb, claim number SCJ 2008-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,600
(h) Robert R. Park, claim number SCJ 2008-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,385
(i) Donald Willett, claim number SCJ 2008-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600
(j) Antonio Perez, claim number SCJ 2009-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,179
(k) James D. Romans, claim number SCJ 2009-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,481
(l) Michael V. Shong, claim number SCJ 2009-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,118
(m) Gerald A. Tinkess, claim number SCJ 2009-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,865
(n) Linh D. Hguyen, claim number SCJ 2009-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
(o) Rafael R. Robinson, claim number SCJ 2009-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200
(p) Anthony J. Magnesi, claim number SCJ 2009-07 . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,888
(q) Jerry Startzell, claim number 99970000 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,975
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) David Guenther, claim number 99970001 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660
(b) Wilbur Eaton, claim number 99970002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,069
(c) Eaton Brothers, claim number 99970003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809
(d) Travis Eaton, claim number 99970004 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532

Sec. 1608 2007 c 522 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this section are subject to
the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be
made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2007, consistent with chapter
41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,400,000))
$51,122,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,600,000))
$97,322,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,800,000

Sec. 1609 2008 c 329 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,618,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,993,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
((Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,301,000))
$4,661,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the
health care authority administrative account.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the office of financial management shall transfer or direct
the transfer of sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account,
including local funds of state agencies and institutions of higher
education, to the health care authority administrative account in
accordance with LEAP document number C04-2008, dated March 10, 2008.
Agencies and institutions of higher education with local funds will
deposit sufficient money to the health care authority administrative
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1610 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,512,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the capitol building construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1611 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the election account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1612 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CLARKE-MCNARY ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,353,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the Clarke-McNary account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1613 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
COSTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute funds to Franklin county ($87,000), Skagit county ($13,000),
Yakima county ($15,000), Spokane county ($99,000), and King county
($286,000) for extraordinary criminal justice costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1614 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--OIL SPILL PREVENTION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the oil spill prevention account.

(End of part)

PART XVII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1701 2009 c 4 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,654,000))
$7,499,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,557,000))
$46,459,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions. Of this amount,
$903,000 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6297 (prosecuting attorney salaries).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,902,000))
$4,829,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,400,000))
$4,491,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat
conservation program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,245,000))
$2,296,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account
Appropriation for the Confederated
Tribes of the Colville Reservation.
This amount is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia River
water delivery). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, this amount
shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account
Appropriation for the Spokane Tribe
of Indians. This amount is provided
solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
River water delivery). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, this amount
shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,192,000))
$2,352,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation
for distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,753,000))
$65,089,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,127,000))
$62,778,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,636,000))
$24,375,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,397,000))
$55,244,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,148,000))
$69,817,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution;
PROVIDED: That the legislature, in making this
appropriation for distribution under the formula
prescribed in RCW 43.08.290 for the 2007-09
biennium, ratifies and approves the prior
distributions, as certified by the department
of revenue to the state treasurer, made for the
2005-07 biennium from the appropriation in
section 801, chapter 372, Laws of 2006 as amended
by section 1701, chapter 522, Laws of 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,865,000))
$20,985,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation
for distribution to local taxing jurisdictions
to mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution
effect of the sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,980,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($423,077,000))
$395,415,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1702 2009 c 4 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$31,000,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operations Account:
For transfer to the state general fund on June 30,
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Capital Account:
For transfer to the state general fund on
June 30, 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000,000
After the transfers in this section are made from
the state convention and trade center operations
and capital accounts, these accounts will
have sufficient funds for: (1) A ten million
dollar requirement for the retrofit of the museum
of history and industry; (2) the requirements of
RCW 67.40.040(5) and 67.40.040(6); and (3) a
sufficient capital reserve. After the transfer
is made, the capital reserve may be applicable for
payment of debt service or operating shortfalls.
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account, $12,200,000 for fiscal year 2008
and (($12,201,000)) $7,851,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,401,000))
$20,051,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000,000))
$24,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account,
$7,200,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,800,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the job development account, $25,000,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $25,000,000 for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to
the oil spill prevention account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Natural Resources Equipment Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual amount
of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($168,111,000))
$181,585,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the
life sciences discovery fund, in an amount
not to exceed the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment
to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,000,000))
$65,220,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the water
quality account, $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2008
and $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, $3,466,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $3,466,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the tobacco
prevention and control account,
$10,523,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
(($10,168,000)) $9,601,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,691,000))
$20,124,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline
sales and use tax account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
((General Fund: For transfer to the health services
account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000,000))
Health Services Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Reading Achievement Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, an amount not to exceed the
actual balance of the reading achievement account.
This transfer is intended to liquidate the reading
achievement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,691,000
Family Leave Insurance Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, an amount not to exceed
the actual balance of the family leave insurance
account on the effective date of this section. . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,458,000
Streamline Sales Tax Account: For transfer to the
state general fund on June 30, 2009, an amount not
to exceed the actual balance of the streamline sales
tax account. . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,620,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,204,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,088,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Budget Stabilization Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
Employment Training Finance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009. After the
transfer in this section is made, the employment
training finance account shall have a balance of
$175,000 to continue customized training program
activities . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009, an amount
not to exceed the actual balance of the college
faculty awards trust fund. This transfer is intended
to liquidate the college faculty awards trust
fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
Washington Distinguished Professorship Trust Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2009, an amount not to exceed the actual
balance of the Washington distinguished professorship
trust account. This transfer is intended to
liquidate the Washington distinguished professorship
trust account . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal year
2009, an amount not to exceed the actual balance of
the Washington graduate fellowship trust account. This
transfer is intended to liquidate the Washington
graduate fellowship trust account . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Get Ready for Math and Science Scholarship Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Judicial Information System Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Student Achievement Fund: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,000,000
Student Achievement Fund: For transfer to the
education legacy trust account . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,000,000

Sec. 1703 2007 c 522 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal
grazing fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,950,000))
$3,145,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,000))
$69,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,500,000))
$85,201,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,524,000))
$88,415,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1704 2007 c 522 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,174,000))
$3,050,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1705 2007 c 522 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,449,000))
$2,033,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

(End of part)

PART XVIII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1801 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED. Nothing in this act
or chapter 5 (ESSB 5460), Laws of 2009 prohibits the expenditure of any
funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed
by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date
of chapter 5, Laws of 2009 (February 18, 2009).

Sec. 1802 RCW 2.68.020 and 2005 c 282 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information
system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of
providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and
providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary.
The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the
purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and
other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and
administration of information services, telecommunications, systems,
software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal
and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 1803 RCW 28B.50.837 and 2003 c 129 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington community and technical college exceptional
faculty awards program is established. The program shall be
administered by the college board. The college faculty awards trust
fund hereby created shall be administered by the state treasurer.
(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the community and
technical college exceptional faculty awards program shall be deposited
in the college faculty awards trust fund. At the request of the
college board, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to
the local endowment fund of the college or its foundation. No
appropriation is necessary for the expenditure of moneys from the fund.
Expenditures from the fund may be used solely for the exceptional
faculty awards program. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the college faculty awards trust fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the account.

Sec. 1804 RCW 28B.67.030 and 2006 c 112 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 shall
be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state
board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures
from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures.
The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances
under the Washington customized employment training program created in
RCW 28B.67.020. The deposit of payments under this section from a
participant shall cease when the board specifies that the participant
has met the monetary obligations of the program. During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the employment
training finance account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW
28B.67.020(4) shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 1805 RCW 28B.76.565 and 2004 c 275 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the distinguished
professorship program shall be deposited in the distinguished
professorship trust fund. At the request of the higher education
coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.575, the treasurer shall release
the state matching funds to the designated institution's local
endowment fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the
fund. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the distinguished professorship trust fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
account.

Sec. 1806 RCW 28B.76.610 and 2004 c 275 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the graduate fellowship
program shall be deposited in the graduate fellowship trust fund. At
the request of the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.76.620, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the
designated institution's local endowment fund. No appropriation is
required for expenditures from the fund. During the 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the graduate fellowship
trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance in the account.

Sec. 1807 RCW 28B.105.110 and 2008 c 329 s 908 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all money received for
the GET ready for math and science scholarship program from
appropriations and private sources. The account shall be
self-sustaining.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students and for purchases of GET units. Purchased GET units
shall be owned and held in trust by the board. Expenditures from the
account shall be an equal match of state appropriations and private
funds raised by the program administrator. During the 2007-09 fiscal
biennium, expenditures from the account not to exceed five percent may
be used by the program administrator to carry out the provisions of RCW
28B.105.090.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.
(7) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer state appropriations to the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account that have not been matched by private contributions
to the state general fund.

Sec. 1808 RCW 41.45.230 and 2008 c 329 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
The pension funding stabilization account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for payment of state
government employer contributions for members of the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees'
retirement system. During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, expenditures
from the account may also be used for payment of the retirement and
annuity plans for higher education employees and for transfer into the
general fund. The account may not be used to pay for any new benefit
or for any benefit increase that takes effect after July 1, 2005. An
increase that is provided in accordance with a formula that is in
existence on July 1, 2005, is not considered a benefit increase for
this purpose. Moneys in the account shall be for the exclusive use of
the specified retirement systems and invested by the state investment
board pursuant to RCW 43.33A.030 and 43.33A.170. For purposes of RCW
43.135.035, expenditures from the pension funding stabilization account
shall not be considered a state program cost shift from the state
general fund to another account. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the pension funding stabilization
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account.

Sec. 1809 RCW 43.30.305 and 2005 c 518 s 928 are each amended to
read as follows:
A revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer, to be known
as the natural resources equipment fund, is hereby created to be
expended by the department without appropriation solely for the
purchase of equipment, machinery, and supplies for the use of the
department and for the payment of the costs of repair and maintenance
of such equipment, machinery, and supplies. During the ((2005-2007))
2007-2009 fiscal biennium the legislature may transfer such amounts as
represent the excess balance of the fund to the state general fund.

Sec. 1810 RCW 71.24.310 and 2006 c 333 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and
this chapter can be most efficiently and effectively implemented as
part of the regional support network defined in RCW 71.24.025. For
this reason, the legislature intends that the department and the
regional support networks shall work together to implement chapter
71.05 RCW as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2006, regional support networks shall recommend to
the department the number of state hospital beds that should be
allocated for use by each regional support network. The statewide
total allocation shall not exceed the number of state hospital beds
offering long-term inpatient care, as defined in this chapter, for
which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act.
(2) If there is consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of state hospital beds that should be allocated
for use by each regional support network, the department shall contract
with each regional support network accordingly.
(3) If there is not consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of beds that should be allocated for use by each
regional support network, the department shall establish by emergency
rule the number of state hospital beds that are available for use by
each regional support network. The emergency rule shall be effective
September 1, 2006. The primary factor used in the allocation shall be
the estimated number of ((acutely and chronically mentally ill)) adults
with acute and chronic mental illness in each regional support network
area, based upon population-adjusted incidence and utilization.
(4) The allocation formula shall be updated at least every three
years to reflect demographic changes, and new evidence regarding the
incidence of acute and chronic mental illness and the need for long-term inpatient care. In the updates, the statewide total allocation
shall include (a) all state hospital beds offering long-term inpatient
care for which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act;
plus (b) the estimated equivalent number of beds or comparable
diversion services contracted in accordance with subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) The department is encouraged to enter performance-based
contracts with regional support networks to provide some or all of the
regional support network's allocated long-term inpatient treatment
capacity in the community, rather than in the state hospital. The
performance contracts shall specify the number of patient days of care
available for use by the regional support network in the state
hospital.
(6) If a regional support network uses more state hospital patient
days of care than it has been allocated under subsection (3) or (4) of
this section, or than it has contracted to use under subsection (5) of
this section, whichever is less, it shall reimburse the department for
that care. The reimbursement rate per day shall be the hospital's
total annual budget for long-term inpatient care, divided by the total
patient days of care assumed in development of that budget.
(7) One-half of any reimbursements received pursuant to subsection
(6) of this section shall be used to support the cost of operating the
state hospital and, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, implementing
new services that will enable a regional support network to reduce its
utilization of the state hospital. The department shall distribute the
remaining half of such reimbursements among regional support networks
that have used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of
care at that hospital, proportional to the number of patient days of
care not used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1811 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1812 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATIVE REDUCTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 8, 266
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18, 274
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 35, 285
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 85, 346
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
CENTRAL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 472
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 378
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
COMPENSATION
INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 8, 265
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 86, 346
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 96, 366, 367
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 187, 480
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 378
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 390
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34, 283
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 92, 355
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 87, 349
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 399
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 491
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 32, 281
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 100, 374
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 41, 290
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 64, 317
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 73, 327
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 42, 292
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58, 309
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 69, 322
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 48, 298
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 73, 329
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 52, 302
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 83, 342
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 82, 341
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 82, 341
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 91, 354
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 101, 374
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
FIRST-TIME HOME BUYERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 40, 288
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 477
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMIN . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2, 265
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 85, 345
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
FY 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 36, 285
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 37, 286
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
NATURAL RESOURCES ORGANIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 281
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 27, 276
CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 199, 492
CLARKE-MCNARY ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 493
COMMUNITY PRESERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 201
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 493
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 489
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 489
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 491
HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 492
O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
OIL SPILL PREVENTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 493
SMALL AGENCY TECHNOLOGY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
TRANSITIONAL HOUSING OPERATING AND RENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
VETERANS INNOVATIONS PROGRAM ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 201
WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 406
PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 15, 272
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 171, 173
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 40, 288
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 84, 342
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 387
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 408
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 190, 484
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 190, 485
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 193, 194, 487, 488
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 203, 500
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 204, 500
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 203, 501
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 494
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 204, 496
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 490
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 123, 164, 411, 464
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152, 443
FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
FOR MISC PURPOSES UNDER SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT AND NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 423
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 440
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 460
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 440
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 442
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 433
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 431
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 435
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 462
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 442
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 465
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT, SEPARATION, AND DOWNSHIFTING INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 485
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
--- END ---