BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.123 and 1993 c 398 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) After the termination date of a collective bargaining
agreement, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective
bargaining agreement shall remain in effect until the effective date of
a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the termination
date stated in the agreement, except under (b) of this subsection.
Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.
(b) When an unfair labor practice complaint is pending before the
public employment relations commission one year after the termination
date in the agreement, the agreement remains in effect until the
commission issues a ruling.
(2) This section does not apply to provisions of a collective
bargaining agreement which both parties agree to exclude from the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section and to provisions within
the collective bargaining agreement with separate and specific
termination dates.
(3) This section shall not apply to the following:
(a) Bargaining units covered by RCW 41.56.430 et seq. for
factfinding and interest arbitration;
(b) Collective bargaining agreements authorized by chapter 53.18
RCW; or
(c) Collective bargaining agreements authorized by chapter 54.04
RCW.
(4) This section shall not apply to collective bargaining
agreements in effect or being bargained on July 23, 1989.

--- END ---