BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The history, economy, culture, and the
future of Washington state to a large degree all involve agriculture.
In order to develop and promote Washington's agricultural products as
part of the existing comprehensive scheme to regulate agricultural
commodities, the legislature declares:
(1) That the marketing of wheat and barley produced in Washington
is in the public interest. It is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that
wheat and barley produced in Washington are properly promoted by:
(a) Enabling wheat producers and barley producers to help
themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and
unhampered marketing, grading, and standardizing of the grains they
produce; and
(b) Working towards stabilizing the agricultural industries by
increasing consumption of wheat and barley within the state, the
nation, and internationally;
(2) That the wheat and barley industries operate within a
regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of
society and the citizens of the state and that includes restrictions on
marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the agricultural
producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;
(3) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for
the wheat and barley industries be clearly expressed, that adequate
protection be given to the industries and their activities and
operations, and that wheat and barley be promoted individually and as
part of a comprehensive agricultural industry to:
(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's wheat
and barley;
(b) Increase the sale and use of Washington state's wheat and
barley in local, domestic, and foreign markets;
(c) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the
quality, care, and methods used in the production of Washington state's
wheat and barley;
(d) Increase the knowledge of the health-giving qualities and
dietetic value of Washington state's wheat and barley and wheat and
barley products;
(e) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the
planting, production, harvesting, handling, processing, marketing, and
uses of wheat and barley produced in Washington state;
(4) That the commission is established primarily for the benefit of
the people of the state of Washington and its economy. By enacting
this chapter, the legislature hereby charges the commission, with
oversight by the director, to speak on behalf of the Washington state
government with regard to wheat and barley production in Washington and
issues related to the wheat and barley industry in Washington; and
(5) That this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police
powers of this state for the purposes of protecting the health, peace,
safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The wheat and barley industries are highly
regulated industries, and this chapter and the rules adopted under it
are only one aspect of the regulation of those industries. Other
regulations and restraints applicable to the wheat and barley
industries include:
(1) Chapter 15.04 RCW, Washington agriculture general provisions;
(2) Chapter 15.08 RCW, horticultural pests and diseases;
(3) Chapter 15.14 RCW, planting stock;
(4) Chapter 15.49 RCW, seeds;
(5) Chapter 15.54 RCW, fertilizers, minerals, and limes;
(6) Chapter 15.58 RCW, Washington pesticide control act;
(7) Chapter 15.64 RCW, farm marketing;
(8) Chapter 15.83 RCW, agricultural marketing and fair practices;
(9) Chapter 15.86 RCW, organic food products;
(10) Chapter 15.92 RCW, center for sustaining agriculture and
natural resources;
(11) Chapter 17.24 RCW, insect pests and plant diseases;
(12) Chapter 19.94 RCW, weights and measures;
(13) Chapter 20.01 RCW, agricultural products--commission
merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, agents;
(14) Chapter 22.09 RCW, agricultural commodities;
(15) Chapter 43.23 RCW, department of agriculture;
(16) Chapter 69.04 RCW, food, drugs, cosmetics, and poisons
including provisions of Title 21 U.S.C. relating to the general
manufacturing practices, food labeling, food standards, food additives,
and pesticide tolerances;
(17) Chapter 70.94 RCW, Washington clean air act, agricultural
burning;
(18) 7 U.S.C., Sec. 136, federal insecticide, fungicide, and
rodenticide act; and
(19) 7 U.S.C., Sec. 1621, agricultural marketing act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affected area" means the following counties located in the
state of Washington: Adams, Asotin, Benton, Chelan, Columbia, Douglas,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Kittitas, Klickitat, Lincoln,
Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, Walla Walla, Whitman, and
Yakima.
(2) "Affected producer" means any producer who is subject to this
chapter.
(3) "Assessment" means the monetary amount established by the
commission in accordance with this chapter.
(4) "Commercial channels" means the sale of wheat or barley for use
as food, feed, seed, or any industrial or chemurgic use, when sold to
any commercial buyer, dealer, processor, cooperative, or to any person,
public or private, who resells any wheat or barley or product produced
from wheat or barley.
(5) "Commercial quantities" means five hundred or more bushels of
wheat or twenty tons of barley produced for market in any calendar year
by any producer.
(6) "Commission" means the Washington grain commission.
(7) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(8) "Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or any qualified person or persons designated by the
director of agriculture to act concerning some matter under this
chapter.
(9) "Grain" or "grains" means wheat and barley and includes all
kinds and varieties of wheat and barley grown in the state of
Washington.
(10) "Handler" means any person who acts, either as principal,
agent, or otherwise, in the processing, selling, marketing, or
distributing of wheat or barley that is not produced by the handler.
"Handler" does not include a common carrier used to transport an
agricultural commodity. "To handle" means to act as a handler.
(11) "Hosting" may include providing meals, refreshments, lodging,
transportation, gifts of a nominal value, reasonable and customary
entertainment, and normal incidental expenses at meetings or
gatherings.
(12) "Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule
making, referenda, or elections, means regular mail or electronic
distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making.
"Electronic distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by
electronic mail or facsimile mail.
(13) "Marketing year" means the twelve-month period beginning June
1st of any year and ending on May 31st of the subsequent year. "Fiscal
year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st of any year and
ending on June 30th of the subsequent year.
(14) "Percent by numbers" means the percent of those persons on the
list of affected parties or affected producers.
(15) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, limited
liability company, trust, association, partnership, society, or any
other organization of individuals, or any unit or agency of local or
state government.
(16) "Producer" means any person who is engaged in the business of
producing or causing to be produced for market, in commercial
quantities, wheat or barley grown in the designated affected area of
the state of Washington, and who has been so engaged in at least one of
the past three years. "Producer" includes a person who contracts to
produce or grow wheat or barley on behalf of a person who retains title
to the seed and its resulting agricultural product or the agricultural
product delivered for further production or increase. "To produce"
means to act as a producer.
(17) "Promotional hosting" means the hosting of individuals and
groups of individuals at meetings, meals, and gatherings for the
purpose of cultivating trade relations and promoting sales of wheat or
barley or processed wheat or barley products.
(18) "Referendum" means a vote by the affected parties or affected
producers which is conducted by secret ballot.
(19) "Rule-making proceedings" means rule making under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(20) "Vacancy" means that a commission member leaves or is removed
from a position on the commission prior to the end of a term, or a
nomination process for the beginning of a term concludes with no
candidates for a position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) There is hereby created the Washington
grain commission. The commission is composed of five wheat producer
members, two barley producer members, two members representing the
wheat industry, one member representing the barley industry, and the
director or his or her appointee. All members, including the director
or his or her appointee, are full voting members of the commission.
(2)(a) Each wheat producer member of the commission must be a
resident of Washington state, over the age of eighteen years at the
time of appointment, and a producer of wheat in the district in and for
which he or she is nominated and appointed. A wheat producer member
must continue to satisfy these qualifications during his or her term of
office.
(b) For the nomination and appointment of wheat producer members,
the affected area is divided into districts as follows:
(i) District I: Ferry, Lincoln, Pend Oreille, Spokane, and Stevens
counties;
(ii) District II: Whitman county;
(iii) District III: Asotin, Columbia, Garfield, and Walla Walla
counties;
(iv) District IV: Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, and Okanogan
counties; and
(v) District V: Benton, Franklin, Kittitas, Klickitat, and Yakima
counties.
(c) The wheat producers in each district are entitled to elect one
wheat producer member of the commission.
(3)(a) Each barley producer member of the commission must be a
resident of Washington state, over the age of eighteen years at the
time of appointment, and a producer of barley in the district in and
for which he or she is nominated and appointed. A barley producer
member must continue to satisfy these qualifications during his or her
term of office.
(b) For the nomination and appointment of barley producer members,
the affected area is divided into districts as follows:
(i) District VI: Asotin, Benton, Columbia, Franklin, Garfield,
Klickitat, Walla Walla, Whitman, and Yakima counties; and
(ii) District VII: Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas,
Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, and Stevens counties.
(c) The barley producers in each district are entitled to elect one
barley producer member of the commission.
(4) An industry member of the commission need not be a resident of
Washington state, but must be involved with the handling, marketing,
transportation, processing of, or research regarding wheat or barley
produced in Washington state. An industry representative member must
continue to satisfy these qualifications during his or her term of
office.
(5)(a) The regular term of office of each producer member of the
commission is three years from January 1st following his or her first
appointment by the director and continues until a successor is
appointed. The term of office for producer positions representing
districts I, IV, and VII is from January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2014,
and for three-year terms thereafter. The term of office for producer
positions representing districts II, III, V, and VI is from January 1,
2012, to December 31, 2015, and for three-year terms thereafter.
(b) The regular term of office of each industry representative
member of the commission is three years from January 1st following his
or her appointment by the director and until a successor is appointed.
The term of office for the barley industry representative position is
from January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2014, and for three-year terms
thereafter. The term of office for the wheat industry representative
(position 1) is from January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2014, and for
three-year terms thereafter. The term of office for the wheat industry
representative (position 2) is from January 1, 2012, to December 31,
2015, and for three-year terms thereafter.
(c) The director, or his or her appointee, is a permanent member of
the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The Washington grain commission replaces
the Washington wheat commission and the Washington barley commission.
To accomplish this transition, the initial appointments to the
Washington grain commission are as follows:
(a) Within thirty days of the effective date of this section, the
Washington wheat commission shall forward to the director the names of
the currently appointed wheat producer members who shall be appointed
to the interim terms specified in subsection (2) of this section.
Thereafter, wheat producer members are nominated and appointed under
sections 6 and 8 of this act.
(b) Within thirty days of the effective date of this section, the
Washington barley commission shall forward to the director the names of
two currently appointed producer members, one who resides in and is a
barley producer in district VI and one who resides in and is a barley
producer in district VII who shall be appointed to the interim terms
specified in subsection (2) of this section. Thereafter, barley
producer members are nominated and appointed under sections 6 and 8 of
this act.
(c) Within thirty days of the effective date of this section, the
Washington wheat commission shall forward to the director the names of
the currently appointed wheat industry representative members who shall
be appointed to the interim terms specified in subsection (3) of this
section. Thereafter the director shall appoint wheat industry
representative members under sections 7 and 8 of this act.
(d) Within thirty days of the effective date of this section, the
Washington barley commission shall forward to the director the name of
one of the currently appointed barley industry representative members
who shall be appointed to the interim term specified in subsection (3)
of this section. Thereafter the director shall appoint the barley
industry representative member under sections 7 and 8 of this act.
(2) Interim terms for producer members expire as follows:
(a) Districts I, IV, and VII: December 31, 2010; and
(b) Districts II, III, V, and VI: December 31, 2011.
(3) Interim terms for industry representative members expire as
follows:
(a) Barley industry representative: December 31, 2010;
(b) Wheat industry representative (position 1): December 31, 2010;
and
(c) Wheat industry representative (position 2): December 31, 2011.
(4) The initial appointments under this section must be made within
sixty days of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall appoint the producer
members of the commission.
(2) Candidates for producer positions on the commission must be
nominated to the director in accordance with this section.
(3)(a) The director shall mail nominating petitions for producer
members not earlier than September 17th and not later than October 2nd
in each district in which an open producer position will occur at the
end of the year. Each nominating petition must be signed by the
candidate and by at least five affected producers of the district from
which the nominated candidate would be appointed.
(b) Signed nominating petitions must be filed with the director.
A nominating petition is filed when it is postmarked by the deadline.
(c) The director shall determine the final date for filing
nominating petitions and shall display that final date on the face of
each nominating petition mailed under this subsection. The final date
may not be earlier than October 8th and not later than October 13th in
each district in which an open producer position will occur at the end
of the year.
(4)(a) The director shall prepare an advisory ballot for each
district in which an open producer position will occur. All candidates
from a district who have been nominated as a producer member in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section shall have their names
placed on the advisory ballot for that district.
(b) The director shall mail advisory ballots to all affected
producers in each district in which an open producer position will
occur. Advisory ballots must be mailed not earlier than October 18th
and not later than November 2nd in each district in which an open
producer position will occur at the end of the year.
(c) Only those completed advisory ballots may be counted that are
sent to the director and postmarked not later than November 25th in
each district in which an open producer position will occur at the end
of the year. Each advisory ballot must display the following language
on its face: "Each completed advisory ballot must be postmarked not
later than November 25, [insert year] to be counted."
(d) Each affected producer is entitled to one vote.
(e) The advisory vote must be conducted in a manner so that it is
a secret ballot.
(5)(a) If two or more candidates for a position are named in valid
petitions, an advisory vote must be held. If only one candidate for a
position is named in valid petitions, an advisory vote need not be
held, and the director may appoint that candidate or request an
additional candidate from the commission for appointment consideration.
If a candidate for a position is not named in any valid petition, the
commission shall submit a candidate for the director's appointment
consideration. Not more than one commission member may be part of the
same person under this chapter.
(b) The director may request of any candidate whose name is
forwarded to the director for potential appointment that the candidate
submit a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to the
commission.
(c) If two or more candidates receive votes in an advisory vote,
the director may select either of the two candidates receiving the most
votes for the position or may reject both candidates and request a new
advisory vote with nominees selected by the commission and, if desired,
by the director. If no candidate has been nominated in a petition
under subsection (3) of this section, the director shall make an
appointment to the position as provided in section 8 of this act.
(6) Except for good cause shown, appointments under this section
must be made no later than fifteen days before the commencement of the
term of office of the position for which the appointment is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The director shall appoint the industry
representative members of the commission.
(2) Not later than November 1st preceding the expiration of an
industry representative member's term of office, the commission shall,
by majority vote of a quorum of the commission, select a qualified
candidate for the industry representative position and forward the name
of the candidate to the director.
(3) The director may select the candidate for the position or may
reject the candidate and request that the commission forward the name
of an additional candidate for appointment consideration by the
director.
(4) Except for good cause shown, appointments under this section
must be made no later than fifteen days before the commencement of the
term of office of the position for which the appointment is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In the event of a vacancy on the commission,
the remaining members shall recommend to the director the name of a
person qualified for appointment to the vacant position. The director
may appoint that person for the position or may reject the candidate
and request that the commission forward the name of an additional
candidate for appointment consideration by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If a commission member fails or refuses to
perform his or her duties due to excessive absence or abandonment of
his or her position or engages in any acts of dishonesty or willful
misconduct, a majority of a quorum of the commission may recommend in
writing to the director that the commission member be removed from his
or her position on the commission. Upon receiving this recommendation,
the director shall review the matter, including any statement from the
commission member who is the subject of the recommendation, and
determine whether adequate cause for removal is present. If the
director finds that adequate cause for removal exists, the director
shall remove the member from his or her commission position. The
position is then vacant and must be filled as set forth in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Any member of the commission also may
be a member or officer of an association which has similar objectives
for which the agricultural commission was formed.
(2) An agricultural commission also may contract with such an
association for services necessary to carry out any purposes authorized
under this chapter, provided that an appropriate contract has been
entered into, and provided that any members with potential conflicts of
interest comply with applicable provisions in chapter 42.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The commission shall hold regular
meetings, at least quarterly, with the time, date, and place to be
determined prior to the new calendar year and published in the state
register as required in RCW 42.30.075.
(2) The commission may call special meetings as provided for in RCW
42.30.080.
(3) The commission shall hold an annual meeting. The proposed
budget must be presented for discussion at the meeting. Notice of the
annual meeting must be given by the commission at least ten days prior
to the meeting through the regular news media.
(4) Any action taken by the commission requires the majority vote
of the members present, provided a quorum is present.
(5) All commission meetings are open and public and must be
conducted in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) A majority of the voting members
constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and for
carrying out the duties of the commission.
(2) A member of the commission shall not receive any salary or
other compensation from the commission, except that each member of the
commission is compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 for each day
spent in actual attendance at or traveling to and from meetings of the
commission or on special assignments for the commission, together with
subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Employees of the commission also may be reimbursed
subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060 when on official commission business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The Washington grain commission is the
successor in interest to the Washington wheat commission and the
Washington barley commission and is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and other such powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers,
or written material in the possession of the Washington wheat
commission or Washington barley commission must be delivered to the
custody of the Washington grain commission. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property owned or
employed by the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley
commission must be delivered to the Washington grain commission. The
Washington grain commission shall ensure the timely transfers of all
legal titles, registrations, and licenses made necessary by this
subsection. All funds, accounts, investments, credits, or other assets
held by the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley commission
must be transferred or assigned to the Washington grain commission.
All debts, liabilities, and obligations owed by the Washington wheat
commission or Washington barley commission must be transferred or
assigned to the Washington grain commission.
(3) All employees of the Washington wheat commission or Washington
barley commission are transferred to the Washington grain commission.
(4) Beginning with the final initial appointment made under section
5 of this act, the interim commissioners shall submit timely reports to
the director summarizing the progress made in completing the actions
required under this section and any other actions necessary to complete
the transition provided for in this chapter.
(5) When the interim commissioners have completed the actions
required under this section and any other actions necessary to complete
the transition provided for in this chapter, they shall so certify in
writing to the director. The Washington wheat commission and
Washington barley commission cease to exist as of the date that
certification is received by the director. Once the director has
received the certification, the director is authorized and shall take
action to repeal the marketing orders addressing wheat or barley.
(6) All actions required under this section must be completed by
the interim commissioners no later than one hundred twenty days after
the final initial appointment is made under section 5 of this act.
(7) RCW 15.66.157 and 15.66.160 do not apply to the Washington
wheat commission and the Washington barley commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The commission is an agency of the
Washington state government subject to oversight by the director. In
exercising its powers and duties, the commission shall carry out the
following purposes:
(a) To establish plans and conduct programs for advertising and
sales promotion, to maintain present markets, or to create new or
larger markets for wheat and barley grown in Washington;
(b) To engage in cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign
marketing of wheat and barley grown in Washington;
(c) To provide for carrying on research studies to find more
efficient methods of production, irrigation, processing,
transportation, handling, and marketing of wheat and barley grown in
Washington;
(d) To adopt rules to provide for improving standards and grades by
defining, establishing, and providing labeling requirements with
respect to wheat and barely grown in Washington;
(e) To investigate and take necessary action to prevent unfair
trade practices relating to wheat and barley grown in Washington;
(f) To provide information or communicate on matters pertaining to
the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, or
uses of wheat and barley grown in Washington to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency;
(g) To provide marketing information and services for producers of
wheat and barley in Washington;
(h) To provide information and services for meeting resource
conservation objectives of producers of wheat and barley in Washington;
(i) To provide for education and training related to wheat and
barley grown in Washington; and
(j) To assist and cooperate with the department or any local,
state, or federal government agency in the investigation and control of
exotic pests and diseases that could damage or affect the production or
trade of wheat and barley grown in Washington.
(2) The commission has the following powers and duties:
(a) To collect the assessments of producers as provided in this
chapter and to expend the same in accordance with this chapter;
(b) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected
producers that may be compiled from information used to collect
assessments authorized under this chapter and data on the value of each
producer's production for a minimum three-year period;
(c) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who
handle wheat or barley within the affected area and data on the amount
and value of the wheat and barley handled for a minimum three-year
period by each person;
(d) To request records and audit the records of producers or
handlers of wheat or barley during normal business hours to determine
whether the appropriate assessment has been paid;
(e) To fund, conduct, or otherwise participate in scientific
research relating to wheat or barley, including but not limited to
research to find more efficient methods of irrigation, production,
processing, handling, transportation, and marketing of wheat or barley,
or regarding pests, pesticides, food safety, irrigation,
transportation, and environmental stewardship related to wheat or
barley;
(f) To work cooperatively with local, state, and federal agencies,
universities, and national organizations for the purposes provided in
this chapter;
(g) To establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money
when the foundation benefits the wheat or barley industry in Washington
and implements the purposes provided in this chapter;
(h) To acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or
patents and to collect royalties resulting from commission-funded
research related to wheat or barley;
(i) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any
private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry
out the purposes and powers provided in this chapter, including
specifically contracts or agreements for research described in (e) of
this subsection. Personal service contracts must comply with chapter
39.29 RCW;
(j) To institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal
actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction or civil
recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other
governmental authorities;
(k) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal
counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The
retention of a private attorney is subject to review and approval by
the office of the attorney general;
(l) To elect a chair and other officers as determined advisable;
(m) To employ and discharge at its discretion administrators and
additional personnel, advertising and research agencies, and other
persons and firms as appropriate and pay compensation;
(n) To acquire personal property and purchase or lease office space
and other necessary real property and transfer and convey that real
property;
(o) To keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements
by commodity, which records must be open to inspection and audit by the
state auditor or private auditor designated by the state auditor at
least every five years;
(p) To borrow money and incur indebtedness;
(q) To make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;
(r) To expend funds for commodity-related education, training, and
leadership programs as the commission deems expedient;
(s) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests,
contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public
agencies to carry out the purposes provided in this chapter;
(t) To apply for and administer federal market access programs or
similar programs or projects and provide matching funds as may be
necessary;
(u) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the
purpose of supporting activities of the commission authorized in this
chapter;
(v) To participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution,
sale, or use of wheat or barley; or the regulation of the manufacture,
distribution, sale, or use of any pesticide, as defined in chapter
15.58 RCW, or any agricultural chemical which is of use or potential
use in producing wheat or barley. This participation may include
activities authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of
those activities to the public disclosure commission;
(w) To speak on behalf of the Washington state government on a
nonexclusive basis regarding issues related to wheat and barley,
including but not limited to trade negotiations and market access
negotiations and to fund industry organizations engaging in those
activities;
(x) To adopt, rescind, and amend rules and regulations reasonably
necessary for the administration and operation of the commission and
the enforcement of its duties under this chapter;
(y) To administer, enforce, direct, and control the provisions of
this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter; and
(z) Other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The commission shall develop and submit
to the director for approval any plans, programs, and projects
concerning the following:
(a) The establishment, issuance, effectuation, and administration
of appropriate programs or projects for the advertising and promotion
of wheat and barley; and
(b) The establishment and effectuation of market research projects,
market development projects, or both, to the end that the marketing and
utilization of wheat and barley may be encouraged, expanded, improved,
or made more efficient.
(2) The director shall review the commission's advertising or
promotion program to ensure that no false claims are being made
concerning any agricultural commodity.
(3) The commission, prior to the beginning of its fiscal year,
shall prepare and submit to the director for approval its research
plan, its commodity-related education and training plan, and its budget
on a fiscal period basis.
(4) The director shall review and make a determination of all
submissions described in this section in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, all rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter
must be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt
from compliance with RCW 34.05.310 and 43.135.055 and chapter 19.85
RCW, the regulatory fairness act, when the proposed rule is subject to
a referendum.
(3) Rules, regulations, and orders made by the commission must be
filed with the director and become effective as provided in RCW
34.05.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) The commission may receive donations of
liquor produced from wheat or barley grown in Washington and may use
the liquor for the promotional purposes specified in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The commission may engage directly or indirectly in the
promotion of liquor produced from wheat or barley grown in Washington
including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful manner and
the dissemination without charge of the liquor. This dissemination is
not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission is not deemed a
producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk, servant, or agent of
a producer, supplier, distributor, or manufacturer under Title 66 RCW.
This dissemination without charge may be solely for agricultural
development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising purposes under
section 14(2)(u) of this act. Dissemination for promotional purposes
may include promotional hosting and must in the good faith judgment of
the commission be in the aid of the marketing, advertising, or
promotion of wheat or barley grown in Washington, or research related
to that marketing, advertising, or promotion.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting
expenditures by its employees, agents, or commission members under RCW
15.04.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington grain commission created under section 4 of this act
may purchase or receive donations of liquor produced from wheat or
barley grown in Washington and may use the liquor for the promotional
purposes specified in section 17(2) of this act. Liquor furnished to
the commission under this section which is used within the state is
subject to the taxes imposed under RCW 66.24.210. A license, permit,
or bond is not required of the Washington grain commission under this
title for the promotional purposes specified in section 17(2) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) The restrictive provisions of chapter
43.78 RCW do not apply to promotional printing and literature for the
commission.
(2) All promotional printing contracts entered into by the
commission must be executed and performed under conditions of
employment that substantially conform to the laws of this state
respecting hours of labor, the minimum wage scale, and the rules and
regulations of the department of labor and industries regarding
conditions of employment, hours of labor, and minimum wages, and the
violation of such a provision of any contract is grounds for
cancellation of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) All money received by the commission
from the assessment levied under this chapter and all moneys
transferred to the commission under section 13(2) of this act must be
deposited in the banks designated by the commission and disbursed by
order of the commission. RCW 43.01.050 does not apply to money
collected under this chapter.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules or establish policies as it
determines necessary to ensure proper accounting and disbursement of
moneys received and held by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Unless covered by a blanket bond covering
officials or employees of the state of Washington, every administrator,
employee, or other person occupying a position of trust for the
commission and every commission member actually handling or drawing
upon funds shall give a bond in the penal amount as may be required by
the commission, the premium for which bond or bonds must be paid by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) Obligations incurred by the commission
and any other liabilities or claims against the commission are
enforceable only against the assets of the commission and, except to
the extent of those assets, liability for the debts or actions of the
commission does not exist against either the state of Washington or any
subdivision or instrumentality thereof or against any member, employee,
or agent of the commission or the state of Washington in his or her
individual capacity.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, neither the
commission members, nor its employees, may be held individually
responsible for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of
commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee,
except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. A person
or employee may not be held individually responsible for any act or
omission of any other commission members. The liability of the
commission members is several and not joint, and a member is not liable
for the default of any other member. This subsection confirms that
commission members have been and continue to be state officers or
volunteers for purposes of RCW 4.92.075 and are entitled to the
defenses, indemnifications, limitations of liability, and other
protections and benefits of chapter 4.92 RCW.
(3) In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of
any statute, including a rule adopted under that statute, or common law
against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, including any
action under chapter 19.86 RCW, proof that the act complained of was
done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and in
furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this chapter, is a
complete defense to such an action or proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Copies of the proceedings, records, and
acts of the commission, when certified by the chair, are admissible in
any court as prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements
contained therein.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 (1) Under RCW 42.56.380, certain
agricultural business records, commission records, and department of
agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.
(2) Financial and commercial information and records submitted to
either the department or the commission for the purpose of
administering this chapter may be shared between the department and the
commission. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or
administrative hearing involving this chapter.
(3) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of
persons subject to this chapter as long as the statements do not
identify the information furnished by any person; or
(b) The publication by the director or the commission of the name
of any person violating this chapter and a statement of the manner of
the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) The commission shall reimburse the
department for all costs incurred by the department for actions
necessary to carry out this chapter, including the adoption of rules,
facilitating or conducting nominations or advisory votes, and the
review and approval required under section 15 of this act.
(2) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff
support for all commodity boards or commissions in accordance with RCW
43.23.033 if a position is not directly funded by the legislature and
costs are related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an
individual commodity board or commission. The commission shall provide
funds to the department according to the rules adopted by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 (1) The commission shall prepare a list of
all producers of wheat and a list of all producers of barley, which
must include for each producer his or her name and address and the
amount, by unit, of wheat or barley produced during the past three
years.
(2) The commission shall prepare a list of all persons who handle
wheat and all persons who handle barley, which must include for each
handler his or her name and address and the amount, by unit, of wheat
or barley handled during the past three years.
(3) It is the responsibility of each producer or handler to ensure
that his or her correct address is filed with the commodity commission
and to submit production data and handling data to the commission as
prescribed in this chapter.
(4) Any qualified person may, at any time, have his or her name
placed upon any list for which he or she qualifies by delivering or
mailing the information to the commission. The lists must be corrected
and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and information
provided to the commission.
(5) For all purposes of giving notice, conducting advisory votes,
and holding referenda, the applicable list corrected up to the day
preceding the date the list is certified by the commission is the list
of all affected producers entitled to notice or to vote. Inadvertent
failure to notify an affected producer does not invalidate a proceeding
conducted under this chapter.
(6) At the director's request when conducting a referendum for the
commission, the commission shall provide the director a certified list
of affected producers from the commission records. The list must
include all information required by the director to conduct a
referendum under this chapter, must be used to determine assent as
provided in this chapter, and must be kept in the rule-making file by
the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1)(a) The initial annual assessments are
the amounts most recently approved by referendum by wheat producers and
barley producers and effective at the time the grain commission is
established:
(i) The initial annual assessment on wheat is three-fourths of one
percent of the net receipts at the first point of sale;
(ii) The initial annual assessment on barley is one percent of the
net receipts at the first point of sale.
(b) The initial annual assessments established in this subsection
are effective unless and until changed pursuant to the procedure in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) If the commission determines, based on information available
to it, that the revenue from the assessment levied on wheat or barley
under this chapter is too high or is inadequate to accomplish the
purposes of this chapter, then with the oversight of the director the
commission shall adopt a resolution setting forth the needs of the
industry, the extent and probable cost of the commission activities
identified as necessary to address the needs of the industry together
with a brief statement justifying each activity, the proposed new
assessment rate, and the expected revenue from the proposed assessment
levied. The resolution must be submitted to the director for review
and approval.
(b) If the director objects to the proposed new assessment rate,
the director shall explain the reasons for the objection to the
commission in writing. The commission may adopt a revised resolution
and submit it to the director for review and approval.
(c) Upon receiving the director's approval and with the director's
oversight, the commission may conduct a referendum to determine whether
affected producers assent to the proposed new assessment rate, or may
refer the matter to the director to conduct the referendum on behalf of
the commission. Only wheat producers may vote on a proposed new
assessment rate on wheat, and only barley producers may vote on a
proposed new assessment rate on barley.
(i) The producers have assented to the new rate if more than fifty
percent by number and more than fifty percent by volume of those
replying assent. The determination by volume is made on the basis of
volume as determined in the list of affected producers created under
section 26 of this act.
(ii) Results of the referendum must be communicated via the news
media.
(iii) If the requisite assent is given, the commission shall adopt
the new rate at its next meeting. The new rate must be adopted by rule
in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, except as provided in section 16
of this act.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (2) of this
section, the commission may, by majority vote of a quorum of its
members, adopt a finding that its current revenue substantially exceeds
that needed to support the current needs of the industry and the
current cost of commission activities and order a temporary reduction
in the annual assessments below the rate currently authorized under
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) With the director's approval, such a reduction commences on
July 1st following the commission's action and expires automatically on
June 30th of the subsequent year unless extended by a new action of the
commission under this subsection.
(c) Any action taken under this subsection must be communicated to
affected producers via the news media and any other means it deems
effective.
(4) The annual assessment authorized in this chapter may not exceed
three percent of the total market value of all affected units sold,
processed, stored, or delivered for sale, processing, or storage by all
affected producers of wheat or barley during the year to which the
assessment applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) The collection of the assessment made
and levied by the commission must be paid by the producer upon all
commercial quantities of wheat and all commercial quantities of barley
sold, processed, stored, or delivered for sale, processing, or storage
by the producer. However, an assessment may not be levied or collected
on wheat or barley grown and used by the producer for feed, seed, or
personal consumption.
(2) Handlers including warehousemen, processors, and feedlots
receiving wheat or barley in commercial quantities from producers shall
collect the assessment made and levied by the commission from each
producer whose production they handle and remit the assessment to the
commission on a monthly basis. Affected units of wheat or barley must
not be transported, carried, shipped, sold, stored, or otherwise
handled or disposed of until every due and payable assessment under
this chapter has been paid and the receipt issued, but liability under
this chapter does not attach to common carriers in the regular course
of their business.
(3) Any due and payable assessment levied under this chapter
constitutes a personal debt of every person so assessed or who
otherwise owes the assessment, and the assessment is due and payable to
the commission on a monthly basis. In the event any person fails to
pay the full amount of such an assessment, the commission may add to
the unpaid assessment an amount not exceeding ten percent of the unpaid
assessment to defray the cost of enforcing the collecting of the unpaid
assessment. In the event of failure of the person or persons to pay
any due and payable assessment, the commission may bring a civil action
against the person or persons in a state court of competent
jurisdiction for the collection thereof, together with the additional
ten percent, and the action must be tried and judgment rendered as in
any other cause of action for debt due and payable. Venue for an
action against a person owing a due and payable assessment to the
commission is in Spokane county or a county in which the person
produces or handles wheat or barley.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 (1) All moneys collected or otherwise
received by the commission under this chapter must be used solely by
and for the commission and may not be used for any other commission or
the department, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. These
moneys must be deposited in accounts in the name of the commission in
any bank which is a state depository. All expenses and disbursements
incurred and made under this chapter must be paid from moneys collected
and received under this chapter without the necessity of a specific
legislative appropriation, and all moneys deposited for the account of
any order must be paid from the account by check or voucher in the
form and in the manner and upon the signature of the person as may be
prescribed by the commission. RCW 43.01.050 is not applicable to such
an account or any moneys so received, collected, or expended.
(2) The commission shall ensure that the expenditure of assessments
collected from wheat producers and moneys transferred from the wheat
commission under section 13(2) of this act are used for purposes
related to the wheat industry and that the expenditure of assessments
collected from barley producers and moneys transferred from the barley
commission under section 13(2) of this act are used for purposes
related to the barley industry. However, this section does not prevent
assessments from wheat, assessments from barley, and moneys transferred
from the wheat commission or barley commission under section 13(2) of
this act to be combined or used together for activities, projects, and
other endeavors that benefit both the wheat and barley industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 (1) Any funds of the commission may be
invested in savings or time deposits in banks, trust companies, and
mutual savings banks that are doing business in the United States, up
to the amount of insurance afforded those accounts by the federal
deposit insurance corporation.
(2) This section applies to all funds which may be lawfully so
invested, which in the judgment of the commission are not required for
immediate expenditure. The authority granted by this section is not
exclusive and is cumulative and in addition to other authority provided
by law for the investment of the funds including, but not limited to,
authority granted under chapters 39.58, 39.59, and 43.84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 (1) To prove eligibility to vote or hold a
position on the commission, each producer must show records of sales of
commercial quantities of wheat or barley sold within the past three
years if requested by the commission.
(2) Each handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all
wheat and barley handled.
(3) Handlers' records must be in the form and contain the
information as the commission may by rule prescribe, must be preserved
for a period of three years, and are subject to inspection at any time
upon demand of the commission or its agents.
(4) The commission through its agents may enter and inspect the
premises and records of any handler of wheat or barley for the purpose
of enforcing this chapter. The commission has the authority to issue
subpoenas for the production of books, records, documents, and other
writings of any kind from any handler and from any person having,
either directly or indirectly, actual or legal control of or over the
premises, books, records, documents, or other writings, for the purpose
of enforcing this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.
(5) All information furnished to or acquired by the commission or
by an agent of the commission under this section must be kept
confidential by all officers, employees, and agents of the commission,
except as may be necessary in a suit or other legal proceeding brought
by, on behalf of, or against the commission or its employees or agents
involving the enforcement of this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter.
(6) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of a
number of persons subject to this chapter, which statements do not
identify the information furnished by any person; or
(b) The publication by the commission or the director of the name
of any person violating this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter, together with a statement of the particular provisions and the
manner of the violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 (1) It is a misdemeanor for any person
willfully to:
(a) Violate or aid in the violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter;
(b) Submit a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record
required by the director or the commission under this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter; or
(c) Fail or refuse to submit a report, statement, or record
required by the director or the commission under this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter.
(2) In the event of a violation or threatened violation of this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the director or the
commission is entitled to an injunction in a court of competent
jurisdiction to prevent further violation and to a decree of specific
performance, and to a temporary restraining order and injunction
pending litigation.
(3) In the event of a violation or threatened violation of this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the director, the
commission, or any affected producer on joining the commission may
refer the violation to the prosecutor in any county in which the
defendant or any defendant resides, or in which the violation was
committed, or in which the defendant or any defendant has his or her
principal place of business.
(4) The superior courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction to
enforce this chapter and the rules of the commission issued under this
chapter, and to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter.

Sec. 33 RCW 15.04.200 and 2006 c 330 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Under the authority of Article VIII of the state Constitution
as amended, agricultural commodity commission expenditures for
agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting by
an agricultural commodities commission under chapters 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.88, 15.89, 15.-- (the new chapter created in
section 40 of this act), and 16.67 RCW shall be pursuant to specific
budget items as approved by the agricultural commodity commission at
the annual public hearings on the agricultural commodity commission
budget.
(2) Agricultural commodity commissions shall adopt rules governing
promotional hosting expenditures by agricultural commodity commission
employees, agents or commissioners. The rules shall identify officials
and agents authorized to make expenditures and the objectives of the
expenditures. Individual agricultural commodity commission
commissioners shall make promotional hosting expenditures, or seek
reimbursements for these expenditures, only in those instances where
the expenditures have been approved by the agricultural commodity
commission. All payments and reimbursements shall be identified and
supported on vouchers.
(3) Agricultural commodity commissions shall be exempt from the
requirements of RCW 43.01.090 and 43.19.500 and chapter 43.82 RCW.

Sec. 34 RCW 15.65.620 and 1961 c 256 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall apply to nor alter nor change any
provision of the statutes of the state of Washington relating to the
apple ((advertising)) commission (RCW 15.24.010-15.24.210 inclusive),
to the soft tree fruits commission (RCW 15.28.010-15.28.310 inclusive),
((or)) to dairy products commission (RCW 15.44.010-15.44.180
inclusive), or to ((wheat)) the grain commission (((RCW 15.63.010-15.63.920 inclusive))) (chapter 15.-- (the new chapter created in
section 40 of this act)). No marketing agreement or order containing
any of the provisions specified in RCW 15.65.310 or 15.65.320 shall be
issued with respect to the respective commodities affected by said
statutes unless and until any commission established by any such
statute shall cease to perform the provisions of its respective
statute. The provisions of this chapter shall have no application to
any marketing agreement or order issued pursuant to the Washington
agricultural enabling act of 1955 (chapter 15.66 RCW); except that any
such marketing agreement or order issued pursuant to said 1955 act may
be brought under this chapter upon compliance with the provisions of
this chapter relating to amendments of marketing agreements and orders,
whereupon:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to and the
provisions of said 1955 act shall cease to apply to such marketing
agreement or order; and
(2) All assets and liabilities of, or pertaining to such agreement
or order, and of any commission or agency established by it, shall
continue to exist with respect to such agreement, order, commission or
agency after being so brought under this chapter.

Sec. 35 RCW 15.66.270 and 2007 c 234 s 100 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any provision of the statutes of the
state of Washington relating to the Washington apple commission
(chapter 15.24 RCW), to the soft tree fruits commission (chapter 15.28
RCW), ((or)) to the dairy products commission (chapter 15.44 RCW),or to
the Washington grain commission (chapter 15.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 40 of this act)). Marketing agreements or orders
shall not be issued with respect to apples, soft tree fruits, ((or))
dairy products, or wheat or barley for the purposes specified in RCW
15.66.030 (1) or (2).

Sec. 36 RCW 41.06.070 and 2002 c 354 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the
state printing plant;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington state apple
((advertising)) commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(s) Officers and employees of the Washington grain commission;
(t) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(((t))) (u) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions
formed under chapter 15.65 RCW;
(((u))) (v) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation
formed under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(((v))) (w) Executive assistants for personnel administration and
labor relations in all state agencies employing such executive
assistants including but not limited to all departments, offices,
commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the
provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any
provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is
made in such law;
(((w))) (x) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy
agency heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more
than three principal policy assistants who report directly to the
agency head or deputy agency heads;
(((x))) (y) All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(((y))) (z) Staff employed by the department of community, trade,
and economic development to administer energy policy functions and
manage energy site evaluation council activities under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(m);
(((z))) (aa) Staff employed by Washington State University to
administer energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((u))) (v) and (((x))) (y) and (2) of this section, shall be
determined by the director of personnel. Changes to the classification
plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for
classified salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec. 37 RCW 42.56.380 and 2007 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to agriculture and livestock is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Business-related information under RCW 15.86.110;
(2) Information provided under RCW 15.54.362;
(3) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.-- (the new chapter created in section 40 of
this act), 15.100, 15.89, and 16.67 RCW or required by the department
of agriculture to administer these chapters or the department's
programs;
(4) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture;
(5) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; or (b) to the department of agriculture or
commodity boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.-- (the new chapter created in
section 40 of this act), 15.100, 15.89, or 16.67 RCW with respect to
domestic or export marketing activities or individual producer's
production information;
(6) Except under RCW 15.19.080, information obtained regarding the
purchases, sales, or production of an individual American ginseng
grower or dealer;
(7) Information that can be identified to a particular business and
that is collected under RCW 15.17.140(2) and 15.17.143 for certificates
of compliance;
(8) Financial statements provided under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d);
(9) Information submitted by an individual or business for the
purpose of participating in a state or national animal identification
system. Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not
public disclosure. This exemption does not affect the disclosure of
information used in reportable animal health investigations under
chapter 16.36 RCW once they are complete; and
(10) Results of testing for animal diseases not required to be
reported under chapter 16.36 RCW that is done at the request of the
animal owner or his or her designee that can be identified to a
particular business or individual.

Sec. 38 RCW 43.23.033 and 2006 c 330 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff
support for all commodity boards and commissions if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature.
(2) Staff support funded under this section ((and)), RCW
15.65.047(1)(c), 15.66.055(3), 15.24.215, 15.26.265, 15.28.320,
15.44.190, 15.88.180, 15.89.150, and 16.67.190, and chapter 15.-- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 40 of this act) shall be limited to
one-half full-time equivalent employee for all commodity boards and
commissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Sections 1 through 17, 19 through 32, and
39 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---