BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4282 and 1994 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) ((initiation fees, (2) dues, (3)))
contributions, (((4))) (2) donations, (((5))) (3) tuition fees, (((6)))
(4) charges made by a nonprofit trade or professional organization for
attending or occupying space at a trade show, convention, or
educational seminar sponsored by the nonprofit trade or professional
organization, which trade show, convention, or educational seminar is
not open to the general public, (((7))) (5) charges made for operation
of privately operated kindergartens, and (((8))) (6) endowment funds.
This section shall not be construed to exempt any person, association,
or society from tax liability upon selling tangible personal property
or upon providing facilities or services for which a special charge is
made to members or others. If dues are in exchange for any significant
amount of goods or services rendered by the recipient thereof to
members without any additional charge to the member, or if the dues are
graduated upon the amount of goods or services rendered, the value of
such goods or services shall not be considered as a deduction under
this section.

--- END ---