BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.140 and 2002 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall end:
(a) For a person convicted of a class A felony or an offense listed
in subsection (5) of this section, or a person convicted of any sex
offense or kidnapping offense who has one or more prior convictions for
a sex offense or kidnapping offense: Such person may only be relieved
of the duty to register under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(b) For a person convicted of a class B felony, and the person does
not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping
offense and the person's current offense is not listed in subsection
(5) of this section: Fifteen years after the last date of release from
confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if
the person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community without
being convicted of any new offenses.
(c) For a person convicted of a class C felony, a violation of RCW
9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
commit a class C felony, and the person does not have one or more prior
convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and the person's
current offense is not listed in subsection (5) of this section: Ten
years after the last date of release from confinement, if any,
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction,
or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent ten
consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
offenses.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply
equally to a person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense or kidnapping offense.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person
having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the superior
court to be relieved of that duty, if the person has spent ten
consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
offenses. The petition shall be made to the court in which the
petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the
duty to register, or, in the case of convictions in other states, a
foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in
Thurston county. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named
and served as the respondent in any such petition. The court shall
consider the nature of the registrable offense committed, and the
criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both
before and after conviction, and may consider other factors. Except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, the court may relieve the
petitioner of the duty to register only if the petitioner shows, with
clear and convincing evidence, that future registration of the
petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.
(b)(i) The court may not relieve a person of the duty to register
if the person has been determined to be a sexually violent predator as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, or has been convicted of a sex offense or
kidnapping offense that is a class A felony and that was committed with
forcible compulsion on or after June 8, 2000.
(ii) The court may not relieve a person of the duty to register if
the person has been convicted of one aggravated offense or more than
one sexually violent offense, as defined in subsection (5) of this
section, and the offense or offenses were committed on or after March
12, 2002.
(c) Any person subject to (b) of this subsection or subsection (5)
of this section may petition the court to be exempted from any
community notification requirements that the person may be subject to
fifteen years after the later of the entry of the judgment and sentence
or the last date of release from confinement, including full-time
residential treatment, pursuant to the conviction, if the person has
spent the time in the community without being convicted of any new
offense.
(4)(a) An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130
for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was
a juvenile may petition the superior court to be relieved of that
duty((. The court shall consider the nature of the registrable offense
committed, and the criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the
petitioner both before and after adjudication, and may consider other
factors.
(a))) as follows:
(i) If the offense was committed while the petitioner was fifteen
years of age or older, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty
to register ((for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that was
committed while the petitioner was fifteen years of age or older)) only
if the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that
future registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of
RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330.
(((b))) (ii) If the offense was committed while the petitioner was
under the age of fifteen, the court may relieve the petitioner of the
duty to register ((for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that was
committed while the petitioner was under the age of fifteen)) if the
petitioner (((i))):
(A) Has not been adjudicated of any additional sex offenses or
kidnapping offenses during the twenty-four months following the
adjudication for the offense giving rise to the duty to register((,));
and (((ii)))
(B) Proves by a preponderance of the evidence that future
registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW
9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.
(b) A petitioner under this subsection has a right to retain
counsel and a right to have counsel appointed if found to be indigent
as determined by using the standards found in chapter 10.101 RCW.
(c) In determining whether to relieve the petitioner of the duty to
register, the court shall consider the nature of the offense committed
for which registration is required and the criminal and relevant
noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before and after
adjudication, and may consider other factors.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to juveniles prosecuted as
adults.
(5)(a) A person who has been convicted of an aggravated offense, or
has been convicted of one or more prior sexually violent offenses or
criminal offenses against a victim who is a minor, as defined in (b) of
this subsection may only be relieved of the duty to register under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. This provision shall apply to
convictions for crimes committed on or after July 22, 2001.
(b) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply only to the federal lifetime registration
requirements under this subsection:
(i) "Aggravated offense" means an adult conviction that meets the
definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2241, which is limited to the following:
(A) Any sex offense involving sexual intercourse or sexual contact
where the victim is under twelve years of age;
(B) RCW 9A.44.040 (rape in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.073 (rape
of a child in the first degree), or RCW 9A.44.083 (child molestation in
the first degree);
(C) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible
compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or
without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant,
or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of
that person to appraise or control conduct: RCW 9A.44.050 (rape in the
second degree), RCW 9A.44.100 (indecent liberties), RCW 9A.44.160
(custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), or RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor);
(D) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible
compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or
without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant,
or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of
that person to appraise or control conduct, if the victim is twelve
years of age or over but under sixteen years of age and the offender is
eighteen years of age or over and is more than forty-eight months older
than the victim: RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086
(child molestation in the second degree), or RCW 9A.44.089 (child
molestation in the third degree);
(E) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is under twelve years of age or that is
committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender administering, by
threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of that person,
a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially
impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct;
(F) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(G) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(i)(A) through (F) of
this subsection.
(ii) "Sexually violent offense" means an adult conviction that
meets the definition of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 14071(a)(1)(A), which is limited
to the following:
(A) An aggravated offense;
(B) An offense that is not an aggravated offense but meets the
definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2242, which is limited to RCW 9A.44.050(1)
(b) through (f) (rape in the second degree) and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b)
through (f) (indecent liberties);
(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is incapable of appraising the nature of the
conduct or physically incapable of declining participation in, or
communicating unwillingness to engage in, the conduct;
(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(ii)(A) through (D) of
this subsection.
(iii) "Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor" means, in
addition to any aggravated offense or sexually violent offense where
the victim was under eighteen years of age, an adult conviction for the
following offenses where the victim is under eighteen years of age:
(A) RCW 9A.44.060 (rape in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.076 (rape
of a child in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the
third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child molestation in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.093
(sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.096
(sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.160
(custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), RCW 9.68A.090
(communication with a minor for immoral purposes), or RCW 9.68A.100
(((patronizing a juvenile prostitute))) (commercial sexual abuse of a
minor);
(B) RCW 9A.40.020 (kidnapping in the first degree), RCW 9A.40.030
(kidnapping in the second degree), or RCW 9A.40.040 (unlawful
imprisonment), where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the
minor's parent;
(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is a minor;
(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (D) of
this subsection.
(6) Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this
section, a violation of RCW 9A.44.130 is an ongoing offense for
purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.
(7) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an offender
shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her
duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(8) For purposes of determining whether a person has been convicted
of more than one sex offense, failure to register as a sex offender or
kidnapping offender is not a sex or kidnapping offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.145 and 1998 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state patrol shall notify:
(1) Registered sex and kidnapping offenders of any change to the
registration requirements; and
(2) No less than annually, an offender having a duty to register
under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed
when the offender was a juvenile of their ability to petition for
relief from registration as provided in RCW 9A.44.140.

--- END ---