BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.04.030 and 2005 c 290 s 1 and 2005 c 238 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, the juvenile courts in this
state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings:
(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as
provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;
(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as
provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through
((13.34.170)) 13.34.161;
(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship
as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;
(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in
RCW 13.32A.170;
(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed
offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in
RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:
(i) The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction of a particular
juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;
(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for
the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;
(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish,
boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by
a juvenile sixteen years of age or older and would, if committed by an
adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which
instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have
jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad
litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age:
PROVIDED, That if such an alleged offense or infraction and an alleged
offense or infraction subject to juvenile court jurisdiction arise out
of the same event or incident, the juvenile court may have jurisdiction
of both matters: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the jurisdiction under this
subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a "decline" for purposes
of RCW 13.40.110(1) or (e)(i) of this subsection: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That courts of limited jurisdiction which confine juveniles for an
alleged offense or infraction may place juveniles in juvenile detention
facilities under an agreement with the officials responsible for the
administration of the juvenile detention facility in RCW 13.04.035 and
13.20.060;
(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a
violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter
28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has
assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW
13.04.0301; or
(v) The juvenile is sixteen or seventeen years old on the date the
alleged offense is committed and the alleged offense is:
(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile
has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious
violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III)
three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class
A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the
second degree, all of which must have been committed after the
juvenile's thirteenth birthday and prosecuted separately;
(C) Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997; or
(D) ((Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1,
1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more
prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or
(E))) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on
or after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed
with a firearm.
(I) In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction, except as provided in (e)(v)(((E))) (D)(II) and
(III) of this subsection.
(II) The juvenile court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the
disposition of any remaining charges in any case in which the juvenile
is found not guilty in the adult criminal court of the charge or
charges for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the
adult criminal court of a lesser included offense that is not also an
offense listed in (e)(v) of this subsection. The juvenile court shall
enter an order extending juvenile court jurisdiction if the juvenile
has turned eighteen years of age during the adult criminal court
proceedings pursuant to RCW 13.40.300. However, once the case is
returned to juvenile court, the court may hold a decline hearing
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 to determine whether to retain the case in
juvenile court for the purpose of disposition or return the case to
adult criminal court for sentencing.
(III) The prosecutor and respondent may agree to waive exclusive
adult criminal jurisdiction in (e)(v)(A) through (D) of this subsection
and remove the proceeding back to juvenile court with the court's
approval.
If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the
juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state
may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered
upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of
establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;
(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in
chapter 13.24 RCW;
(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW
13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained
eighteen years of age;
(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian
custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian
and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises
exclusive jurisdiction;
(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed
by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW
74.13.042; and
(j) Relating to judicial determinations and permanency planning
hearings involving developmentally disabled children who have been
placed in out-of-home care pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement
between the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the
department of social and health services.
(2) The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the
superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as
provided in RCW 26.12.010.
(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the family court over child custody proceedings under chapter
26.10 RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.
(4) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under
subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained
pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in
RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.110 and 1997 c 338 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Discretionary decline hearing - The prosecutor, respondent, or
the court on its own motion may, before a hearing on the information on
its merits, file a motion requesting the court to transfer the
respondent for adult criminal prosecution and the matter shall be set
for a hearing on the question of declining jurisdiction provided that
no respondent under the age of fifteen may be transferred for adult
criminal prosecution except those charged with crimes in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. ((Unless waived by the court, the parties, and
their counsel, a decline hearing shall be held when:))
(2) Mandatory decline hearing - Unless waived by the court, the
parties, and their counsel, a decline hearing shall be held when:
(a) The respondent is fifteen((,)) and the information alleges
murder in the first degree, RCW 9A.32.030; murder in the second degree,
RCW 9A.32.050; assault in the first degree, RCW 9A.36.011; or an
attempt to commit these crimes;
(b) The respondent is sixteen((,)) or seventeen years of age and
the information alleges a class A felony or an attempt, solicitation,
or conspiracy to commit a class A felony;
(((b))) (c) The respondent is seventeen years of age and the
information alleges assault in the second degree, extortion in the
first degree, indecent liberties, child molestation in the second
degree, kidnapping in the second degree, or robbery in the second
degree; or
(((c))) (d) The information alleges an escape by the respondent and
the respondent is serving a minimum juvenile sentence to age twenty-one.
(((2))) (3) The court after a decline hearing may order the case
transferred for adult criminal prosecution upon a finding that the
declination would be in the best interest of the juvenile or the
public. The court shall consider the relevant reports, facts,
opinions, and arguments presented by the parties and their counsel.
(((3))) (4) When the respondent is transferred for criminal
prosecution or retained for prosecution in juvenile court, the court
shall set forth in writing its finding which shall be supported by
relevant facts and opinions produced at the hearing.

--- END ---