BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be cited as the uniform
adult guardianship and protective proceedings jurisdiction act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In this chapter:
(1) "Adult" means an individual who has attained eighteen years of
age.
(2) "Guardian of the estate" means a person appointed by the court
to administer the property of an adult, and includes a conservator
appointed by the court in another state.
(3) "Guardian of the person" or "guardian" means a person appointed
by the court to make decisions regarding the person of an adult.
(4) "Guardianship order" means an order appointing a guardian of
the person or guardian of the estate.
(5) "Guardianship proceeding" means a judicial proceeding in which
an order for the appointment of a guardian of the person or guardian of
the estate is sought or has been issued.
(6) "Incapacitated person" means an adult for whom a guardian of
the person or guardian of the estate has been appointed.
(7) "Party" means the respondent, petitioner, guardian of the
person or guardian of the estate, or any other person allowed by the
court to participate in a guardianship or protective proceeding.
(8) "Person," except in the term incapacitated person or protected
person, means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint
venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(9) "Protected person" means an adult for whom a protective order
has been issued.
(10) "Protective order" means an order appointing a guardian of the
estate or other order related to management of an adult's property,
including an order issued by a court in another state appointing a
conservator.
(11) "Protective proceeding" means a judicial proceeding in which
a protective order is sought or has been issued.
(12) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(13) "Respondent" means an adult for whom a protective order or the
appointment of a guardian of the person is sought.
(14) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally
recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject
to the jurisdiction of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A court of this state may treat a foreign
country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A court of this state may communicate
with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under
this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the
communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the court shall make a record of the communication. The
record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.
(2) Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court
records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) In a guardianship or protective
proceeding in this state, a court of this state may request the
appropriate court of another state to do any of the following:
(a) Hold an evidentiary hearing;
(b) Order a person in that state to produce evidence or give
testimony pursuant to procedures of that state;
(c) Order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the
respondent;
(d) Order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a
proceeding;
(e) Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the
transcript or other record of a hearing under (a) of this subsection or
any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under (b) of this
subsection, and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance
with an order under (c) or (d) of this subsection;
(f) Issue any order necessary to assure the appearance in the
proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to
make a determination, including the respondent or the incapacitated or
protected person;
(g) Issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial,
criminal, or other relevant information in that state, including
protected health information as defined in 45 C.F.R. Sec. 164.504.
(2) If a court of another state in which a guardianship or
protective proceeding is pending requests assistance of the kind
provided in subsection (1) of this section, a court of this state has
jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making
reasonable efforts to comply with the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In a guardianship or protective
proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available,
testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered
by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony
taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the
testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the
manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to be taken.
(2) In a guardianship or protective proceeding, a court in this
state may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to
testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. A court
of this state shall cooperate with the court of the other state in
designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.
(3) Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court
of this state by technological means that do not produce an original
writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the
best evidence rule.

ARTICLE 2
JURISDICTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In this chapter:
(a) "Emergency" means a circumstance that likely will result in
substantial harm to a respondent's health, safety, or welfare, and for
which the appointment of a guardian is necessary because no other
person has authority and is willing to act on the respondent's behalf.
(b) "Home state" means the state in which the respondent was
physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at
least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of a
petition for a protective order or the appointment of a guardian; or if
none, the state in which the respondent was physically present,
including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive
months ending within the six months prior to the filing of the
petition.
(c) "Significant-connection state" means a state, other than the
home state, with which a respondent has a significant connection other
than mere physical presence and in which substantial evidence
concerning the respondent is available.
(2) In determining under sections 9 and 16(5) of this act whether
a respondent has a significant connection with a particular state, the
court shall consider:
(a) The location of the respondent's family and other persons
required to be notified of the guardianship or protective proceeding;
(b) The length of time the respondent at any time was physically
present in the state and the duration of any absence;
(c) The location of the respondent's property; and
(d) The extent to which the respondent has ties to the state such
as voting registration, state or local tax return filing, vehicle
registration, driver's license, social relationship, and receipt of
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This chapter provides the exclusive
jurisdictional basis for a court of this state to appoint a guardian or
issue a protective order for an adult under chapters 11.88 and 11.92
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A court of this state has jurisdiction to
appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for a respondent if:
(1) This state is the respondent's home state;
(2) On the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection state and:
(a) The respondent does not have a home state or a court of the
respondent's home state has declined to exercise jurisdiction because
this state is a more appropriate forum; or
(b) The respondent has a home state, a petition for an appointment
or order is not pending in a court of that state or another
significant-connection state, and, before the court makes the
appointment or issues the order:
(i) A petition for an appointment or order is not filed in the
respondent's home state;
(ii) An objection to the court's jurisdiction is not filed by a
person required to be notified of the proceeding; and
(iii) The court in this state concludes that it is an appropriate
forum under the factors set forth in section 12 of this act;
(3) This state does not have jurisdiction under either subsection
(1) or (2) of this section, the respondent's home state and all
significant-connection states have declined to exercise jurisdiction
because this state is the more appropriate forum, and jurisdiction in
this state is consistent with the constitutions of this state and the
United States; or
(4) The requirements for special jurisdiction under section 10 of
this act are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) A court of this state lacking
jurisdiction under section 9 of this act has special jurisdiction to do
any of the following:
(a) In an emergency, process a petition under RCW 11.88.090 for
appointment of a guardian for a respondent who is physically present in
this state, for a term not exceeding ninety days;
(b) Issue a protective order with respect to a respondent's real or
tangible personal property located in this state if a petition for
appointment of a guardian or a conservator for the respondent is
pending or has been approved in another state;
(c) Appoint a guardian of the person or guardian of the estate for
an incapacitated or protected person for whom a provisional order to
transfer the proceeding from another state has been issued under
procedures similar to section 16 of this act.
(2) If a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency
is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent's home
state on the date the petition was filed, the court shall dismiss the
proceeding at the request of the court of the home state, if any,
whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency
appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Except as otherwise provided in section 10
of this act, a court that has appointed a guardian or issued a
protective order consistent with this chapter has exclusive and
continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it is terminated by
the court or the appointment or order expires by its own terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) A court of this state having
jurisdiction under section 9 of this act to appoint a guardian or issue
a protective order may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if it
determines at any time that a court of another state is a more
appropriate forum.
(2) If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction
under subsection (1) of this section, it shall either dismiss or stay
the proceeding. The court may impose any condition the court considers
just and proper, including the condition that a petition for the
appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order be filed
promptly in another state.
(3) In determining whether it is an appropriate forum, the court
shall consider all relevant factors, including:
(a) Any expressed preference of the respondent;
(b) Whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the respondent has
occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best protect the
respondent from the abuse, neglect, or exploitation;
(c) The length of time the respondent was physically present in or
was a legal resident of this or another state;
(d) The distance of the respondent from the court in each state;
(e) The financial circumstances of the respondent's estate;
(f) The nature and location of the evidence;
(g) The ability of the court in each state to decide the issue
expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence;
(h) The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and
issues in the proceeding; and
(i) If an appointment were made, the court's ability to monitor the
conduct of the guardian of the person or guardian of the estate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) If at any time a court of this state
determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue
a protective order because of unjustifiable conduct, the court may:
(a) Decline to exercise jurisdiction;
(b) Exercise jurisdiction for the limited purpose of fashioning an
appropriate remedy to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the
respondent or the protection of the respondent's property or prevent a
repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the
proceeding until a petition for the appointment of a guardian or
issuance of a protective order is filed in a court of another state
having jurisdiction; or
(c) Continue to exercise jurisdiction after considering:
(i) The extent to which the respondent and all persons required to
be notified of the proceedings have acquiesced in the exercise of the
court's jurisdiction;
(ii) Whether it is a more appropriate forum than the court of any
other state under the factors set forth in section 12(3) of this act;
and
(iii) Whether the court of any other state would have jurisdiction
under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the
jurisdictional standards of section 9 of this act.
(2) If a court of this state determines that it acquired
jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order because
a party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction engaged in unjustifiable
conduct, it may assess against that party necessary and reasonable
expenses, including attorneys' fees, investigative fees, court costs,
communication expenses, witness fees and expenses, and travel expenses.
The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses of any kind against
this state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of
this state unless authorized by law other than this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If a petition for the appointment of a
guardian or issuance of a protective order is brought in this state and
this state was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition
was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements of
this state, notice of the petition must be given to those persons who
would be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding were
brought in the respondent's home state. The notice must be given in
the same manner as notice is required to be given in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Except for a petition for the appointment
of a guardian in an emergency or issuance of a protective order limited
to property located in this state under section 10(1) (a) or (b) of
this act, if a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance
of a protective order is filed in this state and in another state and
neither petition has been dismissed or withdrawn, the following rules
apply:
(1) If the court in this state has jurisdiction under section 9 of
this act, it may proceed with the case unless a court in another state
acquires jurisdiction under provisions similar to section 9 of this act
before the appointment or issuance of the order.
(2) If the court in this state does not have jurisdiction under
section 9 of this act, whether at the time the petition is filed or at
any time before the appointment or issuance of the order, the court
shall stay the proceeding and communicate with the court in the other
state. If the court in the other state has jurisdiction, the court in
this state shall dismiss the petition unless the court in the other
state determines that the court in this state is a more appropriate
forum.

ARTICLE 3
TRANSFER OF GUARDIANSHIP
NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) A guardian of the person or guardian of
the estate appointed in this state may petition the court to transfer
the guardianship to another state.
(2) Notice of a petition under subsection (1) of this section must
be given to the persons that would be entitled to notice of a petition
in this state for the appointment of a guardian of the person or
guardian of the estate.
(3) On the court's own motion or on request of the guardian of the
person or guardian of the estate, the incapacitated or protected
person, or other person required to be notified of the petition, the
court shall hold a hearing on a petition filed pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) The court shall issue an order provisionally granting a
petition to transfer a guardianship and shall direct the guardian of
the person or guardian of the estate to petition for guardianship in
the other state if the court is satisfied that the guardianship will be
accepted by the court in the other state and the court finds that:
(a) The incapacitated person is physically present in or is
reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state;
(b) An objection to the transfer has not been made or, if an
objection has been made, the objector has not established that the
transfer would be contrary to the interests of the incapacitated
person; and
(c) Plans for care and services for the incapacitated person in the
other state are reasonable and sufficient.
(5) The court shall issue a provisional order granting a petition
to transfer a guardianship of the estate and shall direct the guardian
of the estate to petition for guardianship of the estate or
conservatorship in the other state if the court is satisfied that the
guardianship of the estate will be accepted by the court of the other
state and the court finds that:
(a) The protected person is physically present in or is reasonably
expected to move permanently to the other state, or the protected
person has a significant connection to the other state considering the
factors in section 7(2) of this act;
(b) An objection to the transfer has not been made or, if an
objection has been made, the objector has not established that the
transfer would be contrary to the interests of the protected person;
and
(c) Adequate arrangements will be made for management of the
protected person's property.
(6) The court shall issue a final order confirming the transfer and
terminating the guardianship of the person or guardianship of the
estate upon its receipt of:
(a) A provisional order accepting the proceeding from the court to
which the proceeding is to be transferred which is issued under
provisions similar to section 17 of this act; and
(b) The documents required to terminate a guardianship of the
person or guardianship of the estate in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) To confirm transfer of a guardianship
or conservatorship transferred to this state under provisions similar
to section 16 of this act, the guardian or conservator must petition
the court in this state to accept the guardianship or conservatorship.
The petition must include a certified copy of the other state's
provisional order of transfer.
(2) Notice of a petition under subsection (1) of this section must
be given to those persons that would be entitled to notice if the
petition were a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance
of a protective order in both the transferring state and this state.
The notice must be given in the same manner as notice is required to be
given in this state.
(3) On the court's own motion or on request of the guardian or
conservator, the incapacitated or protected person, or other person
required to be notified of the proceeding, the court shall hold a
hearing on a petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The court shall issue an order provisionally granting a
petition filed under subsection (1) of this section unless:
(a) An objection is made and the objector establishes that transfer
of the proceeding would be contrary to the interests of the
incapacitated or protected person; or
(b) The guardian or conservator is ineligible for appointment in
this state.
(5) The court shall issue a final order accepting the proceeding
and appointing the guardian or conservator as guardian of the person or
guardian of the estate in this state upon its receipt from the court
from which the proceeding is being transferred of a final order issued
under provisions similar to section 16 of this act transferring the
proceeding to this state.
(6) Not later than ninety days after issuance of a final order
accepting transfer of a guardianship or conservatorship, the court
shall determine whether the guardianship of the person or guardianship
of the estate needs to be modified to conform to the law of this state.
(7) In granting a petition under this section, the court shall
recognize a guardianship or conservatorship order from the other state,
including the determination of the incapacitated or protected person's
incapacity and the appointment of the guardian or conservator.
(8) The denial by a court of this state of a petition to accept a
guardianship or conservatorship transferred from another state does not
affect the ability of the guardian or conservator to seek appointment
as guardian or guardian of the estate in this state if the court has
jurisdiction to make an appointment other than by reason of the
provisional order of transfer.

ARTICLE 4
REGISTRATION AND RECOGNITION OF ORDERS FROM OTHER STATES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If a guardian has been appointed in another
state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending
in this state, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving
notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register
the guardianship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in
a court, in any appropriate county of this state, certified copies of
the order and letters of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If a guardian of the estate or conservator
has been appointed in another state and a petition for a protective
order is not pending in this state, the guardian of the estate or
conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the
appointing court of an intent to register, may register the protective
order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court of this
state, in any county in which property belonging to the protected
person is located, certified copies of the order and letters of office
and of any bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) Upon registration of a guardianship or
protective order from another state, the guardian or conservator may
exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order of
appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state,
including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the
guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any
conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.
(2) A court of this state may grant any relief available under this
act and other law of this state to enforce a registered order.

ARTICLE 5
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 In applying and construing this uniform
act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This act modifies, limits, and supersedes
the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act,
15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede
section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act,
15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) This act applies to guardianship and
protective proceedings filed on or after the effective date of this
act.
(2) Sections 1 through 6 and 16 through 22 apply to proceedings
filed before the effective date of this act, regardless of whether a
guardianship or protective order has been issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Article headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 1 through 25 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.

--- END ---