BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Before the commencement of video monitoring in any public
school:
(a) All certificated and classified staff assigned to the school
shall be informed, in writing, that the school and its occupants may be
subject to video monitoring;
(b) Written notices shall be posted outside of every room stating
that the room and its occupants may be subject to video monitoring; and
(c) Written notices shall be posted at all building entrances
stating that rooms within the building, and their occupants, may be
subject to video monitoring.
(2) As used in this section, "video monitoring" means the
recording of a series of visual images by any device, electronic or
otherwise.
(3) The school district shall preserve the original of any video
monitoring for not less than six years from the date of the monitoring.
(4) This section does not authorize video monitoring in a manner
that is inconsistent with, or violates, chapter 9.73 RCW.
(5) This section does not apply to residential education programs
under chapter 28A.190 RCW or education programs for juvenile inmates
under chapter 28A.193 RCW.
(6) This section does not apply to the recording of a series of
visual images that is directed by school staff, students, or parents,
as part of instructional activities.

--- END ---