BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 24.03.050 and 2004 c 265 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each corporation shall have and continuously maintain in this
state:
(1) A registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as
its principal office. The registered office shall be at a specific
geographic location in this state, and be identified by number, if any,
and street, or building address or rural route, or, if a commonly known
street or rural route address does not exist, by legal description. A
registered office may not be identified by post office box number or
other nongeographic address. For purposes of communicating by mail,
the secretary of state may permit the use of a post office address in
conjunction with the registered office address if the corporation also
maintains on file the specific geographic address of the registered
office where personal service of process may be made.
(2) A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual
resident in this state whose business office is identical with such
registered office, or a domestic corporation, whether for profit or not
for profit, or a governmental body or agency, or a foreign corporation,
whether for profit or not for profit, authorized to transact business
or conduct affairs in this state, having an office identical with such
registered office, or a domestic limited liability company whose
business office is identical with the registered office, or a foreign
limited liability company authorized to conduct affairs in this state
whose business address is identical with the registered office. A
registered agent shall not be appointed without having given prior
consent to the appointment, in the form of a record. The consent shall
be filed with the secretary of state in such form as the secretary may
prescribe. The consent shall be filed with or as a part of the record
first appointing a registered agent. In the event any individual,
corporation, or limited liability company has been appointed agent
without consent, that person, corporation, or limited liability company
may file a notarized statement attesting to that fact, and the name
shall immediately be removed from the records of the secretary of
state.
No Washington corporation or foreign corporation authorized to
conduct affairs in this state may be permitted to maintain any action
in any court in this state until the corporation complies with the
requirements of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 24.06.050 and 1993 c 356 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each domestic corporation and foreign corporation authorized to do
business in this state shall have and continuously maintain in this
state:
(1) A registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as
its principal office. The registered office shall be at a specific
geographic location in this state, and be identified by number, if any,
and street, or building address or rural route, or, if a commonly known
street or rural route address does not exist, by legal description. A
registered office may not be identified by post office box number or
other nongeographic address. For purposes of communicating by mail,
the secretary of state may permit the use of a post office address in
conjunction with the registered office address if the corporation also
maintains on file the specific geographic address of the registered
office where personal service of process may be made.
(2) A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual
resident in this state whose business office is identical with such
registered office, or a domestic corporation existing under any act of
this state, or a governmental body or agency, or a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this state under
any act of this state having an office identical with such registered
office. The resident agent and registered office shall be designated
by duly adopted resolution of the board of directors; and a statement
of such designation, executed by an officer of the corporation, shall
be filed with the secretary of state. A registered agent shall not be
appointed without having given prior written consent to the
appointment. The written consent shall be filed with the secretary of
state in such form as the secretary may prescribe. The written consent
shall be filed with or as a part of the document first appointing a
registered agent. In the event any individual or corporation has been
appointed agent without consent, that person or corporation may file a
notarized statement attesting to that fact, and the name shall
forthwith be removed from the records of the secretary of state.
No Washington corporation or foreign corporation authorized to
transact business in this state may be permitted to maintain any action
in any court in this state until the corporation complies with the
requirements of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 25.05.005 and 1998 c 103 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Business" includes every trade, occupation, and profession.
(2) "Debtor in bankruptcy" means a person who is the subject of:
(a) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or
a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or
(b) A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law
governing insolvency.
(3) "Distribution" means a transfer of money or other property from
a partnership to a partner in the partner's capacity as a partner or to
the partner's transferee.
(4) "Foreign limited liability partnership" means a partnership
that:
(a) Is formed under laws other than the laws of this state; and
(b) Has the status of a limited liability partnership under those
laws.
(5) "Limited liability partnership" means a partnership that has
filed ((a statement of qualification)) an application under RCW
25.05.500 and does not have a similar statement in effect in any other
jurisdiction.
(6) "Partnership" means an association of two or more persons to
carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under RCW 25.05.055,
predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.
(7) "Partnership agreement" means the agreement, whether written,
oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership,
including amendments to the partnership agreement.
(8) "Partnership at will" means a partnership in which the partners
have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite
term or the completion of a particular undertaking.
(9) "Partnership interest" or "partner's interest in the
partnership" means all of a partner's interests in the partnership,
including the partner's transferable interest and all management and
other rights.
(10) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(11) "Property" means all property, real, personal, or mixed,
tangible or intangible, or any interest therein.
(12) "Registered agent" means an individual resident of this state,
a domestic corporation, a government, governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality, or a foreign corporation authorized to do business
in this state.
(13) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(((13))) (14) "Statement" means a statement of partnership
authority under RCW 25.05.110, a statement of denial under RCW
25.05.115, a statement of dissociation under RCW 25.05.265, a statement
of dissolution under RCW 25.05.320, or an amendment or cancellation of
any statement under these sections.
(((14))) (15) "Transfer" includes an assignment, conveyance, lease,
mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

Sec. 4 RCW 25.10.040 and 1987 c 55 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each limited partnership shall continuously maintain in this
state an office which may but need not be a place of its business in
this state, at which shall be kept the records required by RCW
25.10.050 to be maintained. The office shall be at a specific
geographical location in this state and be identified by number, if
any, and street or building address or rural route or other
geographical address. The office shall not be identified only by post
office box number or other nongeographic address. For purposes of
communicating by mail, the secretary of state may permit the use of a
post office address in conjunction with the office address.
(2) Each limited partnership shall continuously maintain in this
state an agent for service of process on the limited partnership, which
agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic
corporation, a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or a foreign corporation authorized to do business in
this state. The agent may, but need not, be located at the office
identified in RCW 25.10.040(1). The agent's address shall be at a
specific geographical location in this state and be identified by
number, if any, and street or building address or rural route or other
geographical address. The agent's address shall not be identified only
by post office box number or other nongeographic address. For purposes
of communicating by mail, the secretary of state may permit the use of
a post office address in conjunction with the agent's geographic
address.
(3) A registered agent shall not be appointed without having given
prior written consent to the appointment. The written consent shall be
filed with the secretary of state in such form as the secretary may
prescribe. The written consent shall be filed with or as a part of the
document first appointing a registered agent. In the event any
individual or corporation has been appointed agent without consent,
that person or corporation may file a notarized statement attesting to
that fact, and the name shall forthwith be removed from the records of
the secretary of state. The registered agent so appointed by a limited
partnership shall be an agent of such limited partnership upon whom any
process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served
upon the limited partnership may be served. If a limited partnership
fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or if
its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found, then
the secretary of state shall be an agent of such limited partnership
upon whom any such process, notice, or demand may be served. Service
on the secretary of state of any such process, notice, or demand shall
be made by delivering to and leaving with the secretary of state, or
with any authorized clerk of the corporation department of the
secretary of state's office, duplicate copies of such process, notice,
or demand. In the event any such process, notice, or demand is served
on the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately
cause one of the copies thereof to be forwarded by certified mail,
addressed to the limited partnership at the office referred to in RCW
25.10.040(1). Any service so had on the secretary of state shall be
returnable in no fewer than thirty days.
The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes,
notices, and demands served upon the secretary of state under this
section, and shall record therein the time of such service and the
secretary of state's action with reference thereto.
Nothing in this section limits or affects the right to serve any
process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served
upon a limited partnership in any other manner now or hereafter
permitted by law.
Any registered agent may resign as such agent upon filing a written
notice thereof, executed in duplicate, with the secretary of state, who
shall forthwith mail one copy thereof to the limited partnership. The
appointment of such agent shall terminate upon the expiration of thirty
days after receipt of such notice by the secretary of state.

Sec. 5 RCW 25.15.020 and 2002 c 74 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each limited liability company shall continuously maintain in
this state:
(a) A registered office, which may but need not be a place of its
business in this state. The registered office shall be at a specific
geographic location in this state, and be identified by number, if any,
and street, or building address or rural route, or, if a commonly known
street or rural route address does not exist, by legal description. A
registered office may not be identified by post office box number or
other nongeographic address. For purposes of communicating by mail,
the secretary of state may permit the use of a post office address in
conjunction with the registered office address if the limited liability
company also maintains on file the specific geographic address of the
registered office where personal service of process may be made;
(b) A registered agent for service of process on the limited
liability company, which agent may be either an individual resident of
this state whose business office is identical with the limited
liability company's registered office, or a domestic corporation,
limited partnership, or limited liability company, or a government,
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or a separate
legal entity comprised of two or more of these entities, or a foreign
corporation, limited partnership, or limited liability company
authorized to do business in this state having a business office
identical with such registered office; and
(c) A registered agent who shall not be appointed without having
given prior written consent to the appointment. The written consent
shall be filed with the secretary of state in such form as the
secretary may prescribe. The written consent shall be filed with or as
a part of the document first appointing a registered agent.
(2) A limited liability company may change its registered office or
registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a
statement of change that sets forth:
(a) The name of the limited liability company;
(b) If the current registered office is to be changed, the street
address of the new registered office in accord with subsection (1) of
this section;
(c) If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of
the new registered agent and the new agent's written consent, either on
the statement or attached to it, to the appointment; and
(d) That after the change or changes are made, the street addresses
of its registered office and the business office of its registered
agent will be identical.
(3) If a registered agent changes the street address of the agent's
business office, the registered agent may change the street address of
the registered office of any limited liability company for which the
agent is the registered agent by notifying the limited liability
company in writing of the change and signing, either manually or in
facsimile, and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a
statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section and recites that the limited liability company has been
notified of the change.
(4) A registered agent may resign as agent by signing and
delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement that the
registered office is also discontinued. After filing the statement the
secretary of state shall mail a copy of the statement to the limited
liability company at its principal office. The agency appointment is
terminated, and the registered office discontinued is so provided, on
the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.34.030 and 2008 c 198 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
(1) Any power or powers, privileges or authority exercised or
capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be exercised
and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state having
the power or powers, privilege or authority, and jointly with any
public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent
that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint
exercise or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting
jointly with any public agency may exercise and enjoy all of the
powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a
public agency.
(2) Any two or more public agencies may enter into agreements with
one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter, except that any such joint or cooperative action by
public agencies which are educational service districts and/or school
districts shall comply with the provisions of RCW 28A.320.080.
Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to
law of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall
be necessary before any such agreement may enter into force.
(3) Any such agreement shall specify the following:
(a) Its duration;
(b) The precise organization, composition and nature of any
separate legal or administrative entity created thereby together with
the powers delegated thereto, provided such entity may be legally
created. Such entity may include a nonprofit corporation organized
pursuant to chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW whose membership is limited
solely to the participating public agencies or a partnership organized
pursuant to chapter 25.04 or 25.05 RCW whose partners are limited
solely to participating public agencies, or a limited liability company
organized under chapter 25.15 RCW whose membership is limited solely to
participating public agencies, and the funds of any such corporation,
partnership, or limited liability company shall be subject to audit in
the manner provided by law for the auditing of public funds;
(c) Its purpose or purposes;
(d) The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking
and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;
(e) The permissible method or methods to be employed in
accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and
for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;
and
(f) Any other necessary and proper matters.
(4) In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate
legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the
agreement shall contain, in addition to provisions specified in
subsection (3)(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section, the
following:
(a) Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for
administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a
joint board, public agencies that are party to the agreement shall be
represented; and
(b) The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and
personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking. Any
joint board is authorized to establish a special fund with a state,
county, city, or district treasurer servicing an involved public agency
designated "Operating fund of . . . . . . joint board".
(5) No agreement made pursuant to this chapter relieves any public
agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law
except that:
(a) To the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a
joint board or other legal or administrative entity created by an
agreement made pursuant to this chapter, the performance may be offered
in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility; and
(b) With respect to one or more public agencies purchasing or
otherwise contracting through a bid, proposal, or contract awarded by
another public agency or by a group of public agencies, any statutory
obligation to provide notice for bids or proposals that applies to the
public agencies involved is satisfied if the public agency or group of
public agencies that awarded the bid, proposal, or contract complied
with its own statutory requirements and either (i) posted the bid or
solicitation notice on a web site established and maintained by a
public agency, purchasing cooperative, or similar service provider, for
purposes of posting public notice of bid or proposal solicitations, or
(ii) provided an access link on the state's web portal to the notice.
(6) Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided
by law.

--- END ---