BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.92.013 and 2007 c 235 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A veterinarian legally prescribing drugs may delegate to a
registered veterinary medication clerk ((or a licensed veterinary
technician)), while under the veterinarian's direct supervision,
certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the
((dispensing)) preparing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except
controlled substances as defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW)
associated with the practice of veterinary medicine. A veterinarian
legally prescribing drugs may delegate to a licensed veterinary
technician, while under the veterinarian's indirect supervision,
certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the
preparing of legend drugs, nonlegend drugs, and controlled substances
associated with the practice of veterinary medicine. Upon final
approval of the packaged prescription following a direct physical
inspection of the packaged prescription for proper formulation,
packaging, and labeling by the veterinarian, the veterinarian may
delegate the delivery of the prescription to a registered veterinary
medication clerk or licensed veterinary technician, while under the
veterinarian's indirect supervision. Dispensing of drugs by
veterinarians, licensed veterinary technicians, and registered
veterinary medication clerks shall meet the applicable requirements of
chapters 18.64, 69.40, 69.41, and 69.50 RCW and is subject to
inspection by the board of pharmacy investigators.
(2) A licensed veterinary technician may administer legend drugs
under chapter 69.41 RCW and controlled substances under chapter 69.50
RCW under indirect supervision of a veterinarian.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Direct supervision" means the veterinarian is on the premises
and is quickly and easily available; and
(b) "Indirect supervision" means the veterinarian is not on the
premises but has given written or oral instructions for the delegated
task.

--- END ---