BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 To effectuate the legislature's goal of
protecting public safety, as provided in RCW 71.05.010, within the
context of the Washington state supreme court's holding in In re
Harris, 98 Wn.2d 276 (1982), the legislature intends that a court
determining whether a person presents a likelihood of serious harm have
the ability to consider a respondent's recent and past acts where such
acts would indicate a substantial risk to public safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.212 and 1999 c 214 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a ((county)) designated mental health professional or
professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter,
consideration shall include all reasonably available information and
records regarding: (1) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the
need for civil commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to
an evaluation conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW; (2) history of one or
more violent acts; (3) prior determinations of incompetency or insanity
under chapter 10.77 RCW; ((and)) (4) prior commitments under this
chapter; and (5) other available treatment records.
((In addition,)) (2) When conducting an evaluation for offenders
identified under RCW 72.09.370, the ((county)) designated mental health
professional or professional person also shall consider an offender's
history of judicially required or administratively ordered
antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.245 and 1999 c 13 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining whether a person presents a likelihood of
serious harm under RCW 71.05.020(23), the legislature recognizes that
in the case of In re Harris, 98 Wn.2d 276 (1982), the Washington state
supreme court held that in some circumstances it is necessary for a
court to find a substantial risk of physical harm as evidenced by a
recent overt act prior to ordering a civil commitment. For the
purposes of this section, an act is deemed to be recent if it has
occurred within three years prior to the current evaluation by a
designated mental health professional or the current court hearing,
excluding any time spent, but not acts committed, in a mental health
facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.
(2) In making a determination of whether there is a likelihood of
serious harm in a hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320,
the court shall give great weight to any evidence before the court
regarding whether the person has: (1) A recent history of one or more
violent acts; ((or)) (2) taken an action or engaged in behavior,
accompanied by signs of a mental disorder that, when considered in
light of past behavior of the respondent, is likely to be followed in
the near future by an attempt to do physical harm or cause substantial
property destruction; or (3) a recent history of one or more
commitments under this chapter or its equivalent provisions under the
laws of another state which were based on a likelihood of serious harm.
The existence of prior violent acts or commitments under this chapter
or its equivalent shall not be the sole basis for determining whether
a person presents a likelihood of serious harm.
((For the purposes of this section "recent" refers to the period of
time not exceeding three years prior to the current hearing.))

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.157 and 2007 c 375 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional is notified by a
jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a discharge review
under RCW 71.05.232 is to be released to the community, the designated
mental health professional shall evaluate the person within seventy-two
hours of release.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
designated mental health professional and the department of corrections
of the violation and request an evaluation for purposes of revocation
of the less restrictive alternative.
(3) When a designated mental health professional becomes aware that
an offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the community and
the supervision of the department of corrections is in violation of a
treatment order or a condition of supervision that relates to public
safety, or the designated mental health professional detains a person
under this chapter, the designated mental health professional shall
notify the person's treatment provider and the department of
corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the petitioner shall notify the department of corrections
((and the)). If the department of corrections has classified the
offender as a high risk or high needs offender, the department shall
provide documentation of its risk assessment ((or)), records of the
offender's compliance with any conditions of his or her sentence or
community supervision related to participation in mental health
treatment, and any other concerns to the petitioner and the court ((if
the department of corrections classified the offender as a high risk or
high needs offender)).
(5) Nothing in this section creates a duty on any treatment
provider or designated mental health professional to provide offender
supervision.
(6) No jail or state correctional facility may be considered a less
restrictive alternative to an evaluation and treatment facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---