BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.340 and 2005 c 436 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making all discretionary decisions regarding release plans
for and supervision of sex offenders, the department shall set
priorities and make decisions based on an assessment of public safety
risks.
(2) The department shall, no later than September 1, 1996,
implement a policy governing the department's evaluation and approval
of release plans for sex offenders. The policy shall include, at a
minimum, a formal process by which victims, witnesses, and other
interested people may provide information and comments to the
department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or classes
of individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall
make all reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this
process through currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the
assistance of courts, prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims'
advocacy groups in doing so. Notice of an offender's proposed
residence shall be provided to all people registered to receive notice
of an offender's release under RCW ((9.94A.612)) 72.09.712(2), except
that in no case may this notification requirement be construed to
require an extension of an offender's release date.
(3)(a) For any offender convicted of a felony sex offense ((against
a minor victim)) after June 6, 1996, the department shall not approve
a residence location if the proposed residence: (i) Includes a minor
victim or child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim who
the department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the
offender's residence in the household; or (ii) is within ((close
proximity)) fifty miles of, or is in the same county as, the current
residence of a ((minor)) victim, unless the whereabouts of the
((minor)) victim cannot be determined or unless such a restriction
would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the court or
directed by the department of social and health services. The
department is further authorized to reject a residence location for an
offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim if
the proposed residence is within close proximity to schools, child care
centers, playgrounds, or other grounds or facilities where children of
similar age or circumstance as a previous victim are present who the
department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the sex
offender's residence at that location.
(b) In addition, for any offender prohibited from living in a
community protection zone under RCW ((9.94A.712(6)(a)(ii)))
9.94A.703(1)(c), the department may not approve a residence location if
the proposed residence is in a community protection zone.
(4) When the department requires supervised visitation as a term or
condition of a sex offender's community placement under RCW
((9.94A.700)) 9.94B.050(6), the department shall, prior to approving a
supervisor, consider the following:
(a) The relationships between the proposed supervisor, the
offender, and the minor; (b) the proposed supervisor's acknowledgment
and understanding of the offender's prior criminal conduct, general
knowledge of the dynamics of child sexual abuse, and willingness and
ability to protect the minor from the potential risks posed by contact
with the offender; and (c) recommendations made by the department of
social and health services about the best interests of the child.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.270 and 2008 c 231 s 48 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual
reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every offender who is
committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:
(a) Offenders who are sentenced to life without the possibility of
release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW; and
(b) Offenders who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1227.
(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a
series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of
this section.
(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess all offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits.
(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than forty-five days of
being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but,
whenever possible, no later than sixty days after completion of the
assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, and other areas which
are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the community.
(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any offender, the department shall:
(i) Evaluate the offender's needs and, to the extent possible,
connect the offender with existing services and resources that meet
those needs; and
(ii) Connect the offender with a community justice center and/or
community transition coordination network in the area in which the
offender will be residing once released from the correctional system if
one exists.
(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an
offender's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the
period of partial confinement for the offender as allowed pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the offender's transition to the community.
(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing
information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved
with the offender's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed
appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared
electronically.
(8)(a) Except as provided in RCW 72.09.340(3)(a)(ii), in
determining the county of discharge for an offender released to
community custody, the department may not approve a residence location
that is not in the offender's county of origin unless it is determined
by the department that the offender's return to his or her county of
origin would be inappropriate considering any court-ordered condition
of the offender's sentence, victim safety concerns, negative influences
on the offender in the community, or the location of family or other
sponsoring persons or organizations that will support the offender.
(b) If the offender is not returned to his or her county of origin,
the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county
in which the offender is placed with a written explanation.
(c) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the offender's first felony conviction in
Washington.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.712 and 2008 c 231 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than
thirty days before release except in the event of escape or emergency
furloughs as defined in RCW 72.66.010, the department of corrections
shall send written notice of parole, release, community custody, work
release placement, furlough, or escape about a specific inmate
convicted of a violent offense, a sex offense as defined by RCW
9.94A.030, or a felony harassment offense as defined by RCW 9A.46.060
or 9A.46.110, to the following:
(a) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the inmate
will reside or in which placement will be made in a work release
program; and
(b) The sheriff of the county in which the inmate will reside or in
which placement will be made in a work release program.
The sheriff of the county where the offender was convicted shall be
notified if the department does not know where the offender will
reside. The department shall notify the state patrol of the release of
all sex offenders, and that information shall be placed in the
Washington crime information center for dissemination to all law
enforcement.
(2) The same notice as required by subsection (1) of this section
shall be sent to the following if such notice has been requested in
writing about a specific inmate convicted of a violent offense, a sex
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, or a felony harassment offense as
defined by RCW 9A.46.060 or 9A.46.110:
(a) The victim of the crime for which the inmate was convicted or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;
(b) Any witnesses who testified against the inmate in any court
proceedings involving the violent offense;
(c) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney;
and
(d) Any person who requests such notice about a specific inmate
convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 from the
department of corrections at least sixty days prior to the expected
release date of the offender.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting
the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing
by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the inmate. Whenever the
department of corrections mails notice pursuant to this subsection and
the notice is returned as undeliverable, the department shall attempt
alternative methods of notification, including a telephone call to the
person's last known telephone number.
(3) The existence of the notice requirements contained in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not require an extension
of the release date in the event that the release plan changes after
notification.
(4) If an inmate convicted of a violent offense, a sex offense as
defined by RCW 9.94A.030, or a felony harassment offense as defined by
RCW 9A.46.060 or 9A.46.110, escapes from a correctional facility, or if
an offender convicted of a sex offense removes or disables his or her
electronic monitoring device during the period of his or her community
custody, the department of corrections shall immediately notify, by the
most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of
the city and the sheriff of the county in which the inmate or offender
resided immediately before the inmate's or offender's arrest and
conviction. If previously requested, the department shall also notify
the witnesses and the victim of the crime for which the inmate or
offender was convicted or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a
homicide. If the inmate or offender is recaptured or placed back on
electronic monitoring, the department shall send notice to the persons
designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later
than two working days after the department learns of such recapture or
placement back on electronic monitoring.
(5)(a) In addition to the notifications required in subsections (1)
through (4) of this section, upon the actual release of an inmate
convicted of a sex offense, the department of corrections shall make
reasonable, good faith efforts to notify any victim who has been sent
notice under subsection (2) of this section. The department shall make
the notification required by this subsection within twenty-four hours
of the inmate's actual release.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the department has made
"reasonable, good faith efforts" to contact the victim if it has:
(i) Contacted the victim in person; or
(ii) Sent the victim at least one e-mail at his or her last known
e-mail address, if any, and telephoned the victim at least three times
at his or her last known telephone number, if any. If the victim does
not answer the telephone, the department shall leave a message, if
possible, providing a telephone number the victim may call for more
information.
(6) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.
(((6))) (7) The department of corrections shall send the notices
required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department
by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the
department with a current address.
(((7))) (8) The department of corrections shall keep, for a minimum
of two years following the release of an inmate, the following:
(a) A document signed by an individual as proof that that person is
registered in the victim or witness notification program; ((and))
(b) A receipt showing that an individual registered in the victim
or witness notification program was mailed a notice, at the
individual's last known address, upon the release or movement of an
inmate; and
(c) Written records of the department's efforts to comply with
subsection (5) of this section.
(((8))) (9) For purposes of this section the following terms have
the following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings and
children.
(((9))) (10) Nothing in this section shall impose any liability
upon a chief of police of a city or sheriff of a county for failing to
request in writing a notice as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.703 and 2008 c 231 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a court sentences a person to a term of community custody, the
court shall impose conditions of community custody as provided in this
section.
(1) Mandatory conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court shall:
(a) Require the offender to inform the department of court-ordered
treatment upon request by the department;
(b) Require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by
the department under RCW 9.94A.704;
(c) If the offender was sentenced under RCW ((9.94A.712)) 9.94A.507
for an offense listed in RCW ((9.94A.712)) 9.94A.507(1)(a), and the
victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the time of
the offense, prohibit the offender from residing in a community
protection zone;
(d) Require an offender convicted of a sex offense to submit to
electronic monitoring during any period of time in which he or she is
registered as not having a fixed residence under RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) Waivable conditions. Unless waived by the court, as part of
any term of community custody, the court shall order an offender to:
(a) Report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;
(b) Work at department-approved education, employment, or community
restitution, or any combination thereof;
(c) Refrain from possessing or consuming controlled substances
except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;
(d) Pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and
(e) Obtain prior approval of the department for the offender's
residence location and living arrangements.
(3) Discretionary conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court may order an offender to:
(a) Remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;
(b) Refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;
(c) Participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;
(d) Participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the
offense, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the
community;
(e) Refrain from consuming alcohol; or
(f) Comply with any crime-related prohibitions.
(4) Special conditions.
(a) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may order the offender to
participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under
RCW 26.50.150.
(b)(i) In sentencing an offender convicted of an alcohol or drug-related traffic offense, the court shall require the offender to
complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency
agency approved by the department of social and health services or a
qualified probation department, defined under RCW 46.61.516, that has
been approved by the department of social and health services. If the
offense was pursuant to chapter 46.61 RCW, the report shall be
forwarded to the department of licensing. If the offender is found to
have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the offender
shall complete treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the offender
is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires
treatment, the offender shall complete a course in an information
school approved by the department of social and health services under
chapter 70.96A RCW. The offender shall pay all costs for any
evaluation, education, or treatment required by this section, unless
the offender is eligible for an existing program offered or approved by
the department of social and health services.
(ii) For purposes of this section, "alcohol or drug-related traffic
offense" means the following: Driving while under the influence as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, actual physical control while under the
influence as defined by RCW 46.61.504, vehicular homicide as defined by
RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), vehicular assault as defined by RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), homicide by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.050,
or assault by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.060.
(iii) This subsection (4)(b) does not require the department of
social and health services to add new treatment or assessment
facilities nor affect its use of existing programs and facilities
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
A sex offender who is subject to electronic monitoring as a
condition of his or her community custody under RCW 9.94A.703(1)(d)
must be monitored using an active global positioning system that
actively monitors, identifies, and timely reports the offender's
location. The department shall purchase the electronic monitoring
services necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section by
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of interfering with an electronic monitoring
device if, under circumstances not constituting sexually violent
predator escape, he or she:
(a) Is required to be electronically monitored as a condition of
community custody pursuant to a conviction for a sex offense; and
(b) Intentionally removes, alters, tampers with, damages, destroys,
or interferes with the signal from an electronic monitoring device
without prior authorization from the department of corrections.
(2) Interfering with an electronic monitoring device is a class C
felony.
(3) For purposes of this section, "sex offense" has the same
meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.540 and 2005 c 437 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except to the extent provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the following minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory
and shall not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535:
(a) An offender convicted of the crime of murder in the first
degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
twenty years.
(b) An offender convicted of the crime of assault in the first
degree or assault of a child in the first degree where the offender
used force or means likely to result in death or intended to kill the
victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years.
(c) An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree
shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five
years.
(d) An offender convicted of the crime of sexually violent predator
escape shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not
less than sixty months.
(e) An offender convicted of an attempt to violate section 6 of
this act shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not
less than twelve months and one day if: (i) The offender has one or
more previous convictions for a violation, or an attempt to violate,
section 6 of this act; and (ii) the bottom of the offender's standard
range is twelve months or less.
(2) During such minimum terms of total confinement, no offender
subject to the provisions of this section is eligible for community
custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial
confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early
release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized
leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct
custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply: (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency
medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient
treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of
rape in the first degree; or (c) for an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be applied in
sentencing of juveniles tried as adults pursuant to RCW
13.04.030(1)(e)(i).
(b) This subsection (3) applies only to crimes committed on or
after July 24, 2005.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2008 c 108 s 23 and 2008 c 38 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Interfering with an Electronic
Monitoring Device (section 6 of
this act)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW
48.17.063(((3))) (2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(((4))))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---