BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall publish notice at its offices and on its
web site that the department provides and maintains an electronic
registry where a person may enter the name of a contact person to be
contacted in the event the person is in need of or receives emergency
care as the result of an accident, criminal act, or other cause.
(2) A person who volunteers to enter on the department's electronic
registry the name of a contact person to be contacted in the event the
person is in need of or receives emergency care shall enter the first
and last name of the contact person to be contacted, the contact
person's phone number, including area code, and the relationship of the
contact person to the person. The person shall also enter on the
electronic registry personal information about himself or herself that
is the same as information required from an applicant for a driver's
license or identicard. The person may enter subsequent changes to the
electronic registry in order to update or correct the person's
emergency contact information or personal information.
(3) The electronic registry must be readily available for
electronic access by law enforcement officers and health care
providers.
(4) The first law enforcement officer or health care provider who
determines that an injured person is in need of emergency care or who
provides emergency care to a person injured as the result of an
accident, criminal act, or other cause shall make a good faith effort
within a reasonable time to access the electronic registry and contact
the person designated as the contact person by the injured person at
the phone number designated for the contact person on the electronic
registry.
(5) A law enforcement officer or health care provider who makes
contact with a contact person at the phone number designated for the
contact person on the electronic registry shall confirm the identity of
the person as the contact person and shall provide that contact person
with only the name of the injured person, the general location of the
injured person, and, if known, where the injured person is to be
transferred. The law enforcement officer or health care provider shall
also provide the contact person with the law enforcement officer's or
health care provider's name and agency or organization by which he or
she is employed.
(6) Any person, including the department and its employees, and any
law enforcement officer or health care provider complying with this
section who contacts a person designated as a contact person on the
electronic registry at the phone number designated for the contact
person on the electronic registry is not liable for civil damages
resulting from any act or omission in providing or attempting to
provide notice to a contact person in the event the person is injured
and requires emergency care, other than acts or omissions constituting
gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Emergency care" means first aid, care, treatment, or
assistance rendered to an injured person in need of immediate medical
attention and includes providing or arranging for further medical care
or treatment for the injured person.
(b) "Health care provider" means a health professional, hospital,
or other institution, organization, or person that furnishes health
care services and is licensed to furnish these health care services,
including medical, surgical, dental, hospital, ambulance, and other
health care services.
(c) "Law enforcement officer" means any general authority
Washington peace officer, limited authority Washington peace officer,
or specially commissioned Washington peace officer, as those terms are
defined in RCW 10.93.020.

--- END ---