BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.69 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes the significant concerns that many
victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes have when
offenders are considered for postsentence release from confinement.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that victims,
survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes are afforded the
opportunity to make a statement that will be considered prior to the
granting of postsentence release from confinement for any offender
under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board or
its successor, or by the governor regarding an application for pardon
or commutation of sentence.
(2) Victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes have the
following rights:
(a) With respect to victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of
crimes, to present a statement to the indeterminate sentence review
board or its successor, in person or by representation, via audio or
videotape or other electronic means, or in writing, prior to the
granting of parole or community custody release for any offender under
the board's jurisdiction.
(b) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present a
statement to the clemency and pardons board in person, via audio or
videotape or other electronic means, or in writing, at any hearing
conducted regarding an application for pardon or commutation of
sentence.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.420 and 2007 c 363 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review
process under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate,
72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall
participate in, an examination of the offender, incorporating
methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released.
(b) The board may contract for an additional, independent
examination, subject to the standards in this section.
(c) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and
including a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage
in sex offenses if released.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in RCW 9.94A.720. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board
receives the results from the end of sentence review process and the
recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall conduct a hearing to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the offender will
engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in
an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining
whether to release the offender. The board shall order the offender
released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board
determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance
of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than
not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released. If the
board does not order the offender released, the board shall establish
a new minimum term as provided in RCW 9.95.011.
(b) If at the time the offender's minimum term has expired or will
expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's arrival at a
department of correction's facility, then no later than one hundred
twenty days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections
facility, but after the board receives the results from the end of
sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions
to be set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure
to participate in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in
determining whether to release the offender. The board shall order the
offender released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the
board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released.
If the board does not order the offender released, the board shall
establish a new minimum term as provided in RCW 9.95.011.
(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall provide opportunities for the victims of any crimes for
which the offender has been convicted to present ((oral, video,
written, or in-person testimony to the board)) statements as set forth
in section 1 of this act. The procedures for victim input shall be
developed by rule. To facilitate victim involvement, county
prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and
known contact information for victims of record are forwarded as part
of the judgment and sentence.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.420 and 2008 c 231 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review
process under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate,
72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall
participate in, an examination of the offender, incorporating
methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released.
(b) The board may contract for an additional, independent
examination, subject to the standards in this section.
(c) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and
including a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage
in sex offenses if released.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in RCW 9.94A.704. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board
receives the results from the end of sentence review process and the
recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall conduct a hearing to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the offender will
engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in
an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining
whether to release the offender. The board shall order the offender
released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board
determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance
of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than
not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released. If the
board does not order the offender released, the board shall establish
a new minimum term as provided in RCW 9.95.011.
(b) If at the time the offender's minimum term has expired or will
expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's arrival at a
department of correction's facility, then no later than one hundred
twenty days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections
facility, but after the board receives the results from the end of
sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions
to be set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure
to participate in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in
determining whether to release the offender. The board shall order the
offender released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the
board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released.
If the board does not order the offender released, the board shall
establish a new minimum term as provided in RCW 9.95.011.
(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall provide opportunities for the victims of any crimes for
which the offender has been convicted to present ((oral, video,
written, or in-person testimony to the board)) statements as set forth
in section 1 of this act. The procedures for victim input shall be
developed by rule. To facilitate victim involvement, county
prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and
known contact information for victims of record are forwarded as part
of the judgment and sentence.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.885 and 1999 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The clemency and pardons board shall receive petitions from
individuals, organizations, and the department for review and
commutation of sentences and pardoning of offenders in extraordinary
cases, and shall make recommendations thereon to the governor.
(2) The board shall receive petitions from individuals or
organizations for the restoration of civil rights lost by operation of
state law as a result of convictions for federal offenses or out-of-state felonies. The board may issue certificates of restoration
limited to the elective rights to vote and to engage in political
office. Any certifications granted by the board must be filed with the
secretary of state to be effective. In all other cases, the board
shall make recommendations to the governor.
(3) The board shall not recommend that the governor grant clemency
under subsection (1) of this section until a public hearing has been
held on the petition. The prosecuting attorney of the county where the
conviction was obtained shall be notified at least thirty days prior to
the scheduled hearing that a petition has been filed and the date and
place at which the hearing on the petition will be held. The board may
waive the thirty-day notice requirement in cases where it determines
that waiver is necessary to permit timely action on the petition. A
copy of the petition shall be sent to the prosecuting attorney. The
prosecuting attorney shall make reasonable efforts to notify victims,
survivors of victims, witnesses, and the law enforcement agency or
agencies that conducted the investigation, of the date and place of the
hearing. Information regarding victims, survivors of victims, or
witnesses receiving this notice are confidential and shall not be
available to the offender. The board shall consider ((written, oral,
audio, or videotaped statements regarding the petition received,
personally or by representation, from the individuals who receive
notice pursuant to this section)) statements presented as set forth in
section 1 of this act. This subsection is intended solely for the
guidance of the board. Nothing in this section is intended or may be
relied upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or procedural,
enforceable at law by any person.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.69.030 and 2008 c 286 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a reasonable effort made to ensure that victims,
survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes have the following
rights, which apply to any criminal court and/or juvenile court
proceeding:
(1) With respect to victims of violent or sex crimes, to receive,
at the time of reporting the crime to law enforcement officials, a
written statement of the rights of crime victims as provided in this
chapter. The written statement shall include the name, address, and
telephone number of a county or local crime victim/witness program, if
such a crime victim/witness program exists in the county;
(2) To be informed by local law enforcement agencies or the
prosecuting attorney of the final disposition of the case in which the
victim, survivor, or witness is involved;
(3) To be notified by the party who issued the subpoena that a
court proceeding to which they have been subpoenaed will not occur as
scheduled, in order to save the person an unnecessary trip to court;
(4) To receive protection from harm and threats of harm arising out
of cooperation with law enforcement and prosecution efforts, and to be
provided with information as to the level of protection available;
(5) To be informed of the procedure to be followed to apply for and
receive any witness fees to which they are entitled;
(6) To be provided, whenever practical, a secure waiting area
during court proceedings that does not require them to be in close
proximity to defendants and families or friends of defendants;
(7) To have any stolen or other personal property expeditiously
returned by law enforcement agencies or the superior court when no
longer needed as evidence. When feasible, all such property, except
weapons, currency, contraband, property subject to evidentiary
analysis, and property of which ownership is disputed, shall be
photographed and returned to the owner within ten days of being taken;
(8) To be provided with appropriate employer intercession services
to ensure that employers of victims, survivors of victims, and
witnesses of crime will cooperate with the criminal justice process in
order to minimize an employee's loss of pay and other benefits
resulting from court appearance;
(9) To access to immediate medical assistance and not to be
detained for an unreasonable length of time by a law enforcement agency
before having such assistance administered. However, an employee of
the law enforcement agency may, if necessary, accompany the person to
a medical facility to question the person about the criminal incident
if the questioning does not hinder the administration of medical
assistance. Victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking,
as defined in RCW 49.76.020, shall be notified of their right to
reasonable leave from employment under chapter 49.76 RCW;
(10) With respect to victims of violent and sex crimes, to have a
crime victim advocate from a crime victim/witness program, or any other
support person of the victim's choosing, present at any prosecutorial
or defense interviews with the victim, and at any judicial proceedings
related to criminal acts committed against the victim. This subsection
applies if practical and if the presence of the crime victim advocate
or support person does not cause any unnecessary delay in the
investigation or prosecution of the case. The role of the crime victim
advocate is to provide emotional support to the crime victim;
(11) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be
physically present in court during trial, or if subpoenaed to testify,
to be scheduled as early as practical in the proceedings in order to be
physically present during trial after testifying and not to be excluded
solely because they have testified;
(12) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be
informed by the prosecuting attorney of the date, time, and place of
the trial and of the sentencing hearing for felony convictions upon
request by a victim or survivor;
(13) To submit a victim impact statement or report to the court,
with the assistance of the prosecuting attorney if requested, which
shall be included in all presentence reports and permanently included
in the files and records accompanying the offender committed to the
custody of a state agency or institution;
(14) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present
a statement personally or by representation, at the sentencing hearing
for felony convictions; and
(15) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to entry of
an order of restitution by the court in all felony cases, even when the
offender is sentenced to confinement, unless extraordinary
circumstances exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's
judgment((; and
(16) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present
a statement in person, via audio or videotape, in writing or by
representation at any hearing conducted regarding an application for
pardon or commutation of sentence)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act expires August 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 3 of this act takes effect August 1,
2009.

--- END ---