BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly establish a
school-based influenza vaccination pilot program in one urban school
district and one rural school district. Due to the distinct
indications, contraindications, and modes of administration, both
killed injected vaccine and live attenuated nasal vaccine shall be used
in the pilot program. Parents shall be given the choice of which type
of vaccine their child receives in order to help assure maximum
participation.
(2) The department of health shall convene a working group to plan
the school-based influenza vaccination pilot program established under
this section. The working group shall include representatives of:
(a) The Washington state chapter of the American academy of
pediatrics;
(b) The Washington academy of family physicians;
(c) Each school district in which the pilot program operates;
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(e) The state medicaid medical director.
(3) Not later than January 1, 2011, the department of health and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit to
the governor, and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives a jointly written report containing the results and the
recommendations of the department and the office to continue, expand,
or terminate the school-based influenza vaccination pilot program.
(4) The department of health and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction may seek, receive, and spend money received
through an appropriation, grant, donation, or reimbursement from any
public or private source to implement the school-based influenza
vaccination pilot program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---