BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.12 RCW
to read as follows:
No person or entity that is regulated by, contracts with, leases
to, or sells commodities to the public lands commission shall directly
or indirectly pay or use, or offer, consent, or agree to pay or use any
money or thing of value for or in aid of any candidate for the office
of public lands commissioner; nor for reimbursement or indemnification
of any person for money or property so used. Any individual who
violates this section, or who participates in, aids, abets, advises, or
consents to any violation, or who solicits or knowingly receives any
money or thing of value in violation of this section, shall be guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---