BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.101.010 and 2003 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Area" means a tourism promotion area.
(2) "Legislative authority" means the legislative authority of any
county with a population greater than forty thousand ((but less than
one million)), or of any city or town within such a county, including
unclassified cities or towns operating under special charters.
However, in any county with a population of one million or more, the
legislative authority shall be comprised of two or more jurisdictions
acting jointly as the legislative authority under an interlocal
agreement created under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint establishment
and operation of a tourism promotion area.
(3) "Lodging business" means a person that furnishes lodging
taxable by the state under chapter 82.08 RCW that has forty or more
lodging units.
(4) "Tourism promotion" means activities and expenditures designed
to increase tourism and convention business, including but not limited
to advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for
the purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists, and operating tourism
destination marketing organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A legislative authority shall contract, prior to the effective
date of an ordinance imposing a lodging charge under RCW 35.101.050,
for the administration and collection of the charge by the state
department of revenue. The department may deduct a percentage amount,
as provided by contract, for the administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department.
(2) This section only applies to a legislative authority
consisting of a county with a population of one million or more or a
city or town within such a county.

--- END ---