BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.360 and 1982 c 123 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any city or town with a population of ((one)) three hundred
thousand or less at the time of annexation may become a part of any
rural county library district, island library district, or intercounty
rural library district lying contiguous thereto by annexation in the
following manner: The inclusion of such a city or town may be
initiated by the adoption of an ordinance by the legislative authority
thereof stating its intent to join the library district and finding
that the public interest will be served thereby. Before adoption, the
ordinance shall be submitted to the library board of the city or town
for its review and recommendations. If no library board exists in the
city or town, the state librarian shall be notified of the proposed
ordinance. If the board of trustees of the library district concurs in
the annexation, notification thereof shall be transmitted to the
legislative authority or authorities of the counties in which the city
or town is situated.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.12.010 and 1994 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different
meaning:
(1) "Governmental unit" means any county, city, town, rural county
library district, intercounty rural library district, rural partial-county library district, or island library district;
(2) "Legislative body" means the body authorized to determine the
amount of taxes to be levied in a governmental unit; in rural county
library districts, in intercounty rural library districts, and in
island library districts, the legislative body shall be the board of
library trustees of the district;
(3) "Library" means a free public library supported in whole or in
part with money derived from taxation;
(4) "Regional library" means a free public library maintained by
two or more counties or other governmental units as provided in RCW
27.12.080;
(5) "Rural county library district" means a library serving all the
area of a county not included within the area of incorporated cities
and towns: PROVIDED, That any city or town ((with a population of one
hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation)) meeting the
population requirements of RCW 27.12.360 may be included therein as
provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;
(6) "Intercounty rural library district" means a municipal
corporation organized to provide library service for all areas outside
of incorporated cities and towns within two or more counties:
PROVIDED, That any city or town ((with a population of one hundred
thousand or less at the time of annexation)) meeting the population
requirements of RCW 27.12.360 may be included therein as provided in
RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;
(7) "Island library district" means a municipal corporation
organized to provide library service for all areas outside of
incorporated cities and towns on a single island only, and not all of
the area of the county, in counties composed entirely of islands and
having a population of less than twenty-five thousand at the time the
island library district was created: PROVIDED, That any city or town
((with a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of
annexation)) meeting the population requirements of RCW 27.12.360 may
be included therein as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390; and
(8) "Rural partial-county library district" means a municipal
corporation organized to provide library service for a portion of the
unincorporated area of a county. Any city or town located in the same
county as a rural partial-county library district may annex to the
district if the city or town has a population of one hundred thousand
or less at the time of annexation.

--- END ---