BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that school districts
are seeking innovations to reduce operating costs and preserve limited
resources for the primary purpose of student learning. Efficiencies in
transportation, heat, lights, maintenance, and food expenses are
possible from operating for four rather than five days per week, but
current law poses a barrier to this innovation by requiring a set
number of instructional days in each school year. Current waiver
processes do not allow consideration of economies and efficiencies as
a justification for a waiver. School districts in several western
states have operated on a four-day school week and report increased
efficiencies, family support, reduced absenteeism, and no negative
impact on student learning. Small rural school districts in particular
could benefit due to their high per-pupil costs for transportation and
utilities. Therefore, the legislature intends to permit school
districts with under five hundred students to seek waivers from the
school year requirement in order to operate on a four-day school week,
provided that adequate safeguards are put in place to prevent any
negative impact on student learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to waivers authorized under RCW 28A.305.140 and
28A.655.180, the state board of education may grant waivers from the
requirement for a one hundred eighty-day school year under RCW
28A.150.220 and 28A.150.250 to school districts with under five hundred
students that propose to operate one or more schools on a four-day
school week for purposes of economy and efficiency as provided in this
section. The requirement under RCW 28A.150.220 that school districts
offer an annual average instructional hour offering of at least one
thousand hours shall not be waived.
(2) A school district seeking a waiver under this section must
submit an application that includes:
(a) A proposed calendar for the school day and school year that
demonstrates how the instructional hour requirement will be maintained;
(b) An explanation and estimate of the economies and efficiencies
to be gained from compressing the instructional hours into fewer than
one hundred eighty days;
(c) An explanation of how monetary savings from the proposal will
be redirected to support student learning;
(d) A summary of comments received at one or more public hearings
on the proposal and how concerns will be addressed;
(e) Other information that the state board of education may request
to assure that the proposed four-day school week will not adversely
affect student learning.
(3) The state board of education shall adopt criteria to evaluate
waiver requests. No more than five districts may be granted waivers.
Waivers may be granted for up to three years, and districts may reapply
to extend the waiver for an additional period. However, all waivers
expire August 31, 2015.
(4) The state board shall examine the waivers granted under this
section and make a recommendation to the education committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2014, regarding whether the waiver program
should be continued, modified, or allowed to terminate.
(5) This section expires August 31, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.180 and 1995 c 208 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, where appropriate, or the
superintendent of public instruction, where appropriate, may grant
waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating
to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and
other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board of
education or the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction
may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for
restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 ((or 28A.300.138)) to apply for the waivers under
((subsection (1) of)) this section.
(((3) The joint select committee on education restructuring shall
study which waivers of state laws or rules are necessary for school
districts to implement education restructuring. The committee shall
study whether the waivers are used to implement specific essential
academic learning requirements and student learning goals. The
committee shall study the availability of waivers under the schools for
the twenty-first century program created by chapter 525, Laws of 1987,
and the use of those waivers by schools participating in that program.
The committee shall also study the use of waivers authorized under RCW
28A.305.140. The committee shall report its findings to the
legislature by December 1, 1997.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 28A.305.145 (Application process for
waivers under RCW 28A.305.140) and 1993 c 336 s 302 are each repealed.

--- END ---