BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.010 and 2007 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter concerns requirements for new energy resources. This
chapter requires large utilities to obtain fifteen percent of their
electricity, or one hundred percent of their electricity to serve load
growth, whichever is less, from new renewable resources such as solar
and wind by 2020 and undertake cost-effective energy conservation.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Consumer-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
19.29A.010.
(6) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(((6))) (7) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(((7))) (8) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases
electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development or its successor.
(((9))) (10) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable
resource where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of
such facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five
megawatts.
(((10))) (11) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where((: (i))) the facility is located ((in the Pacific
Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into
Washington state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or
integration services)) within the geographic boundary of the western
electricity coordinating council or its successor entity, but in no
event may the geographic location be less than that included in the
western electricity coordinating council geographic boundary on the
effective date of this section; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects ((owned by a qualifying utility and)) located in
the Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation
pipes and canals located in the Pacific Northwest((, where the
additional generation in either case does not result in new water
diversions or impoundments));
(c) Electricity from new hydroelectric generation located in the
Pacific Northwest, including pumped storage and new or existing
irrigation hydrogeneration, that have met applicable licensing
requirements, if any, of the federal energy regulatory commission; or
(d) Electricity produced from hydroelectric generation, including
pumped storage projects, located in the Pacific Northwest that is used
to integrate other eligible renewable resources into the transmission
grid for delivery to a qualifying utility.
(((11))) (12) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010.
(((12))) (13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered in the most recently completed year by a
qualifying utility to its Washington retail customers.
(((13))) (14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally
related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and
other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided criteria
emissions of pollutants to the air, soil, or water((, and avoided
emissions of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases)). Nonpower
attributes do not include avoided emissions of carbon dioxide and other
greenhouse gases, which may be retained by the generator or sold
separately.
(((14))) (15) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined
for the Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698;
16 U.S.C. Sec. 839a).
(((15))) (16) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 39.35C.010.
(((16))) (17) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as
the term "electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves
more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington.
The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy.
(((17))) (18) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable
certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible
renewable resource where ((the generation facility is not powered by
fresh water,)) the certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes
associated with that one megawatt-hour of electricity((,)) and the
certificate is verified by a renewable energy credit tracking system
selected by the department.
(((18))) (19) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) (i) byproducts of
pulping or wood manufacturing processes located within the geographic
boundary of the western electricity coordinating council or its
successor entity, but in no event may the geographic location be less
than that included in the western electricity coordinating council on
the effective date of this section, including but not limited to bark,
wood chips, sawdust, and lignin in spent pulping liquors; (j) black
liquors derived from algae; and (k) biomass energy based on animal
waste, food waste, yard waste, or solid organic fuels from wood,
forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include (i) wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) ((black liquor byproduct from paper production; (iii)))
wood from old growth forests; or (((iv))) (iii) municipal solid waste.
(((19))) (20) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other
entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and
purposes of this chapter.
(((20))) (21) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, achievable, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, ((using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan,)) each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. Cost-effective conservation
potential includes achievable cost-effective conservation related to
energy use, production, and distribution. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) ((Beginning)) By January 1, 2010, each qualifying utility shall
establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for
cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of
achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that
target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each
biennial acquisition target must be no lower than the qualifying
utility's pro rata share for that two-year period of its achievable
cost-effective conservation potential for the subsequent ten-year
period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility ((has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output)) is designed to have a
projected overall thermal conversion efficiency of at least seventy
percent. For the purposes of this section, overall thermal conversion
efficiency means the output of electricity plus usable heat divided by
fuel input. The reduction in load due to high-efficiency cogeneration
shall be((: (i) Calculated as the ratio of the fuel chargeable to
power heat rate of the cogeneration facility compared to the heat rate
on a new and clean basis of a best-commercially available technology
combined-cycle natural gas-fired combustion turbine; and (ii))) counted
towards meeting the biennial conservation target in the same manner as
other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(f) The governing board of a consumer-owned utility shall determine
if a conservation program to be implemented by the consumer-owned
utility is achievable and cost-effective.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load, or one hundred percent of
its load growth from the effective date of this section, whichever is
less, by January 1, 2012, and each year thereafter through December 31,
2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load, or one hundred percent of
its load growth from the effective date of this section, whichever is
less, by January 1, 2016, and each year thereafter through December 31,
2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load, or one hundred percent
of its load growth from the effective date of this section, whichever
is less, by January 1, 2020, and each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years or calculate its load
growth beginning with the retail sales of electricity in calendar year
2007.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count((:
(i))) eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate
entity((; or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090)).
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(j) A qualifying utility is not required to comply with an annual
target in (a) of this subsection if purchases of eligible renewable
resources would displace hydroelectric generation that is available to
serve the qualifying utility's retail load.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.285.050 and 2007 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with
an annual target created in RCW 19.285.040(2) for a given year if the
utility invested four percent of its total annual retail revenue
requirement on the incremental costs of eligible renewable resources,
the cost of renewable energy credits, or a combination of both, but a
utility may elect to invest more than this amount.
(b) The incremental cost of an eligible renewable resource is
calculated as the difference between the levelized delivered cost of
the eligible renewable resource, regardless of ownership, compared to
the levelized delivered cost of an equivalent amount of reasonably
available substitute resources that do not qualify as eligible
renewable resources, where the resources being compared have the same
contract length or facility life.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, for
purposes of this section and RCW 19.285.040(2)(d), an investor-owned
utility shall use its commission-approved total retail revenue
requirement resulting from the utility's most recent general rate case.
(ii) For each investor-owned utility, if the commission has not
issued an order in a general rate case for that utility in any of the
three years prior to January 1st of a year for which an annual target
is created in RCW 19.285.040(2), the commission shall calculate the
total annual retail revenue requirement for that utility for that
target year. The total annual retail revenue requirement for each such
utility must be calculated based on only the operations of the utility
relating to electricity, and must be updated on an annual basis until
the commission issues an order for that utility in a general rate case.
The total annual retail revenue requirement calculated for purposes of
this subsection (1)(c)(ii) has no bearing on the commission's rate-making policies and practices under Title 80 RCW.
(2) An investor-owned utility is entitled to recover all prudently
incurred costs associated with compliance with this chapter. The
commission shall address cost recovery issues of qualifying utilities
that are investor-owned utilities that serve both in Washington and in
other states in complying with this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.285.060 and 2007 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
qualifying utility that fails to comply with the energy conservation or
renewable energy targets established in RCW 19.285.040 shall pay an
administrative penalty to the state of Washington in the amount of
fifty dollars for each megawatt-hour of shortfall. Beginning in 2007,
this penalty shall be adjusted annually according to the rate of change
of the inflation indicator, gross domestic product-implicit price
deflator, as published by the bureau of economic analysis of the United
States department of commerce or its successor.
(2) A qualifying utility that does not meet an annual renewable
energy target established in RCW 19.285.040(2) is exempt from the
administrative penalty in subsection (1) of this section for that year
if the commission for investor-owned utilities or the auditor for all
other qualifying utilities determines that the utility complied with
RCW 19.285.040(2) (d) or (i) or 19.285.050(1).
(3) A qualifying utility must notify its retail electric customers
in published form within three months of incurring a penalty regarding
the size of the penalty and the reason it was incurred.
(4) The commission shall determine if an investor-owned utility may
recover the cost of this administrative penalty in electric rates, and
may consider providing positive incentives for an investor-owned
utility to exceed the targets established in RCW 19.285.040.
(5) Administrative penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited into the energy independence act special account which is
hereby created. All receipts from administrative penalties collected
under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purchase of renewable energy
credits or for energy conservation projects at public facilities, local
government facilities, community colleges, or state universities. The
state shall own and retire any renewable energy credits purchased using
moneys from the account. Only the director of general administration
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(6) For a qualifying utility that is an investor-owned utility, the
commission shall determine compliance with the provisions of this
chapter and assess penalties for noncompliance as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.
(7) For qualifying utilities that are not investor-owned
utilities((,)): (a) The governing board is responsible for determining
compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under
this chapter; (b) the auditor is responsible for auditing compliance
with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter that apply to
those utilities; and (c) the attorney general is responsible for
enforcing that compliance. By November 1, 2009, the auditor may
develop a guidance manual related to compliance with the conservation
provisions of this chapter and other relevant state law.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.285.080 and 2007 c 1 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to ensure the proper
implementation and enforcement of this chapter as it applies to
investor-owned utilities.
(2) The department shall adopt rules concerning only process,
timelines, and documentation to ensure the proper implementation of
this chapter as it applies to qualifying utilities that are not
investor-owned utilities. Those rules include, but are not limited to,
rules associated with a qualifying utility's development of
conservation targets under RCW 19.285.040(1); a qualifying utility's
decision to pursue alternative compliance in RCW 19.285.040(2) (d) or
(i) or 19.285.050(1); and the format and content of reports required in
RCW 19.285.070. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to
restrict the rate-making authority of the commission or a qualifying
utility as otherwise provided by law.
(3) The commission and department may coordinate in developing
rules related to process, timelines, and documentation that are
necessary for implementation of this chapter.
(4)(a) Pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, rules needed for the implementation of this chapter must be
adopted by ((December 31, 2007)) June 30, 2010. These rules may be
revised as needed to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter.
(b) Within six months of the adoption by the Pacific Northwest
electric power and conservation council of each of its regional power
plans, the commission and department shall adopt rules, according to
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, to consider adopting any
changes in methodologies used by the Pacific Northwest electric power
and conservation council that would impact a qualifying utility's
conservation potential assessment in accordance with RCW 19.285.040(1).
If rules are adopted under this subsection, the rules are applicable to
the next biennial target that is at least one year from the effective
date of the rules.

--- END ---