BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that agricultural
fairs serve valuable educational, vocational, and recreational purposes
that promote the public good and serve as a showcase for an important
sector of Washington's economy. The legislature also recognizes that
counties provide territory for agricultural fairs and supporting
services, thereby creating a place for economic and other beneficial
activities. Washington's increasing population, however, can create
significant annexation pressures that impact fairgrounds and
surrounding lands.
In recognition of the many benefits of agricultural fairs and the
importance of promoting effective annexation laws, the legislature
intends to establish clear and logical annexation procedures for the
annexation of county-owned fairgrounds that are consistent with the
longstanding legal requirement that these grounds may only be annexed
with the consent of the majority of the board of county commissioners.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.010 and 1965 c 7 s 35.13.010 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any portion of a county not incorporated as part of a city or town
but lying contiguous thereto may become a part of the city or town by
annexation((: PROVIDED, That property owned by a county, and used for
the purpose of an agricultural fair as provided in chapter 15.76 RCW or
chapter 36.37 RCW shall not be subject to annexation without the
consent of the majority of the board of county commissioners)). An
area proposed to be annexed to a city or town shall be deemed
contiguous thereto even though separated by water or tide or shore
lands on which no bona fide residence is maintained by any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Territory owned by a county and used for an agricultural fair
as provided in chapter 15.76 RCW or chapter 36.37 RCW may only be
annexed to a noncode city or town through the method prescribed in this
section.
(a) The legislative body of the city or town proposing the
annexation must submit a request for annexation and a legal description
of the subject territory to the legislative authority of the county
within which the territory is located.
(b) Upon receipt of the request and description, the county
legislative authority has thirty days to review the proposal and
determine if the annexation proceedings will continue. As a condition
of approval, the legislative authority may modify the proposal, but it
may not add territory that was not included in the request and
description. Approval of the county legislative authority is a
condition precedent to further proceedings upon the request and there
is no appeal of the decision of the legislative authority.
(c) If the county legislative authority determines that the
proceedings may continue, it must, within thirty days of the
determination, fix a date for a public hearing on the proposal, and
cause notice of the hearing to be published at least once a week for
two weeks prior to the hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation in the territory proposed for annexation. The notice must
also be posted in three public places within the subject territory,
specify the time and place of the hearing, and invite interested
persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the annexation.
If the annexation proposal provides for assumption of indebtedness or
adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice must include a
statement of these requirements.
(d) If, following the conclusion of the hearing, a majority of the
county legislative authority deems the annexation proposal to be in the
best interest of the county, it may adopt a resolution approving of the
annexation.
(e) If, following the adoption of the annexation approval
resolution by the county legislative authority, the legislative body of
the city or town proposing annexation determines to effect the
annexation, it must do so by ordinance. The ordinance: (i) May only
include territory approved for annexation in the resolution adopted
under (d) of this subsection; and (ii) must not exclude territory
approved for annexation in the resolution adopted under (d) of this
subsection. Upon passage of the annexation ordinance, a certified copy
must be filed with the applicable county legislative authority.
(2) Any territory annexed through an ordinance adopted under this
section is annexed and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date
fixed in the ordinance.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.14.010 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.010 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any portion of a county not incorporated as part of a city or town
but lying contiguous to a code city may become a part of the charter
code city or noncharter code city by annexation((: PROVIDED, That
property owned by a county, and used for the purpose of an agricultural
fair as provided in chapter 15.76 RCW or chapter 36.37 RCW shall not be
subject to annexation without the consent of the majority of the board
of county commissioners)). An area proposed to be annexed to a charter
code city or noncharter code city shall be deemed contiguous thereto
even though separated by water or tide or shore lands and, upon
annexation of such area, any such intervening water and/or tide or
shore lands shall become a part of such annexing city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Territory owned by a county and used for an agricultural fair
as provided in chapter 15.76 RCW or chapter 36.37 RCW may only be
annexed to a code city through the method prescribed in this section.
(a) The legislative body of the city proposing the annexation must
submit a request for annexation and a legal description of the subject
territory to the legislative authority of the county within which the
territory is located.
(b) Upon receipt of the request and description, the county
legislative authority has thirty days to review the proposal and
determine if the annexation proceedings will continue. As a condition
of approval, the legislative authority may modify the proposal, but it
may not add territory that was not included in the request and
description. Approval of the county legislative authority is a
condition precedent to further proceedings upon the request and there
is no appeal of the decision of the legislative authority.
(c) If the county legislative authority determines that the
proceedings may continue, it must, within thirty days of the
determination, fix a date for a public hearing on the proposal, and
cause notice of the hearing to be published at least once a week for
two weeks prior to the hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation in the territory proposed for annexation. The notice must
also be posted in three public places within the subject territory,
specify the time and place of the hearing, and invite interested
persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the annexation.
If the annexation proposal provides for assumption of indebtedness or
adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice must include a
statement of these requirements.
(d) If, following the conclusion of the hearing, a majority of the
county legislative authority deems the annexation proposal to be in the
best interest of the county, it may adopt a resolution approving of the
annexation.
(e) If, following the adoption of the annexation approval
resolution by the county legislative authority, the legislative body of
the city proposing annexation determines to effect the annexation, it
must do so by ordinance. The ordinance: (i) May only include
territory approved for annexation in the resolution adopted under (d)
of this subsection; and (ii) must not exclude territory approved for
annexation in the resolution adopted under (d) of this subsection.
Upon passage of the annexation ordinance, a certified copy must be
filed with the applicable county legislative authority.
(2) Any territory annexed through an ordinance adopted under this
section is annexed and becomes a part of the code city upon the date
fixed in the ordinance.

--- END ---