BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.150 and 2002 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent to the
landlord to enter into the dwelling unit in order to inspect the
premises, make necessary or agreed repairs, alterations, or
improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the
dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants,
workers, or contractors.
(2) Upon written notice of intent to seek a search warrant, when a
tenant or landlord denies a fire official the right to search a
dwelling unit, a fire official may immediately seek a search warrant
and, upon a showing of probable cause specific to the dwelling unit
sought to be searched that criminal fire code violations exist in the
dwelling unit, a court of competent jurisdiction shall issue a warrant
allowing a search of the dwelling unit.
Upon written notice of intent to seek a search warrant, when a
landlord denies a fire official the right to search the common areas of
the rental building other than the dwelling unit, a fire official may
immediately seek a search warrant and, upon a showing of probable cause
specific to the common area sought to be searched that a criminal fire
code violation exists in those areas, a court of competent jurisdiction
shall issue a warrant allowing a search of the common areas in which
the violation is alleged.
The superior court and courts of limited jurisdiction organized
under Titles 3, 35, and 35A RCW have jurisdiction to issue such search
warrants. Evidence obtained pursuant to any such search may be used in
a civil or administrative enforcement action.
(3) A local government may not require a landlord to engage or hire
a third party to conduct inspections or searches of dwelling units and
common areas under this section. A local government may not assess the
cost of an inspection by a local building official under this section
against the landlord or owner.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Common areas" means a common area or those areas that contain
electrical, plumbing, and mechanical equipment and facilities used for
the operation of the rental building.
(b) "Fire official" means any fire official authorized to enforce
the state or local fire code.
(((4))) (c) "Local building official" means any person employed by
a local government who is authorized to enforce local building codes.
(5) The landlord may enter the dwelling unit without consent of the
tenant in case of emergency or abandonment.
(((5))) (6) The landlord shall not abuse the right of access or use
it to harass the tenant. Except in the case of emergency or if it is
impracticable to do so, the landlord shall give the tenant at least two
days' notice of his or her intent to enter and shall enter only at
reasonable times. The tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent
to the landlord to enter the dwelling unit at a specified time where
the landlord has given at least one day's notice of intent to enter to
exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers or
tenants. A landlord shall not unreasonably interfere with a tenant's
enjoyment of the rented dwelling unit by excessively exhibiting the
dwelling unit.
(((6))) (7) The landlord has no other right of access except by
court order, arbitrator or by consent of the tenant.
(((7))) (8) A landlord or tenant who continues to violate the
rights of the tenant or landlord with respect to the duties imposed on
the other as set forth in this section after being served with one
written notification alleging in good faith violations of this section
listing the date and time of the violation shall be liable for up to
one hundred dollars for each violation after receipt of the notice.
The prevailing landlord or tenant may recover costs of the suit or
arbitration under this section, and may also recover reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(((8))) (9) Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate or
modify in any way any common law right or privilege.

--- END ---