BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.020 and 2008 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician or
psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should
be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a
portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and
certified by the department of social and health services under RCW
71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital,
which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals
experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term
hospitalization;
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in chapters 70.96A and 70.96B RCW;
(10) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(11) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in
rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(12) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(13) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental
disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary;
(14) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3);
(15) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(16) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter;
(17) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human
needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in
routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of
cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;
(18) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;
(19) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(20) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to
occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;
(21) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(22) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;
(23) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter;
(((23))) (24) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by
county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their
capacity as legal representatives of public mental health service
providers under RCW 71.05.130;
(25) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced
by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person
or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts;
(((24))) (26) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or
emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a
person's cognitive or volitional functions;
(((25))) (27) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((26))) (28) "Mental health service provider" means a public or
private agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders
as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources.
This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this
section, community mental health service delivery systems or community
mental health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, facilities
conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77
RCW, and correctional facilities operated by state and local
governments;
(29) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment;
(((27))) (30) "Private agency" means any person, partnership,
corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not
financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an
evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital,
which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for,
the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(((28))) (31) "Professional person" means a mental health
professional and shall also mean a physician, psychiatric advanced
registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may
be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter;
(((29))) (32) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner"
means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse
practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified
in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;
(((30))) (33) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a
physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three
years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the
American medical association or the American osteopathic association
and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(((31))) (34) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed
as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(((32))) (35) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment
facility or institution, or hospital which is conducted for, or
includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of
persons with mental illness, if the agency is operated directly by,
federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of
such governments;
(((33))) (36) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness;
(((34))) (37) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment
under the provisions of this chapter;
(((35))) (38) "Resource management services" has the meaning given
in chapter 71.24 RCW;
(((36))) (39) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services, or his or her designee;
(((37))) (40) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 9.94A.030;
(41) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(((38))) (42) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health
information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to
mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and
dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do
not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person
providing treatment services for the department, regional support
networks, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not
available to others;
(((39))) (43) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in
homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage
to property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A mental health service provider shall release to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request,
information related to mental health services delivered to a person
who:
(a) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;
(b) Has been convicted of a serious violent offense;
(c) Has been found not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetent
to stand trial for a serious violent offense pursuant to chapter 10.77
RCW; or
(d) Has been civilly committed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4).
(2) Except to the extent provided otherwise in subsection (4) of
this section related to a prosecutor's initiation of criminal
proceedings, the information subject to release under subsection (1) of
this section must be released to law enforcement officers, personnel of
a county or city jail, public health officers, personnel of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board,
prosecuting attorneys, attorneys retained to represent the person who
is the subject of the information request under this section, or the
court when such information is requested during the course of business
and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the
requesting party's office.
(3) Appropriate purposes for requesting information related to
mental health services include but are not limited to:
(a) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment
reports;
(b) Assessing an offender's risk to the community;
(c) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender,
including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions
of community supervision; and
(d) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of
corrections supervision.
(4)(a) A prosecuting attorney may request information related to
mental health services in connection with potentially initiating a
criminal prosecution if the person about whom the information is
requested:
(i) Is a person about whom information can be released under
subsection (1) of this section;
(ii) Has a prior conviction for an offense that involved a violent
act;
(iii) Was previously charged with an offense that involved a
violent act and charges were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW
due to incompetency to stand trial; or
(iv) Was previously found not guilty of an offense that involved a
violent act by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(b) Information related to mental health services obtained under
this subsection may be used by prosecutors or the court only to
determine what criminal charges to file, if any, an appropriate bail
amount, or whether to release a person who is the subject of the
request of the information. Any information provided to the court in
this section must be filed under seal with the court, and a copy shall
be provided to the defendant's attorney. Any hearing on a matter under
this subsection involving the use of information related to mental
health services shall be closed to the public.
(5) A request for information related to mental health services
under this section shall not require the consent of the subject of the
records and shall be provided in writing, except to the extent
authorized in subsection (7) of this section. A written request
includes requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the requesting
person is clearly identified. The request must specify the information
being requested.
(6) Legal counsel may, but are not required to, release information
related to mental health services requested under this section on
behalf of a mental health service provider that they represent.
(7) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant
risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service provider,
or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental
health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information
regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of
corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may
be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed
in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is
limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being
treated by the mental health services provider and the address or
information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.
(8) The information received under this section shall remain
confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in
this chapter, except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(9) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement
authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance
portability and accountability act.
(10) No mental health service provider or individual employed by a
mental health service provider, or its legal counsel, shall be held
responsible for information released to or used under the provisions of
this section or rules adopted under this section except under RCW
71.05.440.
(11) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(12) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(13) In collaboration with interested organizations, the department
shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to
mental health services made under this section and a standard format
for information provided in response to such requests. Consistent with
the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal
health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the
standard form for responsive information, the department shall attempt
to design the form in such a way that the information disclosed is
limited to the minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the
information is requested.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.390 and 2007 c 375 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in this section, RCW 71.05.445, 71.05.630,
70.96A.150, section 2 of this act, or pursuant to a valid release under
RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission and all information and records
compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services
to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or
private agencies shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the person, or his or her personal representative or
guardian, shall be obtained before information or records may be
disclosed by a professional person employed by a facility unless
provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of
a facility in which the patient resides or will reside.
(3)(a) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(b) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(i) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(ii) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of
the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and
(iii) Such other information requested by the next of kin or
attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings
should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5)(a) For either program evaluation or research, or both:
PROVIDED, That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the
evaluation or research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need
not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers
must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.
(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7)(a) When a mental health professional is requested by a
representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a
police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal
attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or
provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the
mental health professional shall, if requested to do so, advise the
representative in writing of the results of the investigation including
a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person
investigated. Such written report shall be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from
the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs
later.
(((b) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody or supervision of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which information
or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to
RCW 71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this
chapter under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320 (3)(c) after dismissal of
a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information
that may be released is limited as follows:
(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address shall
be disclosed upon request;
(ii) The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of
the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board
shall be obligated to keep such information confidential in accordance
with this chapter;
(iii) Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving
notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and that the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence;
(iv) Information and records shall be disclosed to the department
of corrections pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions of RCW
71.05.445 for the purposes of completing presentence investigations or
risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community; and
(v))) (b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the
purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10)(a) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person,
when the identity of the person is known to the public or private
agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to
have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may
designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure
shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public or
private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or
unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only such other
information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The
decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached in good
faith and without gross negligence.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(11)(a) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 and section 2 of
this act for the purposes described in ((that)) those sections.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(3)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) Upon the death of a person, his or her next of kin, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent shall be notified
under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
shall be governed by RCW 70.02.140.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.
(16) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient.
(17) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as
are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(18) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of
((RCW 71.05.390)) this section and disclosure is necessary for the
protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized
disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown,
notice of such disappearance, along with relevant information, may be
made to relatives, the department of corrections when the person is
under the supervision of the department, and governmental law
enforcement agencies designated by the physician in charge of the
patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or
her professional designee.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the uniform health
care information act, chapter 70.02 RCW, applies to all records and
information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services.
(19) The fact of admission, as well as all records, files,
evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained
pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any
legal proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of
the person who was the subject of the proceeding except as provided in
section 2 of this act, in a subsequent criminal prosecution of a person
committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) on charges
that were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency
to stand trial, in a civil commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter
71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor, a guardianship or dependency
proceeding. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding
pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential and available subsequent
to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject of the
proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order
the subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good
cause shown if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict
confidentiality are and will be maintained.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.445 and 2005 c 504 s 711 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.
(b) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as
defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receives funding from public sources.
This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.05.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or
community mental health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and
facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under
chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2)(a) Information related to mental health services delivered to
a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW shall be released, upon
request, by a mental health service provider to department of
corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary to carry
out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be
provided only for the purposes of completing presentence investigations
or risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community. The request shall be in writing and shall not require
the consent of the subject of the records.
(b) If an offender subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW has failed
to report for department of corrections supervision or in the event of
an emergent situation that poses a significant risk to the public or
the offender, information related to mental health services delivered
to the offender and, if known, information regarding where the offender
is likely to be found shall be released by the mental health services
provider to the department of corrections upon request. The initial
request may be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently
confirmed in writing. Information released in response to an oral
request is limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is
not being treated by the mental health services provider and the
address or information about the location or whereabouts of the
offender. Information released in response to a written request may
include information identified by rule as provided in subsections (4)
and (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection a written
request includes requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the
requesting person at the department of corrections is clearly
identified. The request must specify the information being requested.
Disclosure of the information requested does not require the consent of
the subject of the records unless the offender has received relief from
disclosure under RCW 9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or 71.05.132.
(3)))(a) When a mental health service provider conducts its initial
assessment for a person receiving court-ordered treatment, the service
provider shall inquire and shall be told by the offender whether he or
she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections.
(b) When a person receiving court-ordered treatment or treatment
ordered by the department of corrections discloses to his or her mental
health service provider that he or she is subject to supervision by the
department of corrections, the mental health services provider shall
notify the department of corrections that he or she is treating the
offender and shall notify the offender that his or her community
corrections officer will be notified of the treatment, provided that if
the offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW
9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or 71.05.132 and the offender has provided the
mental health services provider with a copy of the order granting
relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or
71.05.132, the mental health services provider is not required to
notify the department of corrections that the mental health services
provider is treating the offender. The notification may be written or
oral and shall not require the consent of the offender. If an oral
notification is made, it must be confirmed by a written notification.
For purposes of this section, a written notification includes
notification by e-mail or facsimile, so long as the notifying mental
health service provider is clearly identified.
(((4))) (2) The information to be released to the department of
corrections shall include all relevant records and reports, as defined
by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its
duties((, including those records and reports identified in subsection
(2) of this section)).
(((5))) (3) The department and the department of corrections, in
consultation with regional support networks, mental health service
providers as defined in ((subsection (1) of this section)) RCW
71.05.020, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with
mental illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
section related to the type and scope of information to be released.
These rules shall:
(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of
corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring
community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or
disclosing information of persons who received mental health services
as a minor; and
(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under
the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the
provisions of this section.
(((6))) (4) The information received by the department of
corrections under this section shall remain confidential and subject to
the limitations on disclosure outlined in chapter 71.05 RCW, except as
provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(((7))) (5) No mental health service provider or individual
employed by a mental health service provider shall be held responsible
for information released to or used by the department of corrections
under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this
section except under RCW 71.05.440.
(((8))) (6) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict
the release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(((9))) (7) This section does not modify the terms and conditions
of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(((10))) (8) The department shall, subject to available resources,
electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide
the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services,
and addresses of specific regional support networks and mental health
service providers that delivered mental health services to a person
subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between
the departments.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.630 and 2007 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, all treatment records
shall remain confidential and may be released only to the persons
designated in this section, or to other persons designated in an
informed written consent of the patient.
(2) Treatment records of a person may be released without informed
written consent in the following circumstances:
(a) To a person, organization, or agency as necessary for
management or financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation.
Information obtained under this subsection shall remain confidential
and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other
identifying information about the person whose records are being
released.
(b) To the department, the director of regional support networks,
or a qualified staff member designated by the director only when
necessary to be used for billing or collection purposes. The
information shall remain confidential.
(c) For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.
(d) Pursuant to lawful order of a court.
(e) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director
of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility. The information shall remain confidential.
(f) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons
employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in
supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to
perform their duties.
(g) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for
mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse
of persons who are under the supervision of the department.
(h) To a licensed physician who has determined that the life or
health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the
information contained in the treatment records could be injurious to
the patient's health. Disclosure shall be limited to the portions of
the records necessary to meet the medical emergency.
(i) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily
committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from
one treatment facility to another. The release of records under this
subsection shall be limited to the treatment records required by law,
a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary.
The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem,
the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and
recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's
complete treatment record.
(j) ((Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 71.05.390(7), to a
correctional facility or a corrections officer who is responsible for
the supervision of a person who is receiving inpatient or outpatient
evaluation or treatment. Except as provided in RCW 71.05.445 and
71.34.345, release of records under this section is limited to:
(i) An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision
plan.
(ii) The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all
somatic treatments, at the termination of any treatment provided as
part of the supervision plan.
(iii) When a person is returned from a treatment facility to a
correctional facility, the information provided under (j)(iv) of this
subsection.
(iv) Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in
the person's treatment plan or the level or kind of supervision as
determined by resource management services. In cases involving a
person transferred back to a correctional facility, disclosure shall be
made to clinical staff only.
(k))) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without
modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(((l))) (k) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency
or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose
of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental
disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services
may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county
of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient
was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and
place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of
a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's
appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional
information shall notify the patient's resource management services in
writing of the request and of the resource management services' right
to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the
guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain
the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not
obtain the additional information.
(((m))) (l) For purposes of coordinating health care, the
department may release without informed written consent of the patient,
information acquired for billing and collection purposes as described
in (b) of this subsection to all current treating providers of the
patient with prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for
the patient within the last twelve months. The department shall notify
the patient that billing and collection information has been released
to named providers, and provide the substance of the information
released and the dates of such release. The department shall not
release counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and
alcohol treatment information without a signed written release from the
client.
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department
may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with
federal law and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---