BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.05.170 and 1993 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that the mortality rate in Washington
state among infants and children less than eighteen years of age is
unacceptably high, and that such mortality may be preventable. The
legislature further finds that, through the performance of child
mortality reviews, preventable causes of child mortality can be
identified and addressed, thereby reducing the infant and child
mortality in Washington state.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the
performance of child death reviews by local health departments by
providing necessary legal protections to the families of children whose
deaths are studied, local health department officials and employees,
and health care professionals participating in child mortality review
committee activities.
(2) As used in this section, "child mortality review" means a
process authorized by a local health department as such department is
defined in RCW 70.05.010 for examining factors that contribute to
deaths of children less than eighteen years of age. The process may
include a systematic review of medical, clinical, and hospital records;
home interviews of parents and caretakers of children who have died;
analysis of individual case information; and review of this information
by a team of professionals in order to identify modifiable medical,
socioeconomic, public health, behavioral, administrative, educational,
and environmental factors associated with each death.
(3) Local health departments are authorized to conduct child
mortality reviews. In conducting such reviews, the following
provisions shall apply:
(a) All medical records, reports, and statements procured by,
furnished to, or maintained by a local health department pursuant to
chapter 70.02 RCW for purposes of a child mortality review are
confidential insofar as the identity of an individual child and his or
her adoptive or natural parents is concerned. Such records may be used
solely by local health departments for the purposes of the review.
This section does not prevent a local health department from publishing
statistical compilations and reports related to the child mortality
review, if such compilations and reports do not identify individual
cases and sources of information.
(b) Any records or documents supplied or maintained for the
purposes of a child mortality review are not subject to discovery or
subpoena in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding related
to the death of a child reviewed. This provision shall not restrict or
limit the discovery or subpoena from a health care provider of records
or documents maintained by such health care provider in the ordinary
course of business, whether or not such records or documents may have
been supplied to a local health department pursuant to this section.
(c) Any summaries or analyses of records, documents, or records of
interviews prepared exclusively for purposes of a child mortality
review are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or introduction into
evidence in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding related
to the death of a child reviewed.
(d) No local health department official or employee, and no members
of technical committees established to perform case reviews of selected
child deaths may be examined in any administrative, civil, or criminal
proceeding as to the existence or contents of documents assembled,
prepared, or maintained for purposes of a child mortality review.
(e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit or restrict any
person from reporting suspected child abuse or neglect under chapter
26.44 RCW nor to limit access to or use of any records, documents,
information, or testimony in any civil or criminal action arising out
of any report made pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW.
(4) The department shall assist local health departments to collect
the reports of any child mortality reviews conducted by local health
departments and assist with entering the reports into a database to the
extent that the data is not protected under subsection (3) of this
section. Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall respond to any requests for data from the database to
the extent permitted for health care information under chapter 70.02
RCW. In addition, the department shall provide technical assistance to
local health departments and child death review coordinators conducting
child mortality reviews and encourage communication among child death
review teams. The department shall conduct these activities using only
federal and private funding.

--- END ---