BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public health is
a core function of state government. The local health jurisdictions in
Washington state's decentralized public health system depend on a
combination of federal, state, and local funding. This funding system
can make public health funding unstable on the local level and can
adversely affect the public health services available to the citizens
of the state. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to help
provide local health jurisdictions with a more stable dedicated funding
system by authorizing local option revenue sources and creating a
single account through which all state funding for public health will
be distributed. The legislature further intends that local health
jurisdictions receiving state funds be held accountable for the use of
those funds based on the minimum standards of public health protection
in the state's public health improvement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, a county may
impose a tax on the acquisition, receipt, or possession of bottled
water in the county.
(2) The rate of tax may not exceed five cents per twelve ounces of
bottled water.
(3) For sales to a final consumer, a retailer or wholesaler may not
separately state the tax under this section from the selling price in
any sales receipt or sales invoice or other instrument of sale.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
wholesaler who sells bottled water to a retailer shall collect the tax
from the retailer and remit the tax to the county.
(b) If a retailer has received or otherwise obtained bottled water
upon which the tax imposed by a county under this section has not been
collected by a wholesaler, then the retailer is liable for the tax and
the retailer shall remit the tax directly to the county.
(c) If a wholesaler sells bottled water to a final consumer, then
the wholesaler is liable for the tax and the wholesaler shall remit the
tax directly to the county.
(5) The provisions a county adopts to administer the tax must be
consistent with all requirements under this section.
(6) Taxes collected under this section must be used for core public
health functions of statewide significance within the county.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Bottled water" means water safe for human consumption that is
sealed in bottles. "Bottled water" does not include any beverage
defined as a soft drink in RCW 82.08.0293.
(b) "Core public health functions of statewide significance" has
the same meaning as in RCW 43.70.514.
(c) "Final consumer" means a person who purchases for use or
consumption, and not resale.
(d) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) "Retailer" means a person who engages in the business of
selling bottled water in a retail sale.
(f) "Retail sale" means a sale of bottled water to a final
consumer.
(g) "Sale" means any transfer of the ownership of, title to, or
possession of property for valuable consideration.
(h) "Wholesaler" means any person who engages in the business of
selling or supplying water to any person for resale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The public health improvement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, during
the month of January 2010, and every January thereafter, the state
treasurer shall distribute the account's annual receipts to each local
health jurisdiction in the state to be used for core public health
functions of statewide significance. The state treasurer shall
distribute the moneys required under this subsection as follows:
(a) Each local health jurisdiction shall receive a base level of
funding of one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) The remainder of the funds to be distributed under this
subsection (2) shall be distributed among the jurisdictions on a per
capita basis.
(3) The state treasurer may not distribute funds to a local health
jurisdiction under subsection (2)(a) of this section if he or she
receives notice from the secretary of health, under RCW 43.70.516, that
the jurisdiction is not in substantial compliance with the minimum
standards for public health protection established under RCW 43.70.520.
The state treasurer shall retain funds withheld under this subsection
until he or she receives notification from the secretary, under RCW
43.70.516, that the jurisdiction has achieved substantial compliance.
(4) A local health jurisdiction may use funds provided under this
section to supplant other funding sources for public health programs.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Per capita basis" means the amount multiplied by the
proportion of the population of the jurisdiction in the previous
calendar year to the population of the state in the previous calendar
year.
(b) "Population" means the number of persons as last determined by
the office of financial management. If the jurisdiction is comprised
of a single county, "population" means the number of persons in that
county. If the jurisdiction is comprised of two or more counties,
"population" means the number of persons in all counties of which the
jurisdiction is comprised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall establish a review process for determining
whether a local health jurisdiction is in substantial compliance with
the minimum standards for public health protection established under
RCW 43.70.520.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
secretary shall use the process established in subsection (1) of this
section to review each local health jurisdiction in the state at least
once every three years.
(3)(a) If the secretary finds that a local health jurisdiction is
not in substantial compliance with the minimum standards for public
health protection, he or she shall notify the local health jurisdiction
in writing.
(b) A local health jurisdiction receiving written notice under this
subsection shall submit a plan of correction within sixty days. The
plan of correction must explain the measures that the jurisdiction will
undertake to achieve substantial compliance with the standards within
one hundred eighty days.
(c) If the secretary determines that the plan of correction is
likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial compliance within one
hundred eighty days, he or she shall provide technical assistance to
the jurisdiction to help it to successfully complete the plan of
correction. If the secretary determines that the plan of correction is
not likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial compliance within
one hundred eighty days, he or she shall reject the plan of correction
and allow the jurisdiction to revise and resubmit the plan within
fifteen days. If the secretary finds that the revised plan of
correction is not likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial
compliance within one hundred eighty days, or if the jurisdiction does
not resubmit a revised plan within fifteen days, he or she shall send
notice to the state treasurer that the jurisdiction is out of
substantial compliance under subsection (4) of this section.
(d) The secretary shall review a local health jurisdiction with an
approved plan of correction one hundred eighty days after the approved
plan's submission. If the secretary finds that the jurisdiction
remains out of substantial compliance after the review required by this
subsection (3)(d), he or she shall send notice to the state treasurer
that the jurisdiction is out of substantial compliance under subsection
(4) of this section.
(4)(a) The secretary shall notify the state treasurer when the
secretary finds, under subsections (3)(c) or (d) of this section, that
a local health jurisdiction is out of substantial compliance
established under RCW 43.70.520. Upon notification under this
subsection, the state treasurer shall suspend any distributions made to
the jurisdiction under section 3 of this act until the secretary sends
notice that the jurisdiction is back in substantial compliance.
(b) The secretary shall review, using the process established under
subsection (1) of this section, a jurisdiction subject to suspension
under (a) of this subsection no sooner than one hundred eighty days
after notice of suspension was sent to the state treasurer. If the
secretary finds that the jurisdiction remains out of substantial
compliance, the secretary shall continue the suspension and review the
jurisdiction at intervals of at least one hundred eighty days until the
secretary finds that the jurisdiction is in substantial compliance.
Once the secretary finds that the jurisdiction is in substantial
compliance after a review under this subsection, he or she shall notify
the state treasurer, who shall immediately resume the distributions
required under section 3 of this act and distribute any moneys the
jurisdiction should have received during the period of suspension.
(5) The secretary may exempt a local health jurisdiction from the
review process required by this section if the jurisdiction is
accredited by an organization whose accreditation standards meet or
exceed the minimum standards for public health protection established
under RCW 43.70.520.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.70.514 and 2007 c 259 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout ((sections 60
through 65 of this act)) this section and RCW 43.70.516 and 43.70.518
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Core public health functions of statewide significance" or
"public health functions" means health services that:
(a) Address: Communicable disease prevention and response;
preparation for, and response to, public health emergencies caused by
pandemic disease, earthquake, flood, or terrorism; prevention and
management of chronic diseases and disabilities; promotion of healthy
families and the development of children; assessment of local health
conditions, risks, and trends, and evaluation of the effectiveness of
intervention efforts; and environmental health concerns;
(b) Promote uniformity in the public health activities conducted by
all local health jurisdictions in the public health system, increase
the overall strength of the public health system, or apply to broad
public health efforts; and
(c) If left neglected or inadequately addressed, are reasonably
likely to have a significant adverse impact on counties beyond the
borders of the local health jurisdiction.
(2) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.70.516 and 2007 c 259 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department shall accomplish the tasks included in
subsection (2) of this section by utilizing the expertise of varied
interests, as provided in this subsection.
(a) In addition to the perspectives of local health jurisdictions,
the state board of health, the Washington health foundation, and
department staff that are currently engaged in development of the
public health services improvement plan under RCW 43.70.520, the
secretary shall actively engage:
(i) Individuals or entities with expertise in the development of
performance measures, accountability and systems management, such as
the University of Washington school of public health and community
medicine, and experts in the development of evidence-based medical
guidelines or public health practice guidelines; and
(ii) Individuals or entities who will be impacted by performance
measures developed under this section and have relevant expertise, such
as community clinics, public health nurses, large employers, tribal
health providers, family planning providers, and physicians.
(b) In developing the performance measures, consideration shall be
given to levels of performance necessary to promote uniformity in core
public health functions of statewide significance among all local
health jurisdictions, best scientific evidence, national standards of
performance, and innovations in public health practice. The
performance measures shall be developed to meet the goals and outcomes
in RCW 43.70.512. The office of the state auditor shall provide advice
and consultation to the committee to assist in the development of
effective performance measures and health status indicators.
(c) On or before November 1, 2007, the experts assembled under this
section shall provide recommendations to the secretary related to the
activities and services that qualify as core public health functions of
statewide significance and performance measures. The secretary shall
provide written justification for any departure from the
recommendations.
(2))) By January 1, 2008, the department shall((:
(a))) adopt a prioritized list of activities and services performed
by local health jurisdictions that qualify as core public health
functions of statewide significance as defined in RCW 43.70.514((; and
(b) Adopt appropriate performance measures with the intent of
improving health status indicators applicable to the core public health
functions of statewide significance that local health jurisdictions
must provide)).
(((3))) (2) The secretary may revise the list of activities ((and
the performance measures)) in future years as appropriate. Prior to
modifying ((either)) the list ((or the performance measures)), the
secretary must provide a written explanation of the rationale for such
changes.
(((4) The department and the local health jurisdictions shall abide
by the prioritized list of activities and services and the performance
measures developed pursuant to this section.
(5) The department, in consultation with representatives of county
governments, shall provide local jurisdictions with financial
incentives to encourage and increase local investments in core public
health functions. The local jurisdictions shall not supplant existing
local funding with such state-incented resources.))

Sec. 7 RCW 43.70.518 and 2007 c 259 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning November 15, ((2009)) 2010, the department shall report
to the legislature and the governor annually on the distribution of
funds to local health jurisdictions under ((sections 60 through 65 of))
this act and the use of those funds. The ((initial)) reports must
discuss the ((performance measures adopted by the secretary and any
impact the funding in chapter 259, Laws of 2007 has had on local health
jurisdiction performance and health status indicators. Future reports
shall evaluate)) minimum standards for public health protection
established under RCW 43.70.520 and any impact the funding provided in
this act has had on local health jurisdictions' ability to meet those
standards as well as trends in performance over time and the effects of
expenditures on performance over time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.70.512 (Public health -- Required measurable outcomes) and
2007 c 259 s 60; and
(2) RCW 43.70.522 (Public health performance measures -- Assessing
the use of funds -- Secretary's duties) and 2007 c 259 s 65.

--- END ---