BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.082 and 2003 c 86 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee shall comply with all applicable state and federal
laws when collecting a delinquent small loan. A licensee may charge a
one-time fee as determined in rule by the director to any borrower in
default on any loan or loans where the borrower's check has been
returned unpaid by the financial institution upon which it was drawn.
A licensee may take civil action under Title 62A RCW to collect upon a
check that has been dishonored. If the licensee takes civil action, a
licensee may charge the borrower the cost of collection as allowed
under RCW 62A.3-515, but may not collect attorneys' fees or any other
interest or damages as allowed under RCW 62A.3-515. A licensee may not
threaten criminal prosecution as a method of collecting a delinquent
small loan or threaten to take any legal action against the borrower
which the licensee may not legally take.
(2) Unless invited by the borrower, a licensee may not visit a
borrower's residence or place of employment for the purpose of
collecting a delinquent small loan. A licensee may not impersonate a
law enforcement official, or make any statements which might be
construed as indicating an official connection with any federal, state,
county, or city law enforcement agency, or any other governmental
agency, while engaged in collecting a small loan.
(3) A licensee may not communicate with a borrower in such a manner
as to harass, intimidate, abuse, or embarrass a borrower, including but
not limited to communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable
frequency, by threats of force or violence, or by use of offensive
language. A communication shall be presumed to have been made for the
purposes of harassment if it is initiated by the licensee for the
purposes of collection and:
(a) It is made with a borrower or spouse in any form, manner, or
place, more than three times in a single week;
(b) It is made with a borrower at his or her place of employment
more than one time in a single week or made to a borrower after the
licensee has been informed that the borrower's employer prohibits such
communications;
(c) It is made with the borrower or spouse at his or her place of
residence between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.; or
(d) It is made to a party other than the borrower, the borrower's
attorney, the licensee's attorney, or a consumer reporting agency if
otherwise permitted by law except for purposes of acquiring location or
contact information about the borrower.
(4) A licensee is required to maintain a communication log of all
telephone and written communications with a borrower initiated by the
licensee regarding any collection efforts including date, time, and the
nature of each communication.
(5) If a dishonored check is assigned to any third party for
collection, this section applies to the third party for the collection
of the dishonored check.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "communication" includes any
contact with a borrower, initiated by the licensee, in person, by
telephone, or in writing (including e-mails, text messages, and other
electronic writing) regarding the collection of a delinquent small
loan, but does not include any of the following:
(a) Communication while a borrower is physically present in the
licensee's place of business;
(b) An unanswered telephone call in which no message (other than a
caller ID) is left, unless the telephone call violates subsection
(3)(c) of this section; and
(c) An initial letter to the borrower that includes disclosures
intended to comply with the federal fair debt collection practices act.
(7) For the purposes of this section, (a) a communication occurs at
the time it is initiated by a licensee regardless of the time it is
received or accessed by the borrower, and (b) a call to a number that
the licensee reasonably believes is the borrower's cell phone will not
constitute a communication with a borrower at the borrower's place of
employment.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "week" means a series of
seven consecutive days beginning on a Sunday.

--- END ---