BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "FHA-approved reverse mortgage" means a "home equity conversion
mortgage" or other reverse mortgage product guaranteed or insured by
the federal department of housing and urban development.
(2) "Owner-occupied residence" is the borrower's residence and
includes a life estate property the legal title for which is held in
the name of the borrower in a reverse mortgage transaction or in the
name of a trust, provided the occupant of the property is the
beneficiary of that trust.
(3) "Proprietary reverse mortgage loan" is any reverse mortgage
loan product that is not a home equity conversion mortgage loan or
other federally guaranteed or insured loan.
(4) "Reverse mortgage broker or lender" means a licensee under the
Washington state consumer loan act, chapter 31.04 RCW, or a person
exempt from licensing pursuant to federal law.
(5) "Reverse mortgage loan" means a nonrecourse consumer credit
obligation in which:
(a) A mortgage, deed of trust, or equivalent consensual security
interest securing one or more advances is created in the borrower's
dwelling;
(b) Any principal, interest, or shared appreciation or equity is
due and payable, other than in the case of default, only after:
(i) The consumer dies;
(ii) The dwelling is transferred; or
(iii) The consumer ceases to occupy the dwelling as a dwelling; and
(c) The broker or lender is licensed under Washington state law or
exempt from licensing under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) For purposes of sections 1 through 9 of
this act, in addition to any other requirements, licensees must comply
with the following requirements before offering proprietary reverse
mortgage loans:
(a) Maintain an irrevocable standby letter of credit approved by
the director from a financial institution approved by the director in
favor of the licensee in an amount necessary to fund all reverse
mortgage loan requirements anticipated over the next twelve months for
loans then on the licensee's books and those expected to be made over
the next twelve months or three million dollars, whichever is greater.
The initial term of the letter of credit must be at least two years.
(b) The financial institution that provides the letter of credit as
required in (a) of this subsection may not be affiliated with the
licensee.
(c) A licensee with a rating of either 4A1 or 5A1 from Dun &
Bradstreet credit services for three consecutive years is exempt from
the requirements set forth in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The licensee shall maintain a minimum capital of ten million
dollars.
(3) A licensee may rely on the capital of its parent to satisfy the
requirement of subsection (2) of this section. However, for any year
in which a licensee seeks to so rely, it shall provide to the director
a certified financial statement of the parent showing a net worth of at
least one hundred million dollars as of the close of its most recent
fiscal year and a binding written commitment from the parent to the
licensee to make a minimum of ten million dollars available to the
licensee as a capital contribution in connection with its reverse
mortgage lending program.
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to a
licensee that:
(a) Only originates proprietary reverse mortgage loans the proceeds
of which are fully disbursed at the loan closing; or
(b) Only originates proprietary reverse mortgage loans that are
sold into the secondary market to an investor with either a 4A1 or 5A1
rating from Dun & Bradstreet credit services. A licensee that makes
such a sale shall obtain a written commitment to purchase the loans
from the investor prior to closing and shall arrange for the delivery
of the loans to the investor within ten days of the loan closing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of financial institutions has
specific authority to develop rules regarding the interpretation and
implementation of this section. A proprietary reverse mortgage loan
must comply with all of the following requirements:
(1) For the purposes of this section prepayment, in whole or in
part, or the refinancing of a reverse mortgage loan, is permitted
without penalty at any time during the term of the reverse mortgage
loan. For the purposes of this section, penalty does not include any
fees, payments, or other charges, not including interest, that would
have otherwise been due upon the reverse mortgage being due and
payable. However, when a reverse mortgage lender has paid or waived
all of the usual fees or costs associated with a reverse mortgage loan,
a prepayment penalty may be imposed, provided the penalty does not
exceed the total amount of the usual fees or costs that were initially
absorbed or waived by the reverse mortgage lender. A mortgagee may not
impose a prepayment penalty under this subsection if the prepayment is
caused by the occurrence of the death of the borrowers. A borrower
must be provided prior written notice of any permissible prepayment
penalty under this section;
(2) A reverse mortgage loan may provide for a fixed or adjustable
interest rate or combination thereof, including compound interest, and
may also provide for interest that is contingent on the value of the
property upon execution of the loan or at maturity, or on changes in
value between closing and maturity;
(3) The lender shall pay a late charge to the borrower for any late
advance. If the lender does not mail or electronically transfer a
scheduled monthly advance to the borrower on the first business day of
the month, or within five business days of the date the lender receives
the request, or such other regularly scheduled contractual date, the
late charge is ten percent of the entire amount that should have been
paid to the borrower for that month or as a result of that request.
For each additional day that the lender fails to make the advance, the
lender shall pay interest on the late advance at the interest rate
stated in the loan documents. If the loan documents provide for an
adjustable interest rate, the rate in effect when the late charge first
accrues is used. Any late charge is paid from the lender's funds and
may not be added to the unpaid principal balance. Additionally, the
lender forfeits the right to interest and a monthly servicing fee for
any months in which the advance has not been timely made. This section
does not affect the department of financial institution's ability to
impose other sanctions to protect consumers of reverse mortgage loans;
(4) The reverse mortgage loan may become due and payable upon the
occurrence of any one of the following events:
(a) The home securing the loan is sold or title to the home is
otherwise transferred;
(b) All borrowers cease occupying the home as a principal
residence, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section; or
(c) A defaulting event occurs which is specified in the loan
documents;
(5) Repayment of the reverse mortgage loan is subject to the
following additional conditions:
(a) Temporary absences from the home not exceeding one hundred
eighty consecutive days do not cause the mortgage to become due and
payable;
(b) Extended absences from the home exceeding one hundred eighty
consecutive days, but less than one year, do not cause the mortgage to
become due and payable if the borrower has taken prior action that
secures and protects the home in a manner satisfactory to the lender,
as specified in the loan documents;
(c) The lender's right to collect reverse mortgage loan proceeds is
subject to the applicable statute of limitations for written loan
contracts. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the statute of
limitations shall commence on the date that the reverse mortgage loan
becomes due and payable as provided in the loan agreement; and
(d) Using conspicuous, bold sixteen-point or larger type, the
lender shall disclose in the loan agreement any interest rate or other
fees to be charged during the period that commences on the date that
the reverse mortgage loan becomes due and payable, and that ends when
repayment in full is made;
(6) The first page of any deed of trust securing a reverse mortgage
loan must contain the following statement in sixteen-point boldface
type: "This deed of trust secures a reverse mortgage loan;"
(7) A lender or any other party that participates in the
origination of a reverse mortgage loan shall not require an applicant
for a reverse mortgage to purchase an annuity, insurance, or another
product as a condition of obtaining a reverse mortgage loan. A reverse
mortgage lender or a broker arranging a reverse mortgage loan shall
not:
(a) Offer an annuity to the borrower prior to the closing of the
reverse mortgage or before the expiration of the right of the borrower
to rescind the reverse mortgage agreement;
(b) Refer the borrower to anyone for the purchase of an annuity
prior to the closing of the reverse mortgage or before the expiration
of the right of the borrower to rescind the reverse mortgage agreement;
or
(c) Provide marketing information or annuity sales leads to anyone
regarding the prospective borrower or borrower, or receive any
compensation for such an annuity sale or referral;
(8)(a) A lender or any other party that participates in the
origination of a reverse mortgage loan shall maintain safeguards,
acceptable to the department of financial institutions, to ensure that
individuals offering reverse mortgage loans do not provide reverse
mortgage borrowers with any other financial or insurance products and
that individuals participating in the origination of a reverse mortgage
loan have no ability or incentive to provide the borrower with any
other financial or insurance product;
(b) The borrower shall not be required, directly or indirectly, as
a condition of obtaining a reverse mortgage under this section, to
purchase any other financial or insurance products;
(9) Prior to accepting a final and complete application for a
reverse mortgage loan or assessing any fees, a lender shall refer the
prospective borrower to an independent housing counseling agency
approved by the federal department of housing and urban development for
counseling. The counseling must meet the standards and requirements
established by the federal department of housing and urban development
for reverse mortgage counseling. The lender shall provide the borrower
with a list of at least five independent housing counseling agencies
approved by the federal department of housing and urban development,
including at least two agencies that can provide counseling by
telephone. Telephone counseling is only available at the borrower's
request;
(10) A lender shall not accept a final and complete application for
a reverse mortgage loan from a prospective applicant or assess any fees
upon a prospective applicant without first receiving a certification
from the applicant or the applicant's authorized representative that
the applicant has received counseling from an agency as described in
subsection (9) of this section. The certification must be signed by
the borrower and the agency counselor, and must include the date of the
counseling and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of both the
counselor and the borrower. Electronic facsimile copy of the housing
counseling certification satisfies the requirements of this subsection.
The lender shall maintain the certification in an accurate,
reproducible, and accessible format for the term of the reverse
mortgage;
(11) A reverse mortgage loan may not be made for a Washington state
resident unless that resident is a minimum of sixty years of age as of
the date of execution of the loan; and
(12) Except for the initial disbursement of moneys to the closing
agent, advances by the lender to the borrower must be issued directly
to the borrower, or his or her legal representative, and not to an
intermediary or third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The borrower in a proprietary reverse
mortgage transaction has the same right to rescind the transaction as
provided in the truth in lending act, Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) This section does not apply to a home
equity conversion mortgage or other federally administered reverse
mortgage product. A proprietary reverse mortgage loan product may not
be offered without preapproval by the department of financial
institutions.
(2) The director may make rules regarding the preapproval process,
and may require any documentation, information, standards, or data
deemed necessary by the director. The director may disapprove any
proprietary reverse mortgage loan products that contain or incorporate
by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous, or misleading provisions or
terms, or exceptions and conditions which unreasonably or deceptively
affect the reverse mortgage contract. Additional grounds for
disapproval may include, without limitation, the existence in the
proprietary product of any benefits provided to the borrower that are
contrary to public policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A proprietary reverse mortgage loan
application may not be taken by a lender unless the loan applicant has
received from the lender the following plain language statement in
conspicuous bold sixteen-point type or larger, advising the prospective
borrower about counseling prior to obtaining the reverse mortgage loan
within three business days of receipt of the completed loan
application:

"Important notice to reverse mortgage loan applicant
A reverse mortgage is a complex financial transaction that provides
a means of using the equity you have built up in your home, or the
value of your home, as a way to access home equity.
If you decide to obtain a reverse mortgage loan, you will sign
binding legal documents that will have important legal, tax, and
financial implications for you and your estate.
It is very important for you to understand the terms of the reverse
mortgage and its effect. Before entering into this transaction, you
are required by law to consult with an independent loan counselor. A
list of approved counselors will be provided to you by the lender or
broker. You may also want to discuss your decision with family members
or others on whom you rely for financial advice."

(2) As part of the disclosure required under this section, the
lender or servicer shall provide an annual, or more frequent,
disclosure statement to the borrower, providing details of the loan
advances, balance, other terms, and the name and telephone number of
the lender's employee or agent who has been specifically designated to
respond to inquiries concerning reverse mortgage loans.
(3) In addition to any other loan documentation or disclosure,
prior to execution of the loan and at the end of the loan term, the
lender may either obtain an independent appraisal of the property value
or use the current year's tax assessment valuation of the property.
Copies of these appraisals must be timely provided to the borrower
within five days of the borrower's written request, provided the
borrower has paid for the appraisal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In addition to any other remedies, if a
lender defaults on any of the reverse mortgage loan terms and fails to
cure an actual default after notice as specified in the loan documents,
the borrower, or the borrower's estate, is entitled to treble damages.
(2) An arrangement, transfer, or lien subject to this chapter is
not invalidated solely because of the failure of a lender to comply
with any provision of this chapter. However, this section does not
preclude the application of any other existing civil remedies provided
by law.
(3) A violation of federal legal requirements for an FHA-approved
reverse mortgage as defined in section 1(1) of this act constitutes a
violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) To the extent that implementation of
this section does not conflict with federal law resulting in the loss
of federal funding, proprietary reverse mortgage loan advances made to
a borrower must be treated as proceeds from a loan and not as income
for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefits under means-tested programs of aid to individuals.
(2) Undisbursed reverse mortgage funds must be treated as equity in
the borrower's home and not as proceeds from a loan, resources, or
assets for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefits under
means-tested programs of aid to individuals.
(3) This section applies to any law or program relating to
payments, allowances, benefits, or services provided on a means-tested
basis by this state including, but not limited to, optional state
supplements to the federal supplemental security income program, low-income energy assistance, property tax relief, general assistance, and
medical assistance only to the extent this section does not conflict
with Title 19 of the federal social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The director of the department of financial
institutions may take the necessary steps to ensure that this act is
implemented on its effective date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act may be
known and cited as the Washington state reverse mortgage act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act are each
added to chapter 31.04 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"reverse mortgage lending."

Sec. 12 RCW 31.04.015 and 2001 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires a different meaning.
(1) "Person" includes individuals, partnerships, associations,
limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts,
corporations, and all other legal entities.
(2) "License" means a single license issued under the authority of
this chapter with respect to a single place of business.
(3) "Licensee" means a person to whom one or more licenses have
been issued.
(4) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(5) "Insurance" means life insurance, disability insurance,
property insurance, involuntary unemployment insurance, and such other
insurance as may be authorized by the insurance commissioner.
(6) "Add-on method" means the method of precomputing interest
payable on a loan whereby the interest to be earned is added to the
principal balance and the total plus any charges allowed under this
chapter is stated as the loan amount, without further provision for the
payment of interest except for failure to pay according to loan terms.
The director may adopt by rule a more detailed explanation of the
meaning and use of this method.
(7) "Simple interest method" means the method of computing interest
payable on a loan by applying the annual percentage interest rate or
its periodic equivalent to the unpaid balances of the principal of the
loan outstanding for the time outstanding with each payment applied
first to any unpaid penalties, fees, or charges, then to accumulated
interest, and the remainder of the payment applied to the unpaid
balance of the principal until paid in full. In using such method,
interest shall not be payable in advance nor compounded, except that on
a loan secured by real estate, a licensee may collect at the time of
the loan closing up to but not exceeding forty-five days of prepaid
interest. The prohibition on compounding interest does not apply to
reverse mortgage loans made in accordance with the Washington state
reverse mortgage act. The director may adopt by rule a more detailed
explanation of the meaning and use of this method.
(8) "Applicant" means a person applying for a license under this
chapter.
(9) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
licensee or person subject to this chapter in an effort to obtain or
seek information about obtaining a loan, regardless of whether that
person actually obtains such a loan.
(10) "Loan" means a sum of money lent at interest or for a fee or
other charge and includes both open-end and closed-end loan
transactions.
(11) "Loan originator" means a person employed, either directly or
indirectly, or retained as an independent contractor by a licensee, to
make or assist a person in applying to obtain a loan.
(12) "Making a loan" means closing a loan in a person's name, or
advancing, offering to advance, or making a commitment to advance funds
to a borrower for a loan.
(13) "Mortgage broker" means the same as defined in RCW 19.146.010,
except that for purposes of this chapter, a licensee or person subject
to this chapter cannot receive compensation as both a consumer loan
licensee making the loan and as a mortgage broker in the same loan
transaction.
(14) "Officer" means an official appointed by the company for the
purpose of making business decisions or corporate decisions.
(15) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, alone or in concert with
others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership; company;
association or corporation; or a limited liability company, and the
owner of a sole proprietorship.
(16) "Senior officer" means an officer of a licensee at the vice
president level or above.
(17) "Third party service provider" means any person other than the
licensee or a mortgage broker who provides goods or services to the
licensee or borrower in connection with the preparation of the
borrower's loan and includes, but is not limited to, credit reporting
agencies, real estate brokers or salespersons, title insurance
companies and agents, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or
escrow companies.

Sec. 13 RCW 31.04.115 and 1994 c 92 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "open-end loan" means an agreement
between a licensee and a borrower that expressly states that the loan
is made in accordance with this chapter and that provides that:
(a) A licensee may permit the borrower to obtain advances of money
from the licensee from time to time, or the licensee may advance money
on behalf of the borrower from time to time as directed by the
borrower;
(b) The amount of each advance and permitted charges and costs are
debited to the borrower's account, and payments and other credits are
credited to the same account;
(c) The charges are computed on the unpaid principal balance, or
balances, of the account from time to time; and
(d) The borrower has the privilege of paying the account in full at
any time without prepayment penalty or, if the account is not in
default, in monthly installments of fixed or determinable amounts as
provided in the agreement.
(2)(a) Interest charges on an open-end loan shall not exceed
twenty-five percent per annum computed in each billing cycle by any of
the following methods:
(((a))) (i) By converting the annual rate to a daily rate, and
multiplying the daily rate by the daily unpaid principal balance of the
account, in which case each daily rate is determined by dividing the
annual rate by three hundred sixty-five;
(((b))) (ii) By multiplying a monthly rate by the average daily
unpaid principal balance of the account in the billing cycle, in which
case the monthly rate is one-twelfth of the annual rate, and the
average daily unpaid principal balance is the sum of the amount unpaid
each day during the cycle divided by the number of days in the cycle;
or
(((c))) (iii) By converting the annual rate to a daily rate, and
multiplying the daily rate by the average daily unpaid principal
balance of the account in the billing cycle, in which case the daily
rate is determined by dividing the annual rate by three hundred sixty-five, and the average daily unpaid principal balance is the sum of the
amount unpaid each day during the cycle divided by the number of days
in the cycle.
For all of the methods of computation specified in this subsection
(2)(a), the billing cycle shall be monthly, and the unpaid principal
balance on any day shall be determined by adding to the balance unpaid,
as of the beginning of that day, all advances and other permissible
amounts charged to the borrower, and deducting all payments and other
credits made or received that day. A billing cycle is considered
monthly if the closing date of the cycle is on the same date each
month, or does not vary by more than four days from that date.
(b) Reverse mortgage loans made in accordance with the Washington
state reverse mortgage act are not subject to the interest charge
computation restrictions or billing cycle requirements in this section.
(3) In addition to the charges permitted under subsection (2) of
this section, the licensee may contract for and receive an annual fee,
payable each year in advance, for the privilege of opening and
maintaining an open-end loan account. Except as prohibited or limited
by this section, the licensee may also contract for and receive on an
open-end loan any additional charge permitted by this chapter on other
loans, subject to the conditions and restrictions otherwise pertaining
to those charges.
(4)(a) If credit life or credit disability insurance is provided,
the additional charge for credit life insurance or credit disability
insurance shall be calculated in each billing cycle by applying the
current monthly premium rate for the insurance, at the rate approved by
the insurance commissioner to the entire outstanding balances in the
borrower's open-end loan account, or so much thereof as the insurance
covers using any of the methods specified in subsection (2)(a) of this
section for the calculation of interest charges; and
(b) The licensee shall not cancel credit life or disability
insurance written in connection with an open-end loan because of
delinquency of the borrower in the making of the required minimum
payments on the loan, unless one or more of the payments is past due
for a period of ninety days or more; and the licensee shall advance to
the insurer the amounts required to keep the insurance in force during
that period, which amounts may be debited to the borrower's account.
(5) A security interest in real or personal property may be taken
to secure an open-end loan. Any such security interest may be retained
until the open-end account is terminated. The security interest shall
be promptly released if (a) there has been no outstanding balance in
the account for twelve months and the borrower either does not have or
surrenders the unilateral right to create a new outstanding balance; or
(b) the account is terminated at the borrower's request and paid in
full.
(6) The licensee may from time to time increase the rate of
interest being charged on the unpaid principal balance of the
borrower's open-end loans if the licensee mails or delivers written
notice of the change to the borrower at least thirty days before the
effective date of the increase unless the increase has been earlier
agreed to by the borrower. However, the borrower may choose to
terminate the open-end account and the licensee shall allow the
borrower to repay the unpaid balance incurred before the effective date
of the rate increase upon the existing open-end loan account terms and
interest rate unless the borrower incurs additional debt on or after
the effective date of the rate increase or otherwise agrees to the new
rate.
(7) The licensee shall deliver a copy of the open-end loan
agreement to the borrower at the time the open-end account is created.
The agreement must contain the name and address of the licensee and of
the principal borrower, and must contain such specific disclosures as
may be required by rule of the director. In adopting the rules the
director shall consider Regulation Z promulgated by the board of
governors of the federal reserve system under the federal consumer
credit protection act.
(8) Except in the case of an account that the licensee deems to be
uncollectible, or with respect to which delinquency collection
procedures have been instituted, the licensee shall deliver to the
borrower at the end of each billing cycle in which there is an
outstanding balance of more than one dollar in the account, or with
respect to which interest is imposed, a periodic statement in the form
required by the director. In specifying such form the director shall
consider Regulation Z promulgated by the board of governors of the
federal reserve system under the federal consumer credit protection
act.

--- END ---