BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.540 and 1992 c 139 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The examination of any specific public record may be enjoined
if, upon motion and affidavit by an agency or its representative or a
person who is named in the record or to whom the record specifically
pertains, the superior court for the county in which the movant resides
or in which the record is maintained, finds that such examination would
clearly not be in the public interest and would substantially and
irreparably damage any person, or would substantially and irreparably
damage vital governmental functions. An agency has the option of
notifying persons named in the record or to whom a record specifically
pertains, that release of a record has been requested. However, this
option does not exist where the agency is required by law to provide
such notice.
(2)(a) The examination and disclosure of any public record may be
enjoined if, upon motion and affidavit by an agency or its
representative or a person who is named in the record or to whom the
request specifically pertains, the court finds that the request, or
series of requests, was made for the purpose of harassing the agency,
its employees, the person who is named in the record, or the person to
whom the request specifically pertains.
(b) To determine whether a request or series of requests was made
for the purpose of harassment, the court may consider all relevant
factors, including, but not limited to:
(i) Any prior requests by the same requestor;
(ii) The types of records sought by the requestor;
(iii) Any statements by the requestor concerning the purpose for
the request or series of requests;
(iv) Whether the request or series of requests would substantially
damage any person, or would substantially damage vital governmental
functions; and
(v) Whether the request or series of requests seeks the production
of a significant and burdensome number of documents, except that the
repetitious nature of a request, without more, is not a sufficient
basis for an injunction.
(c) The action shall be filed in the superior court for the county
in which the record is maintained or in the Thurston county superior
court, and may be a summary proceeding based upon affidavits or
declarations, unless the court orders otherwise.
(d) The court may order that all or any part of the request, or
requests, shall be enjoined. The court may retain jurisdiction for
future requests by the same requestor for such period as the court
deems reasonable.
(e) The time period between a request to enjoin access to a public
record under this section and the court's ruling on that request is
exempt from penalty, attorneys' fees, or calculation of a daily fine
under RCW 42.56.550.
(3) As used in this section, "harassment" means requesting public
documents with the intent to cause an interruption or impairment of
government services or with the intent of annoying, tormenting, or
terrorizing any current or former government employee.

--- END ---