BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.250 and 2006 c 209 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment; ((and))
(6) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and employee
benefit information collected under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in
RCW 47.64.220(2); and
(7) Photographs and month and year of birth in the personnel files
of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5), shall have
access to the photographs and year of birth.

--- END ---