BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No school district employee may employ or use any person,
money, or property under the employee's official control or direction,
in his or her official custody, without authorization, for the private
benefit or gain of the employee or another.
(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to
benefit others as part of the employee's official duties.
(3) Each school district board of directors may adopt policies
providing exceptions to this section for occasional use of the
employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not result
in interference with the proper performance of public duties.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt disciplinary guidelines for violations of this section.

--- END ---