BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the cleaning
up of radioactive waste at the Hanford site is crucial to the
environment in this state. The legislature intends to include services
supporting the cleanup within the radioactive waste clean-up business
and occupation tax classification, but it is not the legislature's
intent to extend the radioactive waste clean-up classification to all
business activities conducted at the Hanford site or performed for
persons engaged in the performance of cleanup.
(2) It is the legislature's intent in enacting this legislation to
ensure that the radioactive waste clean-up business and occupation tax
classification applies to all services contributing to the performance
of a clean-up project at the Hanford site other than services that are
routinely provided to any business, including businesses that are not
engaged in clean-up activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.263 and 1996 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and
nuclear research and development; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the ((value of
the)) gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.471
percent.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "cleaning up radioactive
waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research
and development" means:
(a) The activities of handling, storing, treating, immobilizing,
stabilizing, or disposing of radioactive waste, radioactive tank waste
and capsules, nonradioactive hazardous solid and liquid wastes, or
spent nuclear fuel;
(b) Spent nuclear fuel conditioning;
(c) Removal of contamination in soils and groundwater;
(d) Decontamination and decommissioning of facilities; and
((activities integral and necessary to the direct performance of
cleanup))
(e) Services supporting the performance of cleanup. For the
purposes of this subsection (2)(e), a service supports the performance
of cleanup if it:
(i) Is within the scope of work under a clean-up contract with the
United States department of energy; or
(ii) Assists in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up
project undertaken by the United States department of energy under a
subcontract entered into with the prime contractor or another
subcontractor in furtherance of a clean-up contract between the United
States department of energy and a prime contractor.
(3) A service does not assist in the accomplishment of a
requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States
department of energy if the same services are routinely provided to
businesses not engaged in clean-up activities, except that the
following services are always deemed to contribute to the
accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the
United States department of energy:
(a) Information technology and computer support services;
(b) Services rendered in respect to infrastructure; and
(c) Security, safety, and health services.
(4) The legislature intends that the examples provided in this
subsection be used as a guideline when determining whether a service is
"routinely provided to businesses not engaged in clean-up activities"
as that phrase is used in subsection (3) of this section.
(a) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to
general accounting services but does apply to performance audits
performed for persons cleaning up radioactive waste.
(b) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to
general legal services but does apply to those legal services that
assist in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project
undertaken by the United States department of energy. Thus, legal
services provided to contest any local, state, or federal tax liability
or to defend a company against a workers' compensation claim arising
from a worksite injury do not qualify for the radioactive waste clean-up classification. But legal services related to the resolution of a
contractual dispute between the parties to a clean-up contract between
the United States department of energy and a prime contractor do
qualify.
(c) General office janitorial services do not qualify for the
radioactive waste clean-up classification, but the specialized cleaning
of equipment exposed to radioactive waste does qualify.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2009, and
applies prospectively only to activities occurring on or after October
1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---