BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and
related rules adopted by the department unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Deliver" or "delivery" means arrival at a place or port, and
includes arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and
arrivals ashore from offshore waters.
(2) "Pacific sardine" and "pilchard" means the species Sardinops
sagax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A Washington sardine purse seine fishery license or temporary
annual fishery permit is required to use purse seine gear to fish for
or possess Pacific sardines in offshore waters. This requirement does
not affect persons authorized to fish for or possess sardines in
offshore waters under a valid Oregon or California license or permit.
(2) A Washington sardine purse seine fishery license or temporary
annual fishery permit is required to deliver Pacific sardines into the
state.
(3) Washington sardine purse seine fishery licenses and temporary
annual fishery permits require vessel designation under RCW 77.65.100.
(4) Pacific sardines may not be taken or retained in state waters
except for incidental harvest authorized by rule of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license:
(a) May only be issued to a person that held a coastal pilchard
experimental fishery permit in 2008, except as otherwise provided in
this section;
(b) Must be renewed annually to remain active; and
(c) Subject to the restrictions of subsections (6) and (7) of this
section and RCW 77.65.040, is transferable.
(2) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license may be
issued to any person that held a coastal pilchard experimental fishery
permit in 2005, 2006, or 2007 and is precluded from qualifying under
subsection (1) of this section because the vessel designated on the
permit sank prior to 2008.
(3) Beginning in 2010, after taking into consideration the status
of the Pacific sardine population, the impact of removal of sardines
and other forage fish to the marine ecosystem, including the effect on
endangered marine species, and the market for Pacific sardines in the
state, the director may issue:
(a) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license to any
person provided that the issuance would not raise the number of
licenses beyond the number initially issued in 2009;
(b) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine temporary annual
fishery permit to any person if the combined number of active
Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery licenses and annual
temporary permits already issued during the year is less than twenty-five.
(4) The annual fee for a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine
fishery license is one hundred eighty-five dollars for residents and
two hundred ninety-five dollars for nonresidents.
(5) The fee for a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine temporary
annual fishery permit is one hundred eighty-five dollars for residents
and two hundred ninety-five dollars for nonresidents. A temporary
annual fishery permit expires at the end of the calendar year in which
the permit is issued.
(6) Only a person who owns or operates the vessel designated on the
license or permit may hold a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine
fishery license or temporary annual fishery permit.
(7) A person may not own or hold an ownership interest in more than
two Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery licenses.
(8) The director shall adopt rules that require a person fishing
under a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license or a
temporary annual permit to minimize by-catch, and to the extent
by-catch cannot be avoided, to minimize the mortality of such by-catch.
(9) The director shall report annually to the legislature on the
amount of lost and derelict gear that remains in Washington waters as
a result of purse seine fisheries and the effects that gear has caused
on the marine ecosystem.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.65.200 and 2000 c 107 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required
for food fish fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. As
used in this section, "food fish" does not include salmon. The
director may issue a limited-entry commercial fishery license only to
a person who meets the qualifications established in applicable
governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a) Baitfish Lampara $185 $295 Yes No

(b) Baitfish purse seine $530 $985 Yes No

(c) Bottom fish jig $130 $185 Yes No

(d) Bottom fish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(e) Bottom fish troll $130 $185 Yes No

(f) Carp $130 $185 No No

(g) Columbia river
smelt $380 $685 No No

(h) Dog fish set net $130 $185 Yes No

(i) Emerging
commercial
fishery (RCW
77.70.160 and
77.65.400) $185 $295 Determined
by rule Determined
by rule

(j) Food fish drag seine $130 $185 Yes No

(k) Food fish set line $130 $185 Yes No

(l) Food fish trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(m) Food fish trawl- $185 $295 Yes No

Puget Sound

(n) Herring dip bag net $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(o) Herring drag seine $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(p) Herring gill net $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(q) Herring Lampara $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(r) Herring purse seine $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(s) Herring spawn-on-kelp (RCW
77.70.210) N/A N/A Yes Yes

(t) Sardine purse seine
(section 2 of this
act) $185 $295 Yes Yes

(u) Sardine purse seine
temporary
(section 2 of this
act) $185 $295 Yes No

(v) Smelt dip bag net $130 $185 No No

(((u))) (w) Smelt gill
net $380 $685 Yes No

(((v))) (x) Whiting-Puget
Sound (RCW
77.70.130) $295 $520
Yes
Yes

(2) The director may by rule determine the species of food fish
that may be taken with the commercial fishery licenses established in
this section, the gear that may be used with the licenses, and the
areas or waters in which the licenses may be used. Where a fishery
license has been established for a particular species, gear,
geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general fishery
license may not be used to take food fish in that fishery.

--- END ---