BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The fish and wildlife equipment revolving account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. The department must reimburse the
account for all moneys expended from the account. Reimbursements may
be made with moneys appropriated to the department or from other moneys
otherwise available to the department. All moneys generated by the use
or repair of vehicles, water vessels, and heavy equipment or generated
by the sale or surplusing of vehicles, water vessels, and heavy
equipment must be deposited in the account. The department's
reimbursements may be prorated over the useful life of the vehicle,
water vessel, or heavy equipment acquired with moneys from the account.
For the purposes of making reimbursements to the account, all vehicles,
water vessels, and heavy equipment acquired by the department after the
effective date of this section are deemed to have been purchased from
the account.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purchase
of vehicles, water vessels, and heavy equipment, to include the payment
of costs for the operation, repair, and maintenance of the vehicles,
water vessels, and heavy equipment.
(3) Only the director of fish and wildlife or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the terms and charges for the
intra-agency use of vehicles, water vessels, or heavy equipment or for
the disposal through sale of vehicles, water vessels, or heavy
equipment is solely within the discretion of the department and the
department's determination of the terms, charges, or sale price is
considered a reasonable term, charge, or sale price.

--- END ---