BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washingtonians
sixty-five years of age and older will nearly double in the next twenty
years, from eleven percent of our population today to almost twenty
percent of our population in 2025. Younger people with disabilities
will also require supportive long-term care services. Nationally,
young people with a disability account for thirty-seven percent of the
total number of people who need long-term care.
The legislature further finds that to address this increasing need,
the long-term care system should support autonomy and self-determination, and support the role of informal caregivers and
families. It should promote personal planning and savings combined
with public support, when needed. It should also include culturally
appropriate, high quality information, services, and supports delivered
in a cost-effective and efficient manner.
The legislature further finds that the long-term care system should
utilize evidence-based practices for the prevention and management of
chronic disease to improve the general health of Washingtonians over
their lifetime and reduce health care and long-term care costs related
to ineffective chronic care management.
The legislature further finds that investments in family caregiver
support, aging and disability resource centers, adult day care and
chronic care management, have the potential to both improve the quality
of life for individuals who require long-term care and also to result
in long-term savings through home diversion and reduced emergency room
use.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.38.040 and 1983 c 290 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The community-based services for low-income eligible persons
provided by the department or the respective area agencies may include:
(1) Access services designed to provide identification of eligible
persons, assessment of individual needs, reference to the appropriate
service, and follow-up service where required. These services shall
include information and referral, outreach, transportation, and
counseling. They must also include long-term care planning and options
counseling, information and crisis intervention, and streamlined
assistance to access a wide array of public and private community-based
services. Services must be available to individuals, concerned
families or friends, or professionals working with issues related to
aging, disabilities, and caregivers. Services must be made available
through aging and disability resource centers that shall be established
in every area agency on aging. For the purposes of this section "aging
and disability resource center" means a single, coordinated system of
information and access for all persons seeking long-term support to
minimize confusion, enhance individual choice, and support informed
decision making;
(2) Day care offered on a regular, recurrent basis. General
nursing, rehabilitation, personal care, nutritional services, social
casework, mental health as provided pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW
and/or limited transportation services may be made available within
this program;
(3) In-home care for persons, including basic health care;
performance of various household tasks and other necessary chores, or,
a combination of these services;
(4) Counseling on death for the terminally ill and care and
attendance at the time of death; except, that this is not to include
reimbursement for the use of life-sustaining mechanisms;
(5) Health services which will identify health needs and which are
designed to avoid institutionalization; assist in securing admission to
medical institutions or other health related facilities when required;
and, assist in obtaining health services from public or private
agencies or providers of health services. These services shall include
health screening and evaluation, in-home services, health education,
and such health appliances which will further the independence and
well-being of the person;
(6) The provision of low cost, nutritionally sound meals in central
locations or in the person's home in the instance of incapacity. Also,
supportive services may be provided in nutritional education, shopping
assistance, diet counseling and other services to sustain the
nutritional well-being of these persons;
(7) The provisions of services to maintain a person's home in a
state of adequate repair, insofar as is possible, for their safety and
comfort. These services shall be limited, but may include housing
counseling, minor repair and maintenance, and moving assistance when
such repair will not attain standards of health and safety, as
determined by the department;
(8) Civil legal services, as limited by RCW 2.50.100, for
counseling and representation in the areas of housing, consumer
protection, public entitlements, property, and related fields of law;
(9) Long-term care ombudsman programs for residents of all long-term care facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.41.050 and 2008 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall contract with area agencies on aging or other
appropriate agencies to conduct family caregiver long-term care
information and support services to the extent ((of available funding))
necessary to sufficiently meet demand in each area agency on aging and
support nursing home diversion. The responsibilities of the agencies
shall include but not be limited to: (1) Administering a program of
family caregiver long-term care information and support services; (2)
negotiating rates of payment, administering sliding-fee scales to
enable eligible participants to participate in paying for respite care,
and arranging for respite care information, training, and other support
services, including family caregiver support and respite care services;
and (3) developing an evidence-based tailored caregiver assessment and
referral tool. In evaluating the need for respite services,
consideration shall be given to the mental and physical ability of the
caregiver to perform necessary caregiver functions.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.09.710 and 2007 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, in collaboration
with the department of health, shall:
(a) Design and implement medical homes for its aged, blind, and
disabled clients in conjunction with chronic care management programs
to improve health outcomes, access, and cost-effectiveness. Programs
must be evidence based, facilitating the use of information technology
to improve quality of care, must acknowledge the role of primary care
providers and include financial and other supports to enable these
providers to effectively carry out their role in chronic care
management, and must improve coordination of primary, acute, and long-term care for those clients with multiple chronic conditions. The
department shall ((consider expansion of)) expand existing medical home
and chronic care management programs and build on the Washington state
collaborative initiative. The department shall use best practices in
identifying those clients best served under a chronic care management
model using predictive modeling through claims or other health risk
information; and
(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of current chronic care management
efforts in the health and recovery services administration and the
aging and disability services administration, comparison to best
practices, and recommendations for future efforts and organizational
structure to improve chronic care management.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Medical home" means a site of care that provides comprehensive
preventive and coordinated care centered on the patient needs and
assures high quality, accessible, and efficient care.
(b) "Chronic care management" means the department's program that
provides care management and coordination activities for medical
assistance clients determined to be at risk for high medical costs.
"Chronic care management" provides education and training and/or
coordination that assist program participants in improving self-management skills to improve health outcomes and reduce medical costs
by educating clients to better utilize services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department
shall develop a challenge grant program to assist communities and
organizations in efforts to plan and establish additional adult day
service programs throughout the state. The challenge grant program
shall provide financial grants, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars
for each grant, for the purpose of helping to meet the costs of
planning, development, and start-up of new adult day service programs
in underserved communities. Recipients of these grants must provide
matching resources, in funds or in-kind, of equal value to any grant
received. Any adult day services program developed after receiving a
challenge grant must agree to serve people whose care is paid for by
the state on a first-come, first-served basis, regardless of the source
of payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of
sections 2 through 5 of this act, referencing sections 2 through 5 of
this act by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided
by June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, sections 2 through
5 of this act are null and void.

--- END ---