BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.90.005 and 2006 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a key priority of water resource
management in the Columbia river basin is the development of new water
supplies that includes storage and conservation in order to meet the
economic and community development needs of people and the instream
flow needs of fish.
(2) The legislature finds that uncertainty as to existing law may
discourage water conservation in the Columbia river basin and that
modern conservation practices can result in substantial water savings.
(3) The legislature therefore declares that a Columbia river basin
water supply development program is needed, and directs the department
of ecology to aggressively pursue the development of storage,
conservation, and other actions to provide water supplies to benefit
both instream and out-of-stream uses.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.380 and 2003 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the point of
diversion, place of use, and purpose of use of conservation operation
and maintenance savings as defined in chapter 90.90 RCW may be
seasonally changed and transferred under this subsection and RCW
90.03.390 to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of
right previously established, except as provided in RCW 90.14.140
(2)(h).

Sec. 3 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of five or more
consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))
(h) If such a right or portion of the right consists of reduced
annual diversions or withdrawals of irrigation water from bodies of
water set forth in RCW 90.90.030(12) resulting from conservation
operation and maintenance savings as defined in RCW 90.90.030. This
subsection is intended to apply to any reductions in withdrawals
resulting from such conservation operation and maintenance savings,
provided that where operation of this subsection with respect to
withdrawals prior to the effective date of this section would actually
result in detriment or injury to existing rights, the priority of
changes and transfers pursuant to RCW 90.03.380(9) and 90.03.390 must
be modified to the extent necessary to prevent such impairment; or
(i) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.90.030 and 2006 c 6 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department of ecology may enter into voluntary regional
agreements for the purpose of providing new water for out-of-stream
use, streamlining the application process, achieving conservation
operation and maintenance savings, and protecting instream flow.
(2) Such agreements shall ensure that:
(a) For water rights issued from the Columbia river mainstem, there
is no negative impact on Columbia river mainstem instream flows in the
months of July and August as a result of the new appropriations issued
under the agreement;
(b) For water rights issued from the lower Snake river mainstem,
there is no negative impact on Snake river mainstem instream flows from
April through August as a result of the new appropriations issued under
the agreement; and
(c) Efforts are made to harmonize such agreements with watershed
plans adopted under the authority of chapter 90.82 RCW that are
applicable to the area covered by the agreement.
(3) The protection of instream flow as set forth in subsection (2)
of this section is adequate for purposes of mitigating instream flow
impacts resulting from any appropriations for out-of-stream use made
under a voluntary regional agreement, and the only applicable
consultation provisions under state law regarding instream flow impacts
shall be those set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Before executing a voluntary agreement under this section, the
department of ecology shall:
(a) Provide a sixty-day period for consultation with county
legislative authorities and watershed planning groups with jurisdiction
over the area where the water rights included in the agreement are
located, the department of fish and wildlife, and affected tribal
governments, and federal agencies. The department of fish and wildlife
shall provide written comments within that time period. The
consultation process for voluntary regional agreements developed under
the provisions of this section is deemed adequate for the issuance of
new water rights provided for in this section and satisfies all
consultation requirements under state law related to the issuance of
new water rights; and
(b) Provide a thirty-day public review and comment period for a
draft agreement, and publish a summary of any public comments received.
The thirty-day review period shall not begin until after the department
of ecology has concluded its consultation under (a) of this subsection
and the comments that have been received by the department are made
available to the public.
(5) The provisions of subsection (4) of this section satisfy all
applicable consultation requirements under state law.
(6) The provisions of this section and any voluntary regional
agreements developed under such provisions may not be relied upon by
the department of ecology as a precedent, standard, or model that must
be followed in any other voluntary regional agreements.
(7) Nothing in this section may be interpreted or administered in
a manner that precludes the processing of water right applications
under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW that are not included in a voluntary
regional agreement.
(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted or administered in
a manner that impairs or diminishes a valid water right or a habitat
conservation plan approved for purposes of compliance with the federal
endangered species act.
(9) The department of ecology shall monitor and evaluate the water
allocated to instream and out-of-stream uses under this section,
evaluate the program, and provide an interim report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by June 30, 2008. A final report shall
be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June
30, 2011.
(10) If the department of ecology executes a voluntary agreement
under this section that includes water rights appropriated from the
lower Snake river mainstem, the department shall develop aggregate data
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.90.050 for the lower Snake
river mainstem.
(11) Any agreement entered into under this section shall remain in
full force and effect through the term of the agreement regardless of
the expiration of this section.
(12) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section
((and)), RCW 90.03.380, 90.14.140, and 90.90.050, and may only be used
for purposes of implementing these sections.
(a) "Columbia river mainstem" means all water in the Columbia river
within the ordinary high water mark of the main channel of the Columbia
river between the border of the United States and Canada and the
Bonneville dam, and all groundwater within one mile of the high water
mark.
(b) "Lower Snake river mainstem" means all water in the lower Snake
river within the ordinary high water mark of the main channel of the
lower Snake river from the head of Ice Harbor pool to the confluence of
the Snake and Columbia rivers, and all groundwater within one mile of
the high water mark.
(c) "Conservation operation and maintenance savings" includes any
present or future water savings, with respect to water rights issued
for waters in the lower Snake river within the ordinary high water mark
of the main channel of the lower Snake river from the head of Ice
Harbor pool to the confluence of the Snake and Columbia rivers,
including those achieved under voluntary regional agreements, arising
from use of soil moisture and monitoring probes, weather forecast and
crop use data, irrigation scheduling, and other seasonal water
management practices. "Conservation operation and maintenance savings"
does not include savings achieved through fixed capital investments
such as higher efficiency irrigation systems, canal linings, and pipe
conversions or modifications.
(i) Conservation operation and maintenance savings is deemed to
save seventeen percent of usage.
(ii) Fifty percent of such conservation operation and maintenance
savings, or eight and one-half percent of usage, must be available for
change and transfer under RCW 90.03.380(9) and 90.03.390, and the
remaining fifty percent of the savings must be placed in trust.
(iii) Changes and transfers of conservation operation and
maintenance savings are deemed to have no negative impact within the
meaning of subsection (2) of this section.
(13) This section expires June 30, 2012.

--- END ---