BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that an unacceptably
high number of students entering institutions of higher education are
unprepared to do college level mathematics, reading, or writing, and
require remedial instruction. This remedial instruction imposes
additional costs and burdens on students by increasing the time it
takes for them to reach their educational goals, and increases the
state's costs associated with higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Precollege coursework offered in mathematics, reading, writing, or
English, except for English courses offered for English language
learners, shall be offered on a self-supporting basis at state
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College.
If a state or regional university or state college chooses to operate
a self-supporting precollege program, the fees charged shall be
sufficient to cover the direct costs of instruction, which are
instructional salaries and related benefits, supplies, publications,
and records.

--- END ---