BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that developmental
screening of infants and young children is a cost-effective method to
identify developmental delays early and provide appropriate services to
reduce the negative impact of the developmental delay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt a rule specifying which
developmental screening tools may be ordered for minors eligible for
medical assistance. The rule shall also specify the frequency of
administering these developmental screens. The developmental screening
tools and the frequency of administration shall be consistent with
nationally accepted pediatric guidelines.
(2) The department shall provide the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives a report on the number and type of
developmental screens conducted on minors eligible for medical
assistance and the subsequent services provided on December 1st of
every odd-numbered year beginning in 2011.

--- END ---