BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Student proficiency on the Washington state
academic standards is essential to assure readiness for work or
college. Therefore, it is important to continue to measure student
achievement on the standards with a statewide student assessment and to
use the results for system accountability. Currently, Washington uses
the statewide assessments in reading and math as a requirement for
students to graduate from high school. There is some research that
shows that using statewide assessments as a high school graduation
requirement does not improve student test scores and there is also
research that correlates such use with higher dropout rates. In light
of these findings, the legislature proposes removing the statewide
assessment as a requirement for high school graduation and dedicating
any savings realized to increasing student success and closing the
achievement gaps on the statewide assessment and motivating students
through incentives to pursue postsecondary education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years ((designed)). The
purpose of the statewide assessment system is to determine if each
student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section and to monitor the
performance of the overall system of schools and school districts for
state and federal accountability purposes. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington
assessment of student learning, the superintendent shall redesign the
assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in
all grades except high school by shortening test administration and
reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.
Effective with the 2010 administration of the assessment, the
superintendent shall similarly redesign the high school assessment.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The high school assessment system shall include but need not
be limited to the Washington assessment of student learning,
opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the
assessment in which the student was not successful, and if approved by
the legislature pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or
more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the scholastic assessment test (SAT) or the American
college test (ACT) may be used as an objective alternative assessment
under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded
the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education shall identify the scores students must
achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the
state standard in the relevant content area on the Washington
assessment of student learning. The state board of education shall
identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After the first scores
are established, the state board may increase but not decrease the
scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the preliminary scholastic assessment test (PSAT) may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for
demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard for
the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the score students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in that
content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12))) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation ((and to assure that students
are on track for high school graduation)), each school district shall
prepare plans for and notify students and their parents or legal
guardians as provided in this ((subsection (12))) section.
(((a))) (2) Student learning plans are required for eighth through
twelfth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the
content areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during
the previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(((i))) (a) The student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning;
(((ii))) (b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual
program, the score on his or her Washington language proficiency test
II;
(((iii))) (c) Any credit deficiencies;
(((iv))) (d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two
years;
(((v))) (e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(((vi))) (f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to
be taken by the student to meet state academic standards ((and stay on
track for graduation));
(((vii))) (g) Remediation strategies and alternative education
options available to students, including informing students of the
option to continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve
or until the age of twenty-one;
(((viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix))) (h) School district programs, high school courses, and
career and technical education options available for students to meet
graduation requirements; and
(((x))) (i) Available programs offered through skill centers or
community and technical colleges.
(((b))) (3) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one
or more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment
of student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(((i))) (a) The parent or guardian of the student shall be
notified, preferably through a parent conference, of the student's
results on the Washington assessment of student learning, actions the
school intends to take to improve the student's skills in any content
area in which the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to
help them improve their student's skills.
(((ii))) (b) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to
the student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to
the plan made as necessary.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2008 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The superintendent shall
develop end-of-course assessments in algebra I, geometry, integrated
mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II. The superintendent shall
((make)) pilot the algebra I and integrated mathematics I end-of-course
assessments available to school districts on an optional basis in the
2009-10 school year. The end-of-course assessments in algebra I,
geometry, integrated mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II shall
be implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school year.
(2) ((For the graduating class of 2013 and for purposes of the
certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, results from
the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course
assessment or results from the integrated mathematics I end-of-course
assessment plus the integrated mathematics II end-of-course assessment
may be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standard on
the mathematics content area of the high school Washington assessment
of student learning.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2014 and for purposes
of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, the
mathematics content area of the Washington assessment of student
learning shall be assessed using either the algebra I end-of-course
assessment plus the geometry end-of-course assessment or the integrated
mathematics I end-of-course assessment plus the integrated mathematics
II end-of-course assessment. All of the objective alternative
assessments available to students under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065
shall be available to any student who has taken the sequence of end-of-course assessments once but does not meet the state mathematics
standard on the sequence of end-of-course assessments.
(4))) The superintendent of public instruction shall report at
least annually or more often if necessary to keep the education
committees of the legislature informed on each step of the development
and implementation process under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.180.100 and 2004 c 19 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
state board for community and technical colleges shall jointly develop
a program plan to provide a continuing education option for students
who are eligible for the state transitional bilingual instruction
program and who need more time to develop language proficiency but who
are more age-appropriately suited for a postsecondary learning
environment than for a high school. In developing the plan, the
superintendent of public instruction shall consider options to formally
recognize the accomplishments of students in the state transitional
bilingual instruction program who have completed the twelfth grade but
have not earned a ((certificate of academic achievement. By December
1, 2004, the agencies shall report to the legislative education and
fiscal committees with any recommendations for legislative action and
any resources necessary to implement the plan)) high school diploma.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.195.010 and 2004 c 19 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be
subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the
health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a
sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The
state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate
any specific educational or other programs for private schools except
as hereinafter in this section provided.
Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school
districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public
instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements
hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools
or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In
case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and
the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year
in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. The state board of education shall not require private
school students to meet the student learning goals, ((obtain a
certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual
achievement to graduate from high school, to)) master the essential
academic learning requirements, or ((to)) be assessed pursuant to RCW
((28A.655.061)) 28A.655.070. However, private schools may choose, on
a voluntary basis, to have their students master these essential
academic learning requirements((,)) or take the assessments((, and
obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of
individual achievement)). Minimum requirements shall be as follows:
(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall
consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the
equivalent in annual minimum program hour offerings as prescribed in
RCW 28A.150.220.
(2) The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW
28A.150.030 and 28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total
program hour offerings as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic
skills, work skills, and optional subjects and activities shall not
apply to private schools or private sectarian schools.
(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state
certification except as follows:
(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no
counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a
state certificate to teach those courses.
(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certified person
exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be
submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
reporting and explaining such circumstances.
(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for
parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach
children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:
(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of
an employee of the approved private school who is certified under
chapter 28A.410 RCW;
(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this
subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;
(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one
contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision
who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;
(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person;
and
(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty
students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.
(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent
records against loss or damage.
(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be
adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district:
PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and
fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical
facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is
instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the
basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units
for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.
(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain
up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and
operation of the school or school district.
All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching
material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section
provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not
specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility
of the administration and administrators of the particular private
school involved.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction
under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:
(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is
planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction.
The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall
specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the
instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of
the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with
the superintendent of the public school district within which the
parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the
student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;
(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; and
(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the
state board of education is administered annually to the child by a
qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. The state board of education shall
not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master
the essential academic learning requirements, ((to)) or take the
assessments((, or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and
28A.155.045)) under RCW 28A.655.070. The standardized test
administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall
be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of
the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not
making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of
development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any
deficiency.
(2) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section
shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school
without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do
comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to
be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2006 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) ((The certificate of academic achievement requirements under
RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c))) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board. The
state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students
enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical
education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a
certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The
purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these
programs have sufficient opportunity to ((earn a certificate of
academic achievement)) meet the state's essential academic learning
requirements, complete the program and earn the program's certificate
or credential, and complete other state and local graduation
requirements. ((The board shall reports [report] its findings and
recommendations for additional flexibility in graduation requirements,
if necessary, to the legislature by December 1, 2007.))
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2006 c 263 s 401 and 2006 c 115 s 6
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the higher education coordinating board, the state board for community
and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education
coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public school
districts a standardized high school transcript. The superintendent
shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and "hours"
so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester, or
trimester system can be compared.
(2) ((The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.
(3))) Transcripts are important documents to students who will
apply for admission to postsecondary institutions of higher education.
Transcripts are also important to students who will seek employment
upon or prior to graduation from high school. It is recognized that
student transcripts may be the only record available to employers in
their decision-making processes regarding prospective employees. The
superintendent of public instruction shall require school districts to
inform annually all high school students that prospective employers may
request to see transcripts and that the prospective employee's decision
to release transcripts can be an important part of the process of
applying for employment.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2008 c 27 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability system to improve student academic achievement;
provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes
education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities,
and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW
28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by
law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning ((and, for
high school students, to obtain a certificate of academic
achievement)). The board shall also determine student scores that
identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard.
((The board shall consider the incorporation of the standard error of
measurement into the decision regarding the award of the
certificates.)) The board shall set such performance standards and
levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction
and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by
any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose.
((The initial performance standards and any changes recommended by the
board in the performance standards for the tenth grade assessment shall
be presented to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by November 30th of the school year in
which the changes will take place to permit the legislature to take
statutory action before the changes are implemented if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature.)) The legislature shall be
advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to
the ((elementary level)) performance standards ((and the middle school
level performance standards));
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend to the superintendent of
public instruction schools and districts to be recognized for two types
of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in student
achievement. Recognition for improvements in student achievement shall
include consideration of one or more of the following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature and by the board under
(a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing individual
schools, the board may use the assessment results from the initial
years the assessments were administered, if doing so with individual
schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the board shall consider the use of all statewide
mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Identify schools and school districts in which state
intervention measures will be needed and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies after the legislature has authorized a set of
intervention strategies. After the legislature has authorized a set of
intervention strategies, at the request of the board, the
superintendent shall intervene in the school or school district and
take corrective actions. This chapter does not provide additional
authority for the board or the superintendent of public instruction to
intervene in a school or school district;
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(h) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.600.310 and 2005 c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in
courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A
student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high
school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs
offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the
school district in any required state or federal accountability
reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of
intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in
which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered
by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private
schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to
meet the student learning goals((, obtain a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from
high school,)) or to master the essential academic learning
requirements. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or
programs in participating universities only if the board of directors
of the student's school district has decided to participate in the
program. Participating institutions of higher education, in
consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards
for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a
secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the
institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil
and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The
notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that
pupil.
(2) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. The institution of higher education shall
not require the pupil to pay any other fees. The funds received by the
institution of higher education from the school district shall not be
deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution
of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall
not be counted for the purpose of determining any enrollment
restrictions imposed by the state on the institution of higher
education.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.15.520 and 2007 c 355 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the community colleges may:
(1) Waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and
activities fees for:
(a) Students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through
28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will
enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high
school diploma or certificate((, but who are not eligible students as
defined by RCW 28A.600.405)); and
(b) Children of any law enforcement officer or firefighter who lost
his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while
employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer
fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive
the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a community
college within ten years of their graduation from high school;
(2) Waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential for:
(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community college course of
study or program which will enable them to finish their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate ((but who are
not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405)). The waiver
shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school
diploma or certificate; and
(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional
education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such
program.

Sec. 13 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2007 c 355 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) ((The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8))) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle income resident law students.
(((9))) (8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.155.170 and 2007 c 318 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district that operates a
high school shall establish a policy and procedures that permit any
student who is receiving special education or related services under an
individualized education program pursuant to state and federal law and
who will continue to receive such services between the ages of eighteen
and twenty-one to participate in the graduation ceremony and activities
after four years of high school attendance with his or her age-appropriate peers and receive a certificate of attendance.
(2) Participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a
certificate of attendance under this section does not preclude a
student from continuing to receive special education and related
services under an individualized education program beyond the
graduation ceremony.
(3) A student's participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt
of a certificate of attendance under this section shall not be
construed as the student's receipt of ((either:
(a))) a high school diploma pursuant to RCW 28A.230.120((; or
(b) A certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW
28A.155.045)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the higher education coordinating board, and the state
board for community and technical colleges shall use existing staff and
resources to collaboratively conduct a review of incentive programs in
other states. The incentive programs that are reviewed must have a
purpose of increasing the number of students who meet the state
standards at any grade level and/or motivating students through
incentives to pursue postsecondary education. By December 1, 2009, the
agencies shall make a joint report to the legislature detailing the
programs that were reviewed and making recommendations for incentive
programs that Washington should consider for spending any savings
realized by the state by eliminating the statewide assessment as a high
school graduation requirement. The recommendations could include
whether the state should create a public-private partnership or use
other creative models to implement any of the recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.155.045 (Certificate of individual achievement) and
2007 c 354 s 3 & 2004 c 19 s 104;
(2) RCW 28A.655.063 (Objective alternative assessments--Reimbursement of costs -- Testing fee waivers) and 2007 c 354 s 7 & 2006
c 115 s 5;
(3) RCW 28A.655.065 (Objective alternative assessment methods--Appeals from assessment scores -- Waivers and appeals from assessment
requirements -- Rules) and 2008 c 170 s 205, 2007 c 354 s 6, & 2006 c 115
s 1;
(4) RCW 28A.655.0611 (Graduation without certificate of academic
achievement or certificate of individual achievement) and 2007 c 354 s
4;
(5) RCW 28B.50.534 (High school completion pilot program) and 2007
c 355 s 3; and
(6) RCW 28A.600.405 (Participation in high school completion pilot
program -- Eligible students -- Funding allocations -- Rules -- Information for
students and parents) and 2007 c 355 s 4.

--- END ---