BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it important that
taxpayers be protected from large, unanticipated tax increases by port
districts. The legislature also finds that port districts should be
encouraged to implement better long-term fiscal planning and more
prudent money management so as to avoid such large increases in tax
levies. The legislature has determined, therefore, that it is good
public policy to impose reasonable constraints on the authority of
large port districts to impose unduly burdensome tax increases.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The regular property tax levy for each taxing district, other than
the state or a port district with an assessed value of over one hundred
billion dollars, may be set at the amount which would be allowed
otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the
district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set
at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy
authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the
limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit
charge under chapter 52.18 RCW.
The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing
district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under
this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---