BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Enclosed, three-wheeled passenger vehicle" means a vehicle that
has three wheels in contact with the ground, an enclosed passenger
seating area, a steering wheel utilized to maneuver the vehicle, and a
motor unit or power train that is either in front or behind the driver,
and is manufactured at a minimum of one hundred vehicles annually.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.330 and 2003 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more
than three wheels in contact with the ground, on which the driver rides
astride the motor unit or power train and is designed to be steered
with a handle bar, but excluding a farm tractor, a power wheelchair, an
electric personal assistive mobility device, an enclosed, three-wheeled
passenger vehicle, and a moped.
The Washington state patrol may approve of and define as a
"motorcycle" a motor vehicle that fails to meet these specific
criteria, but that is essentially similar in performance and
application to motor vehicles that do meet these specific criteria.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.500 and 2003 c 353 s 9, 2003 c 141 s 7, and 2003
c 41 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No person may drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled
motorcycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid
driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the
holder to drive such vehicles.
(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a
valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's
residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination
for the operation of a moped.
(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age.
Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an electric-assisted
bicycle.
(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal
assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.
(5) No driver's license is required to operate a motorized foot
scooter. Motorized foot scooters may not be operated at any time from
a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise without
reflectors of a type approved by the state patrol.
(6) A person holding a valid driver's license may operate an
enclosed, three-wheeled passenger vehicle without a motorcycle
endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Before the 2014 legislative session, the joint committee shall
review and recommend to the legislature whether to maintain or repeal
the motorcycle endorsement exemption for enclosed, three-wheeled
passenger vehicles contained in RCW 46.20.500.

--- END ---