BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall give a high priority to implementing the
requirement to conduct lead blood level assessments under this chapter
for any eligible children younger than twenty-one years old in
accordance with early and periodic screening and diagnostic treatment
services as defined in section 1905 of Title XIX of the federal social
security act and its implementing regulations and guidelines.

--- END ---