BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.450 and 2004 c 247 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A financial ((literacy)) education public-private partnership
is established, composed of ((up to four members representing the
legislature, one from and appointed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, one from and appointed by the department of
financial institutions, up to four from the financial services sector,
and four educators. One or two members of the senate, one of whom is
a member of the senate committee on financial services, insurance and
housing, shall be appointed by the president of the senate. One or two
members of the house of representatives, one of whom is a member of the
house committee on financial institutions and insurance, shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The
superintendent of public instruction shall appoint the members from the
financial services sector and educator members.)) the following
members:
(a) Four members of the legislature, with one member from each
caucus of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, and one member from each caucus of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) Four representatives from the private for-profit and nonprofit
financial services sector, including at least one representative from
the jumpstart coalition, to be appointed by the governor;
(c) Four teachers to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction, with one each representing the elementary, middle,
secondary, and postsecondary education sectors;
(d) A representative from the department of financial institutions
to be appointed by the director;
(e) Two representatives from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, with one involved in curriculum development and one
involved in teacher professional development, to be appointed by the
superintendent.
(2) The chair of the partnership shall be selected by the members
of the partnership from among the legislative members.
(((2))) (3) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available
for this purpose, the partnership may hire a staff person who shall
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Additional technical and logistical support
may be provided by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the department of financial institutions, the
organizations composing the partnership, and other participants in the
financial ((literacy)) education public-private partnership. ((The
superintendent of public instruction shall compile the initial list of
members and convene the first meeting of the partnership.
(3))) (4) The members of the ((committee)) partnership shall be
appointed by ((July 1, 2004)) August 1, 2009.
(((4))) (5) Legislative members of the partnership shall receive
per diem and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(((5))) (6) Travel and other expenses of members of the partnership
shall be provided by the agency, association, or organization that
member represents.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.460 and 2007 c 459 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The task of the financial ((literacy)) education public-private
partnership is to seek out and determine the best methods of equipping
students with the knowledge and skills they need, before they become
self-supporting, in order for them to make critical decisions regarding
their personal finances. The components of personal financial
((literacy examined)) education shall include((, at a minimum, consumer
financial education, personal finance, and personal credit. The
partnership shall identify the types of outcome measures expected from
participating districts and students, in accordance with the
definitions and outcomes developed under RCW 28A.300.455)) the
achievement of skills and knowledge necessary to make informed
judgments and effective decisions regarding earning, spending, and the
management of money and credit.
(2) In carrying out its task, the partnership shall:
(a) Communicate to school districts the financial education
standards adopted under section 3 of this act, other important
financial education skills and content knowledge, and strategies for
expanding the provision and increasing the quality of financial
education instruction;
(b) Review on an ongoing basis financial education curriculum that
is available to school districts, including instructional materials and
programs and schoolwide programs that include the important financial
skills and content knowledge;
(c) Develop evaluation standards and a procedure for endorsing
financial education curriculum that the partnership determines should
be recommended for use in school districts;
(d) Identify assessments and outcome measures that schools and
communities may use to determine whether students have met the
financial education standards adopted under section 3 of this act;
(e) Monitor and provide guidance for professional development for
educators regarding financial education, including ways that teachers
at different grade levels may integrate financial skills and content
knowledge into mathematics, social studies, and other course content
areas;
(f) Work with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the professional educator standards board to create
professional development that could lead to a certificate endorsement
or other certification of competency in financial education;
(g) Develop academic guidelines and standards-based protocols for
use by classroom volunteers who participate in delivering financial
education to students in the public schools; and
(h) Provide an annual report beginning December 1, 2009, as
provided in section 4 of this act, to the governor, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the committees of the legislature with
oversight over K-12 education and higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated to support school districts with
curriculum and professional development to implement the financial
education learning standards, the jumpstart coalition national
standards in K-12 personal finance education are adopted as the
essential academic learning requirements for financial education. If
funds are not appropriated for school districts to implement the
financial education standards, each school district is encouraged to
adopt the standards voluntarily and provide its students with an
opportunity to master the standards.
(2)(a) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
financial education public-private partnership shall provide technical
assistance and grants to support demonstration projects for district-wide adoption and implementation of the financial education learning
standards under this section.
(b) School districts may apply on a competitive basis to
participate as a demonstration project. The office and the partnership
shall select up to four school districts as demonstration projects,
with two districts located in eastern Washington and two districts
located in western Washington, if possible.
(c) Selected districts must:
(i) Make a commitment to integrate financial education into
instruction at all grade levels and in all schools in the district;
(ii) Establish local partnerships within the community to promote
financial education in the schools; and
(iii) Conduct pre- and post-testing of students' financial
literacy.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
the advice of the financial education public-private partnership, shall
provide assistance to the demonstration projects regarding curriculum,
professional development, and innovative instructional programs to
implement the financial education standards.
(e) The selected districts must report findings and results of the
demonstration project to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by April 30, 2011, so that other school districts have the
opportunity over the summer months to incorporate the lessons learned
into planning for financial education programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The annual report from the financial education public-private
partnership shall include:
(1) Results from the jumpstart survey of personal financial
literacy;
(2) Progress toward statewide adoption of financial education
standards by school districts;
(3) Professional development activities related to equipping
teachers with the knowledge and skills to teach financial education;
(4) Activities related to financial education curriculum
development; and
(5) Any recommendations for policies or other activities to support
financial education instruction in public schools.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.300.465 and 2004 c 247 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington financial ((literacy)) education public-private
partnership account is hereby created in the custody of the state
treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the financial
((literacy)) education public-private partnership, and to provide
financial ((literacy)) education opportunities for students and
financial ((literacy)) education professional development opportunities
for the teachers providing those educational opportunities. Revenues
to the account may include gifts from the private sector, federal
funds, and any appropriations made by the legislature or other sources.
Grants and their administration shall be paid from the account. Only
the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account, and only at the
direction of the partnership. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education. Essential academic learning requirements for
financial education shall be adopted as provided under section 3 of
this act.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington
assessment of student learning, the superintendent shall redesign the
assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in
all grades except high school by shortening test administration and
reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.300.455 (Financial literacy public-private partnership
responsibilities -- Definition of financial literacy -- Strategies--Reports) and 2007 c 459 s 1, 2005 c 277 s 2, & 2004 c 247 s 3;
(2) RCW 28A.300.470 (Financial literacy public-private
partnership -- Expiration) and 2007 c 459 s 4 & 2004 c 247 s 7; and
(3) RCW 28A.230.205 (Financial literary skills -- Duties of the
superintendent of public instruction and of school districts) and 2007
c 459 s 3.

--- END ---