BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many persons
who are released from involuntary mental health treatment in an
inpatient setting would benefit from an order for less restrictive
treatment in order to provide the structure and support necessary to
facilitate long-term stability and success in the community.
(2) The legislature intends to make it easier to renew orders for
less restrictive treatment following a period of inpatient commitment
in cases in which a person has been involuntarily committed more than
once and is likely to benefit from a renewed order for less restrictive
treatment.
(3) The legislature also finds that public safety is enhanced when
a designated mental health professional or developmental disabilities
professional is able to file a petition to revoke an order for less
restrictive treatment under RCW 71.05.340 before a person who is the
subject of the petition becomes ill enough to present a likelihood of
serious harm.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.320 and 2008 c 213 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or
others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an
alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the
custody of the department or to a facility certified for ninety day
treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment
not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment: PROVIDED, That
(a) If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of
commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed
one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment in a facility
certified for one hundred eighty day treatment by the department.
(b) If the committed person has a developmental disability and has
been determined incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and the best
interests of the person or others will not be served by a less-restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court
shall remand him or her to the custody of the department or to a
facility certified for one hundred eighty-day treatment by the
department. When appropriate and subject to available funds, treatment
and training of such persons must be provided in a program specifically
reserved for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities. A person so committed shall receive habilitation
services pursuant to an individualized service plan specifically
developed to treat the behavior which was the subject of the criminal
proceedings. The treatment program shall be administered by
developmental disabilities professionals and others trained
specifically in the needs of persons with developmental disabilities.
The department may limit admissions to this specialized program in
order to ensure that expenditures for services do not exceed amounts
appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the department for
such services. The department may establish admission priorities in
the event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by
the department. An order for treatment less restrictive than
involuntary detention may include conditions, and if such conditions
are not adhered to, the designated mental health professional or
developmental disabilities professional may order the person
apprehended under the terms and conditions of RCW 71.05.340.
(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive
than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others,
then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department
or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department
or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less
restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of
judgment: PROVIDED, That if the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3)
are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to
but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment.
(3) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the
expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in
charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event
of a less restrictive alternative, the designated mental health
professional or developmental disabilities professional, files a new
petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed
person;
(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii)
as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability presents a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or
she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of
another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder or
developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or
(c) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of
mental disorder or developmental disability presents a substantial
likelihood of repeating similar acts considering the charged criminal
behavior, life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety;
or
(d) Continues to be gravely disabled.
If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this
subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this
chapter, it shall not be necessary to ((reprove that element)) prove
such conduct again. ((Such))
(4) For a person committed under subsection (2) of this section who
has been remanded to a period of less restrictive treatment, in
addition to the grounds specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the designated mental health professional or developmental disabilities
professional may file a new petition for continued less restrictive
treatment if:
(a) The person has a history of at least one involuntary commitment
for inpatient treatment, at least part of which occurred during the
thirty-six months prior to the initial detention date of the
involuntary commitment that the current less restrictive alternative
order followed, excluding any time spent in a mental health facility or
in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;
(b) Since the date that the person was discharged from an inpatient
facility under the prior involuntary commitment, the person has a
history of deterioration, decompensation, lack of compliance with
treatment for mental illness which precipitated the current period of
commitment, including but not limited to revocation of a prior less
restrictive alternative order;
(c) In view of the person's treatment history or current behavior,
the person is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient
treatment without an order for less restrictive treatment; and
(d) Outpatient treatment that would be provided under a less
restrictive treatment order is necessary to prevent a relapse,
decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person
presenting a likelihood of serious harm to others or the person
becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time.
If the conduct required to be proven in (a) and (b) of this
subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial that resulted
in the most recent involuntary commitment for inpatient treatment or
less restrictive alternative orders following that inpatient treatment,
it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.
(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection
(3) or (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior
court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition
for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of
venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.
(6) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if
the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as
set forth in this ((subsection)) section are present, the court may
order the committed person returned for an additional period of
treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of
judgment. At the end of the one hundred eighty day period of
commitment, the committed person shall be released unless a petition
for another one hundred eighty day period of continued treatment is
filed and heard in the same manner as provided in this ((subsection))
section. Successive one hundred eighty day commitments are permissible
on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as the original
one hundred eighty day commitment. However, a commitment is not
permissible under subsection (4) of this section if thirty-six months
have passed since the date of discharge from the involuntary inpatient
commitment that the current less restrictive alternative order or
orders followed, excluding any time spent in a mental health facility
or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.
(((4))) (7) No person committed as provided in this section may be
detained unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of
commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length.

--- END ---