BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is
continued evidence of underreporting and nonpayment of workers'
compensation premiums by employers in the drywall installation and
finishing industry. This abuse is created when employers improperly
claim owner exemptions for individuals who are really workers and who
later claim and receive benefits provided for in Title 51 RCW.
Untangling this web of deceit is complicated and costly to the system
and often only comes to light when a claim for benefits is made. To
end this cycle of abuse the legislature therefore declares that all
owners of drywall installation and finishing businesses are subject to
mandatory coverage under Title 51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All owners of businesses engaged in the installation or
finishing of drywall are within the mandatory coverage of this title.
(2) In consultation with the advisory committee created under
section 5 of this act, the department shall adopt rules to implement
this section. Rules shall be designed to be the least burdensome to
employers and to encourage voluntary compliance.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.12.020 and 2008 c 217 s 98 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are the only employments which shall not be included
within the mandatory coverage of this title:
(1) Any person employed as a domestic servant in a private home by
an employer who has less than two employees regularly employed forty or
more hours a week in such employment.
(2) Any person employed to do gardening, maintenance, or repair, in
or about the private home of the employer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "maintenance" means the work of keeping in proper
condition, "repair" means to restore to sound condition after damage,
and "private home" means a person's place of residence.
(3) A person whose employment is not in the course of the trade,
business, or profession of his or her employer and is not in or about
the private home of the employer.
(4) Any person performing services in return for aid or sustenance
only, received from any religious or charitable organization.
(5) Sole proprietors or partners, except as provided in section 2
of this act.
(6) Any child under eighteen years of age employed by his or her
parent or parents in agricultural activities on the family farm.
(7) Jockeys while participating in or preparing horses for race
meets licensed by the Washington horse racing commission pursuant to
chapter 67.16 RCW.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection and
section 2 of this act, any bona fide officer of a corporation
voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in accordance with the
articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, who at all
times during the period involved is also a bona fide director, and who
is also a shareholder of the corporation. Only such officers who
exercise substantial control in the daily management of the corporation
and whose primary responsibilities do not include the performance of
manual labor are included within this subsection.
(b) Alternatively and except as provided in section 2 of this act,
a corporation that is not a "public company" as defined in RCW
23B.01.400(24) may exempt eight or fewer bona fide officers, who are
voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in accordance with the
articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation and who exercise
substantial control in the daily management of the corporation, from
coverage under this title without regard to the officers' performance
of manual labor if the exempted officer is a shareholder of the
corporation, or may exempt any number of officers if all the exempted
officers are related by blood within the third degree or marriage. If
a corporation that is not a "public company" elects to be covered under
subsection (8)(a) of this section, the corporation's election must be
made on a form prescribed by the department and under such reasonable
rules as the department may adopt.
(c) Determinations respecting the status of persons performing
services for a corporation shall be made, in part, by reference to
Title 23B RCW and to compliance by the corporation with its own
articles of incorporation and bylaws. For the purpose of determining
coverage under this title, substance shall control over form, and
mandatory coverage under this title shall extend to all workers of this
state, regardless of honorary titles conferred upon those actually
serving as workers.
(d) A corporation may elect to cover officers who are exempted by
this subsection in the manner provided by RCW 51.12.110.
(9) Services rendered by a musician or entertainer under a contract
with a purchaser of the services, for a specific engagement or
engagements when such musician or entertainer performs no other duties
for the purchaser and is not regularly and continuously employed by the
purchaser. A purchaser does not include the leader of a group or
recognized entity who employs other than on a casual basis musicians or
entertainers.
(10) Services performed by a newspaper carrier selling or
distributing newspapers on the street or from house to house.
(11) Services performed by an insurance producer, as defined in RCW
48.17.010(5).
(12) Services performed by a booth renter. However, a person
exempted under this subsection may elect coverage under RCW 51.32.030.
(13) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, members of a
limited liability company, if either:
(a) Management of the company is vested in its members, and the
members for whom exemption is sought would qualify for exemption under
subsection (5) of this section were the company a sole proprietorship
or partnership; or
(b) Management of the company is vested in one or more managers,
and the members for whom the exemption is sought are managers who would
qualify for exemption under subsection (8) of this section were the
company a corporation.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.08.070 and 2008 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Employer" means any person, body of persons, corporate or
otherwise, and the legal representatives of a deceased employer, all
while engaged in this state in any work covered by the provisions of
this title, by way of trade or business, or who contracts with one or
more workers, the essence of which is the personal labor of such worker
or workers. Or as an exception to the definition of employer, persons
or entities are not employers when they contract or agree to remunerate
the services performed by an individual who meets the tests set forth
in subsections (1) through (6) of RCW 51.08.195 or the separate tests
set forth in RCW 51.08.181 for work performed that requires
registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28
RCW.
(2) For purposes of chapter 51.44 RCW, "employer" also includes:
(a) Any person or body of persons, corporate or otherwise, who is
within the mandatory coverage of this title under section 2 of this
act; and (b) the legal representatives of a deceased person who is
within the mandatory coverage of this title under section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The drywall oversight committee is created to advise the
department on the development of rules to implement section 2 of this
act and to otherwise advise the department on issues affecting the
drywall industry.
(2) The committee shall be composed of the following eight members
to be appointed by the director: Four drywall contractors, two
construction related trade association representatives, and two labor
representatives.
(3) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

--- END ---