BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The office of civil legal aid has a fiscal year 2008-2009
biennial budget total of twenty-two million four hundred seventy-six
thousand dollars to provide state funded civil legal aid to low-income
individuals and families throughout the state.
(2) The attorney general manages the largest public law office in
the state with more than one thousand two hundred employees and offices
in twelve cities around the state, and the office of the attorney
general's consumer protection act division already provides a forum for
each resident to file a complaint.
(3) The Northwest justice project has over ninety attorneys
providing free legal aid to qualified low-income tenants in ten offices
across the state.
(4) Many more federal, state, and local agencies across the state
provide aid and information for tenants seeking help.
(5) Many residents have indicated a desire to not participate in
the attorney general's dispute resolution program.
(6) After advertising their services to every community and each
tenant across the state, through September 2008, the attorney general's
dispute resolution program has received six hundred forty-five thousand
one hundred thirty-six dollars to process three hundred ninety-eight
complaints, an extremely small number given the number of tenants in
communities statewide. The vast majority of these complaints either
had nothing to do with the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant
act, or were solved without formal investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 59.30.010 (Findings -- Purpose -- Intent) and 2007 c 431 s 1;
(2) RCW 59.30.020 (Definitions) and 2007 c 431 s 2;
(3) RCW 59.30.030 (Dispute resolution program -- Purpose -- Attorney
general duties) and 2007 c 431 s 3;
(4) RCW 59.30.040 (Dispute resolution program -- Complaint process)
and 2007 c 431 s 4;
(5) RCW 59.30.050 (Registration process, fees) and 2007 c 431 s 6;
(6) RCW 59.30.060 (Database) and 2007 c 431 s 7;
(7) RCW 59.30.070 (Manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program account) and 2007 c 431 s 8; and
(8) RCW 59.30.080 (Immunity from suit) and 2007 c 431 s 5.

--- END ---