BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that moving low-income high school students efficiently through a progression of career
exploration, internships or preapprenticeships in high-demand
occupations, and completion of postsecondary education benefits these
students by increasing the relevance of their high school education,
increasing their connection to the working world, accelerating their
entry into a high-demand occupation, and increasing their earnings and
opportunities.
(2) The legislature further finds that in a difficult economy,
youth unemployment rates increase sharply. Providing paid internships
and preapprenticeships to high school students creates not only an
immediate short-term economic stimulus in local communities, but also
creates the potential to sustain that economic recovery by making
students better prepared for postsecondary education and employment in
the types of occupations that will generate economic growth over the
long term.
(3) The legislature further finds that moving students efficiently
through secondary and postsecondary education reduces state
expenditures by improving on-time graduation and postsecondary
retention and increases state revenues by providing for graduates with
higher lifelong earnings and taxpaying potential.
(4) Employers and local economies benefit from the development of
a long-term relationship with potential employees and a more consistent
pipeline of skilled workers into the occupations for which they are
having the most trouble finding skilled workers.
(5) Therefore the legislature intends to provide incentives for
local consortia of employers, labor organizations, educational
institutions, and workforce and economic development councils to use
existing funds to build educational and employment pipelines to high-demand occupations for low-income high school students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity internship program is created under sections 2
through 6 of this act. The purpose of the program is to provide
incentives for opportunity internship consortia to use existing
resources to build educational and employment pipelines to high-demand
occupations in targeted industries for low-income high school students.
Three types of incentives are provided through the program:
(a) Each opportunity internship graduate shall be eligible for up
to one year of financial assistance for postsecondary education as
provided in section 8 of this act;
(b) Each opportunity internship graduate who completes a
postsecondary program of study shall receive a job interview with an
employer participating in an opportunity internship consortium that has
agreed to provide such interviews; and
(c) For each opportunity internship graduate who completes a
postsecondary program of study, obtains employment in a high-demand
occupation that pays a starting salary or wages of not less than thirty
thousand dollars per year, and remains employed for at least six
months, the participating opportunity internship consortium shall be
eligible to receive an incentive payment as provided in section 6 of
this act.
(2) The opportunity internship program shall be administered by the
board and the board may adopt rules to implement the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout sections 2 through 6 of this act.
(1) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities.
(2) "Low-income high school student" means a student who is
enrolled in grades ten, eleven, or twelve in a public high school and
who qualifies for federal free or reduced-price meals. If a student
qualifies at the time the student begins participating in the
opportunity internship program, the student remains eligible even if
the student does not receive free or reduced-price meals thereafter.
To participate in the program, the student must remain enrolled in high
school until the student receives a high school diploma.
(3) "Opportunity internship consortium" means a local consortium
formed for the purpose of participating in the opportunity internship
program and which may be composed of a local workforce development
council, economic development council, area high schools, community or
technical colleges, apprenticeship councils, preapprenticeship programs
such as running start for the trades, private vocational schools
licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW, public and private four-year
institutions of higher education, employers in targeted industries, and
labor organizations.
(4) "Opportunity internship graduate" means a low-income high
school student who successfully completes an opportunity internship
program and graduates from high school.
(5) "Postsecondary program of study" means an undergraduate or
graduate certificate, apprenticeship, or degree program.
(6) "Preapprenticeship" means a program of at least ninety hours
and not more than one hundred eighty hours in length that provides
practical experience, education, preparation, and the development of
skills that would be beneficial for entry into state-approved
apprenticeship programs, including but not limited to construction
industry structure and the construction process; orientation to state-approved apprenticeship; tools of the various trades and safe handling
of power tools; and industry standards of safety, responsibility, and
craft excellence.
(7) "Targeted industry" means a business or industry identified by
a local workforce development council as having high-demand occupations
that require candidates to have completed a postsecondary program of
study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Opportunity internship consortia may apply to the board to
offer an opportunity internship program.
(a) The board, in consultation with the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, may select those consortia that
demonstrate the strongest commitment and readiness to implement a high
quality opportunity internship program for low-income high school
students. The board shall place a priority on consortia with
demonstrated experience working with similar populations of students
and demonstrated capacity to assist a large number of students through
the progression of internship or preapprenticeship, high school
graduation, postsecondary education, and retention in a high-demand
occupation. The board shall place a priority on programs that
emphasize secondary career and technical education and nonbaccalaureate
postsecondary education; however, programs that target four-year
postsecondary degrees are eligible to participate.
(b) The board shall enter into a contract with each consortium
selected to participate in the program. No more than ten consortia per
year shall be selected to participate in the program, and to the extent
possible, the board shall assure a geographic distribution of consortia
in regions across the state emphasizing a variety of targeted
industries. Each consortium may select no more than one hundred low-income high school students per year to participate in the program.
(2) Under the terms of an opportunity internship program contract,
an opportunity internship consortium shall commit to the following
activities which shall be conducted using existing federal, state,
local, or private funds available to the consortium:
(a) Identify high-demand occupations in targeted industries for
which opportunity internships or preapprenticeships shall be developed
and provided;
(b) Develop and implement the components of opportunity
internships, including paid or unpaid internships or preapprenticeships
of at least ninety hours in length in high-demand occupations with
employers in the consortium, mentoring and guidance for students who
participate in the program, assistance with applications for
postsecondary programs and financial aid, and a guarantee of a job
interview with a participating employer for all opportunity internship
graduates who successfully complete a postsecondary program of study;
(c) Once the internship or preapprenticeship components have been
developed, conduct outreach efforts to inform low-income high school
students about high-demand occupations, the opportunity internship
program, options for postsecondary programs of study, and the
incentives and opportunities provided to students who participate in
the program;
(d) Obtain appropriate documentation of the low-income status of
students who participate in the program;
(e) Maintain communication with opportunity internship graduates of
the consortium who enroll in postsecondary programs of study; and
(f) Submit an annual report to the board on the progress of and
participation in the opportunity internship program of the consortium.
(3) Opportunity internship consortia are encouraged to:
(a) Provide paid opportunity internships or preapprenticeships,
including during the summer months to encourage students to stay
enrolled in high school;
(b) Work with high schools to offer opportunity internships as
approved worksite learning experiences where students can earn high
school credit;
(c) Designate the local workforce development council as fiscal
agent for the opportunity internship program contract;
(d) Work with area high schools to incorporate the opportunity
internship program into comprehensive guidance and counseling programs
such as the navigation 101 program; and
(e) Coordinate the opportunity internship program with other
workforce development and postsecondary education programs, including
opportunity grants, the college bound scholarship program, federal
workforce investment act initiatives, and college access challenge
grants.
(4) The board shall seek federal funds that may be used to support
the opportunity internship program, including providing the incentive
payments under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
On an annual basis, each opportunity internship consortium shall
provide the board with a list of the opportunity internship graduates
from the consortium. The board shall compile the lists from all
consortia and shall notify the higher education coordinating board of
the eligibility of each graduate on the lists to receive a state need
grant under chapter 28B.92 RCW if the graduate enrolls in a
postsecondary program of study within one year of high school
graduation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On an annual basis, each opportunity internship consortium
shall provide the board with a list of the opportunity internship
graduates from the consortium who have completed a postsecondary
program of study, obtained employment in a high-demand occupation that
pays a starting salary or wages of not less than thirty thousand
dollars per year, and remained employed for at least six months.
(2) The board shall verify the information on the lists from each
consortium. Subject to funds appropriated or otherwise available for
this purpose, the board shall allocate to each consortium an incentive
payment of two thousand dollars for each graduate on the consortium's
list. In the event that insufficient funds are appropriated to provide
a full payment, the board shall prorate payments across all consortia
and shall notify the governor and the legislature of the amount of the
shortfall.
(3) Opportunity internship consortia shall use the incentive
payments to continue operating opportunity internship programs.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.92.030 and 2004 c 275 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Institution or institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical
college operated by the state of Washington or any political
subdivision thereof; or
(b) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the
state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level
which is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized
by rule of the board for the purposes of this section: PROVIDED, That
any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the
state of Washington which is affiliated with an institution operating
in another state must be a separately accredited member institution of
any such accrediting association, or a branch of a member institution
of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for
purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student
financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or
university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of
twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an
annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent
students: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no institution of higher education
shall be eligible to participate in a student financial aid program
unless it agrees to and complies with program rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150.
(2) "Financial aid" means loans and/or grants to needy students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of
higher education.
(3) "Needy student" means a post high school student of an
institution of higher education who demonstrates to the board the
financial inability, either through the student's parents, family
and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books, and
tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter. "Needy
student" also means an opportunity internship graduate as defined by
section 3 of this act who enrolls in a postsecondary program of study
as defined in section 3 of this act within one year of high school
graduation.
(4) "Disadvantaged student" means a post high school student who by
reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential,
familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as
a full time student in an institution of higher education, who would
otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher education under an established program designed
to qualify the student for enrollment as a full time student.
(5) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall work with institutions of higher education to
assure that the institutions are aware of the eligibility of
opportunity internship graduates for an award under this chapter.
(2) If an opportunity internship graduate enrolls within one year
of high school graduation in a postsecondary program of study in an
institution of higher education, including in an apprenticeship program
with related and supplemental instruction provided through an
institution of higher education, the graduate is eligible to receive a
state need grant for up to one year. The graduate shall not be
required to be enrolled on at least a half-time basis. The related and
supplemental instruction provided to a graduate through an
apprenticeship program shall not be required to lead to a degree or
certificate.
(3) Except for the eligibility criteria for an opportunity
internship graduate that are provided under this section, other rules
pertaining to award of a state need grant apply.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes an opportunity internship
graduate from being eligible to receive additional state need grants
after the one-year grant provided in this section if the graduate meets
other criteria as a needy or disadvantaged student.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2007 c 404 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is
provided under section 8 of this act, for a student to be eligible for
a state need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (3) and (4)((.));
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year((.));
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment on at least a half-time
basis at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030(1)((.));
(4) Until June 30, 2011, to the extent funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms and conditions
specified in the omnibus appropriations act, be enrolled or accepted
for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent
semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.92.030(1)((.)); and
(5) Have complied with all the rules ((and regulations)) adopted by
the board for the administration of this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.92.110 and 2004 c 275 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state financial aid recipient under this chapter shall apply the
award toward the cost of tuition, room, board, books, and fees at the
institution of higher education attended. An opportunity internship
graduate who enters an apprenticeship program may use the award for the
costs of related and supplemental instruction provided through an
institution of higher education, tools, and other costs associated with
the apprenticeship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The workforce training and education
coordinating board shall conduct an outcome evaluation of opportunity
internship programs. At a minimum, the analysis shall examine the
financial benefits of on-time graduation, youth employment while in
high school, postsecondary education enrollment and completion, and
adult employment in high-demand occupations compared to the local and
state costs of the programs.
(2) The board shall submit a preliminary analysis to the governor
and the education and higher education committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2012, and a final analysis by December 1, 2014.

--- END ---