BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.86A.010 and 1983 c 66 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that a procedure should be established for
the management of short term treasury surplus funds by the state
treasurer in order to insure a maximum return while they are on deposit
in public depositaries or federal or state-chartered credit unions.
The objectives of this procedure are to minimize noninterest earning
demand deposits and provide fair compensation to financial institutions
for services rendered to the state through the investment of state
funds in time deposits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.86A.030 and 2008 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funds held in public depositaries or federal or state-chartered
credit unions not as demand deposits as provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and
((43.86A.030)) this section, shall be available for a time certificate
of deposit investment program according to the following formula: The
state treasurer shall apportion to all participating depositaries or
federal or state-chartered credit unions an amount equal to five
percent of the three year average mean of general state revenues as
certified in accordance with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state
Constitution, or fifty percent of the total surplus treasury investment
availability, whichever is less. Within thirty days after
certification, those funds determined to be available according to this
formula for the time certificate of deposit investment program shall be
deposited in qualified public depositaries or federal or state-chartered credit unions. These deposits shall be allocated among the
participating depositaries or federal or state-chartered credit unions
on a basis to be determined by the state treasurer.
(2) Of all funds available under this section, the state treasurer
may use up to one hundred seventy-five million dollars per year for the
purposes of RCW 43.86A.060(2)(c)(i) and up to fifteen million dollars
per year for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060(2)(c)(ii). The amounts
made available to these public depositaries or federal or state-chartered credit unions shall be equal to the amounts of outstanding
loans made under RCW 43.86A.060.
(3) The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record
giving consideration to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans,
capital structure, investments or some combination of these factors.
However, if in the judgment of the state treasurer the amount of
allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by this section
will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.86A.060 and 2008 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall establish a linked deposit program
for investment of deposits in qualified public depositaries or federal
or state-chartered credit unions. As a condition of participating in
the program, qualified public depositaries or federal or state-chartered credit unions must make qualifying loans as provided in this
section. The state treasurer may purchase a certificate of deposit
that is equal to the amount of the qualifying loan made by the
qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered credit union
or may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal to the aggregate
amount of two or more qualifying loans made by one or more qualified
public depositaries or federal or state-chartered credit unions.
(2) Qualifying loans made under this section are those:
(a) Having terms that do not exceed ten years;
(b) Where an individual loan does not exceed one million dollars;
(c)(i) That are made to a minority or women's business enterprise
that has received state certification under chapter 39.19 RCW; or
(ii) That are made to a veteran-owned business that has received
state certification under RCW 43.60A.190;
(d) Where the interest rate on the loan to the minority or women's
business enterprise or veteran-owned business does not exceed an
interest rate that is two hundred basis points below the interest rate
the qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered credit
union would charge for a loan for a similar purpose and a similar term,
except that, if the preference given by the state treasurer to the
qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered credit union
under subsection (3) of this section is less than two hundred basis
points, the qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered
credit union may reduce the preference given on the loan by an amount
that corresponds to the reduction in preference below two hundred basis
points given to the qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered credit union; and
(e) Where the points or fees charged at loan closing do not exceed
one percent of the loan amount.
(3) In setting interest rates of time certificate of deposits, the
state treasurer shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point
preference will be given to the qualified public depositary or federal
or state-chartered credit union, except that the treasurer shall lower
the amount of the preference to ensure that the effective interest rate
on the time certificate of deposit is not less than two percent.
(4) Upon notification by the state treasurer that a minority or
women's business enterprise is no longer certified under chapter 39.19
RCW or that a veteran-owned business is no longer certified under RCW
43.60A.190, the qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered credit union shall reduce the amount of qualifying loans by
the outstanding balance of the loan made under this section to the
minority or women's business enterprise or the veteran-owned business,
as applicable.
(5) The office of minority and women's business enterprises has the
authority to adopt rules to:
(a) Ensure that when making a qualified loan under the linked
deposit program, businesses that have never received a loan under the
linked deposit program are given first priority;
(b) Limit the total principal loan amount that any one business
receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit program over the
lifetime of the businesses;
(c) Limit the total principal loan amount that an owner of one or
more businesses receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit
program during the owner's lifetime; and
(d) Limit the total amount of any one qualified loan made under the
linked deposit program.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.86A.070 and 1993 c 512 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state and those acting as its agents are not liable in any
manner for payment of the principal or interest on qualifying loans
made under RCW 43.86A.060. Any delay in payments or defaults on the
part of the borrower does not in any manner affect the deposit
agreement between the qualified public depositary or federal or state-chartered credit union and the state treasurer.

--- END ---