BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.010 and 2007 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affordable residential development" or "affordable housing"
means housing that is owned or rented where monthly housing costs,
including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent
of the household's monthly income.
(2) "Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of
community interests.
(((2))) (3) "Comparable replacement housing" means any dwelling
that is (a) decent, safe, and sanitary; (b) adequate in size to
accommodate the occupants; (c) within the financial means of the
displaced person; (d) functionally equivalent; (e) in an area not
subject to unreasonably adverse environmental conditions; and (f) in a
location generally not less desirable than the location of the
displaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities,
facilities, services, and the displaced person's place of employment.
(4) "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for
wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor and statistics, United States department of labor.
(5) "Dense" means the same as transit-supportive density.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(((3))) (7) "Director" means the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development.
(((4))) (8) "Eligible jurisdiction" means a county or city planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 or a federally recognized Indian tribe in the
state of Washington.
(9) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business in this state under state or federal law.
(((5))) (10) "High capacity transit station" means a stop or
station for public transportation that operates on a fixed guideway
rail system or designated bus rapid transit line.
(11) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW
43.185A.010.
(12) "Major transit stop" means a stop for a bus or other transit
mode providing fixed route service in intervals of at least every
thirty minutes during peak hours of operation.
(13) "Market rate" means the current average market interest rate
that is determined at the time an individual loan is closed upon, or
grant is awarded, using a widely recognized current market interest
rate measurement to be selected for use by the department. This
interest rate must be noted in an attachment to the closing documents
for any loan and in any grant contract for reference if the loan or
grant must be repaid with interest.
(14) "Microenterprise development organization" means a community
development corporation, a nonprofit development organization, a
nonprofit social services organization or other locally operated
nonprofit entity that provides services to low-income entrepreneurs.
(((6))) (15) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is
tax exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, or similar successor
provisions.
(16) "Residential development" means a unit of housing that is
contained within a single, multifamily, or mixed use development.
(17) "Statewide microenterprise association" means a nonprofit
entity with microenterprise development organizations as members that
serves as an intermediary between the department of community, trade,
and economic development and local microenterprise development
organizations.
(18) "Transfer of development rights" or "rural and resource land
transfer of development rights" includes methods for protecting land
from development by voluntarily removing the development rights from a
transfer of development rights sending site and transferring them to a
transfer of development receiving site for the purpose of increasing
development density in the receiving site. Methods for protecting
sending sites and increasing the development density in receiving sites
include awarding bonuses or regulatory flexibility to receiving sites
when persons within a receiving site purchase development rights from
a sending site through a transfer of development rights bank or from a
landowner who is a willing development rights seller. Bonuses include,
but are not limited to, increased height, density, or floor area ratio.
Options for regulations on which a jurisdiction could award increased
flexibility include, but are not limited to, parking requirements,
impervious surface limits, or setbacks.
(19) "Transfer of development rights receiving site" or "transfer
of development rights sending site" means an area that a city or county
has designated as either a receiving site or sending site in accordance
with a rural and resource land transfer of development rights program.
(20) "Transit-proximate" means within one-half mile walking
distance of a high capacity transit station or within one-quarter mile
of another major transit stop.
(21) "Transit-supportive density" means a minimum average of fifty
units of development for each acre of land within one-half mile walking
distance of a high capacity transit station, and a minimum of ten
development units for each acre of land within one-quarter mile of
another major transit stop.
(22) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than
fifty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size,
for the county where the project is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The residential infrastructure program is created in the
department to provide loans to eligible jurisdictions and grants to
nonprofit organizations for public infrastructure that supports
increased capacity for dense, affordable residential development in
transit-proximate areas.
(2) The department may provide direct loans to eligible
jurisdictions for projects meeting the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section or provide grants to nonprofit organizations for
projects meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.
Funds appropriated through the program must be used to pay for the cost
of public infrastructure projects that support increased capacity for
dense, affordable residential development in transit-proximate areas,
including the planning, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of sidewalks, streets and
roads, bridges, publicly owned utilities, drinking water systems, and
storm and sanitary sewage systems. The department may also provide
loans to eligible jurisdictions or grants to nonprofit organizations
for the acquisition of real property when the acquisition is directly
related to the development of public infrastructure projects to support
dense, affordable residential development in transit-proximate areas.
(3) An eligible jurisdiction seeking funding from the residential
infrastructure program must:
(a) Designate a project area within its urban growth area
designated under RCW 36.70A.110 and demonstrate with official plans
that overall development within the project area will increase the
supply of dense, affordable residential development units and that the
project area currently, or will within eight years of the loan award,
meets the definitions of transit-proximate and will achieve minimum
transit-supportive density;
(b) Demonstrate that designated infrastructure projects, for which
an eligible jurisdiction seeks funding:
(i) Are contained in the eligible jurisdictions' capital facilities
element of the comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.070;
(ii) Maximize the use of existing infrastructure; and
(iii) Will increase existing system capacity to accommodate
projected population growth in a manner that supports infill and
redevelopment of existing urban areas;
(c) Demonstrate a commitment to promoting affordable residential
development within the designated project area through:
(i) Local funding commitments to affordable residential housing
projects in the proposed project area; or
(ii) The official adoption and implementation of policies and
ordinances that include affordable housing incentive initiatives, such
as those outlined within RCW 36.70A.540, or other policies and programs
intended to promote the creation of affordable housing;
(d) Include a plan to construct, or pay for the construction of,
comparable replacement housing within the eligible jurisdiction when
housing units are lost as a direct result of the public infrastructure
projects funded under this program. A residential unit lost as a
result of the infrastructure project must be replaced one-for-one with
a unit at an equal or better affordability rate, and relocation
assistance must be paid to any displaced households. Projects
receiving financing from the residential infrastructure program must
comply with any relocation standards and requirements and real property
acquisition policies established by the department as a condition of
residential infrastructure program assistance; and
(e) Commit to paying the prevailing wage as described under RCW
39.12.020 for each infrastructure project.
(4) A nonprofit organization seeking funding from the residential
infrastructure program must:
(a) Demonstrate that the funding will support public infrastructure
projects or the acquisition of property related to the development of
infrastructure projects, as described in subsection (2) of this
section, related to a specific affordable residential development that
has also received a commitment of funding from the Washington housing
trust fund under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW;
(b) Demonstrate that the area in which the infrastructure project
will take place is within an urban growth area designated by a local
jurisdiction under RCW 36.70A.110, and demonstrate with official plans
from the jurisdiction that overall development within the project area
will increase the supply of dense, affordable residential development
and that the project area currently, or will within eight years of the
grant award, meets the definitions of transit-proximate and will
achieve minimum transit-supportive density;
(c) Demonstrate that the specific affordable housing development
described in (a) of this subsection will, within eight years of the
grant award, contribute to an increase in the supply of dense,
affordable residential development within the area referenced in (b) of
this subsection; and
(d) Comply with the requirements of subsection (3)(d) of this
section, related to the provision of comparable replacement housing and
relocation standards and requirements.
(5) The department must determine each year the total amount of
funding available in loans and grants and must establish the total
amount of financial assistance to be appropriated to eligible
jurisdiction and nonprofit organization applicants based on (a) the
total amount of money appropriated to the program; (b) the quality of
applications received; and (c) the best available projections of total
revenue likely to be available for the program for the subsequent three
years. The total amount of financial assistance allocated must not
exceed ten million dollars per project for eligible jurisdictions and
not exceed one million dollars per project for nonprofit organizations.
The maximum project funding limits established in this section must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every
other year beginning July 1, 2011, based upon changes in the consumer
price index during the time period since the last adjustment. If the
bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price
index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest
number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of
the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments
for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must
calculate the new maximum project funding limits and transmit those new
limits to the department.
(6) Loan interest rates must not exceed one-half of one percent a
year. The department shall establish policies, priorities, and
procedures by which all or part of a loan may be forgiven if an
eligible jurisdiction:
(a) Creates a significantly greater number of affordable
residential housing units within the project area than the number
agreed to during loan contract negotiations;
(b) Creates a significant number of residential units that are
available and affordable to households of income levels significantly
below the maximum income levels allowable under the program; or
(c) Significantly exceeds program expectations in other ways to be
identified by the department.
(7) During each fiscal year in which funds are available for use by
the department for the residential infrastructure program, the
department shall announce to all known interested parties, and through
major media throughout the state, a competitive application period of
at least ninety days' duration. This announcement must be made as
often as the director deems appropriate for proper utilization of
resources.
(8) The department shall establish a competitive process for loan
and grant awards and shall review and prioritize proposals in
consultation with the public works board and the transportation
improvement board or designees selected by those boards to represent
them.
(a) Priority must be awarded to projects that include plans to:
(i) Maximize capacity to accommodate growth;
(ii) Maximize residential density;
(iii) Maximize the number of affordable housing units;
(iv) Maintain the affordability of the housing for the longest
period of time;
(v) Maximize affordability to low-income households and very low-income households;
(vi) Maximize access to public transit; and
(vii) Demonstrate readiness to proceed.
(b) In awarding loans and grants from the program established in
subsection (1) of this section, the department must consider whether
the jurisdiction has completed a Washington state quality award program
assessment of management systems.
(c) The department shall give additional consideration to
jurisdictions that demonstrate a commitment to creating receiving areas
for rural and resource land transfer of development rights, which may
be demonstrated through one of the following actions, listed in order
of highest value and priority:
(i) The jurisdiction has in place at the time of application,
within the area specified by the application or in other areas within
the jurisdiction, designated receiving sites for rural and resource
land transfer of development rights established through an ordinance by
the jurisdiction and an interlocal agreement with a sending site
jurisdiction that enables transfers from rural and resource lands;
(ii) The jurisdiction has in place at the time of application,
within the area specified by the application or in other areas within
the jurisdiction, designated receiving sites for rural and resource
land transfer of development rights established through an ordinance by
the jurisdiction; or
(iii) The jurisdiction states in its comprehensive plan at the time
of application a commitment to consider the development and
implementation of a rural and resource land transfer of development
rights program.
(9) Eligible jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that receive
support from the residential infrastructure program must report to the
department annually by December 31st of each year following the date of
the receipt of the loan or grant until ten years after the completion
of the infrastructure project.
(a) Reporting before and during the construction of the
infrastructure project must include information on the status of the
project, the estimated completion date, and any variations from the
approved proposal.
(b) Reporting after completion of the project must include a
description of how the project area is transit-proximate and has
achieved transit-supportive density requirements or how the eligible
jurisdiction or nonprofit organization is working toward complying with
those requirements. The report must also include information about the
status of the residential development occurring within the project
area, including:
(i) The total number of residential units developed or under
construction; and
(ii) The total number of residential units meeting the definition
of affordable residential development.
(10)(a) If an infrastructure project funded by the residential
infrastructure program is not completed by the agreed upon date or
varies substantially from the approved proposal in a way that will
result in the creation of less affordable residential development than
that agreed to at the time of the project funding award as a condition
of the funding, the eligible jurisdiction or nonprofit organization
associated with the project shall make the necessary project
adjustments as determined by the department or refund all or a portion
of the loan or grant amount.
(b) If an eligible jurisdiction rescinds its public commitment to
promoting affordable residential development within the designated
project area by changing officially adopted policies and ordinances or
failing to implement these policies and ordinances, eligible
jurisdictions may be required to refund all or a portion of the
principal loan amount plus compounded interest calculated at the
current market rate.
(c) If a nonprofit organization fails to produce the agreed upon
number of affordable residential units within its designated project,
the nonprofit organizations may be required to refund all or a portion
of its grant amount plus compounded interest calculated at the current
market rate.
(d) The department may grant a partial or total exemption from the
repayment requirement under this section if the department determines
that a project is substantially complete or that the property has been
substantially used in keeping with the original affordable residential
housing purpose of the loan or grant.
(11)(a) Jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that receive more
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars in total loans or grants in a
calendar year from the program established in subsection (1) of this
section or other state housing-related funding sources, including the
housing trust fund, programs of the housing finance commission, and
surcharges established in RCW 36.22.178 and 36.22.179, must apply to
the Washington state quality award program for an assessment of
management systems.
(b) Jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that receive more
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars in total loans or grants in a
calendar year from the program established in subsection (1) of this
section or other state housing-related funding sources, including the
housing trust fund, programs of the housing finance commission, and
surcharges established in RCW 36.22.178 and 36.22.179, for three or
more consecutive calendar years must apply to the Washington state
quality award program for an assessment of management systems every
three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The residential infrastructure account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from transfers to the account under section 4
of this act, repayments of loans or grants made under section 2 of this
act, and other sources identified by the legislature must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes identified in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By August 31, 2010, and by August 31st of every year
thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer from the general fund
into the residential infrastructure account created in section 3 of
this act the lesser of fifty million dollars or the excess real estate
excise tax growth amount.
(2) By August 1, 2010, and by August 1st of each year thereafter,
the director of the office of financial management shall notify the
state treasurer of the amount to be transferred to the residential
infrastructure account.
(3) RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers required
under this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Excess growth factor" means the difference between the annual
growth in real estate excise tax collections and the fiscal growth
factor for the current fiscal year, as determined under this chapter.
If the difference is at or below zero, the excess growth factor is
zero.
(b) "Excess real estate excise tax growth amount" means the dollar
amount derived by multiplying real estate excise tax collections by the
excess growth factor.
(c) "Prior fiscal year" means the fiscal year prior to the fiscal
year in which the transfer under subsection (1) of this section is
made.
(d) "Real estate excise tax collections" means the excise tax
collections under chapter 82.45 RCW that are deposited into the general
fund under RCW 82.45.060(2)(c) in the prior fiscal year.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property
at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the
selling price.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
distributed as provided in this subsection.
(a) An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.
(b) An amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds
of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.
(c) The remainder shall be deposited in the general fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.45.180 and 2006 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a five-dollar fee on all transactions
required by this chapter where the transaction does not require the
payment of tax. A total of five dollars shall be collected in the form
of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is less than five
dollars. Through June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
percent of the taxes collected by the county under this chapter and the
treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of
collection. After June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the county under
this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter before July 1, 2006, the county treasurer shall pay over
to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the
proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the
state under RCW 84.56.280. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter after June 30, 2006, on a monthly basis the county
treasurer shall pay over to the state treasurer the month's
transmittal. The month's transmittal must be received by the state
treasurer by 12:00 p.m. on the last working day of each month. The
county treasurer shall account to the department for the month's
transmittal by the twentieth day of the month following the month in
which the month's transmittal was paid over to the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds ((in the general fund))
as provided in RCW 82.45.060(2).
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in this
subsection apply.
(i) "Close of business" means the time when the county treasurer
makes his or her daily deposit of proceeds.
(ii) "Month's transmittal" means all proceeds deposited by the
county through the close of business of the day that is two working
days before the last working day of the month. This definition of
"month's transmittal" shall not be construed as requiring any change in
a county's practices regarding the timing of its daily deposits of
proceeds.
(iii) "Proceeds" means moneys collected and receipted by the county
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, less the county's share of the
proceeds used to defray the county's costs of collection allowable in
(a) of this subsection.
(iv) "Working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays,
and all legal holidays as provided in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax ((in the general fund)) as
provided in RCW 82.45.060(2). The state treasurer shall deposit the
proceeds of any local taxes imposed under chapter 82.46 RCW in the
local real estate excise tax account hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a
tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax
account shall be credited to the local real estate excise tax account
and distributed to the counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local real estate
excise tax account to the counties, cities, and towns the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority. The state treasurer
shall make the distribution under this subsection without
appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional five-dollar fee on all transactions required by this
chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the payment of
tax. The county treasurer shall remit this fee to the state treasurer
at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall place money
from this fee in the real estate excise tax electronic technology
account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the state
treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to the
following formula: Three-quarters of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
shall be ratably distributed among the counties in direct proportion to
their population as it relates to the total state's population based on
most recent statistics by the office of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department and
compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by July 1, 2015, revert to the county capital improvements
fund in accordance with RCW 82.46.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2008 c 128 s 19 and 2008 c 106 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the essential rail assistance
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the residential
infrastructure account, the resource management cost account, the rural
arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the safety and
education account, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79.495 and 2007 c 484 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The budget stabilization account is governed by the provisions
in Article VII, section 12 and this section.
(2) By June 30th of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
transfer an amount equal to one percent of the general state revenues
for that fiscal year to the budget stabilization account.
(3) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment moneys in the
budget stabilization account. All investment and operating costs
associated with the investment of money shall be paid pursuant to RCW
43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the
earnings from the investment of the money shall be retained by the
account. All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policies established by the state
investment board. As deemed appropriate by the state investment board,
moneys in the account may be commingled for investment with other funds
subject to investment by the board.
(4) For the purposes of Article VII, section 12, this section, and
RCW 82.33.050, the state employment growth forecast shall be based on
the total nonfarm payroll employment data series.
(5) The transfer under section 4 of this act does not reduce
general state revenues for the purposes of the calculation under
subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---