BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.88.140 and 2007 c 368 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, upon an arrest
for a suspected violation of patronizing a prostitute ((or)), promoting
prostitution in the first degree, promoting prostitution in the second
degree, promoting travel for prostitution, commercial sexual abuse of
a minor, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or promoting
travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, the arresting law
enforcement officer may impound the person's ((vehicle)) conveyance if
(((a))) (i) the ((motor vehicle)) conveyance was used in the commission
of the crime; (((b))) (ii) the person arrested is the owner of the
((vehicle)) conveyance; and (((c))) (iii) either (A) the person
arrested has previously been convicted of ((patronizing a prostitute,
under RCW 9A.88.110, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor, under RCW
9.68A.100)) one of the offenses listed in this subsection or (B) the
offense was committed within an area designated under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) A local governing authority may designate areas within which
conveyances are subject to impoundment under this section regardless of
whether the person arrested has previously been convicted of any of the
offenses listed in (a) of this subsection.
(i) The designation must be based on evidence indicating that the
area has a disproportionately higher number of arrests for the offenses
listed in (a) of this subsection as compared to other areas within the
same jurisdiction.
(ii) The local governing authority shall post signs at the
boundaries of the designated area to indicate that the area has been
designated under this subsection.
(2) Impoundments performed under this section shall be in
accordance with chapter 46.55 RCW and the impoundment order must
clearly state "prostitution hold."
(3)(a) Prior to redeeming the impounded conveyance, and in addition
to all applicable impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid to the
towing company under chapter 46.55 RCW, the owner of the impounded
conveyance must pay an administrative fee of five hundred dollars to
the impounding agency. The administrative fee shall be deposited in
the prostitution prevention and intervention account established under
RCW 43.63A.740.
(b) Upon receipt of the administrative fee paid under (a) of this
subsection, the impounding agency shall issue a written receipt to the
owner of the impounded conveyance.
(4)(a) In order to redeem a conveyance impounded under this
section, the owner must provide the towing company with the written
receipt issued under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(b) The written receipt issued under subsection (3)(b) of this
section authorizes the towing company to release the impounded
conveyance upon payment of all impoundment, towing, and storage fees.
(c) A towing company that relies on a forged receipt to release a
conveyance impounded under this section is not liable to the impounding
authority for any unpaid administrative fee under subsection (3)(a) of
this section.
(5)(a) In any proceeding under chapter 46.55 RCW to contest the
validity of an impoundment under this section where the claimant
substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to a full refund of
the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter 46.55 RCW
and the five hundred dollar administrative fee paid under subsection
(3) of this section.
(b) All refunds made under this section shall be paid by the
impounding agency.
(c) Prior to receiving any refund under this section, the claimant
must provide proof of payment.

--- END ---