BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.070 and 2006 c 263 s 614 are each amended to
read as follows:
Declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the following filing
officers:
(1) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for
statewide offices, United States senate, and United States house of
representatives;
(2) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for the
state legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court when
the candidate is seeking office in a district comprised of voters from
two or more counties((. The secretary of state and the county auditor
may accept declarations of candidacy for candidates for the state
legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court when the
candidate is seeking office in a district comprised of voters from one
county));
(3) The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan
office, other than judicial offices and school director in joint
districts, where voters from a district comprising more than one county
vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the
registered voters of the district reside. For school directors in
joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county designated by the superintendent
of public instruction as the county to which the joint school district
is considered as belonging under RCW 28A.323.040((;
(4) For all other purposes of this title, a declaration of
candidacy for the state legislature, the court of appeals, and the
superior court filed with the secretary of state shall be deemed to
have been filed with the county auditor when the candidate is seeking
office in a district composed of voters from one county)).
Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under
this section, within one business day following the closing of the
applicable filing period, shall transmit to the public disclosure
commission the information required in RCW 29A.24.031 (1) through (4)
for each declaration of candidacy filed in his or her office during
such filing period or a list containing the name of each candidate who
files such a declaration in his or her office during such filing period
together with a precise identification of the position sought by each
such candidate and the date on which each such declaration was filed.
Such official, within three days following his or her receipt of any
letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward
a copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.091 and 2006 c 206 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ((filing fee of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of
candidacy for precinct committee officer; a)) filing fee of ten dollars
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal
to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of filing
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum. No
filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any office for
which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a filing fee petition. The
petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of
registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee.
The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A statewide office, the United States senate, or the United
States house of representatives, the fee shall be paid to the secretary
of state;
(2) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district((.));
(((2))) (3) A legislative or judicial office that includes
territory from only one county((:
(a))), the fee shall be paid to the county auditor ((if the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the county
auditor;
(b) The fee shall be paid to the secretary of state if the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the secretary
of state. The secretary of state shall then promptly transmit the fee
to the county auditor of the county in which the legislative or
judicial office is located.));
(((3))) (4) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the
county auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for
deposit in the city or town treasury.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.80.041 and 2004 c 271 s 148 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any member of a major political party who is a registered voter in
the precinct may ((upon payment of a fee of one dollar)) file his or
her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under RCW 29A.24.031 with
the county auditor for the office of precinct committee officer of his
or her party in that precinct. When elected at the primary, the
precinct committee officer shall serve so long as the committee officer
remains an eligible voter in that precinct.

--- END ---