BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.233 and 2003 c 361 s 501 and 2003 c 196 s 401
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, the appearance of the background of all vehicle license plates
may vary in color and design but must be legible and clearly
identifiable as a Washington state license plate, as designated by the
department. Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and
reflectivity, the department shall periodically provide for the
replacement of license plates, except for commercial vehicles with a
gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. Frequency of
replacement shall be established in accordance with empirical studies
documenting the longevity of the reflective materials used to make
license plates.
(2) Special license plate series approved by the special license
plate review board created under RCW 46.16.705 and enacted by the
legislature may display a symbol or artwork approved by the special
license plate review board.
(3) By November 1, 2003, in providing for the periodic replacement
of license plates, the department shall offer to vehicle owners the
option of retaining their current license plate numbers. ((The
department shall charge a retention fee of twenty dollars if this
option is exercised. Revenue generated from the retention fee must be
deposited into the multimodal transportation account.))

--- END ---