BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.233 and 2003 c 361 s 501 and 2003 c 196 s 401
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, the appearance of the background of all vehicle license plates
may vary in color and design but must be legible and clearly
identifiable as a Washington state license plate, as designated by the
department.
((Additionally,)) (2) To ensure maximum legibility and
reflectivity, the department ((shall periodically provide for the
replacement of license plates)) may replace license plates upon request
of the current vehicle owner if the functional lifetime of the plates
has been exceeded, except for commercial vehicles with a gross weight
in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. ((Frequency of replacement
shall)) The department shall not require the replacement of license
plates at other times. The functional lifetime of a license plate must
be established in accordance with empirical studies documenting the
longevity of the reflective materials used to make license plates.
(((2))) (3) The department may, upon the transfer of a vehicle,
require the new vehicle owner to replace the license plates at the same
time the new owner registers the vehicle if the vehicle's existing
license plates have exceeded their functional lifetime.
(4) Special license plate series approved by the special license
plate review board created under RCW 46.16.705 and enacted by the
legislature may display a symbol or artwork approved by the special
license plate review board.
(((3))) (5) By November 1, 2003, in providing for the periodic
replacement of license plates, the department shall offer to vehicle
owners the option of retaining their current license plate numbers.
The department shall charge a retention fee of twenty dollars if this
option is exercised. Revenue generated from the retention fee must be
deposited into the multimodal transportation account.

--- END ---