BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.14.024 and 2008 c 328 s 6005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local government archives account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected by the county auditors under RCW
40.14.027 and 36.22.175 for local government services, such as
providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and
storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local
government records and digital data and access to those records and
data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives
and records management, must be deposited into the account, and
expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes.
((During the 2007-2009 biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
local government archives account to the Washington state heritage
center account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
account.))

Sec. 2 RCW 36.22.175 and 2008 c 328 s 6006 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to any other charge authorized by law, the
county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument
for each document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge
shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the
local government archives account under RCW 40.14.024. These funds
shall be used solely for providing records scheduling, security
microfilm inspection and storage, archival preservation, cataloging,
and indexing for local government records and digital data and access
to those records and data through the regional branch archives of the
division of archives and records management.
(b) The division of archives and records management within the
office of the secretary of state shall provide records management
training for local governments and shall establish a competitive grant
program to solicit and prioritize project proposals from local
governments for potential funding to be paid for by funds from the
auditor surcharge and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for
specific projects may be made by local government agencies only. The
state archivist in consultation with the advisory committee established
under RCW 40.14.027 shall adopt rules governing project eligibility,
evaluation, awarding of grants, and other criteria including
requirements for records management training for grant recipients.
(2) The advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall
review grant proposals and establish a prioritized list of projects to
be considered for funding by January 1st of each even-numbered year,
beginning in 2002. The evaluation of proposals and development of the
prioritized list must be developed through open public meetings.
Funding for projects shall be granted according to the ranking of each
application on the prioritized list and projects will be funded only to
the extent that funds are available. A grant award may have an
effective date other than the date the project is placed on the
prioritized list.
(3)(a) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the
county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument
for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
monthly for deposit in the local government archives account under RCW
40.14.024 to be used exclusively for((: (i))) the construction and
improvement of a specialized regional facility located in eastern
Washington designed to serve the archives, records management, and
digital data management needs of local government((; and (ii) payment
of the certificate of participation issued for the Washington state
heritage center to the extent there is an excess fund balance in the
account and fees generated under RCW 36.18.010 and 43.07.128 are
insufficient to meet debt service payments on the certificate of
participation)).
(b) To the extent the facilities are used for the storage and
retrieval of state agency records and digital data, that portion of the
construction of such facilities used for state government records and
data shall be supported by other charges and fees paid by state
agencies and shall not be supported by the surcharge authorized in this
subsection((, except that to the extent there is an excess fund balance
in the account and fees generated under RCW 36.18.010 and 43.07.128 are
insufficient to meet debt service payments for the Washington state
heritage center, the local government archives account under RCW
40.14.024 may be used for the Washington state heritage center)).
(c) At such time that all debt service from construction of the
specialized regional archive facility located in eastern Washington has
been paid, fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this subsection
shall be reverted to the centennial document preservation and
modernization account as prescribed in RCW 36.22.170 and fifty percent
of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be reverted to the
state treasurer for deposit in the archives and records management
account to serve the archives, records management, and digital data
management needs of local government((, except that the state treasurer
shall not revert funds to the centennial document preservation and
modernization account and to the archives and records management
account if fees generated under RCW 36.18.010 and 43.07.128 are
insufficient to meet debt service payments on the Washington state
heritage center)).

Sec. 3 2008 c 328 s 6010 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Education Construction Account: For transfer to
the Common School Construction, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,930,000

Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
Common School Construction Account, an
amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,063,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For
transfer to the Washington Housing Trust
Account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the Washington Housing Trust Account, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

((Local Government Archives Account: For transfer to
the Washington State Heritage Center Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000))

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account: For
transfer to the Washington State Heritage
Center Account in July 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Municipal Revolving Account: For transfer to the
Washington State Heritage Center Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
State Toxics Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

--- END ---