BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate, as a nondeductible
item, out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance to school
districts for the original construction of any school plant facility
the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be
expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of
works of art. The works of art may be placed in accordance with
Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the state Constitution on public lands,
integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached
within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable
exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or
exhibited in other public facilities. The Washington state arts
commission shall, in consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction, determine the amount to be made available for the purchase
of works of art under this section, and payments therefor shall be made
in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites,
selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design,
execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange,
or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the
Washington state arts commission in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards of directors. The superintendent of public instruction
and the school district board of directors of the districts where the
sites are selected shall have the right to:
(((1))) (a) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(((2))) (b) Appoint a representative to the body established by the
Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process
with full voting rights;
(((3))) (c) Reject the results of the selection process;
(((4))) (d) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of
art on school district premises if such works are portable.
Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall
not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds
available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected
under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art
under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts
commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for
the administration, including conservation of the state art collection,
by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation
of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not
include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.
The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.
(2) During the 2009-2011 biennium, one hundred percent of moneys
appropriated for the original construction of any school plant facility
may be used for the original construction.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.027 and 2005 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out
of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or any major
renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of
any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation
to be expended by the Washington state arts commission with the
approval of the board of regents or trustees for the acquisition of
works of art. The works of art may be placed on public lands of
institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure of institutions of higher education, detached
within or outside a public building or structure of institutions of
higher education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of
a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities.
(2) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of
one percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the
administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of
the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and
all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this
section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other
buildings of a temporary nature.
(3) During the 2009-2011 biennium, one hundred percent of moneys
appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or
remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building may
be used for the original construction, renovation, or remodel.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all state
agencies including all state departments, boards, councils,
commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as a
nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art
may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half
of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to
provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including
conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts
commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the
purpose of this section building shall not include highway construction
sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.
(2) During the 2009-2011 biennium, one hundred percent of moneys
appropriated for the original construction of any public building may
be used for the original construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---