BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.735 and 2006 c 294 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state, to cause the photographing and
fingerprinting of all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested for the
commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross
misdemeanor. (a) When such juveniles are brought directly to a
juvenile detention facility, the juvenile court administrator is also
authorized, but not required, to cause the photographing,
fingerprinting, and record transmittal to the appropriate law
enforcement agency; and (b) a further exception may be made when the
arrest is for a violation punishable as a gross misdemeanor and the
arrested person is not taken into custody.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2010, it is the duty of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and of every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies duly operating within this state, to cause the collection of
biological samples for DNA identification analysis from all adults
lawfully arrested for the commission of any criminal offense
constituting a most serious offense under RCW 9.94A.030, a sex offense
under chapter 9A.44 RCW, or any of the following crimes:
Assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation (RCW 9A.36.041,
9.94A.835)
Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)
Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)
Patronizing a prostitute (RCW 9A.88.110)
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)
Violation of a sexual assault protection order granted under
chapter 7.90 RCW.
(b) Biological samples collected under this subsection shall be:
(i) Collected using the same technique biological samples are
collected under RCW 43.43.754;
(ii) Forwarded to the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol for inclusion in the DNA identification system
established under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.759; and
(iii) Used solely for the purposes of inclusion in the DNA
identification system established under RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.759.
(c) This subsection applies to all adults arrested on or after
January 1, 2010.
(d) This subsection does not apply unless:
(i) Federal funding is provided to the state to reimburse local
governments and the Washington state patrol for the cost of biological
sample collection and testing under this subsection; and
(ii) The chief of the Washington state patrol notifies the sheriff
or director of public safety of every county, the chief of police of
every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies operating within this state that funds are available to
reimburse the costs of collection of biological samples for DNA
identification analysis.
(3) It shall be the right, but not the duty, of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies operating within this state to photograph and record the
fingerprints of all adults lawfully arrested.
(((3))) (4) Such sheriffs, directors of public safety, chiefs of
police, and other chief law enforcement officers, may record, in
addition to photographs and fingerprints, the palmprints, soleprints,
toeprints, or any other identification data of all persons whose
photograph and fingerprints are required or allowed to be taken under
this section when in the discretion of such law enforcement officers it
is necessary for proper identification of the arrested person or the
investigation of the crime with which he is charged.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.754 and 2008 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A biological sample must be collected for purposes of DNA
identification analysis from:
(a) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony, or
any of the following crimes (or equivalent juvenile offenses):
Assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation (RCW 9A.36.041,
9.94A.835)
Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)
Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.170)
Failure to register (RCW 9A.44.130)
Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)
Patronizing a prostitute (RCW 9A.88.110)
Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.096)
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)
Violation of a sexual assault protection order granted under
chapter 7.90 RCW; and
(b) Every adult or juvenile individual who is required to register
under RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) If the Washington state patrol crime laboratory already has a
DNA sample from an individual for a qualifying offense, a subsequent
submission is not required to be submitted.
(3) Biological samples shall be collected in the following manner:
(a) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection
(1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of
corrections facility, and do serve a term of confinement in a city or
county jail facility, the city or county shall be responsible for
obtaining the biological samples.
(b) The local police department or sheriff's office shall be
responsible for obtaining the biological samples for:
(i) Persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of
this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense
who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections
facility, and do not serve a term of confinement in a city or county
jail facility; and
(ii) Persons who are required to register under RCW ((9A.44.030))
9A.44.130.
(c) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection
(1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in
a department of corrections facility or a department of social and
health services facility, the facility holding the person shall be
responsible for obtaining the biological samples. For those persons
incarcerated before June 12, 2008, who have not yet had a biological
sample collected, priority shall be given to those persons who will be
released the soonest.
(4)(a) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 and
43.43.752 through 43.43.758 ((may be retained by the forensic
laboratory services bureau, and)) and sent to the forensic laboratory
services bureau shall be analyzed unless a searchable DNA profile for
the offender has previously been entered in the DNA profile system.
The searchable DNA profile shall be entered into the DNA identification
system only after the accused has been charged for the offense. The
original biological sample shall be retained through the disposition of
the underlying criminal case that caused the biological sample to be
taken.
(b) Upon conviction, the biological sample and searchable DNA
profile shall remain in the DNA identification system.
(c) The biological sample shall be destroyed and the DNA profile
shall be removed from the DNA identification system if:
(i) Following arrest, the accused is not charged within the
applicable charging period;
(ii) The accused has been found not guilty or has been acquitted of
any offense that would require a biological sample to be collected
under RCW 43.43.735; or
(iii) The underlying conviction or adjudication serving as the
basis for taking the biological sample has been reversed and the case
dismissed.
(5) The searchable DNA profile shall be sent to the federal bureau
of investigation for a one-time keyboard search but may be entered in
the combined DNA index system only after the accused has been found
guilty and all right of appeal has lapsed, been waived, or been
exhausted.
(6) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 and
43.43.752 shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or
other tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal
offense or for the identification of human remains or missing persons.
Nothing in this section prohibits the submission of results derived
from the biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation
combined DNA index system.
(((5))) (7) The forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol is responsible for testing performed on all
biological samples that are collected under subsection (1) of this
section, to the extent allowed by funding available for this purpose.
The director shall give priority to testing on samples collected from
those adults or juveniles convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty
of an equivalent juvenile offense that is defined as a sex offense or
a violent offense in RCW 9.94A.030. Known duplicate samples may be
excluded from testing unless testing is deemed necessary or advisable
by the director.
(((6))) (8) This section applies to:
(a) All adults and juveniles to whom this section applied prior to
June 12, 2008;
(b) All adults and juveniles to whom this section did not apply
prior to June 12, 2008, who:
(i) Are convicted on or after June 12, 2008, of an offense listed
in subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
(ii) Were convicted prior to June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in
subsection (1)(a) of this section and are still incarcerated on or
after June 12, 2008; and
(c) All adults and juveniles who are required to register under RCW
9A.44.130 on or after June 12, 2008, whether convicted before, on, or
after June 12, 2008.
(((7))) (9) This section creates no rights in a third person. No
cause of action may be brought based upon the noncollection or
nonanalysis or the delayed collection or analysis of a biological
sample authorized to be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(((8))) (10) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based
upon a database match or database information is not invalidated if it
is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by
mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 or
43.43.752 through 43.43.758 shall be used solely for the purpose of
providing DNA or other tests for identification analysis and
prosecution of a criminal offense, or for the identification of human
remains or missing persons.
(2) Any person who prevails in a court action seeking damages for
misuse or unauthorized retention of a biological sample or DNA profile
under this section or for violation of RCW 43.43.754 (4)(b) or (c)
shall be awarded all costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
incurred in connection with the action. In addition, the court shall
award not less than one thousand dollars total or ten dollars for each
day of the violation, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any misuse or unauthorized retention of a biological sample or
DNA profile taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 or 43.43.752 through
43.43.758 is a class C felony.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "misuse" means any purpose
other than providing DNA or other tests for identification analysis and
prosecution of a criminal offense, or for the identification of human
remains or missing persons.

--- END ---