BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.093 and 2005 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
first degree when: (a) The person has, or knowingly causes another
person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with
another person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen
years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at
least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within
that relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under
the age of eighteen to engage in sexual intercourse with the victim;
(b) the person is a school employee who has, or knowingly causes
another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse
with a registered student of the same school who is at least sixteen
years old but less than twenty years old and not married to the
employee, if the employee is at least sixty months older than the
student; or (c) the person is a foster parent who has, or knowingly
causes another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual
intercourse with his or her foster child who is at least sixteen.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree is a class
C felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.096 and 2005 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
second degree when: (a) The person has, or knowingly causes another
person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another
person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years
old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least
sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant relationship to
the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within that relationship
in order to engage in or cause another person under the age of eighteen
to engage in sexual contact with the victim; (b) the person is a school
employee who has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of
eighteen to have, sexual contact with a registered student of the same
school who is at least sixteen years old but less than twenty years old
and not married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty
months older than the student; or (c) the person is a foster parent who
has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to
have, sexual contact with his or her foster child who is at least
sixteen.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

--- END ---