BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.0265 (Exemptions -- Sales to nonresidents of tangible
personal property which becomes a component of property of the
nonresident by installing, repairing, etc. -- Labor and services for
installing, repairing, etc) and 1980 c 37 s 32;
(2) RCW 82.08.0268 (Exemptions -- Sales of machinery and implements,
and related parts and labor, for farming to nonresidents for use
outside the state) and 1998 c 167 s 1 & 1980 c 37 s 35;
(3) RCW 82.08.0269 (Exemptions -- Sales for use in states,
territories, and possessions of the United States which are not
contiguous to any other state) and 1980 c 37 s 36; and
(4) RCW 82.08.0273 (Exemptions -- Sales to nonresidents of tangible
personal property for use outside the state -- Proof of nonresident
status -- Penalties) and 2007 c 135 s 2, 2003 c 53 s 399, 1993 c 444 s 1,
1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The repeals in section 1, chapter. . ., Laws
of 2009 (section 1 of this act) do not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the statutes
repealed or under any rule or order adopted under those statutes nor do
they affect any proceeding instituted under them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---