BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I. OFFICE OF CONSUMER EDUCATION FOR HOME CONSTRUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of consumer education for home construction is
created in the office of the attorney general to be the primary point
of contact for consumers in matters related to residential purchases
and construction.
(2) The office of consumer education for home construction shall:
(a) Educate consumers about residential purchase and sale
agreements and contracting for residential construction services,
including the requirements of chapter 18.27 RCW and methods available
to protect themselves against loss;
(b) Produce written and electronic consumer education materials
about purchasing homes, contracting for residential construction
services, and legal resources available to consumers;
(c) Create a pamphlet explaining a homeowner's legal rights and
remedies and provide contractors and other construction professionals
with a downloadable version of the pamphlet to attach to contracts for
purchase and sale of new residential real property or the substantial
remodel of existing residential real property. The office shall
periodically update this pamphlet;
(d) Identify and work collaboratively with agencies and
organizations who are already engaged in consumer education efforts
regarding residential purchases and construction, such as the
department of labor and industries, the department of licensing, local
governments, the construction industry, financial institutions, and
other interested organizations and individuals, to increase outreach to
consumers;
(e) Share consumer education materials with and serve as a resource
for agencies and organizations who are already engaged in consumer
education;
(f) Develop a uniform manner of receiving, cataloging, analyzing,
and responding to consumer complaints about residential construction,
and develop a system of tracking resolutions of complaints and of
claims received under section 8 of this act;
(g) Identify which agencies and organizations are already receiving
complaints and coordinate with them to ensure that all agencies and
organizations are requesting the same information from complaining
consumers and that all consumers are referred to the office;
(h) Enter into data-sharing agreements with the department of labor
and industries, local governments, and other agencies with enforcement
duties in residential construction to increase assistance to consumers
and enforcement of construction-related laws;
(i) Report to the legislature on an annual basis the total number
of complaints about residential construction received and the total
number of claims filed under section 8 of this act. For complaints,
the office of consumer education for home construction shall summarize
the nature of the complaints. For claims, the office of consumer
education for home construction shall summarize the nature of the
claims, the monetary value of the claims, whether claims have been
resolved, and any other information that the office deems relevant.
The first report is due on January 1, 2010, and subsequent reports are
due on November 1st of each year thereafter; and
(j) Examine issues involved in establishing a recovery fund to
provide compensation to residential real property homeowners through a
claim filing process. The office of consumer education for home
construction shall consult with appropriate agencies and
representatives from organizations involved in the area of residential
construction. The office of consumer education for home construction
shall make recommendations to the legislature on the creation of a
recovery fund by December 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.075 and 2001 c 159 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall charge a fee of one hundred dollars for
issuing or renewing a certificate of registration during the 2001-2003
biennium. The department shall revise this amount at least once every
two years for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected
by the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW.
(2) The department shall also charge a consumer education fee of
one hundred dollars per year for issuing or renewing a certificate of
registration to a contractor who discloses, as required under RCW
18.27.030, that he or she will perform both residential and commercial
work or only residential work. A contractor who discloses that he or
she will perform only commercial work is not required to pay the fee.
The department shall deposit the fee in the consumer education for home
construction account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The consumer education for home construction account is created in
the custody of the state treasury for the purpose of funding the office
of consumer education for home construction. All fees charged under
RCW 18.27.075(2) and filing fees charged under section 8 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only to fund the office of consumer education for home
construction. Only the home construction board created under section
6 of this act or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition
propensity account, the consumer education for home construction
account, and the reading achievement account. However, the earnings to
be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 6 through 10 of this act the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Board" means the home construction board created in section 6
of this act.
(2) "Claim" means a claim filed with the board against a
construction professional under section 8 of this act and does not mean
a complaint as that term is used in section 1 of this act.
(3) "Construction professional" means a builder, builder vendor,
contractor, subcontractor, or inspector, performing or furnishing the
design, supervision, inspection, construction, or observation of the
construction, of any improvement to residential real property, whether
operating as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
business entity. "Construction professional" does not include a
supplier of materials who has otherwise had no involvement in
performing or furnishing the design, supervision, inspection,
construction, or observation of the construction, of any improvement to
residential real property. "Construction professional" does not
include an inspector who is an agent or employee of a local government
and acting in his or her official capacity as an inspector.
(4) "Contractor" means a contractor, as defined in RCW 18.27.010,
that is registered with the department of labor and industries under
chapter 18.27 RCW.
(5) "Damages" means the cost of repairs, or if the cost of repairs
is clearly disproportionate to the loss in market value, damages is the
loss in market value.
(6) "Defect" means a deficiency, an inadequacy, or an insufficiency
arising out of or relating to the construction, alteration, or repair
of residential real property. "Defect" also includes a deficiency, an
inadequacy, or an insufficiency in a system, component, or material
incorporated into residential real property.
(7) "Homeowner" means a person or persons owning residential real
property. "Homeowner" does not include government agencies, political
subdivisions, financial institutions, and any other entity that
purchases, guarantees, or insures a loan secured by real property.
"Homeowner" also does not include the spouse, domestic partner, or
personal representative of the contractor named in the claim filed
under section 8 of this act.
(8) "Residential real property" has the same meaning as in section
14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The home construction board is established within the office of
consumer education for home construction to administer a residential
real property homeowner and construction professional early resolution
mediation program.
(2) The purpose of the board is to provide homeowners and
construction professionals with a cost-effective and time efficient
process to resolve disputes arising from alleged construction.
(3) The board consists of the following seven members:
(a) Three members possessing a minimum of ten years of experience
in the construction of residences and directly, or as employees or
officers of a firm, registered under chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) One member possessing a minimum of ten years of experience in
the remodeling of residences and directly, or as employees or officers
of a firm, registered under chapter 18.27 RCW;
(c) One building inspector employed by a city or county; and
(d) Two members of the general public.
(4) Members of the board shall be appointed by the governor with
consent of the senate. The governor shall appoint initial members of
the board to staggered terms of from two to four years. Thereafter,
all members shall be appointed to full four-year terms. Members of the
board hold office until their successors are appointed. A vacancy
shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired
portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs.
(5) The board shall select from its members a chair person, vice-chair person, and any other officer the board determines is necessary
to perform its duties.
(6) The board shall meet a minimum of four times per year to carry
out its functions.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement the board's duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall investigate and mediate claims filed by a
homeowner against a construction professional for alleged construction
defects to residential real property.
(2) The board may use the services of neutral third-party experts
to assist the board in investigating, assessing, and mediating claims.
The board may rely on the national building standards and other
recognized standards or codes that the board finds appropriate in
investigating and assessing the claim.
(3) The board shall dismiss a claim if the board determines that
the claim is against a contractor who is not registered under chapter
18.27 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A homeowner of residential real property alleging that a
construction professional has performed defective work must, prior to
commencing an action against the construction professional, file a
claim against the construction professional with the board.
(2) The claim shall be in the form required by the board, and shall
include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and mailing address of the homeowner or the
homeowner's legal representative, if any;
(b) The address and location of the residential real property;
(c) The names and addresses of the construction professionals, to
the extent known to the homeowner, who performed the work;
(d) Whether the work performed involved construction of new
residential real property or a substantial remodel of residential real
property and the date that the homeowner took possession of the new
residential real property or, for a substantial remodel, the date the
work was substantially completed or the project was terminated;
(e) A description of the defective work performed and the actual or
estimated costs of repair;
(f) Any report, estimates, and other documents evidencing the
defect and the costs of repair;
(g) Whether there is a written contract between the construction
professional and the homeowner and whether the contract contains
warranties related to the work performed or the materials used.
(3) The board may not process a claim against a construction
professional unless the claim is filed with the board within the
applicable statute of limitations.
(4) When a claim is filed with the board within the applicable
statute of limitations, the filing of the claim tolls any applicable
statute of limitations and any applicable statute of repose for
construction-related claims for the period of time until fifteen days
after the board provides written notice of completion of mediation.
(5) Any action commenced in court by a homeowner prior to
compliance with the requirements of this section shall be subject to
dismissal without prejudice, and may not be recommenced until the
homeowner has complied with the requirements of this section.
(6) The board by rule may impose a processing fee for claims filed
under this section not to exceed one hundred dollars. The fee shall be
deposited into the consumer education for home construction account
created under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a claim, the board shall give written notice to
the construction professional against whom the claim is made. The
notice of the claim shall describe the claim in reasonable detail
sufficient to determine the nature of the defect.
(2) Within twenty-one days after service of the notice of claim,
the construction professional shall serve a written response on the
homeowner by registered mail or personal service. The written response
shall:
(a) Propose to inspect the residence that is the subject of the
claim and to complete the inspection within a specified time frame.
The proposal shall include the statement that the construction
professional shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy the
defect, compromise by payment, or dispute the claim;
(b) Offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment
without inspection. A construction professional's offer under this
subsection (2)(b) to compromise and settle a homeowner's claim may
include, but is not limited to, an express offer to purchase the
homeowner's residence that is the subject of the claim, and to pay the
homeowner's reasonable relocation costs; or
(c) State that the construction professional disputes the claim and
will neither remedy the defect nor compromise and settle the claim.
(3)(a) If the construction professional disputes the claim or does
not respond to the notice of claim within the time stated in subsection
(2) of this section, the board shall commence an investigation and
mediation of the claim.
(b) If the homeowner rejects the inspection proposal or the
settlement offer made by the construction professional pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, the homeowner shall serve written
notice of the rejection on the construction professional and the board.
After service of the rejection, the board shall commence an
investigation and mediation of the claim.
(c) If the construction professional has not received from the
homeowner, within thirty days after the homeowner's receipt of the
construction professional's response, either an acceptance or rejection
of the inspection proposal or settlement offer, then at anytime
thereafter the construction professional may terminate the proposal or
offer by serving written notice to the homeowner, and the board shall
commence an investigation and mediation of the claim.
(4)(a) If the homeowner elects to allow the construction
professional to inspect in accordance with the construction
professional's proposal pursuant to this section, the homeowner shall
provide the construction professional and its contractors or other
agents reasonable access to the homeowner's residence during normal
working hours to inspect the premises and the claimed defect.
(b) Within fourteen days following completion of the inspection,
the construction professional shall serve on the homeowner:
(i) A written offer to remedy the defect at no cost to the
homeowner, including a report of the scope of the inspection, the
findings and results of the inspection, a description of the additional
construction necessary to remedy the defect, and a timetable for the
completion of such construction;
(ii) A written offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary
payment pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; or
(iii) A written statement that the construction professional will
not proceed further to remedy the defect.
(c) If the construction professional does not proceed further to
remedy the defect within the agreed timetable, or if the construction
professional fails to comply with the provisions of (b) of this
subsection, the homeowner shall provide written notification to the
board. The board shall commence an investigation and mediation of the
claim.
(d) If the homeowner rejects the offer made by the construction
professional pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection to either
remedy the defect or to compromise and settle the claim by monetary
payment, the homeowner shall serve written notice of the rejection on
the construction professional and the board. After service of the
rejection notice, the board shall commence an investigation and
mediation of the claim.
(e) If the construction professional has not received from the
homeowner, within thirty days after the homeowner's receipt of the
construction professional's response, either an acceptance or rejection
of the offer made pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, then
at anytime thereafter the construction professional may terminate the
offer by serving written notice to the homeowner.
(5)(a) Any homeowner accepting the offer of a construction
professional to remedy the defect pursuant to subsection (4)(b)(i) of
this section shall do so by serving the construction professional with
a written notice of acceptance within a reasonable time period after
receipt of the offer, and no later than thirty days after receipt of
the offer. The homeowner shall also send a copy of the written notice
of acceptance to the board. The homeowner shall provide the
construction professional and its contractors or other agents
reasonable access to the homeowner's residence during normal working
hours to perform and complete the construction by the timetable stated
in the offer.
(b) The homeowner and construction professional may, by written
mutual agreement, alter the extent of construction or the timetable for
completion of construction stated in the offer including, but not
limited to, repair of additional defects.
(6) Compliance with this section satisfies the requirements of RCW
64.50.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If, after compliance with the procedures established in section
9 of this act, a resolution has not been reached between the homeowner
and construction professional, the board shall investigate the claim.
(2) The board may use the services of neutral third-party experts
to conduct on-site investigations, make recommendations to the board,
and assist the board in investigating and mediating claims.
(3) After the investigation is complete, the board shall provide
the parties with notification of the findings of the investigation. If
the parties do not provide the board with written notification within
fourteen days after receipt of the findings that the parties have
resolved the claim, the board shall mediate the claim.
(4) The mediation shall be conducted by a panel of three members of
the board in accordance with rules adopted by the board.
(5) All proceedings of the mediation conference, including any
statement made by any party, attorney, or other participant, shall be
privileged and not reported, recorded, placed in evidence, used for
impeachment, made known to a court or jury, or construed for any
purpose as an admission. No party shall be bound by anything done or
said at the mediation conference unless a settlement is reached, in
which event the agreement upon a settlement shall be reduced to writing
and shall be binding upon all parties to that agreement.
(6) At the conclusion of the mediation, the board shall provide a
written notice of the completion of mediation to the parties. The
notice shall include a statement of the results of the mediation and a
copy of any written settlement agreement between the parties. If the
parties did not reach an agreement, the notice shall include a
statement that the parties may pursue any other right or remedy
provided under statutory or common law. However, a homeowner who files
an action under the common law implied warranty of habitability waives
any available claim under express contract warranties. A homeowner who
files a claim under express contract warranties waives any claim under
the common law implied warranty of habitability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall maintain and make available to the office of
consumer education for home construction a record of all claims filed
with the board against construction professionals under this chapter
and the outcomes of those claims.
(2) The office of consumer education for home construction shall
compile a summary of the claims into a report for the legislature as
required under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of RCW 64.50.020 do not apply to a claim filed with
the home construction board under sections 8 through 10 of this act.

PART II. RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY WARRANTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The common law implied warranty of habitability may not be
disclaimed, waived, modified, or limited by contractual agreement. A
provision of any contract for the purchase or sale of newly constructed
residential property that purports to disclaim, waive, modify, or limit
the implied warranty of habitability is void and unenforceable.
(2) The common law implied warranty of habitability for newly
constructed residential real property extends to any homeowner who
purchases the property within six years of its construction, and is not
limited to the initial owner-occupant of the property. A homeowner who
purchases the property subsequent to the initial owner-occupant, and
within six years of the construction of the property, receives the same
protections of the common law implied warranty of habitability as
possessed by the person from whom the property was purchased.
(3) Damages awarded for a breach of the implied warranty of
habitability are the cost of repairs. However, if it is established
that the cost of repairs is clearly disproportionate to the loss in
market value caused by the breach, damages are limited to the loss in
market value.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every contract for the sale or construction of new residential
real property shall provide for written express warranties to the
purchaser or owner of the residential real property.
(2) The express warranties shall meet the following requirements:
(a) The express warranties must assure timely resolution of
homeowners' complaints or claims covered under (j) of this subsection.
(b) The entire cost to the homeowner for the express warranties
coverage must be prepaid by the entity providing the express
warranties, or the express warranties issuer must give irrevocable
coverage, at the time of settlement.
(c) Unexpired express warranties coverage must be automatically
transferred, without additional cost, to subsequent homeowners.
(d) Issued express warranties coverage must be noncancellable by
the express warranties issuer or by its insurance backers.
(e) Exclusions from express warranties coverage must not defeat
coverage objectives stated in (j) of this subsection and must permit
normal homeowner use of the covered property, including normal
maintenance and emergency property protection measures.
(f)(i) Unless prohibited by applicable law, express warranties
must, at a minimum, stipulate that all homeowner complaints covered by
express warranties, including those regarding construction deficiencies
and structural defects claims, will be settled in the amount of their
actual cost to correct or for the original sales price of the property,
whichever is the lesser, subject to a deductible not to exceed a total
of two hundred fifty dollars for all claims filed by a homeowner during
the first two years of coverage and not to exceed a maximum of two
hundred fifty dollars per claim during the third through the tenth year
of coverage.
(ii) A homeowner shall be liable for a deductible only if the
entity providing the express warranties defaults on warranty
performance and the express warranties issuer has to make the covered
corrections. When the entity providing the express warranties performs
corrections under the warranties, no deductible that may be included in
the express warranties is applicable.
(g) In the event of any dispute regarding a homeowner complaint or
structural defect claim, express warranties must, unless prohibited by
applicable law, provide for binding arbitration proceedings arranged
through a nationally recognized dispute settlement organization. The
sharing of arbitration charges shall be as determined by the express
warranties. Express warranties must contain prearbitration
conciliation provisions at no cost to the homeowner, and provision for
judicial resolution of disputes, but arbitration, which must be
available to a homeowner during the entire term of the coverage
contract, must be an assured recourse for a dissatisfied homeowner.
(h) An express warranties issuer must provide homeowners an
executed coverage contract clearly describing:
(i) The identity of the property covered;
(ii) The time at which coverage begins;
(iii) The maximum amount of express warranties liability;
(iv) Noncancellability of the coverage contract by the express
warranties or its insurance backers;
(v) No-cost transferability of unexpired coverage to successors in
title;
(vi) The property coverage provided;
(vii) Any exclusions from coverage;
(viii) Performance standards for resolving homeowner complaints and
claims, if standards for complaint and claim adjustment are promulgated
as part of the express warranties;
(ix) Dispute settlement procedures;
(x) The names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the express
warranties issuer and its insurance backers; and
(xi) When, to whom, under what conditions, and to what address
homeowners should submit any construction deficiency complaints or
structural defects claims.
(i) Express warranties will not be required to warrant that a
covered property complies with:
(i) Original dwelling plans and specifications;
(ii) Applicable building codes; or
(iii) Specific terms of a homeowner's contract to purchase a
property.
(j) Express warranties coverage must take effect at closing or
settlement following the initial sale of the property to the homeowner
and must include the following minimum level of coverage:
(i) During the first year of coverage, the express warranties must
provide for a warranty against defects in workmanship and materials
resulting from the failure of the covered property to comply with
standards of quality as measured by acceptable trade practices, as well
as correct the problems with, or restore the reliable function of,
appliances and equipment damaged during installation or improperly
installed. The express warranties must also cover structural defects
as defined in subsection (4) of this section.
(ii) During the first and second year of coverage, the express
warranties must provide a warranty against defects in the wiring,
piping, and ductwork in the electrical, plumbing, heating, cooling,
ventilating, and mechanical systems.
(iii) Basement slabs in designated areas must be covered by a
warranty against damage from the first through the fourth year.
(iv) From the first through the tenth year, structural defect, as
defined in subsection (4) of this section, except as provided in
(j)(iii) of this subsection, must be covered by a warranty in the
express warranties.
(k) The express warranties must provide insurance coverage for
default on any warranty obligation.
(3) This section does not apply to condominiums subject to chapter
64.34 RCW.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Construction deficiencies" are defects, not of a structural
nature, in residential real property covered by express warranties that
are attributable to poor workmanship or to the use of inferior
materials which result in the impaired functioning of the residential
real property or some part thereof. Defects resulting from homeowner
abuse or from normal wear and tear are not considered construction
deficiencies.
(b) "Residential real property" means a single-family home, a
duplex, a triplex, or a quadraplex.
(c) "Structural defect" is actual physical damage to the designated
load-bearing portions of residential real property caused by failure of
such load-bearing portions that affects their load-bearing functions to
the extent that the structure becomes unsafe, unsanitary, or otherwise
unlivable. "Load-bearing components" for the purpose of defining
structural defects are defined as follows: Footing and foundation
systems; beams; girders; lintels; columns; load-bearing walls and
partitions; roof framing systems; and floor systems. "Structural
defect" does not include damage to the following nonload-bearing
portions of the structure: Roofing; drywall and plaster; exterior
siding; brick, stone, or stucco veneer; floor covering material; wall
tile and other wall coverings; nonload-bearing walls and partitions;
concrete floors in attached garages; electrical; plumbing, heating,
cooling, and ventilation systems; appliances, fixtures, and items of
equipment; paint; doors and windows; trim, cabinets, hardware, and
insulation.

PART III. CONTRACTOR REGISTRATION
Sec. 15 RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) and (d) of this
subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in Washington.
(f) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(g) Type of work performed, whether residential, commercial, or
both.
(h) The name ((and)), address, social security number, date of
birth, and driver's license number of each partner if the applicant is
a firm or partnership, or the name ((and)), address, social security
number, date of birth, and driver's license number of the owner if the
applicant is an individual proprietorship, or the name ((and)),
address, social security number, date of birth, and driver's license
number of the corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the
applicant is a corporation, or the name ((and)), address, social
security number, date of birth, and driver's license number of all
members of other business entities. The information contained in such
application is a matter of public record and open to public inspection.
(i) The registration numbers and unified business identifier
account numbers of previously or currently registered businesses
involving the same owner, principal, or officer as the applicant.
(j) Disclosure of any bankruptcy proceedings filed by or against
the applicant.
(k) Information about any construction licenses, certifications, or
registrations that have been issued to the applicant by other states.
The applicant shall also provide details about any denials,
suspensions, revocations, or any enforcement actions related to
construction against the applicant by other states.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the
department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter
as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an owner,
principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity
that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action
that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes
the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department
determines that the applicant has falsified information on the
application, unless the error was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the applicant
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue; or (vi) the department has determined that a
different state has taken enforcement action against the applicant for
activities that would be a violation of this chapter if they had
occurred in Washington state.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if: (i)
The department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied
final judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter;
(ii) the department has determined that the registrant is a sole
proprietor or an owner, principal, or officer of a registered
contractor that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work
within the scope of this chapter; (iii) the registrant does not
maintain a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the
department has determined that the registrant falsified information on
the application, unless the error was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the
registrant does not have an active and valid certificate of
registration with the department of revenue; or (vi) the department has
determined that a different state has taken enforcement action against
the registrant for activities that would be a violation of this chapter
if they had occurred in Washington state.
(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the
department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer
of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous
partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
A registered contractor, by or against whom a petition in
bankruptcy has been filed, shall notify the department of the
proceedings in bankruptcy, including the identity and location of the
court in which the proceedings are pending, within ten days of the
filing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 5 through 14 of this act take
effect April 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---