BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.18.080 and 1997 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The state comprehensive plan for workforce training and
education shall be updated every two years and presented to the
governor and the appropriate legislative policy committees.)) The board
shall develop a state comprehensive plan for workforce training and
education for a ten-year time period. The board shall submit the ten-year state comprehensive plan to the governor and the appropriate
legislative policy committees. Every four years by December 1st,
beginning December 1, 2012, the board shall submit an update of the
ten-year state comprehensive plan for workforce training and education
to the governor and the appropriate legislative policy committees.
Following public hearings, the legislature shall, by concurrent
resolution, approve or recommend changes to the initial plan and the
updates. The plan shall then become the state's workforce training
policy unless legislation is enacted to alter the policies set forth in
the plan.
(2) The comprehensive plan shall include workforce training role
and mission statements for the workforce development programs of
operating agencies represented on the board and sufficient specificity
regarding expected actions by the operating agencies to allow them to
carry out actions consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(3) Operating agencies represented on the board shall have
operating plans for their workforce development efforts that are
consistent with the comprehensive plan and that provide detail on
implementation steps they will take to carry out their responsibilities
under the plan. Each operating agency represented on the board shall
provide an annual progress report to the board.
(4) The comprehensive plan shall include recommendations to the
legislature and the governor on the modification, consolidation,
initiation, or elimination of workforce training and education programs
in the state.
(5) The comprehensive plan shall address how the state's workforce
development system will meet the needs of employers hiring for
industrial projects of statewide significance.
(6) The board shall report to the appropriate legislative policy
committees by December 1st of each year on its progress in implementing
the comprehensive plan and on the progress of the operating agencies in
meeting their obligations under the plan.

--- END ---