BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2007 c 277 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the
term:
(1) "System" shall mean the state system of community and technical
colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(2) "Board" shall mean the workforce training and education
coordinating board.
(3) "College board" shall mean the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(4) "Director" shall mean the administrative director for the state
system of community and technical colleges.
(5) "District" shall mean any one of the community and technical
college districts created by this chapter.
(6) "Board of trustees" shall mean the local community and
technical college board of trustees established for each college
district within the state.
(7) "Occupational education" shall mean that education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree, and education and training leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree.
(8) "K-12 system" shall mean the public school program including
kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(9) "Common school board" shall mean a public school district board
of directors.
(10) "Community college" shall include those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(11) "Technical college" shall include those higher education
institutions with the sole mission of conducting occupational
education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short
notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs.
The programs of technical colleges shall include, but not be limited
to, continuous enrollment, competency-based instruction, industry-experienced faculty, curriculum integrating vocational and basic skills
education, and curriculum approved by representatives of employers and
labor. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include
Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park
Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.
(12) "Adult education" shall mean all education or instruction,
including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and
literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public
educational institutions, including common school districts for persons
who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school
diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include
academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of
age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are
attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high
school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include
education or instruction provided by any four year public institution
of higher education.
(13) "Dislocated forest product worker" shall mean a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(14) "Forest products worker" shall mean a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(15) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products
worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(16) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish
including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt
rules further interpreting these definitions.
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (18) of this section.
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(19) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under RCW 28B.50.810 for successful completion of
a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.
(20) "Qualified institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Washington public community and technical colleges;
(b) Private career schools that are members of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating
board for the purposes of chapter 28B.92 RCW; and
(c) Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved
apprenticeship programs.
(21) "High employer demand program of study" means an
apprenticeship, or an undergraduate or graduate certificate or degree
program in which the number of students prepared for employment per
year from in-state institutions is substantially less than the number
of projected job openings per year in that field, statewide or in a
substate region.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.273 and 2008 c 14 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The college board, in partnership with business, labor, and the
workforce training and education coordinating board, shall:
(1) Identify high employer demand programs of study offered by
qualified postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential,
certificate, or degree;
(2) Identify job-specific training programs offered by qualified
postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential, certificate, or
degree in green industry occupations as established in chapter 14, Laws
of 2008((, and other high demand occupations, which are occupations
where data show that employer demand for workers exceeds the supply of
qualified job applicants throughout the state or in a specific region,
and where training capacity is underutilized));
(((2))) (3) Gain recognition of the credentials, certificates, and
degrees by Washington's employers and labor organizations. The college
board shall designate these recognized credentials, certificates, and
degrees as "opportunity grant-eligible programs of study"; and
(((3))) (4) Market the credentials, certificates, and degrees to
potential students, businesses, and apprenticeship programs as a way
for individuals to advance in their careers and to better meet the
needs of industry.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.22.130 and 2000 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that a training benefits
program be established to provide unemployment insurance benefits to
unemployed individuals who participate in training programs necessary
for their reemployment.
The legislature further intends that this program serve the
following goals:
(1) Retraining should be available for those unemployed individuals
whose skills are no longer in demand;
(2) To be eligible for retraining, an individual must have a long-term attachment to the labor force;
(3) Training must enhance the individual's marketable skills and
earning power; and
(4) Retraining must be targeted to ((those industries or skills
that are in high demand within the labor market)) high-demand
occupations.
Individuals unemployed as a result of structural changes in the
economy and technological advances rendering their skills obsolete must
receive the highest priority for participation in this program. It is
the further intent of the legislature that individuals for whom
suitable employment is available are not eligible for additional
benefits while participating in training.
The legislature further intends that funding for this program be
limited by a specified maximum amount each fiscal year.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.22.150 and 2002 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are
available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted
entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and who:
(a) Is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075;
(b) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, has
demonstrated, through a work history, sufficient tenure in an
occupation or in work with a particular skill set. This screening will
take place during the assessment process;
(c) Is, after assessment of demand for the individual's occupation
or skills in the individual's labor market, determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in his or her labor
market. Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of demand for the
individual's occupation or skill sets must be substantially based on
declining occupation or skill sets identified in local labor market
areas by the local workforce development councils, in cooperation with
the employment security department and its labor market information
division, under subsection (10) of this section;
(d) Develops an individual training program that is submitted to
the commissioner for approval within sixty days after the individual is
notified by the employment security department of the requirements of
this section;
(e) Enters the approved training program by ninety days after the
date of the notification, unless the employment security department
determines that the training is not available during the ninety-day
period, in which case the individual enters training as soon as it is
available; and
(f) Is enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational institution, and is making
satisfactory progress in the training as certified by the educational
institution.
(2) Until June 30, 2002, the following individuals who meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section may, without regard to
the tenure requirements under subsection (1)(b) of this section,
receive training benefits as provided in this section:
(a) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the aerospace
industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "372" or
the North American industry classification system code "336411";
(b) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the forest
products industry, determined by the department, but including the
industries assigned the major group standard industrial classification
codes "24" and "26" or any equivalent codes in the North American
industry classification system code, and the industries involved in the
harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and wood
products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and
distribution of wood processing and logging equipment; or
(c) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the fishing
industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "0912" or
any equivalent codes in the North American industry classification
system code.
(3) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this
section if he or she:
(a) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular
employer;
(b) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the
date he or she is laid off; or
(c) Is unemployed due to a regular seasonal layoff which
demonstrates a pattern of unemployment consistent with the provisions
of RCW 50.20.015. Regular seasonal layoff does not include layoff due
to permanent structural downsizing or structural changes in the
individual's labor market.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as
defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational
institutions in other states.
(b) "Sufficient tenure" means earning a plurality of wages in a
particular occupation or using a particular skill set during the base
year and at least two of the four twelve-month periods immediately
preceding the base year.
(c) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this
section.
(d) "Training program" means:
(i) An education program determined to be necessary as a
prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational
institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved
training program; or
(ii) A vocational training program at an educational institution:
(A) That is targeted to training for a high-demand occupation.
Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of high-demand occupations
authorized for training under this section must be substantially based
on labor market and employment information developed by local workforce
development councils, in cooperation with the employment security
department and its labor market information division, under subsection
(10) of this section;
(B) That is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills
and earning power; and
(C) That meets the criteria for performance developed by the
workforce training and education coordinating board for the purpose of
determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I
of P.L. 105-220.
"Training program" does not include any course of education
primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or
higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for
certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the
occupation.
(5) Benefits shall be paid as follows:
(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection, for
exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (1) of this section, the
total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's
weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits
and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year; or
(ii) For exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (2) of this
section, for claims filed before June 30, 2002, the total training
benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the individual's weekly
benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and
extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year; or
(iii) For exhaustees eligible under subsection (1) of this section
from industries listed under subsection (2)(a) of this section, for
claims filed on or after June 30, 2002, but before January 5, 2003, the
total training benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the
individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of
regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year.
(b) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular
weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be
paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits. The
training benefits shall be paid before any extended benefits but not
before any similar federally funded program.
(c) Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years
beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim.
(6) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting
regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for
training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year
ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the
individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will
have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new
claim.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, individuals
who receive training benefits under this section or under any previous
additional benefits program for training are not eligible for training
benefits under this section for five years from the last receipt of
training benefits under this section or under any previous additional
benefits program for training.
(b) With respect to claims that are filed before January 5, 2003,
an individual in the aerospace industry assigned the standard
industrial code "372" or the North American industry classification
system code "336411" who received training benefits under this section,
and who had been making satisfactory progress in a training program but
did not complete the program, is eligible, without regard to the five-year limitation of this section and without regard to the requirement
of subsection (1)(b) of this section, if applicable, to receive
training benefits under this section in order to complete that training
program. The total training benefit amount that applies to the
individual is seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit
amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits paid, or deemed
paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the training program
resumed and, if applicable, reduced by the amount of training benefits
paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the
training program commenced.
(8) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment
allowance under chapter 2 of Title II of the Trade Act of 1974, as
amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section
for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment
allowance. An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment
compensation, so called, under any federal law, shall not be eligible
to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual
receives such compensation.
(9) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval
of training and the granting of training benefits.
(10) By July 1, 2001, each local workforce development council, in
cooperation with the employment security department and its labor
market information division, must identify ((occupations and skill sets
that are declining and occupations and skill sets that are in)) high-
demand occupations and occupations in declining employer demand. For
the purposes of RCW 50.22.130 through 50.22.150 and section 9, chapter
2, Laws of 2000, "high-demand occupation" means ((demand for employment
that exceeds the supply of qualified workers for occupations or skill
sets in a labor market area)) an occupation with a substantial number
of current or projected employment opportunities. Local workforce
development councils must use state and locally developed labor market
information. Thereafter, each local workforce development council
shall update this information annually or more frequently if needed.
(11) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.099 and 2007 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature intends to create improved vocational
outcomes for Washington state injured workers and employers through
legislative and regulatory change under a pilot program for the period
of January 1, 2008, through June 30, 2013. This pilot vocational
system is intended to allow opportunities for eligible workers to
participate in meaningful retraining in high-demand occupations,
improve successful return to work and achieve positive outcomes for
workers, reduce the incidence of repeat vocational services, increase
accountability and responsibility, and improve cost predictability. To
facilitate the study and evaluation of the results of the proposed
changes, the department shall establish the temporary funding of
certain state fund vocational costs through the medical aid account to
ensure the appropriate assessments to employers for the costs of their
claims for vocational services in accordance with RCW 51.32.0991.
(b) An independent review and study of the effects of the pilot
program shall be conducted to determine whether it has achieved the
appropriate outcomes at reasonable cost to the system. The review
shall include, at a minimum, a report on the department's performance
with regard to the provision of vocational services, the skills
acquired by workers who receive retraining services, the types of
training programs approved, whether the workers are employed, at what
jobs and wages after completion of the training program and at various
times subsequent to their claim closure, the number and demographics of
workers who choose the option provided in subsection (4)(b) of this
section, and their employment and earnings status at various times
subsequent to claim closure. The department may adopt rules, in
collaboration with the subcommittee created under (c)(iii) of this
subsection, to further define the scope and elements of the required
study. Reports of the independent researcher are due on December 1,
2010, December 1, 2011, and December 1, 2012.
(c) In implementing the pilot program, the department shall:
(i) Establish a vocational initiative project that includes
participation by the department as a partner with WorkSource, the
established state system that administers the federal workforce
investment act of 1998. As a partner, the department shall place
vocational professional full-time employees at pilot WorkSource
locations; refer some workers for vocational services to these
vocational professionals; and work with employers in work source pilot
areas to market the benefits of on-the-job training programs and with
community colleges to reserve slots in high employer demand programs of
study as defined in RCW 28B.50.030. These on-the-job training programs
and community college slots may be considered by both department and
private sector vocational professionals for vocational plan
development. The department will also assist stakeholders in
developing additional vocational training programs in various
industries, including but not limited to agriculture and construction.
These programs will expand the choices available to injured workers in
developing their vocational training plans with the assistance of
vocational professionals.
(ii) Develop and maintain a register of state fund and self-insured
workers who have been retrained or have selected any of the vocational
options described in this section for at least the duration of the
pilot program.
(iii) Create a vocational rehabilitation subcommittee made up of
members appointed by the director for at least the duration of the
pilot program. This subcommittee shall provide the business and labor
partnership needed to maintain focus on the intent of the pilot
program, as described in this section, and provide consistency and
transparency to the development of rules and policies. The
subcommittee shall report to the director at least annually and
recommend to the director and the legislature any additional statutory
changes needed, which may include extension of the pilot period. The
subcommittee shall provide input and oversight with the department
concerning the study required under (b) of this subsection. The
subcommittee shall provide recommendations for additional changes or
incentives for injured workers to return to work with their employer of
injury.
(iv) The department shall develop an annual report concerning
Washington's workers' compensation vocational rehabilitation system to
the legislature and to the subcommittee by December 1, 2009, and
annually thereafter with the final report due by December 1, 2012. The
annual report shall include the number of workers who have participated
in more than one vocational training plan beginning with plans approved
on January 1, 2008, and in which industries those workers were
employed. The final report shall include the department's assessment
and recommendations for further legislative action, in collaboration
with the subcommittee.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, the day the worker
commences vocational plan development means the date the department or
self-insurer notifies the worker of his or her eligibility for plan
development services.
(b) When vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to
make the worker employable at gainful employment, he or she shall be
provided with services necessary to develop a vocational plan that, if
completed, would render the worker employable. The vocational
professional assigned to the claim shall, at the initial meeting with
the worker, fully inform the worker of the return-to-work priorities
set forth in RCW 51.32.095(2) and of his or her rights and
responsibilities under the workers' compensation vocational system.
The department shall provide tools to the vocational professional for
communicating this and other information required by RCW 51.32.095 and
this section to the worker.
(c) On the date the worker commences vocational plan development,
the department shall also inform the employer in writing of the
employer's right to make a valid return-to-work offer during the first
fifteen days following the commencement of vocational plan development.
To be valid, the offer must be for bona fide employment with the
employer of injury, consistent with the worker's documented physical
and mental restrictions as provided by the worker's health care
provider. When the employer makes a valid return-to-work offer, the
vocational plan development services and temporary total disability
compensation shall be terminated effective (([on])) on the starting
date for the job without regard to whether the worker accepts the
return-to-work offer. Following the fifteen-day period, the employer
may still provide, and the worker may accept, any valid return-to-work
offer. The worker's acceptance of such an offer shall result in the
termination of vocational plan development or implementation services
and temporary total disability compensation effective the day the
employment begins.
(3)(a) All vocational plans must contain an accountability
agreement signed by the worker detailing expectations regarding
progress, attendance, and other factors influencing successful
participation in the plan. Failure to abide by the agreed expectations
shall result in suspension of vocational benefits pursuant to RCW
51.32.110.
(b) Any formal education included as part of the vocational plan
must be for an accredited or licensed program or other program approved
by the department. The department shall develop rules that provide
criteria for the approval of nonaccredited or unlicensed programs.
(c) The vocational plan for an individual worker must be completed
and submitted to the department within ninety days of the day the
worker commences vocational plan development. The department may
extend the ninety days for good cause. Criteria for good cause shall
be provided in rule. The frequency and reasons for good cause
extensions shall be reported to the subcommittee created under
subsection (1)(c)(iii) of this section.
(d) Costs for the vocational plan may include books, tuition, fees,
supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, training fees for on-the-job training, the cost of furnishing tools and other equipment
necessary for self-employment or reemployment, and other necessary
expenses in an amount not to exceed twelve thousand dollars. This
amount shall be adjusted effective July 1 of each year for vocational
plans or retraining benefits available under subsection (4)(b) of this
section approved on or after this date but before June 30 of the next
year based on the average percentage change in tuition for the next
fall quarter for all Washington state community colleges.
(e) The duration of the vocational plan shall not exceed two years
from the date the plan is implemented. The worker shall receive
temporary total disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and the
cost of transportation while he or she is actively and successfully
participating in a vocational plan.
(f) If the worker is required to reside away from his or her
customary residence, the reasonable cost of board and lodging shall
also be paid.
(4) Vocational plan development services shall be completed within
ninety days of commencing. During vocational plan development the
worker shall, with the assistance of a vocational professional,
participate in vocational counseling and occupational exploration to
include, but not be limited to, identifying possible job goals,
training needs, resources, and expenses, consistent with the worker's
physical and mental status. A vocational rehabilitation plan shall be
developed by the worker and the vocational professional and submitted
to the department or self-insurer. Following this submission, the
worker shall elect one of the following options:
(a) Option 1: The department or self-insurer implements and the
worker participates in the vocational plan developed by the vocational
professional and approved by the worker and the department or
self-insurer. For state fund claims, the department must review and
approve the vocational plan before implementation may begin. If the
department takes no action within fifteen days, the plan is deemed
approved. The worker may, within fifteen days of approval of the plan
by the department, elect option 2.
(i) Following successful completion of the vocational plan, any
subsequent assessment of whether vocational rehabilitation is both
necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to become employable
at gainful employment under RCW 51.32.095(1) shall include
consideration of transferable skills obtained in the vocational plan.
(ii) If a vocational plan is successfully completed on a claim
which is thereafter reopened as provided in RCW 51.32.160, the cost and
duration available for any subsequent vocational plan is limited to
that in subsection (3)(d) and (e) of this section, less that previously
expended.
(b) Option 2: The worker declines further vocational services
under the claim and receives an amount equal to six months of temporary
total disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090. The award is
payable in biweekly payments in accordance with the schedule of
temporary total disability payments, until such award is paid in full.
These payments shall not include interest on the unpaid balance.
However, upon application by the worker, and at the discretion of the
department, the compensation may be converted to a lump sum payment.
The vocational costs defined in subsection (3)(d) of this section shall
remain available to the worker, upon application to the department or
self-insurer, for a period of five years. The vocational costs shall,
if expended, be available for programs or courses at any accredited or
licensed institution or program from a list of those approved by the
department for tuition, books, fees, supplies, equipment, and tools,
without department or self-insurer oversight. The department shall
issue an order as provided in RCW 51.52.050 confirming the option 2
election, setting a payment schedule, and terminating temporary total
disability benefits. The department shall thereafter close the claim.
(i) If within five years from the date the option 2 order becomes
final, the worker is subsequently injured or suffers an occupational
disease or reopens the claim as provided in RCW 51.32.160, and
vocational rehabilitation is found both necessary and likely to enable
the injured worker to become employable at gainful employment under RCW
51.32.095(1), the duration of any vocational plan under subsection
(3)(e) of this section shall not exceed eighteen months.
(ii) If the available vocational costs are utilized by the worker,
any subsequent assessment of whether vocational rehabilitation is both
necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to become employable
at gainful employment under RCW 51.32.095(1) shall include
consideration of the transferable skills obtained.
(iii) If the available vocational costs are utilized by the worker
and the claim is thereafter reopened as provided in RCW 51.32.160, the
cost available for any vocational plan is limited to that in subsection
(3)(d) of this section less that previously expended.
(iv) Option 2 may only be elected once per worker.
(c) The director, in his or her sole discretion, may provide the
worker vocational assistance not to exceed that in subsection (3) of
this section, without regard to the worker's prior option selection or
benefits expended, where vocational assistance would prevent permanent
total disability under RCW 51.32.060.
(5)(a) As used in this section, "vocational plan interruption"
means an occurrence which disrupts the plan to the extent the
employability goal is no longer attainable. "Vocational plan
interruption" does not include institutionally scheduled breaks in
educational programs, occasional absence due to illness, or
modifications to the plan which will allow it to be completed within
the cost and time provisions of subsection (3)(d) and (e) of this
section.
(b) When a vocational plan interruption is beyond the control of
the worker, the department or self-insurer shall recommence plan
development. If necessary to complete vocational services, the cost
and duration of the plan may include credit for that expended prior to
the interruption. A vocational plan interruption is considered outside
the control of the worker when it is due to the closure of the
accredited institution, when it is due to a death in the worker's
immediate family, or when documented changes in the worker's accepted
medical conditions prevent further participation in the vocational
plan.
(c) When a vocational plan interruption is the result of the
worker's actions, the worker's entitlement to benefits shall be
suspended in accordance with RCW 51.32.110. If plan development or
implementation is recommenced, the cost and duration of the plan shall
not include credit for that expended prior to the interruption. A
vocational plan interruption is considered a result of the worker's
actions when it is due to the failure to meet attendance expectations
set by the training or educational institution, failure to achieve
passing grades or acceptable performance review, unaccepted or
postinjury conditions that prevent further participation in the
vocational plan, or the worker's failure to abide by the accountability
agreement per subsection (3)(a) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2006 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
(3) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high-demand ((field)) occupation, as
determined by the employment security department. No internship or
practicum shall exceed twelve months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(4) On-the-job training;
(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(6) Community service programs;
(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months
with respect to any individual;
(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not
completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;
(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;
(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an
agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of
advancing their skills and knowledge;
(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable; and
(15) Financial literacy activities designed to be effective in
assisting a recipient in becoming self-sufficient and financially
stable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---