BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.515 and 2000 c 5 s 7 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Each enrollee in a health plan must have adequate choice among
health care providers.
(2) Each carrier must allow an enrollee to choose a primary care
provider who is accepting new enrollees from a list of participating
providers. Enrollees also must be permitted to change primary care
providers at any time with the change becoming effective no later than
the beginning of the month following the enrollee's request for the
change.
(3) Each carrier must have a process whereby an enrollee with a
complex or serious medical or psychiatric condition may receive a
standing referral to a participating specialist for an extended period
of time.
(4) Each carrier must provide for appropriate and timely referral
of enrollees to a choice of specialists within the plan if specialty
care is warranted. If the type of medical specialist needed for a
specific condition is not represented on the specialty panel, enrollees
must have access to nonparticipating specialty health care providers.
(5) Each carrier shall provide enrollees with direct access to the
participating chiropractor of the enrollee's choice for covered
chiropractic health care without the necessity of prior referral.
Nothing in this subsection shall prevent carriers from restricting
enrollees to seeing only providers who have signed participating
provider agreements or from utilizing other managed care and cost
containment techniques and processes. For purposes of this subsection,
"covered chiropractic health care" means covered benefits and
limitations related to chiropractic health services as stated in the
plan's medical coverage agreement, with the exception of any provisions
related to prior referral for services.
(6) Each carrier shall provide enrollees with direct access to the
participating medical eye care provider of the enrollee's choice for
covered medical eye care without the necessity of prior referral.
Nothing in this subsection shall prevent carriers from restricting
enrollees to seeing only providers who have signed participating
provider agreements or from utilizing other managed care and cost
containment techniques and processes. For purposes of this subsection,
"covered medical eye care" means covered benefits and limitations
related to all health care services within the scope of practice of
optometry as defined in RCW 18.53.010, whether provided or performed by
a provider licensed under chapter 18.53, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW, as stated
in the plan's medical coverage agreement, with the exception of any
provisions related to prior referral for services. For purposes of
this subsection, "medical eye care provider" means all providers
licensed to provide services within the scope of the practice of
optometry as defined in RCW 18.53.010, whether provided or performed by
a provider licensed under chapters 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW. A
referral for specialty eye care services made by a medical eye care
provider is equivalent to a referral by a primary care provider for all
purposes, including enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing
calculations. A carrier may require by contract that a medical eye
care provider notify any primary care provider for a patient who is
referred for specialty eye care services.
(7) Each carrier must provide, upon the request of an enrollee,
access by the enrollee to a second opinion regarding any medical
diagnosis or treatment plan from a qualified participating provider of
the enrollee's choice.
(((7))) (8) Each carrier must cover services of a primary care
provider whose contract with the plan or whose contract with a
subcontractor is being terminated by the plan or subcontractor without
cause under the terms of that contract for at least sixty days
following notice of termination to the enrollees or, in group coverage
arrangements involving periods of open enrollment, only until the end
of the next open enrollment period. The provider's relationship with
the carrier or subcontractor must be continued on the same terms and
conditions as those of the contract the plan or subcontractor is
terminating, except for any provision requiring that the carrier assign
new enrollees to the terminated provider.
(((8))) (9) Every carrier shall meet the standards set forth in
this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner to implement
this section. In developing rules to implement this section, the
commissioner shall consider relevant standards adopted by national
managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.

--- END ---