BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.79.260 and 2008 c 146 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered nurse under his or her license may perform for
compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, to
individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities.
(2) A registered nurse may, at or under the general direction of a
licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and
surgeon, naturopathic physician, optometrist, podiatric physician and
surgeon, physician assistant, osteopathic physician assistant, or
advanced registered nurse practitioner acting within the scope of his
or her license, administer medications, treatments, tests, and
inoculations, whether or not the severing or penetrating of tissues is
involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill
is required. Such direction must be for acts which are within the
scope of registered nursing practice.
(3) A registered nurse may delegate tasks of nursing care to other
individuals where the registered nurse determines that it is in the
best interest of the patient.
(a) The delegating nurse shall:
(i) Determine the competency of the individual to perform the
tasks;
(ii) Evaluate the appropriateness of the delegation;
(iii) Supervise the actions of the person performing the delegated
task; and
(iv) Delegate only those tasks that are within the registered
nurse's scope of practice.
(b) A registered nurse, working for a home health or hospice agency
regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW, may delegate the application,
instillation, or insertion of medications to a registered or certified
nursing assistant under a plan of care.
(c) Except as authorized in (b) or (e) of this subsection, a
registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications.
Except as authorized in (e) of this subsection, a registered nurse may
not delegate acts requiring substantial skill, and may not delegate
piercing or severing of tissues. Acts that require nursing judgment
shall not be delegated.
(d) No person may coerce a nurse into compromising patient safety
by requiring the nurse to delegate if the nurse determines that it is
inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not be subject to any employer
reprisal or disciplinary action by the nursing care quality assurance
commission for refusing to delegate tasks or refusing to provide the
required training for delegation if the nurse determines delegation may
compromise patient safety.
(e) For delegation in community-based care settings or in-home care
settings, a registered nurse may delegate nursing care tasks only to
registered or certified nursing assistants. Simple care tasks such as
blood pressure monitoring, personal care service, diabetic insulin
device set up, verbal verification of insulin dosage for sight-impaired
individuals, or other tasks as defined by the nursing care quality
assurance commission are exempted from this requirement.
(i) "Community-based care settings" includes: Community
residential programs for people with developmental disabilities,
certified by the department of social and health services under chapter
71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and
boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care
settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.
(ii) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary or permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings as defined in (e)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) Delegation of nursing care tasks in community-based care
settings and in-home care settings is only allowed for individuals who
have a stable and predictable condition. "Stable and predictable
condition" means a situation in which the individual's clinical and
behavioral status is known and does not require the frequent presence
and evaluation of a registered nurse.
(iv) The determination of the appropriateness of delegation of a
nursing task is at the discretion of the registered nurse. Other than
delegation of the administration of insulin by injection for the
purpose of caring for individuals with diabetes, the administration of
medications by injection, sterile procedures, and central line
maintenance may never be delegated.
(v) When delegating insulin injections under this section, the
registered nurse delegator must instruct the individual regarding
proper injection procedures and the use of insulin, demonstrate proper
injection procedures, and must supervise and evaluate the individual
performing the delegated task weekly during the first four weeks of
delegation of insulin injections. If the registered nurse delegator
determines that the individual is competent to perform the injection
properly and safely, supervision and evaluation shall occur at least
every ninety days thereafter.
(vi) The registered nurse shall verify that the nursing assistant
has completed the required core nurse delegation training required in
chapter 18.88A RCW prior to authorizing delegation.
(vii) The nurse is accountable for his or her own individual
actions in the delegation process. Nurses acting within the protocols
of their delegation authority are immune from liability for any action
performed in the course of their delegation duties.
(viii) Nursing task delegation protocols are not intended to
regulate the settings in which delegation may occur, but are intended
to ensure that nursing care services have a consistent standard of
practice upon which the public and the profession may rely, and to
safeguard the authority of the nurse to make independent professional
decisions regarding the delegation of a task.
(f) The nursing care quality assurance commission may adopt rules
to implement this section.
(4) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may instruct
nurses in technical subjects pertaining to nursing.
(5) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may hold herself
or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as a
registered nurse.

--- END ---