BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.110 and 2005 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Approved monitoring device" means any mechanism designed to
measure kilowatt hours that is approved by the Washington State
University energy program.
(2) "Community solar project" means: (a) A solar energy system
owned by local individuals, households, or businesses that is placed on
the property owned by their cooperating local governmental entity or a
cooperative association; or (b) a utility-owned solar energy system
that is voluntarily funded by the ratepayers of the utility where in
exchange for their financial support, the utility gives contributors a
credit on their utility bill or payment for the value of the
electricity produced by the project.
(3) "Cooperative association" means an employee cooperative
association as defined under RCW 23.78.010.
(4) "Customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt hours" means the
((alternating current electricity)) measured energy that is generated
from a renewable energy system located on an individual's, businesses',
or local government's real property that is also provided electricity
generated by a light and power business. Except for community solar
projects, a system located on a leasehold interest does not qualify
under this definition. (("Customer-generated electricity" does not
include electricity generated by a light and power business with
greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas
distribution business.
(2))) (5) "Domestic heat pump water heating system" means a device
that has the primary purpose of reducing demand for electricity or
natural gas through water heating, space heating, or other methods of
capturing energy ambient air for household use.
(6) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt hours
multiplied by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((3))) (7) "Local government entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(8) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(((4))) (9) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((5))) (10) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((6))) (11) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((7))) (12) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells,
or a heat engine and generator, and providing a single direct current
electrical output.
(((8) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business)) (13) "Solar water
heating system" means a solar energy device that has the primary
purpose of reducing demand for electricity or natural gas through water
heating, space heating, or other methods of capturing energy from the
sun to reduce electric or natural gas consumption in a home or
business, and is certified by the solar rating and certification
corporation. "Solar water heating systems" do not include solar pool
heating systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.120 and 2007 c 111 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity((, not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business,))
may apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system, each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment
cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour ((from a customer-generated electricity)) generated by up to one solar electric, wind,
biomass, solar hot water, and domestic hot water heat pump renewable
energy system installed on its property that is not interconnected to
the electric distribution system. No incentive may be paid for
kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after June 30,
((2014)) 2020, or retroactively for previously generated economic
development kilowatt hours.
(2) ((When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)))(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for
the incentive allowed under this section, the applicant shall submit to
the department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy
development center at the Washington State University, established
under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed
by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the ((electricity)) kilowatts produced by the applicant
meets the definition of "customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt
hours" and that the renewable energy system produces ((electricity))
kilowatts with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; ((or))
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(F) A solar water heating system or domestic hot water heat pump
manufactured in the state of Washington; or
(G) A solar water heating system or domestic hot water heat pump
manufactured outside of the state of Washington;
(iv) That ((the)) any electricity can be transformed or transmitted
for entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission
and distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(((4))) (3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the
incentive shall be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(((5))) (4) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid
fifteen cents per economic development kilowatt-hour as measured by an
approved monitoring device unless requests exceed the amount authorized
for credit to the participating light and power business. For the
purposes of this section, the rate paid for the investment cost
recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following factors:
(a) For customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt hours produced
using solar modules manufactured in Washington state, ((two and four-tenths)) one and eight-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt hours produced
using a solar or a wind generator equipped with an inverter
manufactured in Washington state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt hours produced
using an anaerobic digester, or by other solar equipment or using a
wind generator equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state,
one; ((and))
(d) For all other customer-generated ((electricity)) kilowatt hours
produced by wind, eight-tenths;
(e) For customer-generated kilowatt hours produced by a solar hot
water system or a domestic hot water heat pump made in Washington, one-third; and
(f) For customer-generated kilowatt hours produced by a solar hot
water system or a domestic hot water heat pump not made in Washington,
one-fifth.
(((6))) (5) No individual, household, business, or local
governmental entity is eligible for incentives for more than two
thousand dollars per year, except that each participant in a community
solar project is eligible up to five thousand dollars per year.
(((7))) (6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive
exceed the amount of funds available for credit to the participating
light and power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(((8))) (7) The climate and rural energy development center at
Washington State University energy program may establish guidelines and
standards for technologies that are identified as Washington
manufactured and therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(((9))) (8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to ((the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or))
the light and power business serving the situs of the system upon
receipt of the investment cost recovery incentive.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.130 and 2005 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A light and power business ((shall be)) is allowed a credit
against taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to investment
cost recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal year under RCW
82.16.120. The credit ((shall)) must be taken in a form and manner as
required by the department. The credit under this section for the
fiscal year ((shall)) may not exceed ((twenty-five one-hundredths of))
one percent of the businesses' taxable power sales due under RCW
82.16.020(1)(b) or ((twenty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars,
whichever is greater, except that utility-owned community solar
projects as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(b) may only account for up to
twenty-five percent of the credit taken. The credit may not exceed the
tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds ((shall))
may not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to
earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit in
subsequent years.
(2) For any business that has claimed credit for amounts that
exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under RCW 82.16.120,
the amount of tax against which credit was claimed for the excess
payments ((shall be)) is immediately due and payable. The department
((shall)) must assess interest but not penalties on the taxes against
which the credit was claimed. Interest ((shall)) must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and ((shall accrue))
accrues until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are
repaid.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, ((2015)) 2019. Credits may not be claimed after June 30, ((2016))
2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The utilities and transportation commission shall develop and make
recommendations to the legislature on how gas distribution companies
may be allowed to participate in the cost recovery incentive program
and receive a public utility tax credit under chapter 82.16 RCW.

--- END ---