BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
uniform emergency volunteer health practitioners act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the state military department.
(2) "Disaster relief organization" means an entity that provides
emergency or disaster relief services that include health or veterinary
services provided by volunteer health practitioners and that:
(a) Is designated or recognized as a provider of those services
pursuant to a disaster response and recovery plan adopted by an agency
of the federal government or the department; or
(b) Regularly plans and conducts its activities in coordination
with an agency of the federal government or the department.
(3) "Emergency" means an event or condition that is an emergency,
disaster, or public health emergency under chapter 38.52 RCW.
(4) "Emergency declaration" means a declaration of emergency issued
by the governor under RCW 43.06.010.
(5) "Emergency management assistance compact" means the interstate
compact approved by congress by P.L. 104-321, 110 Stat. 3877, RCW
38.10.010.
(6) "Entity" means a person other than an individual.
(7) "Health facility" means an entity licensed under the laws of
this or another state to provide health or veterinary services.
(8) "Health practitioner" means an individual licensed under the
laws of this or another state to provide health or veterinary services.
(9) "Health services" means the provision of treatment, care,
advice or guidance, or other services, or supplies, related to the
health or death of individuals or human populations, to the extent
necessary to respond to an emergency, including:
(a) The following, concerning the physical or mental condition or
functional status of an individual or affecting the structure or
function of the body:
(i) Preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative,
maintenance, or palliative care; and
(ii) Counseling, assessment, procedures, or other services;
(b) Sale or dispensing of a drug, a device, equipment, or another
item to an individual in accordance with a prescription; and
(c) Funeral, cremation, cemetery, or other mortuary services.
(10) "Host entity" means an entity operating in this state which
uses volunteer health practitioners to respond to an emergency.
(11) "License" means authorization by a state to engage in health
or veterinary services that are unlawful without the authorization.
The term includes authorization under the laws of this state to an
individual to provide health or veterinary services based upon a
national certification issued by a public or private entity.
(12) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint
venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(13) "Scope of practice" means the extent of the authorization to
provide health or veterinary services granted to a health practitioner
by a license issued to the practitioner in the state in which the
principal part of the practitioner's services are rendered, including
any conditions imposed by the licensing authority.
(14) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(15) "Veterinary services" means the provision of treatment, care,
advice or guidance, or other services, or supplies, related to the
health or death of an animal or to animal populations, to the extent
necessary to respond to an emergency, including:
(a) Diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of an animal disease,
injury, or other physical or mental condition by the prescription,
administration, or dispensing of vaccine, medicine, surgery, or
therapy;
(b) Use of a procedure for reproductive management; and
(c) Monitoring and treatment of animal populations for diseases
that have spread or demonstrate the potential to spread to humans.
(16) "Volunteer health practitioner" means a health practitioner
who provides health or veterinary services, whether or not the
practitioner receives compensation for those services. The term does
not include a practitioner who receives compensation pursuant to a
preexisting employment relationship with a host entity or affiliate
which requires the practitioner to provide health services in this
state, unless the practitioner is not a resident of this state and is
employed by a disaster relief organization providing services in this
state while an emergency declaration is in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter applies to volunteer health
practitioners registered with a registration system that complies with
section 5 of this act and who provide health or veterinary services in
this state for a host entity while an emergency declaration is in
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) While an emergency declaration is in
effect, the department may limit, restrict, or otherwise regulate:
(a) The duration of practice by volunteer health practitioners;
(b) The geographical areas in which volunteer health practitioners
may practice;
(c) The types of volunteer health practitioners who may practice;
and
(d) Any other matters necessary to coordinate effectively the
provision of health or veterinary services during the emergency.
(2) An order issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may
take effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a
rule within the meaning of the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.
(3) A host entity that uses volunteer health practitioners to
provide health or veterinary services in this state shall:
(a) Consult and coordinate its activities with the department to
the extent practicable to provide for the efficient and effective use
of volunteer health practitioners; and
(b) Comply with any laws other than this chapter relating to the
management of emergency health or veterinary services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) To qualify as a volunteer health
practitioner registration system, a system must:
(a) Accept applications for the registration of volunteer health
practitioners before or during an emergency;
(b) Include information about the licensure and good standing of
health practitioners which is accessible by authorized persons;
(c) Be capable of confirming the accuracy of information concerning
whether a health practitioner is licensed and in good standing before
health services or veterinary services are provided under this chapter;
and
(d) Meet one of the following conditions:
(i) Be an emergency system for advance registration of volunteer
health care practitioners established by a state and funded through the
health resources services administration under section 319I of the
public health services act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 247d-7b, as amended);
(ii) Be a local unit consisting of trained and equipped emergency
response, public health, and medical personnel formed pursuant to
section 2801 of the public health services act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300hh,
as amended);
(iii) Be operated by a:
(A) Disaster relief organization;
(B) Licensing board;
(C) National or regional association of licensing boards or health
practitioners;
(D) Health facility that provides comprehensive inpatient and
outpatient healthcare services, including a tertiary care and teaching
hospital; or
(E) Governmental entity; or
(iv) Be designated by the department as a registration system for
purposes of this chapter.
(2) While an emergency declaration is in effect, the department,
a person authorized to act on behalf of the department, or a host
entity may confirm whether volunteer health practitioners utilized in
this state are registered with a registration system that complies with
subsection (1) of this section. Confirmation is limited to obtaining
identities of the practitioners from the system and determining whether
the system indicates that the practitioners are licensed and in good
standing.
(3) Upon request of a person in this state authorized under
subsection (2) of this section, or a similarly authorized person in
another state, a registration system located in this state shall notify
the person of the identities of volunteer health practitioners and
whether the practitioners are licensed and in good standing.
(4) A host entity is not required to use the services of a
volunteer health practitioner even if the practitioner is registered
with a registration system that indicates that the practitioner is
licensed and in good standing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) While an emergency declaration is in
effect, a volunteer health practitioner, registered with a registration
system that complies with section 5 of this act and licensed and in
good standing in the state upon which the practitioner's registration
is based, may practice in this state to the extent authorized by this
chapter as if the practitioner were licensed in this state.
(2) A volunteer health practitioner qualified under subsection (1)
of this section is not entitled to the protections of this chapter if
the practitioner is licensed in more than one state and any license of
the practitioner is suspended, revoked, or subject to an agency order
limiting or restricting practice privileges, or has been voluntarily
terminated under threat of sanction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Credentialing" means obtaining, verifying, and assessing the
qualifications of a health practitioner to provide treatment, care, or
services in or for a health facility.
(b) "Privileging" means the authorizing by an appropriate
authority, such as a governing body, of a health practitioner to
provide specific treatment, care, or services at a health facility
subject to limits based on factors that include license, education,
training, experience, competence, health status, and specialized skill.
(2) This chapter does not affect credentialing or privileging
standards of a health facility and does not preclude a health facility
from waiving or modifying those standards while an emergency
declaration is in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of
this section, a volunteer health practitioner shall adhere to the scope
of practice for a similarly licensed practitioner established by the
licensing provisions, practice acts, or other laws of this state.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
this chapter does not authorize a volunteer health practitioner to
provide services that are outside the practitioner's scope of practice,
even if a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would be
permitted to provide the services.
(3) The department may modify or restrict the health or veterinary
services that volunteer health practitioners may provide pursuant to
this chapter. An order under this subsection may take effect
immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a rule within
the meaning of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A host entity may restrict the health or veterinary services
that a volunteer health practitioner may provide pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) A volunteer health practitioner does not engage in unauthorized
practice unless the practitioner has reason to know of any limitation,
modification, or restriction under this section or that a similarly
licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide
the services. A volunteer health practitioner has reason to know of a
limitation, modification, or restriction or that a similarly licensed
practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide a service
if:
(a) The practitioner knows the limitation, modification, or
restriction exists or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this
state would not be permitted to provide the service; or
(b) From all the facts and circumstances known to the practitioner
at the relevant time, a reasonable person would conclude that the
limitation, modification, or restriction exists or that a similarly
licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide
the service.
(6) In addition to the authority granted by law of this state other
than this chapter to regulate the conduct of health practitioners, a
licensing board or other disciplinary authority in this state:
(a) May impose administrative sanctions upon a health practitioner
licensed in this state for conduct outside of this state in response to
an out-of-state emergency;
(b) May impose administrative sanctions upon a practitioner not
licensed in this state for conduct in this state in response to an
in-state emergency; and
(c) Shall report any administrative sanctions imposed upon a
practitioner licensed in another state to the appropriate licensing
board or other disciplinary authority in any other state in which the
practitioner is known to be licensed.
(7) In determining whether to impose administrative sanctions under
subsection (6) of this section, a licensing board or other disciplinary
authority shall consider the circumstances in which the conduct took
place, including any exigent circumstances, and the practitioner's
scope of practice, education, training, experience, and specialized
skill.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) This chapter does not limit rights,
privileges, or immunities provided to volunteer health practitioners by
laws other than this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, this chapter does not affect
requirements for the use of health practitioners pursuant to the
emergency management assistance compact.
(2) The department, pursuant to the emergency management assistance
compact, may incorporate into the emergency forces of this state
volunteer health practitioners who are not officers or employees of
this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a municipality or
other local government within this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department may promulgate rules to
implement this chapter. In doing so, the department shall consult with
and consider the recommendations of the entity established to
coordinate the implementation of the emergency management assistance
compact and shall also consult with and consider rules promulgated by
similarly empowered agencies in other states to promote uniformity of
application of this chapter and make the emergency response systems in
the various states reasonably compatible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 In applying and construing this uniform
act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Sec. 12 RCW 38.52.010 and 2007 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
means the preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency
functions, other than functions for which the military forces are
primarily responsible, to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and
recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering
from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all hazards,
whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide support
for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of
residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.
(2) "Local organization for emergency services or management" means
an organization created in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter by state or local authority to perform local emergency
management functions.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any county, city or town.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any person, including but not limited
to an architect registered under chapter 18.08 RCW or a professional
engineer registered under chapter 18.43 RCW, who is registered with a
local emergency management organization or the department and holds an
identification card issued by the local emergency management director
or the department for the purpose of engaging in authorized emergency
management activities or is an employee of the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof who is called upon to perform
emergency management activities.
(5) "Injury" as used in this chapter shall mean and include
accidental injuries and/or occupational diseases arising out of
emergency management activities.
(6)(a) "Emergency or disaster" as used in all sections of this
chapter except RCW 38.52.430 shall mean an event or set of
circumstances which: (i) Demands immediate action to preserve public
health, protect life, protect public property, or to provide relief to
any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii) reaches
such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(b) "Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that
requires a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response as a result of a violation of one of the
statutes enumerated in RCW 38.52.430.
(7) "Search and rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing,
or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity any person
who becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result
of a natural, technological, or human caused disaster, including
instances involving searches for downed aircraft when ground personnel
are used. Nothing in this section shall affect appropriate activity by
the department of transportation under chapter 47.68 RCW.
(8) "Executive head" and "executive heads" means the county
executive in those charter counties with an elective office of county
executive, however designated, and, in the case of other counties, the
county legislative authority. In the case of cities and towns, it
means the mayor in those cities and towns with mayor-council or
commission forms of government, where the mayor is directly elected,
and it means the city manager in those cities and towns with council
manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate an
executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.
(9) "Director" means the adjutant general.
(10) "Local director" means the director of a local organization of
emergency management or emergency services.
(11) "Department" means the state military department.
(12) "Emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public
agency's use of emergency services during an emergency or disaster as
defined in subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(13) "Expense of an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430
means reasonable costs incurred by a public agency in reasonably making
an appropriate emergency response to the incident, but shall only
include those costs directly arising from the response to the
particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include the costs of
providing police, coroner, fire fighting, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as
the salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.
(14) "Public agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal
corporation, district, town, or public authority located, in whole or
in part, within this state which provides or may provide fire fighting,
police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.
(15) "Incident command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene
functional management system that establishes common standards in
organization, terminology, and procedures; provides a means (unified
command) for the establishment of a common set of incident objectives
and strategies during multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while
maintaining individual agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility,
and accountability; and is a component of the national interagency
incident management system; or (b) an equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.
(16) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 82.14B.020.

Sec. 13 RCW 38.52.180 and 2007 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be no liability on the part of anyone including any
person, partnership, corporation, the state of Washington or any
political subdivision thereof who owns or maintains any building or
premises which have been designated by a local organization for
emergency management as a shelter from destructive operations or
attacks by enemies of the United States for any injuries sustained by
any person while in or upon said building or premises, as a result of
the condition of said building or premises or as a result of any act or
omission, or in any way arising from the designation of such premises
as a shelter, when such person has entered or gone upon or into said
building or premises for the purpose of seeking refuge therein during
destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States or
during tests ordered by lawful authority, except for an act of willful
negligence by such owner or occupant or his servants, agents, or
employees.
(2) All legal liability for damage to property or injury or death
to persons (except an emergency worker, regularly enrolled and acting
as such), caused by acts done or attempted ((during or while traveling
to or from an emergency or disaster, search and rescue, or training or
exercise authorized by the department in preparation for an emergency
or disaster or search and rescue)), under the color of this chapter in
a bona fide attempt to comply therewith((, except as provided in
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section regarding covered
volunteer emergency workers,)) shall be the obligation of the state of
Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the state
for the enforcement of such liability, or for the indemnification of
persons appointed and regularly enrolled as emergency workers while
actually engaged in emergency management duties, or as members of any
agency of the state or political subdivision thereof engaged in
emergency management activity, or their dependents, for damage done to
their private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done
in good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the
foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification in any
case of willful misconduct, gross negligence or bad faith on the part
of any agent of emergency management: PROVIDED, That should the United
States or any agency thereof, in accordance with any federal statute,
rule or regulation, provide for the payment of damages to property
and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section, then and in
that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever upon
the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or
injury for which the United States government assumes liability.
(3) ((No act or omission by a covered volunteer emergency worker
while engaged in a covered activity shall impose any liability for
civil damages resulting from such an act or omission upon:
(a) The covered volunteer emergency worker;
(b) The supervisor or supervisors of the covered volunteer
emergency worker;
(c) Any facility or their officers or employees;
(d) The employer of the covered volunteer emergency worker;
(e) The owner of the property or vehicle where the act or omission
may have occurred during the covered activity;
(f) Any local organization that registered the covered volunteer
emergency worker; and
(g) The state or any state or local governmental entity.
(4) The immunity in subsection (3) of this section applies only
when the covered volunteer emergency worker was engaged in a covered
activity:
(a) Within the scope of his or her assigned duties;
(b) Under the direction of a local emergency management
organization or the department, or a local law enforcement agency for
search and rescue; and
(c) The act or omission does not constitute gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Covered volunteer emergency worker" means an emergency worker
as defined in RCW 38.52.010 who (i) is not receiving or expecting
compensation as an emergency worker from the state or local government,
or (ii) is not a state or local government employee unless on leave
without pay status.
(b) "Covered activity" means:
(i) Providing assistance or transportation authorized by the
department during an emergency or disaster or search and rescue as
defined in RCW 38.52.010, whether such assistance or transportation is
provided at the scene of the emergency or disaster or search and
rescue, at an alternative care site, at a hospital, or while in route
to or from such sites or between sites; or
(ii) Participating in training or exercise authorized by the
department in preparation for an emergency or disaster or search and
rescue.
(6))) Any requirement for a license to practice any professional,
mechanical or other skill shall not apply to any authorized emergency
worker who shall, in the course of performing his duties as such,
practice such professional, mechanical or other skill during an
emergency described in this chapter.
(((7))) (4) The provisions of this section shall not affect the
right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be
entitled under this chapter, or under the workers' compensation law, or
under any pension or retirement law, nor the right of any such person
to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program ((and the cost of regulating licensed
volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360)), except
as provided in RCW 18.79.202 until June 30, 2013. All such fees shall
be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 38 RCW.

--- END ---