BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection,
after receipt of the notice of an appeal that has been filed under RCW
51.52.060(2), the employer and its representatives shall not have
contact to discuss the issues in question in the appeal with any
medical provider who has examined or treated the worker at the request
of the worker or treating medical provider, unless written
authorization for contact is given by the worker or the worker's
representative. Written authorization is only valid if given after the
date that the appeal is filed and expires ninety days after it is
signed.
(b) Contact is permitted as necessary for the ongoing management of
the claim, including but not limited to communication regarding the
worker's treatment needs and the provider's treatment plan, vocational
and return-to-work issues and assistance, and certification of the
worker's inability to work, unless these issues are in question in the
appeal.
(c) If the employer or its representatives wish to communicate with
the examining or treating medical providers concerning the issues in
question in the appeal, and no written authorization from the worker or
the worker's representative has been obtained, the communication must
either be:
(i) In writing, including by e-mail, sent contemporaneously to all
parties with a distinct notice to the provider that any response must
be in writing, including by e-mail;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the worker or the worker's
representative given the opportunity to fully participate; or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(d) Written authorization is not required if the worker fails to
identify or confirm the examining or treating medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, after
receipt of the notice of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the worker
and the representative for the worker, if any, shall not have contact
to discuss the issues in question in the appeal with any medical
provider who has examined the worker at the request of the employer
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, unless written authorization for contact is
given by the employer or its representative. Written authorization is
only valid if given after the date that the appeal is filed and expires
ninety days after it is signed.
(b) If the worker or the worker's representative wishes to
communicate with a medical provider who has examined the worker
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, and no written authorization from the
employer or its representative has been obtained, the communication
must either be:
(i) In writing, including by e-mail, sent contemporaneously to all
parties with a distinct notice to the provider that any response must
be in writing, including by e-mail;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the department, employer,
and their representatives given the opportunity to fully participate;
or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(c) Written authorization is not required if the employer fails to
identify or confirm the examining medical provider as a witness as
required by the board.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the
department.
(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection, after
an appeal has been filed under RCW 51.52.060(2), a conference has been
held to schedule hearings, and the worker has named his or her
witnesses, the department and its representatives shall not have
contact to discuss the issues in question in the appeal with any
medical provider who has examined or treated the worker at the request
of the worker or treating medical provider and has been named as a
witness by the worker or their representative unless written
authorization for contact is given by the worker or the worker's
representative. Written authorization is only valid if given after the
date that the appeal is filed and expires ninety days after it is
signed.
(b) Contact is permitted as necessary for the ongoing management of
the claim, including but not limited to communication regarding the
worker's treatment needs and the provider's treatment plan, vocational
and return-to-work issues and assistance, and certification of the
worker's inability to work, unless these issues are in question in the
appeal.
(c) If the department or its representatives wish to communicate
with the examining or treating medical providers concerning the issues
in question in the appeal, and no written authorization from the worker
or the worker's representative has been obtained, the communication
must either be:
(i) In writing, including by e-mail, sent contemporaneously to all
parties with a distinct notice to the provider that any response must
be in writing, including by e-mail;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the worker or the worker's
representative given the opportunity to fully participate; or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(d) Written authorization is not required if the worker fails to
identify or confirm the examining or treating medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, after
an appeal has been filed under RCW 51.52.060(2), a conference has been
held to schedule hearings, and the worker has named his or her
witnesses, the worker and the representative for the worker, if any,
shall not have contact to discuss the issues in question in the appeal
with any medical provider who has examined the worker at the request of
the department pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, unless written authorization
for contact is given by the department or its representatives. Written
authorization is only valid if given after the date that the appeal is
filed and expires ninety days after it is signed.
(b) If the worker or the worker's representative wishes to
communicate with a medical provider who has examined the worker
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, and no written authorization from the
department or its representative has been obtained, the communication
must either be:
(i) In writing, including by e-mail, sent contemporaneously to all
parties with a distinct notice to the provider that any response must
be in writing, including by e-mail;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the department or its
representatives given the opportunity to fully participate; or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(c) Written authorization is not required if the department fails
to identify or confirm the examining medical provider as a witness as
required by the board.
(5) Upon motion by either party, the industrial appeals judge
assigned to the case may determine whether a party has made itself
reasonably available to participate in an in-person, telephone, or
videoconference communication as provided in subsections (1)(c)(ii),
(2)(b)(ii), (3)(c)(ii), and (4)(b)(ii) of this section. If the
industrial appeals judge determines that a party has not made itself
reasonably available, the judge may determine appropriate remedies
including but not limited to setting a date and time for the contact
being requested by a party, sanctioning the party who has not
reasonably made itself available, or both.
(6) This section only applies to issues set forth in a notice of
appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2).
(7) This section does not limit the reporting requirements under
RCW 51.04.050 and 51.36.060 for issues not set forth in a notice of
appeal.
(8) The department and board may adopt rules as necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to orders entered on or
after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---