BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.34.090 and 2002 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing
buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon recommendations from
the state capitol committee and the director of the department of
general administration, with the advice of the capitol campus design
advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:
(a) An existing building may be renamed only after a substantial
renovation or a change in the predominant tenant agency headquartered
in the building.
(b) A new or existing building may be named or renamed after:
(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington
history;
(ii) The purpose of the building;
(iii) The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the
building;
(iv) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;
(v) A Native American tribe located in Washington;
(vi) A group of people or type of person;
(vii) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as
recommended by the director of the department of general
administration.
(c) The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not
be removed.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
legislature shall approve names for new or existing public rooms or
spaces on the west capitol campus based upon recommendations from the
state capitol committee and the director of the department of general
administration, with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory
committee, subject to the following limitations:
(a) An existing room or space may be renamed only after a
substantial renovation;
(b) A new or existing room or space may be named or renamed only
after:
(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington
history;
(ii) The purpose of the room or space;
(iii) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;
(iv) A Native American tribe located in Washington;
(v) A group of people or type of person;
(vi) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as
recommended by the director of the department of general
administration.
(3) The state capitol committee shall approve names for new or
existing public rooms or spaces in the Washington state heritage center
on the west capitol campus, proposed by the secretary of state. The
secretary of state shall adopt regulations to govern name proposals in
honor of a donor, benefactor, grant-maker, or other person or entity
who has substantially contributed financially or in kind to the center.
The donor, benefactor, grant-maker or other person or entity may be
acknowledged with a standard plaque, sign, or other recognition as
proposed by the secretary of state, reviewed by the capitol campus
design advisory committee, and approved by the state capitol committee.
(4) When naming or renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this
section, consideration must be given to: (a) Any disparity that exists
with respect to the gender of persons after whom buildings, rooms, and
spaces are named on the state capitol grounds; (b) the diversity of
human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's citizenry and
history.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds"
means buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as
state capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east
capitol campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the
Lacey campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol
Building, and Capitol Lake.

--- END ---