BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Tens of thousands of stray and homeless dogs and cats are
handled by Washington's animal care and control agencies and other
animal welfare organizations each year, costing millions of dollars.
(2) Many thousands of adoptable animals are dying in shelters each
year because there are not enough homes available to place them.
(3) Unaltered dogs account for most serious incidences of
unprovoked dog aggression and dog bites, causing injury, suffering,
expense, and financial liability.
(4) Pets owned by low-income individuals are less likely to be
spayed or neutered than pets owned by individuals with higher levels of
income. The cost of spay and neuter surgery is a barrier to achieving
higher levels of surgically sterilized pets.
(5) The majority of feral and free-roaming cats in Washington are
not spayed or neutered, thus contributing significantly to the
population of cats that are homeless and euthanized in shelters.
(6) The most effective and humane way to reduce the number of
animals dying in shelters is to reduce animal overpopulation through a
targeted, statewide spay and neuter surgery network.
(7) Reducing the companion animal population through spay and
neuter surgery will reduce the number of animals handled and cared for
by animal care and control agencies and other animal welfare
organizations. This, in turn, will help reduce costs these agencies
and organizations incur for handling stray, abandoned, relinquished,
and homeless animals and, most importantly, will help reduce the number
of animals that die in shelters.
(8) Increasing the numbers of dogs that are surgically sterilized
will help reduce risks of dog bites that result in injury, death,
medical costs, and liability. Increasing the numbers of feral and
free-roaming cats that are surgically sterilized will reduce the
burdens they place on animal care and control agencies, shelters,
animal rescue organizations, and individuals who care for these
unowned, lost, or abandoned animals.
(9) A companion animal spay/neuter assistance program is necessary
to address the problems of companion animal overpopulation. The
program should be funded through a fee that is practical,
administratively feasible, and targeted at the class of Washington
residents that is most responsible for companion animals and their
impact on our communities: Owners of cats and dogs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Account" means the companion animal spay/neuter assistance
account created in section 9 of this act.
(2) "Animal care and control agency" means an agency or authority
as defined in RCW 16.52.011(2)(c).
(3) "Cat" means a member of the species Felis catus.
(4) "Companion animal" means a cat or dog and includes a feral or
free-roaming cat as defined in this section.
(5) "Copayment" means the amount in dollars that a low-income owner
of a dog or cat may be required to pay for spay or neuter surgery.
(6) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(7) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(8) "Dog" means a member of the species Canis familiaris.
(9) "Feral or free-roaming cat" means a cat that is unowned, lost,
or abandoned.
(10) "Low income" means an individual who is a resident of
Washington state and meets the income limitations defined in section
4(2) of this act or participates in a public assistance program defined
in section 4(2) of this act.
(11) "Medically unfit" means unsuitable for a surgical procedure
due to any medical condition that may place a dog or cat at
life-threatening risk if a surgical procedure is performed on such an
animal, as determined by a veterinarian.
(12) "Neuter" means the surgical procedure of castrating a male dog
or cat.
(13) "Owner" means an individual or individuals with ownership
rights and responsibilities for a dog or cat.
(14) "Participating spay and neuter surgery provider" means a
private veterinarian, private veterinary practice, animal care and
control agency, or nonprofit organization that performs spay and neuter
surgeries on companion animals belonging to low-income individuals, or
spay and neuter surgeries on feral or free-roaming cats, and is
participating in the program established under this chapter.
(15) "Program" means the companion animal spay/neuter assistance
program created in this chapter.
(16) "Shelter" means a facility that is owned by a public, private,
or nonprofit organization that provides food, water, and housing for
stray, abandoned, abused, or owner-surrendered dogs and cats.
(17) "Spay" means the surgical procedure of ovariohysterectomy on
a female dog or cat.
(18) "Surgical sterilization" means performing spay or neuter
surgery on a dog or cat.
(19) "Voucher" means a nontransferable document that, when approved
by the director or the director's designee, authorizes low-income
owners of companion animals or caretakers of feral and free-roaming
cats to receive program-supported companion animal spay or neuter
surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations by participating
spay and neuter surgery providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The companion animal spay/neuter
assistance program is established. The purpose of the program is to
provide for spaying and neutering of companion animals owned by low-income individuals and for spaying and neutering feral and free-roaming
cats.
(2) The department shall administer the program and shall:
(a) Enroll spay and neuter surgery providers and publicize the
program and the names and locations of participating spay and neuter
surgery providers;
(b) Establish criteria and procedures for screening companion
animal owners and caretakers of feral and free-roaming cats for
eligibility to participate in the program. Caretakers of feral and
free-roaming cats are not subject to the low-income requirements set
forth in section 4(2) of this act;
(c) Screen companion animal owners and caretakers of feral and
free-roaming cats for eligibility or contract for screening to promote
the ease and convenience of applying for services under the program;
(d) Obtain the greatest number of spay and neuter surgeries that
can be accomplished efficiently, consistent with the program's purpose
and availability of funds;
(e) To the extent practical, maximize the ease and convenience for
eligible owners and caretakers of companion animals to apply for and
receive spay, neuter, and other authorized veterinary medical services,
and minimize administrative burdens, procedures, and costs for
participating spay and neuter surgery providers that participate in the
program; and
(f) Actively promote the program to inform the public about
companion animal overpopulation issues and surgical sterilization.
(3) The department's priorities for expenditures are to fund spay
and neuter surgeries on companion animals belonging to low-income
individuals who are Washington state residents and for spaying and
neutering feral and free-roaming cats.
(4) The department may expend moneys from the account to pay the
costs of presurgical examinations and vaccinations of companion animals
eligible for spay or neuter surgery.
(5) To the extent that moneys from the account are available and
spay and neuter funding priorities are met, as determined by the
director, the department may expend money from the account for spay and
neuter surgeries on companion animals that are in the possession of
animal shelters, animal care and control agencies, and other animal
welfare organizations.
(6) The department shall set copayment amounts for spay or neuter
surgery on owned companion animals. The copayment amounts may not
exceed twenty dollars per dog and ten dollars per cat. Any copayments
due must be paid by or on behalf of low-income owners of companion
animals to participating spay and neuter surgery providers. There is
no copayment due for spay or neuter surgery performed on feral or free-roaming cats.
(7) The department may not use moneys from the account to provide
veterinary medical services to the public at large.
(8) Other agencies of the state, including but not limited to the
department of social and health services and the Washington state
health care authority, shall work cooperatively with the department to
facilitate screening and verification of low-income applicants for
eligibility to participate in the program.
(9) The department may contract with public, private, or nonprofit
agencies or organizations with relevant experience and expertise to
accomplish the purposes of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may expend moneys from
the account for spay and neuter surgeries for companion animals that
are:
(a) Owned by qualified low-income individuals;
(b) Feral or free-roaming cats; or
(c) Not owned by individuals but are in the possession of animal
shelters, animal care and control agencies, and other animal welfare
organizations.
(2) An individual is "low income" if he or she is a resident of
Washington state and:
(a) Meets the definition of "low-income household" defined in RCW
43.185A.010; or
(b) Is eligible for and participates in at least one of the
following public assistance programs:
(i) The Washington basic food program administered by the
Washington state department of social and health services;
(ii) Basic health administered by the Washington state health care
authority;
(iii) Medical assistance programs administered by the Washington
state department of social and health services that fall within a
household income limitation of two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level as defined by the United States department of health and
human services;
(iv) Supplemental security income administered by the federal
social security administration; or
(v) Any other public assistance program that the director
determines is sufficient to qualify a person as a low-income
individual.
(3) No unowned dog or cat transferred from jurisdictions outside
Washington state into this state is eligible for spay or neuter surgery
under the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any private veterinarian, private
veterinary practice, animal care and control agency, and nonprofit
organization whose services include performing spay and neuter
surgeries on companion animals is eligible to participate in the
program.
(2) Spay and neuter services provided under the program may only be
performed by veterinarians licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW.
(3) Participation by spay and neuter surgery providers in the
program is voluntary. Participating spay and neuter surgery providers
may also elect to exclude particular species (dog or cat) and
participants may exclude acceptance of feral or free-roaming cats.
(4) Any private veterinarian, private veterinary practice, animal
care and control agency, or nonprofit organization that performs
companion animal spay and neuter surgeries that is interested in
participating in the program must submit an application to the
department that includes a schedule listing the fees charged for
companion animal sterilization in its normal course of business.
Applicants must list separate fees for surgical sterilization of female
cats, male cats, female dogs within various weight ranges, male dogs
within various weight ranges, and for other surgical classifications as
the department determines.
(5) The department shall reimburse each participating spay and
neuter surgery provider for companion animal sterilization based upon
the provider's normal fee schedule, not to exceed an amount the
department determines is usual, customary, and reasonable. The usual,
customary, and reasonable fee limit must be calculated at the eightieth
percentile of prevailing fees for similar services charged by peer
private veterinary practices in Washington state. The department may
establish rates of compensation for presurgical examinations and for
administration of vaccinations in such a manner and at a level as the
department determines is fair and reasonable.
(6) The department shall adjust rates of compensation at two-year
intervals.
(7) The department may establish separate rates of compensation for
services provided by animal care and control agencies and nonprofit
organizations that are participating spay and neuter surgery providers.
(8) Participating private veterinarians or private veterinary
practices are not required to screen applicants for eligibility,
although they may do so voluntarily. The department may require that
animal care and control agencies and nonprofit organizations that are
participating spay and neuter surgery providers screen applicants for
eligibility.
(9) No participating spay and neuter surgery provider is required
to perform medical procedures on an animal that the provider determines
is medically unfit.
(10) The department shall provide payment on a monthly basis to all
participating spay and neuter surgery providers for spay and neuter
surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations authorized by the
department for reimbursement. Services not authorized for payment may
not be reimbursed. Companion animal owners and caretakers of feral and
free-roaming cats are responsible for payment of any additional fees
due to the participating spay and neuter surgery provider that are
mutually agreed upon, administered by that provider, and not covered
under the program.
(11) To receive reimbursement for spay and neuter surgeries and
other approved services, the participating spay and neuter surgery
provider must submit documentation of authorized services performed as
required by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall adopt policies and
procedures relative to:
(1) Proof of eligibility for spay and neuter surgery;
(2) Establishing copayment amounts for spay and neuter surgeries on
companion animals owned by qualified low-income individuals;
(3) Enrolling spay and neuter surgery providers in the program;
(4) Determining the percentage of moneys to be allocated to spay
and neuter surgery, education of the public, and other purposes;
(5) Determining fair and reasonable rates of compensation for spay
and neuter surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations, and
for making fair and reasonable adjustments to those rates;
(6) Providing guidance to shelters concerning shelter reporting as
required under section 13 of this act; and
(7) Any other matter necessary for the administration of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 15.53.9018 and 2006 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every registrant or licensee must file a semiannual report on
forms provided by the department setting forth the number of tons of
commercial feed distributed in or into this state. The report must be
filed regardless of the amount of feed distributed or inspection fees
owed. The report must include:
(a) The name and mailing address of the registrant or licensee;
(b) The physical address of the registrant or licensee;
(c) The name, contact information, and signature of the person
filing the report;
(d) The total number of tons distributed in or into this state;
(e) The total number of tons on which the registrant or licensee is
paying fees;
(f) If the registrant or licensee is not paying inspection fees on
all commercial feed he or she distributed in or into this state,
information regarding the registrants or licensees that are responsible
for paying the inspection fees and the number of tons involved; ((and))
(g) If the registrant or licensee is not paying companion animal
spay/neuter fees on all pet food he or she distributed in or into this
state, information regarding the registrants or licensees that are
responsible for paying the companion animal spay/neuter fees and the
number of tons involved; and
(h) Other information required by the department by rule.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) through (5) of this
section((,)):
(a) Each initial distributor or responsible buyer must pay to the
department an inspection fee on all commercial feed distributed by such
person during the reporting period. ((The inspection fee must
accompany the report required in subsection (1) of this section.)) The
inspection fee shall be not less than four cents nor more than twelve
cents per ton as prescribed by the department by rule. ((These fees))
The inspection fee shall be used for enforcement and administration of
this chapter and its rules.
(b) Each initial distributor or responsible buyer of pet food must
pay to the department a companion animal spay/neuter fee on all pet
food distributed by such person during the reporting period. However,
no initial distributor or responsible buyer shall owe a companion
animal spay/neuter fee if the amount of pet food distributed during the
reporting period was less than one ton. Specialty pet food is not
subject to the companion animal spay/neuter fee. The companion animal
spay/neuter fee is fifty-seven dollars and fifty cents per ton, with
fractional amounts subject to the fee proportionally. The companion
animal spay/neuter fee shall be deposited into the companion animal
spay/neuter assistance account created in section 9 of this act.
(c) All fees must accompany the report required in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) The initial distributor is not required to pay an inspection
fee or companion animal spay/neuter fee for commercial feed he or she
distributed to a responsible buyer.
(4) In a situation where a responsible buyer is distributing to
another responsible buyer, the inspection fee, and if applicable, the
companion animal spay/neuter fee must be paid by the last responsible
buyer to distribute the commercial feed.
(5) The initial distributor or responsible buyer is not required to
pay an inspection fee or companion animal spay/neuter fee for: (a)
((Pet food and specialty pet food distributed in packages weighing less
than ten pounds; (b))) Distribution of bona fide experimental feeds on
which accurate records and experimental programs are maintained;
(((c))) (b) commercial feed distributed to points outside this state;
and (((d))) (c) food processing byproducts from fruit, vegetable, or
potato processing plants, freezing or dehydrating facilities, or juice
or jelly preserving plants. In addition, the initial distributor or
responsible buyer is not required to pay an inspection fee for pet food
and specialty pet food distributed in packages weighing less than ten
pounds.
(6) Tonnage will be reported and inspection fees will be paid on
(a) byproducts or products of sugar refineries; and (b) materials used
in the preparation of pet foods and specialty pet food. Tonnage will
be reported and companion animal spay/neuter fees will be paid on
materials used in the preparation of pet food.
(7)(a) Each person made responsible by this chapter for filing a
report or paying inspection fees and, if applicable, companion animal
spay/neuter fees, must do so according to the following schedule:
(i) For the period January 1st through June 30th of each year, the
report ((and)), inspection fees, and companion animal spay/neuter fees
are due on July 31st of that year; and
(ii) For the period July 1st through December 31st of each year,
the report ((and)), inspection fees, and companion animal spay/neuter
fees are due on January 31st of the following year.
(b) If a complete report is not received by the due date or the
appropriate inspection fees and companion animal spay/neuter fees are
not received by the due date, the person responsible for filing the
report or paying the inspection fee and companion animal spay/neuter
fee must pay a late fee equal to fifteen percent of the ((inspection))
fees owed or fifty dollars, whichever is greater.
(c) The department may cancel the registration of a person's
commercial feed or may cancel a person's commercial feed license if
that person fails to pay the late fee. The applicant or licensee may
request a hearing as authorized under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) If inspection fees are owed, the minimum inspection fee is
twelve dollars and fifty cents.
(9) For the purpose of verifying the accuracy of reports and
payment of appropriate inspection and companion animal spay/neuter
fees, the department may examine, at reasonable times, a registrant's
or licensee's distribution records and may require each registrant or
licensee to maintain records or file additional reports. These records
must be maintained in usable condition by the registrant or licensee
for a period of ((three)) five years unless by rule this retention
period is extended and must be submitted to the department upon
request.
(10) The report required by subsection (1) of this section shall
not be a public record, and any information given in such report which
would reveal the business operation of the person making the report is
exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, and information
obtained by the department from other governmental agencies or other
sources that is used to verify information received in the report is
exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW. However, this
subsection does not prevent the use of information concerning the
business operation of a person if any action, suit, or proceeding
instituted under the authority of this chapter, including any civil
action for collection of unpaid inspection fees or companion animal
spay/neuter fees, which action is hereby authorized and which shall be
as an action at law in the name of the director of the department.
(11) Any commercial feed obtained by a consumer or contract feeder
outside the jurisdiction of this state and brought into this state for
use is subject to all the provisions of this chapter, including
inspection fees and companion animal spay/neuter fees.

Sec. 8 RCW 15.53.9044 and 2005 c 18 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all moneys collected
under this chapter shall be paid to the director and deposited in an
account within the agricultural local fund. Such deposits shall be
used only in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The companion animal spay/neuter assistance
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
companion animal spay/neuter fees received under RCW 15.53.9018, gifts
and grants to the program under section 10 of this act, or other
revenue directed to the account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the program as
authorized by this chapter. Only the director of agriculture or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department may accept any donations,
grants, bequests, and devises, conditional or otherwise, or money,
property, service, or other things of value which may be received from
the United States or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, any
institution, person, firm, or corporation, public and private, to be
held, used, or applied for the purposes of the program established
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A person who knowingly falsifies the
following information is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be suspended
from participation in the program:
(1) Individual and household income or ownership of a pet in order
to qualify for pet sterilization;
(2) Prevailing fees and rates charged for spay and neuter
surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations; or
(3) Payment requests submitted to the department for performance of
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Not later than January 31, 2011, and
annually thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit to the
governor and the legislature a report that describes and evaluates the
program's performance and impact over the previous year and
cumulatively since its inception. At the least, the report must
include the following elements: The number of spay and neuter
surgeries completed; program revenue and expenditures; the number of
dogs and cats received by animal shelters and the fate of these
animals; effectiveness, efficiency, and accomplishment of objectives;
and recommendations for legislative or administrative actions as the
department deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 To assist the department in evaluating the
impact of the program, animal care and control agencies, humane
societies, and other nonprofit organizations that serve as animal
shelter for dogs and cats within the state must annually report to the
department, in a form and manner required by the department, the number
of cats, kittens, dogs, and puppies received and the fate of these
animals. However, animal shelters that handle small numbers of cats or
dogs, as determined by the department, are not required to report. The
department shall provide guidance to shelters on classifying animals by
age, health, and other factors for reporting purposes. Animal shelters
that fail to report as required under this section may, at the
department's discretion, be disqualified from receiving moneys under
this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.92.260 and 2002 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the limitations in this section, animal care and
control agencies as defined in RCW 16.52.011 and nonprofit humane
societies, that have qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code may provide limited veterinary services to animals owned
by qualified low-income households. The veterinary services provided
shall be limited to electronic identification, surgical sterilization,
and vaccinations. A veterinarian or veterinary technician acting
within his or her scope of practice must perform the limited veterinary
services. For purposes of this section, "low-income household" means
the same as in RCW 43.185A.010 and section 4(2)(b) of this act.
(b) Animal control agencies and nonprofit humane societies,
receiving animals on an emergency basis, may provide emergency care,
subject to a local ordinance that defines an emergency situation and
establishes temporary time limits.
(c) Any local ordinance addressing the needs under this section
that was approved by the voters and is in effect on July 1, 2003,
remains in effect.
(2) Veterinarians and veterinary technicians employed at these
facilities must be licensed under this chapter. No officer, director,
supervisor, or any other individual associated with an animal care or
control agency or nonprofit humane society owning and operating a
veterinary medical facility may impose any terms or conditions of
employment or direct or attempt to direct an employed veterinarian in
any way that interferes with the free exercise of the veterinarian's
professional judgment or infringes upon the utilization of his or her
professional skills.
(3) Veterinarians, veterinary technicians, and animal control
agencies and humane societies acting under this section shall, for
purposes of providing the limited veterinary services, meet the
requirements established under this chapter and are subject to the
rules adopted by the veterinary board of governors in the same fashion
as any licensed veterinarian or veterinary medical facility in the
state.
(4) The Washington state veterinary board of governors shall adopt
rules to:
(a) Establish registration and registration renewal requirements;
(b) Govern the purchase and use of drugs for the limited veterinary
services authorized under this section; and
(c) Ensure that agencies and societies are in compliance with this
section.
(5) The limited veterinary medical service authority granted by
registration under this section may be denied, suspended, revoked, or
conditioned by a determination of the board of governors for any act of
noncompliance with this chapter. The uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW, governs unregistered operation, the issuance and denial of
registrations, and the discipline of registrants under this section.
(6) No animal control agency or humane society may operate under
this chapter without registering with the department. An application
for registration shall be made upon forms provided by the department
and shall include the information the department reasonably requires,
as provided by RCW 43.70.280. The department shall establish
registration and renewal fees as provided by RCW 43.70.250. A
registration fee shall accompany each application for registration or
renewal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 6 and 9 through 13 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 6 and 9 through 13 of
this act take effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---