BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.129.005 and 1994 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that long-term care facilities are a
critical part of the state's long-term care services system. It is the
intent of the legislature that individuals who reside in long-term care
facilities receive appropriate services, be treated with courtesy, and
continue to enjoy their basic civil and legal rights.
It is also the intent of the legislature that long-term care
facility residents have the opportunity to exercise reasonable control
over life decisions. The legislature finds that choice, participation,
privacy, and the opportunity to engage in religious, political, civic,
recreational, and other social activities foster a sense of self-worth
and enhance the quality of life for long-term care residents.
The legislature finds that the public interest would be best served
by providing the same basic resident rights in all long-term care
settings. Residents in nursing facilities are guaranteed certain
rights by federal law and regulation, 42 U.S.C. 1396r and 42 C.F.R.
part 483. It is the intent of the legislature to extend those basic
rights to residents in veterans' homes, boarding homes, ((and)) adult
family homes, and intermediate care facilities for persons with
developmental disabilities.
The legislature intends that a facility should care for its
residents in a manner and in an environment that promotes maintenance
or enhancement of each resident's quality of life. A resident should
have a safe, clean, comfortable, and homelike environment, allowing the
resident to use his or her personal belongings to the extent possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.129.010 and 1997 c 392 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of state government
responsible for licensing the provider in question.
(2) "Facility" means a long-term care facility or an intermediate
care facility.
(3) "Long-term care facility" means a facility that is licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(4) "Intermediate care facility" or "intermediate care facility for
persons with developmental disabilities" means a facility described in
federal law as an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded
that is certified by the department of social and health services or by
the federal department of health and human services to provide
residential care under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(d).
(5) "Resident" means the individual receiving services in a long-term care facility or an intermediate care facility for persons with
developmental disabilities, that resident's attorney-in-fact, guardian,
or other legal representative acting within the scope of their
authority.
(((5))) (6) "Physical restraint" means a manual method, obstacle,
or physical or mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or
adjacent to the resident's body that restricts freedom of movement or
access to his or her body, is used for discipline or convenience, and
not required to treat the resident's medical symptoms.
(((6))) (7) "Chemical restraint" means a psychopharmacologic drug
that is used for discipline or convenience and not required to treat
the resident's medical symptoms.
(((7))) (8) "Representative" means a person appointed under RCW
7.70.065.
(((8))) (9) "Reasonable accommodation" by a facility to the needs
of a prospective or current resident has the meaning given to this term
under the federal Americans with disabilities act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 12101 et seq. and other applicable federal or state
antidiscrimination laws and regulations.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.129.105 and 1997 c 392 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
No long-term care facility ((or)), nursing facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, or intermediate care facility for persons with
developmental disabilities shall require or request residents to sign
waivers of potential liability for losses of personal property or
injury, or to sign waivers of residents' rights set forth in this
chapter or in the applicable licensing or certification laws.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.129.110 and 1997 c 392 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must permit each resident to remain in the
facility, and not transfer or discharge the resident from the facility
unless:
(a) The transfer or discharge is necessary for the resident's
welfare and the resident's needs cannot be met in the facility;
(b) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;
(c) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be
endangered;
(d) The resident has failed to make the required payment for his or
her stay; or
(e) The facility ceases to operate.
(2) All long-term care facilities shall fully disclose to potential
residents or their legal representative the service capabilities of the
facility prior to admission to the facility. If the care needs of the
applicant who is medicaid eligible are in excess of the facility's
service capabilities, the department shall identify other care settings
or residential care options consistent with federal law.
(3) Before a long-term care facility transfers or discharges a
resident, the facility must:
(a) First attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid the
transfer or discharge, unless agreed to by the resident;
(b) Notify the resident and representative and make a reasonable
effort to notify, if known, an interested family member of the transfer
or discharge and the reasons for the move in writing and in a language
and manner they understand;
(c) Record the reasons in the resident's record; and
(d) Include in the notice the items described in subsection (5) of
this section.
(4)(a) Except when specified in this subsection, the notice of
transfer or discharge required under subsection (3) of this section
must be made by the facility at least thirty days before the resident
is transferred or discharged.
(b) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or
discharge when:
(i) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(ii) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(iii) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the
resident's urgent medical needs; or
(iv) A resident has not resided in the facility for thirty days.
(5) The written notice specified in subsection (3) of this section
must include the following:
(a) The reason for transfer or discharge;
(b) The effective date of transfer or discharge;
(c) The location to which the resident is transferred or
discharged;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ombudsman;
(e) For residents with developmental disabilities, the mailing
address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of ((developmentally disabled individuals))
persons with developmental disabilities established under part C of the
developmental disabilities assistance and bill of rights act; ((and))
(f) For residents who ((are mentally ill)) have a mental illness,
the mailing address and telephone number of the agency responsible for
the protection and advocacy of ((mentally ill individuals)) persons who
have a mental illness established under the protection and advocacy for
mentally ill individuals act; and
(g) For residents of an intermediate care facility for persons with
developmental disabilities, the mailing addresses and telephone numbers
of the resident's representative, if any, and the human rights
committee of that facility established under 42 C.F.R. 483.440.
(6) A facility must provide sufficient preparation and orientation
to residents to ensure safe and orderly transfer or discharge from the
facility.
(7) A resident discharged in violation of this section has the
right to be readmitted immediately upon the first availability of a
gender-appropriate bed in the facility.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.129.160 and 1998 c 245 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
The long-term care ombudsman shall monitor implementation of this
chapter and determine the degree to which veterans' homes, nursing
facilities, adult family homes, ((and)) boarding homes, and
intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental
disabilities ensure that residents are able to exercise their rights.
The long-term care ombudsman shall consult with the departments of
health and social and health services, long-term care facility
organizations, the human rights committee of an intermediate care
facility for persons with developmental disabilities, resident groups,
and organizations for senior ((and disabled)) citizens
((organizations)) and persons with disabilities.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.129.170 and 1994 c 214 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that long-term care facility or nursing
home residents, their family members or guardians, the long-term care
ombudsman, protection and advocacy personnel, and the human rights
committee identified in RCW 70.129.110(((4))) (5) (e) ((and)), (f), and
(g), and others who may seek to assist long-term care facility or
nursing home residents, use the least formal means available to
satisfactorily resolve disputes that may arise regarding the rights
conferred by the provisions of chapter 70.129 RCW and RCW 18.20.180,
18.51.009, 72.36.037, and 70.128.125. Wherever feasible, direct
discussion with facility personnel or administrators should be
employed. Failing that, and where feasible, recourse may be sought
through state or federal long-term care or nursing home licensing or
other regulatory authorities.((However,))
(2) The procedures suggested in this section are cumulative and
shall not restrict an agency or person from seeking a remedy provided
by law or from obtaining additional relief based on the same facts,
including any remedy available to an individual at common law.
(3) Chapter 214, Laws of 1994 is not intended to, and shall not be
construed to, create any right of action on the part of any individual
beyond those in existence under any common law or statutory doctrine.
(4) Chapter 214, Laws of 1994 is not intended to, and shall not be
construed to, operate in derogation of any right of action on the part
of any individual in existence on June 9, 1994.

--- END ---