BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.5152 and 2006 c 73 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to penalties that may be imposed under RCW 46.61.5055,
the court may require a person who is convicted of a nonfelony
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or who enters a deferred
prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 based on a nonfelony violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, to attend an educational program, such
as a victim impact panel, focusing on the emotional, physical, and
financial suffering of victims who were injured by persons convicted of
driving while under the influence of intoxicants. The program must
meet the minimum standards established under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each court administration or the equivalent shall develop
and maintain a registry of qualified victim impact panels. When
imposing a requirement that an offender attend a victim impact panel
under RCW 46.61.5152, the court shall refer the offender to a victim
impact panel that is listed in the registry. Municipal, district, and
superior courts may coordinate efforts to develop and maintain a
registry for their judicial district.
(b) Any person who reasonably believes that a victim impact panel
has failed to meet the minimum standards in this section may report
that to the court in writing. The court may remove from the registry
any victim impact panel that fails to meet the minimum standards. The
court may establish a process to receive and review complaints and
conduct disciplinary procedures for victim impact panels.
(2) To be listed among a court's registry, the victim impact panel
must meet the following minimum standards:
(a) The victim impact panel must address the effects of driving
while impaired on individuals and families and address alternatives to
drinking and/or drug use and driving;
(b) The victim impact panel must have at least two different
speakers who shall be victim survivors of DUI crashes and who were not
the proximate cause of their victimization or crash, one of whom may be
the panel facilitator, presenting their stories in person and providing
at least sixty minutes of victim panel presentation, not including
registration and administration time;
(c) The victim impact panel shall have policies and procedures to
recruit, screen, train, and provide feedback and ongoing support to the
panelists. The panel shall take reasonable steps to verify the
authenticity of each panelist's story;
(d) The victim impact panel shall charge a reasonable fee to all
persons required to attend, unless otherwise ordered by the court;
(e) The victim impact panel shall have a no admittance policy for
anyone under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or whose actions or
behavior are otherwise inappropriate. The victim impact panel may
institute additional admission requirements;
(f) The victim impact panel shall maintain attendance records for
at least five years;
(g) The victim impact panel shall make reasonable efforts to use a
facility that meets standards established by the Americans with
disabilities act;
(h) The victim impact panel shall provide referral information to
other community services; and
(i) The victim impact panel shall have a designated facilitator who
is responsible for the compliance with these minimum standards and who
is responsible for maintaining appropriate records and communication
with the referring courts and probationary departments regarding
attendance or nonattendance.

--- END ---