BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the Olympic
Peninsula is bounded on the west and north by uniquely rich and highly
vulnerable biological, cultural, and marine resources supporting some
of the nation's most valuable tribal, commercial, and sport fisheries.
The area also sustains endangered species and numerous species of
vulnerable marine mammals. The area's national significance is
recognized by special federal designations including a national park,
a national marine sanctuary, a maritime area to be avoided, national
wildlife refuges, a world heritage site, as well as tribal lands and
usual and accustomed fishing areas of federally recognized coastal
Indian tribes. This remote area periodically experiences severe
coastal storms, dangerous seas, strong coastal currents, and frequent
fog placing economically valuable maritime commerce and ship crews at
risk.
(2) The legislature further finds that these peculiarities of the
local waters require special protection from the serious threat posed
by maritime casualties. The area's natural, cultural, and economic
resources must be provided with the best achievable protection from
damages caused by the discharge of oil into coastal waters.
(3) The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has
maintained an emergency response tug at Neah Bay since 1999 to protect
its waters from maritime casualties and resultant oil spills. During
that time it has demonstrated its capability by responding to forty-one
ships in need of assistance in the area from Port Angeles to the
Columbia river. State funding is scheduled to end June 30, 2009. The
legislature intends for the maritime industry to provide and fully fund
a year-round emergency response tug at Neah Bay, including the
logistical and operational management support system. This emergency
response towing vessel and its operations should meet or exceed the
state's fiscal year 2009 technical contract specifications of the
contracted Neah Bay emergency response towing vessel.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.46.130 and 1991 c 200 s 426 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An emergency response system for vessels operating in the entry
of the Strait of Juan de Fuca shall be established and operated
consistent with this section by July 1, ((1992)) 2010. ((In
establishing the emergency response system, the administrator shall
consider the recommendations of the regional marine safety committees.
The administrator shall also consult with the province of British
Columbia regarding its participation in the emergency response
system.))
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, and in
addition to the contingency plan requirements adopted by the department
under RCW 88.46.060, contingency plans for all covered vessels while
operating in all waters of the entry to the Strait of Juan de Fuca
north of the Clallam county shoreline and east of Duncan rock must
provide for the emergency response system described in this section,
including the management and operation of an emergency response towing
vessel that satisfies the planning standards in section 3 of this act.
(b) Owners and operators of covered vessels that operate in the
portion of the entry to the Strait of Juan de Fuca identified in this
subsection shall submit an addendum to their oil spill contingency plan
demonstrating compliance with this section by January 1, 2010. A
vessel submitting an initial contingency plan after January 1, 2010,
must provide documentation of its compliance with this section
concurrent with the submittal of its contingency plan.
(c) The department shall review all submittals demonstrating
compliance with this section and shall approve any submittal that meets
the intent and planning standards established in section 3 of this act.
(3) Full implementation of section 3 of this act, or implementation
of a system of protective measures imposed or required by the federal
government that are determined by the department to be substantially
equivalent to those requirements, satisfies the emergency response
system required by this section.
(4) The director may suspend the requirement for an emergency
response towing vessel created in this section if the director
determines that an emergency response towing vessel satisfying the
requirements of section 3 of this act is not available to provide the
services required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An emergency response towing vessel that is a part of the
emergency response system required by RCW 88.46.130 must be stationed
at Neah Bay and be continuously capable and available to respond to any
vessel emergency. The towing vessel must, at a minimum, be able to
satisfy the following planning standards:
(a) Be underway within twenty minutes of a decision to deploy;
(b) Be able to deploy at any hour of any day to provide emergency
assistance and be safely manned to remain underway for at least forty-eight hours;
(c) In severe weather conditions, be capable of making up to,
stopping, holding, and towing a drifting or disabled vessel of one
hundred eighty thousand metric dead weight tons;
(d) In severe weather conditions, be capable of holding position
within one hundred feet of another vessel;
(e) Be equipped with and maneuverable enough to effectively employ
a ship anchor chain recovery hook and line throwing gun;
(f) Be capable of a bollard pull of at least seventy short tons;
and
(g) Be equipped with appropriate equipment for:
(i) Damage control patching;
(ii) Vessel dewatering;
(iii) Air safety monitoring; and
(iv) Digital photography.
(2) The requirements of this section may be fulfilled by one or
more private organizations or nonprofit cooperatives providing umbrella
coverage under contract to single or multiple covered vessels.
(3)(a) The department must be authorized to contract with the
emergency response towing vessel, at the discretion of the department,
in response to a potentially emerging maritime casualty or as a
precautionary measure during severe storms. All instances of use by
the department must be paid for by the department.
(b) Covered vessels that are required to provide an emergency
response towing vessel under RCW 88.46.130 may not restrict the
emergency response towing vessel from responding to distressed vessels
that are not covered vessels.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the ability of a covered vessel
to contract with an emergency response towing vessel with capabilities
that exceed the minimum capabilities provided for a towing vessel in
this section.
(5) The covered vessel owner or operator shall submit a written
report to the department as soon as practicable regarding an emergency
response system deployment, including photographic documentation
determined by the department to be of adequate quality. The report
must provide a detailed description of the incident necessitating a
response and the actions taken to render assistance under the emergency
response system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide the various
components of the maritime industry with the tools necessary to satisfy
the requirements of RCW 88.46.130 in the most cost-effective manner.
In doing, the legislature encourages, but does not mandate, the
maritime industry to unite behind their mutual interests and
responsibilities and identify or form a single umbrella organization
that allows all affected covered vessels to equitably share the costs
inherent in the implementation of RCW 88.46.130.
(2) The legislature further finds that an equitable sharing of the
costs of implementing RCW 88.46.130 may mean that not all covered
vessels will be responsible for providing the same amount of funding.
Any umbrella organization that is identified or formed to satisfy the
requirements of this act should consider the multitude of factors that
comprise the risk of oil spills and the likelihood of initiating a
response from the emergency response vessel required by RCW 88.46.130,
including the number of transits made by the covered vessel, the nature
and quantity of its cargo, and the technical sophistication of its
design, safety updates, and maintenance.
(3) The legislature intends to provide the authority for any
operator of a covered vessel that feels as though an umbrella
organization that is identified, formed, or proposed for formation does
not equitably share the costs of compliance with RCW 88.46.130 with the
covered vessel in question, or the class of vessel to which the covered
vessel belongs, to either contract directly with an adequate emergency
response vessel or form or join a discreet umbrella organization
representing the appropriate segment of the maritime industry.
However, if the operator of a covered vessel chooses not to join a
proposed or existing umbrella organization, or finds that negotiations
leading to the formation of an umbrella organization are not
progressing in an adequate manner, the legislature requests, but does
not require, that the vessel operator contact the department and
provide official notice of their concern as to how the umbrella group
in question failed in establishing an equitable cost-share strategy.
(4) The department shall collect and maintain all notices received
under this section and shall summarize any reports received by the
operators of covered vessels and report the summation to the
appropriate committees of the legislature upon request by a legislative
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Designated representatives of the owners
and operators of all classes of covered vessels shall negotiate, given
the intent of section 4 of this act, a system to determine the
equitable apportionment of costs of the emergency response system
required by this act.
(2) Participants to the negotiations shall report the results to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.
This report shall provide available information relating to:
(a) The anticipated average annual cost of providing the emergency
response system required by this act;
(b) The methodology for determining the annual cost for each vessel
of complying with this act, including a system for crediting enhanced
navigational or structural characteristics, and any caps or limitations
on total cost for vessels that frequently transit the waters identified
in this act; and
(c) The anticipated average annual cost of complying with this act
for each of the following class of covered vessels:
(i) Oil tankers;
(ii) Tank barges;
(iii) Tug and oil barge combinations;
(iv) Nontank vessels, including cruise ships;
(v) Other covered vessels.
(3) If the representatives designated under this section to
participate in negotiations fail to achieve the goals of this section
or otherwise choose not to report the outcomes to the legislature, the
department of ecology shall, by December 1, 2009, deliver the summation
of any reports received under section 4 of this act.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to reviewing contingency plans submitted under RCW
88.46.130, the department may determine the adequacy of the emergency
response system required in RCW 88.46.130 through practice drills that
test the adequacy of the responding entity's capabilities and
satisfaction of the requirements of section 3 of this act. Practice
drills may be conducted without prior notice.
(2) Each successful response to a vessel emergency may be
considered by the department to satisfy a drill covering this portion
of a covered vessel's contingency plan.
(3) Drills of the emergency response system required in RCW
88.46.130 must emphasize the system's ability to respond to a
potentially worst case vessel emergency scenario.

Sec. 7 RCW 88.46.010 and 2007 c 347 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Best achievable protection" means the highest level of
protection that can be achieved through the use of the best achievable
technology and those staffing levels, training procedures, and
operational methods that provide the greatest degree of protection
achievable. The director's determination of best achievable protection
shall be guided by the critical need to protect the state's natural
resources and waters, while considering (a) the additional protection
provided by the measures; (b) the technological achievability of the
measures; and (c) the cost of the measures.
(2) "Best achievable technology" means the technology that provides
the greatest degree of protection taking into consideration (a)
processes that are being developed, or could feasibly be developed,
given overall reasonable expenditures on research and development, and
(b) processes that are currently in use. In determining what is best
achievable technology, the director shall consider the effectiveness,
engineering feasibility, and commercial availability of the technology.
(3) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel or a passenger vessel, of three hundred or more
gross tons, including but not limited to, commercial fish processing
vessels and freighters.
(4) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose,
unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed
by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(5) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(6) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(8) "Discharge" means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring,
emitting, emptying, or dumping.
(9) "Duncan rock" means the nautical landmark located northwest of
Tatoosh Island in Clallam county marking the entrance to the Strait of
Juan de Fuca.
(10) "Entry to the Strait of Juan de Fuca" means that portion of
the Strait of Juan de Fuca seaward of a line drawn from New Dungeness
light in Clallam county to Discovery Island light on Vancouver Island,
British Columbia, Canada, and including the Washington portion of the
approach area to the Strait of Juan de Fuca from Cape Flattery light in
Clallam county southward to North Head light in Pacific county near the
mouth of the Columbia river.
(11)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
a tank vessel or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing,
handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) retail motor vehicle motor
fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an exempt
agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330; (iv) underground
storage tank regulated by the department or a local government under
chapter 90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not dispense
more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not a
covered vessel, in a single transaction.
(((10))) (12) "Marine facility" means any facility used for tank
vessel wharfage or anchorage, including any equipment used for the
purpose of handling or transferring oil in bulk to or from a tank
vessel.
(((11))) (13) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of
the state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb
and flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the
past, or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate,
interstate, or foreign commerce.
(((12))) (14) "Oil" or "oils" means oil of any kind that is liquid
at atmospheric temperature and any fractionation thereof, including,
but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline, fuel oil, diesel
oil, biological oils and blends, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed
with wastes other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any
substance listed in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted August
14, 1989, under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as
amended by P.L. 99-499.
(((13))) (15) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in,
on, or under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not
include a facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any
land of the state, other than submerged land. "Offshore facility" does
not include a marine facility.
(((14))) (16) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of
which is located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than
submerged land, that because of its location, could reasonably be
expected to cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging
oil into or on the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining
shorelines.
(((15))) (17)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a
vessel, any person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the
vessel; (ii) in the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person
owning or operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned
vessel or onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or
operated the vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(((16))) (18) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or
more gross tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons
carrying passengers for compensation.
(((17))) (19) "Person" means any political subdivision, government
agency, municipality, industry, public or private corporation,
copartnership, association, firm, individual, or any other entity
whatsoever.
(((18))) (20) "Severe weather conditions" means observed nautical
conditions with sustained winds measured at forty knots and wave
heights measured between twelve and eighteen feet.
(21) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating
craft of any kind.
(((19))) (22) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into
the waters of the state.
(((20))) (23) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or
adapted to carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo
residue, and that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(((21))) (24) "Vessel emergency" includes:
(a) A substantial threat of pollution originating from a covered
vessel including, but not limited to, loss or serious degradation of
propulsion, steering, means of navigation, primary electrical
generating capability, and seakeeping capability;
(b) Hull breach; or
(c) Oil spill.
(25) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats,
beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
(((22))) (26) "Worst case spill" means: (a) In the case of a
vessel, a spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the vessel complicated
by adverse weather conditions; and (b) in the case of an onshore or
offshore facility, the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather
conditions.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.56.500 and 1991 c 200 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state oil spill response account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(1) shall be deposited in
the account. All costs reimbursed to the state by a responsible party
or any other person for responding to a spill of oil shall also be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be spent only
after appropriation. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The account shall be used exclusively to pay for:
(a) The costs associated with the response to spills of crude oil
or petroleum products into the navigable waters of the state; and
(b) The costs associated with the department's use of the emergency
response towing vessel as described in section 3 of this act.
(3) Payment of response costs under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall be limited to spills which the director has determined
are likely to exceed fifty thousand dollars. Before expending moneys
from the account, the director shall make reasonable efforts to obtain
funding for response costs from the person responsible for the spill
and from other sources, including the federal government.
(4) Reimbursement for response costs shall be allowed only for
costs which are not covered by funds appropriated to the agencies
responsible for response activities. Costs associated with the
response to spills of crude oil or petroleum products shall include:
(((1))) (a) Natural resource damage assessment and related
activities;
(((2))) (b) Spill related response, containment, wildlife rescue,
cleanup, disposal, and associated costs;
(((3))) (c) Interagency coordination and public information related
to a response; and
(((4))) (d) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The director of the department of
ecology, or the director's designee, shall initiate discussions with
the director's equivalent position in the government for the Canadian
province of British Columbia to explore options for Washington and
British Columbia to share the marine response assets required under
this act.
(2) Any progress or outcomes from the discussions initiated under
this section must be reported to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than January 1, 2011.
(3) This section expires July 31, 2011.

--- END ---