BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0283 and 2007 c 6 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices, and the components of
such prosthetic devices;
(b) Components of prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or
furnished for an individual by a person licensed under the laws of this
state to prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices;
(c) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ((and
(c) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and)) (d) Durable medical equipment, and the components of
durable medical equipment, for home use and prescribed by a person
licensed under the laws of this state to prescribe such equipment;
(e) Gaseous((,)) or liquid bottled oxygen ((systems)) used with
durable medical equipment prescribed for an individual by a person
licensed under ((chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW)) the laws of this state
for use in the medical treatment of ((that)) an individual for home
use; and
(f) Mobility enhancing equipment, and the components of mobility
enhancing equipment, prescribed by a person licensed under the laws of
this state to prescribe such equipment.
(2) In addition, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) ((The exemption in subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply to sales of durable medical equipment, other than as specified in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, or mobility enhancing equipment.
(4))) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device, including repair and replacement parts for a
prosthetic device, worn on or in the body to:
(i) Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;
(ii) Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or
(iii) Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.
(b) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement parts for durable medical equipment that:
(i) Can withstand repeated use;
(ii) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
(iii) Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness
or injury; and
(iv) Is not worn in or on the body.
(c) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacement parts for mobility enhancing equipment that:
(i) Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the
ability to move from one place to another and that is appropriate for
use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
(iii) Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.
(d) The terms "durable medical equipment" and "mobility enhancing
equipment" are mutually exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in the form
of a refund is provided for sales of:
(a) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state for use in
the medical treatment of that individual for other than home use;
(b) Repair, replacement, and component parts for medically
prescribed oxygen for other than home use; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of medically prescribed oxygen for
other than home use.
(2) Sellers shall collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer shall apply for a refund directly from the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.0277 and 2007 c 6 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices, and the components of
such prosthetic devices;
(b) Components of such prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or
furnished for an individual by a person licensed under the laws of this
state to prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices;
(c) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ((and
(c) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and)) (d) Durable medical equipment, and the components of
durable medical equipment, for home use and prescribed by a person
licensed under the laws of this state to prescribe such equipment;
(e) Gaseous((,)) or liquid bottled oxygen ((systems)) used with
durable medical equipment prescribed for an individual by a person
licensed under ((chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW)) the laws of this state
for use in the medical treatment of ((that)) an individual for home
use; and
(f) Mobility enhancing equipment, and the components of mobility
enhancing equipment, prescribed by a person licensed under the laws of
this state to prescribe such equipment.
(2) In addition, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) ((The exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section
shall not apply to the use of durable medical equipment, other than as
specified in subsection (1)(c) of this section, or mobility enhancing
equipment.
(4))) "Prosthetic device," "durable medical equipment," and
"mobility enhancing equipment" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.08.0283.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter must not apply in respect to the
use of:
(a) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state for use in
the medical treatment of that individual for other than home use;
(b) Repair, replacement, and component parts for any of the items
exempted in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items exempted in (a) of
this subsection.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax shall collect tax on sales
subject to this exemption. The buyer shall apply for a refund directly
from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.803 and 2007 c 6 s 1103 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in the form
of a refund is provided for sales of nebulizers for other than home
use, including repair, replacement, and component parts for such
nebulizers, for human use pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) may not apply to charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving of nebulizers that are exempt under this
section. "Nebulizer" means a device, not a building fixture, that
converts a liquid medication into a mist so that it can be inhaled.
(2) Sellers ((shall)) must collect tax on sales subject to this
exemption. The buyer ((shall)) must apply for a refund directly from
the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.803 and 2007 c 6 s 1104 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) may not apply in
respect to the use of nebulizers for other than home use, including
repair, replacement, and component parts for such nebulizers, for human
use pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the provisions of this
chapter shall not apply in respect to labor and services rendered in
respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of
nebulizers that are exempt under this section. "Nebulizer" has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.08.803.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax ((shall)) must collect tax
on sales subject to this exemption. The buyer ((shall)) must apply for
a refund directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed
by the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.08.945 and 2004 c 153 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to)) (1) An
exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a refund
is provided for sales of kidney dialysis devices for other than home
use, including repair ((and)), replacement, and component parts, for
human use pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) may not apply to charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving of kidney dialysis devices that are exempt under this
section.
(2) Sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer must apply for a refund directly from the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.945 and 2004 c 153 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) may not apply to the
use of kidney dialysis devices for other than home use, including
repair ((and)), replacement, and component parts, for human use
pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the provisions of this
chapter ((shall)) may not apply in respect to the use of labor and
services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving of kidney dialysis devices that are exempt under this
section.
(2) Sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer must apply for a refund directly from the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

--- END ---