BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Access to appropriate early intervention services significantly
improves function in children with developmental delays and
developmental disabilities. Health care services, including
neurodevelopmental therapies, are an essential component of early
intervention services.
(2) The provision of early intervention services is a shared
responsibility of federal and state government, private health
insurance, state purchased health care programs, and schools.
(3) The existing neurodevelopmental therapy benefit is unreasonably
limited, in light of the nature of the diagnoses that
neurodevelopmental services are used to treat. Children with medical
disorders that result in developmental delays or developmental
disabilities have an ongoing need for appropriate neurodevelopmental
services that are designed to improve and maintain their ability to
function and to prevent deterioration in functioning. The provision of
appropriate health care interventions, such as neurodevelopmental
therapies, to treat these disorders significantly and positively
affects a child's ability to function in an age-appropriate manner.
Research demonstrates that the timing of the provision of these
interventions is critical to a child's ability to function and the
failure to intervene at a meaningful point in a child's development can
result in a lost opportunity that cannot be fully compensated for
later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter that is established or renewed on or
after January 1, 2011, must include coverage for neurodevelopmental
therapies for covered individuals under eighteen years of age.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Neurodevelopmental therapies" means occupational therapy,
speech therapy, physical therapy, applied behavior analysis, and other
therapies for the treatment of developmental delays, developmental
disabilities, or developmental disorders that are consistent with
generally accepted standards of practice, as defined in subsection (5)
of this section.
(b) "Applied behavior analysis" means the design, implementation,
and evaluation of therapeutic programs, using behavioral stimuli and
consequences, to produce socially significant improvement in human
behavior, including the use of direct observation, measurement, and
functional analysis of the relationship between social or learning
environment and behavior.
(3) Neurodevelopmental therapy benefits are payable when the
services have been delivered or supervised by a health professional
regulated under Title 18 RCW, pursuant to an individualized written
treatment plan developed by a health care provider licensed under
chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or when covered services have been rendered
by such licensee. The treatment plan must be developed based upon the
results of a comprehensive evaluation or periodic reevaluation of the
child. A carrier may require that the treatment plan be reviewed
periodically. A carrier may require that neurodevelopmental therapy
services be delivered by a health care provider who participates in the
carrier's provider network, unless no participating provider is
available to deliver covered services. Nothing in this section
prohibits a carrier from negotiating rates with qualified providers.
(4) The treatment plan should complement and not duplicate any
other neurodevelopmental services that a child is receiving through
publicly funded programs, including special education. Services that
are being provided by a school district to a child through an
individual education plan under the federal individuals with
disabilities education act do not have to be provided to the child
under this section. However, consistent with part C of the federal
individuals with disabilities education act, for early intervention
services provided to children birth to three years of age, a child's
health insurance coverage must be considered the primary payer.
(5) Benefits are payable for services to improve age-appropriate
functioning, and for maintenance of function in cases where significant
deterioration in the child's condition would result without the
service. Deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance for neurodevelopmental
services may be no more than the deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
for other medical services otherwise provided under the health plan.
Neurodevelopmental therapy coverage under this section is subject to a
maximum benefit of fifty thousand dollars per year. Coverage under
this section also may be subject to health benefit plan provisions
establishing cumulative annual or lifetime benefit limits for all
services provided under the health benefit plan.
(6) In determining whether services are medically necessary, the
health plan may use reasonable criteria that are in accordance with
generally accepted standards of practice, and are clinically
appropriate, giving strong consideration to the diagnoses for which
neurodevelopmental therapies are prescribed for children, the ongoing
nature of such diagnoses, and the use of neurodevelopmental therapy
services to improve and prevent deterioration in functioning. As used
in this subsection, "generally accepted standards of practice" means
standards that are based on credible scientific evidence published in
peer-reviewed medical literature generally recognized by the relevant
medical community, evidence-based clinical guidelines developed by
relevant physician or health care practitioner specialty societies, or
other clinical guidelines that are supported by multiple site random
controlled trials or other credible research demonstrating that the
therapy is effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All group health benefit plans entered into, or renewed, on or
after January 1, 2011, must include coverage for neurodevelopmental
therapies for covered individuals under eighteen years of age.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Neurodevelopmental therapies" means occupational therapy,
speech therapy, physical therapy, applied behavior analysis, and other
therapies for the treatment of developmental delays, developmental
disabilities, or developmental disorders that are consistent with
generally accepted standards of practice, as defined in subsection (5)
of this section.
(b) "Applied behavior analysis" means the design, implementation,
and evaluation of therapeutic programs, using behavioral stimuli and
consequences, to produce socially significant improvement in human
behavior, including the use of direct observation, measurement, and
functional analysis of the relationship between the social or learning
environment and behavior.
(3) Neurodevelopmental therapy benefits are payable when the
services have been delivered or supervised by a health professional
regulated under Title 18 RCW, pursuant to an individualized written
treatment plan developed by a health care provider licensed under
chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or when covered services have been rendered
by such licensee. The treatment plan must be developed based upon the
results of a comprehensive evaluation or periodic reevaluation of the
child. A carrier may require that the treatment plan be reviewed
periodically. A carrier may require that neurodevelopmental therapy
services be delivered by a health care provider who participates in the
carrier's provider network, unless no participating provider is
available to deliver covered services. Nothing in this section
prohibits a carrier from negotiating rates with qualified providers.
(4) The treatment plan should complement and not duplicate any
other neurodevelopmental services that a child is receiving through
publicly funded programs, including special education. Services that
are being provided by a school district to a child through an
individual education plan under the federal individuals with
disabilities education act do not have to be provided to the child
under this section. However, consistent with part C of the federal
individuals with disabilities education act, for early intervention
services provided to children birth to three years of age, a child's
health insurance coverage must be considered the primary payer.
(5) Benefits shall be payable for services to restore and improve
age-appropriate functioning and for maintenance of function in cases
where significant deterioration in the child's condition would result
without the service. Deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance for
neurodevelopmental services may be no more than the deductible,
copayment, or coinsurance for other medical services otherwise provided
under the health benefit plan. Neurodevelopmental therapy coverage
under this section is subject to a maximum benefit of fifty thousand
dollars per year. Coverage under this section also may be subject to
health benefit plan provisions establishing cumulative annual or
lifetime benefit limits for all services provided under the health
benefit plan.
(6) In determining whether services are medically necessary, the
carrier may use reasonable criteria that are in accordance with
generally accepted standards of practice, and are clinically
appropriate, giving strong consideration to the diagnoses for which
neurodevelopmental therapies are prescribed for children, the ongoing
nature of such diagnoses, and the use of neurodevelopmental therapy
services to improve and prevent deterioration in functioning. As used
in this subsection, "generally accepted standards of practice" means
standards that are based on credible scientific evidence published in
peer-reviewed medical literature generally recognized by the relevant
medical community, evidence-based clinical guidelines developed by
relevant physician or health care practitioner specialty societies, or
other clinical guidelines that are supported by multiple site random
controlled trials or other credible research demonstrating that the
therapy is effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of health shall conduct a
review under chapter 18.120 RCW to determine the most appropriate means
to regulate persons who utilize applied behavior analysis for the
treatment of persons with an autism spectrum disorder. The review
should address, at a minimum, whether applied behavior analysis
providers should be regulated through establishment of a new health
profession or through establishment of a new classification within an
existing health profession, and appropriate education and experience
requirements. In determining appropriate education and experience
requirements, the department shall give great weight to the
certification criteria established by the institute for applied
behavior analysis. In developing its recommendations, the department
shall consult with interested organizations. The department must
submit its recommendations to the governor and the legislature on or
before November 15, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of health shall establish a
process to periodically review credible sources of scientific evidence
related to effective therapies for treatment of individuals under
eighteen years of age with autism spectrum disorder. The results of
the review will identify treatment modalities that should be considered
to be in accordance with generally accepted standards of practice, as
that term is defined in section 2(6) and section 3(6) of this act. The
review shall be conducted with substantial involvement of individuals
with medical expertise in this field, and with consultation from
health care providers, autism researchers, family members of persons
with autism spectrum disorders, carriers, the department of social and
health services, the health care authority, educators, and other
interested persons. The department must report its findings to the
governor and the legislature by November 15, 2009, and on a biannual
basis thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 41.05.170 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored
group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 4;
(2) RCW 48.21.310 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored
group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 2;
(3) RCW 48.44.450 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored
group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 1; and
(4) RCW 48.46.520 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored
group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 6 of this act takes effect January
1, 2011.

--- END ---