BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
enhance the delivery of health care to the citizens of the state.
(a) For many years health care assistants, certified with the state
and supervised by a licensed health care practitioner, have been an
integral and often overlooked part of the state's health care delivery
system. It is not surprising then that as the demand for health care
services has exploded over the past twenty years, so too have the
demands on licensed health care practitioners, and in turn those that
assist those practitioners.
(b) In an attempt to manage this skyrocketing demand, a highly
complex integrated health delivery system characterized by greater
specialization has evolved. Health care assistants, including medical
assistants, have responded to these changes by developing greater
training and education opportunities through nationally accredited
programs. This additional training, when appropriately supervised, can
be of great assistance to our licensed health care practitioners.
(c) It is important for the legislature to look for new ways to
harness the training of our health care practitioners, and those that
assist them, in order to alleviate the stress on our current health
care delivery system. With this in mind, the legislature encourages
some minor expansions to the scope of practice of registered health
care assistants, so long as there are clearly defined limitations to
their scope expressly linked to education, training, and supervision.
(2) Within the existing resources, the department of health shall
conduct a review under chapter 18.120 regarding the regulation and the
scope of practice of medical assistants.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.135.010 and 2008 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is in this state's public interest that limited authority to:
(1) Administer skin tests and subcutaneous, intradermal, intramuscular,
and intravenous injections; (2) perform minor invasive procedures to
withdraw blood; ((and)) (3) administer vaccines in accordance with RCW
18.135.120; and (4) administer certain drugs, in accordance with
section 3 of this act be granted to health care assistants who are not
so authorized under existing licensing statutes, subject to such
regulations as will ensure the protection of the health and safety of
the patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The administration of drugs by a health care assistant is
restricted to oral, topical, rectal, otic, ophthalmic, or inhaled
routes administered pursuant to a written order of a supervising health
care practitioner. The drugs authorized for administration under this
section are limited to the following:
(i) Over-the-counter drugs that may be administered to a patient
while in the care of a health care practitioner are: Benadryl,
acetaminophen, ibuprofen, aspirin, neosporin, polysporin, normal
saline, colace, kenalog, and hydrocortisone cream;
(ii) Nonover-the-counter unit dose legend drugs that may be
administered to a patient while in the care of a health care
practitioner are: Kenalog, hydrocortisone cream, reglan, compazine,
zofran, bactroban, albuterol, xopenex, silvadene, gastrointestinal
cocktail, fluoride, lmx cream, emla, lat, optic dyes, oral contrast,
and oxygen.
(b) Only health care assistants who are certified as category C or
E assistants by the department of health may administer the oral drugs
specified in (a) of this subsection.
(c) Health care assistants authorized to administer certain over-the-counter and legend drugs under (a) of this subsection must
demonstrate initial and ongoing competency to administer specific drugs
as determined by the health care practitioner.
(2) A health care practitioner must administer a medication if:
(a) A patient is unable to physically ingest or safely apply a
medication independently or with assistance; or
(b) A patient is unable to indicate an awareness that he or she is
taking a medication.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.135.020 and 2008 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(2) "Health care assistant" means an unlicensed person who assists
a licensed health care practitioner in providing health care to
patients pursuant to this chapter. However, persons trained by a
federally approved end-stage renal disease facility who perform end-stage renal dialysis in the home setting are exempt from certification
under this chapter.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW; or
(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A
RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an
osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW.
(4) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted
pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is
physically present and is immediately available in the facility during
the administration of injections or vaccines, as defined in this
chapter, or certain drugs as provided in section 3 of this act, but
need not be present during procedures to withdraw blood.
(5) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, renal dialysis center or facility
federally approved under 42 C.F.R. 405.2100, blood bank federally
licensed under 21 C.F.R. 607, or clinical laboratory certified under 20
C.F.R. 405.1301-16.
(6) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed
health care practitioner to a health care assistant to perform the
functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of
practice of the delegator and which are not within the scope of
practice of the delegatee.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.135.065 and 2008 c 58 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each delegator, as defined under RCW 18.135.020(6), shall
maintain a list of((: (a))) specific ((medications and)) drugs,
diagnostic agents, and vaccines, and the route of administration of
each((, that he or she has authorized for injection; and (b) the
vaccines that he or she has authorized for administration)) drug,
diagnostic agent, and vaccine that the delegatee is authorized to
administer under this chapter. Both the delegator and delegatee shall
sign the above list, indicating the date of each signature. The signed
list shall be forwarded to the secretary of the department of health
and shall be available for review.
(2) Delegatees are prohibited from administering any controlled
substance as defined in RCW 69.50.101(d), any experimental drug, and
any cancer chemotherapy agent unless a delegator is physically present
in the immediate area where the drug is administered.

--- END ---