BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the production of
wine grapes in the state is an important segment of Washington
agriculture as evidenced by the continued investments made by the state
in developing the wine industry, including the creation of viticulture
and enology programs at Washington State University and wine technology
programs at community and technical colleges. The legislature further
finds that the promotion and sale of Washington wine at the legislative
gift center is harmonious with the purpose of the gift center, which is
to promote the state and the goods produced around the state.
Therefore, the legislature intends to allow the legislative gift center
to sell wine produced in Washington to visitors of legal drinking age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this title shall apply to or prevent the legislative
gift center created in chapter 44.73 RCW from selling at retail for
off-premises consumption wine produced in Washington by a licensed
domestic winery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The legislative gift center is
authorized to sell at retail for off-premises consumption wine produced
in Washington by a licensed domestic winery. Wine sold by the
legislative gift center must: (a) Be sold to individuals twenty-one
years of age or older; (b) be sold for personal use and not for resale;
and (c) have been purchased from a licensed wine distributor or from a
manufacturer authorized to distribute wine of its own production.
(2) The legislative gift center must collect and remit to the
department of revenue all applicable state and local taxes on sales of
wine.
(3) The legislative gift center must consult with the Washington
wine commission to select which Washington wines will be sold. The
Washington wine commission must give consideration to award winning
wines in assisting the gift center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 15.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission must assist the legislative gift center in selecting
the Washington wines the legislative gift center will sell as provided
in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 44.73 RCW.

--- END ---