BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that children put a
face on a troubled economy. As families lose their livelihoods and
their homes, it becomes more difficult for them to ensure their
children receive adequate nutrition. Despite the challenges also faced
by the state in a troubled economy, it is the legislature's intent to
maintain its current commitment, to the maximum extent possible, to
feed hungry low-income students in public schools at no cost to the
students. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that all low-income students in public schools receive a nutritious school breakfast
at no charge, and all low-income students in elementary schools receive
school lunch at no charge. It is the legislature's goal over time to
phase in the free provision of school lunches to all low-income
students at all grade levels. It is further the intent of the
legislature to invest strategically in capacity building and provision
of meals to low-income children during the summer months because
children continue to need nutritious meals when school is not in
operation during the summer.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.235.150 and 1993 c 333 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated, the superintendent of
public instruction may award grants to school districts to increase
participation in school breakfast and lunch programs, to improve
program quality, and to improve the equipment and facilities used in
the programs. School districts shall demonstrate that they have
applied for applicable federal funds before applying for funds under
this subsection.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated, the superintendent of
public instruction shall increase the state support for school
breakfasts and lunches.
(3) The legislature shall appropriate funds for allocation to
school districts sufficient to:
(a) Eliminate the copayment for breakfast for all students
qualifying for reduced-price lunch; and
(b) In any school that enrolls students in any of grades preschool
through five, eliminate the copayment for lunch for all students
qualifying for reduced-price lunch in the school.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.235.155 and 1993 c 333 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall administer funds
for the federal summer food service program. To the extent funds are
appropriated, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
state support for summer food service programs. State funds received
by organizations operating summer food service programs must be used to
support operating costs of the program, including food and labor costs,
unless specific appropriations for nonoperating costs are provided.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may award grants, to
the extent funds are appropriated, to eligible organizations to help
start new summer food service programs for children or to help expand
summer food services for children. The superintendent of public
instruction shall conduct two cycles of grant awards per school year,
with a fall cycle of grants of up to twenty thousand dollars to build
local capacity to provide summer food service programs and a spring
cycle of grants of up to five thousand dollars for expenses related to
providing outreach and for planning and administrative tasks associated
with initiating a new program. Organizations receiving grants in the
fall cycle must outline target communities, potential service sites,
and partnering organizations in their grant application and provide
background information and evidence of successful community program
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to the education committees of the legislature
by January 15, 2011, on the use of the grants provided under section 3
of this act and on outcomes related to the summer food service
programs, including the number of children who were provided meals
through the programs in the summer of 2009 and 2010.

--- END ---