BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In every school district there are older
youth who have become disengaged with the traditional education program
of public high schools. They may have failed multiple classes and are
far behind in accumulating credits to graduate. They do not see a high
school diploma as an achievable goal. They may have dropped out of
school entirely. They are not likely to become reengaged in their
education by the prospect of reenrollment in a traditional or even an
alternative high school.
(2) For many years, school districts, community and technical
colleges, and community-based organizations have created partnerships
to provide appropriate educational programs for these students.
Programs such as career education options and career link have
successfully offered individualized academic instruction, case
management support, and career-oriented skills in an age-appropriate
learning environment to hundreds of disengaged older youth.
Preparation for the GED test is provided but is not the end goal for
students.
(3) However, in recent years, many of these partnerships have
ceased to operate. The laws and rules authorizing school districts to
contract using basic education allocations do not provide sufficient
guidance and instead present barriers. Program providers are forced to
adapt to rules that were not written to address the needs of the
students being served. Questions and concerns about liability,
responsibility, and administrative burden have caused districts
reluctantly to abandon their partnerships, and consequently leave
hundreds of students without a viable alternative for continuing their
public education.
(4) Therefore the legislature intends to provide a statutory
framework to support a statewide dropout reengagement system for older
youth. The framework clarifies and standardizes funding, programs, and
administration by directing the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to develop model contracts and interlocal agreements. It
is the legislature's intent to encourage school districts, community
and technical colleges, and community-based organizations to
participate in this system and provide appropriate instruction and
services to reengage older students and help them make progress toward
a meaningful credential and career skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This section and sections 3 through 5 of this act provide a
statutory framework for a statewide dropout reengagement system to
provide appropriate educational opportunities and access to services
for students age sixteen to twenty-one who have dropped out of high
school or are not accumulating sufficient credits to reasonably
complete a high school diploma in a public school before the age of
twenty-one.
(2) Under the system, school districts may:
(a) Enter into the model interlocal agreement developed under
section 4 of this act with an educational service district, community
or technical college, or other public entity to provide a dropout
reengagement program for eligible students of the district; or
(b) Enter into the model contract developed under section 4 of this
act with a community-based organization to provide a dropout
reengagement program for eligible students of the district.
(3) If a school district does not enter an interlocal agreement or
contract with an educational service district, community or technical
college, other public entity, or community-based organization to
provide a dropout reengagement program for eligible students residing
in the district, the educational service district, community or
technical college, other public entity, or community-based organization
may petition a school district other than the resident school district
to enroll the eligible students under RCW 28A.225.220 through
28A.225.230 and enter the interlocal agreement or contract with the
petitioning entity to provide a dropout reengagement program for the
eligible students.
(4) This section does not affect the authority of school districts
to contract for educational services under RCW 28A.150.305 and
28A.320.035. This section also does not affect the authority of school
districts to offer dropout reengagement programs or other educational
services for eligible students directly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through
4 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Dropout reengagement program" means an educational program
that offers at least the following instruction and services:
(a) Academic instruction, including but not limited to GED
preparation, academic skills instruction, and college and work
readiness preparation, that generates credits that can be applied to a
high school diploma from the student's school district or from a
community or technical college under RCW 28B.50.535 and has the goal of
enabling the student to obtain the academic and work readiness skills
necessary for employment or postsecondary study. A dropout
reengagement program is not required to offer instruction in only those
subject areas where a student is deficient in accumulated credits.
Academic instruction must be provided by teachers certified by the
Washington professional educator standards board or by instructors
employed by a community or technical college whose required credentials
are established by the college;
(b) Case management, academic and career counseling, and assistance
with accessing services and resources that support at-risk youth and
reduce barriers to educational success; and
(c) If the program provider is a community or technical college,
the opportunity for qualified students to enroll in college courses
that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate. The college may
not charge an eligible student tuition for such enrollment.
(2) "Eligible student" means a student who:
(a) Is at least sixteen but less than twenty-one years of age at
the beginning of the school year;
(b) Is not accumulating sufficient credits toward a high school
diploma to reasonably complete a high school diploma from a public
school before the age of twenty-one or is recommended for the program
by case managers from the department of social and health services or
the juvenile justice system; and
(c) Is enrolled or enrolls in the school district in which the
student resides, or is enrolled or enrolls in a nonresident school
district under RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230.
(3) "Full-time equivalent eligible student" means an eligible
student whose enrollment and attendance meet criteria adopted by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction specifically for
dropout reengagement programs. The criteria shall be:
(a) Based on the community or technical college credits generated
by the student if the program provider is a community or technical
college; and
(b) Based on a minimum amount of planned programming or instruction
and minimum attendance by the student rather than hours of seat time if
the program provider is a community-based organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a model interlocal agreement and a model contract for the
dropout reengagement system.
(2) The model interlocal agreement and contract shall, at a
minimum, address the following:
(a) Responsibilities for identification, referral, and enrollment
of eligible students;
(b) Instruction and services to be provided by a dropout
reengagement program, as specified under section 3 of this act;
(c) Responsibilities for data collection and reporting, including
student transcripts and data required for the statewide student
information system;
(d) Administration of the high school statewide student
assessments;
(e) Uniform financial reimbursement rates per full-time equivalent
eligible student enrolled in a dropout reengagement program, calculated
and allocated as a statewide annual average of the basic education
allocations generated under RCW 28A.150.260 for nonvocational students
and including enhancements for vocational students where eligible
students are enrolled in vocational courses in a program, and allowing
for a uniform administrative fee to be retained by the district;
(f) Responsibilities for provision of special education or related
services for eligible students with disabilities who have an
individualized education program;
(g) Responsibilities for necessary accommodations and plans for
students qualifying under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of
1973;
(h) Minimum instructional staffing ratios for dropout reengagement
programs offered by community-based organizations, which are not
required to be the same as for other basic education programs in school
districts; and
(i) Performance measures that must be reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction in a common format for purposes of
accountability, including longitudinal monitoring of student progress
and postsecondary education and employment.
(3) Eligible students enrolled in a dropout reengagement program
under sections 2 through 4 of this act are considered regularly
enrolled students of the school district in which they are enrolled,
except that the students shall not be included in the school district's
enrollment for purposes of calculating compliance with RCW 28A.150.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 4 of this act.
(2) When adopting rules under this section and developing model
interlocal agreements and contracts under section 4 of this act, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with
the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, colleges and community-based
organizations that have previously offered dropout reengagement
programs, providers of online courses and programs approved under RCW
28A.250.020, school districts, and educational service districts.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.305.190 and 1993 c 218 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education shall adopt rules governing the
eligibility of a child sixteen years of age and under nineteen years of
age to take the ((general educational development)) GED test if the
child provides a substantial and warranted reason for leaving the
regular high school education program, ((or)) if the child was home-schooled, or if the child is an eligible student enrolled in a dropout
reengagement program under sections 2 through 4 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2009 c 574 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under ((RCW 28C.04.610)) sections 2
through 4 of this act.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.

--- END ---