BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.110 and 2005 c 274 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct, the
disciplining authority shall prepare and serve findings of fact and an
order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act.
(b) If the license holder or applicant is found to have not
committed unprofessional conduct, the disciplining authority shall
forthwith prepare and serve findings of fact and an order of dismissal
of the charges, including public exoneration of the licensee or
applicant. If the license holder was subject to summary suspension or
restriction under RCW 18.130.135, the disciplining authority shall,
within five business days of the order of dismissal, issue the license
holder a new license.
(c) The findings of fact and order shall be retained by the
disciplining authority as a permanent record.
(2) The disciplining authority shall report the issuance of
statements of charges and final orders in cases processed by the
disciplining authority to:
(a) The person or agency who brought to the disciplining
authority's attention information which resulted in the initiation of
the case;
(b) Appropriate organizations, public or private, which serve the
professions;
(c) The public. Notification of the public shall include press
releases to appropriate local news media and the major news wire
services; and
(d) Counterpart licensing boards in other states, or associations
of state licensing boards.
(3) This section shall not be construed to require the reporting of
any information which is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.
(4) For purposes of this section, "public exoneration" includes,
but is not limited to, the removal of any press releases regarding the
disciplinary proceedings from the department's web site and the
modification of any other documents on the web site pertaining to the
disciplinary proceedings to indicate that the license holder has been
exonerated. The modifications to the documents on the web site must
use the term "exonerated."

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.170 and 2008 c 134 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the disciplining authority believes a license holder may be
unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety to consumers by
reason of any mental or physical condition, a statement of charges in
the name of the disciplining authority shall be served on the license
holder and notice shall also be issued providing an opportunity for a
hearing. The hearing shall be limited to the sole issue of the
capacity of the license holder to practice with reasonable skill and
safety. If the disciplining authority determines that the license
holder is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety for one
of the reasons stated in this subsection, the disciplining authority
shall impose such sanctions under RCW 18.130.160 as is deemed necessary
to protect the public.
(2)(a) In investigating or adjudicating a complaint or report that
a license holder may be unable to practice with reasonable skill or
safety by reason of any mental or physical condition, the disciplining
authority may require a license holder to submit to a mental or
physical examination by one or more licensed or certified health
professionals designated by the disciplining authority from a roster of
at least ten licensed or certified health professionals maintained by
the disciplining authority for purposes of this subsection. The
license holder may request that the examination be performed by a
professional who is not on the disciplining authority's roster. The
department shall utilize the professional requested by the license
holder unless it finds that the professional is unqualified to perform
the examination or the professional is unlikely to perform the
examination in an impartial manner due to a preexisting relationship
with the license holder. If the department utilizes the professional
requested by the license holder, it may not pay the professional more
than it pays the professionals on its roster. The license holder shall
be provided written notice of the disciplining authority's intent to
order a mental or physical examination, which notice shall include:
(i) A statement of the specific conduct, event, or circumstances
justifying an examination; (ii) a summary of the evidence supporting
the disciplining authority's concern that the license holder may be
unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety by reason of a
mental or physical condition, and the grounds for believing such
evidence to be credible and reliable; (iii) a statement of the nature,
purpose, scope, and content of the intended examination; (iv) a
statement that the license holder has the right to respond in writing
within twenty days to challenge the disciplining authority's grounds
for ordering an examination or to challenge the manner or form of the
examination; and (v) a statement that if the license holder timely
responds to the notice of intent, then the license holder will not be
required to submit to the examination while the response is under
consideration.
(b) Upon submission of a timely response to the notice of intent to
order a mental or physical examination, the license holder shall have
an opportunity to respond to or refute such an order by submission of
evidence or written argument or both. The evidence and written
argument supporting and opposing the mental or physical examination
shall be reviewed by either a panel of the disciplining authority
members who have not been involved with the allegations against the
license holder or a neutral decision maker approved by the disciplining
authority. The reviewing panel of the disciplining authority or the
approved neutral decision maker may, in its discretion, ask for oral
argument from the parties. The reviewing panel of the disciplining
authority or the approved neutral decision maker shall prepare a
written decision as to whether: There is reasonable cause to believe
that the license holder may be unable to practice with reasonable skill
and safety by reason of a mental or physical condition, or the manner
or form of the mental or physical examination is appropriate, or both.
(c) Upon receipt by the disciplining authority of the written
decision, or upon the failure of the license holder to timely respond
to the notice of intent, the disciplining authority may issue an order
requiring the license holder to undergo a mental or physical
examination. All such mental or physical examinations shall be
narrowly tailored to address only the alleged mental or physical
condition and the ability of the license holder to practice with
reasonable skill and safety. An order of the disciplining authority
requiring the license holder to undergo a mental or physical
examination is not a final order for purposes of appeal. The cost of
the examinations ordered by the disciplining authority shall be paid
out of the health professions account. In addition to any examinations
ordered by the disciplining authority, the license holder may submit
physical or mental examination reports from licensed or certified
health professionals of the license holder's choosing and expense.
(d) If the disciplining authority finds that a license holder has
failed to submit to a properly ordered mental or physical examination,
then the disciplining authority may order appropriate action or
discipline under RCW 18.130.180(9), unless the failure was due to
circumstances beyond the person's control. However, no such action or
discipline may be imposed unless the license holder has had the notice
and opportunity to challenge the disciplining authority's grounds for
ordering the examination, to challenge the manner and form, to assert
any other defenses, and to have such challenges or defenses considered
by either a panel of the disciplining authority members who have not
been involved with the allegations against the license holder or a
neutral decision maker approved by the disciplining authority, as
previously set forth in this section. Further, the action or
discipline ordered by the disciplining authority shall not be more
severe than a suspension of the license, certification, registration,
or application until such time as the license holder complies with the
properly ordered mental or physical examination.
(e) Nothing in this section shall restrict the power of a
disciplining authority to act in an emergency under RCW 34.05.422(4),
34.05.479, and 18.130.050(8).
(f) A determination by a court of competent jurisdiction that a
license holder is mentally incompetent or an individual with mental
illness is presumptive evidence of the license holder's inability to
practice with reasonable skill and safety. An individual affected
under this section shall at reasonable intervals be afforded an
opportunity, at his or her expense, to demonstrate that the individual
can resume competent practice with reasonable skill and safety to the
consumer.
(3) For the purpose of subsection (2) of this section, a license
holder governed by this chapter, by making application, practicing, or
filing a license renewal, is deemed to have given consent to submit to
a mental, physical, or psychological examination when directed in
writing by the disciplining authority and further to have waived all
objections to the admissibility or use of the examining health
professional's testimony or examination reports by the disciplining
authority on the ground that the testimony or reports constitute
privileged communications.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.172 and 2008 c 134 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to serving a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090 or
18.130.170, the disciplinary authority may furnish a statement of
allegations to the licensee along with a detailed summary of the
evidence relied upon to establish the allegations and a proposed
stipulation for informal resolution of the allegations. These
documents shall be exempt from public disclosure until such time as the
allegations are resolved either by stipulation or otherwise.
(2) The disciplinary authority and the licensee may stipulate that
the allegations may be disposed of informally in accordance with this
subsection. The stipulation shall contain a statement of the facts
leading to the filing of the complaint; the act or acts of
unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the alleged
basis for determining that the licensee is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the stipulation is not to
be construed as a finding of either unprofessional conduct or inability
to practice; a statement that the stipulation does not constitute an
admission on behalf of the licensee of any of the facts or acts alleged
in the stipulation; an acknowledgment that a finding of unprofessional
conduct or inability to practice, if proven, constitutes grounds for
discipline under this chapter; and an agreement on the part of the
licensee that the sanctions set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW
18.130.160 (1), (2), (6), and (8), may be imposed as part of the
stipulation, except that no fine may be imposed but the licensee may
agree to reimburse the disciplinary authority the costs of
investigation and processing the complaint up to an amount not
exceeding one thousand dollars per allegation; and an agreement on the
part of the disciplinary authority to forego further disciplinary
proceedings concerning the allegations. A stipulation entered into
pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered formal disciplinary
action.
(3) If the licensee declines to agree to disposition of the charges
by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section,
the disciplinary authority may proceed to formal disciplinary action
pursuant to RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.
(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this
section by both the licensee and the disciplinary authority, the
complaint is deemed disposed of and shall become subject to public
disclosure on the same basis and to the same extent as other records of
the disciplinary authority. Should the licensee fail to pay any agreed
reimbursement within thirty days of the date specified in the
stipulation for payment, the disciplinary authority may seek collection
of the amount agreed to be paid in the same manner as enforcement of a
fine under RCW 18.130.165.

--- END ---