BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 1.12.060 and 1961 c 204 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the use of "registered" mail is authorized by this
code, "certified" mail, with return receipt requested, may be used.
(2) Whenever the use of "certified mail with a return receipt
requested" is authorized or required by this code, electronic return
receipt delivery confirmation provided by the United States postal
service may be used.

--- END ---