BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The following highways are of statewide significance:
(1) That portion of state route number 11 that runs from Interstate
5 to 12th Street near the Alaska Marine Highway System ferry terminal
in Bellingham;
(2) That portion of state route number 529 from the port of Everett
north to Interstate 5 near Marysville; and
(3) State route number 599, as defined in RCW 47.17.808.

--- END ---