BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.369 and 2000 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By July 1, 1999, the commission shall make available to
candidates, public officials, and political committees that are
required to file reports under this chapter an electronic filing
((alternative)) system for submitting financial affairs reports,
contribution reports, and expenditure reports((, including but not
limited to filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or)) over the
internet.
(2) By January 1, ((2002)) 2013, the commission shall make
available to lobbyists ((and)), lobbyists' employers, and agencies
required to file reports under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175,
((or)) 42.17.180, or 42.17.190 an electronic filing ((alternative))
system for submitting these reports ((including but not limited to
filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or)) over the internet.
(3) The commission shall make available to candidates((,)) and
public officials((,)) filing financial affairs reports and political
committees((, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers)) an electronic
((copy of the appropriate reporting forms)) filing system at no charge.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.3691 and 2000 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning January 1, 2002, each candidate or political
committee that expended twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
preceding year or expects to expend twenty-five thousand dollars or
more in the current year shall file all contribution reports and
expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369. The
commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates
whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file
reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2004,)) Each candidate or political
committee that expended ten thousand dollars or more in the preceding
year or expects to expend ten thousand dollars or more in the current
year shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports
required by this chapter ((by the electronic alternative))
electronically over the internet as provided by the commission under
RCW 42.17.369. ((The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case
basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack the technological
ability to file reports using the electronic alternative provided by
the commission.
(3))) (2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2013, lobbyists required to
register under RCW 42.17.150, or report under RCW 42.17.170, whose
total reportable accrued compensation for lobbying, whether from or on
behalf of one or more lobbyists' employers, was ten thousand dollars or
more for the previous calendar year, or is expected to be ten thousand
dollars or more for the current calendar year, must file all reports
required by this chapter electronically over the internet as provided
by the commission under RCW 42.17.369.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2014, lobbyists' employers required to
report under RCW 42.17.180 whose total reportable accrued expenses and
payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one or
more lobbyists, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous
calendar year, or is expected to be ten thousand dollars or more for
the current calendar year, must file all reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17.369.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2013, all agencies required to report
under RCW 42.17.190 must file all lobbying reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17.369.
(3) The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for
candidates, lobbyists, lobbyists' employers, or agencies when they lack
the technological ability to file reports electronically.
(4) Failure by a candidate ((or)), political committee, lobbyist,
lobbyist's employer, or agency to comply with this section is a
violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Effective August 1, 2010, lobbyists and
lobbyists' employers who are registered or required to report for
either calendar years 2010 or 2011, or both, or who subsequently
register for any part of calendar years 2010 or 2011, shall pay a one-time fee to the public disclosure commission for the development and
implementation of the electronic filing system under RCW 42.17.369.
Lobbyists' fees are based on total reportable accrued compensation
whether from or on behalf of one or more lobbyists' employers.
Lobbyist employers' fees are based on total reportable accrued expenses
and payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one
or more lobbyists. Fees are as follows:
(a)(i) One hundred dollars for lobbyists whose compensation is at
least ten thousand dollars but less than twenty-five thousand dollars;
(ii) three hundred dollars for lobbyists whose compensation is at least
twenty-five thousand dollars but less than fifty thousand dollars;
(iii) six hundred dollars for lobbyists whose compensation is at least
fifty thousand dollars but less than one hundred thousand dollars; and
(iv) eight hundred dollars for lobbyists whose compensation is one
hundred thousand dollars or more.
(b)(i) One hundred dollars for lobbyist employers whose expenses
and payments are at least ten thousand dollars but less than twenty-five thousand dollars; (ii) three hundred dollars for lobbyist
employers whose expenses and payments are at least twenty-five thousand
dollars but less than fifty thousand dollars; (iii) six hundred dollars
for lobbyist employers whose expenses and payments are at least fifty
thousand dollars but less than one hundred thousand dollars; and (iv)
eight hundred dollars for lobbyist employers whose expenses and
payments are one hundred thousand dollars or more.
(c) One hundred fifty dollars for each agency required to file
under RCW 42.17.190.
(2) Fees received under this section must be deposited into the
lobbying electronic filing account under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The lobbying electronic filing account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
fees paid by lobbyists, lobbyists' employers, and agencies under
section 3 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for costs incurred as a result of the
design, development, implementation, and maintenance of:
(a) Software or other applications to accommodate electronic filing
of the reports required for lobbyists, lobbyists' employers, and public
agencies reporting under chapter 42.17 RCW; and
(b) A database and query system compatible with current
architecture, technology, and operating systems that results in readily
available data to the public for review and analysis.
(2) Only the executive director of the public disclosure commission
or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

--- END ---