BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.075 and 2003 c 388 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife
officers shall enforce this title, rules of the department, and other
statutes as prescribed by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officers
who are not ex officio officers shall have and exercise, throughout the
state, such police powers and duties as are vested in sheriffs and
peace officers generally. An applicant for a fish and wildlife officer
position must be a citizen of the United States of America who can read
and write the English language. All fish and wildlife officers
employed after June 13, 2002, must successfully complete the basic law
enforcement academy course, known as the basic course, sponsored by the
criminal justice training commission, or the basic law enforcement
equivalency certification, known as the equivalency course, provided by
the criminal justice training commission. All officers employed on
June 13, 2002, must have successfully completed the basic course, the
equivalency course, or the supplemental course in criminal law
enforcement, known as the supplemental course, offered under chapter
155, Laws of 1985. Any officer who has not successfully completed the
basic course, the equivalency course, or the supplemental course must
complete the basic course or the equivalency course within fifteen
months of June 13, 2002.
(2) Fish and wildlife officers are peace officers.
(3) Any liability or claim of liability under chapter 4.92 RCW that
arises out of the exercise or alleged exercise of authority by a fish
and wildlife officer rests with the department unless the fish and
wildlife officer acts under the direction and control of another agency
or unless the liability is otherwise assumed under an agreement between
the department and another agency.
(4) Fish and wildlife officers may serve and execute warrants and
processes issued by the courts.
(5) The department may utilize the services of a volunteer chaplain
as provided under chapter 41.22 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.22.020 and 1985 c 223 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife
may utilize the services of a volunteer chaplain.

--- END ---