BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW
to read as follows:
All reports required to be submitted to the legislature shall be
provided only in an electronic format. Reports must be submitted
electronically to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and
the secretary of the senate. The chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate shall provide an online
site for reports submitted to the legislature on the legislative
internet home page. The reports shall be organized in such a way as to
make the reports easy to find and accessible by legislators, staff, and
the public.
Upon electronic submittal of the required report to the chief clerk
of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate, the
agency shall send a letter, also by electronic means, to the
appropriate legislative committee that the report has been filed. The
letter may include a brief summary of the report. The public entity
submitting the report may make hard copies available by request.

--- END ---