BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.126.020 and 2004 c 160 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions ((set forth)) in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agreement of distributorship" means any contract, agreement,
commercial relationship, license, association, or any other
arrangement, for a definite or indefinite period, between a supplier
and distributor.
(2) "Brand" means any word, name, group of letters, symbol, or
combination thereof, including the name of the brewer if the brewer's
name is also a significant part of the product name, adopted and used
by a supplier to identify a specific malt beverage product and to
distinguish that product from other malt beverages produced by that
supplier or other suppliers.
(3) "Distributor" means any person, including but not limited to a
component of a supplier's distribution system constituted as an
independent business, importing or causing to be imported into this
state, or purchasing or causing to be purchased within this state, any
malt beverage for sale or resale to retailers licensed under the laws
of this state, regardless of whether the business of such person is
conducted under the terms of any agreement with a malt beverage
manufacturer.
(((3))) (4) "Supplier" means any malt beverage manufacturer or
importer who enters into or is a party to any agreement of
distributorship with a wholesale distributor. "Supplier" does not
include: (a) Any domestic brewery or microbrewery licensed under RCW
66.24.240 and producing less than ((fifty)) two hundred thousand
barrels of malt liquor annually; (b) any brewer or manufacturer of malt
liquor producing less than ((fifty)) two hundred thousand barrels of
malt liquor annually and holding a certificate of approval issued under
RCW 66.24.270; or (c) any authorized representative of malt liquor
manufacturers who holds an appointment from one or more malt liquor
manufacturers which, in the aggregate, produce less than ((fifty)) two
hundred thousand barrels of malt liquor.
(((4))) (5) "Malt beverage manufacturer" means every brewer,
fermenter, processor, bottler, or packager of malt beverages located
within or outside this state, or any other person, whether located
within or outside this state, who enters into an agreement of
distributorship for the resale of malt beverages in this state with any
wholesale distributor doing business in the state of Washington.
(((5))) (6) "Importer" means any distributor importing beer into
this state for sale to retailer accounts or for sale to other
distributors designated as "subjobbers" for resale.
(((6))) (7) "Authorized representative" has the same meaning as
"authorized representative" as defined in RCW 66.04.010.
(((7))) (8) "Person" means any natural person, corporation,
partnership, trust, agency, or other entity, as well as any individual
officers, directors, or other persons in active control of the
activities of such entity.
(9) "Successor distributor" means any distributor who enters into
an agreement, whether oral or written, to distribute a brand of malt
beverages after the supplier with whom such agreement is made or the
person from whom that supplier acquired the right to manufacture or
distribute the brand has terminated, canceled, or failed to renew an
agreement of distributorship, whether oral or written, with another
distributor to distribute that same brand of malt beverages.
(10) "Terminated distributor" means a distributor whose agreement
of distributorship with respect to a brand of malt beverages, whether
oral or written, has been terminated, canceled, or not renewed.
(11) "Terminated distribution rights" means distribution rights
with respect to a brand of malt beverages which are lost by a
terminated distributor as a result of termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of an agreement of distributorship for that brand.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.126.030 and 1984 c 169 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Suppliers are entitled to the following protections which ((shall
be)) are deemed to be incorporated ((in the)) into every agreement of
distributorship:
(1) Agreements between suppliers and wholesale distributors shall
be in writing;
(2) A wholesale distributor shall maintain the financial and
competitive capability necessary to achieve efficient and effective
distribution of the supplier's products;
(3) A wholesale distributor shall maintain the quality and
integrity of the supplier's product in the manner set forth by the
supplier;
(4) A wholesale distributor shall exert its best efforts to sell
the product of the supplier and shall merchandise such products in the
stores of its retail customers as agreed between the wholesale
distributor and supplier;
(5) The supplier may cancel or otherwise terminate any agreement
with a wholesale distributor immediately and without notice if the
reason for such termination is fraudulent conduct in any of the
wholesale distributor's dealings with the supplier or its products,
insolvency, the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of
creditors, bankruptcy, or suspension in excess of fourteen days or
revocation of a license issued by the state liquor board;
(6) A wholesale distributor shall give the supplier prior written
notice, of not less than ninety days, of any material change in its
ownership or management and the supplier has the right to reasonable
prior approval of any such change; and
(7) A wholesale distributor shall give the supplier prior written
notice, of not less than ninety days, of the wholesale distributor's
intent to cancel or otherwise terminate the distributorship agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.126.040 and 1984 c 169 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Wholesale distributors are entitled to the following protections
which ((shall be)) are deemed to be incorporated ((in the)) into every
agreement of distributorship:
(1) Agreements between wholesale distributors and suppliers shall
be in writing;
(2) A supplier shall give the wholesale distributor at least sixty
days prior written notice of the supplier's intent to cancel or
otherwise terminate the agreement, unless such termination is based on
a reason set forth in RCW 19.126.030(5) or results from a supplier
acquiring the right to manufacture or distribute a particular brand and
electing to have that brand handled by a different distributor. The
notice shall state all the reasons for the intended termination or
cancellation. Upon receipt of notice, the wholesale distributor shall
have sixty days in which to rectify any claimed deficiency. If the
deficiency is rectified within this sixty-day period, the proposed
termination or cancellation is null and void and without legal effect;
(3) ((The wholesale distributor is entitled to compensation for the
laid-in cost of inventory and liquidated damages measured on the fair
market price of the business as provided for in the agreement for any
termination of the agreement by the supplier other than termination for
cause, for failure to live up to the terms and conditions of the
agreement, or any reason set forth in RCW 19.126.030(5); and
(4))) The wholesale distributor may sell or transfer its business,
or any portion thereof, including the agreement, to successors in
interest upon prior approval of the transfer by the supplier. No
supplier may unreasonably withhold or delay its approval of any
transfer, including wholesaler's rights and obligations under the terms
of the agreement, if the person or persons to be substituted meet
reasonable standards imposed by the supplier.
(4) If an agreement of distributorship is terminated, canceled, or
not renewed for any reason other than for cause, failure to live up to
the terms and conditions of the agreement, or a reason set forth in RCW
19.126.030(5), the wholesale distributor is entitled to compensation
from the successor distributor for the laid-in cost of inventory and
for the fair market value of the terminated distribution rights. For
purposes of this section, termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of
a distributor's right to distribute a particular brand constitutes
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of an agreement of
distributorship whether or not the distributor retains the right to
continue distribution of other brands for the supplier. In the case of
terminated distribution rights resulting from a supplier acquiring the
right to manufacture or distribute a particular brand and electing to
have that brand handled by a different distributor, the affected
distribution rights will not transfer until such time as the
compensation to be paid to the terminated distributor has been finally
determined by agreement or arbitration.
(5) When a terminated distributor is entitled to compensation under
subsection (4) of this section, a successor distributor must compensate
the terminated distributor for the fair market value of the terminated
distributor's rights to distribute the brand, less any amount paid to
the terminated distributor by a supplier or other person with respect
to the terminated distribution rights for the brand. If the terminated
distributor's distribution rights to a brand of malt beverages are
divided among two or more successor distributors, each successor
distributor must compensate the terminated distributor for the fair
market value of the distribution rights assumed by that successor
distributor, less any amount paid to the terminated distributor by a
supplier or other person with respect to the terminated distribution
rights assumed by the successor distributor. A terminated distributor
may not receive total compensation under this subsection that exceeds
the fair market value of the terminated distributor's distribution
rights with respect to the affected brand. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to require any supplier or other third person to
make any payment to a terminated distributor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the "fair market value" of
distribution rights as to a particular brand means the amount that a
willing buyer would pay and a willing seller would accept for such
distribution rights when neither is acting under compulsion and both
have knowledge of all facts material to the transaction. "Fair market
value" is determined as of the date on which the distribution rights
are to be transferred in accordance with subsection (4) of this
section.
(7) In the event the terminated distributor and the successor
distributor do not agree on the fair market value of the affected
distribution rights within thirty days after the terminated distributor
is given notice of termination, the matter must be submitted to binding
arbitration. Unless the parties agree otherwise, such arbitration must
be conducted in accordance with the American arbitration association
commercial arbitration rules with each party to bear its own costs and
attorneys' fees.
(8) Unless the parties otherwise agree, or the arbitrator for good
cause shown orders otherwise, an arbitration conducted pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section must proceed as follows: (a) The notice
of intent to arbitrate must be served within forty days after the
terminated distributor receives notice of terminated distribution
rights; (b) the arbitration must be conducted within ninety days after
service of the notice of intent to arbitrate; and (c) the arbitrator or
arbitrators must issue an order within thirty days after completion of
the arbitration.
(9) In the event of a material change in the terms of an agreement
of distribution, the revised agreement must be considered a new
agreement for purposes of determining the law applicable to the
agreement after the date of the material change, whether or not the
agreement of distribution is or purports to be a continuing agreement
and without regard to the process by which the material change is
effected.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.126.060 and 1984 c 169 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any action or arbitration brought by a wholesale distributor or
a supplier pursuant to this chapter, other than an arbitration to
determine the compensation due to a terminated distributor under RCW
19.126.040(4), the prevailing party shall be awarded its reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.126.080 and 1985 c 440 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person injured by a violation of this chapter, other than a
person seeking only a determination of the compensation due to a
terminated distributor under RCW 19.126.040(4), may bring a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further
violations. Injunctive relief may be granted in an action brought
under this chapter without the injured party being required to post
bond if, in the opinion of the court, there exists a likelihood that
the injured party will prevail on the merits.

--- END ---