BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a new small business during the
first twelve months of operation of the new small business. The
exemption authorized in this subsection only applies to the first one
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars reported on the excise tax returns
for the twelve-month period.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "New small business" means a business that obtained or was
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for
the first time.
(b) "New small business" does not include:
(i) A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, unless the majority of the activities to be conducted
after restructuring, reorganization, or transferral are significantly
different from the activities previously conducted;
(ii) A new branch location or other facility except by an existing
out-of-state entity first doing business in this state;
(iii) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, by the same
principals.
(3) For purposes of determining eligibility under the two hundred
thousand dollar limitation in subsection (1) of this section, persons
taxable under this chapter on multiple activities associated with the
same product, as identified in RCW 82.04.440, need only include the
value of products or gross proceeds of sales for a single activity
associated with the same product.
(4) A new small business must file an application, in a form and
manner required by the department, before taking a credit under this
section. The department shall rule on the application within twenty
days.
(5) A claim by a person not entitled to this exemption is fraud or
misrepresentation of a material fact and subject to interest and
penalties prescribed by law.
(6) The exemption provided in this section is not available for any
period during or after which the new small business:
(a) Purchases or otherwise acquires, directly or indirectly, in
bulk and not in the ordinary course of business, tangible or intangible
assets of another taxpayer; or
(b) Is a surviving corporation of a statutory merger.

--- END ---