BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 43.43.120 and 43.43.320, to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2010, in lieu of retiring under RCW
43.43.250 and accepting a retirement allowance under RCW 43.43.260, and
either RCW 43.43.270 or 43.43.271, as applicable, a regular patrol
officer, or a patrol officer who has attained the rank of sergeant, who
has been a member of the Washington state patrol retirement system and
has not less than twenty-five years of service credit and is eligible
to receive a retirement allowance may participate in the Washington
state patrol retirement system deferred option plan. A member electing
this option shall:
(a) Continue his or her employment to a specified date and thereby
defer receipt of retirement benefits in accordance with the provisions
of this section; and
(b) Elect a form of monthly retirement allowance from the
Washington state patrol retirement system, which election shall be
irrevocable unless otherwise provided under the Washington state patrol
retirement system.
(2) For purposes of this section, service credit includes service
credit recognized under RCW 43.43.230, 43.43.233, 43.43.235, and
43.43.260.
(3)(a) The number of years of the member's service credit prior to
participation in the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred
option plan, plus the number of years of participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred option plan, must
equal or exceed twenty-eight years. However, the duration of
participation in the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred
option plan for any member shall not exceed seven years.
(b) Participation in the Washington state patrol retirement system
deferred option plan must begin on the first day of a month and end on
the last day of a month.
(c)(i) At the conclusion of a member's participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred option plan, the
member shall terminate employment with the Washington state patrol, and
shall start receiving the member's accrued monthly retirement allowance
from the Washington state patrol retirement system.
(ii) Any member who is placed on disability status as set forth in
subsection (7) of this section and whose Washington state patrol
retirement system deferred option plan account is not reinstated under
subsection (7)(b) of this section shall not receive a monthly
retirement allowance from the Washington state patrol retirement
system.
(4)(a) While a member is participating in the Washington state
patrol retirement system deferred option plan, the member contributions
and the employer contributions shall continue to be paid at the rate
computed for the current active members under RCW 41.45.0631, subject
to the following:
(i) One hundred percent of a member's contributions shall be
credited to the member's Washington state patrol retirement system
deferred option plan account, and one hundred percent of the employer's
contributions shall be credited to the retirement system; and
(ii) The monthly retirement benefits that would have been payable
had the member retired and begun receiving a retirement allowance shall
be paid into the member's Washington state patrol retirement system
deferred option plan account.
(b) The member shall not earn any additional service credit under
the Washington state patrol retirement system, or receive any salary
increase adjustments to the member's retirement allowance calculation,
during the period of the member's participation in the Washington state
patrol retirement system deferred option plan.
(5)(a) A member who participates in the deferred option plan is
eligible to receive retirement allowance cost-of-living increases from
the Washington state patrol retirement system, up to a maximum of three
percent per year during the member's period of participation in the
deferred option plan.
(b) A member's deferred option plan account balance shall be
credited on an annual basis with investment earnings at a rate of two
percentage points below the rate of return of the investment portfolio
of the Washington state patrol retirement system, but not less than
zero percent.
(c)(i) A member shall forfeit all interest on the deferred option
plan account balance if the member terminates participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred option plan before
the sum of the member's years of service credit prior to participation
in the deferred option plan, plus the number of years of participation
in the deferred option plan, equals twenty-eight years. However, this
subsection (5)(c) does not apply if the member's participation
terminates as a result of the member's death.
(ii) If a member forfeits his or her interest under this subsection
(5)(c), his or her eligibility for a retirement allowance under this
chapter shall be calculated as if he or she had never elected the
deferred option plan.
(6) If a member is placed on disability leave in accordance with
RCW 43.43.040(1)(a) during the period of the member's participation in
the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred option plan, the
member and the employer contributions shall continue to be made and
credited in accordance with subsection (4) of this section for the
period of disability leave.
(7)(a) A member who, during the period of participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred option plan, is
placed on disability status in accordance with RCW 43.43.040(1)(a), and
receives compensation in accordance with RCW 43.43.040(2): (i) Is
deemed to have terminated participation in the deferred option plan on
the last day of the month that coincides with, or next follows, the
date of the member's placement on disability status; and (ii) forfeits
the entire balance in the member's deferred option plan account as of
the termination date under (a)(i) of this subsection (7).
(b) A member shall be reinstated in the Washington state patrol
retirement system deferred option plan, and the balance previously
forfeited from the member's deferred option plan account shall be
reinstated, on the first day of the month that coincides with or next
follows the date of the member's reemployment if the member:
(i) Was receiving disability benefits under RCW 43.43.040;
(ii) Was deemed to have terminated participation in the deferred
option plan;
(iii) Returns to active duty with the Washington state patrol; and
(iv) Becomes an active member of the retirement system.
(c) A member reemployed and reinstated as provided in (b) of this
subsection may elect to acquire service credit for the period of
disablement by paying all required contributions in accordance with RCW
43.43.290. When payments are made, member and employer contributions
shall be credited in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
Service credit shall be applied toward the member's number of years of
participation in the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred
option plan for purposes of determining the minimum and maximum period
of participation described in subsection (3) of this section.
(8) Subject to subsection (5)(c) of this section, upon retirement
the member shall receive:
(a) The member's accrued monthly retirement allowance from the
Washington state patrol retirement system, in accordance with
subsection (3)(c)(i) of this section, and
(b) An amount equal to the member's monthly retirement allowance
elected under subsection (1)(b) of this section, multiplied by the
number of months the member was in the deferred option plan, adjusted
for any cost-of-living increases under subsection (5)(a) of this
section, plus the amount of contribution under subsection (4) of this
section and the amount of interest under subsection (5) of this
section. The amount determined under this subsection shall be paid, at
the member's option in:
(i) A lump sum payment;
(ii) A direct rollover payable to an individual retirement annuity
provider selected by the member as a result of the member's own
research and investigation; or
(iii) A direct rollover to an eligible retirement plan or, if the
beneficiary is a nonspouse designated beneficiary, to an individual
retirement account or annuity as described in subsection (10)(b)(ii) of
this section.
(9)(a) If the member dies during the period of participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred option plan, the
amount determined in subsection (8) of this section shall be paid:
(i) At the option of the designated beneficiary, for the benefit of
the designated beneficiary, and in accordance with subsection (8)(a) or
(b)(iii) of this section; or
(ii) If there is no designated beneficiary or the designated
beneficiary predeceases the member, to the estate of the member in
accordance with subsection (8)(a) of this section. A payment made
under this section is in addition to any death benefits payable under
any other statute.
(b) For purposes of this section, "designated beneficiary" means
the individual designated by the member by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If the member's lawful spouse
or lawful domestic partner is not designated as the sole primary
beneficiary, the member must also file with the department the written
consent of his or her spouse or domestic partner to the beneficiary
designation.
(10)(a) At the end of participation, a distributee may elect, at
the time and in the manner prescribed by the department, to have any
portion of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an
eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct
rollover.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(i) "Eligible rollover distribution" means any distribution of all
or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee, except
that an eligible rollover distribution does not include any
distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic
payments (not less frequently than annually) made for the life (or life
expectancy) of the distributee or the joint lives (or life
expectancies) of the distributee and the distributee's designated
beneficiary, or for a specified period of ten years or more; any
distribution to the extent such a distribution is required under
section 401(a)(9) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and
the portion of any distribution that is not includable in gross income.
A portion of a distribution does not fail to be an eligible rollover
distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax member
contributions that are not includable in gross income. However, such
a portion may be paid only to:
(A) An individual retirement account or annuity described in
section 408(a) or (b) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended;
or
(B) A qualified trust described in section 401(a) or 403(a) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or an annuity contract
described in section 403(b) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, if such a trust or annuity contract provides for separate
accounting for amounts so transferred (and earnings thereon), including
separately accounting for the portion of such a distribution that is
includable in gross income and the portion of such a distribution which
is not includable.
(ii) "Eligible retirement plan" means an eligible plan under
section 457(b) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, which
is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any
agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a
state and which agrees to separately account for amounts transferred
into such a plan from the retirement system, an individual retirement
account described in section 408(a) of the internal revenue code of
1986, as amended, an individual retirement annuity described in section
408(b) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, an annuity
plan described in section 403(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986,
as amended, an annuity contract described in section 403(b) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or a qualified trust
described in section 401(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, that accepts the distributee's eligible rollover distribution.
(iii) "Distributee" means a member whether or not the member is an
active member. In addition, the member's surviving spouse or surviving
domestic partner and the member's spouse, former spouse, domestic
partner, or former domestic partner who is an obligee under a mandatory
benefits assignment order, as provided in RCW 41.50.500, are
distributees with regard to the interest of the spouse, former spouse,
domestic partner, or former domestic partner. "Distributee" also
includes the member's nonspouse designated beneficiary, pursuant to
section 401(a)(9)(E) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.
In the case of a nonspouse beneficiary, the direct rollover may be made
only to an individual retirement account or annuity (other than an
endowment contract) described in section 408(a) or (b) of the internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended (IRA), that is established on behalf
of such a designated beneficiary and that will be treated as an
inherited IRA pursuant to the provisions of section 402(c)(11) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended. Also, in this case, the
determination of any required minimum distribution under section
401(a)(9) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, that is
ineligible for rollover shall be made in accordance with Notice 2007-7,
Q&A 17 and 18, 2007-5 I.R.B. 395. The required minimum distribution
rules of section 401(a)(9)(B) (other than clause iv thereof) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, apply to the transferee IRA.
(iv) "Direct rollover" means a payment by the retirement system to
the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee or, to a Roth
IRA under section 408A of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, as specified by the distributee (assuming the distributee
otherwise meets the Roth IRA requirements).
(c) At least thirty days before, and not more than one hundred
eighty days before, the date of distribution, the distributee must be
provided with a notice of rights which satisfies section 402(f) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as to rollover options and
tax effects. Such a distribution may commence less than thirty days
after the notice is given. However, (i) the department must clearly
inform the distributee that the distributee has a right to a period of
at least thirty days after receiving the notice to consider the
decision of whether or not to elect a distribution; and (ii) the
distributee, after receiving the notice, must affirmatively elect a
distribution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---