BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Beneficiary" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.120.
(2) "Benefits" means qualifications for retirement, the level of
retirement payments, survivorship or other pensions, payment options,
and average final compensation. "Benefits" does not include the
requirements for eligibility for participation in the plan.
(3) "Board" means the Washington state patrol retirement board
established under this chapter.
(4) "Board member" means a member of the Washington state patrol
retirement system board.
(5) "Chief" means the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(6) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.
(7) "Expense account" means the Washington state patrol retirement
system expense account established under this chapter.
(8) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.120 and also
includes separated vested members of the plan who are not currently
receiving benefits.
(9) "Plan" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.120.
(10) "State actuary" means the actuary employed under chapter 44.44
RCW.
(11) "System" means the Washington state patrol retirement system
established under chapter 43.43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An eleven member Washington state patrol
retirement board is hereby created. Membership on the board consists
of:
(a) The chief of the Washington state patrol, who serves as chair
of the board;
(b) The director of the department of retirement systems, or a
designee;
(c) The director of financial management, or a designee;
(d) Two members representing active members, appointed by the chief
from a list submitted by an organization representing members of the
plan. One of these members must be a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system plan 2. Until 2030, one of these members must
be a member of the Washington state patrol retirement system plan 1;
(e) One member representing active members, appointed by the chief
from a list submitted by an organization representing commissioned
officers above the rank of sergeant;
(f) One member representing retired members, appointed by the chief
from among members receiving service pensions from the Washington state
patrol retirement system;
(g) Two nonvoting members appointed by the president of the senate,
with one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
and
(h) Two nonvoting members appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, with one member from each of the two largest caucuses
of the house of representatives.
(2) The active member representatives serve four-year terms. Of
the initial active member representatives, one must be appointed for a
four-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and one
must be appointed for a two-year term. Thereafter, the active member
representatives must be appointed for four-year terms. The retiree and
legislative members serve two-year terms. Board members may be
reappointed to serve succeeding terms without limitation. Board
members serve until their successors are appointed and seated.
(3) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the vacancy is filled
in the same manner as the initial appointment.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the board constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business and any action taken must be
approved by five or more of the voting members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The expenses of the board are paid from
the expense account.
(2) The members of the board serve without compensation, but active
member representatives must not suffer financial loss because of
absence from their regular employment and must be reimbursed from the
expense account. Board members are reimbursed for travel and education
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board has the following powers and
duties with respect to the Washington state patrol retirement system:
(1) Study pension issues and pension benefits, develop pension
policies, and make recommendations to the governor for legislation to
be submitted to the legislature;
(2) Hire an executive director who serves at the pleasure of the
board, and hire or contract with other state agencies for additional
research, legal, and administrative support, as well as for office
space;
(3) Contract for actuarial services, either with the state actuary
or with independent actuaries, for actuarial analysis;
(4) Establish board rules and operating policies;
(5) Consult with the department for the purpose of improvement in
benefit administration and member services;
(6) Conduct public meetings as prescribed in chapter 42.30 RCW; and
(7) Communicate with members of the retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A Washington state patrol retirement system
expense account is created in the state treasury. The department shall
ascertain the amount appropriated by the legislature for the
administration of the board. This amount is to be computed by the
department as a percentage of member pay, with one-half of that amount
paid by the employer and one-half paid by the member. The department
shall report the resulting expense account rate to the board and to the
chief, and shall bill the employer and employees for this amount in the
same manner as their contributions to the retirement system. This
charge is not a pension contribution under chapter 41.45 RCW. The
department may adjust the expense account rate at any time when
necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering
the board. Expenditures from the expense account are subject to
appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 6 RCW 44.44.040 and 2003 c 295 s 4 and 2003 c 92 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law.
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW 41.04.276.
(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2,
Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state
actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and section 5(5), chapter 2, Laws of 2003.
(8) Provide actuarial assistance to the Washington state patrol
retirement system board under section 4 of this act. Reimbursement for
services must be made to the state actuary under RCW 39.34.130.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.04.278 and 2006 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy may form three function-specific subcommittees, as set forth under subsection (2) of this
section, from the members under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e), as
follows:
(a) A public safety subcommittee with one member from each group
under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e);
(b) An education subcommittee with one member from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e); and
(c) A state and local government subcommittee, with one retiree
member under RCW 41.04.276(1)(d) and two members from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (c) and (e).
The retiree members may serve on more than one subcommittee to
ensure representation on each subcommittee.
(2)(a) The public safety subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting public safety employees who are members of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters'((,)) and public safety
employees'((, and Washington state patrol)) retirement systems.
(b) The education subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting educational employees who are members of the public
employees', teachers', and school employees' retirement systems.
(c) The state and local government subcommittee shall focus on
pension issues affecting state and local government employees who are
members of the public employees' retirement system.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.43.120 and 2001 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in the following sections, unless a different meaning is
plainly required by the context:
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington state patrol
retirement system.
(2) "Retirement fund" means the Washington state patrol retirement
fund.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Member" means any person included in the membership of the
retirement fund.
(5) "Employee" means any commissioned employee of the Washington
state patrol.
(6)(a) "Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement
system after June 12, 1980, is a person who has passed the Washington
state patrol's entry-level oral, written, physical performance, and
background examinations and is, thereby, appointed by the chief as a
candidate to be a commissioned officer of the Washington state patrol.
(b) "Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement
system before June 12, 1980, is a trooper cadet, patrol cadet, or
employee of like classification, employed for the express purpose of
receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the state
patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper. "Like
classification" includes: Radio operators or dispatchers; persons
providing security for the governor or legislature; patrolmen; drivers'
license examiners; weighmasters; vehicle safety inspectors; central
wireless operators; and warehousemen.
(7) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of retirement
allowance or any other benefit allowed by this chapter.
(8) "Regular interest" means interest compounded annually at such
rates as may be determined by the director.
(9) (("Retirement board" means the board provided for in this
chapter.
(10))) "Insurance commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of
the state of Washington.
(((11))) (10) "Lieutenant governor" means the lieutenant governor
of the state of Washington.
(((12))) (11) "Service" shall mean services rendered to the state
of Washington or any political subdivisions thereof for which
compensation has been paid. Full time employment for seventy or more
hours in any given calendar month shall constitute one month of
service. An employee who is reinstated in accordance with RCW
43.43.110 shall suffer no loss of service for the period reinstated
subject to the contribution requirements of this chapter. Only months
of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement
allowance or other benefit provided for herein. Years of service shall
be determined by dividing the total number of months of service by
twelve. Any fraction of a year of service as so determined shall be
taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or
benefit.
(((13))) (12) "Prior service" shall mean all services rendered by
a member to the state of Washington, or any of its political
subdivisions prior to August 1, 1947, unless such service has been
credited in another public retirement or pension system operating in
the state of Washington.
(((14))) (13) "Current service" shall mean all service as a member
rendered on or after August 1, 1947.
(((15))) (14)(a) "Average final salary," for members commissioned
prior to January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary
received by a member during the member's last two years of service or
any consecutive two-year period of service, whichever is the greater,
as an employee of the Washington state patrol; or if the member has
less than two years of service, then the average monthly salary
received by the member during the member's total years of service.
(b) "Average final salary," for members commissioned on or after
January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary received by a
member for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months; or if
the member has less than sixty months of service, then the average
monthly salary received by the member during the member's total months
of service.
(((16))) (15) "Actuarial equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal
value when computed upon the basis of such mortality table as may be
adopted and such interest rate as may be determined by the director.
(((17))) (16) Unless the context expressly indicates otherwise,
words importing the masculine gender shall be extended to include the
feminine gender and words importing the feminine gender shall be
extended to include the masculine gender.
(((18))) (17) "Director" means the director of the department of
retirement systems.
(((19))) (18) "Department" means the department of retirement
systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(((20))) (19) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person
appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(((21))) (20) "Contributions" means the deduction from the
compensation of each member in accordance with the contribution rates
established under chapter 41.45 RCW.
(((22))) (21) "Annual increase" means as of July 1, 1999, seventy-seven cents per month per year of service which amount shall be
increased each subsequent July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.
(((23))) (22)(a) "Salary," for members commissioned prior to July
1, 2001, shall exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040,
or any voluntary overtime, earned on or after July 1, 2001.
(b) "Salary," for members commissioned on or after July 1, 2001,
shall exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040 or any
voluntary overtime, lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, holiday
pay, or any form of severance pay.
(((24))) (23) "Plan 2" means the Washington state patrol retirement
system plan 2, providing the benefits and funding provisions covering
commissioned employees who first become members of the system on or
after January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 5 and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---