BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.115
RCW to read as follows:
The state of Washington promotes improving medical services to
adult individuals with developmental disabilities. Subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, medical
students at the University of Washington, nursing students at schools
of nursing within the state of Washington, and special and technical
care students at technical schools within the state of Washington would
benefit from specialized training and exposure to the unique care needs
for adults that are developmentally disabled. The board shall develop
a centralized program for grants for institutions for programs designed
to develop training projects focused upon improvement of services to
adult individuals with developmental disabilities. The board shall
administer the grant program in consultation with the department of
health. The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2010. The report must include information
regarding grants awarded under this section, as well as any other
efforts or progress in expanding or improving training for students in
treating adult individuals with developmental disabilities.

--- END ---