BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.465 and 2007 c 266 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county that creates a benefit zone and
finances public improvements pursuant to chapter 39.100 RCW may impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter and
subject to the criteria set forth in this section. Except as provided
in this section, the tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the city, town, or
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1) in the case of a sales tax or the rate provided in RCW
82.12.020(5) in the case of a use tax, less the aggregate rates of any
other taxes imposed on the same events that are credited against the
state taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The tax rate
shall be no higher than what is reasonably necessary for the local
government to receive its entire annual state contribution in a ten-month period of time.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
city, town, or county at no cost to the city, town, or county.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the city, town, or county
shall first have received tax allocation revenues during the preceding
calendar year. The tax imposed under this section shall expire on the
earlier of the date: (a) The tax allocation revenues are no longer
used for public improvements and public improvement costs; (b) the
bonds issued under the authority of chapter 39.100 RCW are retired, if
the bonds are issued; or (c) that is thirty years after the tax is
first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a city,
town, or county imposing a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The amount of tax received by the local government in any
fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be distributed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax distributions totals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of tax distributions totals the amount of local
public sources, dedicated in the previous calendar year to finance
public improvements authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW, expended in
the previous year for public improvement costs or used to pay for other
bonds issued to pay for public improvements; or
(iii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section
by all cities, towns, and counties totals the annual state credit limit
as provided in RCW 82.32.700(3);
(d) The tax shall be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (b) and (c) of this subsection shall belong to the state
of Washington.
(5) If both a county and a city or town impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by the city, town, or county shall be credited
as follows:
(a) If the county has created a benefit zone before the city or
town, the tax imposed by the county shall be credited against the tax
imposed by the city or town, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the county tax; and
(b) If the city or town has created a benefit zone before the
county, the tax imposed by the city or town shall be credited against
the tax imposed by the county, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the city or town tax.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax distributions
attributable to each city, town, and county imposing a sales and use
tax under this section and shall advise a city, town, or county when
the tax will cease to be distributed for the remainder of the fiscal
year as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section. Determinations
by the department of the amount of taxes attributable to a city, town,
or county are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of
any tax imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
revenues in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(b) and
(c) of this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the moneys
in the general fund.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 82.14.470 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Benefit zone" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.100.010.
(c) "Excess local excise taxes" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.050.
(d) "Excess state excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the benefit zone over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the base year from taxable activity within
the benefit zone. However, if a local government creates the benefit
zone and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months immediately
preceding the creation of the benefit zone within the boundaries of the
area that became the benefit zone, "excess state excise taxes" means
the entire amount of state excise taxes the state receives during a
calendar year period beginning with the calendar year immediately
following the creation of the benefit zone and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter.
(e) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes imposed
on the same taxable events that are credited against the state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW except for the
local tax authorized in this section.
(f) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.100.030.
(g) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess state
excise taxes and excess local excise taxes.
(h) "State contribution" means the lesser of ((two)) four million
dollars or an amount equal to excess state excise taxes received by the
state during the preceding calendar year.
(i) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.010.
(j) "Public improvements" and "public improvement costs" have the
same meanings as provided in RCW 39.100.010.
(k) "Local public sources" includes, but is not limited to, private
monetary contributions, assessments, dedicated local government funds,
and tax allocation revenues. "Local public sources" does not include
local government funds derived from any state loan or state grant, any
local tax that is credited against the state sales and use taxes, or
any other state funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.470 and 2007 c 266 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Moneys collected from the taxes imposed under RCW
82.14.465 shall be used only for the following purposes:
(A) Principal and interest payments on bonds issued under the
authority of RCW 39.100.060;
(B) Principal and interest payments on other bonds issued by the
local government to finance public improvements; or
(C) Payments for public improvement costs.
(ii) Moneys collected and used as provided in (a)(i) of this
subsection must be matched with an amount from local public sources
dedicated through December 31st of the previous calendar year to
finance public improvements authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW.
Available local matching funds that exceed the match requirements of
this subsection (1)(a)(ii) for the current year may be applied to the
match requirements of any succeeding year.
(b) Local public sources are dedicated to finance public
improvements if they: (i) Are actually expended to pay public
improvement costs or debt service on bonds issued for public
improvements; or (ii) are required by law or an agreement to be used
exclusively to pay public improvement costs or debt service on bonds
issued for public improvements.
(2) A local government shall inform the department by the first day
of March of the amount of local public sources dedicated in the
preceding calendar year to finance public improvements authorized under
chapter 39.100 RCW.
(3) If a local government fails to comply with subsection (2) of
this section, no tax may be imposed under RCW 82.14.465 in the
subsequent fiscal year. The list of public improvements may be amended
by the submitting local government to reflect additions or deletions.
(4) A local government shall provide a report to the department and
the state auditor by March 1st of each year. A local government shall
make a good faith effort to provide information required for the
report.
The report shall contain the following information:
(a) The amount of tax allocation revenues, taxes under RCW
82.14.465, and local public sources received by the local government
during the preceding calendar year, and a summary of how these revenues
were expended; and
(b) The names of any businesses known to the local government that
have located within the benefit zone as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole
or in part with hospital benefit zone financing.
(5) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a
list of public improvements undertaken by local governments and
financed in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing, and
it shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by local governments under subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.100.040 and 2007 c 266 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A local government that adopts an ordinance creating a benefit
zone under this chapter and that has within the benefit zone a
nonprofit hospital that has received a certificate of need from the
state department of health for the construction of a new hospital
within the benefit zone shall, within ninety days of adopting the
ordinance:
(a)(i) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the benefit zone that describes the public improvement,
describes the boundaries of the benefit zone, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected.
(ii) A public improvement description made under this subsection
(1)(a) may be amended by the submitting local government; and
(b) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer, the county assessor, the department of revenue, and the
governing body of each participating taxing authority within which the
benefit zone is located.
(2) Any challenge to the formation shall be brought within sixty
days of ((the later of)) the date of its formation ((or July 1, 2007)).
All parties, including the holders of bonds payable from tax revenue
under chapter 266, Laws of 2007, may rely upon the presumption of
validity of formation of the benefit zone following the expiration of
the sixty-day period.

--- END ---