BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.020 and 2008 c 327 s 2 and 2008 c 131 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port
district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(4) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government or a
federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water, earth
stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity,
telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, buildings or
structures, and port facilities((, all)) for the purpose of job
creation, job retention, or job expansion. Port facilities include
capitalized equipment valued in excess of four hundred thousand dollars
for the maintenance of maritime transportation facilities by a
consortium of three or more ports.
(5) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer than one hundred persons per square mile or a county smaller than
two hundred twenty-five square miles, as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the
period July 1st to June 30th.

--- END ---