BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the governor and the
legislature to stimulate Washington's lagging economy and to reduce the
state's unemployment rate by quickly putting people to work on
infrastructure projects. These investments will include improving
higher education campuses, cleaning up Puget Sound, replacing aging
local infrastructure, and creating green jobs. Such projects must be
started quickly after funding is received and generate a significant
number of jobs in order to strengthen the economy and assist those
seeking work. To that end, more than four hundred forty-six million
dollars will be advanced and go to advertisement no later than April
30, 2009.
(2) This economic stimulus capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth, the amounts specified, or as much
thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated are
hereby appropriated.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2010" or "FY 2010" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010.
(b) "Fiscal year 2011" or "FY 2011" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2011.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not
expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill
the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART 1
2007-09 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Alternative Energy Investments (30000057)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Sec. 102 2007 c 520 s 2062 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace/Stabilize Housing Unit
Siding (((06-1-005))) (20061005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$6,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,024,000))
$5,208,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,818,000

Sec. 103 2007 c 520 s 2076 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: South Close Security Complex
(((06-2-021))) (20062021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,983,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,294,000))
$75,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,017,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,193,000))
$549,170,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,487,000

Sec. 104 2007 c 520 s 2057 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(((06-2-070))) (200620270)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,581,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,331,000))
$14,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Orphaned and Abandoned Site Cleanup Initiative (30000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water Grants Program (30000021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,250

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,250

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood Hazards (30000023)

Flood damage reduction measures

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Stormwater Retrofit and Low Impact Development Implementation Grant
Program (30000097)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works Preservation (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Initiative Projects (30000050)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Appropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,235,500
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,235,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Sec. 116 2007 c 520 s 3177 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation - Phase 2 (((08-2-015)))
(20082015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($528,000))
$4,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,389,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,917,000))
$4,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000052)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,480

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,480

Sec. 118 2007 c 520 s 5042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Interdisciplinary Academic Building (((08-2-003))) (20082003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the interdisciplinary academic building. The
office of financial management shall not allot funding for the design
until after sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative
session and only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative
fiscal committees and to the office of financial management for review
and approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008
regular legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$58,554,000

Higher Education Non-Proprietary Local
Capital Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,554,000

((Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0))
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,500,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,500,000))
$74,554,000

Sec. 119 2007 c 520 s 5050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Phase 3 (((08-2-005))) (20082005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of UW Tacoma phase 3. The office of financial
management shall not allot funding for the design until after sine die
adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only if the
predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal committees and
to the office of financial management for review and approval under RCW
43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular legislative
session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,150,000))
$40,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,000,000))
$17,044,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,150,000))
$57,194,000

Sec. 120 2007 c 520 s 5071 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(((06-2-950))) (20062950)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,770,000))
$43,446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,000))
$0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,300,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,220,000))
$43,446,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety and Code Compliance (30000053)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000054)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000055)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000056)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 125 2007 c 520 s 5092 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (((08-2-003))) (20082003)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,000,000))
$29,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,000,000))
$50,890,000

Sec. 126 2007 c 520 s 5115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (((04-1-953))) (20041953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,523,000))
$63,023,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,227,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,000,000))
$63,273,000

Sec. 127 2007 c 520 s 5201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Humanities and Classroom Building
(06-1-205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,744,000))
$30,672,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,427,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,308,000))
$30,809,000

Sec. 128 2007 c 520 s 5243 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Vocational Building (((08-1-217)))
(20081217)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,802,000))
$23,006,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,498,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,300,000))
$23,006,000

Sec. 129 2007 c 520 s 5268 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Chemistry and Life Science
Building (((08-1-219))) (20081219)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,520,000))
$31,783,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,044,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,564,000))
$31,783,000

Sec. 130 2007 c 520 s 5267 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building
(((08-1-220))) (20081220)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,393,000))
$34,728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,391,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,784,000))
$34,728,000

Sec. 131 2007 c 520 s 5266 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Building 7 Renovation (((08-1-319)))
(20081319)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,009,000))
$10,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,331,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,340,000))
$10,757,000

Sec. 132 2007 c 520 s 5270 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College: Music Building 15 Renovation
(((08-1-320))) (20081320)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,142,000))
$14,948,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,094,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,236,000))
$14,948,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College - Infrastructure (30000190)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

(End of part)

PART 2
2009-11 CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Alternative Energy Investments (30000057)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections: Replace and Stabilize Housing Unit
Siding (20061005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,713,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,087,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,372,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: South Close Security Complex
(20062021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,578,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,804,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(20062070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,460,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Orphaned and Abandoned Site Cleanup Initiative (30000018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water Grants Program (30000021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,250

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,250

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood Hazards (30000023)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Stormwater Retrofit and Low Impact Development Implementation Grant
Program (30000097)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works Preservation (30000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Initiative Projects (30000050)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,235,500
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,235,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation (20082015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,778,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $478,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000052)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,480

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,480

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Interdisciplinary Academic Building (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,054,000
Higher Education Non-Proprietary Local
Capital Accounts--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Phase 3 (20082005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,044,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,194,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(20062950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,383,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,596,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety and Code Compliance (30000053)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000054)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000055)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000056)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,202,000
Subtotal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (20041953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,773,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Humanities and Classroom Building
(20061205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,928,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College - Vocational Building (20081217)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,096,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $910,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Chemistry and Life Science
Building (20081219)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Building 7 Renovation (20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 232 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Music Building 15 Renovation
(20081320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,287,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $661,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,948,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College - Infrastructure (30000190)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

(End of part)

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) The office of financial management may
authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital
project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of
such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is
insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of
any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such
transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a
specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher
education and only between capital projects that are funded from the
same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local
government agencies except where the grants are provided within a
single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically
authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $685,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the preservation of the
transportation building.
(2) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,958,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.

(3) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(4) University of Washington: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $86,526,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects.
(5) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $15,750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects. If funds in this
subsection are used to finance the wastewater reclamation project, all
treated effluent may be used only for the domestic water requirements
of the Pullman energy plant and chilled water facilities and irrigating
general university grounds, excluding the golf course.
(6) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $7,788,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects.
(7) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $5,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects.
(8) Community and technical colleges: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $109,804,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for various campus projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2009-2011 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces
in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2011-2013 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2009, from the 2007-2009 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 If any federal moneys appropriated by this
act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department
or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal
moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No
replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of
the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds.
Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter
. . ., Laws of 2009 for deposit into the state taxable building
construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply
with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall
be deposited into the state building construction account. The state
treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building
construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the fiscal committees of the legislature, may select
capital projects that have completed predesign to undergo a budget
evaluation study. The budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques must be utilized by the office of
financial management in conducting the studies. The office of
financial management shall select the budget evaluation team members,
contract for the study, and report the results to the legislature and
agencies in a timely manner following the study. Funds from the
project appropriation must be used by the office of financial
management through an interagency agreement with the affected agencies
to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 Part headings in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of Part)

--- END ---