BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.42.070 and 2007 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) On or after the effective date of this act, the treasurer
shall compute general state revenues for the three fiscal years
immediately preceding such date and shall determine the arithmetic mean
thereof. As soon as is practicable after the close of each fiscal year
thereafter, he or she shall do likewise. In determining the amount of
general state revenues, the treasurer shall include all state money
received in the treasury from each and every source whatsoever except:
(((a))) (1) Fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation
of any undertaking, facility or project; (((b))) (2) moneys received as
gifts, grants, donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the
United States or any department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any
person, firm or corporation, public or private, when the terms and
conditions of such gift, grant, donation, aid or assistance require the
application and disbursement of such moneys otherwise than for the
general purposes of the state of Washington; (((c))) (3) moneys to be
paid into and received from retirement system funds, and performance
bonds and deposits; (((d))) (4) moneys to be paid into and received
from trust funds including but not limited to moneys received from
taxes levied for specific purposes and the several permanent funds of
the state and the moneys derived therefrom but excluding bond
redemption funds; (((e))) (5) proceeds received from the sale of bonds
or other evidences of indebtedness. Upon computing general state
revenues, the treasurer shall make and file in the office of the
secretary of state, a certificate containing the results of such
computations. Copies of said certificate shall be sent to each elected
official of the state and each member of the legislature. The
treasurer shall, at the same time, advise each elected official and
each member of the legislature of the current available debt capacity
of the state, and may make estimated projections for one or more years
concerning debt capacity.
(((2) For purposes of this chapter, general state revenues shall
also include revenues that are deposited in the general fund under RCW
82.45.180(2), lottery revenues as provided in RCW 67.70.240(3),
revenues paid into the general fund under RCW 84.52.067, and revenues
deposited into the student achievement fund and distributed to school
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.068.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state shall not contract any bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money that would cause the
aggregate state debt to exceed the debt limitation, as specified in
Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution.
(2) It shall be the duty of the state finance committee to compute
annually the amount required to pay principal of and interest on
outstanding debt.
(3) To the extent necessary because of the state constitutional
debt limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or
guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the
state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.525.210 and 1984 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to authorize general obligation
bonds of the state of Washington for common school plant facilities
which provides for the reimbursement of the state treasury for
principal and interest payments ((and which therefore is not subject to
the limitations on indebtedness under RCW 39.42.060)).

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.142.010 and 2007 c 24 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of regents of the University of Washington and Washington
State University may issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness for any university purpose. The board of regents of the
University of Washington and Washington State University may obligate
all or a component of the fees and revenues of the university for the
payment of such bonds, notes, or evidences of indebtedness: PROVIDED,
That such fees and revenues are not subject to appropriation by the
legislature and do not constitute general state revenues as defined in
Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution ((or general state
revenues for the purpose of calculating statutory limits on state
indebtedness pursuant to RCW 39.42.060)). Such bonds, notes, and other
indebtedness shall not constitute bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the state or
required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from general state
revenues ((for the purposes of RCW 39.42.060)). Bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness issued under this chapter shall be issued in
accordance with the procedures in RCW 28B.10.310 and 28B.10.315 or the
provisions applicable to either the state or local governments under
chapter 39.46 or 39.53 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.142.030 and 2007 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of regents of the University of Washington may issue
bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness under this section for
the purpose of refinancing real and personal property acquired by the
University of Washington during the period between August and October
2006. The board of regents of the University of Washington may
obligate all or a component of the fees and revenues of the university
for the payment of such bonds, notes, or evidences of indebtedness:
PROVIDED, That such fees and revenues are not subject to appropriation
by the legislature and do not constitute general state revenues as
defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution ((or
general state revenues for the purpose of calculating statutory limits
on state indebtedness pursuant to RCW 39.42.060)). Bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness issued under this section shall be
issued in accordance with the procedures in RCW 28B.10.310 and
28B.10.315 or the provisions applicable to either the state or local
governments under chapter 39.46 or 39.53 RCW. Such bonds, notes, and
other indebtedness shall not constitute bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the
state or required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from general
state revenues ((for the purposes of RCW 39.42.060)).

Sec. 6 RCW 39.94.010 and 1998 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to confirm the authority of the
state, its agencies, departments, and instrumentalities, the state
board for community and technical colleges, and the state institutions
of higher education to enter into contracts for the acquisition of real
and personal property which provide for payments over a term of more
than one year and to exclude such contracts from the computation of
indebtedness under ((RCW 39.42.060 and)) Article VIII, section 1 of the
state Constitution. It is further the purpose of this chapter to
permit the state, its agencies, departments, and instrumentalities, the
state board for community and technical colleges, and the state
institutions of higher education to enter into financing contracts
which make provision for the issuance of certificates of participation
and other financing structures. Financing contracts of the state,
whether or not entered into under this chapter, shall be subject to
approval by the state finance committee except as provided in this
chapter.
This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.94.030 and 1998 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state may enter into financing contracts for itself or on
behalf of an other agency for the use and acquisition for public
purposes of real and personal property. Payments under financing
contracts of the state shall be made by the state from currently
appropriated funds or funds not constituting "general state revenues"
as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, payments under
financing contracts of the state on behalf of any other agency shall be
made solely from the sources identified in the financing contract,
which may not obligate general state revenues as defined in Article
VII, section 1 of the state Constitution. The treasurer of an other
agency shall remit payments under financing contracts to the office of
the state treasurer or to the state treasurer's designee. In the event
of any deficiency of payments by an other agency under a financing
contract, the treasurer of the other agency shall transfer any legally
available funds of the other agency in satisfaction of the other
agency's obligations under the financing contract if such funds have
been obligated by the other agency under the financing contract and, if
such deficiency is not thereby cured, the office of the state treasurer
is directed to withdraw from that agency's share of state revenues for
distribution or other money an amount sufficient to fulfill the terms
and conditions of the financing contract. The term of any financing
contract shall not exceed thirty years or the remaining useful life of
the property, whichever is shorter. Financing contracts may include
other terms and conditions agreed upon by the parties.
(2) The state for itself or on behalf of an other agency may enter
into contracts for credit enhancement, which shall limit the recourse
of the provider of credit enhancement solely to the security provided
under the financing contract secured by the credit enhancement.
(3) The state or an other agency may grant a security interest in
real or personal property acquired under financing contracts. The
security interest may be perfected as provided by the uniform
commercial code - secured transactions, or otherwise as provided by law
for perfecting liens on real estate. Other terms and conditions may be
included as agreed upon by the parties.
(4)(a) ((Except under (b) of this subsection,)) Financing contracts
and contracts for credit enhancement entered into under the limitations
set forth in this chapter shall not constitute a debt or the
contracting of indebtedness under ((RCW 39.42.060 or)) any ((other))
law limiting debt of the state. It is the intent of the legislature
that such contracts also shall not constitute a debt or the contracting
of indebtedness under Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution. Certificates of participation in payments to be made
under financing contracts also shall not constitute a debt or the
contracting of an indebtedness under ((RCW 39.42.060)) any law limiting
debt of the state if payment is conditioned upon payment by the state
under the financing contract with respect to which the same relates.
It is the intent of the legislature that such certificates also shall
not constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under Article
VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution if payment of the
certificates is conditioned upon payment by the state under the
financing contract with respect to which those certificates relate.
(b) A financing contract made by the state on behalf of an other
agency may be secured by the pledge of revenues of the other agency or
other agency's full faith and credit or may, at the option of the state
finance committee, include a contingent obligation by the state for
payment under such financing contract.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.99H.060 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(16), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the board of regents or the board of trustees of Washington State
University shall cause the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(1) to be
paid out of the appropriate building account or capital projects
account to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the
state treasury.
(2) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(15), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount computed in RCW
43.99H.040(2) from the capitol campus reserve account, hereby created
in the state treasury, to the general fund of the state treasury. At
the time of sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW
43.99H.020(15), and on or before June 30th of each succeeding year
while such bonds remain outstanding, the state finance committee shall
determine, based on current balances and estimated receipts and
expenditures from the capitol campus reserve account, that portion of
principal and interest on such RCW 43.99H.020(15) bonds which will, by
virtue of payments from the capitol campus reserve account, be
reimbursed from sources other than "general state revenues" as that
term is defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
((The amount so determined by the state finance committee, as from time
to time adjusted in accordance with this subsection, shall not
constitute indebtedness for purposes of the limitations set forth in
RCW 39.42.060.))
(3) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(17), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the director of the department of labor and industries shall cause
fifty percent of the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(3) to be
transferred from the accident fund created in RCW 51.44.010 and fifty
percent of the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(3) to be transferred
from the medical aid fund created in RCW 51.44.020, to the general fund
of the state treasury.
(4) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(18), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the board of regents of the University of Washington shall cause
the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(4) to be paid out of University
of Washington nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for
deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.
(5) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(20), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount computed in RCW
43.99H.040(5) from the public safety and education account created in
RCW 43.08.250 to the general fund of the state treasury.
(6) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(4), on each
date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due,
the state treasurer shall transfer from property taxes in the state
general fund levied for the support of the common schools under RCW
84.52.065 to the general fund of the state treasury for unrestricted
use the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(6).

Sec. 9 RCW 43.99Q.120 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that it is necessary to complete the
rehabilitation of the state legislative building, to extend the useful
life of the building, and provide for the permanent relocation of
offices displaced by the rehabilitation and create new space for public
uses.
Furthermore, it is the intent of the legislature to fund the
majority of the rehabilitation and construction using bonds repaid by
the capitol building construction account, as provided for in the
enabling act and dedicated by the federal government for the sole
purpose of establishing a state capitol, to fund the cash elements of
the project using capital project surcharge revenues in the Thurston
county capital facilities account, and to support the establishment of
a private foundation to engage the public in the preservation of the
state legislative building and raise private funds for restoration and
educational efforts. ((The bonds repaid by the capitol building
construction account, whose revenues are from the sale of capitol
building lands, timber, or other materials, shall be exempt from the
state debt limit under RCW 39.42.060, and if at any time the capitol
building construction account has insufficient revenues to repay the
bonds, the legislature may provide additional means for the payment of
the bonds, but any such additional means shall be subject to the state
debt limit.))

Sec. 10 RCW 43.99Q.130 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of providing funds for the planning, design,
construction, and other necessary costs for the rehabilitation of the
state legislative building, the state finance committee is authorized
to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum
of eighty-two million five hundred ten thousand dollars or as much
thereof as may be required to finance the rehabilitation and
improvements to the legislative building and all costs incidental
thereto. The approved rehabilitation plan includes costs associated
with earthquake repairs and future earthquake mitigation and allows for
associated relocation costs and the acquisition of appropriate
relocation space. ((Bonds authorized in this section shall not
constitute indebtedness for purposes of the limitations set forth in
RCW 39.42.060, to the extent that the bond payments are paid from the
capitol building construction account.)) Bonds authorized in this
section may be sold at a price the state finance committee determines.
No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without
prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the
bonds. The proceeds of the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes
of this section shall be deposited in the capitol historic district
construction account hereby created in the state treasury. These
proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this
section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and
sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management subject to
legislative appropriation.

Sec. 11 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund.
On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund((.
Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the education
construction fund and the student achievement fund are included in
"general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070));
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(7) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 43.99N.110 (Bonds exempt from statutory
indebtedness) and 1997 c 220 s 219 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 39.42.060 (Limitation on issuance of
evidences of indebtedness -- Annual computation of amount required to pay
on outstanding debt) and 2008 c 179 s 301, 2003 c 147 s 13, 2002 c 240
s 7, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 18, 1999 c 273 s 9, 1997 c 220 s 220, & 1993
c 52 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---