BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.150.010 and 2007 c 267 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Direct patient-provider primary care practice" and "direct
practice" means a provider, group, or entity that meets the following
criteria in (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection:
(a)(i) A health care provider who furnishes primary care services
through a direct agreement;
(ii) A group of health care providers who furnish primary care
services through a direct agreement; or
(iii) An entity that sponsors, employs, or is otherwise affiliated
with a group of health care providers who furnish only primary care
services through a direct agreement, which entity is wholly owned by
the group of health care providers or is a nonprofit corporation exempt
from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, and
is not otherwise regulated as a health care service contractor, health
maintenance organization, or disability insurer under Title 48 RCW.
Such entity is not prohibited from sponsoring, employing, or being
otherwise affiliated with other types of health care providers not
engaged in a direct practice;
(b) Enters into direct agreements with direct patients or parents
or legal guardians of direct patients;
(c) Does not accept payment for health care services provided to
direct patients from any entity subject to regulation under Title 48
RCW((,)) or plans administered under chapter 41.05, 70.47, or 70.47A
RCW((, or self-insured plans)); and
(d) Does not provide, in consideration for the direct fee,
services, procedures, or supplies such as prescription drugs,
hospitalization costs, major surgery, dialysis, high level radiology
(CT, MRI, PET scans or invasive radiology), rehabilitation services,
procedures requiring general anesthesia, or similar advanced
procedures, services, or supplies.
(2) "Direct patient" means a person who is party to a direct
agreement and is entitled to receive primary care services under the
direct agreement from the direct practice.
(3) "Direct fee" means a fee charged by a direct practice as
consideration for being available to provide and providing primary care
services as specified in a direct agreement.
(4) "Direct agreement" means a written agreement entered into
between a direct practice and an individual direct patient, or the
parent or legal guardian of the direct patient or a family of direct
patients, whereby the direct practice charges a direct fee as
consideration for being available to provide and providing primary care
services to the individual direct patient. A direct agreement must (a)
describe the specific health care services the direct practice will
provide; and (b) be terminable at will upon written notice by the
direct patient.
(5) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a person regulated
under Title 18 RCW or chapter 70.127 RCW to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law.
(6) "Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005.
(7) "Primary care" means routine health care services, including
screening, assessment, diagnosis, and treatment for the purpose of
promotion of health, and detection and management of disease or injury.
(8) "Network" means the group of participating providers and
facilities providing health care services to a particular health
carrier's health plan or to plans administered under chapter 41.05,
70.47, or 70.47A RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.150.040 and 2007 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Direct practices may not:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined in RCW
48.44.010 or 48.46.020 with any carrier or with any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor, or plans administered under chapter 41.05,
70.47, or 70.47A RCW, to provide health care services through a direct
agreement except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Submit a claim for payment to any carrier or any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor, or plans administered under chapter 41.05,
70.47, or 70.47A RCW, for health care services provided to direct
patients as covered by their agreement;
(c) With respect to services provided through a direct agreement,
be identified by a carrier or any carrier's contractor or
subcontractor, or plans administered under chapter 41.05, 70.47, or
70.47A RCW, as a participant in the carrier's or any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor network for purposes of determining network
adequacy or being available for selection by an enrollee under a
carrier's benefit plan; or
(d) Pay for health care services covered by a direct agreement
rendered to direct patients by providers other than the providers in
the direct practice or their employees, except as described in
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2) Direct practices and providers may:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined by RCW
48.44.010 and 48.46.020 or plans administered under chapter 41.05,
70.47, or 70.47A RCW for purposes other than payment of claims for
services provided to direct patients through a direct agreement. Such
providers shall be subject to all other provisions of the participating
provider contract applicable to participating providers including but
not limited to the right to:
(i) Make referrals to other participating providers;
(ii) Admit the carrier's members to participating hospitals and
other health care facilities;
(iii) Prescribe prescription drugs; and
(iv) Implement other customary provisions of the contract not
dealing with reimbursement of services;
(b) Pay for charges associated with the provision of routine lab
and imaging services ((provided in connection with wellness physical
examinations)). In aggregate such payments per year per direct patient
are not to exceed fifteen percent of the total annual direct fee
charged that direct patient. Exceptions to this limitation may occur
in the event of short-term equipment failure if such failure prevents
the provision of care that should not be delayed; and
(c) Charge an additional fee to direct patients for supplies,
medications, and specific vaccines provided to direct patients that are
specifically excluded under the agreement, provided the direct practice
notifies the direct patient of the additional charge, prior to their
administration or delivery.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.150.050 and 2007 c 267 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Direct practices may not decline to accept new direct patients
or discontinue care to existing patients solely because of the
patient's health status. A direct practice may decline to accept a
patient if the practice has reached its maximum capacity, or if the
patient's medical condition is such that the provider is unable to
provide the appropriate level and type of health care services in the
direct practice. So long as the direct practice provides the patient
notice and opportunity to obtain care from another physician, the
direct practice may discontinue care for direct patients if: (a) The
patient fails to pay the direct fee under the terms required by the
direct agreement; (b) the patient has performed an act that constitutes
fraud; (c) the patient repeatedly fails to comply with the recommended
treatment plan; (d) the patient is abusive and presents an emotional or
physical danger to the staff or other patients of the direct practice;
or (e) the direct practice discontinues operation as a direct practice.
(2) Subject to the restrictions established in this chapter, direct
practices may accept payment of direct fees directly or indirectly from
((nonemployer)) third parties.

--- END ---