BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.17.042 and 1995 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the pay periods permitted under RCW 36.17.040,
counties may pay county officers and employees using the following
methods:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may establish a weekly
or biweekly pay period where county officers and employees receive
their compensation not later than seven days following the end of each
((two week)) pay period for services rendered during that pay period,
except as authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
((However,)) (2) In a county that has assumed the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation
under chapter 36.56 RCW, the county legislative authority may establish
a weekly or biweekly pay period where the county officers and employees
receive their compensation not later than thirteen days following the
end of each ((two-week)) pay period for services rendered during that
pay period.
(3) The legislative authority of any county that currently uses a
semimonthly pay period under RCW 36.17.040 may adopt a biweekly pay
period. In such counties, county officers and employees shall receive
their compensation not later than thirteen days following the end of
each pay period for services rendered during that pay period.

--- END ---