BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.371 and 2003 c 167 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding ((less than five and one-half))
four gallons or more of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or
wine specialty shop license is one hundred dollars for each store. The
sale of any container holding four gallons or more must comply with RCW
66.28.200 and 66.28.220.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.28.200 and 2007 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine restaurant or a tavern
license in combination with an off-premises beer and wine retailer's
license ((or)), licensees holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license with an endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.400(4), and
licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license with an
endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.371(1) may sell malt liquor in kegs
or other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid.
Under a special endorsement from the board, a grocery store licensee
may sell malt liquor in containers no larger than five and one-half
gallons. The sale of any container holding four gallons or more must
comply with the provisions of this section and RCW 66.28.210 through
66.28.240.
(2) Any person who sells or offers for sale the contents of kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor, or
leases kegs or other containers that will hold four gallons of malt
liquor, to consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW shall
do the following for any transaction involving the container:
(a) Require the purchaser of the malt liquor to sign a declaration
and receipt for the keg or other container or beverage in substantially
the form provided in RCW 66.28.220;
(b) Require the purchaser to provide one piece of identification
pursuant to RCW 66.16.040;
(c) Require the purchaser to sign a sworn statement, under penalty
of perjury, that:
(i) The purchaser is of legal age to purchase, possess, or use malt
liquor;
(ii) The purchaser will not allow any person under the age of
twenty-one years to consume the beverage except as provided by RCW
66.44.270;
(iii) The purchaser will not remove, obliterate, or allow to be
removed or obliterated, the identification required under RCW 66.28.220
to be affixed to the container;
(d) Require the purchaser to state the particular address where the
malt liquor will be consumed, or the particular address where the keg
or other container will be physically located; and
(e) Require the purchaser to maintain a copy of the declaration and
receipt next to or adjacent to the keg or other container, in no event
a distance greater than five feet, and visible without a physical
barrier from the keg, during the time that the keg or other container
is in the purchaser's possession or control.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.220 and 2007 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules requiring retail licensees to affix
appropriate identification on all containers of four gallons or more of
malt liquor for the purpose of tracing the purchasers of such
containers. The rules may provide for identification to be done on a
statewide basis or on the basis of smaller geographical areas.
(2) The board shall develop and make available forms for the
declaration and receipt required by RCW 66.28.200. The board may
charge spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees with an endorsement
issued under RCW 66.24.400(4), beer and/or wine specialty shop
licensees with an endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.371(1), and
grocery store licensees for the costs of providing the forms and that
money collected for the forms shall be deposited into the liquor
revolving fund for use by the board, without further appropriation, to
continue to administer the cost of the keg registration program.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor to
consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW if the kegs or
containers are not identified in compliance with rules adopted by the
board.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---