BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any measure presented to a student body and passed with a
majority vote of the students voting to create or increase a fee,
charge, or assessment upon themselves is not subject to RCW 43.135.055
and use of those fees is not subject to RCW 42.17.190.
(2) Services and activities fees may be used for lobbying by a
student government association or its equivalent and may also be used
to support a statewide or national student organization or its
equivalent that may engage in lobbying.

--- END ---