BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The management and control of a library shall be vested in a
board of either five or seven trustees as hereinafter in this section
provided.
(a) In cities and towns five trustees shall be appointed by the
mayor with the consent of the legislative body.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection:
(i) In counties, rural county library districts, and island library
districts, five trustees shall be appointed by the board of county
commissioners.
(ii) In a regional library district a board of either five or seven
trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the legislative
bodies concerned.
(iii) In intercounty rural library districts a board of either five
or seven trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the boards
of county commissioners of each of the counties included in a district.
(c) In a rural county library district located in a county with a
population of one million five hundred thousand or more, seven trustees
shall be appointed by the county legislative body.
(2) The first appointments for boards comprised of but five
trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years
respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to
serve for five years. The first appointments for boards comprised of
seven trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six,
and seven years respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be
appointed annually to serve for seven years. No person shall be
appointed to any board of trustees for more than two consecutive terms.
Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in
the manner in which members of the board are regularly chosen.
(3) A library trustee shall not receive a salary or other
compensation for services as trustee, but necessary expenses actually
incurred shall be paid from the library funds.
(4) A library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed
only by vote of the legislative body. A trustee of a county library,
a rural county library district library, or an island library district
library may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners after
a public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for
removal, which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of
hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days
before the hearing. A trustee of an intercounty rural library district
may be removed by the joint action of the board of county commissioners
of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein for the
removal of a trustee of a county library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For any library board of trustees increasing
from five to seven members under section 1 of this act:
(1) Appointments for the existing five trustee positions that are
made on or after January 1, 2010, shall be for terms of seven years;
and
(2) The appointing authority shall within four months of the
effective date of this act appoint two additional members to the board.
The additional members shall be appointed to terms of six and seven
years so that thereafter one trustee shall be appointed annually for a
term of seven years.

--- END ---