BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Convenient and environmentally sound product stewardship
programs for mercury-containing lights that include collecting,
transporting, and recycling mercury-containing lights will help protect
Washington's environment and the health of state residents;
(2) Product producers should finance and provide these programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a
product, rather than its components, and attributes the product to the
owner of the brand as the producer.
(2) "Covered entity" means the end user of a product, such as a
resident or small business, that can use a product stewardship program
to discard an unwanted product.
(3) "Covered product" means a product designated by this chapter,
either individually or as an item within a covered product category
including all materials that make up the covered product.
(4) "Covered product category" means a group of similar products
covered by this chapter.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no further
processing takes place and materials from a covered product have been
transformed for direct use as a feedstock in producing new products or
disposed of or managed in permitted facilities.
(7) "Hazardous substances" or "hazardous materials" means those
substances or materials identified by rules adopted under chapter
70.105 RCW.
(8) "Mercury-containing lights" means lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other
devices that contain mercury and provide functional illumination in
homes, businesses, and in outdoor stationary fixtures.
(9) "Orphan product" means a covered product that lacks a
producer's brand, or for which the producer is no longer in business
and has no successor in interest, or that bears a brand for which the
department cannot identify an owner.
(10) "Person" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability
company, firm, association, cooperative, or other legal entity located
within or outside Washington state.
(11) "Processing" means recovering materials from unwanted products
for use as feedstock in new products.
(12) "Producer" means a person that:
(a) Has or had legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand
of a covered product sold in or into Washington state;
(b) Imports or has imported a covered product branded by a producer
that meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection and where that
producer has no physical presence in the United States;
(c) If (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, makes or made
an unbranded product that is sold or has been sold in or into
Washington state; or
(d)(i) Sells or sold at wholesale or retail a covered product, (ii)
does not have legal ownership of the brand, and (iii) elects to fulfill
the responsibilities of the producer for that product.
(13) "Product stewardship" means a requirement for a producer of a
covered product to manage and reduce adverse safety, health, and
environmental impacts of the covered product throughout its life cycle,
including financing and providing for the collection, transporting,
reusing, recycling, processing, and final disposition of their
products.
(14) "Product stewardship plan" or "plan" means a detailed plan
describing the manner in which a product stewardship program will be
implemented.
(15) "Product stewardship program" or "program" means the methods,
systems, and services financed and provided by producers of covered
products that addresses product stewardship and includes collecting,
transporting, reusing, recycling, processing, and final disposition of
unwanted products, including a fair share of orphan products.
(16) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
products into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration. Recycling does not include energy
recovery or energy generation by means of combusting unwanted products
with or without other waste.
(17) "Reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and
ending December 31st in the same calendar year.
(18) "Residuals" means nonrecyclable materials left over from
processing an unwanted product.
(19) "Retailer" means a person who offers covered products for sale
at retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but does
not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor
or a retailer.
(20) "Reuse" means a change in ownership of a covered product or
its components, parts, packaging, or shipping materials for use in the
same manner and purpose for which it was originally purchased, or for
use again, as in shipping materials, by the generator of the shipping
materials. "Reuse" does not include dismantling of products for the
purpose of recycling.
(21) "Small school district" means a school district with a student
enrollment less than two thousand.
(22) "Stakeholder" means a person who may have an interest in or be
affected by a product stewardship program.
(23) "Stewardship organization" means an organization designated by
a group of producers to act as an agent on behalf of each producer to
operate a product stewardship program.
(24) "Unwanted product" means a covered product no longer wanted by
its owner or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is intended to be
discarded by its owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Covered product and covered product
categories designated under this chapter are mercury-containing lights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Covered entities are residents and small
school districts located in Washington state and any person delivering
fifteen or fewer mercury-containing lights to a collection site or
service participating in a product stewardship program for mercury-containing lights.
(2)(a) All mercury-containing lights collected by product
stewardship programs must be recycled. Mercury and mercury-bearing
residuals from recycling of mercury-containing lights must be retorted
at a facility that has the required permits and licenses.
(b) Mercury recovered from retorting must be recycled or placed in
a properly permitted hazardous waste landfill. When a facility is
available, mercury recovered from retorting must be placed in a
properly permitted mercury repository.
(3) Product stewardship programs for mercury-containing lights must
be fully implemented by January 1, 2011, and may be implemented prior
to rule making by the department.
(4) Effective January 1, 2012, all government, commercial,
industrial, and retail facilities and office buildings must recycle
their end-of-life mercury-containing general purpose lights.
(5) Every producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating a product stewardship program for mercury-containing lights
shall submit an annual report to the department in a format provided by
the department, that includes the number and type of lights received in
their respective stewardship program from generators in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Every producer of a covered product sold
in or into Washington state must participate in a product stewardship
program for that product.
(2) Every such producer must:
(a) Operate, either individually or jointly with other producers,
a product stewardship program approved by the department; or
(b) Enter into an agreement with a stewardship organization to
operate, on the producer's behalf, a product stewardship program
approved by the department.
(3) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
must pay all administrative and operational costs associated with their
program.
(4) Product stewardship programs shall collect, free of charge,
unwanted products from covered entities for reuse, recycling,
processing, or final disposition.
(5) The department, or its designee, may inspect, audit, or review
audits of processing and disposal facilities used to fulfill the
requirements of a product stewardship program.
(6) No product stewardship program required under this chapter may
use federal or state prison labor for processing unwanted products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) As of the implementation date
established under this chapter for the covered product, no producer,
wholesaler, retailer, or other person may sell or offer for sale that
product to any person in this state unless the producer is
participating in a product stewardship program under a plan approved by
the department.
(2) Each product stewardship plan must be approved by the
department.
(3) A person selling or offering for sale a covered product in the
state shall receive from the producer of the covered product
verification that the producer is participating in an approved product
stewardship program prior to selling the product in or into the state.
A person is considered to have complied with this subsection (3) if, on
the date the person ordered a covered product from a producer or its
agent, the producer was listed by the department as participating in an
approved stewardship program or the producer provided written
verification on the shipping documents or billing invoice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall periodically
publish a notice on its web site, and in any other manner it deems
appropriate, requesting that stakeholders who are interested in
stewardship programs contact the department. The department shall
maintain a list of interested stakeholders, including their mailing
address, and make it available in writing upon request.
(2) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating or intending to operate a product stewardship program must,
at least sixty days prior to submitting a product stewardship plan to
the department pursuant to subsection (3)(h) of this section, provide
public notice of the plan it is considering for submittal to the list
of interested stakeholders maintained by the department under
subsection (1) of this section. The producer, group of producers, or
stewardship organization must solicit stakeholder comment and input
during development of the plan and attempt to address any stakeholder
concerns regarding the plan prior to submittal. Documentation of these
actions must be submitted to the department at the time of plan
submittal.
(3) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating or intending to operate a product stewardship program must
submit a product stewardship plan to the department specifying:
(a) Information, including contact information, regarding:
(i) The organization submitting the plan;
(ii) A list of all participating producers and their brands
including the trademark, if applicable; and
(iii) If the program is to be operated by a stewardship
organization, a description of management, administration, and tasks to
be performed by the stewardship organization.
(b) Recovery goals, including:
(i) Recovery goals for the first, second, and third years of the
program, expressed as pounds per capita, and an explanation of how
these goals reflect a significant percentage of an unwanted product
relative to the quantity of the unwanted product that may be available
for reuse or recycling; and
(ii) Plans to maximize reuse or recycling of packaging or shipping
materials that may be collected.
(c) A collection system, including:
(i) Location of collection sites and other collection services to
be used by the program;
(ii) A description of the consideration given to existing curbside
collection infrastructure as an appropriate collection mechanism. If
the curbside collection infrastructure is not utilized by the plan, a
written explanation must be provided citing the reasons that curbside
collection services are not included in the plan;
(iii) How unwanted products from all covered entities will be
collected for all cities in the state with populations greater than ten
thousand and in all counties of the state;
(iv) How the collection system will be convenient and adequate to
serve the needs of all covered entities in both urban and rural areas;
and
(v) How collected unwanted products will be transported to
processing facilities.
(d) A processing and disposal system, including:
(i) Locations, permit status, and records of any penalties,
violations, or regulatory orders received in the previous five years by
processing and disposal facilities proposed to be used by the program,
including all downstream processing and disposal facilities handling
hazardous substances and hazardous materials through final disposition;
(ii) A third-party audit of each processing and disposal facility
proposed to be used by the program for any unwanted product or
residuals containing hazardous substances or hazardous materials,
documenting compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and
rules;
(iii) Policies and procedures to be followed by persons collecting,
transporting, processing, and disposing of unwanted products, including
how the program will ensure compliance with all applicable laws,
regulations, and rules;
(iv) A description of how unwanted products will be processed at
each processing facility;
(v) How all residuals will be disposed of or managed in permitted
facilities, including disposal or management of all hazardous
substances and hazardous materials in permitted hazardous waste
facilities;
(vi) How hazardous substances and hazardous materials will be
safely and securely tracked and handled from collection to final
disposition in compliance with this chapter, any rules adopted by the
department to implement this chapter, and all other applicable laws and
rules; and
(vii) Management practices that will be used by first processors
and their downstream vendors to ensure that hazardous substances and
hazardous materials are not released into the environment and will not
adversely impact human health.
(e) How the program will seek to use businesses within the state,
including transportation services, retailers, collection sites and
services, existing curbside collection services, and processing
facilities.
(f) A financing system, including:
(i) How the entire product stewardship program will be financed,
that may include how costs will be apportioned among and assessed upon
producers participating in the program; and
(ii) How those providing services for the collection,
transportation, and processing systems will be fairly compensated for
their services.
(g) Education and outreach activities, including:
(i) An effective advertising campaign promoting the use of the
program to all covered entities that includes a toll-free telephone
number and web site, with market saturation sufficient to ensure
meeting recovery goals;
(ii) A description of how and when information about the program
will be provided to retailers, wholesalers, collectors, and other
interested parties to disseminate to covered entities; and
(iii) The methodology for determining how the effectiveness of the
outreach activities will be measured.
(h) The stakeholder process described under subsection (2) of this
section, including:
(i) A description of the process used to solicit stakeholder input
during development of the plan; and
(ii) A summary of stakeholder comments, and how any stakeholder
concerns were addressed.
(4) All plans submitted to the department must be made available
for public review on the department's web site and at the department's
headquarters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A producer, group of producers, or
stewardship organization must submit a proposed product stewardship
plan to the department at least one year prior to a covered product's
implementation date established under this chapter.
(2) Within ninety days after receiving a proposed product
stewardship plan, the department shall determine whether the plan
complies with this chapter and any rules adopted to implement this
chapter. If it approves a plan, the department shall notify the
applicant of its approval. If it rejects a plan, the department shall
notify the applicant of its decision and its reasons for rejecting the
plan. An applicant whose plan has been rejected by the department may
submit a revised plan to the department within sixty days after
receiving notice of the rejection to maintain compliance with this
chapter or may join another plan within sixty days after receiving
notice of rejection.
(3) At least once every four years, a producer, group of producers,
or stewardship organization operating a product stewardship program
must update its product stewardship plan and submit the updated plan to
the department for review. The department must determine the status of
an updated plan within ninety days of its submittal. If the department
rejects an updated plan, the department shall provide the reasons it
rejected the updated plan. The producer or producers of a covered
product participating in the product stewardship program shall continue
to operate under the prior approved plan for not more than ninety days
or another time period approved by the department and shall submit a
revised updated plan for approval within that time period. The prior
approved plan remains in effect until the department approves or
rejects the revised plan. Failure of a product stewardship program to
submit an updated plan within the time period provided under this
subsection (3) is deemed to be out of compliance with this chapter,
unless the producers in the product stewardship program notify the
department of their intention to disband the plan and join an alternate
approved plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Any proposed change to a product
stewardship plan must have prior approval of the department except for
the following:
(a) Additions or changes to collection locations for unwanted
products; or
(b) Additions of producers to a product stewardship program.
(2) The product stewardship program must inform the department of
changes in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section fifteen days prior
to the changes occurring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) On or before April 1st of each year,
every producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating a product stewardship program must prepare and submit to the
department a report for the immediately preceding reporting period
describing:
(a) Information, including contact information, regarding:
(i) The organization submitting the report; and
(ii) A list of all participating producers and their brands and
trademarks, if applicable;
(b) Recovery rates, including:
(i) The amount, by weight, of unwanted products collected from
covered entities in each county in the state, including documented
collection and recycling or disposal of that material; and
(ii) How the program attained recovery rates established in the
product stewardship plan or set by the department, and, if the program
did not attain those recovery rates, what actions it will take during
the next reporting period to do so, including how it will increase and
improve effective, measurable outreach and education efforts;
(c) The collection system, including collection locations and
services provided for all cities in the state with populations greater
than ten thousand and in all counties in the state;
(d) The processing and disposal system, including:
(i) A list of processing and disposal facilities used and
locations, the weight of unwanted products processed at each processing
facility and disposed at each disposal facility, and a description of
the methods used at each processing facility;
(ii) A list of subcontractors used through final disposition that
processed or disposed of unwanted products containing hazardous
substances or hazardous materials, and subcontractor facility
locations;
(iii) Documentation and summary results of annual third-party
audits conducted on each processing facility and disposal facility as
required in section 7 of this act;
(iv) Final disposition of residuals;
(v) Any penalties, violations, or regulatory orders received during
the reporting period by each processing facility or disposal facility
that was used; and
(vi) Whether policies and procedures in the product stewardship
plan for collecting, transporting, processing, and final disposition of
unwanted products were followed during the reporting period, and a
description of any noncompliance;
(e) The financing system, including a description of how the system
met the requirements in section 7 of this act;
(f) The education and outreach activities implemented during the
reporting period, including an analysis of the effectiveness of the
education and outreach activities;
(g) How the product stewardship program complied with any other
elements in the plan; and
(h) Any other information that the department may require.
(2) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating a product stewardship program that attains a ninety percent
recovery rate and a recycling rate of eighty percent is only required
to report to the department information specified in subsections
(1)(a), (b), (c), (g), and (h) of this section.
(3) All reports submitted to the department must be made available
to the public on the department's web site and at the department's
headquarters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 By June of the third program year for each
product or product category, the plan operators shall establish
required recovery rates for the fourth and subsequent program years,
based on information gained in the first through third years, sales
data, anticipated product obsolescence, and anticipated sales growth.
Annual planned recovery rates shall be submitted to the department for
approval by September 1st prior to the program year for which the rates
are established. The submittal must include documentation of the
calculations and data used to determine the recovery rate. The
department shall approve, disapprove, or adjust in consultation with
the plan's operator, the submitted recovery rates based upon its
assessment of prior year's data, sales data, and other available
information that supports the decision. Sixty days after delivering a
written warning, the department shall assess a penalty of up to ten
thousand dollars for each violation on each plan operator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The department shall send a written
warning and a copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement
this chapter to a producer who is not participating in a product
stewardship program approved by the department and whose covered
product is being sold in or into the state.
(2) A producer not participating in a product stewardship program
approved by the department whose covered product continues to be sold
in or into the state sixty days after receiving a written warning from
the department shall be assessed a penalty of one thousand dollars for
each violation. A violation is the sale of one covered product.
(3) If any producer fails to implement its approved plan, the
department shall assess a penalty of up to five thousand dollars for
the first violation along with notification that the producer must
implement its plan within thirty days of the violation. After thirty
days, any producer failing to implement their approved plan must be
assessed a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for the second and
each subsequent violation. A subsequent violation occurs each
thirty-day period that the producer fails to implement the approved
plan.
(4) The department shall send a written warning to a producer that
fails to submit a product stewardship plan, update or change the plan
when required, or submit an annual report as required under this
chapter. The written warning must include compliance requirements and
notification that the requirements must be met within sixty days. If
requirements are not met within sixty days, the producer will be
assessed a ten thousand dollar penalty per day of noncompliance
starting with the first day of notice of noncompliance.
(5) Penalties prescribed under this section must be reduced by
fifty percent if the producer complies within thirty days of the second
violation notice.
(6) A producer may appeal penalties prescribed under this section
to the pollution control hearings board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The department shall provide, on its
web site, a list of all producers participating in product stewardship
programs it has approved and a list of all producers it has identified
as noncompliant with this chapter and any rules adopted to implement
this chapter.
(2) Product retailers must check the department's web site or
producer-provided written verification to determine if producers of
products they are selling in or into the state are in compliance with
this chapter. If the retailer is unsure of the status of the producer
or believes the producer is not in compliance with this chapter, the
retailer shall contact the department to determine the producer's
status.
(3) The department shall personally serve, or send with delivery
confirmation, a written warning explaining the violation along with a
copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement this chapter to
a product retailer known to be selling a product in or into the state
from producers who are not participating in a product stewardship
program or who are not in compliance with this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter.
(4) A product retailer who continues to sell a covered product from
a producer that is not participating in an approved product stewardship
program sixty days after receiving a written warning from the
department, may be assessed a penalty two times the value of the
products sold in violation of this chapter or five hundred dollars,
whichever is greater. This penalty must be waived if the retailer
verifies that it has discontinued sale of the covered product within
thirty days of the date of the penalty assessment. A retailer may
appeal penalties assessed under this section to the pollution control
hearings board.
(5) A sale or purchase of a used covered product as a casual or
isolated sale as defined in RCW 82.04.040 is not subject to the
provisions of this section.
(6) A person primarily engaged in the business of reuse and resale
of used product is not subject to the provisions of this section when
selling used working covered product, for use in the same manner and
purpose for which it was originally purchased.
(7) In-state retailers in possession of a covered product on the
date that restrictions on the sale of the covered product become
effective may exhaust their existing stock through sales to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 All producers whose products are included
in this chapter shall pay the department ten thousand dollars annually
no later than January 1st of each year for each covered product
category sold in or into the state. Producers solely engaged in the
retail sales of the covered product shall pay the department one
thousand dollars annually. Funds collected under this section must be
used to pay for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The product stewardship programs account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds received from
producers under section 14 of this act and penalties collected under
this chapter must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for administering this chapter. Only the
director of the department or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The department may adopt rules
necessary to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter.
(2) The department may adopt rules to establish performance
standards for product stewardship programs and may establish
administrative penalties for failure to meet the standards.
(3) By December 31, 2011, the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the status of the
product stewardship program and recommendations for changes to the
provisions of this chapter.
(4) Beginning October 1, 2011, the department shall annually invite
comments from local governments, communities, and citizens to report
their satisfaction with services provided by product stewardship
programs. This information must be used by the department to determine
if the plan operator is meeting convenience requirements and in
reviewing proposed updates or changes to product stewardship plans.
(5) Beginning October 1, 2011, the department shall annually invite
comments from retailers, consumer groups, electric utilities, the
Northwest power and conservation council, and other interested parties
regarding the impacts of the requirements of this chapter on the
availability or purchase of energy efficient lighting within the state.
If the department determines that evidence shows the requirements of
this chapter have resulted in negative impacts on the availability or
purchase of energy efficient lighting in the state, the department
shall report this information by December 31st of each year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations for
changes to the provisions of this chapter.
(6) Beginning October 1, 2011, the department shall annually invite
comments from retailers, consumer groups, electric utilities, the
Northwest power and conservation council, and other interested parties
regarding the availability of energy efficient nonmercury lighting to
replace mercury-containing lighting within the state. If the
department determines that evidence shows that energy efficient
nonmercury lighting is available and achieves similar energy savings as
mercury lighting at similar cost, the department shall report this
information by December 31st of each year to the appropriate committees
of the legislature with recommendations for legislative changes to
reduce mercury use in lighting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide such service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Nothing in this chapter changes the
requirements of any entity regulated under chapter 70.105 RCW to comply
with the requirements under that chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act may be known and cited as the
product stewardship recycling act for mercury-containing lights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This chapter must be liberally construed to
carry out its purposes and objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 20, 22, and 23 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---