BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.280 and 2005 c 274 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended are exempt under this chapter, except that:
(1) A specific record is not exempt when publicly cited by an
agency in connection with any agency action; and
(2) Any records which are created or presented by an agency in the
course of collective bargaining, or which are received from the
bargaining representative by the agency in the course of collective
bargaining, are not exempt when the agency and the bargaining
representative agree to the terms of a written collective bargaining
agreement.

--- END ---