BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.475 and 2007 c 265 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2008, every public school that offers sexual
health education must assure that sexual health education is medically
and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, appropriate for students
regardless of gender, race, disability status, or sexual orientation,
and includes information about: (a) Abstinence and other methods of
preventing unintended pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases; and
(b) the legal elements of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where
a minor is a victim and the consequences upon conviction. All sexual
health information, instruction, and materials must be medically and
scientifically accurate. Abstinence may not be taught to the exclusion
of other materials and instruction on contraceptives and disease
prevention. A school may choose to use separate, outside speakers or
prepared curriculum to teach different content areas or units within
the comprehensive sexual health program as long as all speakers,
curriculum, and materials used are in compliance with this section.
Sexual health education must be consistent with the January 2005
guidelines for sexual health information and disease prevention
developed by the department of health and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) As used in ((chapter 265, Laws of 2007)) this section,
"medically and scientifically accurate" means information that is
verified or supported by research in compliance with scientific
methods, is published in peer-review journals, where appropriate, and
is recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations
and agencies with expertise in the field of sexual health including but
not limited to the American college of obstetricians and gynecologists,
the Washington state department of health, and the federal centers for
disease control and prevention.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction and the department of
health shall make the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health
information and disease prevention available to school districts,
teachers, and guest speakers on their web sites. Within available
resources, the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health shall make any related information, model policies,
curricula, or other resources available as well.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the department of health, shall develop a list of sexual health
education curricula that are consistent with the 2005 guidelines for
sexual health information and disease prevention. This list shall be
intended to serve as a resource for schools, teachers, or any other
organization or community group, and shall be updated no less
frequently than annually and made available on the web sites of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the Washington state patrol, shall develop a prepared curriculum to
teach the legal elements of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW
where a minor is a victim and the consequences upon conviction. This
curriculum shall be updated no less frequently than annually and be
made available on the web site of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(6) Public schools that offer sexual health education are
encouraged to review their sexual health curricula and choose a
curriculum from the list developed under subsection (4) of this section
as well as the curriculum developed under subsection (5) of this
section. Any public school that offers sexual health education may
identify, choose, or develop any other curriculum, if the curriculum
chosen or developed complies with the requirements of this section.
(((6))) (7) Any parent or legal guardian who wishes to have his or
her child excused from any planned instruction in sexual health
education may do so upon filing a written request with the school
district board of directors or its designee, or the principal of the
school his or her child attends, or the principal's designee. In
addition, any parent or legal guardian may review the sexual health
education curriculum offered in his or her child's school by filing a
written request with the school district board of directors, the
principal of the school his or her child attends, or the principal's
designee.
(((7))) (8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall, through its Washington state school health profiles survey or
other existing reporting mechanism, ask public schools to identify any
curricula used to provide sexual health education, and shall report the
results of this inquiry to the legislature on a biennial basis,
beginning with the 2008-09 school year.
(((8))) (9) The requirement to report harassment, intimidation, or
bullying under RCW 28A.600.480(2) applies to this section.

--- END ---