BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.685 and 2003 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The border county higher education opportunity project is
created. The purpose of the project is to allow Washington
institutions of higher education that are located in counties on the
Oregon border to implement tuition policies that correspond to Oregon
policies. Under the border county project, Columbia Basin Community
College, Clark College, Lower Columbia Community College, Grays Harbor
Community College, and Walla Walla Community College may enroll
students who reside in the bordering Oregon counties of Columbia,
Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman,
Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, and Washington at resident tuition
rates.
(b) The Tri-Cities and Vancouver branches of Washington State
University may enroll students who reside in the bordering Oregon
counties of Columbia, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Umatilla,
Union, Wallowa, and Washington for eight credits or less at resident
tuition rates.
(2) Columbia Basin Community College, Clark College, Lower Columbia
Community College, Grays Harbor Community College, and Walla Walla
Community College may enroll students at resident tuition rates who:
(a) Are currently domiciled in Washington;
(b) Relocated to Washington from one of the thirteen counties
identified in subsection (1)(a) of this section within the previous
twelve months; and
(c) Were domiciled in one of the thirteen counties identified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section for at least ninety days immediately
before relocating to Washington.
(3) The Tri-Cities and Vancouver branches of Washington State
University may enroll students for eight credits or less at resident
tuition rates who:
(a) Are currently domiciled in Washington;
(b) Relocated to Washington from one of the nine counties
identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section within the previous
twelve months; and
(c) Were domiciled in one of the nine counties identified in
subsection (1)(b) of this section for at least ninety days immediately
before relocating to Washington.
(4) Washington institutions of higher education participating in
the project shall give priority program enrollment to Washington
residents.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.0139 and 2003 c 159 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of determining resident tuition rates, "resident
student" includes a resident of Oregon, residing in Columbia, Gilliam,
Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla,
Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county, who meets the following
conditions:
(1) The student is eligible to pay resident tuition rates under
Oregon laws and has been domiciled in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River,
Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union,
Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county for at least ninety days
immediately before enrollment at a community college located in Asotin,
Benton, Clark, Columbia, Cowlitz, Franklin, Garfield, Klickitat,
Pacific, Skamania, Wahkiakum, or Walla Walla county, Washington; ((or))
(2) The student is enrolled in courses located at the Tri-Cities or
Vancouver branch of Washington State University for eight credits or
less; or
(3) The student is currently domiciled in Washington and:
(a) Was eligible to pay resident tuition rates under Oregon laws;
and
(b) Had been domiciled in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah,
Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco,
or Washington county for at least ninety days immediately before being
domiciled in Washington.

--- END ---