BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Within existing resources, each state agency shall maintain a web
site that contains the agency's rule-making information. A direct link
to the agency's rule-making page must be displayed on the agency's
homepage. The rule-making web site shall include the complete text of
all proposed rules, emergency rules, and permanent rules proposed or
adopted within the past twelve months, or include a direct link to the
index page on the Washington State Register web site that contains
links to the complete text of all proposed rules, emergency rules, and
permanent rules proposed or adopted within the past twelve months by
that state agency. For proposed rules, the time, date, and place for
the rule-making hearing and the procedures and timelines for submitting
written comments and supporting data must be posted on the web site.

--- END ---