BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.69 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At all criminal proceedings before a court, the presiding
officer shall inquire as to the presence of the victim and/or a
survivor of the victim and, whether the victim is present or not, shall
read the following:
"Victims of crime have rights under Washington law with the intent
to ensure that all victims and witnesses of crime are treated with
dignity, respect, courtesy, and sensitivity; and that the rights of
victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crime are honored and
protected by law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges in a
manner no less vigorous than the protections afforded criminal
defendants. A flier with the complete list of victim rights is
available outside this courtroom."
(2) The court shall make available fliers with a complete list of
victims' rights outside the courtroom.

--- END ---