BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.28 RCW
to read as follows:
An action to quiet title may not be supported by a statutory or
common law claim of adverse possession.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.16.020 and 2002 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as
follows:
Within ten years:
(1) For actions for the recovery of real property((,)) or for the
recovery of the possession ((thereof; and)) of real property, where the
cause of action arose before the effective date of this section, no
action shall be maintained for such recovery unless it appears that the
plaintiff, his or her ancestor, predecessor or grantor was seized or
possessed of the premises in question within ten years before the
commencement of the action.
(2) For an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the
United States, or of any state or territory within the United States,
or of any territory or possession of the United States outside the
boundaries thereof, or of any extraterritorial court of the United
States, unless the period is extended under RCW 6.17.020 or a similar
provision in another jurisdiction.
(3) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named in the
order for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past due
child support that has accrued under an order entered after July 23,
1989, by any of the above-named courts or that has accrued under an
administrative order as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued
after July 23, 1989.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.28.150 and Code 1881 s 541 are each amended to read
as follows:
The plaintiff shall only be entitled to recover damages for
withholding the property for the term of six years next preceding the
commencement of the action, and for any period that may elapse from
such commencement, to the time of giving a verdict therein, exclusive
of the use of permanent improvements made by the defendant. ((When
permanent improvements have been made upon the property by the
defendant, or those under whom he claims holding under color of title
adversely to the claim of the plaintiff, in good faith, the value
thereof at the time of trial shall be allowed as a setoff against such
damages.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 7.28.050 (Limitation of actions for recovery of real
property -- Adverse possession under title deducible of record) and 1893
c 11 s 1;
(2) RCW 7.28.060 (Rights inhere to heirs, devisees and assigns) and
1893 c 11 s 2;
(3) RCW 7.28.070 (Adverse possession under claim and color of
title -- Payment of taxes) and 1893 c 11 s 3;
(4) RCW 7.28.080 (Color of title to vacant and unoccupied land) and
1893 c 11 s 4;
(5) RCW 7.28.085 (Adverse possession -- Forest land -- Additional
requirements -- Exceptions) and 1998 c 57 s 1;
(6) RCW 7.28.090 (Adverse possession -- Public lands -- Adverse title
in infants, etc) and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 7, 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 7, & 1893
c 11 s 5;
(7) RCW 7.28.100 (Construction) and 1893 c 11 s 6;
(8) RCW 7.28.160 (Defendant's counterclaim for permanent
improvements and taxes paid) and 1903 c 137 s 1;
(9) RCW 7.28.170 (Defendant's counterclaim for permanent
improvements and taxes paid -- Pleadings, issues and trial on
counterclaim) and 1903 c 137 s 2; and
(10) RCW 7.28.180 (Defendant's counterclaim for permanent
improvements and taxes paid -- Judgment on counterclaim -- Payment) and
1903 c 137 s 3.

--- END ---