BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the development of
electric vehicle infrastructure to be a critical step in creating jobs,
fostering economic growth, reducing greenhouse gas emissions, reducing
our reliance on foreign fuels, and reducing the pollution of Puget
Sound attributable to the operation of petroleum-based vehicles on
streets and highways. Limited driving distance between battery charges
is a fundamental disadvantage and obstacle to broad consumer adoption
of vehicles powered by electricity. In order to eliminate this
fundamental disadvantage and dramatically increase consumer acceptance
and usage of electric vehicles, it is essential that an infrastructure
of convenient electric vehicle charging opportunities be developed.
The purpose of this act is to encourage the transition to electric
vehicle use and to expedite the establishment of a convenient, cost-effective, electric vehicle infrastructure that such a transition
necessitates. The state's success in encouraging this transition will
serve as an economic stimulus to the creation of short-term and long-term jobs as the entire automobile industry and its associated direct
and indirect jobs transform over time from combustion to electric
vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A regional transportation planning
organization containing any county with a population in excess of one
million in collaboration with representatives from the department of
ecology, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
local governments, and the office of regulatory affairs must seek
federal or private funding for the planning for, deployment of, or
regulations concerning electric vehicle infrastructure. These efforts
should include:
(a) Development of short-term and long-term plans outlining how
state, regional, and local government construction may include electric
vehicle infrastructure in publicly available parking and government
fleet vehicle parking, including what ratios of charge spots to parking
may be appropriate based on location or type of facility or building;
(b) Consultations with the state building code council and the
department of labor and industries to coordinate the plans with state
standards for new residential, commercial, and industrial buildings to
ensure that the appropriate electric circuitry is installed to support
electric vehicle infrastructure;
(c) Consultation with the workforce development council and the
higher education coordinating board to ensure the development of
appropriate educational and training opportunities for citizens of the
state in support of the transition of some portion of vehicular
transportation from combustion to electric vehicles;
(d) Development of an implementation plan for counties with a
population greater than five hundred thousand with the goal of having
public and private parking spaces, in the aggregate, be ten percent
electric vehicle ready by December 31, 2018; and
(e) Consideration of, to what extent, if any, state preemption of
local regulation of electric vehicle infrastructure is appropriate in
order to encourage rapid deployment of electric vehicle infrastructure.
(2) These plans and any recommendations development as a result of
the consultations required by this section must be submitted to the
legislature by December 31, 2010, or as soon as reasonably practicable
after the securing of any federal or private funding.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply through this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Leasehold excise tax may not be imposed on leases to tenants of
public lands for purposes of installing, maintaining, and operating
electric vehicle infrastructure.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(a) The sale of electric vehicle batteries;
(b) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving electric
vehicle batteries;
(c) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, constructing, repairing, or improving electric
vehicle infrastructure; and
(d) The sale of tangible personal property that will become a
component of electric vehicle infrastructure during the course of
installing, constructing, repairing, or improving electric vehicle
infrastructure.
(2) Sellers may make tax exempt sales under this section only if
the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certification in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of:
(a) Electric vehicle batteries;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, altering, or improving electric vehicle batteries; and
(c) Tangible personal property that will become a component of
electric vehicle infrastructure during the course of installing,
constructing, repairing, or improving electric vehicle infrastructure.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 79.13 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general provisions" to read as follows:
(1) The state and any local government, including any housing
authority, is authorized to lease land owned by such an entity to any
person for purposes of installing, maintaining, and operating a battery
charging station, a battery exchange station, or a rapid charging
station, for a term not in excess of fifty years, for rent of not less
than one dollar per year, and with such other terms as the public
entity's governing body determines in its sole discretion.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.19.648 and 2007 c 348 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies and local government
subdivisions of the state, to the extent determined practicable by the
rules adopted by the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel.
(2) In order to phase in this transition for the state, all state
agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the department of
community, trade, and economic development by rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 43.325.080, are required to achieve forty percent fuel usage for
operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment
from electricity or biofuel by June 1, 2013. The department of general
administration, in consultation with the department of community,
trade, and economic development, shall report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2013, on what percentage of the state's fuel
usage is from electricity or biofuel.
(3) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.
(4) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance
facilities.
(5) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each state-operated highway rest stop.
(6) By December 31, 2015, the state must provide the opportunity to
lease space for the limited purpose of installing and operating a
battery exchange station or a battery charging station in appropriate
state-owned highway rest stops.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The installation of individual battery charging stations and
battery exchange stations, which individually are categorically exempt
under the rules adopted under RCW 43.21C.110, shall not be disqualified
from such categorically exempt status as a result of their being parts
of a larger proposal that includes other such facilities and related
utility networks under the rules adopted under RCW 43.21C.110.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Electric vehicle infrastructure is a permitted use in all zones
other than residential zones by July 1, 2010. Any local land use
regulatory authority pertaining to the development and construction of
electric vehicle infrastructure must be exercised in a manner that does
not render the project impracticable or significantly delay its
installation.
(2) Cities are authorized to adopt incentive programs to encourage
the retrofitting of existing structures with the electrical outlets
capable of charging electric vehicles. Incentives may include bonus
height, site coverage, floor area ratio, and transferable development
rights for use in urban growth areas.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Electric vehicle infrastructure is a permitted use in all zones
other than residential zones by July 1, 2010. Any local land use
regulatory authority pertaining to the development and construction of
electric vehicle infrastructure must be exercised in a manner that does
not render the project impracticable or significantly delay its
installation.
(2) Code cities are authorized to adopt incentive programs to
encourage the retrofitting of existing structures with the electrical
outlets capable of charging electric vehicles. Incentives may include
bonus height, site coverage, floor area ratio, and transferable
development rights for use in urban growth areas.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Electric vehicle infrastructure is a permitted use in all zones
other than residential zones by July 1, 2010. Any local land use
regulatory authority pertaining to the development and construction of
electric vehicle infrastructure must be exercised in a manner that does
not render the project impracticable or significantly delay its
installation.
(2) Counties and cities are authorized to adopt incentive programs
to encourage the retrofitting of existing structures with the
electrical outlets capable of charging electric vehicles. Incentives
may include bonus height, site coverage, floor area ratio, and
transferable development rights for use in urban growth areas.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Electric vehicle infrastructure is a permitted use in all zones
other than residential zones by July 1, 2010. Any local land use
regulatory authority pertaining to the development and construction of
electric vehicle infrastructure must be exercised in a manner that does
not render the project impracticable or significantly delay its
installation.
(2) Counties and cities are authorized to adopt incentive programs
to encourage the retrofitting of existing structures with the
electrical outlets capable of charging electric vehicles. Incentives
may include bonus height, site coverage, floor area ratio, and
transferable development rights for use in urban growth areas.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by the society of
automotive engineers, the national electric code, or other federal,
state, and local agencies.
(c) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its sole source of propulsion power, including plug-in
electric vehicles and extended-range electric vehicles.
(d) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, machinery,
and equipment necessary to support an electric vehicle, including
battery charging stations, rapid charging stations, and battery
exchange stations.
(e) "Rapid charging station" means an industrial grade electrical
outlet that allows for faster recharging of electric vehicle batteries
through higher power levels, which meets or exceeds any standards,
codes, and regulations set forth by the society of automotive
engineers, the national electric code, or other federal, state, and
local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As a necessary and desirable step to spur public and private
investment in electric vehicle infrastructure in accordance with
section 1 of this act, and to begin implementing the provisions of RCW
43.19.648, the legislature authorizes an alternative fuels corridor
pilot project capable of supporting electric vehicle charging and
battery exchange technologies.
(2) To the extent permitted under federal programs, rules, or law,
the department may enter into partnership agreements with other public
and private entities for the use of land and facilities along state
routes and within interstate highway rights-of-way for an alternative
fuels corridor pilot project. The pilot project may allow for
commercial activities only as necessary to attain basic economic
sufficiency. At a minimum, the pilot project must:
(a) Limit renewable fuel and vehicle technology offerings to those
with a forecasted demand over the next fifteen years and approved by
the department;
(b) Ensure that a pilot project site does not compete with existing
retail businesses for the provision of refueling services or recharging
technologies in the same geographic area;
(c) Provide existing truck stop operators and retail truck
refueling businesses with an absolute right of first refusal over the
offering of refueling services to class six trucks with a maximum gross
vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand pounds within the same geographic
area identified for a possible pilot project site;
(d) Reach agreement with the department of services for the blind
ensuring that any commercial activities at host sites do not materially
affect the revenues forecasted from their vending operations at each
site;
(e) Regulate the internal rate of return from the partnership,
including provisions to reduce or eliminate the level of state support
once the partnership attains economic self-sufficiency;
(f) Be limited to not more than five locations on state-owned land
within federal interstate rights-of-way or state highway rights-of-way
in Washington; and
(g) Be limited in duration to a term of years reasonably necessary
for the partnership to recover the cost of capital investments, plus
the regulated internal rate of return.
(3) The department is not responsible for providing capital
equipment nor operating refueling or recharging services. The
department must provide periodic status reports on the pilot project to
the office of financial management and the relevant standing committees
of the legislature not less than every biennium.

--- END ---