BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.212 and 1999 c 214 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a ((county)) designated mental health professional or
professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter,
consideration shall include all reasonably available information and
records regarding: (1) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the
need for civil commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to
an evaluation conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW; (2) history of one or
more violent acts; (3) prior determinations of incompetency or insanity
under chapter 10.77 RCW; ((and)) (4) prior commitments under this
chapter; and (5) any pertinent information submitted by the person's
relative.
In addition, when conducting an evaluation for offenders identified
under RCW 72.09.370, the ((county)) designated mental health
professional or professional person shall consider an offender's
history of judicially required or administratively ordered
antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.240 and 1997 c 112 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a petition is filed for fourteen day involuntary treatment or
ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment, the court shall
hold a probable cause hearing within seventy-two hours of the initial
detention of such person as determined in RCW 71.05.180. If requested
by the detained person or his or her attorney, the hearing may be
postponed for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. The hearing
may also be continued subject to the conditions set forth in RCW
71.05.210 or subject to the petitioner's showing of good cause for a
period not to exceed twenty-four hours. A relative of the person may
provide the court with pertinent information at the probable cause
hearing.
At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds
by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of
mental disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely
disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to
involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives
are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall
order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to
exceed fourteen days in a facility certified to provide treatment by
the department. If the court finds that such person, as the result of
a mental disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely
disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than
detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court
shall order an appropriate less restrictive course of treatment for not
to exceed ninety days.
The court shall specifically state to such person and give such
person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the
fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive
treatment is to be sought, such person will have the right to a full
hearing or jury trial as required by RCW 71.05.310. The court shall
also provide written notice that the person is barred from the
possession of firearms.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.310 and 2005 c 504 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition for ninety day
treatment within five judicial days of the first court appearance after
the probable cause hearing. The court may continue the hearing upon
the written request of the person named in the petition or the person's
attorney, for good cause shown, which continuance shall not exceed five
additional judicial days. If the person named in the petition requests
a jury trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the
first court appearance after the probable cause hearing. The burden of
proof shall be by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be
upon the petitioner. The person shall be present at such proceeding,
which shall in all respects accord with the constitutional guarantees
of due process of law and the rules of evidence pursuant to RCW
71.05.360 (8) and (9). A relative of the person may provide the court
with pertinent information at the proceeding.
During the proceeding, the person named in the petition shall
continue to be treated until released by order of the superior court.
If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing of the
petition, not including extensions of time requested by the detained
person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be released.

--- END ---