BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that an extremely
high risk of homelessness exists for persons discharged from state
institutions and persons under ongoing care or supervision of state
agencies, such as youth aging out of the foster care system, any former
dependent of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW, adults being released
from state psychiatric wards, adults receiving ongoing mental health
care from regional support networks, former offenders being released
from state correctional facilities, and former offenders under active
supervision. Providing safe and viable options for housing to these
populations to avoid homelessness confers a valuable benefit on the
public that is intended to improve public health, safety, and welfare.
(2) It is the goal of this state to:
(a) Gather evidence to discover the true nature and extent of the
problem of homelessness as it relates to persons discharged from state
institutions and persons under ongoing care or supervision of state
agencies; and
(b) Collect adequate and appropriate data related to the housing
status of persons discharged from state institutions and persons under
ongoing care or supervision of state agencies; and
(c) Ensure that all persons discharged from state institutions and
persons under ongoing care or supervision of state agencies have access
to decent, appropriate, and affordable housing in a healthy safe
environment; and
(d) Eliminate the occurrence of any state institution discharging
persons into homelessness by 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Not later than September 1, 2009, the department of corrections
shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a plan by
which the department proposes to eliminate the discharge of offenders
from the custody of the department into homelessness. The plan must
specifically identify the resources necessary and actions required to
eliminate the discharge of any offender into homelessness by 2011. The
plan must also include performance measures to gauge the effectiveness
of the plan in increasing the percentage of released offenders who
secure and retain stable housing and decreasing the percentage of
released offenders who enter homelessness. Existing department plans
may be used to partially fulfill the planning requirement, but must be
updated with implementation strategies to meet this new goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
Not later than September 1, 2009, the department of social and
health services shall submit to the legislature a plan by which the
department proposes to eliminate the discharge into homelessness of
youth aging out of the foster care system, chronically mentally ill
persons being released from involuntary psychiatric commitment, and by
which the department proposes to address the housing needs of
chronically mentally ill persons receiving ongoing mental health care
from regional support networks. The plan must specifically identify
the resources necessary and actions required to eliminate the discharge
of such youth and adults into homelessness by 2011. The plan must also
include performance measures to gauge the effectiveness of the plan in
increasing the percentage of released persons who secure and retain
stable housing and decreasing the percentage of released persons who
enter homelessness. Existing department plans may be used to partially
fulfill the planning requirement, but must be updated with
implementation strategies to meet this new goal.

Sec. 4 RCW 72.09.270 and 2007 c 483 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual
reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every offender who is
committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:
(a) Offenders who are sentenced to life without the possibility of
release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW; and
(b) Offenders who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1227.
(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a
series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of
this section.
(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess all offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits.
(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than forty-five days of
being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but,
whenever possible, no later than sixty days after completion of the
assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, housing, and other areas
which are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the
community.
(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any offender, the department shall:
(i) Evaluate the offender's needs and, to the extent possible,
connect the offender with existing services and resources that meet
those needs; and
(ii) Connect the offender with a community justice center and/or
community transition coordination network in the area in which the
offender will be residing once released from the correctional system if
one exists; and
(iii) Record details, including an address, of the confirmed
housing situation arranged for the offender pending the offenders
release from custody.
(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an
offender's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the
period of partial confinement for the offender as allowed pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the offender's transition to the community.
(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing
information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved
with the offender's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed
appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared
electronically.
(8)(a) In determining the county of discharge for an offender
released to community custody or community placement, the department
may not approve a residence location that is not in the offender's
county of origin unless it is determined by the department that the
offender's return to his or her county of origin would be inappropriate
considering any court-ordered condition of the offender's sentence,
victim safety concerns, negative influences on the offender in the
community, or the location of family or other sponsoring persons or
organizations that will support the offender.
(b) If the offender is not returned to his or her county of origin,
the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county
in which the offender is placed with a written explanation.
(c) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the offender's first felony conviction in
Washington.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.
(10) While actively supervising any former offender, the department
shall maintain a record of the former offender's housing status.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.270 and 2008 c 231 s 48 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual
reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every offender who is
committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:
(a) Offenders who are sentenced to life without the possibility of
release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW; and
(b) Offenders who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1227.
(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a
series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of
this section.
(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess all offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits.
(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than forty-five days of
being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but,
whenever possible, no later than sixty days after completion of the
assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, housing, and other areas
which are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the
community.
(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any offender, the department shall:
(i) Evaluate the offender's needs and, to the extent possible,
connect the offender with existing services and resources that meet
those needs; and
(ii) Connect the offender with a community justice center and/or
community transition coordination network in the area in which the
offender will be residing once released from the correctional system if
one exists; and
(iii) Record details, including an address, of the confirmed
housing situation arranged for the offender pending the offenders
release from custody.
(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an
offender's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the
period of partial confinement for the offender as allowed pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the offender's transition to the community.
(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing
information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved
with the offender's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed
appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared
electronically.
(8)(a) In determining the county of discharge for an offender
released to community custody, the department may not approve a
residence location that is not in the offender's county of origin
unless it is determined by the department that the offender's return to
his or her county of origin would be inappropriate considering any
court-ordered condition of the offender's sentence, victim safety
concerns, negative influences on the offender in the community, or the
location of family or other sponsoring persons or organizations that
will support the offender.
(b) If the offender is not returned to his or her county of origin,
the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county
in which the offender is placed with a written explanation.
(c) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the offender's first felony conviction in
Washington.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.
(10) While actively supervising any former offender, the department
shall maintain a record of the former offender's housing status.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2005 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may
order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the
sentence. The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a
subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate
assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum
that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards
satisfying the legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set
the offender monthly payment amount, the department shall set the
amount if the department has active supervision of the offender,
otherwise the county clerk shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an
offender's monthly payment, restitution shall be paid prior to any
payments of other monetary obligations. After restitution is
satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment proportionally
among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a
prison, or the court may require the offender to pay the actual cost of
incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county
jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than
one hundred dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of
other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence
over the payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court.
All funds recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the
county jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of
incarceration in a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department may only supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in
which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the
community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is
confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility
pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains
under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender
remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her
legal financial obligations. The county clerk is authorized to
maintain a record of the last known housing status and last known
address of each offender under the jurisdiction of the court for
purposes of his or her financial obligations, and must provide this
information to the department upon request.
(5) While under the jurisdiction of the court for the purposes of
his or her financial obligations, an offender must keep the county
clerk informed of his or her housing status, including his or her
current address. An offender whose housing status has changed or who
has changed address must notify the court within fourteen days of the
change.
(6) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(((6))) (7) After completing the investigation, the department
shall make a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment
that the offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal
financial obligation.
(((7))) (8)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may
make a recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the
county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's
monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment
amount, or if the department set the monthly payment amount and the
department has subsequently turned the collection of the legal
financial obligation over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the
monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court.
During the period of repayment, the county clerk may require the
offender to report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the
appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath
to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial
assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county
clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.
(((8))) (9) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is
entered, the department is authorized, for any period of supervision,
to collect the legal financial obligation from the offender.
Subsequent to any period of supervision or, if the department is not
authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk
is authorized to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the
offender. Any amount collected by the department shall be remitted
daily to the county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The
department and the county clerks are authorized, but not required, to
accept credit cards as payment for a legal financial obligation, and
any costs incurred related to accepting credit card payments shall be
the responsibility of the offender.
(((9))) (10) The department or any obligee of the legal financial
obligation may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of
obtaining satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(((10))) (11) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum
towards a legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or
requirement of a sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties
for noncompliance as provided in RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, or
9.94A.740.
(((11))) (12)(a) Until January 1, 2004, the department shall mail
individualized monthly billings to the address known by the department
for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2004, the administrative office of the
courts shall mail individualized monthly billings to the address known
by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial
obligation.
(c) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(d) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the
courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently
than weekly.
(e) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(((12))) (13) The department shall arrange for the collection of
unpaid legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in
the community through the county clerk. The department shall either
collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections
through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or
is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The costs for collection services
shall be paid by the offender.
(((13))) (14) The county clerk may access the records of the
employment security department for the purposes of verifying employment
or income, seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties
necessary to the collection of an offender's legal financial
obligations.
(((14))) (15) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the
state, the counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the
payment of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any
offender who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the
department for a term of community custody, community placement, or
community supervision, and who remains under the jurisdiction of the
court for payment of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2008 c 231 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may
order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the
sentence. The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a
subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate
assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum
that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards
satisfying the legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set
the offender monthly payment amount, the department shall set the
amount if the department has active supervision of the offender,
otherwise the county clerk shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an
offender's monthly payment, restitution shall be paid prior to any
payments of other monetary obligations. After restitution is
satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment proportionally
among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a
prison, or the court may require the offender to pay the actual cost of
incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county
jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than
one hundred dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of
other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence
over the payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court.
All funds recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the
county jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of
incarceration in a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department may only supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in
which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the
community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is
confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility
pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains
under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender
remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her
legal financial obligations. The county clerk is authorized and
required to maintain a record of the current housing status and current
address of each offender under the jurisdiction of the court for
purposes of his or her financial obligations, and must provide this
information to the department upon request.
(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make
a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the
offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial
obligation.
(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a
recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the
county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's
monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment
amount, or if the department set the monthly payment amount and the
department has subsequently turned the collection of the legal
financial obligation over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the
monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court.
During the period of repayment, the county clerk may require the
offender to report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the
appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath
to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial
assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county
clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.
(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered,
the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect
the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any
period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to
supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk is authorized
to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the offender. Any
amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to the
county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department and the
county clerks are authorized, but not required, to accept credit cards
as payment for a legal financial obligation, and any costs incurred
related to accepting credit card payments shall be the responsibility
of the offender.
(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation
may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining
satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a
legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a
sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance
as provided in RCW 9.94B.040, 9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740.
(11)(a) Until January 1, 2004, the department shall mail
individualized monthly billings to the address known by the department
for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2004, the administrative office of the
courts shall mail individualized monthly billings to the address known
by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial
obligation.
(c) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(d) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the
courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently
than weekly.
(e) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(12) The department shall arrange for the collection of unpaid
legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in the
community through the county clerk. The department shall either
collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections
through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or
is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The costs for collection services
shall be paid by the offender.
(13) The county clerk may access the records of the employment
security department for the purposes of verifying employment or income,
seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties necessary
to the collection of an offender's legal financial obligations.
(14) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the state, the
counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other persons
acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any offender
who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the department
for a term of community custody, and who remains under the jurisdiction
of the court for payment of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.63A.305 and 2007 c 316 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The independent youth housing program is created in the
department to provide housing stipends to eligible youth to be used for
independent housing. In developing a plan for the design,
implementation, and operation of the independent youth housing program,
the department shall:
(a) Adopt policies, requirements, and procedures necessary to
administer the program;
(b) Contract with one or more eligible organizations described
under RCW 43.185A.040 to provide services and conduct administrative
activities as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Establish eligibility criteria for youth to participate in the
independent youth housing program, giving priority to youth who have
been dependents of the state for at least one year;
(d) Refer interested youth to the designated subcontractor
organization administering the program in the area in which the youth
intends to reside;
(e) Develop a method for determining the amount of the housing
stipend, first and last month's rent, and security deposit, where
applicable, to be dedicated to participating youth. The method for
determining a housing stipend must take into account a youth's age, the
youth's total income from all sources, the fair market rent for the
area in which the youth lives or intends to live, and a variety of
possible living situations for the youth. The amount of housing
stipends must be adjusted, by a method and formula established by the
department, to promote the successful transition for youth to complete
housing self-sufficiency over time;
(f) Ensure that the independent youth housing program is integrated
and aligned with other state rental assistance and case management
programs operated by the department, as well as case management and
supportive services programs, including the independent living program,
the transitional living program, and other related programs offered by
the department of social and health services; and
(g) Consult with the department of social and health services and
other stakeholders involved with dependent youth, homeless youth, and
homeless young adults, as appropriate.
(2) The department of social and health services shall collaborate
with the department in implementing and operating the independent youth
housing program including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Refer potential eligible youth to the department before the
youth's eighteenth birthday, if feasible, to include an indication, if
known, of where the youth plans to reside after aging out of foster
care;
(b) Provide information to all youth aged fifteen or older, who are
dependents of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW, about the independent
youth housing program, encouraging dependents nearing their eighteenth
birthday to consider applying for enrollment in the program;
(c) Encourage organizations participating in the independent living
program and the transitional living program to collaborate with
independent youth housing program providers whenever possible to
capitalize on resources and provide the greatest amount and variety of
services to eligible youth;
(d) Annually provide to the department data reflecting changes in
the percentage of youth aging out of the state dependency system each
year who are eligible for state assistance, as well as any other data
and performance measures that may assist the department to measure
program success, including but not limited to the number of youth aging
out of the state dependency system who do not have stable affordable
housing, as defined in RCW 43.185B.010, upon discharge; and
(e) Annually, beginning by December 31, 2007, provide to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the interagency council
on homelessness as described under RCW 43.185C.170 recommendations of
strategies to reach the goals described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g).
(3) Under the independent youth housing program, subcontractor
organizations shall:
(a) Use moneys awarded to the organizations for housing stipends,
security deposits, first and last month's rent stipends, case
management program costs, and administrative costs;
(i) Administrative costs for each subcontractor organization may
not exceed twelve percent of the estimated total annual grant amount to
the subcontractor organization;
(ii) All housing stipends must be payable only to a landlord or
housing manager of any type of independent housing;
(b) Enroll eligible youth who are referred by the department and
who choose to reside in their assigned service area;
(c) Enter eligible youth program participants into the homeless
client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180;
(d) Monitor participating youth's housing status;
(e) Evaluate participating youth's eligibility and compliance with
department policies and procedures at least twice a year;
(f) Assist participating youth to develop or update an independent
living plan focused on obtaining and retaining independent housing or
collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved
to ensure that the youth has an independent living plan;
(g) Educate participating youth on tenant rights and
responsibilities;
(h) Provide support to participating youth in the form of general
case management and information and referral services, when necessary,
or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already
involved to ensure that the youth is receiving the case management and
information and referral services needed;
(i) Connect participating youth, when possible, with individual
development account programs, other financial literacy programs, and
other programs that are designed to help young people acquire economic
independence and self-sufficiency, or collaborate with a case manager
with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is
receiving information and referrals to these programs, when
appropriate;
(j) Submit expenditure and performance reports, including
information related to the performance measures in RCW 43.63A.311, to
the department on a time schedule determined by the department; and
(k) Provide recommendations to the department regarding program
improvements and strategies that might assist the state to reach its
goals as described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g).

Sec. 9 RCW 13.40.210 and 2007 c 203 s 1 and 2007 c 199 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile
committed to its custody. The release date shall be within the
prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW
13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning
offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined
prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term
of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the
juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile
committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days
prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under
this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be
tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented
himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior
approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.
(b) Prior to release, the department shall record details,
including an address, of the confirmed housing situation arranged for
the juvenile pending the juvenile's release from custody.
(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the
state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes
that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one
hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or
in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in
rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On
certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are
necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a
sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one
hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release
those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their
sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case
at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is
no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to
release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a
clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing
court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases
have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no
event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted
release under the provisions of this subsection.
(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1)
of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with
a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her
community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that
in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first or second
degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in
the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when
the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary
and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the
ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for
offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for
offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence of
theft of a motor vehicle 1, possession of a stolen motor vehicle, or
taking a motor vehicle without permission 1. The decision to place an
offender on parole shall be based on an assessment by the department of
the offender's risk for reoffending upon release. The department shall
prioritize available parole resources to provide supervision and
services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.
(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the
juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this
goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or
using a deadly weapon and refrain from committing new offenses and may
require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric,
drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training,
or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address
where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during
specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;
(vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using
illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when
requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact
with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet
other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance
the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution.
Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory
service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the
community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed
through public or private organizations or through work crews.
(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of
the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to
participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders
participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to
comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection
and shall also be required to comply with the following additional
terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct
that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an
assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements
imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the
intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision
program, the secretary may require day reporting.
(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be
discharged from the department's supervision.
(e) The department must track the housing status of juvenile
offenders who are placed on parole for the duration of the juvenile's
supervision.
(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof.
If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which
he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the
secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her
parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is
reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to
protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same
conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with
increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of
supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in
(a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of
confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or
county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each
week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v)
the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the
offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the
offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or
second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as
defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the
conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder
of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training
camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.
(b) The secretary may modify parole and order any of the conditions
or may return the offender to confinement for up to twenty-four weeks
if the offender was sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW
9A.44.130 and is known to have violated the terms of parole.
Confinement beyond thirty days is intended to only be used for a small
and limited number of sex offenders. It shall only be used when other
graduated sanctions or interventions have not been effective or the
behavior is so egregious it warrants the use of the higher level
intervention and the violation: (i) Is a known pattern of behavior
consistent with a previous sex offense that puts the youth at high risk
for reoffending sexually; (ii) consists of sexual behavior that is
determined to be predatory as defined in RCW 71.09.020; or (iii)
requires a review under chapter 71.09 RCW, due to a recent overt act.
The total number of days of confinement for violations of parole
conditions during the parole period shall not exceed the number of days
provided by the maximum sentence imposed by the disposition for the
underlying offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.0357. The department shall
not aggregate multiple parole violations that occur prior to the parole
revocation hearing and impose consecutive twenty-four week periods of
confinement for each parole violation. The department is authorized to
engage in rule making pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement this
subsection, including narrowly defining the behaviors that could lead
to this higher level intervention.
(c) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of
parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the
program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of
this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days.
Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state or any county.
(5) A parole officer of the department of social and health
services shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her
supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be
authorized to arrest the person.
(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the
secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform
functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.05.350 and 1997 c 112 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
No indigent patient shall be conditionally released or discharged
from involuntary treatment without suitable clothing, and the
superintendent of a state hospital shall furnish the same, together
with such sum of money as he or she deems necessary for the immediate
welfare of the patient. Such sum of money shall be the same as the
amount required by RCW 72.02.100 to be provided to persons in need
being released from correctional institutions. As funds are available,
the secretary may provide payment to indigent persons conditionally
released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the optional
provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules and
regulations to do so. The department must also record the housing
status of indigent patients when they are discharged from a state
hospital.

Sec. 11 RCW 71.24.045 and 2006 c 333 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The regional support network shall:
(1) Contract as needed with licensed service providers. The
regional support network may, in the absence of a licensed service
provider entity, become a licensed service provider entity pursuant to
minimum standards required for licensing by the department for the
purpose of providing services not available from licensed service
providers;
(2) Operate as a licensed service provider if it deems that doing
so is more efficient and cost effective than contracting for services.
When doing so, the regional support network shall comply with rules
promulgated by the secretary that shall provide measurements to
determine when a regional support network provided service is more
efficient and cost effective;
(3) Monitor and perform biennial fiscal audits of licensed service
providers who have contracted with the regional support network to
provide services required by this chapter. The monitoring and audits
shall be performed by means of a formal process which insures that the
licensed service providers and professionals designated in this
subsection meet the terms of their contracts;
(4) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
((disabled)) persons with disabilities, children, and low-income
persons are met within the priorities established in this chapter;
(5)(a) Maintain patient tracking information in a central location
as required for resource management services and the department's
information system;
(b) Within the patient tracking system, track the housing status of
patients receiving care from regional support networks;
(6) Collaborate to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse
shift of ((mentally ill)) persons with mental illnesses into state and
local correctional facilities;
(7) Work with the department to expedite the enrollment or re-enrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional
facilities and institutions for mental diseases;
(8) If a regional support network is not operated by the county,
work closely with the county designated mental health professional or
county designated crisis responder to maximize appropriate placement of
persons into community services; and
(9) Coordinate services for individuals who have received services
through the community mental health system and who become patients at
a state mental hospital to ensure they are transitioned into the
community in accordance with mutually agreed upon discharge plans and
upon determination by the medical director of the state mental hospital
that they no longer need intensive inpatient care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 4 and 6 of this act expire August
1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 5 and 7 of this act take effect
August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Except for sections 5 and 7 of this act,
this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---