BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that effective water
resource management and a stable livestock industry are vital to the
economic and environmental well-being of the state. The legislature
further finds that achievement of these goals is hindered by a lack of
agreement of the intent of the 1945 legislature's enactment of RCW
90.44.050 as it pertains to the quantity of water available under the
exemption from water right permit requirements for withdrawals of
public groundwater for "stock watering purposes" and the meaning of the
undefined term.

--- END ---