BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.020 and 2002 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following goals are adopted to guide the development and
adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations of those
counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in order of priority
and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:
(1) Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where
adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided in an
efficient manner.
(2) Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of
undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development.
(3) Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation
systems that are based on regional priorities and coordinated with
county and city comprehensive plans.
(4) Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to
all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a
variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage
preservation of existing housing stock.
(5) Economic development. Encourage economic development
throughout the state that is consistent with adopted comprehensive
plans, promote economic opportunity for all citizens of this state,
especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged persons, promote the
retention and expansion of existing businesses and recruitment of new
businesses, recognize regional differences impacting economic
development opportunities, and encourage growth in areas experiencing
insufficient economic growth, all within the capacities of the state's
natural resources, public services, and public facilities.
(6) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for
public use without just compensation having been made. The property
rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and
discriminatory actions.
(7) Permits. Applications for both state and local government
permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure
predictability.
(8) Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural
resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural,
and fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive
forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and discourage
incompatible uses.
(9) Open space and recreation. Retain open space, enhance
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks
and recreation facilities.
(10) Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's
high quality of life, including air and water quality, and the
availability of water. Establish land use and transportation patterns
that, at a minimum, support state greenhouse gas emissions reduction
requirements.
(11) Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the
involvement of citizens in the planning process and ensure coordination
between communities and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.
(12) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public
facilities and services necessary to support development shall be
adequate to serve the development at the time the development is
available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service
levels below locally established minimum standards.
(13) Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the
preservation of lands, sites, and structures, that have historical or
archaeological significance.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2005 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Rural counties may also
allow new small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied
by an existing business as long as the new small-scale business
conforms to the rural character of the area as defined by the local
government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Public services
and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the
isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does
not permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated and must consider all
transportation modes in meeting regional transportation demands. In
adopting level of service standards required under this subsection
(6)(a)(iii)(B), jurisdictions must also consider adopting multimodal
level of service standards;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the ((department of transportation's six-year)) office of financial
management's ten-year investment program((. The concurrency
requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to transportation
facilities and services of statewide significance except for counties
consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and
ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency
requirements in (b) of this subsection));
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of ((traffic)) travel demand for at least ten years
based on the adopted land use plan to provide information on the
location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ((six-year improvement)) ten-year investment
program developed by the ((department of transportation)) office of
financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access ((and promote)), connections between land
uses and transportation modes, and the promotion of healthy lifestyles.
(b)(i) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
must consider multimodal improvements or strategies, examples of which
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "concurrent with the
development" ((shall mean)) means that improvements or strategies are
in place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment is
in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six years.
(iii) The concurrency requirements of this subsection (6)(b) do not
apply to transportation facilities and services of statewide
significance except for counties consisting of islands whose only
connection to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In
these island counties, state highway and ferry route capacity must be
a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements of this subsection
(6)(b).
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
and the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation
systems, and the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030
for the state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.100 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of each county or city ((that is)) adopted
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall be:
(1) Coordinated with, and consistent with, the comprehensive plans
adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 of other counties or cities with
which the county or city has, in part, common borders or related
regional issues; and
(2) Consistent with the regional transportation plans required
under RCW 47.80.030 for the region within which the county or city is
located.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.108 and 2005 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation element required by RCW 36.70A.070 may
include, in addition to improvements or strategies to accommodate the
impacts of development authorized under RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b),
multimodal transportation improvements or strategies that are made
concurrent with the development. These transportation improvements or
strategies may include, but are not limited to, measures implementing
or evaluating:
(a) Multiple modes of transportation with peak and nonpeak hour
capacity performance standards for locally owned transportation
facilities; ((and))
(b) Modal performance standards meeting the peak and nonpeak hour
capacity performance standards; and
(c) Transit-oriented development or other compact development
strategies. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c) the following
definitions apply:
(i) "Compact development" means an area designated for mixed-use,
higher density development patterns that encourage walking, bicycling,
and plans for a multimodal network that may include transit services
and facilities; and
(ii) "Transit-oriented development" means a type of compact
development that provides compact, walkable communities with densities
that support transit service and have convenient access to transit
systems with frequent peak travel period service.
(2) Nothing in this section or RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b) shall be
construed as prohibiting a county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040
from exercising existing authority to develop multimodal improvements
or strategies to satisfy the concurrency requirements of this chapter.
(3) Nothing in this section is intended to affect or otherwise
modify the authority of jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2002 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, regional transit authority
facilities as defined in RCW 81.112.020, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17.020,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.490 and 1995 c 347 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
The growth management planning and environmental review fund is
hereby established in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the
fund from the proceeds of bond sales, tax revenues, budget transfers,
federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful source. Moneys in
the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the fund
shall be used to make grants and loans to local governments for the
purposes set forth in RCW 43.21C.240, 43.21C.031, or 36.70A.500.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.70A.500 and 1997 c 429 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) shall provide management services for the fund created by
RCW 36.70A.490. The department shall establish procedures and a
program for fund management. The department shall encourage
participation in the ((grant)) program by other public agencies. The
department shall develop ((the)) grant and loan criteria, monitor the
((grant)) program, and select ((grant)) recipients in consultation with
state agencies participating in the ((grant)) program through the
provision of ((grant)) funds or technical assistance.
(2) A grant or loan may be awarded to a county or city that is
required to or has chosen to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and that is
qualified pursuant to this section. The grant or loan shall be
provided to assist a county or city in paying for the cost of preparing
an environmental analysis under chapter 43.21C RCW, that is integrated
with a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, plan element, county-wide
planning policy, development regulation, monitoring program, or other
planning activity adopted under or implementing this chapter that:
(a) Improves the process for project permit review while
maintaining environmental quality; or
(b) Encourages use of plans and information developed for purposes
of complying with this chapter to satisfy requirements of other state
programs.
(3) In order to qualify for a grant or loan, a county or city
shall:
(a) Demonstrate that it will prepare an environmental analysis
pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW and subsection (2) of this section that
is integrated with a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, plan element,
county-wide planning policy, development regulations, monitoring
program, or other planning activity adopted under or implementing this
chapter;
(b) Address environmental impacts and consequences, alternatives,
and mitigation measures in sufficient detail to allow the analysis to
be adopted in whole or in part by applicants for development permits
within the geographic area analyzed in the plan;
(c) Demonstrate that procedures for review of development permit
applications will be based on the integrated plans and environmental
analysis;
(d) Include mechanisms to monitor the consequences of growth as it
occurs in the plan area and to use the resulting data to update the
plan, policy, or implementing mechanisms and associated environmental
analysis;
(e) Demonstrate substantial progress towards compliance with the
requirements of this chapter. A county or city that is more than six
months out of compliance with a requirement of this chapter is deemed
not to be making substantial progress towards compliance; and
(f) Provide local funding, which may include financial
participation by the private sector.
(4) In awarding grants and loans, the department shall give
preference to proposals that include one or more of the following
elements:
(a) Furtherance of greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirements;
(b) Financial participation by the private sector, or a
public/private partnering approach;
(((b))) (c) Identification and monitoring of system capacities for
elements of the built environment, and to the extent appropriate, of
the natural environment;
(((c))) (d) Coordination with state, federal, and tribal
governments in project review;
(((d))) (e) Furtherance of important state objectives related to
economic development, protection of areas of statewide significance,
and siting of essential public facilities;
(((e))) (f) Programs to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of
the permitting process by greater reliance on integrated plans and
prospective environmental analysis;
(((f))) (g) Programs for effective citizen and neighborhood
involvement that contribute to greater likelihood that planning
decisions can be implemented with community support; and
(((g))) (h) Programs to identify environmental impacts and
establish mitigation measures that provide effective means to satisfy
concurrency requirements and establish project consistency with the
plans.
(5) If the local funding includes funding provided by other state
functional planning programs, including open space planning and
watershed or basin planning, the functional plan shall be integrated
into and be consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(6) State agencies shall work with grant and loan recipients to
facilitate state and local project review processes that will implement
the projects receiving ((grants)) financial assistance under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Comprehensive plans and development regulations should encourage
development along transit lines and at major transit stations at levels
that support transit-oriented communities. These plans and regulations
should also: (1) Encourage walking, bicycling, and reduced vehicle
trips; (2) include design standards for streets, sidewalks, and
buildings that encourage safe walking and bicycling; (3) provide for a
no net loss of affordable housing, and an adequate supply of housing
that is affordable to low and moderate-income households; and (4)
promote mixed-use and mixed-income developments.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.80.030 and 2005 c 328 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each regional transportation planning organization shall
develop in cooperation with the department of transportation, providers
of public transportation and high capacity transportation, ports, and
local governments within the region, adopt, and periodically update a
regional transportation plan that:
(a) Is based on a least cost planning methodology that identifies
the most cost-effective facilities, services, and programs;
(b) Identifies existing or planned transportation facilities,
services, and programs, including but not limited to major roadways
including state highways and regional arterials, transit and
nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal
facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital
programs including transportation demand management that should
function as an integrated regional transportation system, giving
emphasis to those facilities, services, and programs that exhibit one
or more of the following characteristics:
(i) Crosses member county lines;
(ii) Is or will be used by a significant number of people who live
or work outside the county in which the facility, service, or project
is located;
(iii) Significant impacts are expected to be felt in more than one
county;
(iv) Potentially adverse impacts of the facility, service, program,
or project can be better avoided or mitigated through adherence to
regional policies;
(v) Transportation needs addressed by a project have been
identified by the regional transportation planning process and the
remedy is deemed to have regional significance; and
(vi) Provides for system continuity;
(c) Establishes level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes, with the exception of transportation facilities of
statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. These regionally
established level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries shall be developed jointly with the department of
transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries, consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between
providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods
and the needs of local commuters using state facilities;
(d) Includes a financial plan demonstrating how the regional
transportation plan can be implemented, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques to finance needed facilities, services, and
programs;
(e) Assesses regional development patterns, capital investment and
other measures necessary to:
(i) Ensure the preservation of the existing regional transportation
system, including requirements for operational improvements,
resurfacing, restoration, and rehabilitation of existing and future
major roadways, as well as operations, maintenance, modernization, and
rehabilitation of existing and future transit, railroad systems and
corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and
(ii) Make the most efficient use of existing transportation
facilities to relieve vehicular congestion and maximize the mobility of
people and goods;
(f) Sets forth a proposed regional transportation approach,
including capital investments, service improvements, programs, and
transportation demand management measures to guide the development of
the integrated, multimodal regional transportation system. For
regional growth centers, the approach must address transportation
concurrency strategies required under RCW 36.70A.070 and include a
measurement of vehicle level of service for off-peak periods and total
multimodal capacity for peak periods; and
(g) Where appropriate, sets forth the relationship of high capacity
transportation providers and other public transit providers with regard
to responsibility for, and the coordination between, services and
facilities.
(2) Regional transportation planning organizations encompassing at
least one county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 with two hundred forty-five thousand or more residents must adopt a regional transportation
plan for those counties that implement the goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled adopted under RCW 47.01.440.
(3) The organization shall review the regional transportation plan
biennially for currency and forward the adopted plan along with
documentation of the biennial review to the state department of
transportation. In satisfying the requirements of this subsection, the
organization shall provide notice reasonably calculated to inform the
public of the review, and opportunities for the public to comment on
the review and plan adoption.
(((3))) (4) All transportation projects, programs, and
transportation demand management measures within the region that have
an impact upon regional facilities or services must be consistent with
the plan and with the adopted regional growth and transportation
strategies.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.21C.240 and 2003 c 298 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, a county, city, or town reviewing a project action shall
determine that the requirements for environmental analysis, protection,
and mitigation measures in the county, city, or town's development
regulations and comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW,
and in other applicable local, state, or federal laws and rules provide
adequate analysis of and mitigation for the specific adverse
environmental impacts of the project action to which the requirements
apply. Rules adopted by the department according to RCW 43.21C.110
regarding project specific impacts that may not have been adequately
addressed apply to any determination made under this section. In these
situations, in which all adverse environmental impacts will be
mitigated below the level of significance as a result of mitigation
measures included by changing, clarifying, or conditioning of the
proposed action and/or regulatory requirements of development
regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or other local, state, or
federal laws, a determination of nonsignificance or a mitigated
determination of nonsignificance is the proper threshold determination.
(2) A county, city, or town shall make the determination provided
for in subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) In the course of project review, including any required
environmental analysis, the local government considers the specific
probable adverse environmental impacts of the proposed action and
determines that these specific impacts are adequately addressed by the
development regulations or other applicable requirements of the
comprehensive plan, subarea plan element of the comprehensive plan, or
other local, state, or federal rules or laws; and
(b) The local government bases or conditions its approval on
compliance with these requirements or mitigation measures.
(3) If a county, city, or town's comprehensive plans, subarea
plans, and development regulations adequately address a project's
probable specific adverse environmental impacts, as determined under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county, city, or town
shall not impose additional mitigation under this chapter during
project review. Project review shall be integrated with environmental
analysis under this chapter.
(4) A comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or development regulation
shall be considered to adequately address an impact if the county,
city, or town, through the planning and environmental review process
under chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter, has identified the specific
adverse environmental impacts and:
(a) The impacts have been avoided or otherwise mitigated; or
(b) The legislative body of the county, city, or town has
designated as acceptable certain levels of service, land use
designations, development standards, or other land use planning
required or allowed by chapter 36.70A RCW.
(5) In deciding whether a specific adverse environmental impact has
been addressed by an existing rule or law of another agency with
jurisdiction with environmental expertise with regard to a specific
environmental impact, the county, city, or town shall consult orally or
in writing with that agency and may expressly defer to that agency. In
making this deferral, the county, city, or town shall base or condition
its project approval on compliance with these other existing rules or
laws.
(6) Nothing in this section limits the authority of an agency in
its review or mitigation of a project to adopt or otherwise rely on
environmental analyses and requirements under other laws, as provided
by this chapter.
(7) A project action that is consistent with the applicable
comprehensive plan and development regulations may not be challenged
for noncompliance under this chapter due to greenhouse gas emissions
if:
(a) The county, city, or town in which the project action is
located has prepared an environmental impact statement under RCW
43.21C.030 for the area covered by the comprehensive plan or subarea
plan that includes a greenhouse gas emissions analysis;
(b) The county, city, or town in which the project action is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan or subarea plan and
development regulations that comply with subsections (3) and (4) of
this section;
(c) The development authorized by the comprehensive plan and
development regulations will reduce greenhouse gas emissions in
accordance with RCW 70.235.020, and per capita vehicle miles traveled
in accordance with RCW 47.01.440;
(d) The project action complies with the definition of compact
development in RCW 36.70A.108; and
(e) The project action is located in an urban growth area and a
center designated by the county, city, or town comprehensive plan.
(8) This section shall apply only to a county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C
RCW to read as follows:
Cities and towns authorizing compact development in designated
centers or participating in a regional transfer of development rights
program under chapter 43.362 RCW may impose environmental fees on
development activity as part of the financing for environmental review
under this chapter. Environmental fees imposed under this section:
(1) May only be for: (a) A subarea plan for which the impacts of
compact development have been addressed by the applicable city or town;
or (b) a regional transfer of development rights program receiving area
for which the impacts of development within the receiving area have
been addressed by the applicable city or town;
(2) May only be for environmental review costs that have been
identified as reasonably related to the new development;
(3) May not exceed a proportionate share of the environmental
review costs financed under RCW 36.70A.500, if any, or the costs of
environmental review and holding costs that would have been borne by
the development if no environmental review had occurred; and
(4) Must be used to repay a loan authorized under RCW 36.70A.500,
if applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An authority that intends to dispose of land under RCW
81.112.080(3) that is located within one-half mile of a major transit
station must provide qualifying public or nonprofit entities an
opportunity of first offer to develop the land. For purposes of this
section, a "qualifying public or nonprofit entity" is an entity that:
(a) Is eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund established
in chapter 43.185 RCW; (b) certifies that it will seek assistance from
the housing trust fund for development of the land in the next
application round for the fund; and (c) meets other financial and
development requirements of the authority. The authority may provide
that any agreement with a qualifying public or nonprofit entity be
contingent upon receipt of a funding award within a reasonable period
of time, be subject to approval by a federal granting agency, or
include such other contingencies that the authority may reasonably
require.
(2) Nothing in this section is intended to conflict with federal
requirements or to require an authority to take any action that the
authority reasonably determines would cause it to forego or repay
federal funding or forego incentives to develop property around transit
stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An authority may donate air rights over any authority-owned
parking facility that is associated with a major transit station to a
qualifying public or nonprofit entity for the development of housing
units. For purposes of this section, a "qualifying public or nonprofit
entity" is an organization that:
(a) Is eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund
established in chapter 43.185 RCW;
(b) Certifies that it will seek financial assistance from the
program for development of the land or air rights in the next
application round; and
(c) Meets other financial and development requirements of the
authority.
(2) The authority may provide that any agreement with a qualifying
public or nonprofit organization be contingent upon receipt of a
funding award within a reasonable period of time, be subject to
approval by a federal granting agency, or include such other
contingencies that the authority may reasonably require. In addition,
if the development within the donated air rights will increase the
costs of or require modifications to the parking facility, the
qualifying public or nonprofit entity must, as a condition to the
donation of the air rights, agree to pay or provide for the payment of
those costs or modifications.
(3) Nothing in this section is intended to conflict with federal
requirements or to require an authority to take any action that the
authority reasonably determines would cause it to forego or repay
federal funding or to forego incentives to develop property around
transit stations.
(4) The donation of air rights under this section will encourage
the development of transit-oriented development, increase transit
ridership, and is declared to be a proper purpose of and for the
benefit of an authority that makes such a donation.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.14.0455 and 2006 c 311 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax
authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the boundaries of the district. The rate of tax
shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax. ((The tax may not be imposed for a period exceeding ten years.
This tax may be extended for a period not exceeding ten years with an
affirmative vote of the voters voting at the election.))
(2) Money received from the tax imposed under this section must be
spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 36.73 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 36.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each county legislative authority must establish and maintain
a transit-oriented development facilitation fund for the purpose of
funding qualifying development projects. All receipts from gifts,
grants, endowments from public or private sources, in trust or
otherwise, and other designated public and private sources must be
deposited in the fund. The legislature may also appropriate moneys
into the fund. Expenditures may only be used for:
(a) Developing residential housing within single, multifamily, or
mixed-use developments that are: (i) Located within one-half mile of
a major transit stop; and (ii) affordable to a person or household with
an income that is less than one hundred twenty percent of the median
household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which
the residential housing is located;
(b) Purchasing real property or development rights in accordance
with (a) of this subsection; and
(c) The administration of this section by the county and by lead
agencies or entities designated in accordance with this section.
(2)(a) Each county legislative authority must designate a lead
agency or entity to administer the fund established in subsection (1)
of this section. Lead agencies and entities may either be:
(i) A city or county housing authority created under chapter 35.82
RCW; or
(ii) An organization that is eligible to receive financial
assistance under RCW 43.185.060.
(b) Lead agencies or entities designated under (a) of this
subsection may:
(i) Purchase, rent, lease, sell, or operate residential housing
that complies with subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(ii) Provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement,
alteration, or repair of any residential housing, or part thereof, that
complies with subsection (1)(a) of this section; and
(iii) Perform all other duties and actions deemed necessary and
appropriate to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect December 1, 2011.

--- END ---