BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.100 and 2007 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) When overtaking and passing a pedestrian or bicycle in
compliance with RCW 46.61.110(2);
(d) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon;
(((d))) (e) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic;
or
(((e))) (f) Upon a highway having three lanes or less, when
approaching a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, tow truck or
other vehicle providing roadside assistance while operating warning
lights with three hundred sixty degree visibility, or police vehicle as
described under RCW 46.61.212(2).
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, or (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (d) of
this subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except when preparing for a left turn at an intersection,
exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn is legally
permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high-occupancy vehicle lane. A high-occupancy vehicle lane is not
considered the left-hand lane of a roadway. The department of
transportation, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, shall
adopt rules specifying (a) those circumstances where it is permissible
for other vehicles to use the left lane in case of emergency or to
facilitate the orderly flow of traffic, and (b) those segments of
limited access roadway to be exempt from this subsection due to the
operational characteristics of the roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.110 and 2005 c 396 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of
vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those
limitations, exceptions, and special rules hereinafter stated:
(1) The driver of a vehicle overtaking other traffic proceeding in
the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance
and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely
clear of the overtaken traffic.
(2) The driver of a vehicle approaching a pedestrian or bicycle
that is on the roadway or on the right-hand shoulder or bicycle lane of
the roadway shall pass to the left at a safe distance, of no less than
three feet, to clearly avoid coming into contact with the pedestrian or
bicyclist, and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway
until safely clear of the overtaken pedestrian or bicyclist.
(3) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted,
overtaken traffic shall give way to the right in favor of an overtaking
vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase speed until completely
passed by the overtaking vehicle.

--- END ---