BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.305 and 2007 c 316 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The independent youth housing program is created in the
department to provide housing stipends to eligible youth to be used for
independent housing. In developing a plan for the design,
implementation, and operation of the independent youth housing program,
the department shall:
(a) Adopt policies, requirements, and procedures necessary to
administer the program;
(b) Contract with one or more eligible organizations described
under RCW 43.185A.040 to provide services and conduct administrative
activities as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Establish eligibility criteria for youth to participate in the
independent youth housing program, giving priority to youth who have
been dependents of the state for at least one year;
(d) Refer interested youth to the designated subcontractor
organization administering the program in the area in which the youth
intends to reside;
(e) Develop a method for determining the amount of the housing
stipend, first and last month's rent, and security deposit, where
applicable, to be dedicated to participating youth. The method for
determining a housing stipend must take into account a youth's age, the
youth's total income from all sources, the fair market rent for the
area in which the youth lives or intends to live, and a variety of
possible living situations for the youth. The amount of housing
stipends must be adjusted, by a method and formula established by the
department, to promote the successful transition for youth to complete
housing self-sufficiency over time;
(f) Ensure that the independent youth housing program is integrated
and aligned with other state rental assistance and case management
programs operated by the department, as well as case management and
supportive services programs, including the independent living program,
the transitional living program, and other related programs offered by
the department of social and health services; and
(g) Consult with the department of social and health services and
other stakeholders involved with dependent youth, homeless youth, and
homeless young adults, as appropriate.
(2) The department of social and health services shall collaborate
with the department in implementing and operating the independent youth
housing program including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Refer potential eligible youth to the department before the
youth's eighteenth birthday, if feasible, to include an indication, if
known, of where the youth plans to reside after aging out of foster
care;
(b) Provide information to all youth aged fifteen or older, who are
dependents of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW, about the independent
youth housing program, encouraging dependents nearing their eighteenth
birthday to consider applying for enrollment in the program;
(c) Encourage organizations participating in the independent living
program and the transitional living program to collaborate with
independent youth housing program providers whenever possible to
capitalize on resources and provide the greatest amount and variety of
services to eligible youth;
(d) Annually provide to the department data reflecting changes in
the percentage of youth aging out of the state dependency system each
year who are eligible for state assistance, as well as any other data
and performance measures that may assist the department to measure
program success; and
(e) Annually, beginning by December 31, 2007, provide to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the interagency council
on homelessness as described under RCW 43.185C.170 recommendations of
strategies to reach the goals described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g).
(3) Under the independent youth housing program, subcontractor
organizations shall:
(a) Use moneys awarded to the organizations for housing stipends,
security deposits, first and last month's rent stipends, case
management program costs, and administrative costs. When subcontractor
organizations determine that it is necessary to assist participating
youth in accessing and maintaining independent housing, subcontractor
organizations may also use moneys awarded to pay for professional
mental health services and tuition costs for court-ordered classes and
programs;
(i) Administrative costs for each subcontractor organization may
not exceed twelve percent of the estimated total annual grant amount to
the subcontractor organization;
(ii) All housing stipends, security deposits, and first and last
month's rent stipends must be payable only to a landlord or housing
manager of any type of independent housing;
(b) Enroll eligible youth who are referred by the department and
who choose to reside in their assigned service area;
(c) Enter eligible youth program participants into the homeless
client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180;
(d) Monitor participating youth's housing status;
(e) Evaluate participating youth's eligibility and compliance with
department policies and procedures at least twice a year;
(f) Assist participating youth to develop or update an independent
living plan focused on obtaining and retaining independent housing or
collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved
to ensure that the youth has an independent living plan;
(g) Educate participating youth on tenant rights and
responsibilities;
(h) Provide support to participating youth in the form of general
case management and information and referral services, when necessary,
or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already
involved to ensure that the youth is receiving the case management and
information and referral services needed;
(i) Connect participating youth, when possible, with individual
development account programs, other financial literacy programs, and
other programs that are designed to help young people acquire economic
independence and self-sufficiency, or collaborate with a case manager
with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is
receiving information and referrals to these programs, when
appropriate;
(j) Submit expenditure and performance reports, including
information related to the performance measures in RCW 43.63A.311, to
the department on a time schedule determined by the department; and
(k) Provide recommendations to the department regarding program
improvements and strategies that might assist the state to reach its
goals as described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.63A.307 and 2007 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Eligible youth" means an individual who:
(a) On or after September 1, 2006, is at least eighteen, was a
dependent of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW ((in the month)) at any
time during the four-month period before his or her eighteenth
birthday, and has not yet reached the age of twenty-three;
(b) Except as provided in RCW 43.63A.309(2)(a), has a total income
from all sources, except for temporary sources that include, but are
not limited to, overtime wages, bonuses, or short-term temporary
assignments, that does not exceed fifty percent of the area median
income;
(c) Is not receiving services under RCW 74.13.031(10)(b);
(d) Complies with other eligibility requirements the department may
establish.
(3) "Fair market rent" means the fair market rent in each county of
the state, as determined by the United States department of housing and
urban development.
(4) "Independent housing" means a housing unit that is not owned by
or located within the home of the eligible youth's biological parents
or any of the eligible youth's former foster care families or
dependency guardians. "Independent housing" may include a unit in a
transitional or other supportive housing facility.
(5) "Individual development account" or "account" means an account
established by contract between a low-income individual and a
sponsoring organization for the benefit of the low-income individual
and funded through periodic contributions by the low-income individual
that are matched with contributions by or through the sponsoring
organization.
(6) "Subcontractor organization" means an eligible organization
described under RCW 43.185A.040 that contracts with the department to
administer the independent youth housing program.

--- END ---