BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington has clear and long-standing interests
in maximizing the health and well-being of its residents, safeguarding
the confidentiality and integrity of the doctor-patient relationship,
and containing health care costs;
(b) To further its substantial interest in the health and well-being of its residents and in containing health care costs, the state
of Washington has shown a strong commitment to evidence-based care and
cost-effective health purchasing;
(c) Health care providers in Washington who write prescriptions for
their patients have a strong interest in the integrity of the patient-provider relationship; and
(d) The use of patient identifiable prescription data to market
prescription drugs to patients runs counter to Washington's strong
commitment to both evidence-based care and cost-effective health
purchasing.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to preserve patient privacy
and contain health care costs by providing greater protection for
patient specific health information than is currently provided by
federal law.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.02.010 and 2006 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or
investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or
affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:
(a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific
standards;
(b) A private or public program of payments to a health care
provider; or
(c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.
(2) "Directory information" means information disclosing the
presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name, location
within a health care facility, and the general health condition of a
particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or who is
currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.
(3) "Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities" means an
officer of any agency or authority in the United States, a state, a
tribe, a territory, or a political subdivision of a state, a tribe, or
a territory who is empowered by law to: (a) Investigate or conduct an
official inquiry into a potential criminal violation of law; or (b)
prosecute or otherwise conduct a criminal proceeding arising from an
alleged violation of law.
(4) "General health condition" means the patient's health status
described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair," "good," "excellent,"
or terms denoting similar conditions.
(5) "Health care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by
a health care provider:
(a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental
condition; or
(b) That affects the structure or any function of the human body.
(6) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home,
laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider
provides health care to patients.
(7) "Health care information" means any information, whether oral
or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be
associated with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the
patient's health care, including a patient's deoxyribonucleic acid and
identified sequence of chemical base pairs. The term includes any
required accounting of disclosures of health care information.
(8) "Health care operations" means any of the following activities
of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor
to the extent that the activities are related to functions that make an
entity a health care provider, a health care facility, or a third-party
payor:
(a) Conducting: Quality assessment and improvement activities,
including outcomes evaluation and development of clinical guidelines,
if the obtaining of generalizable knowledge is not the primary purpose
of any studies resulting from such activities; population-based
activities relating to improving health or reducing health care costs,
protocol development, case management and care coordination, contacting
of health care providers and patients with information about treatment
alternatives; and related functions that do not include treatment;
(b) Reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care
professionals, evaluating practitioner and provider performance and
third-party payor performance, conducting training programs in which
students, trainees, or practitioners in areas of health care learn
under supervision to practice or improve their skills as health care
providers, training of nonhealth care professionals, accreditation,
certification, licensing, or credentialing activities;
(c) Underwriting, premium rating, and other activities relating to
the creation, renewal, or replacement of a contract of health insurance
or health benefits, and ceding, securing, or placing a contract for
reinsurance of risk relating to claims for health care, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, if any applicable legal
requirements are met;
(d) Conducting or arranging for medical review, legal services, and
auditing functions, including fraud and abuse detection and compliance
programs;
(e) Business planning and development, such as conducting cost-management and planning-related analyses related to managing and
operating the health care facility or third-party payor, including
formulary development and administration, development, or improvement
of methods of payment or coverage policies; and
(f) Business management and general administrative activities of
the health care facility, health care provider, or third-party payor
including, but not limited to:
(i) Management activities relating to implementation of and
compliance with the requirements of this chapter;
(ii) Customer service, including the provision of data analyses for
policy holders, plan sponsors, or other customers, provided that health
care information is not disclosed to such policy holder, plan sponsor,
or customer;
(iii) Resolution of internal grievances;
(iv) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of
a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor with
another health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor or an entity that following such activity will become a health
care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, and due
diligence related to such activity; and
(v) Consistent with applicable legal requirements, creating
deidentified health care information or a limited dataset and fund-raising for the benefit of the health care provider, health care
facility, or third-party payor.
(9) "Health care provider" means a person who is licensed,
certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state
to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(10) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(11) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(12) "Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or
other group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under
federal or state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct
periodic review of research programs to assure the protection of the
rights and welfare of human research subjects.
(((11))) (13) "Maintain," as related to health care information,
means to hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that
information.
(((12))) (14) "Marketing" means making a communication that
encourages recipients of the communication to purchase or use a product
or service. "Marketing" does not include any of the following:
(a) Communications, including those made under (b) of this
subsection, made orally or in writing by an entity with access to the
recipient's health information if the entity making the communication
does not receive direct or indirect remuneration including, but not
limited to, gifts, fees, payments, subsidies, or other economic
benefits, from a third party for making the communication.
Remuneration does not include payments received by a pharmacist or
pharmacy from carriers, state purchased health care programs or other
entities purchasing services under a health benefit plan, from health
plan enrollees, or from a patient for the following activities:
(i) Prescription drug ingredient costs;
(ii) Dispensing fees;
(iii) Formulary compliance; or
(iv) Case management related to the diagnosis, treatment, or
management of illness of a specific patient when conducted by, or under
the supervision of, a pharmacist, including but not limited to care
management educational materials provided to a patient about the
patient's health condition, adherence to a prescribed course of
therapy, such as refill reminders, or other information about the
product being dispensed;
(b) Communications made to current enrollees by the carrier, or to
a patient by that patient's primary provider solely for the purpose of
describing a provider's participation in an existing health care
provider network or health plan network to which the enrollees or the
patient already subscribes;
(c) Communications made to current enrollees by the carrier, or to
a current patient by that patient's primary provider solely for the
purpose of describing if, and the extent to which, a product or
service, or payment for a product or service, is provided by a
provider, contractor, or plan or is included in a health benefit plan
to which the enrollees or the patient already subscribes;
(d) Communications made to a current patient by the patient's
physician or primary health care provider for purposes of the patient's
health care treatment; and
(e) Communications made to plan enrollees describing the
availability of more cost-effective pharmaceuticals, medical devices,
or treatment options.
(15) "Patient" means an individual who receives or has received
health care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received
health care.
(((13))) (16) "Payment" means:
(a) The activities undertaken by:
(i) A third-party payor to obtain premiums or to determine or
fulfill its responsibility for coverage and provision of benefits by
the third-party payor; or
(ii) A health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor, to obtain or provide reimbursement for the provision of health
care; and
(b) The activities in (a) of this subsection that relate to the
patient to whom health care is provided and that include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Determinations of eligibility or coverage, including
coordination of benefits or the determination of cost-sharing amounts,
and adjudication or subrogation of health benefit claims;
(ii) Risk adjusting amounts due based on enrollee health status and
demographic characteristics;
(iii) Billing, claims management, collection activities, obtaining
payment under a contract for reinsurance, including stop-loss insurance
and excess of loss insurance, and related health care data processing;
(iv) Review of health care services with respect to medical
necessity, coverage under a health plan, appropriateness of care, or
justification of charges;
(v) Utilization review activities, including precertification and
preauthorization of services, and concurrent and retrospective review
of services; and
(vi) Disclosure to consumer reporting agencies of any of the
following health care information relating to collection of premiums or
reimbursement:
(A) Name and address;
(B) Date of birth;
(C) Social security number;
(D) Payment history;
(E) Account number; and
(F) Name and address of the health care provider, health care
facility, and/or third-party payor.
(((14))) (17) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(((15))) (18) "Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or
searching the record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page
for the first thirty pages and fifty cents per page for all other
pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and handling may be
charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be adjusted
biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all
consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as
determined by the secretary of health. However, where editing of
records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done by
the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge
for a basic office visit.
(((16))) (19) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under
Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other
jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health
maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan; or a
state or federal health benefit program.
(((17))) (20) "Treatment" means the provision, coordination, or
management of health care and related services by one or more health
care providers or health care facilities, including the coordination or
management of health care by a health care provider or health care
facility with a third party; consultation between health care providers
or health care facilities relating to a patient; or the referral of a
patient for health care from one health care provider or health care
facility to another.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.02.050 and 2007 c 156 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except to the extent that use or disclosure of health care
information is limited under section 4 of this act, a health care
provider or health care facility may disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization to the extent a
recipient needs to know the information, if the disclosure is:
(a) To a person who the provider or facility reasonably believes is
providing health care to the patient;
(b) To any other person who requires health care information for
health care education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer
review, or administrative, legal, financial, actuarial services to, or
other health care operations for or on behalf of the health care
provider or health care facility; or for assisting the health care
provider or health care facility in the delivery of health care and the
health care provider or health care facility reasonably believes that
the person:
(i) Will not use or disclose the health care information for any
other purpose; and
(ii) Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care
information;
(c) To any other health care provider or health care facility
reasonably believed to have previously provided health care to the
patient, to the extent necessary to provide health care to the patient,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(d) To any person if the health care provider or health care
facility reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an
imminent danger to the health or safety of the patient or any other
individual, however there is no obligation under this chapter on the
part of the provider or facility to so disclose;
(e) To immediate family members of the patient, including a
patient's state registered domestic partner, or any other individual
with whom the patient is known to have a close personal relationship,
if made in accordance with good medical or other professional practice,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(f) To a health care provider or health care facility who is the
successor in interest to the health care provider or health care
facility maintaining the health care information;
(g) For use in a research project that an institutional review
board has determined:
(i) Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the
privacy of the patient that would result from the disclosure;
(ii) Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health
care information in individually identifiable form;
(iii) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information
from redisclosure;
(iv) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying,
directly or indirectly, any patient in any report of the research
project; and
(v) Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest
opportunity, consistent with the purposes of the project, information
that would enable the patient to be identified, unless an institutional
review board authorizes retention of identifying information for
purposes of another research project;
(h) To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit,
if that person agrees in writing to:
(i) Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with
the purpose of the audit, information that would enable the patient to
be identified; and
(ii) Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish
the audit or report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in
payment for health care by a health care provider or patient, or other
unlawful conduct by the health care provider;
(i) To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in
which the patient is detained;
(j) To provide directory information, unless the patient has
instructed the health care provider or health care facility not to make
the disclosure;
(k) To fire, police, sheriff, or another public authority, that
brought, or caused to be brought, the patient to the health care
facility or health care provider if the disclosure is limited to the
patient's name, residence, sex, age, occupation, condition, diagnosis,
estimated or actual discharge date, or extent and location of injuries
as determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious
when admitted;
(l) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities and the
health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor
believes in good faith that the health care information disclosed
constitutes evidence of criminal conduct that occurred on the premises
of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor;
(m) To another health care provider, health care facility, or
third-party payor for the health care operations of the health care
provider, health care facility, or third-party payor that receives the
information, if each entity has or had a relationship with the patient
who is the subject of the health care information being requested, the
health care information pertains to such relationship, and the
disclosure is for the purposes described in RCW 70.02.010(8) (a) and
(b); or
(n) For payment.
(2) A health care provider shall disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization if the disclosure
is:
(a) To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the
extent the health care provider is required by law to report health
care information; when needed to determine compliance with state or
federal licensure, certification or registration rules or laws; or when
needed to protect the public health;
(b) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the
extent the health care provider is required by law;
(c) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, upon
receipt of a written or oral request made to a nursing supervisor,
administrator, or designated privacy official, in a case in which the
patient is being treated or has been treated for a bullet wound,
gunshot wound, powder burn, or other injury arising from or caused by
the discharge of a firearm, or an injury caused by a knife, an ice
pick, or any other sharp or pointed instrument which federal, state, or
local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe to have been
intentionally inflicted upon a person, or a blunt force injury that
federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe
resulted from a criminal act, the following information, if known:
(i) The name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's residence;
(iii) The patient's sex;
(iv) The patient's age;
(v) The patient's condition;
(vi) The patient's diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a health care provider;
(vii) Whether the patient was conscious when admitted;
(viii) The name of the health care provider making the
determination in (c)(v), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Whether the patient has been transferred to another facility;
and
(x) The patient's discharge time and date;
(d) To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations
of deaths;
(e) Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW
70.02.060.
(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing
their record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are
consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding allowable disclosures under RCW 70.02.050, and
unless expressly authorized by the patient as provided in RCW
70.02.030, (1) health care providers, including pharmacies and entities
licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, (2) health carriers, (3) pharmacy
benefit managers, or (4) the business associates, subsidiaries, or
affiliates of the entities set out in subsections (1) through (3) of
this section, shall not intentionally share, sell, or otherwise use any
health care information for the purpose of marketing prescription drugs
to patients.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.02.170 and 1991 c 335 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who has complied with this chapter may maintain an
action for the relief provided in this section against a health care
provider or facility who has not complied with this chapter.
(2) The court may order the health care provider or other person to
comply with this chapter. Such relief may include actual damages, but
shall not include consequential or incidental damages. The court shall
award reasonable attorneys' fees and all other expenses reasonably
incurred to the prevailing party.
(3) Any action under this chapter is barred unless the action is
commenced within two years after the cause of action is discovered.
(4) Except to the extent provided otherwise in subsection (5) of
this section, a violation of this chapter shall not be deemed a
violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
(5) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the
legislature finds that the practices covered by section 4 of this act
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of section 4 of this act is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.86.090 and 2007 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except to the extent provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any person who is injured in his or her business or property
by a violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede
to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may
bring a civil action in the superior court to enjoin further
violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or
both, together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable
attorney's fee, and the court may in its discretion, increase the award
of damages to an amount not to exceed three times the actual damages
sustained: PROVIDED, That such increased damage award for violation of
RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed ten thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That such person may bring a civil action in the district court to
recover his or her actual damages, except for damages which exceed the
amount specified in RCW 3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable attorney's fees. The district court may, in its discretion,
increase the award of damages to an amount not more than three times
the actual damages sustained, but such increased damage award shall not
exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020. For the purpose of this
section, "person" shall include the counties, municipalities, and all
political subdivisions of this state.
(2)(a) Any person who is injured by a violation of section 4 of
this act may bring a civil action in the superior court to enjoin
further violations, to recover the greater of one thousand dollars or
actual damages sustained by him or her, or both, together with the
costs of the suit, including reasonable attorneys' fees. The court
may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not
to exceed the greater of three thousand dollars or three times the
actual damages sustained.
(b) Each prescription drug marketing communication sent or conveyed
to a patient shall constitute a separate violation of section 4 of this
act.
(3) Whenever the state of Washington is injured, directly or
indirectly, by reason of a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue therefor in the superior court to
recover the actual damages sustained by it, whether direct or indirect,
and to recover the costs of the suit including a reasonable attorney's
fee.

--- END ---