BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many watershed
groups and programs, including but not limited to many watershed
planning units operating under chapter 90.82 RCW, have proposed or
considered the establishment of water banks to meet vital instream and
out-of-stream needs within a watershed or region. The legislature also
finds that water banks and exchanges can: Provide critical tools to
make water supplies available when and where needed during times of
drought; improve stream flows and preserve instream values during fish
critical periods; reduce water transaction costs, time, and risk to
purchasers; facilitate fair and efficient reallocation of water from
one beneficial use to another; provide banked water supplies to offset
impacts related to future development and the issuance of new water
rights; and facilitate water agreements that protect upstream community
values while retaining flexibility to meet critical downstream water
needs in times of scarcity. The legislature therefore declares that
the intent of this act is to provide clear authority for water banks
throughout the state, to improve the effectiveness of water bank and
exchange provisions, and to use the interlocal cooperation act to
establish watershed management partnerships for water banking purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.100 and 2003 c 144 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to use the trust water
rights program ((in the Yakima river basin)) for water banking purposes
statewide.
(2) Public agencies, as defined under RCW 39.34.020, are authorized
to enter into interlocal agreements with the department to form
watershed management partnerships under the interlocal cooperation act,
chapter 39.34 RCW, for the purpose of establishing and operating local
water banks under the state trust water rights program. The department
shall invite any federally recognized Indian tribe with a reservation
located within the area proposed to be covered by the water bank to be
a party to the interlocal agreement. The geographic area served by a
water bank established under this subsection must be contiguous except
that the water bank may not operate within the reservation boundaries
of a federally recognized Indian tribe, or within lands held in trust
by the federal government on behalf of a federally recognized Indian
tribe, without written consent from the tribe.
(3) Water banking may be used for one or more of the following
purposes:
(a) To authorize the use of trust water rights to mitigate for
water resource impacts, future water supply needs, or any beneficial
use under chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW, consistent with any terms
and conditions established by the transferor, except that within the
Yakima river basin return flows from water rights authorized in whole
or in part for any purpose shall remain available as part of the Yakima
basin's total water supply available and to satisfy existing rights for
other downstream uses and users;
(b) To document transfers of water rights to and from the trust
water rights program; and
(c) To provide a source of water rights the department can make
available to third parties on a temporary or permanent basis for any
beneficial use under chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW.
(((3))) (4) The department shall not use or agree to the use of
water banking to:
(a) Cause detriment or injury to existing rights;
(b) Issue temporary water rights or portions thereof for new
potable uses requiring an adequate and reliable water supply under RCW
19.27.097;
(c) Administer federal project water rights, including federal
storage rights; or
(d) Allow carryover of stored water in the Yakima basin from one
water year to another water year if it would negatively impact the
total water supply available.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted or
administered in a manner that precludes the use of the department's
existing authority to process trust water rights applications under
this chapter or to process water right applications under chapter 90.03
or 90.44 RCW. The interlocal agreement process to establish a
watershed management partnership under subsection (2) of this section
is not required for water banks or exchanges operating under existing
authority as of the effective date of this section.
(6) For purposes of this section and RCW 90.42.135, "total water
supply available" shall be defined as provided in the 1945 consent
decree between the United States and water users in the Yakima river
basin, and consistent with later interpretation by state and federal
courts.
(7) In operating a water bank, a watershed management partnership
may acquire, purchase, hold, lease, manage, occupy, and sell real and
personal property or any interest therein, enter into and perform all
necessary contracts, appoint and employ necessary agents and employees
and fix their compensation, employ contractors including contracts for
professional services, sue and be sued, and do all lawful acts required
and expedient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(8) A watershed management partnership operating a water bank may
establish a revolving fund for the purpose of acquiring and disbursing
water rights.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.34.200 and 2003 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any two or more public agencies may enter into agreements with
one another to form a watershed management partnership for the purpose
of implementing any portion or all elements of a watershed management
plan, including the coordination and oversight of plan implementation.
The plan may be any plan or plan element described in RCW 39.34.190(3).
(2) Public agencies may enter into agreements with the department
of ecology to form watershed management partnerships for the purpose of
establishing and operating local water banks under the state trust
water rights program, chapter 90.42 RCW.
(3) The watershed partnership agreement shall include the
provisions required of all interlocal agreements under RCW
39.34.030(3). The agreement shall be filed pursuant to RCW 39.34.040
with the county auditor of each county lying within the geographical
watershed area to be addressed by the partnership. The public agencies
forming the partnership shall designate a treasurer for the deposit,
accounting, and handling of the funds of the partnership. The
treasurer shall be either a county treasurer or a city treasurer of a
county or city participating in the agreement to form the partnership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Costs incurred by the department or a water bank established under
RCW 90.42.100 associated with water service contracts with federal
agencies may be recovered by the department from persons withdrawing
water or credits from the water bank or the water bank as a condition
of the exercise of a water right supplied from a federal water project.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.42.080 and 2002 c 329 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The state may acquire all or portions of existing ((water))
surface or groundwater rights, by purchase, gift, or other appropriate
means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity or
combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are
trust water rights. A water right acquired by the state that is
expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be
administered as a trust water right in compliance with that condition.
(b) If the holder of a right to surface water ((from a body of
water)) or groundwater chooses to donate all or a portion of the
person's water right to the trust water system to assist in providing
instream flows or to preserve surface or groundwater resources on a
temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation
on such terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and the
other applicable requirements of this chapter and the terms prescribed
are relevant and material to protecting any interest in the water right
retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water
rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.
(2) The department may enter into leases, contracts, or such other
arrangements with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure
that trust water rights acquired in accordance with this chapter may be
exercised to the fullest possible extent.
(3) Trust water rights may be acquired by the state on a temporary
or permanent basis.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, a water
right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed
the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years
before the donation nor may the total of any portion of the water right
remaining with the donor plus the donated portion of the water right
exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the
five years before the donation. A water right holder who believes his
or her water right has been impaired by a trust water right donated
under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that the department
review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or
exercising a portion of that trust water right donated under subsection
(1)(b) of this section is impairing existing water rights in violation
of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right shall be altered by the
department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department
to alter or not to alter a trust water right donated under subsection
(1)(b) of this section is appealable to the pollution control hearings
board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's status as a trust
water right under this subsection is not evidence of the validity or
quantity of the water right.
(5) The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to
donations for instream flows described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, but do apply to other transfers of water rights under this
section.
(6) No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by
the state pursuant to this section unless specifically appropriated for
this purpose by the legislature.
(7) Any water right conveyed to the trust water right system as a
gift that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes shall be managed by the department for public purposes to
ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water
right.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, if the
department acquires a trust water right by lease, the amount of the
trust water right shall not exceed the extent to which the water right
was exercised during the five years before the acquisition was made nor
may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the
original water right holder plus the portion of the water right leased
by the department exceed the extent to which the water right was
exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A water right
holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right leased under this subsection may request that the
department review the impairment claim. If the department determines
that exercising the trust water right resulting from the leasing or
exercising of a portion of that trust water right leased under this
subsection is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW
90.42.070, the trust water right shall be altered by the department to
eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or
not to alter a trust water right leased under this subsection is
appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right under this
subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water
right.
(9) For a water right donated to or acquired by the trust water
rights program on a temporary basis, the full quantity of water
diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before the donation or
acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program and shall
revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the trust
period ends.
(10) For water rights donated or leased under subsection (4) or (8)
of this section where nonuse of the water right is excused for
sufficient cause under RCW 90.14.140, and where the nonuse occurred in
the five years preceding the donation or lease, the department shall
calculate the amount of water to be acquired by looking at the extent
to which the right was exercised during the most recent five-year
period preceding the date where sufficient cause for nonuse under RCW
90.14.140 was established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.03.255 and 1997 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, when evaluating an application for a water
right, transfer, or change filed pursuant to RCW 90.03.250 or 90.03.380
that includes provision for any water impoundment or other resource
management technique, take into consideration the benefits and costs,
including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or other
resource management technique that is included as a component of the
application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of groundwater that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the diversion of
surface water proposed in the application for the water right,
transfer, or change. Except when used as a condition for approving
applications that identify use of trust water rights held in water
banks for mitigation purposes, provision for an impoundment or other
resource management technique in an application shall be made solely at
the discretion of the applicant and shall not otherwise be made by the
department as a condition for approving an application that does not
include such provision.
This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any
riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by appropriation
or otherwise.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.44.055 and 1997 c 360 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, when evaluating an application for a water
right or an amendment filed pursuant to RCW 90.44.050 or 90.44.100 that
includes provision for any water impoundment or other resource
management technique, take into consideration the benefits and costs,
including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or other
resource management technique that is included as a component of the
application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of groundwater that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the withdrawal of
groundwater proposed in the application for the water right or
amendment in the same water resource inventory area. Except when used
as a condition for approving applications that identify use of trust
water rights held in water banks for mitigation purposes, provision for
an impoundment or other resource management technique in an application
shall be made solely at the discretion of the applicant and shall not
be made by the department as a condition for approving an application
that does not include such provision.
This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any
riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by appropriation
or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of calculating annual consumptive quantity as defined
under RCW 90.03.380(1), if, within the most recent five-year period,
the water right has been in the trust water rights program under
chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW, or the water right has been in a water bank
under RCW 90.42.100, or partial nonuse of the water right is excused
from relinquishment under RCW 90.14.140, the department shall look to
the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use preceding
one of these three events.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---