BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
substantial inventory of unsold or foreclosed vacant homes on the
market that is driving property values down and destabilizing
neighborhoods. These homes also present an opportunity to provide
affordable homes to low-income families, addressing some of the unmet
need for affordable housing in the state of Washington. The
legislature also finds that providing targeted incentives to housing
developers will stimulate the sale of these vacant homes to low-income
buyers now and stabilize neighborhoods affected by this growing
inventory. The legislature intends to provide such incentives through
excise tax relief on sales of homes to low-income first-time home
buyers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A sale of a qualifying residential housing unit to a buyer
meeting the conditions and requirements of this section is exempt from
tax under this chapter.
(2) A buyer must acquire the qualifying residential housing unit
through a fixed-rate mortgage.
(3) The Washington state housing finance commission or a housing
counseling agency certified by the department of housing and urban
development must certify that the following conditions under this
subsection have been satisfied:
(a) The buyer and the buyer's spouse or domestic partner have not
owned a home during the three-year period prior to purchase of the
home;
(b) The buyer has completed a home buyer education seminar; and
(c) The buyer is part of a low-income household.
(4) When the amount of state real estate excise taxes exempted
under this section and section 3 of this act exceeds seven hundred
fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year, the department must contact
all county treasurers to notify them that the exemption authorized
under this section and section 3 of this act is disallowed for real
estate sales occurring on or after the first day of the second month
following the transmittal month to the state treasurer under RCW
82.45.180 where the seven hundred fifty thousand dollar limit was
determined by the department to be exceeded. The disallowance of the
exemption under this subsection applies for the remainder of the state
fiscal year unless the effective date of the disallowance occurs in the
following fiscal year, in which case this subsection does not apply.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "First-time home buyer" means an individual or his or her
spouse or domestic partner, who has not owned a home during the three-year period prior to purchase of a home.
(b) "Low-income household" means an individual and his or her
spouse or domestic partner, whose adjusted income is at or below eighty
percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for
the county where the project is located, and who is a first-time home
buyer.
(c) "Qualifying residential housing unit" means a new residential
housing unit or a residential housing unit that has been foreclosed and
is unoccupied due to the foreclosure.
(d) "Residential housing unit" or "unit" means a single-family
home, condominium, or townhome, and includes the land upon which the
home, condominium, or townhome is located.
(6) An exemption may not be claimed under this section for sales
occurring on or after January 1, 2013.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A sale to a qualifying organization where the organization
is exercising an option to repurchase the property is exempt from tax
under this chapter.
(b) A sale by a qualifying organization to a qualifying buyer is
exempt from tax under this chapter.
(2) When the amount of state real estate excise taxes exempted
under this section and section 2 of this act exceeds seven hundred
fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year, the department must contact
all county treasurers to notify them that the exemption authorized
under this section and section 2 of this act is disallowed for real
estate sales occurring on or after the first day of the second month
following the transmittal month to the state treasurer under RCW
82.45.180 where the seven hundred fifty thousand dollar limit was
determined by the department to be exceeded. The disallowance of the
exemption under this subsection applies for the remainder of the state
fiscal year unless the effective date of the disallowance occurs in the
following fiscal year, in which case this subsection does not apply.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Qualifying buyer" means a buyer meeting the requirements of
sections 2(2) and (3) of this act.
(b) "Qualifying organization" means a nonprofit organization that
is: (i) A tax exempt organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
of the federal internal revenue code; and (ii) primarily engaged in the
business of developing, building, or rehabilitating residential housing
units.
(4) An exemption may not be claimed under this section for sales
occurring on or after January 1, 2013.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The exemptions in sections 2 and 3 of this act do not apply to
taxes imposed under this chapter unless a city or county has adopted a
resolution or ordinance authorizing the exemptions for purposes of city
or county real estate excise taxes.

--- END ---