BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.330 and 2006 c 76 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall appoint a state interoperability executive
committee((,)).
(a) The membership of ((which)) the state interoperability
executive committee must include, but not be limited to((,)) the
following voting members:
(i) A representative((s)) of the military department((,));
(ii) A representative of the Washington state patrol((,));
(iii) A representative of the department of transportation((,));
(iv) A representative of the department of information
services((,));
(v) A representative of the department of natural resources((,));
(vi) A representative of city ((and county)) governments((,));
(vii) A representative of county governments;
(viii) A representative of a state ((and local)) fire ((chiefs,
police)) agency;
(ix) A representative of local fire chiefs((, and));
(x) A representative of local police;
(xi) A representative of sheriffs((, and state and local emergency
management directors));
(xii) A representative of the state emergency managers association;
(xiii) A representative of the state emergency management division;
and
(xiv) A tribal representative;
(b) The following persons shall be requested to participate as
nonvoting members of the state interoperability executive committee:
(i) A representative of a federal agency counterpart;
(ii) A representative of the state's urban area security initiative
region;
(iii) A representative of the association of public safety
communications officials national emergency number association chapter;
and
(iv) Four legislators.
(2) The legislative membership appointed under subsection (1) of
this section must consist of one member from each of the two largest
caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and
one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. The chair and legislative members of the board will
serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee. Voting
membership may not exceed fifteen members.
(((2))) (3) Legislative members of the state interoperability
executive committee shall not be reimbursed for travel expenses.
Nonlegislative members must seek reimbursement for travel and other
membership expenses through their respective agencies or organizations.
(4) The chair of the board shall appoint the chair or cochairs of
the committee from among the voting members of the committee.
(((3))) (5) The state interoperability executive committee has the
following responsibilities:
(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the board for
technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems,
including emergency communications systems. The standards must
address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking
into account both existing and future systems and technologies;
(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the board the licensing and
use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including
the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and
serve as the point of contact with the federal communications
commission on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of
radio spectrum;
(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio
communications system equipment to ensure that:
(i) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol
network, any new trunked system shall be, at a minimum, project-25;
(ii) Any new system that requires advanced digital features shall
be, at a minimum, project-25; and
(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum,
upgradeable to project-25;
(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for
state-sponsored wireless communications systems;
(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to
promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;
(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and
emergency response organizations;
(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to
ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response
wireless communications systems; and
(h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the board to
promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

--- END ---