BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.128.225 (Advisory committee) and 2007 c 40 s 1 & 2002 c
223 s 4;
(2) RCW 43.20A.680 (State council on aging established) and 1981 c
151 s 1;
(3) RCW 70.195.010 (Birth-to-six interagency coordinating council--Early intervention services -- Conditions and limitations) and 1998 c 245
s 125 & 1992 c 198 s 15;
(4) RCW 18.20.260 (Advisory board) and 2000 c 47 s 8;
(5) RCW 43.121.020 (Council established -- Members, chairperson--Appointment, qualifications, terms, vacancies) and 2008 c 152 s 7, 2007
c 144 s 1, 1996 c 10 s 1, 1994 c 48 s 1, 1989 c 304 s 4, 1987 c 351 s
3, 1984 c 261 s 1, & 1982 c 4 s 2;
(6) RCW 74.13.031 (Duties of department -- Child welfare services--Children's services advisory committee) and 2008 c 267 s 6 & 2007 c 413
s 10;
(7) RCW 43.330.210 (Developmental disabilities endowment -- Governing
board -- Liability of governing board and state investment board) and
2000 c 120 s 5 & 1999 c 384 s 4;
(8) RCW 70.198.020 (Advisory council -- Membership) and 2004 c 47 s
2;
(9) RCW 72.23.025 (Eastern and western state hospital boards
established -- Primary diagnosis of mental disorder -- Duties -- Institutes
for the study and treatment of mental disorders established) and 2006
c 333 s 204, 1998 c 245 s 141, 1992 c 230 s 1, & 1989 c 205 s 21;
(10) RCW 70.190.005 (Purpose) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 301 & 1992 c 198
s 1;
(11) RCW 70.190.010 (Definitions) and 1996 c 132 s 2, 1995 c 399 s
200, & 1992 c 198 s 3;
(12) RCW 70.190.020 (Consolidate efforts of existing entities) and
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 315 & 1992 c 198 s 4;
(13) RCW 70.190.030 (Proposals to facilitate services at the
community level) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 316 & 1992 c 198 s 5;
(14) RCW 70.190.040 (Finding -- Grants to improve readiness to learn)
and 1993 c 336 s 901;
(15) RCW 70.190.050 (Community networks -- Outcome evaluation) and
1998 c 245 s 122 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 207;
(16) RCW 70.190.060 (Community networks -- Legislative intent--Membership -- Open meetings) and 2005 c 274 s 345, 1998 c 314 s 12, 1996
c 132 s 3, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 303;
(17) RCW 70.190.065 (Member's authorization of expenditures--Limitation) and 1996 c 132 s 5;
(18) RCW 70.190.070 (Community networks -- Duties) and 1994 sp.s. c
7 s 304;
(19) RCW 70.190.075 (Lead fiscal agent) and 1996 c 132 s 4;
(20) RCW 70.190.080 (Community networks -- Programs and plans) and
1996 c 132 s 6 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 305;
(21) RCW 70.190.085 (Community networks -- Sexual abstinence and
activity campaign) and 1994 c 299 s 5;
(22) RCW 70.190.090 (Community networks -- Planning grants and
contracts -- Distribution of funds -- Reports) and 1999 c 309 s 918, 1996
c 132 s 7, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 306;
(23) RCW 70.190.100 (Duties of council) and 1998 c 245 s 123 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 307;
(24) RCW 70.190.110 (Program review) and 1998 c 245 s 124 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 308;
(25) RCW 70.190.120 (Interagency agreement) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s
309;
(26) RCW 70.190.130 (Comprehensive plan -- Approval process -- Network
expenditures -- Penalty for noncompliance with chapter) and 1998 c 314 s
13, 1996 c 132 s 8, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 310;
(27) RCW 70.190.150 (Federal restrictions on funds transfers,
waivers) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 312;
(28) RCW 70.190.160 (Community networks -- Implementation in federal
and state plans) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 314;
(29) RCW 70.190.170 (Transfer of funds and programs to state
agency) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 320;
(30) RCW 70.190.180 (Community network -- Grants for use of school
facilities) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 604;
(31) RCW 70.190.190 (Network members immune from civil liability--Network assets not subject to attachment or execution) and 1996 c 132
s 9;
(32) RCW 70.190.910 (Severability -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s 20;
(33) RCW 70.190.920 (Effective date -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s
21; and
(34) RCW 13.24.011 (Execution of compact) and 2003 c 180 s 1.

PART II
GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.185B.020 (Affordable housing advisory board -- Generally)
and 2003 c 40 s 1 & 1993 c 478 s 5;
(2) RCW 43.113.010 (Commission created) and 1992 c 96 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.03.028 (State committee on agency officials' salaries--Members -- Duties -- Reports) and 2007 c 241 s 3, 2001 c 302 s 2, & 1995 c
67 s 1;
(4) RCW 43.63A.760 (Airport impact mitigation account -- Creation--Report) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 928;
(5) RCW 43.117.030 (Commission established) and 1995 c 67 s 4 &
1974 ex.s. c 140 s 3;
(6) RCW 36.93.051 (Appointment of board -- Members -- Terms--Qualifications) and 1991 c 363 s 93 & 1989 c 84 s 17;
(7) RCW 19.27.070 (State building code council -- Established--Membership -- Travel expenses -- Administrative, clerical assistance) and
1995 c 399 s 8, 1989 c 246 s 2, 1987 c 505 s 7, 1985 c 360 s 11, 1984
c 287 s 55, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 59, & 1974 ex.s. c 96 s 7;
(8) RCW 39.10.220 (Board -- Membership -- Vacancies) and 2007 c 494 s
102 & 2005 c 377 s 1;
(9) RCW 43.34.080 (Capitol campus design advisory committee--Generally) and 1990 c 93 s 1;
(10) RCW 43.34.010 (Composition of committee) and 1997 c 279 s 1,
1979 ex.s. c 57 s 10, & 1965 c 8 s 43.34.010;
(11) RCW 27.48.040 (Capitol furnishings preservation committee--Capitol furnishings preservation committee account) and 1999 c 343 s 2;
(12) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings boards) and 1994 c
249 s 29 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;
(13) RCW 43.31.504 (Child care facility fund committee -- Generally)
and 1993 c 280 s 45 & 1989 c 430 s 4;
(14) RCW 43.63A.068 (Advisory committee on policies and programs
for children and families with incarcerated parents -- Funding for
programs and services) and 2007 c 384 s 6;
(15) RCW 43.136.035 (Citizen commission for performance measurement
of tax preferences) and 2006 c 197 s 3;
(16) RCW 43.03.305 (Washington citizens' commission on salaries for
elected officials -- Generally) and 2008 c 6 s 204, 1999 c 102 s 1, 1995
c 3 s 1, 1993 c 281 s 46, & 1986 c 155 s 2;
(17) RCW 41.04.033 (Operation of the Washington state combined fund
drive -- Committee -- Rules) and 2003 c 205 s 1 & 2002 c 61 s 4;
(18) RCW 43.160.030 (Community economic revitalization board--Members -- Terms -- Chair, vice-chair -- Management services -- Travel
expenses -- Vacancies -- Removal) and 2008 c 327 s 3, 2004 c 252 s 2, 2003
c 151 s 1, 1996 c 51 s 3, 1995 c 399 s 86, & 1993 c 320 s 2;
(19) RCW 72.78.030 (Pilot program established -- Participation
standards -- Selection criteria -- Advisory committee) and 2007 c 483 s
103;
(20) RCW 67.40.020 (State convention and trade center -- Public
nonprofit corporation authorized -- Board of directors -- Powers and
duties) and 1995 c 386 s 12, 1993 c 500 s 9, 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 1, 1987
1st ex.s. c 8 s 2, 1984 c 210 s 1, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 2, & 1982 c 34
s 2;
(21) RCW 43.105.055 (Advisory committees -- Customer advisory board)
and 1999 c 80 s 7 & 1987 c 504 s 9;
(22) RCW 82.33.010 (Economic and revenue forecast council--Oversight and approval of economic and revenue forecasts) and 1990 c
229 s 1 & 1984 c 138 s 4;
(23) RCW 43.162.010 (Washington state economic development
commission -- Membership -- Rules) and 2007 c 232 s 2 & 2003 c 235 s 2;
(24) RCW 43.163.020 (Economic development finance authority
created -- Membership) and 1995 c 399 s 89, 1990 c 53 s 2, & 1989 c 279
s 3;
(25) RCW 29A.04.510 (Election administration and certification
board -- Generally) and 2003 c 111 s 149 & 1992 c 163 s 3;
(26) RCW 38.52.040 (Emergency management council -- Members -- Ad hoc
committees -- Function as state emergency response commission -- Rules
review) and 1995 c 269 s 1202, 1988 c 81 s 18, 1984 c 38 s 5, 1979
ex.s. c 57 s 8, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 82, 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 6, &
1951 c 178 s 5;
(27) RCW 41.50.086 (Employee retirement benefits board -- Created--Membership) and 2001 c 181 s 1, 1998 c 341 s 506, & 1995 c 239 s 301;
(28) RCW 80.50.030 (Energy facility site evaluation council--Created -- Membership -- Support) and 2001 c 214 s 4 & 1996 c 186 s 108;
(29) RCW 38.52.530 (Enhanced 911 advisory committee) and 2006 c 210
s 1, 2002 c 341 s 3, 2000 c 34 s 1, 1997 c 49 s 7, & 1991 c 54 s 5;
(30) RCW 18.44.500 (Escrow commission -- Members -- Terms -- Compensation
and travel expenses) and 1995 c 238 s 3, 1985 c 340 s 3, & 1984 c 287
s 36;
(31) RCW 43.33.010 (Composition of committee) and 1965 c 8 s
43.33.010;
(32) RCW 43.33.030 (Records -- Administrative and clerical
assistance) and 1981 c 3 s 24 & 1965 c 8 s 43.33.030;
(33) RCW 43.33.040 (Rules and regulations -- Chairman) and 1965 c 8
s 43.33.040;
(34) RCW 43.33.130 (Reports of debt management activities) and 1998
c 245 s 63, 1981 c 3 s 25, & 1977 ex.s. c 251 s 10;
(35) RCW 39.42.010 (Scope of application) and 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 1;
(36) RCW 39.42.020 (Evidences of indebtedness -- Issuance -- Signature)
and 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 2;
(37) RCW 39.42.030 (Evidences of indebtedness -- Issuance -- State
finance committee, duties and powers) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 14 s 16,
1983 c 167 s 104, & 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 3;
(38) RCW 39.42.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds) and
1971 ex.s. c 184 s 4;
(39) RCW 39.42.050 (Anticipation notes -- Issued, when -- Payment of
principal and interest) and 1981 c 29 s 1 & 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 5;
(40) RCW 39.42.060 (Limitation on issuance of evidences of
indebtedness -- Annual computation of amount required to pay on
outstanding debt) and 2008 c 179 s 301, 2003 c 147 s 13, 2002 c 240 s
7, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 18, 1999 c 273 s 9, 1997 c 220 s 220, & 1993 c
52 s 1;
(41) RCW 39.42.070 (Computation of general state revenues -- Filing
of certificate -- Estimate of debt capacity) and 2007 c 215 s 2, 2003 1st
sp.s. c 9 s 1, 2002 c 240 s 8, & 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 7;
(42) RCW 39.42.080 (Obligations allowable under debt limitation)
and 1974 ex.s. c 111 s 1 & 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 8;
(43) RCW 39.42.090 (Certificates of indebtedness -- Issued, when--Retirement) and 2007 c 215 s 3, 1985 c 57 s 21, & 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 9;
(44) RCW 39.42.100 (Evidences of indebtedness -- Defects not to
affect validity -- Copy of resolution authorizing issuance filed -- Action
to contest before delivery) and 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 10;
(45) RCW 39.42.110 (Evidences of indebtedness -- As negotiable
instruments, legal investments, and security for deposits) and 1971
ex.s. c 184 s 11;
(46) RCW 39.42.120 (Excess earnings account -- Payments to United
States treasury) and 1988 c 92 s 1;
(47) RCW 39.42.900 (Effective date -- 1971 ex.s. c 184) and 1971
ex.s. c 184 s 12;
(48) RCW 9.46.040 (Gambling commission -- Members -- Appointment--Vacancies, filling) and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 12, 1974 ex.s. c 135 s 12,
& 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 4;
(49) RCW 43.31.425 (Hanford area economic investment fund
committee) and 1998 c 76 s 2 & 1991 c 272 s 20;
(50) RCW 70.37.030 (Washington health care facilities authority
established -- Members -- Chairman -- Terms -- Quorum -- Vacancies -- Compensation
and travel expenses) and 2002 c 91 s 1, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 261, 1984
c 287 s 103, 1983 c 210 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 157, & 1974
ex.s. c 147 s 3;
(51) RCW 43.115.020 (Commission created) and 1987 c 249 s 2 & 1971
ex.s. c 34 s 2;
(52) RCW 79A.30.030 (Washington state horse park authority--Formation -- Powers -- Articles of incorporation -- Board) and 2000 c 11 s 85
& 1995 c 200 s 4;
(53) RCW 67.16.012 (Washington horse racing commission -- Creation--Terms -- Vacancies -- Bonds -- Oaths) and 1998 c 345 s 4, 1987 c 453 s 2,
1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 233 s 1, & 1933 c 55 s 2;
(54) RCW 43.330.090 (Economic diversification strategies -- Targeted
industry clusters -- Film and video production -- Industry cluster advisory
committee) and 2007 c 228 s 201, 2006 c 105 s 1, 2005 c 136 s 14, 2003
c 153 s 2, 1998 c 245 s 85, 1994 c 144 s 1, & 1993 c 280 s 12;
(55) RCW 43.105.032 (Information services board -- Members--Chairperson -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Compensation and travel expenses) and
2007 c 158 s 1, 1999 c 241 s 2, 1996 c 137 s 10, 1992 c 20 s 8, 1987 c
504 s 4, 1984 c 287 s 86, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 128, & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 219 s 5;
(56) RCW 48.32.040 (Creation of the association -- Required accounts)
and 2005 c 100 s 4, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 4, & 1971 ex.s. c 265 s
4;
(57) RCW 43.33A.020 (Board created -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies--Removal) and 2002 c 303 s 1, 1985 c 195 s 1, 1981 c 219 s 1, & 1981 c
3 s 2;
(58) RCW 43.105.800 (K-20 educational network board) and 1999 c 285
s 2;
(59) RCW 41.26.715 (Board of trustees -- Created -- Selection of
trustees -- Terms of office -- Vacancies) and 2007 c 303 s 1 & 2003 c 2 s
4;
(60) RCW 48.32A.055 (Creation of the association) and 2001 c 50 s
6;
(61) RCW 66.08.012 (Creation of board -- Chairman -- Quorum -- Salary)
and 1961 c 307 s 7, 1949 c 5 s 8, 1945 c 208 s 1, 1937 c 225 s 1, &
1933 ex.s. c 62 s 63;
(62) RCW 67.70.030 (State lottery commission created -- Membership--Terms -- Vacancies -- Chairman -- Quorum) and 1982 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 3;
(63) RCW 48.87.040 (Composition of association) and 2002 c 300 s 2
& 1993 c 112 s 4;
(64) RCW 19.146.280 (Mortgage broker commission -- Code of conduct--Complaint review) and 2006 c 19 s 17, 2001 c 177 s 6, 1997 c 106 s 20,
1994 c 33 s 26, & 1993 c 468 s 21;
(65) RCW 43.110.010 (Council created -- Membership -- Terms -- Travel
expenses) and 2001 c 290 s 1, 1997 c 437 s 1, 1990 c 104 s 1, 1983 c 22
s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 129, 1975 1st ex.s. c 218 s 1, & 1969 c
108 s 2;
(66) RCW 43.52A.010 (State agreement to participate in Pacific
Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council) and 1981 c
14 s 1;
(67) RCW 43.43.850 (Organized crime intelligence unit -- Created) and
1973 1st ex.s. c 202 s 1;
(68) RCW 13.60.120 (Task force on missing and exploited children--Advisory board) and 1999 c 168 s 3;
(69) RCW 41.04.276 (Select committee on pension policy -- Creation--Membership -- Terms of office -- Staff support) and 2005 c 24 s 1 & 2003 c
295 s 1;
(70) RCW 43.09.435 (Performance audits -- Citizen advisory board) and
2005 c 385 s 3;
(71) RCW 41.06.110 (Washington personnel resources board -- Created--Term -- Qualifications, conditions -- Compensation, travel expenses--Officers, quorum, records) and 2002 c 354 s 210, 1993 c 281 s 25, 1984
c 287 s 69, & 1982 c 10 s 8;
(72) RCW 81.88.140 (Citizens committee on pipeline safety -- Duties--Membership) and 2001 c 238 s 11 & 2000 c 191 s 14;
(73) RCW 48.62.041 (Property and liability advisory board--Creation -- Membership -- Duties) and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 4;
(74) RCW 39.58.030 (Public deposit protection commission -- State
finance committee constitutes -- Proceedings) and 1983 c 66 s 6 & 1969
ex.s. c 193 s 3;
(75) RCW 42.17.350 (Public disclosure commission -- Established--Membership -- Prohibited activities -- Compensation, travel expenses) and
1998 c 30 s 1, 1984 c 287 s 74, 1982 c 147 s 15, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
112 s 8, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 93, 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 23, &
1973 c 1 s 35;
(76) RCW 41.58.010 (Public employment relations commission--Created -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Report) and 1981 c 338
s 21 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 1;
(77) RCW 36.100.020 (Governance -- Board of directors) and 1995 3rd
sp.s. c 1 s 302, 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 2, 1995 c 396 s 2, 1989 1st
ex.s. c 8 s 2, & 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 12;
(78) RCW 42.56.140 (Public records exemptions accountability
committee) and 2007 c 198 s 2;
(79) RCW 43.155.030 (Public works board created) and 1999 c 153 s
58 & 1985 c 446 s 9;
(80) RCW 44.05.030 (Redistricting commission -- Membership--Chairperson -- Vacancies) and 1984 c 13 s 1 & 1983 c 16 s 3;
(81) RCW 21.20.550 (State advisory committee -- Composition,
appointment, qualifications) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 171 s 3 & 1959 c 282
s 55;
(82) RCW 21.20.560 (State advisory committee -- Chairperson,
secretary -- Meetings) and 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 39, 1973 1st ex.s. c 171 s
4, & 1959 c 282 s 56;
(83) RCW 21.20.570 (State advisory committee -- Terms -- Vacancies) and
1959 c 282 s 57;
(84) RCW 21.20.580 (State advisory committee -- Duties) and 1981 c
272 s 10, 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 40, & 1959 c 282 s 58;
(85) RCW 21.20.590 (State advisory committee -- Reimbursement of
travel expenses) and 1981 c 272 s 11, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 65, &
1959 c 282 s 59;
(86) RCW 43.210.020 (Small business export finance assistance
center authorized -- Purposes) and 1998 c 109 s 1, 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s
66, 1985 c 231 s 2, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 20 s 2;
(87) RCW 82.03.010 (Board created) and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 30;
(88) RCW 43.336.020 (Commission created -- Composition -- Terms--Executive director -- Rule-making authority) and 2007 c 228 s 102;
(89) RCW 43.56.010 (Appointment of commissioners) and 1965 c 8 s
43.56.010;
(90) RCW 48.22.070 (Longshoreman's and harbor worker's compensation
coverage -- Rules -- Plan creation) and 1997 c 110 s 1, 1993 c 177 s 1, &
1992 c 209 s 2;
(91) RCW 80.01.010 (Commission created -- Appointment of members--Terms -- Vacancies -- Removal -- Salary) and 2006 c 346 s 1, 1961 c 307 s 4,
& 1961 c 14 s 80.01.010;
(92) RCW 74.32.100 (Advisory committee on vendor rates -- Created--Members -- Chairman) and 1971 ex.s. c 87 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 203 s 1;
(93) RCW 41.24.060 (Board of trustees -- How constituted) and 1999 c
148 s 6, 1981 c 213 s 7, 1945 c 261 s 6, & 1943 c 137 s 2; and
(94) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings boards) and 1994 c
249 s 29 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5.

PART III
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.108.030 (Advisory committee) and 1991 c 228 s 11 & 1990
c 287 s 4;
(2) RCW 28B.50.1404 (Bates Technical College board of trustees) and
1991 c 238 s 27;
(3) RCW 28B.50.100 (Boards of trustees -- Generally) and 1991 c 238
s 37, 1987 c 330 s 1001, 1983 c 224 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 1, 1977
ex.s. c 282 s 2, 1973 c 62 s 17, 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 22, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28B.50.100;
(4) RCW 28B.50.1403 (Bellingham Technical College board of
trustees) and 1991 c 238 s 26;
(5) RCW 28B.50.1406 (Cascadia Community College board of trustees)
and 1994 c 217 s 4;
(6) RCW 28B.35.100 (Trustees -- Appointment -- Terms -- Quorum--Vacancies) and 2006 c 78 s 3, 1998 c 95 s 3, 1985 c 137 s 1, 1979 ex.s.
c 103 s 4, & 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 45;
(7) RCW 28B.50.1405 (Clover Park Technical College board of
trustees) and 1991 c 238 s 28;
(8) RCW 28B.50.010 (Short title) and 1991 c 238 s 20 & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28B.50.010;
(9) RCW 28B.95.020 (Definitions) and 2007 c 405 s 8, 2005 c 272 s
1, 2004 c 275 s 59, 2001 c 184 s 1, 2000 c 14 s 1, & 1997 c 289 s 2;
(10) RCW 28B.50.050 (State board for community and technical
colleges) and 1991 c 238 s 30, 1988 c 76 s 1, 1984 c 287 s 64, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 30 s 9, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 74, 1973 c 62 s 13, 1969
ex.s. c 261 s 19, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.050;
(11) RCW 28B.04.085 (Displaced homemaker program advisory
committee) and 2004 c 275 s 32 & 1987 c 230 s 2;
(12) RCW 28B.40.100 (Trustees -- Appointment -- Terms -- Quorum--Vacancies) and 2006 c 78 s 4, 1998 c 95 s 4, 1985 c 137 s 2, 1979 ex.s.
c 103 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 65, 1973 c 62 s 11, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28B.40.100;
(13) RCW 28B.116.040 (Foster care endowed scholarship advisory
board) and 2005 c 215 s 5;
(14) RCW 28B.115.050 (Planning committee -- Criteria for selecting
participants) and 2004 c 275 s 70, 1991 c 332 s 18, & 1989 1st ex.s. c
9 s 719;
(15) RCW 28B.76.010 (Board created) and 1985 c 370 s 1;
(16) RCW 28B.76.100 (Advisory council) and 2007 c 458 s 103, 2004
c 275 s 2, & 1985 c 370 s 9;
(17) RCW 28B.76.280 (Data collection and research -- Research
advisory group -- Privacy protection) and 2004 c 275 s 12;
(18) RCW 28B.12.040 (Board to develop and administer program--Agreements authorized, limitation -- Work study advisory committee) and
1994 c 130 s 4, 1993 c 385 s 3, 1985 c 370 s 58, & 1974 ex.s. c 177 s
4;
(19) RCW 43.105.810 (K-20 network technical steering committee) and
1999 c 285 s 6;
(20) RCW 43.30.820 (Olympic natural resources center--Administration) and 1991 c 316 s 3;
(21) RCW 28B.50.140 (Boards of trustees -- Powers and duties) and
2005 c 258 s 9, 2004 c 275 s 58, & 1997 c 281 s 1;
(22) RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee--Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160
s 4;
(23) RCW 28B.50.1402 (Renton Technical College board of trustees)
and 1991 c 238 s 25;
(24) RCW 28A.600.130 (Washington scholars' program -- Planning
committee -- Composition -- Duties) and 2006 c 263 s 916, 1995 1st sp.s. c
5 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 500, 1985 c 370 s 33, & 1981 c 54 s 4;
(25) RCW 28B.50.040 (College districts enumerated) and 1994 c 217
s 2, 1991 c 238 s 23, 1988 c 77 s 1, 1981 c 72 s 1, 1973 1st ex.s. c 46
s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.040;
(26) RCW 28B.38.010 (Spokane intercollegiate research and
technology institute) and 2004 c 275 s 55 & 1998 c 344 s 9;
(27) RCW 28B.20.100 (Regents -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies--Quorum) and 2006 c 78 s 1, 1998 c 95 s 1, 1985 c 61 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c
103 s 2, 1973 c 62 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.100;
(28) RCW 28B.30.100 (Regents -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies--Quorum -- Bond) and 2006 c 78 s 2, 1998 c 95 s 2, 1985 c 61 s 2, 1979
ex.s. c 103 s 3, 1973 c 62 s 10, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.100;
(29) RCW 28B.35.100 (Trustees -- Appointment -- Terms -- Quorum--Vacancies) and 2006 c 78 s 3, 1998 c 95 s 3, 1985 c 137 s 1, 1979 ex.s.
c 103 s 4, & 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 45; and
(30) RCW 28B.12.040 (Board to develop and administer program--Agreements authorized, limitation -- Work study advisory committee) and
1994 c 130 s 4, 1993 c 385 s 3, 1985 c 370 s 58, & 1974 ex.s. c 177 s
4.

PART IV
BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.04.035 (Board of accountancy -- Members -- Terms--Vacancies -- Removal) and 2004 c 159 s 1, 2001 c 294 s 3, 1992 c 103 s 3,
1986 c 295 s 2, & 1983 c 234 s 4;
(2) RCW 18.08.330 (Board of registration -- Appointment, terms,
vacancies, removal -- Officers -- Travel expenses) and 1985 c 37 s 4;
(3) RCW 18.250.030 (Athletic training advisory committee) and 2007
c 253 s 4;
(4) RCW 70.79.010 (Board of boiler rules -- Members -- Terms -- Meetings)
and 1999 c 183 s 1 & 1951 c 32 s 1;
(5) RCW 68.05.040 (Cemetery board created -- Appointments -- Terms) and
2005 c 365 s 48, 1987 c 331 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 351 s 1, & 1953 c 290 s
31;
(6) RCW 19.16.280 (Board created -- Composition of board--Qualification of members) and 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 19;
(7) RCW 18.16.050 (Advisory board -- Members -- Compensation) and 2008
c 20 s 3 & 2002 c 111 s 4;
(8) RCW 18.30.050 (Board of denturists -- Members, terms, travel
expenses, removal) and 2002 c 160 s 4 & 1995 c 1 s 6;
(9) RCW 18.43.030 (Board of registration -- Members -- Terms--Qualifications -- Compensation and travel expenses) and 1986 c 102 s 1,
1984 c 287 s 35, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 37, & 1947 c 283 s 3;
(10) RCW 18.39.173 (Board of funeral directors and embalmers--Established -- Membership -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Terms--Vacancies -- Officers -- Quorum) and 2005 c 365 s 13 & 1977 ex.s. c 93 s 8;
(11) RCW 18.220.030 (Geologist licensing board) and 2000 c 253 s 4;
(12) RCW 18.280.040 (Home inspector advisory licensing board) and
2008 c 119 s 4;
(13) RCW 18.96.040 (Board of registration for landscape
architects -- Created -- Members -- Qualifications) and 1993 c 35 s 1, 1985
c 18 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 4;
(14) RCW 18.210.040 (Advisory committee) and 1999 c 263 s 5;
(15) RCW 18.140.230 (Real estate appraiser commission--Establishment -- Composition) and 2005 c 339 s 19 & 2000 c 249 s 3; and
(16) RCW 18.85.071 (Real estate commission created -- Qualifications,
terms, appointment of members -- Vacancies) and 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 6 &
1953 c 235 s 17.

PART V
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.94.650 (Burning permits for weed abatement, fire
fighting instruction, or agriculture activities -- Issuance -- Agricultural
burning practices and research task force -- Exemption for aircraft crash
fire rescue training activities) and 1998 c 43 s 1;
(2) RCW 15.60.010 (Apiary advisory committee) and 2000 c 100 s 2,
1994 c 178 s 3, 1993 c 89 s 3, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 16, & 1961 c
11 s 15.60.010;
(3) RCW 15.24.020 (Commission created -- Generally) and 2004 c 178 s
2, 2002 c 313 s 116, 1989 c 354 s 54, 1967 c 240 s 23, 1963 c 145 s 2,
& 1961 c 11 s 15.24.020;
(4) RCW 16.67.040 (Beef commission created -- Generally) and 2003 c
396 s 33, 2000 c 146 s 1, 1997 c 363 s 1, 1993 c 40 s 1, 1991 c 9 s 1,
& 1969 c 133 s 3;
(5) RCW 15.89.030 (Washington beer commission created -- Composition)
and 2006 c 330 s 4;
(6) RCW 43.97.015 (Columbia River Gorge Compact -- Columbia River
Gorge commission) and 1987 c 499 s 1;
(7) RCW 76.15.080 (Technical advisory committee) and 2008 c 299 s
5;
(8) RCW 89.08.030 (Conservation commission) and 1987 c 180 s 1,
1983 c 248 s 13, 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 4, 1967 c 217 s 1, 1961 c 240
s 3, & 1955 c 304 s 3;
(9) RCW 15.44.015 (Regulating dairy products -- Commission created--Existing comprehensive scheme -- Laws applicable) and 2002 c 313 s 87;
(10) RCW 43.21L.040 (Environmental and land use hearings board) and
2003 c 393 s 5;
(11) RCW 15.76.170 (Fairs commission -- Creation, terms,
compensation, powers and duties) and 1984 c 287 s 18, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 34 s 21, 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 11, & 1961 c 61 s 8;
(12) RCW 89.10.020 (Farmland preservation task force) and 2007 c
352 s 3;
(13) RCW 79A.25.220 (Firearms range advisory committee) and 2007 c
241 s 55, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 71, & 1990 c 195 s 3;
(14) RCW 77.04.030 (Commission -- Appointment) and 2001 c 155 s 1,
2000 c 107 s 203, 1994 c 264 s 52, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 60, 1987 c 506 s 5,
1981 c 338 s 11, 1980 c 78 s 4, & 1955 c 36 s 77.04.030;
(15) RCW 77.04.040 (Commission -- Qualifications of members) and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 61, 1987 c 506 s 6, 1980 c 78 s 5,
& 1955 c 36 s 77.04.040;
(16) RCW 77.04.055 (Commission -- Duties) and 2000 c 107 s 204, 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 4, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 62, 1990 c 84 s 2, & 1987 c 506 s
7;
(17) RCW 77.04.060 (Commission -- Meetings -- Officers -- Compensation,
travel expenses) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 63;
(18) RCW 77.04.090 (Rule-making authority -- Certified copy as
evidence) and 1996 c 267 s 35, 1995 c 403 s 111, 1984 c 240 s 1, 1980
c 78 s 16, & 1955 c 36 s 77.12.050;
(19) RCW 77.04.130 (Adoption and certification of rules) and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 12, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 16, 1973 c 93 s 1, & 1955 c
12 s 75.08.090;
(20) RCW 77.04.150 (Hunters and fishers with disabilities -- Advisory
committee -- Composition -- Terms -- Pilot project -- Report to the
legislature) and 2008 c 294 s 1, 2005 c 149 s 1, & 2001 c 312 s 1;
(21) RCW 77.75.040 (Pacific Marine Fisheries Compact--
Representatives of state on Pacific Marine Fisheries Commission) and
1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 20, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 152, 1963 c 171 s 2, &
1955 c 12 s 75.40.040;
(22) RCW 76.09.210 (Forest practices appeals board -- Created--Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Removal) and 1979 ex.s. c 47 s 4 & 1974
ex.s. c 137 s 21;
(23) RCW 76.09.030 (Forest practices board -- Created -- Membership--Terms -- Vacancies -- Meetings -- Compensation, travel expenses -- Staff) and
2008 c 46 s 1, 2003 c 39 s 32, 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 1001, 1995 c 399 s 207,
1993 c 257 s 1, 1987 c 330 s 1301, 1985 c 466 s 70, 1984 c 287 s 108,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 173, 1975 1st ex.s. c 200 s 1, & 1974 ex.s.
c 137 s 3;
(24) RCW 15.100.030 (Washington forest products commission--Created -- Membership -- Quorum -- Terms) and 2002 c 251 s 2 & 2001 c 314 s
3;
(25) RCW 15.28.015 (Regulating soft tree fruits -- Commission
created -- Existing comprehensive scheme -- Applicable laws) and 2002 c 313
s 103;
(26) RCW 43.126.025 (State board on geographic names created--Membership -- Chairman) and 1983 c 273 s 2;
(27) RCW 15.74.010 (Commission created) and 1990 c 142 s 2;
(28) RCW 70.105E.090 (Advisory board -- Public involvement -- Funding)
and 2005 c 1 s 9;
(29) RCW 15.62.030 (Commission established by referendum) and 1989
c 5 s 3;
(30) RCW 77.55.301 (Hydraulic appeals board -- Members--Jurisdiction -- Procedures) and 2005 c 146 s 801, 2003 c 393 s 21, 2000
c 107 s 20, 1996 c 276 s 2, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 37, 1989 c 175 s 160, 1988
c 272 s 3, 1988 c 36 s 37, & 1986 c 173 s 4;
(31) RCW 79A.25.310 (Washington invasive species council -- Created)
and 2007 c 241 s 61 & 2006 c 152 s 2;
(32) RCW 79.19.070 (Land bank technical advisory committee) and
1984 c 222 s 7;
(33) RCW 16.57.015 (Livestock identification advisory board -- Rule
review -- Fee setting) and 2003 c 326 s 3 & 1993 c 354 s 10;
(34) RCW 77.12.690 (Migratory waterfowl art committee -- Duties--Deposit and use of funds -- Audits) and 1998 c 245 s 158, 1998 c 191 s
33, 1987 c 506 s 55, & 1985 c 243 s 6;
(35) RCW 70.105D.030 (Department's powers and duties) and 2007 c
446 s 1, 2007 c 225 s 1, 2007 c 104 s 19, 2002 c 288 s 3, 2001 c 291 s
401, 1997 c 406 s 3, & 1995 c 70 s 2;
(36) RCW 77.85.250 (Findings -- Forum on monitoring salmon recovery
and watershed health -- Creation -- Duties -- Report to the governor and
legislature) and 2007 c 444 s 8;
(37) RCW 79.70.070 (Natural heritage advisory council) and 2007 c
241 s 24, 1998 c 50 s 1, 1994 c 264 s 62, 1988 c 36 s 55, & 1981 c 189
s 4;
(38) RCW 43.30.205 (Board of natural resources -- Composition) and
2003 c 334 s 104, 1986 c 227 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 57 s 9, & 1965 c 8 s
43.30.040;
(39) RCW 43.145.010 (Compact) and 1981 c 124 s 1;
(40) RCW 43.145.020 (Requirements of Washington representative to
Northwest low-level waste compact committee) and 1990 c 21 s 5 & 1981
c 124 s 2;
(41) RCW 17.10.030 (State noxious weed control board -- Members--Terms -- Elections -- Meetings -- Reimbursement for travel expenses) and 1997
c 353 s 4, 1987 c 438 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 23, & 1969 ex.s.
c 113 s 3;
(42) RCW 70.149.040 (Duties of director) and 2007 c 240 s 1, 2004
c 203 s 1, 1997 c 8 s 1, & 1995 c 20 s 4;
(43) RCW 90.56.120 (Oil spill advisory council--Meetings--Travel
expenses and compensation) and 2006 c 372 s 907 & 2005 c 304 s 2;
(44) RCW 79A.05.015 (Commission created -- Composition -- Compensation
and expenses) and 1999 c 249 s 201, 1984 c 287 s 82, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s.
c 34 s 116, 1969 ex.s. c 31 s 1, 1965 ex.s. c 132 s 1, & 1965 c 8 s
43.51.020;
(45) RCW 79A.75.010 (Centennial advisory committee -- Established--Composition) and 2004 c 14 s 2;
(46) RCW 17.21.230 (Pesticide advisory board) and 1994 c 283 s 26,
1989 c 380 s 54, 1988 c 36 s 8, 1974 ex.s. c 20 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 191
s 8, 1967 c 177 s 14, & 1961 c 249 s 23;
(47) RCW 15.92.090 (Commission on pesticide registration--Established -- Composition -- Duration of membership -- Compensation) and
1999 c 247 s 1 & 1995 c 390 s 1;
(48) RCW 43.21B.010 (Pollution control hearings board created--Purpose) and 1979 ex.s. c 47 s 3 & 1970 ex.s. c 62 s 31;
(49) RCW 90.71.250 (Ecosystem coordination board -- Membership--Duties) and 2007 c 341 s 7;
(50) RCW 79A.25.110 (Recreation and conservation funding board--Created -- Membership -- Terms -- Compensation and travel expenses) and 2007
c 241 s 47, 1994 c 264 s 31, 1988 c 36 s 21, 1985 c 77 s 1, & 1984 c
287 s 84;
(51) RCW 77.95.120 (Regional fisheries enhancement group advisory
board -- Duties and authority) and 2000 c 107 s 109, 1998 c 96 s 1, &
1995 c 367 s 6;
(52) RCW 77.85.200 (Salmon and steelhead recovery program--Management board -- Duties -- Termination of program) and 2005 c 308 s 1,
2001 c 135 s 1, 2000 c 107 s 121, & 1998 c 60 s 2;
(53) RCW 77.85.110 (Salmon recovery funding board -- Creation--Membership) and 2007 c 241 s 20 & 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 3;
(54) RCW 15.49.111 (Arbitration committee -- Creation -- Generally) and
1989 c 354 s 81;
(55) RCW 90.58.170 (Shorelines hearings board -- Established--Members -- Chairman -- Quorum for decision -- Expenses of members) and 1994
c 253 s 1, 1988 c 128 s 76, 1979 ex.s. c 47 s 6, & 1971 ex.s. c 286 s
17;
(56) RCW 76.13.110 (Small forest landowner office -- Establishment--Duties -- Advisory committee -- Report to the legislature) and 2002 c 120
s 1, 2001 c 280 s 1, 2000 c 11 s 12, & 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 503;
(57) RCW 70.95.040 (Solid waste advisory committee -- Members--Meetings -- Travel expenses -- "Governor's award of excellence.") and 1991
c 319 s 401, 1987 c 115 s 1, 1982 c 108 s 1, & 1977 c 10 s 1;
(58) RCW 58.24.020 (Official agency designated -- Advisory board) and
1987 c 466 s 5, 1982 c 165 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 152, & 1951
c 224 s 3;
(59) RCW 18.104.190 (Technical advisory group) and 2005 c 84 s 8 &
1993 c 387 s 25;
(60) RCW 15.66.010 (Definitions) and 2002 c 313 s 39, 1993 c 80 s
3, 1986 c 203 s 16, 1985 c 457 s 14, 1983 c 288 s 6, 1982 c 35 s 180,
1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 6, & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.010;
(61) RCW 15.66.015 (Regulating agricultural commodities -- Existing
comprehensive scheme) and 2002 c 313 s 38;
(62) RCW 15.66.017 (Regulating agricultural commodities -- Laws
applicable) and 2002 c 313 s 41;
(63) RCW 15.66.023 (Commission may establish foundation) and 2001
c 315 s 8;
(64) RCW 15.66.030 (Marketing orders authorized -- Purposes) and 2003
c 396 s 1, 2002 c 313 s 40, 2001 c 315 s 1, & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.030;
(65) RCW 15.66.040 (Prerequisites to marketing orders -- Director's
duties) and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.040;
(66) RCW 15.66.050 (Petition for marketing order -- Deposit to defray
department's expenses -- Circumstances requiring reimbursement) and 2002
c 313 s 42 & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.050;
(67) RCW 15.66.053 (Proceedings subject to administrative procedure
act -- Exemptions) and 2002 c 313 s 43;
(68) RCW 15.66.055 (Director's duties and responsibilities -- Rules)
and 2002 c 313 s 44;
(69) RCW 15.66.060 (Lists of affected parties -- Notice -- Use of
lists) and 2002 c 313 s 45, 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 7, 1969 c 66 s 1, &
1961 c 11 s 15.66.060;
(70) RCW 15.66.070 (Petitions for marketing orders -- Public
hearing -- Legal notice) and 2004 c 179 s 1, 2002 c 313 s 46, & 1961 c 11
s 15.66.070;
(71) RCW 15.66.080 (Findings, conclusions, and recommended decision
of the director -- Notification -- Final decision) and 2004 c 179 s 2 &
1961 c 11 s 15.66.080;
(72) RCW 15.66.090 (After final decision -- Assent of affected
parties determined by referendum) and 2004 c 179 s 3, 2002 c 313 s 47,
1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 8, & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.090;
(73) RCW 15.66.093 (Suspension of marketing order upon request of
commodity commission) and 2002 c 313 s 48;
(74) RCW 15.66.097 (Issuing, amending, or terminating a marketing
order -- Limitation on public hearings or referendums) and 2002 c 313 s
49;
(75) RCW 15.66.100 (Contents of marketing order) and 1961 c 11 s
15.66.100;
(76) RCW 15.66.105 (Certain records exempt from public disclosure--Exemptions -- Actions not prohibited by chapter) and 2005 c 274 s 217 &
2002 c 313 s 50;
(77) RCW 15.66.110 (Commodity commission -- Composition -- Terms) and
2003 c 396 s 4, 2002 c 313 s 51, 2001 c 315 s 2, & 1961 c 11 s
15.66.110;
(78) RCW 15.66.113 (When director appoints majority of the
commission -- Nominations -- Advisory vote -- Notice -- Director selects either
of two candidates receiving the most votes) and 2002 c 313 s 52;
(79) RCW 15.66.120 (Commodity commission -- Nominations -- Elections--Vacancies) and 2002 c 313 s 54, 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 9, & 1961 c 11 s
15.66.120;
(80) RCW 15.66.123 (After any vote, referendum, nomination, or
election -- Affected parties provided results -- Disputes) and 2002 c 313
s 55;
(81) RCW 15.66.130 (Commodity commission -- Meetings -- Quorum--Compensation -- Travel expenses for members and employees) and 2002 c 313
s 56, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 17, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34
s 20, 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 10, 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 3, & 1961 c 11 s
15.66.130;
(82) RCW 15.66.140 (Commodity commission -- Powers and duties) and
2003 c 396 s 2, 2002 c 313 s 57, 2001 c 315 s 3, 1985 c 261 s 20, 1982
c 81 s 2, & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.140;
(83) RCW 15.66.141 (Commission's plans, programs, and projects--Director's approval required) and 2003 c 396 s 5;
(84) RCW 15.66.142 (Commission speaks for state -- Director's
oversight) and 2003 c 396 s 6;
(85) RCW 15.66.143 (Lists of all affected producers and handlers--Affected parties responsible for accuracy -- Use of lists) and 2002 c 313
s 58;
(86) RCW 15.66.145 (Members may belong to association with same
objectives -- Contracts with associations authorized) and 1972 ex.s. c
112 s 4;
(87) RCW 15.66.150 (Annual assessments -- Rate -- Collection) and 1981
c 297 s 40, 1979 ex.s. c 93 s 1, & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.150;
(88) RCW 15.66.153 (Promotional hosting expenditures -- Rules) and
2002 c 313 s 59;
(89) RCW 15.66.157 (When commodity commission is terminated -- Duties
of affected commodity commission) and 2002 c 313 s 60;
(90) RCW 15.66.160 (Annual assessments -- Disposition of revenue) and
1961 c 11 s 15.66.160;
(91) RCW 15.66.170 (Annual assessments -- Payments -- Civil action to
enforce) and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.170;
(92) RCW 15.66.180 (Expenditure of funds collected) and 2002 c 313
s 61 & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.180;
(93) RCW 15.66.185 (Investment of agricultural commodity commission
funds in savings or time deposits of banks, trust companies, and mutual
savings banks) and 2003 c 396 s 3, 2002 c 313 s 62, & 1967 ex.s. c 54
s 2;
(94) RCW 15.66.190 (Official bonds required) and 1961 c 11 s
15.66.190;
(95) RCW 15.66.200 (Petition for modification or exemption--Hearing -- Appeal from ruling) and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.200;
(96) RCW 15.66.210 (Unlawful acts -- Penalties -- Injunctions--Investigations) and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.210;
(97) RCW 15.66.220 (Compliance with chapter a defense in any
action) and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.220;
(98) RCW 15.66.230 (Liability of commission, state, etc.) and 1961
c 11 s 15.66.230;
(99) RCW 15.66.240 (Marketing agreements) and 1961 c 11 s
15.66.240;
(100) RCW 15.66.245 (Marketing agreement or order -- Authority for
participation in proceedings concerning regulation of pesticides or
agricultural chemicals) and 2002 c 313 s 63 & 1988 c 54 s 2;
(101) RCW 15.66.250 (Price fixing and product limiting prohibited)
and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.250;
(102) RCW 15.66.260 (Costs of conducting nominations and
elections -- Reimbursement) and 2002 c 313 s 64, 1969 c 66 s 2, & 1961 c
11 s 15.66.260;
(103) RCW 15.66.263 (Costs of implementing RCW 15.66.141) and 2003
c 396 s 8;
(104) RCW 15.66.270 (Exempt commissions -- Marketing agreements and
orders) and 2007 c 234 s 100 & 1961 c 11 s 15.66.270;
(105) RCW 15.66.275 (Applicability of chapter to state agencies or
other governmental units) and 1967 ex.s. c 55 s 1;
(106) RCW 15.66.280 (Restrictive provisions of chapter 43.78 RCW
not applicable to promotional printing and literature of commissions)
and 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 5;
(107) RCW 15.66.900 (Short title) and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.900;
(108) RCW 15.66.901 (Severability -- 2004 c 99) and 2004 c 99 s 3;
and
(109) RCW 15.88.030 (Wine commission created -- Composition) and 2003
c 396 s 38, 1997 c 321 s 40, 1988 c 254 s 12, & 1987 c 452 s 3.

PART VI
OTHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.50.254 (Advisory council on adult education -- Workforce
training and education coordinating board to monitor) and 1991 c 238 s
19;
(2) RCW 43.46.015 (Washington state arts commission established--Composition) and 1999 c 241 s 1 & 1985 c 317 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.215.090 (Early learning advisory council -- Statewide
early learning plan) and 2007 c 394 s 3;
(4) RCW 70.112.030 (Family practice education advisory board--Chairman -- Membership) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 108 s 3;
(5) RCW 27.34.405 (Heritage barn preservation advisory board--Report) and 2007 c 333 s 3;
(6) RCW 27.34.250 (Advisory council on historic preservation--Members) and 1995 c 150 s 1;
(7) RCW 43.180.040 (Commission created) and 1995 c 399 s 98, 1985
c 6 s 14, 1984 c 287 s 90, & 1983 c 161 s 4;
(8) RCW 72.41.020 (Board of trustees -- Membership -- Terms--Vacancies -- Officers -- Rules and regulations) and 1993 c 147 s 7, 1985 c
378 s 29, 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 13, & 1973 c 118 s 2;
(9) RCW 27.34.360 (Women's history consortium -- Created -- Washington
state historical society as managing agency) and 2005 c 391 s 2;
(10) RCW 28C.18.020 (Workforce training and education coordinating
board) and 1991 c 238 s 3; and
(11) RCW 28C.04.390 (Worker retraining program funds -- Workforce
training customer advisory committee) and 1999 c 121 s 1.

PART VII
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 49.04.010 (Apprenticeship council created -- Composition--Terms -- Compensation -- Duties) and 2001 c 204 s 1, 1984 c 287 s 97, 1982
1st ex.s. c 39 s 2, 1979 ex.s. c 37 s 1, 1977 c 75 s 72, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 34 s 143, 1967 c 6 s 1, 1961 c 114 s 1, & 1941 c 231 s 1;
(2) RCW 18.205.080 (Chemical dependency certification advisory
committee -- Composition -- Terms) and 1998 c 243 s 8;
(3) RCW 74.13.096 (Representation of children of color -- Advisory
committee) and 2007 c 465 s 2;
(4) RCW 51.36.150 (Industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee -- Duties -- Membership) and 2007 c 282 s 2;
(5) RCW 18.25.0151 (Commission established -- Membership) and 2000 c
171 s 5 & 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 104;
(6) RCW 9.94A.880 (Clemency and pardons board -- Membership -- Terms--Chairman -- Bylaws -- Travel expenses -- Staff) and 1981 c 137 s 25;
(7) RCW 72.09.070 (Correctional industries board of directors--Duties) and 2004 c 167 s 1, 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 535, 1993 sp.s. c 20 s 3,
1989 c 185 s 4, & 1981 c 136 s 8;
(8) RCW 43.101.020 (Commission created -- Purpose) and 1974 ex.s. c
94 s 2;
(9) RCW 18.29.110 (Dental hygiene examining committee -- Generally)
and 1991 c 3 s 51 & 1989 c 202 s 3;
(10) RCW 18.32.0351 (Commission established -- Membership) and 2007
c 269 s 16 & 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 204;
(11) RCW 18.34.050 (Examining committee -- Compensation and travel
expenses) and 1984 c 287 s 32 & 1957 c 43 s 5;
(12) RCW 19.28.311 (Electrical board) and 2005 c 280 s 1, 2000 c
238 s 3, 1988 c 81 s 4, 1984 c 287 s 56, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 60,
1969 ex.s. c 71 s 1, & 1963 c 207 s 5;
(13) RCW 70.87.220 (Elevator safety advisory committee) and 2003 c
143 s 7 & 2002 c 98 s 11;
(14) RCW 70.168.020 (Steering committee -- Composition -- Appointment)
and 2000 c 93 s 20, 1990 c 269 s 5, & 1988 c 183 s 2;
(15) RCW 18.73.040 (Emergency medical services licensing and
certification advisory committee) and 1990 c 269 s 6, 1984 c 279 s 55,
1981 c 338 s 13, 1979 ex.s. c 261 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 43, &
1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 4;
(16) RCW 72.09.345 (Sex offenders -- Release of information to
protect public -- End-of-sentence review committee -- Assessment -- Records
access -- Review, classification, referral of offenders -- Issuance of
narrative notices) and 2008 c 231 s 49 & 1997 c 364 s 4;
(17) RCW 18.83.035 (Examining board -- Composition -- Terms--Chairperson) and 1989 c 226 s 1, 1986 c 27 s 2, & 1984 c 279 s 76;
(18) RCW 43.22.420 (Factory assembled structures advisory board)
and 2001 c 335 s 2, 1999 c 22 s 9, 1995 c 280 s 13, 1987 c 330 s 601,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 103, 1971 ex.s. c 82 s 1, 1970 ex.s. c 27 s
9, & 1969 ex.s. c 229 s 3;
(19) RCW 48.62.051 (Health and welfare advisory board -- Creation--Membership -- Duties) and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 5;
(20) RCW 70.37.030 (Washington health care facilities authority
established -- Members -- Chairman -- Terms -- Quorum -- Vacancies -- Compensation
and travel expenses) and 2002 c 91 s 1, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 261, 1984
c 287 s 103, 1983 c 210 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 157, & 1974
ex.s. c 147 s 3;
(21) RCW 43.20.270 (Governor's interagency coordinating council on
health disparities -- Action plan -- Statewide policy) and 2006 c 239 s 1;
(22) RCW 41.05.035 (Exchange of health information -- Pilot -- Advisory
board, discretionary -- Administrator's authority) and 2007 c 259 s 10;
(23) RCW 70.47A.100 (Health insurance partnership board) and 2007
c 260 s 4;
(24) RCW 48.41.040 (Health insurance pool -- Creation, membership,
organization, operation, rules) and 2000 c 80 s 1, 2000 c 79 s 7, 1989
c 121 s 2, & 1987 c 431 s 4;
(25) RCW 43.20.030 (State board of health -- Members -- Chairman -- Staff
support -- Executive director, confidential secretary -- Compensation and
travel expenses of members) and 2006 c 238 s 1;
(26) RCW 18.35.150 (Board of hearing and speech -- Created--Membership -- Qualifications -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Meetings -- Compensation--Travel expenses) and 2002 c 310 s 15, 1996 c 200 s 19, 1993 c 313 s 6,
1989 c 198 s 7, 1984 c 287 s 33, 1983 c 39 s 12, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
34 s 35, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 15;
(27) RCW 74.39A.230 (Authority created) and 2002 c 3 s 2 ;
(28) RCW 49.60.050 (Commission created) and 1985 c 185 s 3, 1981 c
338 s 9, 1957 c 37 s 5, & 1955 c 270 s 2;
(29) RCW 51.52.010 (Board of industrial insurance appeals) and 2004
c 65 s 15, 2003 c 224 s 1, 1999 c 149 s 1, 1981 c 338 s 10, 1977 ex.s.
c 350 s 74, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 151, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 68, 1965
ex.s. c 165 s 3, 1961 c 307 s 8, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.010;
(30) RCW 49.17.055 (WISHA advisory committee--Appointment of
members--Duties--Terms, compensation, and expenses) and 1997 c 107 s 1;
(31) RCW 10.98.210 (Washington integrated justice information
board -- Members) and 2003 c 104 s 3;
(32) RCW 36.110.030 (Board of directors established -- Membership)
and 1995 c 399 s 45 & 1993 c 285 s 3;
(33) RCW 43.101.310 (Board on law enforcement training standards
and education -- Board on correctional training standards -- Created--Purpose) and 1997 c 351 s 2;
(34) RCW 18.225.060 (Washington state mental health counselors,
marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory committee--Established -- Composition) and 2001 c 251 s 6;
(35) RCW 18.108.020 (Board of massage -- Generally) and 1991 c 3 s
253 & 1987 c 443 s 9;
(36) RCW 18.71.015 (Commission established -- Membership--Qualifications -- Duties and powers -- Compensation -- Order of removal--Vacancies) and 2006 c 8 s 103, 1999 c 366 s 4, & 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 303;
(37) RCW 18.50.140 (Midwifery advisory committee -- Generally) and
1994 sp.s. c 9 s 706, 1991 c 3 s 114, 1987 c 467 s 5, & 1981 c 53 s 3;
(38) RCW 18.36A.070 (Naturopathic advisory committee) and 1991 c 3
s 92 & 1987 c 447 s 7;
(39) RCW 18.79.070 (Commission established -- Membership--Qualifications) and 2005 c 17 s 1 & 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 407;
(40) RCW 18.52.040 (Board of nursing home administrators -- Created--Membership) and 1992 c 53 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c 97 s 1, & 1970 ex.s. c
57 s 4;
(41) RCW 18.59.120 (Board of occupational therapy practice
established -- Members -- Terms -- Meetings -- Compensation) and 1984 c 9 s 13;
(42) RCW 70.118.100 (Alternative systems -- Technical review
committee) and 1997 c 447 s 3;
(43) RCW 70.118.110 (Alternative systems -- State guidelines and
standards) and 1997 c 447 s 5;
(44) RCW 18.54.020 (Examining committee reconstituted as optometry
board) and 1963 c 25 s 2;
(45) RCW 18.200.060 (Advisory committee -- Composition -- Terms--Duties) and 1997 c 285 s 7;
(46) RCW 18.57.003 (State board of osteopathic medicine and
surgery -- Membership -- Qualifications -- Officers -- Meetings -- Compensation
and travel expenses -- Removal) and 1991 c 160 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 42, &
1979 c 117 s 2;
(47) RCW 70.104.070 (Pesticide incident reporting and tracking
review panel -- Intent) and 1989 c 380 s 67;
(48) RCW 70.104.080 (Pesticide panel -- Generally) and 1994 c 264 s
41, 1991 c 3 s 363, & 1989 c 380 s 68;
(49) RCW 70.104.090 (Pesticide panel -- Responsibilities) and 1991 c
3 s 364 & 1989 c 380 s 69;
(50) RCW 70.14.050 (Drug purchasing cost controls -- Establishment of
evidence-based prescription drug program) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 9
& 1986 c 303 s 10;
(51) RCW 18.64.001 (State board of pharmacy -- Creation -- Membership--Oath -- Vacancies) and 1984 c 153 s 1, 1981 c 338 s 17, 1973 1st ex.s. c
18 s 1, 1963 c 38 s 16, & 1935 c 98 s 1;
(52) RCW 18.74.020 (Board created -- Members -- Staff assistance--Compensation and travel expenses) and 2007 c 98 s 2, 1991 c 3 s 174,
1984 c 287 s 46, 1983 c 116 s 3, 1979 c 158 s 62, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
34 s 44, & 1949 c 239 s 2;
(53) RCW 18.22.013 (Podiatric medical board -- Membership) and 1990
c 147 s 3 & 1982 c 21 s 8;
(54) RCW 70.14.060 (Prescription drug purchasing consortium--Participation -- Prescription drug consortium advisory committee--Exceptions -- Rules) and 2005 c 129 s 1;
(55) RCW 41.05.055 (Public employees' benefits board -- Members) and
1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 4, 1994 c 36 s 1, 1993 c 492 s 217, 1989 c 324 s
1, & 1988 c 107 s 7;
(56) RCW 41.05.065 (Public employees' benefits board -- Duties) and
2007 c 156 s 10, 2007 c 114 s 5, & 2006 c 299 s 2;
(57) RCW 74.18.070 (Rehabilitation council for the blind--Membership) and 2003 c 409 s 7, 2000 c 57 s 1, & 1983 c 194 s 7;
(58) RCW 9.94A.850 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Established--Powers and duties) and 2005 c 282 s 19;
(59) RCW 9.94A.8673 (Sex offender policy board -- Membership) and
2008 c 249 s 3;
(60) RCW 18.155.050 (Sexual offender treatment providers advisory
committee) and 1990 c 3 s 805;
(61) RCW 43.340.020 (Tobacco settlement authority -- Governing
board -- Meetings -- Staff support) and 2002 c 365 s 3;
(62) RCW 74.31.020 (Washington traumatic brain injury strategic
partnership advisory council -- Members -- Expenses -- Appointment -- Duties)
and 2007 c 356 s 3;
(63) RCW 43.60A.080 (Veterans affairs advisory committee -- Created--Membership -- Terms -- Powers and duties) and 1995 c 25 s 1, 1992 c 35 s 1,
1987 c 59 s 1, 1985 c 63 s 1, 1983 c 34 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 285 s 1, &
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 14;
(64) RCW 43.60A.170 (Competitive grant program -- Veterans
innovations program board -- Travel expenses) and 2006 c 343 s 5;
(65) RCW 18.92.021 (Veterinary board of governors -- Appointment,
qualifications, terms, officers -- Quorum) and 2007 c 235 s 3 & 1983 c 2
s 2; and
(66) RCW 70.119A.160 (Water supply advisory committee) and 1998 c
245 s 112 & 1995 c 376 s 4.

PART VIII
PUBLIC SCHOOLS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.305.011 (Board membership -- Terms -- Compensation) and
2006 c 263 s 105 & 2005 c 497 s 101;
(2) RCW 28A.305.219 (Mathematics advisory panel -- Science advisory
panel) and 2007 c 396 s 2;
(3) RCW 28A.195.050 (Private school advisory committee) and 1984 c
40 s 1 & 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 6; and
(4) RCW 28A.525.025 (School facilities citizen advisory panel--Membership -- Travel expenses -- Technical advisory group) and 2006 c 263
s 308.

PART IX
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 46.66.010 (Authority established -- Members) and 2007 c 199
s 20;
(2) RCW 70.94.537 (Transportation demand management -- Commute trip
reduction board) and 2006 c 329 s 7, 1997 c 250 s 5, 1996 c 186 s 514,
1995 c 399 s 188, & 1991 c 202 s 15;
(3) RCW 47.06B.020 (Agency council on coordinated transportation--Creation, membership, staff, meetings) and 2007 c 421 s 2 & 1998 c 173
s 2;
(4) RCW 36.78.030 (Board created -- Number -- Appointment -- Terms--Vacancies) and 1971 ex.s. c 85 s 5 & 1965 ex.s. c 120 s 3;
(5) RCW 35.78.020 (State design standards -- Committee -- Membership)
and 1984 c 7 s 24 & 1965 c 7 s 35.78.020;
(6) RCW 46.82.300 (Driver instructors' advisory committee) and 2006
c 219 s 3, 2002 c 195 s 5, 1984 c 287 s 93, & 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 3;
(7) RCW 47.60.310 (State ferries -- Local expressions -- Ferry advisory
committees) and 1988 c 100 s 1, 1983 c 15 s 24, 1983 c 3 s 137, 1977 c
29 s 1, & 1961 c 13 s 47.60.310;
(8) RCW 43.43.932 (State fire protection policy board -- Created--Members) and 2005 c 35 s 1, 1995 c 369 s 15, & 1986 c 266 s 55;
(9) RCW 43.103.030 (Council created -- Powers and duties) and 2005 c
166 s 2, 1999 c 40 s 4, 1995 c 398 s 4, 1991 c 176 s 2, & 1983 1st
ex.s. c 16 s 3;
(10) RCW 47.06A.020 (Board -- Duties) and 2005 c 319 s 125, 1999 c
216 s 1, & 1998 c 175 s 3;
(11) RCW 47.64.280 (Marine employees' commission) and 2006 c 164 s
18, 1984 c 287 s 95, & 1983 c 15 s 19;
(12) RCW 46.20.520 (Training and education program -- Advisory board)
and 1998 c 245 s 89, 1987 c 454 s 3, & 1982 c 77 s 5;
(13) RCW 46.09.280 (Nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities
advisory committee) and 2007 c 241 s 19, 2004 c 105 s 8, 2003 c 185 s
1, & 1986 c 206 s 13;
(14) RCW 88.16.010 (Board of pilotage commissioners -- Created--Chairperson -- Members -- Terms -- Qualifications -- Vacancies -- Quorum) and
2008 c 128 s 1, 2003 c 58 s 1, 2001 c 36 s 4, 1991 c 200 s 1001, 1987
c 485 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 207 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 337 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 151
s 73, 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 58, & 1935 c 18 s 1;
(15) RCW 46.16.705 (Special license plate review board -- Created)
and 2005 c 319 s 117 & 2003 c 196 s 101;
(16) RCW 43.59.010 (Purpose -- Finding) and 1998 c 165 s 2 & 1967
ex.s. c 147 s 1;
(17) RCW 47.01.051 (Commission created -- Appointment of members--Terms -- Qualifications -- Removal) and 2006 c 334 s 1 & 1977 ex.s. c 151
s 5; and
(18) RCW 47.26.121 (Transportation improvement board -- Membership--Chair -- Expenses) and 1996 c 49 s 1, 1995 c 269 s 2603, 1994 c 179 s 13,
& 1993 c 172 s 1.

PART X
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

--- END ---