BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a public agency is planning a project that may require a
utility facility operator to relocate its utility facilities in or
along the right-of-way, the public agency shall notify each affected
utility facility operator as soon as is practicable and include the
affected utility facility operator in a preliminary design meeting
during the design phase. The notice must provide information
concerning: (a) The proposed project design; and (b) proposed dates of
any required utility facility relocations.
(2) During the preliminary design meeting, public agencies and
affected utility facility operators shall review the impact of any
proposed utility facility relocation and make reasonable efforts to
avoid or minimize:
(a) Factors which could cause delay of the project;
(b) Relocation of existing utility facilities and associated costs;
and
(c) Costs to public agencies.
(3) This section does not preempt specific provisions in existing
franchises, permits, or contracts between public agencies and utility
facility operators.
(4) This section does not apply to the relocation of utility
facilities in the event of an unforeseen emergency that creates an
immediate threat to the public safety, health, or welfare.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Public agency" means the state, county, city, or any political
subdivision of the state, which maintains ownership or control of the
right-of-way.
(b) "Utility facility" means any privately, publicly, or
cooperatively owned equipment, facilities, or system for producing,
transmitting, or distributing communications, cable television, power,
electricity, gas, hazardous liquids, water, steam, or waste.

--- END ---