BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Recording device" means an electronic system, and the physical
device or mechanism containing the electronic system, that primarily,
or incidental to its primary function, preserves or records, in
electronic form, data collected by sensors or provided by other systems
within a motor vehicle. "Recording device" includes event data
recorders, sensing and diagnostic modules, electronic control modules,
automatic crash notification systems, geographic information systems,
and any other device that records and preserves data that can be
accessed related to that motor vehicle.
(2) "Owner" means:
(a) A person having all the incidents of ownership, including legal
title, of a motor vehicle, whether or not the person lends, rents, or
creates a security interest in the motor vehicle;
(b) A person entitled to the possession of a motor vehicle as the
purchaser under a security agreement;
(c) A person entitled to possession of a motor vehicle as a lessee
pursuant to a written lease agreement for a period of more than three
months; or
(d) If a third party requests access to a recording device to
investigate a collision, the owner of the motor vehicle at the time the
collision occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A manufacturer of a motor vehicle sold
or leased in this state, that is equipped with one or more recording
devices, shall disclose in the owner's manual that the motor vehicle is
equipped with one or more recording devices and, if so, the type of
data recorded and whether the recording device or devices have the
ability to transmit information to a central communications system or
other external device.
(2) If a recording device is used as part of a subscription
service, the subscription service agreement must disclose the type of
information that the device may record or transmit.
(3) A disclosure made in writing is deemed a disclosure in the
owner's manual.
(4) If a recording device is to be installed in a vehicle
aftermarket, the manufacturer or distributor of the device shall
disclose in the product manual the type of information that the device
may record and whether the recording device has the ability to transmit
information to a central communications system or other external
device.
(5) A disclosure made in writing is deemed a disclosure in the
product manual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Information recorded or transmitted by
a recording device may not be retrieved, downloaded, scanned, read, or
otherwise accessed by a person other than the owner of the motor
vehicle in which the recording device is installed except:
(a) Upon a court order;
(b) With the consent of the owner, given for a specific instance of
access, for any purpose;
(c) For improving motor vehicle safety, including medical research
on the human body's reaction to motor vehicle collisions, if the
identity of the motor vehicle or the owner or driver of the motor
vehicle is not disclosed in connection with the retrieved information;
(d) For determining the need for or facilitating emergency medical
response if a motor vehicle collision occurs, provided that the
information retrieved is used solely for medical purposes; or
(e) For subscription services pursuant to an agreement in which
disclosure required under section 2 of this act has been made, provided
that the information retrieved is used solely for the purposes of
fulfilling the subscription service and is not disclosed to a third
party.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1)(c) of this section:
(a) The disclosure of a motor vehicle's vehicle identification
number with the last six digits deleted or redacted is not a disclosure
of the identity of the owner or driver; and
(b) Retrieved information may only be disclosed to a data
processor.
(3) Information recorded or transmitted by a recording device may
not be sold to a third party unless the owner of the information
explicitly grants permission for the sale.
(4) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of
this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.020 and 2008 c 282 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by
failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering
a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license,
or ignition interlock driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock
device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption
devices;
(24) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(25) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(26) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(27) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(28) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(29) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(30) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(31) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(32) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(33) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or firefighters;
(34) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(35) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(36) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(37) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(38) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(39) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(40) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(41) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(42) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(43) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(44) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(45) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to secure a
load;
(46) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(47) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(48) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt
to cancel a traffic citation;
(49) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes;
(50) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;
(51) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a
refund;
(52) Section 3 of this act relating to recording device
information;
(53) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of
monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((53))) (54) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((54))) (55) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((57))) (58) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((58))) (59) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((59))) (60) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((60))) (61) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---