BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall by rule establish rates for medically
intensive home health care that are equivalent to rates established for
similar services by the department of labor and industries.

--- END ---