BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.070 and 1992 c 69 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, it shall
remain under such classification and shall not be applied to other use
except as provided by subsection (2) of this section for at least ten
years from the date of classification and shall continue under such
classification until and unless withdrawn from classification after
notice of request for withdrawal shall be made by the owner. During
any year after eight years of the initial ten-year classification
period ((have)) has elapsed, notice of request for withdrawal of all or
a portion of the land may be given by the owner to the assessor or
assessors of the county or counties in which ((such)) the land is
situated. In the event that a portion of a parcel is removed from
classification, the remaining portion must meet the same requirements
as did the entire parcel when ((such)) the land was originally granted
classification pursuant to this chapter unless the remaining parcel has
different income criteria. Within seven days the assessor shall
transmit one copy of ((such)) the notice to the legislative body
((which)) that originally approved the application. The assessor or
assessors, as the case may be, shall, when two assessment years have
elapsed following the date of receipt of ((such)) the notice, withdraw
((such)) the land from ((such)) the classification and the land shall
be subject to the additional tax and applicable interest due under RCW
84.34.108. The open space taxation agreement to tax according to use
shall not be considered to be a contract and can be abrogated at any
time by the legislature in which event no additional tax or penalty
shall be imposed.
(2)(a) In counties with a population of less than one million five
hundred thousand on January 1, 2009, the following reclassifications
are not considered withdrawals or removals and are not subject to
additional tax under RCW 84.34.108:
(((a))) (i) Reclassification between lands under RCW 84.34.020 (2)
and (3);
(((b))) (ii) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020 (2) or (3) or chapter 84.33 RCW to open space land under RCW
84.34.020(1);
(((c))) (iii) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020 (2) or (3) to forest land classified under chapter 84.33 RCW;
and
(((d))) (iv) Reclassification of land classified as open space land
under RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) and reclassified to farm and agricultural
land under RCW 84.34.020(2) if the land had been previously classified
as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2); and
(b) In counties with a population of one million five hundred
thousand or greater on January 1, 2009, the following reclassifications
are not considered withdrawals or removals and are not subject to
additional tax under RCW 84.34.108:
(i) Reclassification of land from one current use classification
governed by this chapter to another current use classification governed
by this chapter;
(ii) Reclassification of land designated under chapter 84.33 RCW to
a current use classification governed by this chapter; and
(iii) Reclassification of land from a current use classification
governed by this chapter to forest land designated under chapter 84.33
RCW.
(3) Applications for reclassification shall be subject to
applicable provisions of RCW 84.34.037, 84.34.035, 84.34.041, and
chapter 84.33 RCW.
(4) The income criteria for land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2)
(b) and (c) may be deferred for land being reclassified from land
classified under RCW 84.34.020 (1)(c) or (3), or chapter 84.33 RCW into
RCW 84.34.020(2) (b) or (c) for a period of up to five years from the
date of reclassification.

--- END ---