BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.035 and 2000 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology((;)).
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology((;)).
(3) "Groundwaters" means all waters that exist beneath the land
surface or beneath the bed of any stream, lake or reservoir, or other
body of surface water within the boundaries of this state, whatever may
be the geological formation or structure in which such water stands or
flows, percolates or otherwise moves. There is a recognized
distinction between natural groundwater and artificially stored
groundwater((;)).
(4) "Natural groundwater" means water that exists in underground
storage owing wholly to natural processes((;)).
(5) "Artificially stored groundwater" means water that is made
available in underground storage artificially, either intentionally, or
incidentally to irrigation and that otherwise would have been
dissipated by natural processes((; and)).
(6) "Stock watering" means all reasonable uses of water normally
associated with the care and management of livestock including, but not
limited to, drinking, feeding, cleaning of stalls, washing livestock,
washing equipment used in the feeding or milking of livestock,
controlling dust around livestock, and cooling livestock.
(7) "Underground artificial storage and recovery project" means any
project in which it is intended to artificially store water in the
ground through injection, surface spreading and infiltration, or other
department-approved method, and to make subsequent use of the stored
water. However, (a) this subsection does not apply to irrigation
return flow, or to operational and seepage losses that occur during the
irrigation of land, or to water that is artificially stored due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district
project, or to projects involving water reclaimed in accordance with
chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies to those instances of
claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the construction,
operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project or
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of
land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial recharge already
existing at the time a groundwater subarea is established.

--- END ---