BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.76.250 and 1996 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The essential rail assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for the
purposes specified in this section.
(2) Moneys appropriated from the account to the department of
transportation may be used by the department or distributed by the
department to cities, county rail districts, counties, economic
development councils, ((and)) port districts, and privately or publicly
owned railroads for the purpose of:
(a) Acquiring, rebuilding, rehabilitating, or improving rail lines;
(b) Purchasing or rehabilitating railroad equipment necessary to
maintain essential rail service;
(c) Constructing railroad improvements to mitigate port access or
mainline congestion;
(d) Construction of loading facilities to increase business on
light density lines or to mitigate the impacts of abandonment;
(e) Preservation, including operation, of light density lines, as
identified by the Washington state department of transportation, in
compliance with this chapter; or
(f) Preserving rail corridors for future rail purposes by purchase
of rights-of-way. The department shall first pursue transportation
enhancement program funds, available under the federal surface
transportation program, to the greatest extent practicable to preserve
rail corridors. Purchase of rights-of-way may include track, bridges,
and associated elements, and must meet the following criteria:
(i) The right-of-way has been identified and evaluated in the state
rail plan prepared under this chapter;
(ii) The right-of-way may be or has been abandoned; and
(iii) The right-of-way has potential for future rail service.
(3) The department or the participating local jurisdiction is
responsible for maintaining any right-of-way acquired under this
chapter, including provisions for drainage management, fire and weed
control, and liability associated with ownership.
(4) Nothing in this section impairs the reversionary rights of
abutting landowners, if any, without just compensation.
(5) The department, cities, county rail districts, counties, and
port districts may grant franchises to private railroads for the right
to operate on lines acquired under this chapter.
(6) The department, cities, county rail districts, counties, and
port districts may grant trackage rights over rail lines acquired under
this chapter.
(7) If rail lines or rail rights-of-way are used by county rail
districts, port districts, state agencies, or other public agencies for
the purposes of rail operations and are later abandoned, the rail lines
or rail rights-of-way cannot be used for any other purposes without the
consent of the underlying fee title holder or reversionary rights
holder, or until compensation has been made to the underlying fee title
holder or reversionary rights holder.
(8) The department of transportation shall develop criteria for
prioritizing freight rail projects that meet the minimum eligibility
requirements for state assistance under RCW 47.76.240. The department
shall develop criteria in consultation with the Washington state
freight rail policy advisory committee. Project criteria should
consider the level of local financial commitment to the project as well
as cost/benefit ratio. Counties, local communities, railroads,
shippers, and others who benefit from the project should participate
financially to the greatest extent practicable.
(9) Moneys received by the department from franchise fees, trackage
rights fees, and loan payments shall be redeposited in the essential
rail assistance account. Repayment of loans made under this section
shall occur within a period not longer than fifteen years, as set by
the department. The repayment schedule and rate of interest, if any,
shall be determined before the distribution of the moneys.
(10) The state shall maintain a contingent interest in any
equipment, property, rail line, or facility that has outstanding grants
or loans. The owner may not use the line as collateral, remove track,
bridges, or associated elements for salvage, or use it in any other
manner subordinating the state's interest without permission from the
department.
(11) ((Moneys distributed under this chapter should be provided as
loans wherever practicable. Except as provided by section 3, chapter
73, Laws of 1996, for improvements on or to privately owned railroads,
railroad property, or other private property, moneys distributed shall
be provided solely as loans.)) Moneys may be granted for improvements
to privately owned railroads, railroad property, or other private
property under this chapter for freight rail projects that meet the
minimum eligibility criteria for state assistance under RCW 47.76.240,
and which are supported by contractual consideration. At a minimum,
such contractual consideration shall consist of defined benefits to the
public with a value equal to or greater than the grant amount, and
where the grant recipient provides the state a contingent interest
adequate to ensure that such public benefits are realized.

--- END ---