BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.91.020 and 2006 c 88 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the
governing body of any city, town, county, water-sewer district, or
drainage district, hereinafter referred to as a "municipality" may
contract with owners of real estate for the construction of storm,
sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants,
water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances, hereinafter called
"water or sewer facilities," within their boundaries or (except for
counties) within ten miles from their corporate limits connecting with
the public water or sewerage system to serve the area in which the real
estate of such owners is located, and to provide for a period of not to
exceed fifteen years for the reimbursement of such owners and their
assigns by any owner of real estate who did not contribute to the
original cost of such water or sewer facilities and who subsequently
tap onto or use the same of a fair pro rata share of the cost of the
construction of said water or sewer facilities, including not only
those directly connected thereto, but also users connected to laterals
or branches connecting thereto, subject to such reasonable rules and
regulations as the governing body of such municipality may provide or
contract, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law.
(b) If authorized by ordinance or contract, a municipality may
participate in financing the development of water or sewer facilities
development projects authorized by, and in accordance with, (a) of this
subsection. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance or contract:
(i) Municipalities that contribute to the financing of water or
sewer facilities projects under this section have the same rights to
reimbursement as owners of real estate who make contributions as
authorized under this section; and
(ii) If the projects are jointly financed by a combination of
municipal funding and private funding by real estate owners, the amount
of reimbursement received by each participant in the financing must be
a pro rata share.
(c) A municipality seeking reimbursement from an owner of real
estate under this section is limited to the dollar amount authorized
under this chapter and may not collect any additional reimbursement,
assessment, charge, or fee for the infrastructure or facilities that
were constructed under the applicable ordinance, contract, or
agreement. This does not prevent the collection of amounts for
services or infrastructure that are additional expenditures not subject
to such ordinance, contract, or agreement.
(2)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the
fifteen-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration
of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period
of six months or more.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by
the contracting municipality of the extension filed under this
subsection.
(3) Each contract shall include a provision requiring that every
two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the contracting
municipality with information regarding the current contract name,
address, and telephone number of the person, company, or partnership
that originally entered into the contract. If the property owner fails
to comply with the notification requirements of this subsection within
sixty days of the specified time, then the contracting municipality may
collect any reimbursement funds owed to the property owner under the
contract. Such funds must be deposited in the capital fund of the
municipality.
(4) To the extent it may require in the performance of such
contract, such municipality may install said water or sewer facilities
in and along the county streets in the area to be served as hereinabove
provided, subject to such reasonable requirements as to the manner of
occupancy of such streets as the county may by resolution provide. The
provisions of such contract shall not be effective as to any owner of
real estate not a party thereto unless such contract has been recorded
in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the real
estate of such owner is located prior to the time such owner taps into
or connects to said water or sewer facilities.

--- END ---