BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Under law there is no clear way to determine
when voting rights are restored to a person who has been convicted of
a felony. This creates confusion and unnecessary barriers to voting.
It also discriminates against certain groups of citizens. For example,
approximately seventeen percent of African-Americans and ten percent of
Latinos are prevented from voting. It is the intent of the legislature
to create a clear delineation to determine when a person convicted of
a felony, upon meeting specific responsibilities of his or her
sentence, becomes eligible to gain the restoration of the right to
vote.
The office of the secretary of state is directed to review current
statutes and regulations as they relate to the restoration of felon's
right to vote and recommend a solution to the 2010 legislature.

--- END ---