BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
state's best interest to pursue an aggressive sustainable energy
agenda. Since all new energy is the most expensive energy, it is the
place of government to initiate and drive policy for new energy
technologies that will be the most reasonable cost energy for the
future. The state has passed legislation in recent years that promotes
the use and manufacturing of renewable energy technologies, requires
energy efficiency and conservation, supports consumption of biofuels
and the growth of state biofuel feedstocks, and reduces greenhouse gas
emissions from new power plants and automobiles. These policies are
pursued with the intent of protecting and enhancing Washington's
economy and future.
Various state agencies and institutions have been designated to
execute sustainable energy policies and programs. These agencies
include the energy policy division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, Washington State University's energy
extension program, the utilities and transportation commission, the
department of general administration, the department of agriculture,
and the department of ecology. Additionally, the legislature and
executive agencies have established other sustainable energy
initiatives such as the energy freedom fund and the biofuels advisory
committee, respectively. The legislature finds that it may be
necessary in the future to establish additional sustainable energy
programs and initiatives.
The legislature finds that the implementation of Washington's
sustainable energy agenda is being impeded due to the fragmented
division of responsibilities among these state-based energy agencies
and institutions and the lack of a central coordinating agency that
ensures cooperation and the execution of a strategic plan.
The legislature intends to centralize and integrate state energy
programs and certain regulatory functions that are currently spread
throughout state government into one central office called the
sustainable energy office. In centralizing and integrating state
energy programs, the legislature intends to ensure staffing resources
are allocated in the most efficient and effective manner possible,
eliminate the duplication of services, and ensure the execution of
policies adopted by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A sustainable energy office is created. The
office shall be vested with all powers and duties established or
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The executive head of the sustainable energy
office is the director. The director of the office shall be appointed
by the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director of the sustainable energy
office shall supervise and administer the activities of the office and
shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
sustainable energy matters affecting the state.
(2) The director shall develop a sustainable energy strategy to
drive Washington's sustainable energy goals.
(3) The director shall oversee the development of a sustainable
energy work plan in consultation with the sustainable energy work group
to carry out the goals established in the sustainable energy strategy.
The work plan shall provide actions:
(a) To ensure state staffing resources are allocated in the most
efficient and effective manner possible to accomplish the strategic
plan;
(b) To eliminate the duplication of services;
(c) To ensure the execution of policies adopted by the legislature;
and
(d) To establish performance metrics and to regularly measure
progress in achieving the sustainable energy strategy.
(4) The director shall oversee a state agency sustainable energy
work group to meet no less than quarterly to coordinate activities to
implement the sustainable energy work plan. The work group shall
consist of the directors, or designees determined by the directors, of
the following state energy entities:
(a) The department of agriculture;
(b) The department of ecology;
(c) The department of general administration;
(d) The energy policy division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development;
(e) The utilities and transportation commission;
(f) Washington State University's energy extension program; and
(g) Any other state energy entity designated by the governor.
(5) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director,
the director has the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
intergovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;
(c) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of
federal or other funds;
(d) Prepare and submit budgets for the office for executive and
legislative action;
(e) Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed
necessary to further the purposes of this chapter;
(f) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, while the director is
responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the
office; and
(g) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.
(6) When federal or other funds are received by the office, they
shall be promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter
expended only upon the approval of the director.
(7) The director may request information and assistance from all
other agencies, departments, and officials of the state.
(8) The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of
office, consult with governmental officials, private groups, and
individuals and with officials of other states. All state agencies and
their officials and the officials of any political subdivision of the
state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the office,
including the submission of requested information, to allow the office
to carry out its purposes under this chapter.
(9) The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating
groups with the legislature, within state government, with state and
other governmental units, with the private sector and nonprofit
entities, or in specialized subject areas as may be necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(10) The internal affairs of the office are under the control of
the director in order that the director may manage the office in a
flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary
circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the director has
complete charge and supervisory powers over the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---