BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.95N RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only an entity registered as a collector with the department
may act as a collector in a plan. All covered electronic products
received by a registered collector must be submitted to a plan. Fully
functioning computers that are received by a registered collector in
working order may be sold or donated as whole products by the collector
for reuse. Computers that require repair to make them a fully
functioning unit may only be repaired on-site at the collector's place
of business by the registered collector for reuse according to its
original purpose.
(2) Registered collectors may use whole parts gleaned from
collected computers or new parts for making repairs as long as there is
a part-for-part exchange with nonfunctioning computers submitted to a
plan.
(3) Registered collectors may not include computers that are
gleaned for reuse in the weight totals for compensation by the plan.
(4) Registered collectors must maintain a record of computers sold
or donated by the collector for a period of three years.
(5) Registered collectors must display a notice at the point of
collection that computers received by the collector may be repaired and
sold or donated as a fully functioning computer rather than submitted
to a processor for recycling.
(6) The authority, authorized party, or the department may conduct
site visits of all registered collectors that reuse or refurbish
computers and who have an agreement with the authority or authorized
party to provide collection services. If the authority or authorized
party finds that a collector is not providing services in compliance
with this chapter, the authority or authorized party shall report that
finding to the department for enforcement action.

--- END ---