BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall require applicants for registration and
renewal who perform locksmith services to complete a fingerprint-based
background check through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation.
If the applicant is a partnership, corporation, or other entity, all
owners, principals, or officers shall also complete the background
check. The applicant must also be required to submit background checks
for their employees and subcontractors. The applicant must be required
to pay the current federal and state fees for fingerprint-based
criminal history background checks. The applicant shall submit the
fingerprints and required fees for the background checks to the
department for submission to the Washington state patrol. The
department may consider the recent issuance of a license that required
a fingerprint-based national criminal information background check, in
order to accelerate the registration process.
(2) The department shall develop by rule a process for determining
which applicants and registrants perform locksmith services and ensure
all registrants performing locksmith services have a fingerprint and
background check done on a regular basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.010 and 2007 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other
entity who or which, in the pursuit of an independent business
undertakes to, or offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct,
alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, develop, move, wreck, or
demolish any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other
structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate
or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or
other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures
or works in connection therewith, the installation or repair of roofing
or siding, performing tree removal services, or cabinet or similar
installation; or, who, to do similar work upon his or her own property,
employs members of more than one trade upon a single job or project or
under a single building permit except as otherwise provided in this
chapter. "Contractor" also includes a consultant acting as a general
contractor. "Contractor" also includes any person, firm, corporation,
or other entity covered by this subsection, whether or not registered
as required under this chapter or who are otherwise required to be
registered or licensed by law, who offer to sell their property without
occupying or using the structures, projects, developments, or
improvements for more than one year from the date the structure,
project, development, or improvement was substantially completed or
abandoned.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "Filing" means delivery of a document that is required to be
filed with an agency to a place designated by the agency.
(5) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than one building trade or craft
upon a single job or project or under a single building permit. A
general contractor also includes one who superintends, or consults on,
in whole or in part, work falling within the definition of a
contractor.
(6) "Locksmith services" include repairing, rekeying, opening,
modifying, servicing, or installing any mechanical, electromechanical,
electronic, or electromagnetic device, or similar device, including any
peripheral hardware, that is designed to control access from one area
to another, or that is designed to control the use of a device.
(7) "Notice of infraction" means a form used by the department to
notify contractors that an infraction under this chapter has been filed
against them.
(((7))) (8) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25
RCW.
(((8))) (9) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from
the department that a contractor's action is in violation of this
chapter and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(((9))) (10) "Registration suspension" means either an automatic
suspension as provided in this chapter, or a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for a
specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance
with this chapter.
(((10))) (11) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or
persons owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(((11))) (12) "Service," except as otherwise provided in RCW
18.27.225 and 18.27.370, means posting in the United States mail,
properly addressed, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or
personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the
United States mail to the last known address provided to the
department.
(((12))) (13) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose
operations do not fall within the definition of "general contractor".
A specialty contractor may only subcontract work that is incidental to
the specialty contractor's work.
(((13))) (14) "Substantial completion" means the same as
"substantial completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.
(((14))) (15) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm,
corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being
registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor"
includes contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or
suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who
has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account
required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty
or fewer days.
(((15))) (16) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment or
final tax warrant that has not been satisfied either through payment,
court approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under
RCW 19.72.070.
(((16))) (17) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by
the city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is
current on its face, checking the department's contractor registration
database, or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is
registered.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) and (d) of this
subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in Washington.
(f) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(g) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm
or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant
is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the
corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a
corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the
department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter
as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an owner,
principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity
that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action
that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes
the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department
determines that the applicant has falsified information on the
application, unless the error was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the applicant
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue; or (vi) the applicant is engaged in locksmith
services and any owner, principal, officer, or employee of the
applicant's business entity has been convicted in this state or
elsewhere of: (A) A violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030; (B) a felony involving a schedule I or II controlled
substance; (C) a felony involving a motor vehicle under chapter 9A.56
RCW; or (D) a crime under chapter 9A.52 RCW.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the
department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (ii) the
department has determined that the registrant is a sole proprietor or
an owner, principal, or officer of a registered contractor that has an
unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope of this
chapter; (iii) the registrant does not maintain a valid unified
business identifier number; (iv) the department has determined that the
registrant falsified information on the application, unless the error
was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the registrant does not have an active and
valid certificate of registration with the department of revenue; or
(vi) the registrant is engaged in locksmith services and any owner,
principal, officer, or employee of the registrant's business entity has
been convicted in this state or elsewhere of: (A) A violent offense or
sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (B) a felony involving a
schedule I or II controlled substance; (C) a felony involving a motor
vehicle under chapter 9A.56 RCW; or (D) a crime under chapter 9A.52
RCW.
(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the
department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer
of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous
partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

--- END ---