BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.200 and 2006 c 331 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When construction, repair, ((or)) maintenance, or utility work
is conducted on or adjacent to a public highway, county road, street,
bridge, trail, sidewalk, or other thoroughfare commonly traveled
((and)), the needs and control of all users of the public highway,
county road, street, bridge, trail, or sidewalk, or other thoroughfare
users, including motorists, bicyclists, and pedestrians within the
thoroughfare, and persons with disabilities in accordance with the
Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (28 C.F.R. Sec. 35.130), must
be an essential part of the construction, repair, maintenance, or
utility work. When the work interferes with the normal and established
mode of travel on the highway, county road, street, bridge, trail,
sidewalk, or thoroughfare, the location ((shall)) must be properly
posted by prominently displayed signs or flagmen or both. When passage
of the highway, county road, street, bridge, trail, sidewalk, or
thoroughfare is closed to any user, the location must be posted with
detour signs that direct the user to safe alternate routes of
reasonable distance. Signs used for posting in such ((an)) areas
((shall)) must be consistent with the provisions found in the state of
Washington "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and
Highways" obtainable from the department of transportation. If safe
alternate routes of reasonable distance cannot be provided for
bicyclists and pedestrians, (a) public notice must be placed at the
site for a minimum of one week in advance of the work or (b)
arrangements must be made to transport bicyclists and pedestrians past
the construction, repair, maintenance, or utility zone.
(2) If the construction, repair, ((or)) maintenance, or utility
work includes or uses grooved pavement, abrupt lane edges, steel
plates, or gravel or earth surfaces, the construction, repair, ((or))
maintenance, or utility zone must be posted with signs stating the
condition, as required by current law, and in addition, must warn
motorcyclists of the potential hazard only if the hazard or condition
exists on a paved public highway, county road, street, bridge, or other
thoroughfare commonly traveled. For the purposes of this subsection,
the department shall adopt by rule a uniform sign or signs for this
purpose, including at least the following language, "MOTORCYCLES USE
EXTREME CAUTION."
(3) Any contractor, firm, corporation, political subdivision, or
other agency performing such work shall comply with this section.
(4) Each driver of a motor vehicle used in connection with such
construction, repair, ((or)) maintenance, or utility work shall obey
traffic signs posted for, and flaggers stationed at such location in
the same manner and under the same restrictions as is required for the
driver of any other vehicle.
(5) A violation of or a failure to comply with this section is a
misdemeanor. Each day upon which there is a violation, or there is a
failure to comply, constitutes a separate violation.

--- END ---