BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.80.010 and 2007 c 234 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Person" includes an individual, firm, copartnership,
corporation, company, or association or their lessees, trustees, or
receivers.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means any truck, trailer, semitrailer, tractor,
dump truck which uses a hydraulic or mechanical device to dump or
discharge its load, or any self-propelled or motor-driven vehicle used
upon any public highway of this state for the purpose of transporting
property, but not including baggage, mail, and express transported on
the vehicles of auto transportation companies carrying passengers.
(3) "Public highway" means every street, road, or highway in this
state.
(4) "Common carrier" means any person who undertakes to transport
property for the general public by motor vehicle for compensation,
whether over regular or irregular routes, or regular or irregular
schedules, including motor vehicle operations of other carriers by rail
or water and of express or forwarding companies.
(5) "Contract carrier" includes all motor vehicle operators not
included under the terms "common carrier" and "private carrier" as
defined in this section, and further includes any person who under
special and individual contracts or agreements transports property by
motor vehicle for compensation.
(6) A "private carrier" is a person who transports by his or her
own motor vehicle, with or without compensation, property which is
owned or is being bought or sold by the person, or property where the
person is the seller, purchaser, lessee, or bailee and the
transportation is incidental to and in furtherance of some other
primary business conducted by the person in good faith.
(7) "Motor carrier" includes "common carrier," "contract carrier,"
"private carrier," and "exempt carrier" as defined in this section.
(8) "Exempt carrier" means any person operating a vehicle exempted
under RCW 81.80.040.
(9) "Vehicle" means every device capable of being moved upon a
public highway and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or
may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, except devices moved
by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rail or
tracks.
(10) "Common carrier" and "contract carrier" includes persons
engaged in the business of providing, contracting for, or undertaking
to provide transportation of property for compensation over the public
highways of the state of Washington as brokers or forwarders.
(11) "Household goods carrier" means a person ((engaged in the
business of transporting)) who transports for compensation, by motor
vehicle within this state, or who advertises, solicits, offers, or
enters into an agreement to transport household goods as defined by the
commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.80.040 and 1993 c 121 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter, except where specifically
otherwise provided, and except the provisions providing for licenses,
shall not apply to:
(((1))) (a) Motor vehicles when operated in transportation
exclusively within the corporate limits of any city or town of less
than ten thousand population unless contiguous to a city or town of ten
thousand population or over, nor between contiguous cities or towns
both or all of which are less than ten thousand population;
(((2))) (b) Motor vehicles when operated in transportation wholly
within the corporate limits of cities or towns of ten thousand or more
but less than thirty thousand population, or between such cities or
towns when contiguous, as to which the commission, after investigation
and the issuance of an order thereon, has determined that no
substantial public interest exists which requires that such
transportation be subject to regulation under this chapter;
(((3))) (c) Motor vehicles when transporting exclusively the United
States mail or in the transportation of newspapers or periodicals;
(((4))) (d) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States,
the state of Washington, or any county, city, town, or municipality
therein, or by any department of them, or either of them;
(((5))) (e) Motor vehicles specially constructed for towing not
more than two disabled, unauthorized, or repossessed motor vehicles,
wrecking, or exchanging an operable vehicle for a disabled vehicle and
not otherwise used in transporting goods for compensation. For the
purposes of this subsection (1)(e), a vehicle is considered to be
repossessed only from the time of its actual repossession through the
end of its initial tow;
(((6))) (f) Motor vehicles normally owned and operated by farmers
in the transportation of their own farm, orchard, or dairy products,
including livestock and plant or animal wastes, from point of
production to market, or in the infrequent or seasonal transportation
by one farmer for another farmer, if their farms are located within
twenty miles of each other, of products of the farm, orchard, or dairy,
including livestock and plant or animal wastes, or of supplies or
commodities to be used on the farm, orchard, or dairy;
(((7))) (g) Motor vehicles when transporting exclusively water in
connection with construction projects only;
(((8))) (h) Motor vehicles of less than 8,000 pounds gross vehicle
weight when transporting exclusively legal documents, pleadings,
process, correspondence, depositions, briefs, medical records,
photographs, books or papers, cash or checks, when moving shipments of
the documents described at the direction of an attorney as part of
providing legal services.
(2) The exemptions set forth in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this
section do not apply to household goods carriers.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.80.070 and 2007 c 234 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A common carrier, contract carrier, or temporary carrier shall
not operate for the transportation of property for compensation in this
state without first obtaining from the commission a permit for such
operation.
(((a) For household goods:
(i) Permits issued to any carrier must be exercised by the carrier
to the fullest extent to render reasonable service to the public.
Applications for household goods carrier permits or permit extensions
must be on file for a period of at least thirty days before issuance
unless the commission finds that special conditions require earlier
issuance.
(ii) A permit or permit extension must be issued to any qualified
applicant, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered
by the application, if it is found that: The applicant is fit,
willing, and able to perform the services proposed and conform to this
chapter and the requirements, rules, and regulations of the commission;
the operations are consistent with the public interest; and, in the
case of common carriers, they are required by the present or future
public convenience and necessity; otherwise the application must be
denied.
(b) For general commodities other than household goods:
(i))) (2) The commission shall issue a common carrier permit to any
qualified applicant if it is found the applicant is fit, willing, and
able to perform the service and conform to the provisions of this
chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission.
(((ii))) (3) Before a permit is issued, the commission shall
require the applicant to establish safety fitness and proof of minimum
financial responsibility as provided in this chapter.
(((2) This chapter does not confer on any person or persons the
exclusive right or privilege of transporting property for compensation
over the public highways of the state.
(3) A common carrier, contract carrier, or temporary carrier
operating without the permit required in subsection (1) of this
section, or who violates a cease and desist order of the commission
issued under RCW 81.04.510, is subject to a penalty, under the process
set forth in RCW 81.04.405, of one thousand five hundred dollars.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 81.04.510, the commission may, in
conjunction with issuing the penalty set forth in subsection (3) of
this section, issue cease and desist orders to carriers operating
without the permit required in subsection (1) of this section, and to
all persons involved in the carriers' operations.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 81.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person shall engage in business as a household goods carrier
without first obtaining a household goods carrier permit from the
commission.
(2) Permits issued to any household goods carrier must be exercised
by the carrier to the fullest extent to render reasonable service to
the public. Applications for household goods carrier permits or permit
extensions must be on file for a period of at least thirty days before
issuance unless the commission finds that special conditions require
earlier issuance.
(3) The commission must issue a permit or permit extension to any
qualified applicant, authorizing the whole or any part of the
operations covered by the application, if it is found that: The
applicant is fit, willing, and able to perform the services proposed
and conform to this chapter and the requirements, rules, and
regulations of the commission; the operations are consistent with the
public interest; and, in the case of common carriers, they are required
by the present or future public convenience and necessity; otherwise,
the application must be denied.
(4) Any person who engages in business as a household goods carrier
in violation of subsection (1) of this section is subject to a penalty
of up to five thousand dollars per violation.
(a) If the basis for the violation is advertising, each
advertisement reproduced, broadcast, or displayed via a particular
medium constitutes a separate violation.
(b) In deciding the amount of penalty to be imposed per violation,
the commission shall consider the following factors:
(i) The carrier's willingness to comply with the requirements of
RCW 81.80.070 and the commission's rules under this chapter; and
(ii) The carrier's history with respect to compliance with this
section.
(5) Any person who engages in business as a household goods carrier
in violation of a cease and desist order issued by the commission under
RCW 81.04.510 is subject to a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars per
violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 81.80 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not confer on any person or persons the exclusive
right or privilege of transporting property for compensation over the
public highways of the state.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.80.357 and 1994 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person in the business of transporting household goods as
defined by the commission in intrastate commerce shall advertise
without listing the carrier's Washington utilities and transportation
commission permit number, physical address, and telephone number in the
advertisement.
(2) ((As of June 9, 1994,)) All advertising, contracts,
correspondence, cards, signs, posters, papers, and documents, including
web sites or other online advertising, which show a household goods
((motor)) carrier name ((or address)) shall also show the carrier's
Washington utilities and transportation commission permit number,
physical address, and telephone number. The alphabetized listing of
household ((good[s] motor)) goods carriers appearing in the advertising
sections of telephone books or other directories and all advertising
that shows the carrier's name or address shall show the carrier's
current Washington utilities and transportation commission permit
number.
(3) Radio or television advertising ((by electronic transmission))
need not contain the carrier's Washington utilities and transportation
commission permit number if the carrier provides its permit number,
physical address, and telephone number to the person selling the
advertisement and it is recorded in the advertising contract.
(4) No person shall falsify a Washington utilities and
transportation commission permit number or use a false or inaccurate
Washington utilities and transportation commission permit number in
connection with any solicitation or identification as an authorized
household goods ((motor)) carrier.
(5) If, upon investigation, the commission determines that a
((motor)) household goods carrier or person acting in the capacity of
a ((motor)) household goods carrier has violated this section, the
commission may issue a penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars for
every violation.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.80.280 and 2007 c 234 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Permits may be canceled, suspended, altered, or amended by the
commission upon complaint by any interested party, or upon the
commission's own motion after notice and opportunity for hearing, when
the permittee or permittee's agent has repeatedly violated this
chapter, the rules and regulations of the commission, or the motor laws
of this state or of the United States, or the household goods carrier
has made unlawful rebates or has not conducted its operation in
accordance with the permit. The commission may enjoin any person from
any violation of this chapter, or any order, rule, or regulation made
by the commission pursuant to the terms hereof. If the suit is
instituted by the commission, a bond is not required as a condition to
the issuance of the injunction.
(2) When the commission has canceled a household goods carrier
permit, the carrier must, when directed by the commission, provide
notice to every customer that its permit has been canceled, and provide
proof of such notice to the commission.

--- END ---