BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.230 and 2004 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine
importer, and wine distributor licensed under this title shall make
((monthly)) reports to the board of its operations, pursuant to ((the))
such regulations as the board may adopt. However, such reports,
including without limitation tax returns pursuant to RCW 66.24.210, may
not be required more frequently than annually from any domestic winery
that did not withdraw from its premises more than six thousand gallons
of wine subject to federal excise tax during the calendar year
preceding the date on which the report would otherwise be due. Such
domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine importer,
and wine distributor shall make no sales of wine within the state of
Washington except to the board, or as otherwise provided in this title.

--- END ---