BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
(1) By no later than December 31, 2010, the department shall
recalculate service credit for periods of qualifying prior service by
an eligible member, as provided for in this section.
(2) An eligible member is a member who is active in the retirement
system and who earns service credit after the effective date of this
section and before September 1, 2010.
(3) A qualifying period of prior service is a school year prior to
January 1, 1987, in which the member:
(a) Was employed in an eligible position by a school district or
districts, educational service district, the state school for the deaf,
the state school for the blind, an institution of higher education, or
a community college;
(b) Earned earnable compensation for at least six hundred thirty
hours as determined by the department;
(c) Received less than six months of service credit; and
(d) Has not withdrawn service credit for the school year or has
restored any withdrawn service credit for the school year.
(4) The department shall recalculate service credit for qualifying
periods of prior service for an eligible member as follows:
(a) The member shall receive one-half service credit month for each
month of the period from September through August of the following year
if he or she earned earnable compensation during that period for at
least six hundred thirty hours as determined by the department, and was
employed nine months of that period; and
(b) A member's service credit shall not be reduced under this
section for a qualifying period of prior service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
(1) By no later than December 31, 2010, the department shall
recalculate service credit for periods of qualifying prior service by
an eligible member, as provided for in this section.
(2) An eligible member is a member of plan 2 or 3 who is active in
the retirement system and who earns service credit after the effective
date of this section and before September 1, 2010.
(3) A qualifying period of prior service is a school year prior to
January 1, 1987, in which the member:
(a) Was employed in an eligible position by a school district or
districts, educational service district, the state school for the deaf,
the state school for the blind, an institution of higher education, or
a community college;
(b) Earned earnable compensation for at least six hundred thirty
hours as determined by the department;
(c) Received less than six months of service credit; and
(d) Has not withdrawn service credit for the school year or has
restored any withdrawn service credit for the school year.
(4) The department shall recalculate service credit for qualifying
periods of prior service for an eligible member as follows:
(a) The member shall receive one-half service credit month for each
month of the period from September through August of the following year
if he or she earned earnable compensation during that period for at
least six hundred thirty hours as determined by the department, and was
employed nine months of that period; and
(b) A member's service credit shall not be reduced under this
section for a qualifying period of prior service.

--- END ---