BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.035 and 2004 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic
assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;
(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or
longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;
(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;
and
(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25
percent for the public employees' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system. The assumption shall be .90 percent
for the teachers' retirement system.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, the following long-term economic
assumption for growth in salaries, exclusive of merit or longevity
increases, shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030: 4.25 percent for the public employees' retirement system,
the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system, the school employees'
retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, and
the Washington state patrol retirement system.
(3)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003,
changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment
rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of
assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the
magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return
relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with
actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of
assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the
market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy
percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date.
Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing
technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness
of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to
the legislature as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---