BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.017 and 2007 c 487 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar death
benefit shall be paid as a sundry claim to the estate of an employee of
any state agency, the common school system of the state, or institution
of higher education who dies as a result of (1) injuries sustained in
the course of employment; or (2) an occupational disease or infection
that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under
this chapter, and is not otherwise provided a death benefit through
coverage under their enrolled retirement system under chapter 402, Laws
of 2003. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be
made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
director of the department of general administration by order under RCW
51.52.050.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.24.160 and 2001 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a participant dies as the result of injuries
received, or sickness contracted in consequence or as the result of the
performance of his or her duties, the board of trustees shall order and
direct the payment from the principal fund of (i) the sum of ((one
hundred fifty-two)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollars to his widow
or her widower, or if there is no widow or widower, then to his or her
dependent child or children, or if there is no dependent child or
children, then to his or her dependent parents or either of them, or if
there are no dependent parents or parent, then the death benefit shall
be paid to the member's estate, and (ii)(A) the sum of one thousand two
hundred seventy-five dollars per month to his widow or her widower
during his or her life together with the additional monthly sum of one
hundred ten dollars for each child of the member, unemancipated or
under eighteen years of age, dependent upon the member for support at
the time of his or her death, (B) to a maximum total of two thousand
five hundred fifty dollars per month.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2001, and each July 1st thereafter, the
compensation amount specified in (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price
index, calculated as follows: The index for the calendar year
preceding the year in which the July calculation is made, to be known
as "calendar year A," is divided by the index for the calendar year
preceding calendar year A, and the resulting ratio is multiplied by the
compensation amount in effect on June 30th immediately preceding the
July 1st on which the respective calculation is made. For the purposes
of this subsection, "index" means the same as the definition in RCW
2.12.037(1).
(2) If the widow or widower does not have legal custody of one or
more dependent children of the deceased participant or if, after the
death of the participant, legal custody of such child or children
passes from the widow or widower to another person, any payment on
account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the widow
or widower shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody
of such child or children. Such payments on account of such child or
children shall be subtracted from the amount to which such widow or
widower would have been entitled had such widow or widower had legal
custody of all the children and the widow or widower shall receive the
remainder after such payments on account of such child or children have
been subtracted. If there is no widow or widower, or the widow or
widower dies while there are children, unemancipated or under eighteen
years of age, then the amount of one thousand two hundred seventy-five
dollars per month shall be paid for the youngest or only child together
with an additional one hundred ten dollars per month for each
additional of such children to a maximum of two thousand five hundred
fifty dollars per month until they become emancipated or reach the age
of eighteen years; and if there are no widow or widower, child, or
children entitled thereto, then to his or her parents or either of them
the sum of one thousand two hundred seventy-five dollars per month for
life, if it is proved to the satisfaction of the board that the
parents, or either of them, were dependent on the deceased for their
support at the time of his or her death. In any instance in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if the widow or widower, child
or children, or the parents, or either of them, marries while receiving
such pension the person so marrying shall thereafter receive no further
pension from the fund.
(3) In the case provided for in this section, the monthly payment
provided may be converted in whole or in part into a lump sum payment,
not in any case to exceed twelve thousand dollars, equal or
proportionate, as the case may be, to the actuarial equivalent of the
monthly payment in which event the monthly payments shall cease in
whole or in part accordingly or proportionately. Such conversion may
be made either upon written application to the state board and shall
rest in the discretion of the state board; or the state board is
authorized to make, and authority is given it to make, on its own
motion, lump sum payments, equal or proportionate, as the case may be,
to the value of the annuity then remaining in full satisfaction of
claims due to dependents. Within the rule under this subsection the
amount and value of the lump sum payment may be agreed upon between the
applicant and the state board.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.053 and 2007 c 487 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such
designated person or persons are still living at the time of the
member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated
by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.35.115 and 2007 c 487 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such
designated person or persons are still living at the time of the
member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated
by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.37.110 and 2007 c 487 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or
persons, trust, or organization the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If the
designated person or persons are not still living at the time of the
member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated
by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.0931 and 2007 c 487 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit for members who had the opportunity to transfer to the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system pursuant
to chapter 502, Laws of 1993, but elected to remain in the public
employees' retirement system, shall be paid to the member's estate, or
such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member has
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. If there is no designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, the member's death benefit shall be
paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been
nominated by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse,
then to the member's legal representatives.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the benefit under
this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of (a)
injuries sustained in the course of employment as a general authority
police officer; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.
(3) The benefit under this section shall not be paid in the event
the member was in the act of committing a felony when the fatal
injuries were suffered.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.40.0932 and 2007 c 487 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such
designated person or persons are still living at the time of the
member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated
by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to the benefits of all
members killed in the course of employment since January 1, 2009.

--- END ---