BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 During the 2009 legislative interim, the
Washington state institute for public policy, with the assistance and
support of the office of the state actuary, shall study the options
available to the legislature for addressing the needs of members of the
public employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, and the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, to have adequate disability
benefit coverage through disability benefits under the public pension
systems, through access to long-term disability insurance coverage, or
a combination of both. Options could include but are not limited to
recommended statutory changes to the public pension systems, an
insurance product available to all members administered by a state
agency, expansion of eligibility for the current long-term disability
benefits offered by the public employees' benefits board, or other
options as developed by the institute. The institute shall report the
findings and recommendations of its study to the select committee on
pension policy no later than November 1, 2009.

--- END ---