BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.270 and 2003 c 155 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, should
a member die before the date of retirement the amount of the
accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the
employees' savings fund, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, at the time of death:
(a) Shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or
(b) If there be no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, or if a member fails to file a new
beneficiary designation subsequent to marriage, remarriage, dissolution
of marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of membership following
termination by withdrawal or retirement, such accumulated
contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the surviving spouse as if in
fact such spouse had been nominated by written designation as
aforesaid, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) Upon the death ((in service, or while on authorized leave of
absence for a period not to exceed one hundred and twenty days from the
date of payroll separation,)) of any member who is qualified but has
not applied for a service retirement allowance or has completed ten
years of service at the time of death, the designated beneficiary, or
the surviving spouse as provided in subsection (1) of this section, may
elect to waive the payment provided by subsection (1) of this section.
Upon such an election, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option
under RCW 41.40.188, calculated under the retirement allowance
described in RCW 41.40.185 or 41.40.190, whichever is greater,
actuarially reduced, except under subsection (5) of this section, by
the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670 shall automatically be given effect as if
selected for the benefit of the designated beneficiary. If the member
is not then qualified for a service retirement allowance, such benefit
shall be based upon the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to
pay the accrued regular retirement allowance commencing when the
deceased member would have first qualified for a service retirement
allowance.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section, unless elected, shall not apply
to any member who has applied for service retirement in RCW 41.40.180,
as now or hereafter amended, and thereafter dies between the date of
separation from service and the member's effective retirement date,
where the member has selected a survivorship option under RCW
41.40.188. In those cases the beneficiary named in the member's final
application for service retirement may elect to receive either a cash
refund, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, or monthly payments according to the option
selected by the member.
(4) If a member dies within sixty days following application for
disability retirement under RCW 41.40.230, the beneficiary named in the
application may elect to receive the benefit provided by:
(a) This section; or
(b) RCW 41.40.235, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.40.188 in the disability application.
(5) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial reduction. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.40.185.

--- END ---