BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the penalties provided by this chapter, an
employer performing services that require registration under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28 RCW who violates RCW
51.14.010 may be subject to a stop work order issued under this
section.
(2) If the director determines after an investigation that an
employer is in violation of RCW 51.14.010, the director may issue a
stop work order against the employer requiring the cessation of
business operations of the employer. Service of the order must be in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(3) When a stop work order is served on a worksite by posting a
copy of the stop work order in a conspicuous location at the worksite,
it is effective as to the employer's operations on that worksite. When
a stop work order is served on the employer, the order is effective to
all employer worksites for which the employer is not in compliance.
Business operations of the employer must cease immediately upon service
consistent with the stop work order. The order remains in effect until
the director issues an order releasing the stop work order upon finding
that the employer has come into compliance and has paid any premiums,
penalties, and interest under this title or issues an order of
conditional release pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(4) An employer who violates a stop work order is subject to a one
thousand dollar penalty for each day not in compliance.
(5) An employer against whom a stop work order has been issued may
request reconsideration from the department or may appeal to the board
of industrial insurance appeals. The request must be made in writing
to the department or the board within ten days of receiving the stop
work order at the worksite or in person. If the department conducts a
reconsideration, it must be concluded within ten days of receiving the
request for reconsideration by the employer. The stop work order
remains in effect during the period of reconsideration or appeal,
unless the employer furnishes to the department a cash deposit or bond
in the amount of five thousand dollars or one thousand dollars per
covered worker identified, whichever is greater. At time of a final
order upholding a stop work order, the bond or cash deposit will be
seized and applied to the premium, penalty, and interest balance of
that employer. In an appeal before the board, the appellant has the
burden of proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case
for the relief sought in such appeal. RCW 51.52.080 through 51.52.106
govern appeals under this section. Further appeals taken from a final
decision of the board under this section are governed by the provisions
relating to judicial review of administrative decisions contained in
RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, and the department has the same right
of review from the board's decisions as do employers.
(6) The director may issue an order of conditional release from the
stop work order if the employer has complied with the coverage
requirements of this title and agreed to pay premiums, penalties, and
interest through a payment schedule. If the terms of the schedule are
not met, the stop work order may be reinstated and the unpaid balance
will become due.
(7) Stop work orders and penalties assessed under this chapter
remain in effect against any successor corporation or business entity
that has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer
against whom the stop work order was issued and which is engaged in the
same or equivalent trade or activity.
(8) The department may adopt rules to carry out this section.

--- END ---