BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
A contractor must maintain and have available for inspection by the
department a list of all direct subcontractors and a copy of their
certificate of registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
A city, town, or county shall not approve or issue a business
license to a person required to be registered under this chapter
without verifying that the person is registered under this chapter.
The department of licensing shall conduct the verification for cities
that participate in the master license system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city shall not approve or issue a business license to a person
required to be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW without verifying
that the person is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW. The department
of licensing shall conduct the verification for cities that participate
in the master license system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city shall not approve or issue a business license to a person
required to be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW without verifying
that the person is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW. The department
of licensing shall conduct the verification for cities that participate
in the master license system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A county shall not issue a business license to a person required to
be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW without verifying that the person
is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing shall verify contractor registration as
provided under section 2 of this act for local governments that
participate in the master license system.

Sec. 7 RCW 60.28.011 and 2007 c 494 s 504 and 2007 c 218 s 92 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Public improvement contracts shall provide, and public bodies
shall reserve, a contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the
moneys earned by the contractor as a trust fund for the protection and
payment of: (a) The claims of any person arising under the contract;
and (b) the state with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to Titles 50,
51, and 82 RCW which may be due from such contractor.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract shall have a lien upon
moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant
shall be given within forty-five days of completion of the contract
work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract shall be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
shall issue a check representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable
to the bank or trust company and the contractor jointly. This check
shall be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the contractor
and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities shall be
held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities shall be paid to
the contractor as the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body. The
public body shall accept a bond meeting these requirements unless the
public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing to accept it. This
bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims and liens and
in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages
in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of
the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting
the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of sixty days
following the completion. In the event that the work is terminated
before final completion as provided in this section, the public body
may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same contractor to
perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount equal to or
less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this
chapter are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and
regulations in conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.020 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes shall be
certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty
days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue, the employment security department, the department of labor
and industries, and the material suppliers and laborers filing claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
39.10.210. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the project has
been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the
work, the public body may accept the completion of the subcontract.
The public body must give public notice of this acceptance. After a
forty-five day period for giving notice of liens, and compliance with
the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021, the public body may
release that portion of the retained funds associated with the
subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the forty-five
day period are not valid.
(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in RCW 39.10.210.

Sec. 8 RCW 60.28.021 and 2007 c 218 s 94 are each amended to read
as follows:
After the expiration of the forty-five day period for giving notice
of lien provided in RCW 60.28.011(2), and after receipt of the
((department of revenue's)) certificates of the department of revenue,
the employment security department, and the department of labor and
industries, and the public body is satisfied that the taxes certified
as due or to become due by the department of revenue, the employment
security department, and the department of labor and industries are
discharged, and the claims of material suppliers and laborers who have
filed their claims, together with a sum sufficient to defray the cost
of foreclosing the liens of such claims, and to pay attorneys' fees,
have been paid, the public body may withhold from the remaining
retained amounts for claims the public body may have against the
contractor and shall pay the balance, if any, to the contractor the
fund retained by it or release to the contractor the securities and
bonds held in escrow.
If such taxes have not been discharged or the claims, expenses, and
fees have not been paid, the public body shall either retain in its
fund, or in an interest bearing account, or retain in escrow, at the
option of the contractor, an amount equal to such unpaid taxes and
unpaid claims together with a sum sufficient to defray the costs and
attorney fees incurred in foreclosing the lien of such claims, and
shall pay, or release from escrow, the remainder to the contractor.

Sec. 9 RCW 60.28.040 and 1985 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the amount of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's successors or assignees with
respect to a public improvement contract wherein the contract price is
twenty thousand dollars or more, shall be a lien prior to all other
liens upon the amount of the retained percentage withheld by the
disbursing officer under such contract((, except that)).
(2) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, after payment of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's successors or assignees with
respect to a public improvement contract wherein the contract price is
twenty thousand dollars or more, the amount of all other taxes,
increases, and penalties under Title 82 RCW, due and owing from the
contractor, shall be a lien prior to all other liens upon the amount of
the retained percentage withheld by the disbursing officer under such
contract.
(3) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, after payment of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, the amount of all premiums, taxes, and penalties due or to become
due under Titles 50 and 51 RCW from the contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees with respect to a public improvement contract
wherein the contract price is twenty thousand dollars or more shall be
a lien prior to all other liens upon the amount of the retained
percentage withheld by the disbursing officer under such contract.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the amount of all
other taxes, increases, and penalties due and owing from the contractor
shall be a lien upon the balance of such retained percentage remaining
in the possession of the disbursing officer after all other statutory
lien claims have been paid.
(5) The employees of a contractor or the contractor's successors or
assignees who have not been paid the prevailing wage under such a
public improvement contract shall have a first priority lien against
the bond or retainage prior to all other liens. ((The amount of all
other taxes, increases and penalties due and owing from the contractor
shall be a lien upon the balance of such retained percentage remaining
in the possession of the disbursing officer after all other statutory
lien claims have been paid.))

Sec. 10 RCW 60.28.051 and 2007 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon completion of a contract, the state, county, or other
municipal officer charged with the duty of disbursing or authorizing
disbursement or payment of such contracts shall forthwith notify the
department of revenue, the employment security department, and the
department of labor and industries of the completion of contracts over
thirty-five thousand dollars. Such officer shall not make any payment
from the retained percentage fund or release any retained percentage
escrow account to any person, until he or she has received from the
department of revenue ((a)), the employment security department, and
the department of labor and industries certificates that all taxes,
increases, and penalties due from the contractor, and all taxes due and
to become due with respect to such contract have been paid in full or
that they are, in ((the)) each department's opinion, readily
collectible without recourse to the state's lien on the retained
percentage.

Sec. 11 RCW 60.28.060 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 25 are each amended
to read as follows:
If within thirty days after receipt of notice by the department of
revenue, the employment security department, and the department of
labor and industries of the completion of the contract, the amount of
all taxes, increases and penalties due from the contractor or any of
his successors or assignees or to become due with respect to such
contract have not been paid, the department of revenue, the employment
security department, and the department of labor and industries may
certify to the disbursing officer the amount of all taxes, increases
and penalties due from the contractor, together with the amount of all
taxes due and to become due with respect to the contract and may
request payment thereof ((to the department of revenue)) in accordance
with the priority provided by this chapter. The disbursing officer
shall within ten days after receipt of such certificate and request pay
to the department of revenue, the employment security department, and
the department of labor and industries the amount of all taxes,
increases and penalties certified to be due or to become due with
respect to the particular contract, and, after payment of all claims
which by statute are a lien upon the retained percentage withheld by
the disbursing officer, shall pay to the departments ((of revenue)) the
balance, if any, or so much thereof as shall be necessary to satisfy
the claim of the department of revenue for the balance of all taxes,
increases or penalties shown to be due by the certificate of the
department of revenue. If the contractor owes no taxes imposed
pursuant to Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW, the department of revenue, the
employment security department, and the department of labor and
industries shall so certify to the disbursing officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall conduct education and outreach to employers on
workers' compensation requirements and premium responsibilities,
including independent contractor issues. The department shall work
with new employers on an individual basis and also establish mass
education campaigns.

Sec. 13 RCW 50.12.070 and 2008 c 120 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work
records, containing such information as the commissioner may prescribe.
Such records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied
by the commissioner or his or her authorized representatives at any
reasonable time and as often as may be necessary. The commissioner may
require from any employing unit any sworn or unsworn reports with
respect to persons employed by it, which he or she deems necessary for
the effective administration of this title.
(b) An employer who contracts with another person or entity for
work subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a
record of the unified business identifier account number for and
compensation paid to the person or entity performing the work. In
addition to the penalty in subsection (3) of this section, failure to
obtain or maintain the record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 ((and to a
penalty determined by the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars, to be collected as provided in RCW 50.24.120)).
(2)(a) Each employer shall register with the department and obtain
an employment security account number. Registration must include the
names and social security numbers of the owners, partners, members, or
corporate officers of the business, as well as their mailing addresses
and telephone numbers and other information the commissioner may by
rule prescribe. Registration of corporations must also include the
percentage of stock ownership for each corporate officer, delineated by
zero percent, less than ten percent, or ten percent or more. Any
changes in the owners, partners, members, or corporate officers of the
business, and changes in percentage of ownership of the outstanding
shares of stock of the corporation, must be reported to the department
at intervals prescribed by the commissioner under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) Each employer shall make periodic reports at such intervals as
the commissioner may by regulation prescribe, setting forth the
remuneration paid for employment to workers in its employ, the full
names and social security numbers of all such workers, and the total
hours worked by each worker and such other information as the
commissioner may by regulation prescribe.
(c) If the employing unit fails or has failed to report the number
of hours in a reporting period for which a worker worked, such number
will be computed by the commissioner and given the same force and
effect as if it had been reported by the employing unit. In computing
the number of such hours worked, the total wages for the reporting
period, as reported by the employing unit, shall be divided by the
dollar amount of the state's minimum wage in effect for such reporting
period and the quotient, disregarding any remainder, shall be credited
to the worker: PROVIDED, That although the computation so made will
not be subject to appeal by the employing unit, monetary entitlement
may be redetermined upon request if the department is provided with
credible evidence of the actual hours worked. Benefits paid using
computed hours are not considered an overpayment and are not subject to
collections when the correction of computed hours results in an invalid
or reduced claim; however:
(i) A contribution paying employer who fails to report the number
of hours worked will have its experience rating account charged for all
benefits paid that are based on hours computed under this subsection;
and
(ii) An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid to
workers and fails to report the number of hours worked shall reimburse
the trust fund for all benefits paid that are based on hours computed
under this subsection.
(3) Any employer who fails to keep and preserve records required by
this section shall be subject to a penalty determined by the
commissioner but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars or two hundred
percent of the quarterly tax for each offense, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) An interagency advisory committee on
the underground economy is created. The committee shall conduct a
continuing study of the underground economy with the goal of reducing
or eliminating the underground economy in this state.
(2) The committee is composed of:
(a) One representative each from the department of labor and
industries, the employment security department, and the department of
revenue;
(b) One representative of cities, appointed by an association of
cities and one representative of counties, appointed by an association
of counties; and
(c) Three representatives each of labor and employers, appointed by
the director of the department of labor and industries.
(3) Members shall serve a term of three years beginning on
September 1, 2009, except that the terms of the members representing
labor and employers shall be staggered so that the term of one member
appointed from each group expires in two years and the term of one
member appointed from each group expires in one year. Vacancies shall
be filled in the same manner as initial appointments.
(4) The member representing the department of labor and industries
shall serve as chair.
(5) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the
committee shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on its findings and recommendations.
(6) In conducting its continuing study, the committee may consider,
but is not limited to the following issues:
(a) Shortening of reporting times for new hire reporting under RCW
26.23.040 as a means of improving state agency data cross-matching
capabilities and usefulness;
(b) Modifying resale certificate provisions;
(c) Requiring contractors to place subcontractor unified business
identifier numbers on checks;
(d) Establishing penalties for owners who intentionally do not
follow the law;
(e) Establishing penalties for persons who offer or accept
undocumented cash payment;
(f) Enhancing funding for the master business application system;
(g) Requiring photo identification for contractor registration and
renewal;
(h) Requiring new and out-of-state contractors to attend a
contractor training class before registration;
(i) Requiring contractors to attend continuing education;
(j) Creating effective sanctions for contractor registration
violations; and
(k) Establishing additional benchmarks and measures for purposes of
section 15 of this act.
(7) Members, except those representing an employer or organization,
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(8) The department of labor and industries, the employment security
department, and the department of revenue shall coordinate and provide
staff support for the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department of labor and industries, the
employment security department, and the department of revenue shall
coordinate and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 1st of each year on the effectiveness of efforts
implemented since July 1, 2008, to address the underground economy.
The agencies shall use benchmarks and measures established by the
institute for public policy and other measures it determines
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 14 and 15 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 13 of this act takes effect October
1, 2009.

--- END ---