BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.105.430 and 2005 c 155 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The abutting residential owner to state-owned shorelands,
tidelands, or related beds of navigable waters, other than harbor
areas, may install and maintain without charge a dock on the areas if
used exclusively for private recreational purposes and the area is not
subject to prior rights, including any rights of upland, tideland, or
shoreland owners as provided in RCW 79.125.400, 79.125.460, 79.125.410,
and 79.130.010.
(b) The dock cannot be sold or leased separately from the upland
residence. The dock cannot be used to moor boats for commercial or
residential use. ((This))
(c) The permission granted in this section to install and maintain
a dock is subject to applicable local, state, and federal rules and
regulations governing location, design, construction, size, and length
of the dock.
(d) The permission granted in this section to install and maintain
a dock extends to permission to install and maintain a boat lift, or
other construction primarily used to provide safe moorage for a boat or
to safely remove and store a boat above the water level, that is
intended to operate in conjunction or association with the dock.
(e) Nothing in this subsection (1) prevents the abutting owner from
obtaining a lease if otherwise provided by law.
(2) The abutting residential owner to state-owned shorelands,
tidelands, or related beds of navigable waters, other than harbor
areas, may install and maintain a mooring buoy without charge if the
boat that is moored to the buoy is used for private recreational
purposes, the area is not subject to prior rights, including any rights
of upland, tideland, or shoreland owners as provided in RCW 79.125.400,
79.125.460, 79.125.410, and 79.130.010, and the buoy will not obstruct
the use of mooring buoys previously authorized by the department.
(a) The buoy must be located as near to the upland residence as
practical, consistent with applicable rules and regulations and the
provisions of this section. The buoy must be located, or relocated if
necessary, to accommodate the use of lawfully installed and maintained
buoys.
(b) If two or more residential owners, who otherwise qualify for
free use under the provisions of this section, are in dispute over
assertion of rights to install and maintain a mooring buoy in the same
location, they may seek formal settlement through adjudication in
superior court for the county in which the buoy site is located. In
the adjudication, preference must be given to the residential owner
that first installed and continually maintained and used a buoy on that
site, if it meets all applicable rules, regulations, and provisions of
this section, and then to the owner of the residential property nearest
the site. Nothing in this section requires the department to mediate
or otherwise resolve disputes between residential owners over the use
of the same site for a mooring buoy.
(c) The buoy cannot be sold or leased separately from the abutting
residential property. The buoy cannot be used to moor boats for
commercial or residential use, nor to moor boats over sixty feet in
length.
(d) If the department determines that it is necessary for secure
moorage, the abutting residential owner may install and maintain a
second mooring buoy, under the same provisions as the first, the use of
which is limited to a second mooring line to the boat moored at the
first buoy.
(e) The permission granted in this subsection (2) is subject to
applicable local, state, and federal rules and regulations governing
location, design, installation, maintenance, and operation of the
mooring buoy, anchoring system, and moored boat. Nothing in this
subsection (2) prevents a boat owner from obtaining a lease if
otherwise provided by law. This subsection (2) also applies to areas
that have been designated by the commissioner or the fish and wildlife
commission as aquatic reserves.
(3) This permission to install and maintain a recreational dock or
mooring buoy may be revoked by the department, or the department may
direct the owner of a recreational dock or mooring buoy to relocate
their dock or buoy, if the department makes a finding of public
necessity to protect waterward access, ingress rights of other
landowners, public health or safety, or public resources.
Circumstances prompting a finding of public necessity may include, but
are not limited to, the dock, buoy, anchoring system, or boat posing a
hazard or obstruction to navigation or fishing, contributing to
degradation of aquatic habitat, or contributing to decertification of
shellfish beds otherwise suitable for commercial or recreational
harvest. The revocation may be appealed as provided for under RCW
79.105.160.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes a boat owner to abandon a
vessel at a recreational dock, mooring buoy, or elsewhere.

--- END ---