BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Oregon does
not charge any fees for their farm structures and there is a need for
farmers in Washington to have competitive parity with our neighboring
state.
(2) In some instances, local governments are charging more for the
permit fee than it takes to buy the materials and construction of farm
structures, like a pole barn. Local governments benefit from the
improvements by having a new source of property tax revenue by the
creation of the new structure that generates revenues for many years.
(3) The legislature intends that first-year taxes paid on the new
farm structure be used to offset any permit and inspection fees the
county planning department would charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties may not impose permit fees or inspection charges for
the construction or remodel of agricultural structures.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act,
"agricultural structure" means a structure designed and constructed to
house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock, or other
horticultural products. This structure may not be:
(a) A place of human habitation;
(b) A place of employment where agricultural products are
processed, treated, or packaged;
(c) A place used by the public;
(d) A climate controlled building; or
(e) A structure used for purposes other than growing plants in
which ten or more persons are present at any one time.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 2 of this act, nothing in this
chapter shall prohibit a city, town, or county of the state from
imposing fees different from those set forth in the state building
code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.40 RCW
to read as follows:
An amount equal to any reduction in revenue resulting from the
agricultural structure permit fee and inspection charge exemptions
specified in section 2 of this act must be allocated from the county
general levy imposed on the agricultural structure to the county
planning department.

--- END ---