BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of appropriation and allocation of state funds
to school districts, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall calculate annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment as provided in this section.
(2) For the following allocations, the calculation of annual
average full-time equivalent student enrollment for a school year shall
be based on a three-year average comprising the annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in the school year for which the
calculation is made and the annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment in the prior two school years:
(a) Beginning with the allocations for the 2009-10 school year:
The basic education allocation under RCW 28A.150.260 and allocations
for the program for highly capable students under chapter 28A.185 RCW;
and
(b) Beginning with the allocations for the 2010-11 school year:
Allocations based on annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollments in the prior school year calculated as provided under this
subsection (2) from the student achievement fund under RCW 28A.505.220
and for the learning assistance program under chapter 28A.165 RCW.
(3) For the following allocations and any, unless otherwise
specified, other allocations of funds based on full-time equivalent
student enrollment, the calculation of annual average full-time
equivalent student enrollment for a school year shall be based on
enrollment in the school year for which the calculation is made: The
special education excess cost allocation under RCW 28A.150.390 and
allocations for educational programs for students in residential
schools under chapter 28A.190 RCW.

--- END ---