BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.118.021 and 2007 c 425 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means new motor vehicle arbitration board.
(2) "Collateral charges" means any sales or lease related charges
including but not limited to sales tax, use tax, arbitration service
fees, unused license fees, unused registration fees, unused title fees,
finance charges, prepayment penalties, credit disability and credit
life insurance costs not otherwise refundable, any other insurance
costs prorated for time out of service, transportation charges, dealer
preparation charges, or any other charges for service contracts,
undercoating, rustproofing, or factory or dealer installed options.
(3) "Condition" means a general problem that results from a defect
or malfunction of one or more parts, or their improper installation by
the manufacturer, its agents, or the new motor vehicle dealer.
(4) "Consumer" means any person who has entered into an agreement
or contract for the transfer, lease, or purchase of a new motor
vehicle, other than for purposes of resale or sublease, during the
duration of the warranty period defined under this section.
(5) "Court" means the superior court in the county where the
consumer resides, except if the consumer does not reside in this state,
then the superior court in the county where an arbitration hearing or
determination was conducted or made pursuant to this chapter.
(6) "Incidental costs" means any reasonable expenses incurred by
the consumer in connection with the repair of the new motor vehicle,
including any towing charges and the costs of obtaining alternative
transportation.
(7) "Manufacturer" means any person engaged in the business of
constructing or assembling new motor vehicles or engaged in the
business of importing new motor vehicles into the United States for the
purpose of selling or distributing new motor vehicles to new motor
vehicle dealers. "Manufacturer" does not include any person engaged in
the business of set-up of motorcycles as an agent of a new motor
vehicle dealer if the person does not otherwise construct or assemble
motorcycles.
(8) "Motorcycle" means any motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330
which has an engine displacement of at least seven hundred fifty cubic
centimeters.
(9) "Motor home" means a vehicular unit designed to provide
temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use,
built on or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle
chassis or on a chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the
completed vehicle.
(10) "Motor home manufacturer" means the first stage manufacturer,
the component manufacturer, and the final stage manufacturer.
(a) "First stage manufacturer" means a person who manufactures
incomplete new motor vehicles such as chassis, chassis cabs, or vans,
that are directly warranted by the first stage manufacturer to the
consumer, and are completed by a final stage manufacturer into a motor
home.
(b) "Component manufacturer" means a person who manufactures
components used in the manufacture or assembly of a chassis, chassis
cab, or van that is completed into a motor home and whose components
are directly warranted by the component manufacturer to the consumer.
(c) "Final stage manufacturer" means a person who assembles,
installs, or permanently affixes a body, cab, or equipment to an
incomplete new motor vehicle such as a chassis, chassis cab, or van
provided by a first stage manufacturer, to complete the vehicle into a
motor home.
(11) "New motor vehicle" means any new self-propelled vehicle,
including a new motorcycle, primarily designed for the transportation
of persons or property over the public highways that was originally
purchased or leased at retail from a new motor vehicle dealer or
leasing company in this state, but does not include vehicles purchased
or leased by a business as part of a fleet of ten or more vehicles at
one time or under a single purchase or lease agreement. ((If the motor
vehicle is a motor home, this chapter shall apply to the self-propelled
vehicle and chassis, but does not include those portions of the vehicle
designated, used, or maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office,
or commercial space.)) The term "new motor vehicle" does not include
trucks with nineteen thousand pounds or more gross vehicle weight
rating. The term "new motor vehicle" includes a demonstrator or lease-purchase vehicle as long as a manufacturer's warranty was issued as a
condition of sale.
(12) "New motor vehicle dealer" means a person who holds a dealer
agreement with a manufacturer for the sale of new motor vehicles, who
is engaged in the business of purchasing, selling, servicing,
exchanging, or dealing in new motor vehicles, and who is licensed or
required to be licensed as a vehicle dealer by the state of Washington.
(13) "Nonconformity" means a defect, serious safety defect, or
condition that substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of a new
motor vehicle, but does not include a defect or condition that is the
result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized modification or alteration of
the new motor vehicle.
(14) "Purchase price" means the cash price of the new motor vehicle
appearing in the sales agreement or contract.
(a) "Purchase price" in the instance of a lease means the actual
written capitalized cost disclosed to the consumer contained in the
lease agreement. If there is no disclosed capitalized cost in the
lease agreement the "purchase price" is the manufacturer's suggested
retail price including manufacturer installed accessories or items of
optional equipment displayed on the manufacturer label, required by 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1232.
(b) "Purchase price" in the instance of both a vehicle purchase or
lease agreement includes any allowance for a trade-in vehicle but does
not include any manufacturer-to-consumer rebate appearing in the
agreement or contract that the consumer received or that was applied to
reduce the purchase or lease cost.
Where the consumer is a subsequent transferee and the consumer
selects repurchase of the motor vehicle, "purchase price" means the
consumer's subsequent purchase price. Where the consumer is a
subsequent transferee and the consumer selects replacement of the motor
vehicle, "purchase price" means the original purchase price.
(15) "Reasonable offset for use" means the definition provided in
RCW 19.118.041(1)(c) for a new motor vehicle other than a new
motorcycle. The reasonable offset for use for a new motorcycle shall
be computed by the number of miles that the vehicle traveled before the
manufacturer's acceptance of the vehicle upon repurchase or replacement
multiplied by the purchase price, and divided by twenty-five thousand.
(16) "Reasonable number of attempts" means the definition provided
in RCW 19.118.041.
(17) "Replacement motor vehicle" means a new motor vehicle that is
identical or reasonably equivalent to the motor vehicle to be replaced,
as the motor vehicle to be replaced existed at the time of original
purchase or lease, including any service contract, undercoating,
rustproofing, and factory or dealer installed options.
(18) "Serious safety defect" means a life-threatening malfunction
or nonconformity that impedes the consumer's ability to control or
operate the new motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonable intended
purposes or creates a risk of fire or explosion.
(19) "Subsequent transferee" means a consumer who acquires a motor
vehicle, within the warranty period, as defined in this section, with
an applicable manufacturer's written warranty and where the vehicle
otherwise met the definition of a new motor vehicle at the time of
original retail sale or lease.
(20) "Substantially impair" means to render the new motor vehicle
unreliable, or unsafe for ordinary use, or to diminish the resale value
of the new motor vehicle below the average resale value for comparable
motor vehicles.
(21) "Warranty" means any implied warranty, any written warranty of
the manufacturer, or any affirmation of fact or promise made by the
manufacturer in connection with the sale of a new motor vehicle that
becomes part of the basis of the bargain. The term "warranty" pertains
to the obligations of the manufacturer in relation to materials,
workmanship, and fitness of a new motor vehicle for ordinary use or
reasonably intended purposes throughout the duration of the warranty
period as defined under this section.
(22) "Warranty period" means the period ending two years after the
date of the original delivery to the consumer of a new motor vehicle,
or the first twenty-four thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs
first.

--- END ---