BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2007 c 354 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through no
later than the graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from
high school without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved objective
alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed for
eligible special education students;
(b) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
((additional)) high school mathematics credit or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning ((and continue to take the appropriate mathematics assessment
at least once annually until graduation)); and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two ((additional)) mathematics credits or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the
student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
mathematics standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment
of student learning ((and continue to take the appropriate mathematics
assessment at least once annually until graduation)).
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of this section with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply. The
state board of education's authority under this section does not alter
the requirement that any change in performance standards for the tenth
grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3) This section expires August 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---