BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.04.405 and 2001 c 294 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee, certificate holder, or licensed firm, or any of
their employees shall not disclose any confidential information
obtained in the course of a professional transaction except with the
consent of the client or former client or as disclosure may be required
by law, legal process, the standards of the profession, or as
disclosure of confidential information is permitted by RCW 18.04.350
(((3))) (7) and (((4))) (8), 18.04.295(8), 18.04.390, and this section
in connection with quality assurance, or peer reviews, investigations,
and any proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) This section shall not be construed as limiting the authority
of this state or of the United States or an agency of this state, the
board, or of the United States to subpoena and use such confidential
information obtained by a licensee, or any of their employees in the
course of a professional transaction in connection with any
investigation, public hearing, or other proceeding, nor shall this
section be construed as prohibiting a licensee or certified public
accountant whose professional competence has been challenged in a court
of law or before an administrative agency from disclosing confidential
information as a part of a defense to the court action or
administrative proceeding.
(3) The proceedings, records, and work papers of a review committee
shall be privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or
other means of legal process or introduction into evidence in any civil
action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or board proceeding and
no member of the review committee or person who was involved in the
peer review process shall be permitted or required to testify in any
such civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or board
proceeding as to any matter produced, presented, disclosed, or
discussed during or in connection with the peer review process, or as
to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other
actions of such committees, or any members thereof. Information,
documents, or records that are publicly available are not to be
construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil action,
arbitration, administrative proceeding, or board proceeding merely
because they were presented or considered in connection with the
quality assurance or peer review process.
(4) The financial records of CPAs and clients including, but not
limited to, asset transfer documents and related legal documents
prepared by those authorized to practice law, the CPA's work product
derived from the confidential financial records of clients, financial
statements, tax returns, and confidential medical information
pertaining to the CPA or clients that are provided to the board in the
course of an investigation or in conjunction with an application for
licensure under this chapter are not subject to disclosure under the
public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, are privileged, and are not
subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal process or
introduction into evidence in any civil action or arbitration.
Information, documents, or records that are publicly available are not
to be construed as exempt from disclosure or discovery or use in any
civil action or arbitration merely because they were presented or
considered in connection with a board investigation or application to
the board in conjunction with licensure.

--- END ---