BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of transportation shall
conduct a state route number 2 route development plan that will
identify essential improvements needed between the port of
Everett/Naval Station and approaching the state route number 9
interchange near the city of Snohomish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---