BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to nonprofit organizations primarily
engaged in the provision of legal services to low-income individuals.
For the purpose of this section, "nonprofit" means an organization
exempt from federal income tax under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of
the federal internal revenue code.

--- END ---