BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Manufactured/mobile home communities provide a significant
source of homeownership opportunities for Washington residents.
However, the increasing closure and conversion of manufactured/mobile
home communities to other uses, combined with increasing
manufactured/mobile home lot rents, low vacancy rates in existing
manufactured/mobile home communities, and the extremely high cost of
moving homes with manufactured/mobile home communities close,
increasingly make manufactured/mobile home park community living
insecure for manufactured/mobile homeowners.
(b) Many homeowners residing in manufactured/mobile home
communities are low-income and senior citizens, and are, therefore,
those residents most in need of reasonable security in the siting of
their manufactured/mobile homes because of the adverse impacts on the
health, safety, and welfare of residents forced to move due to closure,
change of use, or discontinuance of manufactured/mobile home
communities.
(c) The preservation of manufactured/mobile home communities:
(i) Is a more economical alternative than providing new replacement
housing units for residents displaced from closing manufactured/mobile
home communities;
(ii) Is a strategy by which local governments can meet the
affordable housing needs of their residents;
(iii) Is a strategy by which local governments planning under
chapter 36.70A RCW may meet the housing element of their comprehensive
plans as it relates to the provision of housing affordable to all
economic sectors; and
(iv) Should be a goal of all local governments.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage and facilitate
long-term security of tenure for manufactured/mobile homeowners by
providing this voluntary opportunity for manufactured/mobile home
community owners to take advantage of a tax exemption in return for a
commitment to maintain their manufactured/mobile home community as such
for a minimum of ten years. This voluntary commitment and tax
exemption benefit must be accompanied by a commitment to comply with
chapter 59.20 RCW, in particular RCW 59.20.130, 59.20.135, 59.20.200,
and 59.20.300.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, real property that
constitutes a manufactured/mobile home community is exempt from
taxation.
(2) Beginning with the first year a property owner claims the
exemption under this section, a property owner's charge for the rental
of any mobile home lot or manufactured home lot may not increase by
more than the percentage change in the consumer price index for the
prior calendar year.
(3)(a) Upon a cessation of use under which an exemption has been
granted under this section, the county treasurer must collect all taxes
that would have been paid had the property not been exempt during the
seven years preceding, or the life of such exemption, if less, together
with interest at the same rate and computed in the same manner as
delinquent property taxes. Taxes due under this subsection are also
subject to a penalty of ten percent.
(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection apply only when
ownership of the property is transferred or when any of the property
loses its exempt status. The additional taxes and penalties under (a)
of this subsection does not apply if the cessation of use resulted
solely from:
(i) Transfer to another property owner for a use that also
qualifies for an exemption under this section;
(ii) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(iii) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the property is located which disallows
the present use of such property;
(iv) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the property
owner changing the use of such property; or
(v) Transfer to an agency of the state of Washington or the city or
county within which the property is located.
(4) The general requirements and conditions of RCW 84.36.812,
84.36.813, 84.36.815, 84.36.820, 84.36.825, 84.36.830, and 84.36.845
apply to this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "manufactured home," "mobile
home," and "manufactured/mobile home community" have the meanings
provided in RCW 59.20.030.

--- END ---