BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.17.045 and 1963 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Employees of the counties shall have the right to voluntarily
authorize the monthly deduction of their pledges to the United Good
Neighbor or its successor, monthly payment to a credit ((unit)) union
as defined in RCW 31.12.005, and monthly dues to a labor union, from
their salaries or wages. When such written authorization is received
by the county auditor, he or she shall make such monthly deduction.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.17.050 and 1999 c 71 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The auditor shall not draw his warrant for the salary of any
officer until the latter shall have first filed his duplicate receipt
with the auditor, properly signed by the treasurer, showing he has made
the last required monthly statement and settlement.)) If the superior
court issues a declaratory judgment under RCW 36.16.125 finding that a
county officer has abandoned his or her duties, the county officer may
not be paid a salary.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.22.010 and 1995 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor:
(1) Shall be recorder of deeds and other instruments in writing
which by law are to be filed and recorded in and for the county for
which he or she is elected;
(2) Shall keep an account current with the county treasurer, charge
all money received as shown by receipts issued and credit all
disbursements paid out according to the record of settlement of the
treasurer with the legislative authority;
(3) Shall make out and transmit to the state auditor a ((complete))
statement of the state fund account with the county ((for the past
fiscal year certified by his or her certificate and seal, immediately
after the completion of the annual settlement of the county treasurer
with the legislative authority)) in accordance with standards developed
by the state auditor. The statement must be available to the public;
(4) Shall make available a complete exhibit of the prior-year
finances of the county including, but not limited to, a statement of
financial condition and financial operation in accordance with
standards developed by the state auditor. This exhibit shall be made
available after the financial records are closed for the prior year;
(5) Shall make out a register of all warrants legally authorized
and directed to be issued by the legislative body at any regular or
special meeting. The auditor shall make the data available to the
county treasurer. The auditor shall retain the original of the
register of warrants for future reference;
(6) As clerk of the board of county commissioners, shall:
Record all of the proceedings of the legislative authority;
Make full entries of all of their resolutions and decisions on all
questions concerning the raising of money for and the allowance of
accounts against the county;
Record the vote of each member on any question upon which there is
a division or at the request of any member present;
Sign all orders made and warrants issued by order of the
legislative authority for the payment of money;
Record the reports of the county treasurer of the receipts and
disbursements of the county;
Preserve and file all accounts acted upon by the legislative
authority;
Preserve and file all petitions and applications for franchises and
record the action of the legislative authority thereon;
Record all orders levying taxes;
Perform all other duties required by any rule or order of the
legislative authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.22.090 and 1975 c 43 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
All warrants for the payment of claims against diking, ditch,
drainage and irrigation districts and school districts of the second
class, who do not issue their own warrants, as well as political
subdivisions within the county for which no other provision is made by
law, shall be drawn and issued by the county auditor of the county
wherein such subdivision is located, upon ((vouchers properly
approved)) proper approval by the governing body thereof.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.22.170 and 2005 c 442 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a surcharge of
five dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county auditor for
each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
authorized by law. One dollar of the surcharge shall be ((deposited in
the county general fund to be)) used at the discretion of the county
commissioners to promote historical preservation or historical
programs, which may include preservation of historic documents.
(b) A surcharge of two dollars per instrument shall be charged by
the county auditor for each document presented for recording by the
employment security department, which will be in addition to any other
charge authorized by law.
(2) Of the remaining revenue generated through the surcharges under
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Fifty percent shall be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer who shall distribute such funds to each county treasurer
within the state in July of each year in accordance with the formula
described in RCW 36.22.190. The county treasurer shall place the funds
received in a special account titled the auditor's centennial document
preservation and modernization account to be used solely for ongoing
preservation of historical documents of all county offices and
departments and shall not be added to the county current expense fund;
and
(b) Fifty percent shall be retained by the county and deposited in
the auditor's operation and maintenance fund for ongoing preservation
of historical documents of all county offices and departments.
(3) The centennial document preservation and modernization account
is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be
classified as a treasury trust account. State distributions from the
centennial document preservation and modernization account shall be
made without appropriation.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.32.210 and 2003 c 53 s 204 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each ((board of county commissioners)) elected county official,
or county departments as directed by local policy, of the several
counties of the state of Washington shall, on or before the first
Monday of March of each year, file with the auditor of the county a
statement ((verified by oath)) showing for the twelve-month((s)) period
ending December 31st of the preceding year, ((the following:
(a))) a full and complete inventory of all capitalized assets
((shall be)) kept in accordance with standards established by the state
auditor. ((This inventory shall be segregated to show the following
subheads:
(i) The assets, including equipment, on hand, together with a
statement of the date when acquired, the amount paid therefor, the
estimated life thereof and a sufficient description to fully identify
such property;
(ii) All equipment of every kind or nature sold or disposed of in
any manner during such preceding twelve months period, together with
the name of the purchaser, the amount paid therefor, whether or not the
same was sold at public or private sale, the reason for such disposal
and a sufficient description to fully identify the same; and
(iii) All the equipment purchased during the period, together with
the date of purchase, the amount paid therefor, whether or not the same
was bought under competitive bidding, the price paid therefor and the
probable life thereof, the reason for making the purchase and a
sufficient description to fully identify such property; and
(b) The person to whom such money or any part thereof was paid and
why so paid and the date of such payment.))
(2) Inventories shall be filed with the county auditor as a public
record and shall be open to the inspection of the public.
(((3) Any county commissioner failing to file such statement or
willfully making any false or incorrect statement therein or aiding or
abetting in the making of any false or incorrect statement is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.
(4) It is the duty of the prosecuting attorney of each county to
within three days from the calling to his or her attention of any
violation to institute proceedings against such offending official and
in addition thereto to prosecute appropriate action to remove such
commissioner from office.
(5) Any taxpayer of such county is hereby authorized to institute
the action in conjunction with or independent of the action of the
prosecuting attorney.))

Sec. 7 RCW 36.40.010 and 1963 c 4 s 36.40.010 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the second Monday in July of each year, the county
auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county shall
notify in writing each county official, elective or appointive, in
charge of an office, department, service, or institution of the county,
to file with him or her on or before the second Monday in August
thereafter detailed and itemized estimates, both of the probable
revenues from sources other than taxation, and of all expenditures
required by such office, department, service, or institution for the
ensuing fiscal year.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.40.030 and 1995 c 301 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The estimates required in RCW 36.40.010 and 36.40.020 shall be
submitted on forms provided by the county auditor or chief financial
officer designated in a charter county and classified according to the
classification established by the state auditor. The county auditor or
chief financial officer designated in a charter county shall provide
such forms. He or she shall also prepare the estimates for interest
and debt redemption requirements and any other estimates the
preparation of which properly falls within the duties of his or her
office.
Each such official shall file his or her estimates within the time
and in the manner provided in the notice and form and the county
auditor or chief financial officer ((shall)) designated in a charter
county may deduct and withhold as a penalty from the salary of each
official failing or refusing to file such estimates as herein provided,
the sum of ((ten)) fifty dollars for each day of delay: PROVIDED, That
the total penalty against any one official shall not exceed two hundred
fifty dollars in any one year.
In the absence or disability of any official the duties required
herein shall devolve upon the official or employee in charge of the
office, department, service, or institution for the time being. The
notice shall contain a copy of this penalty clause.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.40.040 and 1995 c 301 s 63 and 1995 c 194 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Upon receipt of the estimates the county auditor or chief financial
officer designated in a charter county shall prepare the county budget
which shall set forth the complete financial program of the county for
the ensuing fiscal year, showing the expenditure program and the
sources of revenue by which it is to be financed.
The revenue section shall set forth the estimated receipts from
sources other than taxation for each office, department, service, or
institution for the ensuing fiscal year, the actual receipts for the
first six months of the current fiscal year and the actual receipts for
the last completed fiscal year, the estimated surplus at the close of
the current fiscal year and the amount proposed to be raised by
taxation.
The expenditure section shall set forth in comparative and tabular
form by offices, departments, services, and institutions the estimated
expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year, the appropriations for the
current fiscal year, the actual expenditures for the first six months
of the current fiscal year including all contracts or other obligations
against current appropriations, and the actual expenditures for the
last completed fiscal year.
All estimates of receipts and expenditures for the ensuing year
shall be fully detailed in the annual budget and shall be classified
and segregated according to a standard classification of accounts to be
adopted and prescribed by the state auditor after consultation with the
Washington state association of counties and the Washington state
association of county officials.
The county auditor or chief financial officer designated in a
charter county shall set forth separately in the annual budget to be
submitted to the county legislative authority the total amount of
emergency warrants issued during the preceding fiscal year, together
with a statement showing the amount issued for each emergency, and the
legislative authority shall include in the annual tax levy, a levy
sufficient to raise an amount equal to the total of such warrants:
PROVIDED, That the legislative authority may fund the warrants or any
part thereof into bonds instead of including them in the budget levy.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.40.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.40.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
The budget shall be submitted by the auditor or chief financial
officer designated in a charter county to the board of county
commissioners on or before the first Tuesday in September of each year.
The board shall thereupon consider the same in detail, making any
revisions or additions it deems advisable.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.40.130 and 1963 c 4 s 36.40.130 are each amended
to read as follows:
Expenditures made, liabilities incurred, or warrants issued in
excess of any of the detailed budget appropriations or as revised by
transfer as in RCW 36.40.100((, 36.40.110)) or 36.40.120 provided shall
not be a liability of the county, but the official making or incurring
such expenditure or issuing such warrant shall be liable therefor
personally and upon his or her official bond. The county auditor shall
issue no warrant and the county commissioners shall approve no claim
for any expenditure in excess of the detailed budget appropriations or
as revised under the provisions of RCW 36.40.100 through 36.40.130,
except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or for
emergencies as hereinafter provided. ((Any county commissioner, or
county auditor, approving any claim or issuing any warrant in excess of
any such budget appropriation except as herein provided shall forfeit
to the county fourfold the amount of such claim or warrant which shall
be recovered by action against such county commissioner or auditor, or
all of them, and the several sureties on their official bonds.))

Sec. 12 RCW 36.40.210 and 1963 c 4 s 36.40.210 are each amended
to read as follows:
On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month the auditor shall
submit or make available to the board of county commissioners a report
showing the expenditures and liabilities against each separate budget
appropriation incurred during the preceding calendar month and like
information for the whole of the current fiscal year to the first day
of said month, together with the unexpended and unencumbered balance of
each appropriation. He or she shall also set forth the receipts from
taxes and from sources other than taxation for the same periods.

Sec. 13 RCW 36.96.020 and 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before June 1st of 1980, and on or before June 1st of every
year thereafter, each county auditor shall search available records and
notify the county legislative authority if any special purpose
districts located wholly or partially within the county appear to be
inactive. ((Each county auditor shall also provide in the
notifications made in 1982 and thereafter a list of all special purpose
districts located wholly or partially within the county which, for
three consecutive years before the notification, have failed to file
statements with the county auditor as required in RCW 36.96.090.)) If
the territory of any special purpose district is located within more
than one county, the legislative authorities of all other counties
within whose boundaries such a special purpose district lies shall also
be notified by the county auditor. However, the authority to dissolve
such a special purpose district as provided by this chapter shall rest
solely with the legislative authority of the county which contains the
greatest geographic portion of such special purpose district.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.96.090 and 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Every special purpose district shall file a statement with
the auditor of each county in which it lies on or before December 31st
of every year, beginning in the year 1979. The initial statement filed
by each special purpose district shall contain)) For every newly
created special purpose district, the auditor of each county in which
the special purpose district is located shall provide the state auditor
with the following information:
(((a))) (1) The name of the special purpose district and a general
description of its location ((and geographical area within the county
and within any other county;
(b) The statutes under which the special purpose district
operates));
(((c))) (2) The name, address, and telephone number((, and
remaining term of office)) of each member of its governing authority;
and
(((d))) (3) The functions that the special purpose district is then
presently performing and the purposes for which it was created.
((Subsequent annual statements need only identify the special purpose
district and any of the above detailed information that has changed in
the last year.
(2) Each county auditor, on or before January 31, 1980, and on or
before January 31st each year thereafter, shall forward to the state
auditor a summation of the information contained in the statements
required to be filed in subsection (1) of this section together with
information of each special purpose district located wholly or
partially within the county that has been dissolved during the
preceding year.))

Sec. 15 RCW 43.09.280 and 1995 c 301 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The expense of auditing public accounts shall be borne by each
entity subject to such audit for the auditing of all accounts under its
jurisdiction and the state auditor shall certify the expense of such
audit to the fiscal or warrant-issuing officer of such entity, who
shall immediately make payment to the state auditor. If the expense as
certified is not paid by any local government within thirty days from
the date of certification, the state auditor may certify the expense to
the auditor of the county in which the local government is situated,
who shall promptly issue his or her warrant on the county treasurer
payable out of the current expense fund of the county, which fund,
except as to auditing the financial affairs and making inspection and
examination of the county, shall be reimbursed by the county auditor or
chief financial officer designated in a charter county out of the money
due the local government at the next monthly settlement of the
collection of taxes and shall be transferred to the current expense
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.350.010 (Registering warrants -- All districts) and 1990
c 33 s 373, 1975 c 43 s 27, 1973 c 111 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.66.010;
(2) RCW 28A.350.020 (Registering warrants -- Second-class districts)
and 1990 c 33 s 374, 1975 c 43 s 28, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.020;
(3) RCW 28A.350.030 (Auditing accounts -- All districts) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.030;
(4) RCW 28A.350.040 (Auditor to draw and issue warrants -- Second-class districts) and 1990 c 33 s 375, 1975 c 43 s 29, 1973 c 111 s 3,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.040;
(5) RCW 28A.350.050 (Teacher must qualify before warrant drawn and
issued or registered -- All districts) and 1973 c 72 s 1, 1971 c 48 s 45,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.050;
(6) RCW 28A.350.060 (Liability of auditor for warrants exceeding
budget -- All districts) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 31 & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.66.070;
(7) RCW 28A.350.070 (Orders for warrants not transferable -- Second-class districts) and 1975 c 43 s 30 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.080;
(8) RCW 36.18.110 (Monthly statement to county auditor) and 1985 c
44 s 3, 1984 c 128 s 3, & 1963 c 4 s 36.18.110;
(9) RCW 36.18.120 (Statements to be checked) and 1985 c 44 s 4,
1984 c 128 s 4, & 1963 c 4 s 36.18.120; and
(10) RCW 36.18.130 (Errors or irregularities) and 1963 c 4 s
36.18.130.

--- END ---