BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21C.0381 and 1995 c 172 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Decisions ((pertaining to the issuance, renewal, reopening, or
revision of)) to issue, renew, reopen, or revise an air operating
permit under RCW 70.94.161 are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).

--- END ---