BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Voice over internet protocol service" means a service that:
(i) Enables real time, two-way voice communications that originate
or terminate from a user's location using internet protocol or a
successor protocol, including any such service that permits a user to
receive calls from the public switched telephone network and terminate
calls to the public switched telephone network; and
(ii) Uses a broadband connection from the user's location.
(b) "Internet protocol-enabled service" means a service,
capability, functionality, or application that is provided using
internet protocol or a successor protocol to enable an end user to send
or receive data, video, or voice communications in internet protocol
format or a successor format.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a department,
agency, commission, or political subdivision of this state may not
enact or enforce, either directly or indirectly, any law, rule,
regulation, standard, order, or other provision having the force or
effect of law that regulates, or has the effect of regulating:
(a) The rates of voice over internet protocol service or internet
protocol-enabled service;
(b) The terms and conditions of service of voice over internet
protocol service or internet protocol-enabled service; or
(c) The entry into the market of voice over internet protocol
service or internet protocol-enabled service.

--- END ---