BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.144.010 and 2008 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjustable rate mortgage" or "ARM" means a payment option ARM
or a hybrid ARM (commonly known as a 2/28 or 3/27 loan).
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, as used in an application
for a residential mortgage loan.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
person subject to this chapter in an effort to seek information about
obtaining a residential mortgage loan, regardless of whether that
person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(6) "Financial institution" means commercial banks and alien banks
subject to regulation under Title 30 RCW, savings banks subject to
regulation under Title 32 RCW, savings associations subject to
regulation under Title 33 RCW, credit unions subject to regulation
under chapter 31.12 RCW, consumer loan companies subject to regulation
under chapter 31.04 RCW, and mortgage brokers and lenders subject to
regulation under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(7) "Fully indexed rate" means the index rate prevailing at the
time a residential mortgage loan is made, plus the margin that will
apply after the expiration of an introductory interest rate.
(8) "Interest-only" means when the loan agreement allows the
borrower to make payments that only pay the amount needed to pay all
the interest that has accrued on the loan. The principal of the loan
is not reduced by the payment.
(9) "Negative amortization" means an increase in the principal
balance of a loan caused when the loan agreement allows the borrower to
make payments less than the amount needed to pay all the interest that
has accrued on the loan. The unpaid interest is added to the loan
balance and becomes part of the principal.
(((9))) (10) "Person" means individuals, partnerships,
associations, limited liability companies, limited liability
partnerships, trusts, corporations, and all other legal entities.
(((10))) (11) "Residential mortgage loan" means an extension of
credit secured by residential real property located in this state upon
which is constructed or intended to be constructed, a single-family
dwelling or multiple-family dwelling of four or less units. It does
not include a reverse mortgage or a borrower credit transaction that is
secured by rental property. It does not include a bridge loan. It
does not include loans to individuals making or acquiring a residential
mortgage loan solely with his or her own funds for his or her own
investment. For purposes of this subsection, a "bridge loan" is any
temporary loan, having a maturity of one year or less, for the purpose
of acquisition or construction of a dwelling intended to become the
borrower's principal dwelling.
(((11))) (12) "Subprime loan" means a consumer-purpose closed end
loan secured by a consumer's principal dwelling and having an annual
percentage rate that exceeds the average prime offer rates for a
comparable transaction published by the federal reserve board by at
least one and one-half percentage points for a first-lien loan or three
and one-half percentage points for a subordinate-lien loan.
(13) "The interagency guidance on nontraditional mortgage product
risks" means the guidance document issued in September 2006 by the
office of the comptroller of the currency, the board of governors of
the federal reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation,
the office of thrift supervision, and the national credit union
administration, and the guidance on nontraditional mortgage product
risks released in November 2006 by the conference of state bank
supervisors and the American association of residential mortgage
regulators.
(((12))) (14) "The statement on subprime mortgage lending" means
the guidance document issued in June 2007 by the office of the
comptroller of the currency, the board of governors of the federal
reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the office
of thrift supervision, and the national credit union administration,
and the statement on subprime mortgage lending released in July 2007 by
the conference of state bank supervisors, the American association of
residential mortgage regulators, and the national association of
consumer credit administrators.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.144.030 and 2008 c 108 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall apply the interagency guidance on
nontraditional mortgage product risks and the statement on subprime
mortgage lending to interest-only mortgages, adjustable rate mortgages,
and subprime loans made by financial institutions. This section does
not apply to adjustable rate mortgages made, purchased, guaranteed, or
insured by the federal national mortgage association, federal home loan
mortgage corporation, federal housing administration, and the federal
veteran's association.
(2)(a) Financial institutions subject to this chapter shall adopt
and adhere to internal policies and procedures that are reasonably
intended to achieve the objectives set forth in the interagency
guidance on nontraditional mortgage product risks and the statement on
subprime mortgage lending as set forth in subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) The department shall adopt rules as required to implement this
section.

--- END ---