BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.146 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall consider circumstances that may mitigate the
seriousness of a violation in any investigation or any enforcement
action. Mitigating factors include:
(a) Whether the licensee voluntarily disclosed of the violation or
activity;
(b) The timeliness of the disclosure;
(c) When there is a voluntary disclosure by a licensee, the
likelihood that the director would have discovered the violation in a
timely fashion without that voluntary disclosure;
(d) The cooperation of the licensee during any investigation of the
violation;
(e) Any remedial measures taken to correct any flaws in internal
procedures to protect against any future violations when the disclosure
is by a designated broker, principal, or owner;
(f) The length of time the licensee has engaged in business without
any prior administrative actions;
(g) Whether the licensee has business practices that include:
(i) Supervision and training of personnel;
(ii) Regular review work performed;
(iii) Training in the requirements of this chapter and rules;
(iv) Monitoring for compliance under this chapter; and
(v) Acting on reports of alleged misconduct;
(h) Whether the violation should have been reasonably anticipated;
(i) Whether the violation was a matter of inadvertence, simple
negligence, or gross negligence;
(j) Whether there were prior audits of the company that failed to
reveal the violation;
(k) A positive score or report obtained in prior audits, if the
licensee has been previously audited; and
(l) Any other mitigating factors adopted by the director by rule.
(2) When a violation voluntarily disclosed by a licensee is the
result of a deliberate and knowing violation by an employee or
independent contract loan officer and was intended to be concealed from
the licensee, the director shall:
(a) Pursue the employee or independent contract loan officer who
committed the violation and exhaust all legal remedies in an effort to
make all consumers harmed by the violation whole;
(b) Not charge the licensee punitive fees, penalties, investigation
fees, or fees of any other kind; and
(c) Not audit, examine, or investigate the licensee.
(3) The director must adopt a policy to encourage licensees to
report violations by minimizing remedial actions imposed upon the
reporting individual. When the reporting person is a licensee or
acting on behalf of a licensee, the director may only suspend or revoke
a license or require restitution to a consumer from a licensee in
severe cases of high culpability. Examples of high culpability
include:
(a) When the licensee has actual knowledge of the act when the act
is committed; and
(b) Gross and reckless negligence in supervision by a licensee.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.146.220 and 2006 c 19 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may enforce all laws and rules relating to the
licensing of mortgage brokers and loan originators, grant or deny
licenses to mortgage brokers and loan originators, and hold hearings.
(2) The director may impose fines or order restitution against
licensees or other persons subject to this chapter, or deny, suspend,
decline to renew, or revoke licenses for:
(a) Violations of orders, including cease and desist orders;
(b) False statements or omission of material information on the
application that, if known, would have allowed the director to deny the
application for the original license;
(c) Failure to pay a fee required by the director or maintain the
required bond;
(d) Failure to comply with any directive, order, or subpoena of the
director; or
(e) Any violation of this chapter.
(3) The director may impose fines on an employee, loan originator,
independent contractor, or agent of the licensee, or other person
subject to this chapter for:
(a) Any violations of RCW 19.146.0201 (1) through (9) or (13),
19.146.030 through 19.146.080, 19.146.200, 19.146.205(4), or
19.146.265; or
(b) Failure to comply with any directive or order of the director.
(4) The director may issue orders directing a licensee, its
employee, loan originator, independent contractor, agent, or other
person subject to this chapter to cease and desist from conducting
business.
(5) The director may issue orders removing from office or
prohibiting from participation in the conduct of the affairs of a
licensed mortgage broker, or both, any officer, principal, employee, or
loan originator of any licensed mortgage broker or any person subject
to licensing under this chapter for:
(a) Any violation of 19.146.0201 (1) through (9) or (13),
19.146.030 through 19.146.080, 19.146.200, 19.146.205(4), or
19.146.265;
(b) False statements or omission of material information on the
application that, if known, would have allowed the director to deny the
application for the original license;
(c) Conviction of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or
financial misconduct or a felony after obtaining a license; or
(d) Failure to comply with any directive or order of the director.
(6) Each day's continuance of a violation or failure to comply with
any directive or order of the director is a separate and distinct
violation or failure.
(7) The director shall establish by rule standards for licensure of
applicants licensed in other jurisdictions.
(8) The director shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.
(9) The remedies in this section are subject to section 1 of this
act.

--- END ---