BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.144 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit a financial institution from
charging fees, including discount points, permitted by the federal
housing administration in connection with a residential mortgage loan
insured by the federal housing administration or permitted by the
federal veterans administration in connection with a residential
mortgage loan under the federal veterans administration home loan
guaranty program.

--- END ---