BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.340 and 2000 c 94 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When, in the opinion of the superintendent or the
professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing
involuntary treatment, the committed person can be appropriately served
by outpatient treatment prior to or at the expiration of the period of
commitment, then such outpatient care may be required as a term of
conditional release for a period which, when added to the inpatient
treatment period, shall not exceed the period of commitment. If the
hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient treatment is
other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient
facility so designated must agree in writing to assume such
responsibility. A copy of the terms of conditional release shall be
given to the patient, the ((county)) designated mental health
professional in the county in which the patient is to receive
outpatient treatment, and to the court of original commitment.
(b) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((2)))(3)(c) is conditionally released under
(a) of this subsection, the superintendent or professional person in
charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment
shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which
the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of
the decision to conditionally release the person. Notice and a copy of
the terms of conditional release shall be provided at least thirty days
before the person is released from inpatient care. Within twenty days
after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney may petition the court
in the county that issued the commitment order to hold a hearing to
determine whether the person may be conditionally released and the
terms of the conditional release. The prosecuting attorney shall
provide a copy of the petition to the superintendent or professional
person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary
treatment, the attorney, if any, and guardian or conservator of the
committed person, and the court of original commitment. If the county
in which the committed person is to receive outpatient treatment is the
same county in which the criminal charges against the committed person
were dismissed, then the court shall, upon the motion of the
prosecuting attorney, transfer the proceeding to the court in that
county. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within ten
days of the filing of the petition. The committed person shall have
the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an
involuntary treatment proceeding, except as set forth in this
subsection and except that there shall be no right to jury trial. The
issue to be determined at the hearing is whether or not the person may
be conditionally released without substantial danger to other persons,
or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing
public safety or security. If the court disapproves of the conditional
release, it may do so only on the basis of substantial evidence.
Pursuant to the determination of the court upon the hearing, the
conditional release of the person shall be approved by the court on the
same or modified conditions or the person shall be returned for
involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to release at the
end of the period for which he or she was committed, or otherwise in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient care
or the secretary may modify the conditions for continued release when
such modification is in the best interest of the person. Notification
of such changes shall be sent to all persons receiving a copy of the
original conditions.
(3)(a) If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient
care, the ((county)) designated mental health professional, or the
secretary determines that:
(i) A conditionally released person is failing to adhere to the
terms and conditions of his or her release;
(ii) Substantial deterioration in a conditionally released person's
functioning has occurred;
(iii) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a
reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by
further inpatient treatment; or
(iv) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.
Upon notification by the hospital or facility designated to provide
outpatient care, or on his or her own motion, the ((county)) designated
mental health professional or the secretary may order that the
conditionally released person be apprehended and taken into custody and
temporarily detained in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near
the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment.
(b) The hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient
treatment shall notify the secretary or ((county)) designated mental
health professional when a conditionally released person fails to
adhere to terms and conditions of his or her conditional release or
experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as
a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm. The
((county)) designated mental health professional or secretary shall
order the person apprehended and temporarily detained in an evaluation
and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is
receiving outpatient treatment.
(c) A person detained under this subsection (3) shall be held until
such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to
determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital
or facility from which he or she had been conditionally released. The
((county)) designated mental health professional or the secretary may
modify or rescind such order at any time prior to commencement of the
court hearing.
(d) The court that originally ordered commitment shall be notified
within two judicial days of a person's detention under the provisions
of this section, and the ((county)) designated mental health
professional or the secretary shall file his or her petition and order
of apprehension and detention with the court that originally ordered
commitment or with the court in the county in which the person is
detained and serve them upon the person detained. His or her attorney,
if any, and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, shall receive
a copy of such papers as soon as possible. Such person shall have the
same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an
involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in
this section and except that there shall be no right to jury trial.
The issues to be determined shall be: (i) Whether the conditionally
released person did or did not adhere to the terms and conditions of
his or her conditional release; (ii) that substantial deterioration in
the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of
substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the
decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv)
there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the conditions
listed in this subsection (3)(d) have occurred, whether the terms of
conditional release should be modified or the person should be returned
to the facility.
(e) Pursuant to the determination of the court upon such hearing,
the conditionally released person shall either continue to be
conditionally released on the same or modified conditions or shall be
returned for involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to
release at the end of the period for which he or she was committed for
involuntary treatment, or otherwise in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter. Such hearing may be waived by the person and his or
her counsel and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, but shall
not be waivable unless all such persons agree to waive, and upon such
waiver the person may be returned for involuntary treatment or
continued on conditional release on the same or modified conditions.
(4) The proceedings set forth in subsection (3) of this section may
be initiated by the ((county)) designated mental health professional or
the secretary on the same basis set forth therein without requiring or
ordering the apprehension and detention of the conditionally released
person, in which case the court hearing shall take place in not less
than five days from the date of service of the petition upon the
conditionally released person. The petition may be filed in the court
that originally ordered commitment or with the court in the county in
which the person is present.
Upon expiration of the period of commitment, or when the person is
released from outpatient care, notice in writing to the court which
committed the person for treatment shall be provided.
(5) The grounds and procedures for revocation of less restrictive
alternative treatment shall be the same as those set forth in this
section for conditional releases.
(6) In the event of a revocation of a conditional release, the
subsequent treatment period may be for no longer than the actual period
authorized in the original court order.

--- END ---