BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.270 and 1993 c 240 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to
perform the function of metropolitan transportation with a commission
form of management, a metropolitan transit commission shall be formed
prior to the effective date of the assumption of such function. Except
as provided in this section, the metropolitan transit commission shall
exercise all powers of the metropolitan municipal corporation with
respect to metropolitan transportation facilities, including but not
limited to the power to construct, acquire, maintain, operate, extend,
alter, repair, control and manage a local public transportation system
within and without the metropolitan area, to establish new passenger
transportation services and to alter, curtail, or abolish any services
as the commission may deem desirable and to fix tolls and fares.
The comprehensive plan for public transportation service and any
amendments thereof shall be adopted by the metropolitan council and the
metropolitan transit commission shall provide transportation facilities
and service consistent with such plan. The metropolitan transit
commission shall authorize expenditures for transportation purposes
within the budget adopted by the metropolitan council. Tolls and fares
may be fixed or altered by the commission only after approval thereof
by the metropolitan council. Bonds of the metropolitan municipal
corporation for public transportation purposes shall be issued by the
metropolitan council as provided in this chapter.
The metropolitan transit commission shall consist of ((seven))
eight voting members. Six of such members shall be appointed by the
metropolitan council and the seventh member shall be the ((chairman))
chair of the metropolitan council who shall be ex officio the
((chairman)) chair of the metropolitan transit commission. The eighth
member shall represent organized labor employed within the local public
transportation system and shall be appointed by the labor organization
representing the majority of public transportation employees within the
system. Three of the six ((appointed)) members of the commission
appointed by the metropolitan council shall be residents of the central
city and three shall be residents of the metropolitan area outside of
the central city. The three central city members of the first
metropolitan transit commission shall be selected from the existing
transit commission of the central city, if there be a transit
commission in such city. The terms of first appointees shall be for
one, two, three, four, five and six years, respectively. Thereafter,
commissioners shall serve for a term of four years. Compensation of
transit commissioners shall be determined by the metropolitan council.
The requirement to create a metropolitan transit commission shall
not apply to a county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions,
and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter
36.56 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.57.030 and 1974 ex.s. c 167 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every county which undertakes the transportation function pursuant
to RCW 36.57.020 shall create by resolution of the county legislative
body a county transportation authority which shall be composed as
follows:
(1) The elected officials of the county legislative body, not to
exceed three such elected officials;
(2) The mayor of the most populous city within the county;
(3) The mayor of a city with a population less than five thousand,
to be selected by the mayors of all such cities within the county;
(4) The mayor of a city with a population greater than five
thousand, excluding the most populous city, to be selected by the
mayors of all such cities within the county((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That)). However, if there is no city with a population greater than
five thousand, excluding the most populous city, then the sixth member
who shall be an elected official, shall be selected by the other two
mayors selected pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(5) An individual representing organized labor employed within the
county transportation authority and who shall be recommended by the
labor organization representing the majority of the public
transportation employees within the authority. The members of the
authority shall be selected within sixty days after the date of the
resolution creating such authority.
Any member of the authority who is a mayor or an elected official
selected pursuant to subsection (4) ((above)) of this section and whose
office is not a full time position shall receive one hundred dollars
for each day attending official meetings of the authority.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.57A.050 and 2007 c 469 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the
public transportation benefit area the members of the county
legislative authority ((and)), the elected representative of each city
within the area, and the labor organization representing the majority
of the unionized employees of the transit system or systems within the
area, shall provide for the selection of the governing body of such
area, the public transportation benefit area authority((, which)). The
public transportation benefit area authority shall consist of elected
officials selected by and serving at the pleasure of the governing
bodies of component cities within the area and the county legislative
authority of each county within the area, and one member representing
organized labor and who shall be recommended by the labor organization
representing the majority of the unionized employees of the public
transportation system(s) within the area. If at the time a public
transportation benefit area authority assumes the public transportation
functions previously provided under the interlocal cooperation act
(chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen positions on the governing board
of the transit system, those positions may be retained as positions on
the governing board of the public transportation benefit area
authority.
Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its
legislative body withdraw from participation in the public
transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each
city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove
and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public
transportation benefit area if the composition thereof does not meet
its approval.
In no case shall the governing body of a single county public
transportation benefit area be greater than ((nine)) ten members and in
the case of a multicounty area, ((fifteen)) sixteen members. Those
cities within the transportation benefit area and excluded from direct
membership on the authority are hereby authorized to designate a member
of the authority who shall be entitled to represent the interests of
such city which is excluded from direct membership on the authority.
The legislative body of such city shall notify the authority as to the
determination of its authorized representative on the authority.
Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to
exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends
official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties
approved by the chairman of the authority. Except that the authority
may, by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to
each member from forty-four dollars up to ninety dollars per day or
portion of a day for actual attendance at board meetings or for
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
authority. In no event may a member be compensated in any year for
more than seventy-five days, except the chairman who may be paid
compensation for not more than one hundred days((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, compensation shall not be paid to an elected official or
employee of federal, state, or local government who is receiving
regular full-time compensation from such government for attending
meetings and performing prescribed duties of the authority.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county performing the public transportation function as
authorized by RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 or any public transportation
system that is not governed: By a metropolitan municipal corporation
as authorized by RCW 35.58.270; by a county performing the public
transportation function as authorized by RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110;
by a county transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW; or by any
public transportation benefit area established under chapter 36.57A
RCW, must appoint a member representing organized labor to its public
transportation governing body, if applicable. This member shall be
recommended by the labor organization representing the majority of the
public transportation employees within the local public transportation
system.

--- END ---