BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.015 and 2006 c 311 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "District" means a transportation benefit district created
under this chapter.
(2) "City" means a city or town.
(3) "Transportation improvement" means a project contained in the
transportation plan of the state ((or)), a regional transportation
planning organization, city, county, or eligible jurisdiction as
identified in RCW 36.73.020(2). A project may include investment in
new or existing highways of statewide significance, principal arterials
of regional significance, high capacity transportation, public
transportation, and other transportation projects and programs of
regional or statewide significance including transportation demand
management. Projects may also include the operation, preservation, and
maintenance of these facilities or programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.73.120 and 2007 c 329 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a district may
impose a fee or charge on the construction or reconstruction of
commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other commercial
or industrial building or building space or appurtenance, or on the
development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of land
for commercial purposes, only if done in accordance with chapter 39.92
RCW.
(2) Any fee or charge imposed under this section shall be used
exclusively for transportation improvements ((constructed by a
district)) as defined in RCW 36.73.015. The fees or charges imposed
must be reasonably necessary as a result of the impact of development,
construction, or classification or reclassification of land on
identified transportation needs.
(3) If a county or city within the district area is levying a fee
or charge for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be
credited against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the
district.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.0455 and 2006 c 311 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax
authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the boundaries of the district. The rate of tax
shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the tax may
not be imposed for a period exceeding ten years. This tax, if not
imposed under the conditions of subsection (2) of this section, may be
extended for a period not exceeding ten years with an affirmative vote
of the voters voting at the election.
(2) The voter-approved sales tax initially imposed under this
section after July 1, 2010, may be imposed for a period exceeding ten
years if the moneys received under this section are dedicated for the
repayment of indebtedness incurred in accordance with the requirements
of chapter 36.73 RCW.
(3) Money received from the tax imposed under this section must be
spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 36.73 RCW.

--- END ---