BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2008 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) This subsection applies to both adult prior convictions and
juvenile prior convictions of serious violent and sex offenses. Other
juvenile prior convictions shall not be considered in the offender
score.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one
point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior serious violent and sex offense felony conviction ((and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction)).
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section,
count two points for each prior adult ((and juvenile)) violent felony
conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and ((1/2)) two points for each prior juvenile
((nonviolent)) serious violent and sex offense felony conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult ((and juvenile))
violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior
adult nonviolent felony conviction, and ((1/2)) two points for each
prior juvenile ((nonviolent)) serious violent and sex offense felony
conviction (not already counted).
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction((, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction)).
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult prior conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior conviction of a serious violent or sex offense; for each
serious traffic offense, other than those used for an enhancement
pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult prior
conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction of a
serious violent or sex offense; count one point for each adult ((and
1/2 point for each juvenile)) prior conviction for operation of a
vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult prior conviction and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction of a serious violent or
sex offense; count one point for each adult ((and 1/2 point for each
juvenile)) prior conviction for driving under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
or operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction ((and two points for each juvenile
manufacture of methamphetamine offense)). If the present conviction is
for a drug offense and the offender has a criminal history that
includes a sex offense or serious violent offense, count three points
for each adult prior felony drug offense conviction ((and two points
for each juvenile drug offense)). All other adult ((and juvenile))
felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this section if the current
drug offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this section if the
current drug offense is nonviolent.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point
((and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point)).
(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point
((and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point)).
(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult ((and juvenile)) prior Burglary 1
conviction, and two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction((, and one point for each juvenile
prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction)).
(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction.
(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(11), count priors as in subsections (7)
through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section; however count three
points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction,
excluding prior convictions for failure to register as a sex offender
under RCW 9A.44.130(11), which shall count as one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community custody, add one point. For purposes
of this subsection, community custody includes community placement or
postrelease supervision, as defined in chapter 9.94B RCW.
(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle,
Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however
count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three
points for each adult ((and juvenile)) prior Theft 1 (of a motor
vehicle), Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property
1 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor
vehicle), Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle,
Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle
Without Permission 2 conviction.
(21) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Prior convictions that were
not counted in the offender score or included in criminal history under
repealed or previous versions of the sentencing reform act shall be
included in criminal history and shall count in the offender score if
the current version of the sentencing reform act requires including or
counting those convictions. Prior convictions that were not included
in criminal history or in the offender score shall be included upon any
resentencing to ensure imposition of an accurate sentence.

--- END ---