BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:
(1) The beneficial stewardship of the land, air, and waters of the
state is a solemn obligation of the present generation for the benefit
of future generations.
(2) There are many hazardous waste sites in this state, and cleanup
of these sites requires trained environmental professionals.
(3) Encouraging outstanding students to enter the environmental
cleanup profession is of vital importance to the state of Washington.
By creating the environmental cleanup opportunity grant program, the
legislature intends to assist in the effort to recruit the next
generation of environmental cleanup professionals consistent with the
green economy jobs growth initiative under RCW 43.330.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient graduates with a bachelor's degree
focused on cleanup of contaminated hazardous waste sites under the
model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW, and works on cleanup of
contaminated sites for a period of two years. The conditional
scholarship under this chapter is the environmental cleanup opportunity
grant.
(2) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by
an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher
education coordinating board.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(4) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at
least fifteen quarter credit hours or the equivalent, demonstrates high
academic achievement, is a resident student as defined by RCW
28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, and has a declared intention to complete a
major course of study leading to an environmental career in the cleanup
of hazardous substances at contaminated facilities.
(5) "Facility" means (a) any building, structure, installation,
equipment, pipe or pipeline (including any pipe into a sewer or
publicly owned treatment works), well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment,
ditch, landfill, storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock,
vessel, or aircraft; or (b) any site or area where a hazardous
substance, other than a consumer product in consumer use, has been
deposited, stored, disposed of, or placed, or otherwise come to be
located.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
service as an environmental cleanup professional in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(8) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.
(9) "Eligible place of work" means the department of ecology's
toxic cleanup program, a governmental entity, nongovernmental
organization, or private firm engaged in projects or programs primarily
dedicated to the cleanup of hazardous substances at contaminated
facilities within the state of Washington.
(10) "Environmental cleanup employment obligation" means full-time
or part-time employment with an eligible place of work totaling the
equivalent of two years of full-time work within the first five years
after graduation.
(11) "Equalization fee" means the additional amount added to the
principal of a loan under this chapter to equate the debt to that which
the student would have incurred if the loan had been received through
the federal subsidized Stafford student loan program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM CREATED--POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD.
The environmental cleanup opportunity grant program is created. The
program shall be administered by the higher education coordinating
board. In administering the program, the board shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) Select students to receive conditional scholarships;
(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their environmental cleanup employment obligations under this chapter;
and
(5) Award scholarships to eligible students if moneys are
available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 SELECTION OF PARTICIPANTS--PROCESSES--CRITERIA. (1) The board may select participants based on an
application process conducted by the board or the board may use
selection processes for similar students in cooperation with the
department of ecology.
(2) If the board selects participants for the program, it shall
establish a selection committee for screening and selecting recipients
of the conditional scholarships. The criteria shall emphasize factors
demonstrating excellence including but not limited to superior
scholastic achievement, leadership ability, community contributions,
willingness to commit to providing environmental cleanup service in
areas of critical state need, and an ability to act as a role model for
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 SATISFACTORY PROGRESS REQUIRED. To receive
additional disbursements under the program under this chapter, a
participant must be considered by his or her institution of higher
education to be in a satisfactory progress condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 AWARD OF CONDITIONAL SCHOLARSHIPS AND LOAN
REPAYMENTS--AMOUNT--DURATION. The board may award up to ten
conditional scholarships in a twelve-month period to eligible
participants from the funds appropriated to the board from the state
toxics control account created in RCW 70.105D.070, or from any private
donations, or any other funds given to the board for this program. The
amount of the conditional scholarship awarded an individual shall not
exceed the amount of tuition and fees at the institution of higher
education attended by the participant or resident undergraduate tuition
and fees at the University of Washington per academic year for a full-time student, whichever is lower. Participants are eligible to receive
conditional scholarships for a maximum of two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 REPAYMENT OBLIGATION. (1) Participants in
the conditional scholarship program incur an obligation to repay the
conditional scholarship, with interest and an equalization fee, unless
they graduate from an institution of higher education with a major
focused on cleanup of contaminated hazardous waste sites pursuant to
chapter 70.105D RCW and are employed at an eligible worksite for the
equivalent of two years of full-time employment served during the first
five years following graduation, under rules adopted by the board.
Participants who are employed at an eligible place of work shall have
one year of loan canceled for each year they work.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined annually by the board.
Participants who fail to complete the environmental cleanup service
shall incur an equalization fee based on the remaining unforgiven
balance of the loan. The equalization fee shall be added to the
remaining balance and repaid by the participant.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. The maximum
period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal and
interest accruing quarterly commencing six months from the date the
participant completes or discontinues the course of study. Provisions
for deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant works at an
eligible place of work until the entire repayment obligation is
satisfied. Should the participant cease to work on cleanup of
contaminated sites in this state before the participant's repayment
obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the
principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and continue
until the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is
satisfied.
(5) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of such
repayments under the criteria established in this section and shall
maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, which are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited in the environmental cleanup opportunity grant account and
shall be used to cover the costs of granting the conditional
scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making collections
under subsection (5) of this section. The board shall maintain
accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those
necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant conditional
scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The board shall adopt rules to define the terms of repayment,
including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments. The board
is encouraged to adopt rules consistent with similar programs to the
extent feasible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 ENVIRONMENTAL CLEANUP OPPORTUNITY GRANT
ACCOUNT. (1) The environmental cleanup opportunity grant account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the environmental cleanup opportunity grant program. The account shall
be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature
from the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.105D.070 for
the environmental cleanup opportunity grant program, private
contributions to the program, and receipts from participant repayments
from the environmental cleanup opportunity grant program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional loans to participants in the environmental cleanup
opportunity grant program established by this chapter and costs
associated with program administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2008 c 329 s 921, 2008 c 329 s 920,
2008 c 329 s 919, and 2008 c 328 s 6009 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; ((and))
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150; and
(xiii) Conditional scholarships awarded under the environmental
cleanup opportunity grant program established under chapter 28B. . .RCW
(sections 1 through 8 of this act).
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(d) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the
account.
(9) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---