BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.60.030 and 2007 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, sex, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability is recognized as and
declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination:
PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300,
48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the
purposes of this subparagraph; ((and))
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability, or national origin or
lawful business relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein
contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law
pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices; and
(g) the right of a mother to breastfeed her child in any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.215 and 2007 c 187 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent
or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results in
any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of
any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other
persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission,
patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging
in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable
to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin,
sexual orientation, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military
status, status as a mother breastfeeding her child, the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That
this section shall not be construed to require structural changes,
modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a person
with a disability except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That
behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other persons
can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.

--- END ---