BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 REGISTRATION OR AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE
REQUIRED. (1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to
practice registered interior design in this state, or to use in
connection with his or her name or otherwise assume, use, or advertise
any title or description including the word "registered interior
designer" or "registered interior design services" or language tending
to imply that he or she is a registered interior designer, unless the
person is registered or authorized to practice in the state of
Washington under this chapter.
(2) An interior designer or interior design firm registered in any
other jurisdiction, but not registered in the state of Washington, may
offer to practice registered interior design in this state if:
(a) They clearly state in their proposal for services that they are
not currently registered in the state of Washington; and
(b) Prior to practicing registered interior design in the state of
Washington, the person or firm registers to practice registered
interior design in this state.
(3) The provisions of this section may not affect the use of the
words "interior design" or "interior designer" where a person does not
practice or offer to practice registered interior design.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Administration of the construction contract" includes the
periodic observation of materials and work to observe the general
compliance with the construction contract documents, but does not
include responsibility for supervising construction methods and
processes, site conditions, equipment operations, personnel, or safety
on the worksite.
(2) "Architect" means an individual who is registered under chapter
18.08 RCW.
(3) "Board" means the state board for registered interior
designers.
(4) "Certificate of authorization" means a certificate issued by
the director to a business entity that authorizes the entity to
practice registered interior design.
(5) "Certificate of registration" means the certificate of
registration issued by the board to a registered interior designer.
(6) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(8) "Engineer" means an individual who is registered as an engineer
under chapter 18.43 RCW.
(9) "Manager" means a member of a limited liability company in
which management of its business is vested in the members, and the
managers of a limited liability company in which management of its
business is vested in one or more managers.
(10) "NCIDQ" means the national council for interior design
qualification.
(11) "Partitions" means walls that divide a space that are not a
part of the building's structure nor serve the building's load path.
A partition supports its own weight and may be designed to provide
varying levels of visual and acoustical privacy, smoke and fire
resistance, and loads attached to it such as cabinetry or grab bars.
(12) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional
service corporation, corporation, joint stock association, joint
venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in the state.
(13) "Practice of registered interior design" means the rendering
of services to enhance the quality and function of the nonstructural
interior areas of a structure designed for human habitation or
occupancy. The term includes:
(a) An analysis of:
(i) A client's needs and goals; and
(ii) The requirements for safety relating to that area;
(b) The formulation of preliminary designs that are appropriate,
functional, and aesthetic;
(c) The development and presentation of final designs for the
alteration or construction of the space;
(d) The preparation of contract documents, including specifications
for partitions, materials, finishes, furniture, fixtures, and
equipment;
(e) Collaboration with other registered design professionals in the
completion of a project;
(f) The preparation and administration of bids or contracts as the
agent of a client;
(g) The review and evaluation of problems relating to the design of
a project;
(h) The understanding and application of the appropriate building
codes; and
(i) Performance by an individual who meets the education,
examination, and experience requirements under section 4 of this act.
(14) "Registered" means holding a currently valid certificate of
registration or certificate of authorization issued by the director
authorizing the practice of registered interior design.
(15) "Registered design professional" means an individual who is
registered or licensed to practice their respective design profession
as defined by the statutory requirements of the professional
registration laws of the state or jurisdiction in which the project is
being constructed.
(16) "Registered interior designer" means a person who provides
some, or all, of the services described in this chapter, and holds a
certificate of registration issued by the board.
(17) "Responsible control" means the amount of control over and
detailed knowledge of the content of a technical submission during its
preparation that is ordinarily exercised by a registered interior
designer when applying the normal standard of professional care.
(18) "Review" means a process of examination and evaluation, of the
documents, for compliance with applicable laws, codes, and regulations
affecting the built environment that includes the ability to control
the final product.
(19) "Structure" means any construction consisting of load-bearing
members such as the foundation, roof, floors, walls, columns, girders,
and beams or a combination of any number of these parts, with or
without other parts or appurtenances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 BOARD OF REGISTRATION--APPOINTMENT, TERMS,
VACANCIES, REMOVAL--OFFICERS--TRAVEL EXPENSES. (1) A state board for
registered interior designers is created consisting of five members who
must be appointed by the governor.
(a) Four members of the initially appointed board shall be
qualified as described by section 4 of this act, be residents of the
state, and have at least eight years' experience in the practice of
interior design in responsible control of interior design work or
responsible charge of interior design teaching. These four appointees
must be registered under this chapter within one year of the first
person being registered under this chapter. One member must be a
public member, a resident of the state, who is not and has never been
an interior designer or registered interior designer and who does not
employ and is not employed by or professionally or financially
associated with an interior designer or registered interior designer.
(b) Two of the initially appointed board members must serve for two
years, two must serve for four years, and the public member must serve
for six years. Thereafter, all board members must serve a term of six
years. No member may serve more than two consecutive terms on the
board. Each member must hold office until the expiration of the term
for which the member is appointed or until a successor has been
appointed by the governor.
(2)(a) Every member of the board must receive a certificate of
appointment from the governor.
(b) The governor may remove any member of the board for
inefficiency, neglect of duty, or dishonorable conduct. Vacancies in
the board for any reason must be filled by appointment for the
unexpired term.
(3) The board must appoint one of its members as chair and one of
its members as secretary and treasurer. The chair and secretary must
each serve one year. The secretary of the board must keep a true and
correct record of all proceedings of the board.
(4) Members of the board must be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240 and must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION--APPLICATION--QUALIFICATIONS. (1) The director must grant a certificate of
registration to all qualified applicants who are determined by the
board as having passed the required examination and as having given
satisfactory proof of completion of the required education and work
experience.
(2) Applications for registration must be filed as the board
prescribes by rule. The application and registration fees must be
determined by the director under RCW 43.24.086.
(3) An applicant for registration as a registered interior designer
must be of good moral character, be at least eighteen years of age, and
demonstrate:
(a) Proof of one of the following:
(i) An interior design degree from an institution of higher
education as necessary to sit for the NCIDQ exam including, but not
limited to, no less than sixty semester or ninety quarter credit hours
of interior design coursework that culminates in a degree or diploma;
(ii) A substantially equivalent program of interior design
education approved by the board including, but not limited to, no less
than sixty semester or ninety quarter credit hours of interior design
coursework that culminates in a degree or diploma; or
(iii) The alternate education review process as administered by the
NCIDQ; and
(b) Proof of documented experience as required by the NCIDQ for
exam eligibility including, but not limited to, no less than three
thousand five hundred twenty hours of interior design work experience;
and
(c)(i) Verification issued by the NCIDQ as proof that the applicant
has passed the examination prepared and administered by the NCIDQ; or
(ii) That the applicant is a registered architect with documented
proof of six years of combined education and diversified experience in
the practice of interior design as reviewed and approved by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATES OF REGISTRATION--SEAL, USE. (1) The director must issue a certificate of registration
to any applicant who has, to the satisfaction of the board, met all the
requirements for registration upon payment of the registration fee as
provided in this chapter. All certificates of registration must show
the full name of the registrant, have the registration number, and must
be signed by the chair of the board and by the director. The issuance
of a certificate of registration by the director is prima facie
evidence that the person named therein is entitled to all the rights
and privileges of a registered interior designer and registered design
professional.
(2) Each registrant must obtain a seal of the design authorized by
the board bearing the registered interior designer's name, registration
number, the legend "registered interior designer," and the name of this
state. It is unlawful to seal and sign a document after a registrant's
certificate of registration or authorization has expired, been revoked,
or is suspended.
(3) Any interior design construction documents, which may include
drawings, plans, specifications, or reports prepared or issued by the
registered interior designer, being filed for public record with any
jurisdiction or local building department for the purposes of obtaining
a building permit must bear the signature and seal of the registered
interior designer who prepared or approved the documents and the date
sealed. Construction documents bearing the seal of a registered
interior designer must be accepted for filing by the appropriate
jurisdiction or local building department.
(4) The board may adopt regulations specifying the manner in which
a registered interior designer may electronically transmit construction
documents.
(5) A registered interior designer may seal and sign technical
submissions that are nonstructural and are: Prepared by the registered
interior designer; prepared by the registered interior designers'
regularly employed subordinates; or prepared in part by an individual
or firm under direct subcontract with the registered interior designer.
(6) The secretary of the board must keep an official roster of all
certificates of registration to practice as a registered interior
designer in the state issued and renewed pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter. The roster must be properly indexed and open for public
inspection and information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 REGISTRATION OF OUT-OF-STATE REGISTRANTS.
The director may, upon receipt of a current registration fee, grant a
certificate of registration to any applicant who is registered or
licensed in another state or jurisdiction if the individual holds an
active certificate number issued by NCIDQ and the qualifications
required by that state or jurisdiction are equivalent or more
stringent, as determined by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 EXEMPTIONS. (1) This chapter may not affect
or prevent:
(a) The practice of architecture as authorized in chapter 18.08
RCW, landscape architecture as authorized in chapter 18.96 RCW,
engineering as authorized in chapter 18.43 RCW, or naval architecture,
or any legally recognized profession or trade not registered under this
chapter;
(b) An architect who is registered under applicable laws of this
state from providing interior design services or registered interior
design services providing that the architect does not refer to himself
or herself as a registered interior designer unless registered under
this chapter;
(c) Any person from calling himself or herself an interior designer
or offering interior design services provided that he or she does not
refer to himself or herself as a registered interior designer and does
not provide registered interior design services as defined in section
2 of this act;
(d) Any person who provides decorative services, or assistance in
selection of decorative accessories, surface materials, window
treatments, wall coverings, paint, floor coverings, lighting fixtures
which are not part of a structure, plumbing fixtures which are not part
of a structure, cabinetry, surface-mounted fixtures, and loose
furnishings and equipment not subject to regulation under applicable
provisions of jurisdictional codes, regulations, or the jurisdictional
fire codes, providing the person does not refer to himself or herself
as a registered interior designer;
(e) Any employee of a retail establishment, wholesale
establishment, or commercial furniture dealership providing
consultation or furnishings in the furtherance of a sale or prospective
sale, providing the person does not refer to himself or herself as a
registered interior designer;
(f) Any person from doing interior design work including preparing
construction contract documents and administration of the construction
contract for:
(i) Residential buildings regardless of the size of the building,
so long as it does not contain more than four dwelling units;
(ii) Residential buildings of more than four dwelling units, but
only if the entire completed building is less than four thousand square
feet;
(iii) Nonresidential buildings of any occupancy not exceeding four
thousand square feet;
(g) Drafters, clerks, project managers, superintendents, and other
employees or consultants of a registered interior designer from acting
under the instructions, control, or supervision of their employers;
(h) The construction, alteration, or supervision of construction by
contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or superintendents
employed by contractors or the preparation of shop drawings in
connection therewith;
(i) Owners or contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW from
engaging persons who are not registered interior designers or
registered architects to observe and supervise construction of a
project; or
(j) Any person who prepares plans, drawings, or specifications for
buildings for his or her own private residential use.
(2) A person exempted by the provisions of this section is not
thereby absolved from any civil or criminal liability that might
otherwise accrue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 BUSINESS ENTITY. (1) Each office or place
of business in this state of any partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, or other business organization or association that
offers to practice or engages in the practice of registered interior
design must have a registered interior designer who is a resident of
this state and holds a certificate of registration issued pursuant to
this chapter regularly working in the office or place of business and
having responsible control for the interior design work or work
relating to engaging in practice as a registered interior designer
conducted in the office or place of business.
(2) If a person who is not registered, or a registrant who is not
an owner, and who is employed by or affiliated with a business
organization or association which holds a certificate of authorization
issued is found by the board to have violated a provision of this
chapter or a regulation of the board, the board may hold the business
organization or association and the registrants and licensees who are
owners responsible for the violation.
(3) No person, firm, copartnership, association, or other
organization may bring or maintain any action in the courts of this
state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act
or contract for which registration is required by this chapter without
alleging and proving that the plaintiff was duly registered under this
chapter at all times during the performance of the act or contract.
(4) The business entity must furnish the board with information
about its organization and activities as the board shall require by
rule.
(5) Upon the filing with the board of the application for
certificate of authorization, the certified copy of the resolution, and
the information specified in subsection (4) of this section, the board
must authorize the director to issue to the business entity a
certificate of authorization to practice registered interior design in
this state.
(6) For each certificate of authorization issued under this
section, the business entity must pay a certification fee and an annual
certification renewal fee as prescribed by the director under RCW
43.24.086.
(7) Any business entity that has been registered under this chapter
and has engaged in the practice of registered interior design may have
its certificate of authorization either suspended or revoked by the
board if, after a proper hearing, the board finds that the business
entity has committed misconduct or malpractice. In such a case, any
individual registered interior designer registered under this chapter
who is involved in such misconduct or malpractice is also subject to
disciplinary measures provided in this chapter.
(8) Any business entity practicing or offering to practice
registered interior design, whether or not it is authorized to practice
registered interior design under this chapter, must be jointly and
severally responsible to the same degree as an individual registered
interior designer and must conduct their business without misconduct or
malpractice in the practice of registered interior design as defined in
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RENEWAL--WITHDRAWAL. (1) The director must
set the renewal date for certificates of registration in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086. Registrants who fail to pay the renewal fee within
thirty days of the due date must pay all delinquent fees plus a penalty
fee equal to one-third of the renewal fee. A registrant who fails to
pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may be reinstated under
such circumstances as the board determines. The renewal and penalty
fees and the frequency of renewal assessment must be authorized under
this chapter. Renewal date for certificates of authorization and
certificates of registration must be the anniversary of the date of
authorization or date of registration.
(2) Any registrant in good standing may withdraw from the practice
of registered interior design by giving written notice to the director,
and may within five years thereafter resume active practice upon
payment of the then-current renewal fee. A registrant may be
reinstated after a withdrawal of more than five years under such
circumstances as the board determines.
(3) The board must require each registered interior designer who
holds a certificate of registration pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter to complete ten hours per year of continuing education units
approved by the board, as a condition to the renewal of his or her
certificate.
(4) The renewal must be recorded, together with its serial number,
by the secretary of the board in the official register of the board
under this chapter.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section,
any holder of a certificate of registration which has expired through
failure to be renewed may obtain a renewal of the certificate, at any
time within one year from the date of its expiration, upon application
to and with the approval of the board. The time for renewal of the
expired certificate may be extended at the discretion of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 PROHIBITED ACTS--ENFORCEMENT--PENALTIES.
(1) The board must comply with chapter 18.235 RCW and provide grounds
for disciplinary action, and have disciplinary power to suspend,
revoke, fine, annul registration, or impose a civil penalty for each
violation provided that there is satisfactory proof of violated
provisions of the rules adopted by the board.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to:
(a) Hold himself or herself out to the public or to solicit
business as a registered interior designer in this state without having
a certificate of registration or temporary certificate issued by the
board. This subsection (2)(a) does not prohibit a person who is exempt
under this chapter from the provisions of this chapter from holding
himself or herself out to the public or soliciting business as an
interior designer;
(b) Advertise or put out any sign, card, or other device which
indicates to the public that he or she is a registered interior
designer or that he or she is otherwise qualified to practice as a
registered interior designer, without having a certificate of
registration issued by the board;
(c) Practice as a registered interior designer without a
certificate of registration issued by the board;
(d) Violate any other provision of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 GRANDFATHERING. Any person, who applies
for registration and remits the application and initial fees within a
two-year period after the first person is registered under this
chapter, must be registered by the board provided that the applicant
meets one of the following requirements:
(1) The education, examination, and experience requirements in
section 4 of this act;
(2) The applicant has previously passed the NCIDQ examination; or
(3) Has fifteen years of documented proof of diversified experience
in the practice of interior design as reviewed and approved by the
board, and provides proof of passage of the code section of the NCIDQ
exam. Accommodation for an individual to sit for the code section of
the NCIDQ exam will be provided by the board and an NCIDQ certificate
will not be granted, but the board will be notified of the exam section
results.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---