BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Communities across the state, including Everett, Longview,
Grays Harbor, and Colville, have natural resource-based economies and
rely on the use of biomass fuels to generate electricity for use in
manufacturing and to serve local residents;
(b) In 2007, by approving Initiative Measure No. 937, codified as
chapter 19.285 RCW, citizens of the state authorized a law requiring
electric utilities that serve more than twenty-five thousand customers
in Washington to obtain fifteen percent of their electricity from new
renewable resources by 2020 and to meet energy conservation goals;
(c) Eight other western states have renewable energy standards, but
most of those other laws, unlike chapter 19.285 RCW, allow existing
biomass resources to count as renewable energy resources; and
(d) By discriminating against our state's natural assets for
producing renewable energy, chapter 19.285 RCW obligates local electric
utilities to acquire more expensive renewable resource technologies.
(2) The legislature declares that chapter 19.285 RCW should be
amended to preserve our low electricity costs and its economic benefits
to urban and rural communities alike, and to promote further
development of the low cost, climate-friendly biomass resources that
form the foundation of our present and future clean energy economy.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Biomass energy" means energy produced from the combustion of
(a) organic byproducts of the pulping process or algae; (b) animal
waste; (c) solid organic fuels from wood; (d) forest or field residues;
(e) wooden demolition or construction debris; (f) landfill gas or
biogas produced from organic matter, wastewater, or anaerobic
digesters; or (g) dedicated energy crops. "Biomass energy" does not
include energy produced from the combustion of wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as: Creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests; or municipal solid waste.
(4) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(((4))) (5) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(((5))) (6) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(((6))) (7) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(((7))) (8) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases
electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development or its successor.
(((9))) (10) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable
resource where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of
such facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five
megawatts.
(((10))) (11) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest;
or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments; or
(c) Electricity from a biomass energy powered generation facility
located in Washington that commenced operation before March 31, 1999.
(((11))) (12) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010.
(((12))) (13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered in the most recently completed year by a
qualifying utility to its Washington retail customers.
(((13))) (14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally
related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and
other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(((14))) (15) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined
for the Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698;
16 U.S.C. Sec. 839a).
(((15))) (16) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 39.35C.010.
(((16))) (17) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as
the term "electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves
more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington.
The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy.
(((17))) (18) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable
certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible
renewable resource where the generation facility is not powered by
fresh water, the certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes
associated with that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the
certificate is verified by a renewable energy credit tracking system
selected by the department.
(((18))) (19) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor byproduct from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(((19))) (20) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other
entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and
purposes of this chapter.
(((20))) (21) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, harvesters are
allowed a credit against the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter, as provided in this section. The credit is thirty dollars per
harvested green ton of forest derived biomass sold, transferred, or
used for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. Credit
may not be claimed for forest derived biomass sold, transferred, or
used before the effective date of this section. The amount of credit
allowed for a reporting period may not exceed the tax otherwise due
under this chapter for that reporting period. Any unused excess
credit in a reporting period may be carried forward to future reporting
periods for a maximum of two years.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "harvested" and "harvesters"
are defined in RCW 84.33.035, and "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
forest derived biomass used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or
biofuel. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section, "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of forest derived biomass for production of electricity, steam,
heat, or biofuel.
(2) For purposes of this section, "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 3, 4, and 5 of this act take effect
October 1, 2009.

--- END ---