BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.110 and 2007 c 259 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include up to an additional ((twenty-five)) five
dollars to be transferred by the department to the University of
Washington for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 1st of each year, the University of Washington shall
provide to the department an accounting of:
(1) The use of funds collected under RCW 43.70.110(c) during the
prior year; and
(2) The use of the online health sciences library by each category
of provider subject to RCW 43.70.110(c).

--- END ---