BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that contaminated
storm water runoff is a major water pollution problem in the state
creating a significant burden on the rivers, aquifers, lakes, and
streams across Washington. In addition, mitigating the burdens of
storm water and storm water pollution is one of the Puget Sound
partnership's top strategic priorities for Puget Sound recovery.
(2) The legislature recognizes that the burden of storm water
pollution is a function of both increased volumes of storm water runoff
due to the expansion of impervious surfaces and the toxic substances
that pollute the runoff. Local governments may address the burdens
created by increased impervious surface through storm water utility
fees, but it has been difficult to regulate the toxic substances that
contaminate storm water runoff and result in nonpoint source pollution.
(3) The legislature finds that contamination from one category of
toxic substances, petroleum products, accounts for a significant
portion of the total pollution load in Puget Sound and other areas in
the state.
(4) The legislature finds that, although future expenditures for
required storm water remediation have not been fully quantified,
existing information shows that near-term costs for storm water permit
compliance and retrofit projects are in excess of one billion dollars.
To meet federal storm water permit requirements and complete other
storm water projects necessary to meet water quality recovery goals,
more than two hundred fifty million dollars will need to be spent by
cities, counties, ports, and the state department of transportation
every year. The fee imposed in section 3 of this act on petroleum
products, which account for between forty-five percent and sixty-five
percent of storm water pollution, will generate less than half of the
minimum of the annual costs of necessary storm water remediation
projects.
(5) The legislature finds that the burden of storm water pollution
from petroleum products is difficult to offset because the source of
pollution is not a single physical point, but occurs wherever the
petroleum products are purchased, consumed, or used. Nonpoint
pollution sources like petroleum and petroleum byproducts contaminate
storm water through a multitude of pathways. Combustion of gasoline,
diesel, residual fuel oil, and other petroleum products emit pollutants
such as hydrocarbons, polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons, zinc, and
arsenic, which then disperse and depose on the ground. Petroleum-based
chemicals leach from substances like paving asphalt. Oil and grease
drip from vehicles and equipment onto roads and parking lots. When
rainwater flows across impervious surfaces, these contaminants are
mobilized and transported to water bodies.
(6) The legislature finds that the possession of petroleum and
petroleum byproducts such as asphalt and road oil, lubricants, motor
vehicle fuel, and motor diesel fuel directly contributes to storm water
contamination because once these products are present in the state, the
immediate, foreseeable, and unavoidable consequences of their
distribution and use are emissions that significantly contribute to
storm water pollution.
(7) The legislature finds that the federal government and the state
of Washington have identified remediation of storm water runoff through
national pollutant discharge elimination system phase I and II as a
requirement for the state and local jurisdictions. Impacts from the
polluted storm water may be mitigated through retrofit projects for
existing infrastructure.
(8) The legislature finds that resources needed to offset the
direct burdens of storm water polluted by these substances are
insufficient to meet existing needs. Existing funding is raised
largely by local governments and is disproportionately borne by fees
levied on individual developers and property owners.
(9) Finally, the legislature finds that imposing a fee on the first
in-state possession of petroleum products that contribute to nonpoint
storm water pollution is the most administratively feasible method of
regulation that proportionally allocates the costs of offsetting the
burdens that these products place on the environment. The legislature
therefore authorizes a fee to regulate nonpoint source pollution from
petroleum products and offset the burdens that such nonpoint pollution
places on the environment and the waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The water pollution account is created in the state treasury.
All fees collected under section 3 of this act must be deposited in the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account must be used on activities or capital
projects that mitigate or prevent storm water pollution by petroleum
products or storm water pollution associated with petroleum products.
(2) After deducting the department's administrative costs
associated with collecting the fees and administering a competitive
grant process:
(a) Approximately forty percent of the moneys must be allocated
through the grant process to local governments to fund activities or
capital projects that address petroleum contamination of storm water
through the implementation of the national pollutant discharge
elimination system programs permitted under this chapter. To be
eligible, local governments must provide fifty percent of project or
activity costs from other nonstate fund sources. To qualify for
funding, applicants must also demonstrate the following:
(i) A clear relationship between petroleum products that contribute
to storm water pollution and the project's or activity's outcomes; and
(ii) For project proposals, that the project is an identified
priority based on an analysis of ecological or water quality needs
throughout the jurisdiction, basin, or watershed.
(b) Approximately forty percent of the moneys must be allocated
through the grant process to local governments for retrofit projects
that address petroleum contamination of storm water. The moneys must
be prioritized for projects that utilize low-impact development
retrofit strategies, but moneys may be awarded for other retrofit
projects if the site does not lend itself to low-impact development
techniques. To qualify for funding, applicants must demonstrate the
following:
(i) A clear relationship between petroleum products that contribute
to storm water pollution and the project's outcomes; and
(ii) That the project is an identified priority based on an
analysis of ecological or water quality needs throughout the
jurisdiction, basin, or watershed.
(c) Approximately ten percent of the money must be allocated as
grants to the department of transportation to fund activities or
capital projects that address petroleum contamination of storm water
related to existing transportation infrastructure through the
implementation of the department of transportation's national pollutant
discharge elimination system programs permitted under this chapter. To
qualify for funding, the department must demonstrate the following:
(i) A clear relationship between petroleum products that contribute
to storm water pollution and the project's or activity's outcomes; and
(ii) For project proposals, that the project is an identified
priority based on an analysis of ecological or water quality needs
throughout the jurisdiction, basin, or watershed.
(d) Approximately ten percent of the money must be allocated
through either existing storm water grant programs or the grant process
to projects under (a) or (b) of this subsection and to the highest
priority projects based upon ecological and water quality benefits
determined by the department. For projects qualifying under this
subsection (2)(d), moneys may be allocated to meet the matching
requirements under (a) of this subsection to jurisdictions that
demonstrate economic hardship in meeting the matching requirement. To
qualify for funding, applicants must also demonstrate the following:
(i) A clear relationship between petroleum products that contribute
to storm water pollution and the project's outcomes; and
(ii) That the project is an identified priority based on an
analysis of ecological or water quality needs throughout the
jurisdiction, basin, or watershed.
(3) The department shall develop criteria for administering the
program and ranking projects for funding. In developing criteria
applicable to projects in the Puget Sound basin, the department shall
consult with the Puget Sound partnership. All projects approved for
funding must demonstrate the potential to achieve clear ecological or
water quality benefits. The department shall endeavor to distribute
the moneys within each geographic region of the state in proportion to
the severity of impacts on the state's waters from petroleum
contamination.
(4) Administration of the grant program, including the collection
of fees under section 3 of this act, must be paid for out of the water
pollution account. Notwithstanding program implementation costs, no
more than three percent of the moneys from the account may be used to
administer the grant program on a continuing basis.
(5) The department shall initiate the grant application process by
July 1, 2010.
(6) By December 1, 2011, and every two years thereafter, the
department shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature on the progress of the program and the suitability
of the percentage allocations specified in subsection (2)(a) through
(d) of this section.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Low-impact development" means a storm water management and
land development strategy applied at the parcel and subdivision level
that emphasizes conservation and use of on-site natural features
integrated with engineered, small-scale hydrologic controls to more
closely mimic predevelopment hydrologic functions.
(b) "Retrofit" means the renovation of existing development to
improve or eliminate storm water problems associated with the site.
(c) "Capital project" means the capital project, including the
construction and associated costs, described in capital budget
instructions issued by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2010, a fee is imposed on the first
possession of petroleum products that contribute to storm water
pollution, as defined in subsection (6) of this section, for the
purpose of offsetting the burden caused by petroleum pollution of storm
water in this state. The fee is one dollar and fifty cents per barrel
of petroleum product that contributes to storm water pollution.
(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the
water pollution account created in section 2 of this act and applied
solely for the pollution prevention and mitigation purposes permitted
under section 2 of this act and for the administration of the program
required under section 2 of this act.
(3) The fee must be collected by the department. No later than
January 1, 2010, the department shall adopt rules governing the
collection of the fees. The department may enter into agreements with
other state agencies to facilitate the most efficient collection
system.
(4) It is the intent of this section to impose a fee only once for
petroleum products that contribute to storm water pollution that are
possessed in this state. Accordingly, the fee is imposed on the first
possession of such products. The fee is not imposed on the possession
of small amounts of petroleum products that is first possessed by a
consumer or by a retailer for the purpose of sale to ultimate
consumers.
(5) Petroleum products exported from or sold for export from the
state are not subject to the fee imposed under this section.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of petroleum product.
(b) "Control" means the power to sell or use the petroleum product
or to authorize the sale or use by another.
(c) "Petroleum products that contribute to storm water pollution"
means asphalt and road oil, lubricants, motor vehicle fuel, motor
diesel fuel, and residual fuel oil, and any other petroleum substance
that the department determines contributes to storm water pollution in
the state. The term does not include crude oil, aviation gasoline, jet
fuel, home heating oil, dyed special fuel, or clear special fuel used
for agricultural purposes.
(d) "Possession" means the act of taking control of the petroleum
product located within this state, whether the person taking control
does so by bringing, receiving, creating, or extracting the petroleum
product in this state, and includes both actual and constructive
possession. "Actual possession" occurs when the person with control
obtains physical possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the
person with control does not obtain physical possession.

--- END ---