BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to save lives by
increasing timely medical attention to overdose victims through the
establishment of limited immunity from prosecution for people who seek
medical assistance in an overdose situation. Drug overdose is the
second leading cause of injury death in the United States, behind only
motor vehicle accidents and ahead of firearms. Overdose mortality
rates have increased significantly since the 1990s, according to the
centers for disease control and prevention, illegal and prescription
drug overdoses killed more than thirty-three thousand people nationwide
in 2005, the last year for which firm data are available. The
Washington state department of health reports that in 1999,
unintentional drug poisoning was responsible for four hundred three
deaths in this state; in 2006, the number had increased to seven
hundred seven. Many overdose fatalities occur because peers delay or
forego calling 911 for fear of arrest or police involvement, which
researchers continually identify as the most significant barrier to the
ideal first response of calling emergency services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who believes he or she is witnessing a drug-related
overdose and seeks medical assistance for the person experiencing the
overdose shall not be subject to prosecution for a violation of this
chapter, or have property that is not contraband seized or forfeited on
the basis of a violation of this chapter, if the evidence of the
violation was obtained as a result of seeking medical assistance.
(2) A person who experiences a drug-related overdose and receives
medical assistance in connection therewith shall not be subject to
prosecution for a violation of this chapter, or have property that is
not contraband seized or forfeited on the basis of a violation of this
chapter, if the evidence of the violation was obtained as a result of
having received medical assistance.
(3) This section shall not apply to prosecutions brought pursuant
to:
(a) RCW 69.50.415;
(b) RCW 69.50.401 for the manufacture of, or possession with the
intent to manufacture, controlled substances; and
(c) RCW 69.50.401 for the delivery of, or possession with intent to
deliver, controlled substances where the delivery was, or was intended
to be, a sale for profit.
(4) A court may consider the act of seeking medical assistance for
someone experiencing a drug-related overdose as a mitigating
circumstance justifying an exceptional sentence below the standard
range under RCW 9.94A.535(1).

--- END ---