BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.080 and 2007 c 114 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set
by the board:
(a) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school
employees, retired or disabled employees of county, municipal, or other
political subdivisions, or retired or disabled employees of tribal
governments covered by this chapter may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts after retirement or disablement;
(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately
upon separation from employment;
(c) Surviving spouses, domestic partners, and dependent children of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty may participate
in insurance plans and contracts.
(2) Rates charged surviving spouses and domestic partners of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or
disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or dependent children
who are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be based on
the experience of the community rated risk pool established under RCW
41.05.022.
(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses and domestic partners of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or
disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or children who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be calculated from a
separate experience risk pool comprised only of individuals eligible
for parts A and B of medicare; however, the premiums charged to
medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees shall be reduced by
the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.
(4) Surviving spouses, domestic partners, and dependent children of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty and retired or
disabled and separated employees shall be responsible for payment of
premium rates developed by the authority which shall include the cost
to the authority of providing insurance coverage including any amounts
necessary for reserves and administration in accordance with this
chapter. These self pay rates will be established based on a separate
rate for the employee, the spouse, and the children.
(5) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this
section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature
whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.195 and 2007 c 114 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or rules or
procedures adopted by the authority, the authority shall make available
to retired or disabled employees who are enrolled in parts A and B of
medicare one or more medicare supplemental insurance policies that
conform to the requirements of chapter 48.66 RCW. The policies shall
be chosen in consultation with the public employees' benefits board.
These policies shall be made available to retired or disabled state
employees; retired or disabled school district employees; retired
employees of county, municipal, or other political subdivisions or
retired employees of tribal governments eligible for coverage available
under the authority; or surviving spouses or domestic partners of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.26.030 and 2005 c 459 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.
(2)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative
authority of any city, town, county, or district or the elected
officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement
officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such
municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any
labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the
firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of
over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or
division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement
officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.
(b) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to
the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or
firefighter:
(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or
district;
(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;
(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law
enforcement agency; or
(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully
operational fire department as of January 1, 1996.
(3) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any
person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time,
fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of
Washington generally, with the following qualifications:
(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically
clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be
considered a law enforcement officer;
(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a
different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully
completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the
equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons
serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;
(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as
have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police
department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly
provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance
enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city
police officers;
(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an
employer under RCW 41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years
previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter
41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to
plan 2 members; and
(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person
employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or
director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially
involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties
in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The
provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not apply to any public
safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a
retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.
(4) "Firefighter" means:
(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is
serving in a position which requires passing a civil service
examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;
(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter
where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;
(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;
(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire
protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of
this subsection (4)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;
(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or
organization (which is an employer under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or
hereafter amended), if such individual has five years previous
membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18
RCW. The provisions of this subsection (4)(e) shall not apply to plan
2 members;
(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which,
on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil
service examination for firefighter;
(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time,
fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was
making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16
or 41.18 RCW; and
(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated
basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician.
(5) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(6) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a
member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a
member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.
(7)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under
the age of eighteen or mentally or physically ((handicapped)) disabled
as determined by the department, except a ((handicapped)) person who is
disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:
(i) A natural born child;
(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to
the date benefits are payable under this chapter;
(iii) A posthumous child;
(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior
to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or
(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any
benefits are payable under this chapter.
(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including
the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high
school, college, or vocational or other educational institution
accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located,
including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular
vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which
the child returns to school.
(8) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or
other person as would apply under subsections (3) or (4) of this
section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after
March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is
employed in that capacity on or after such date.
(9) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.
(10) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(11)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit,
or any other benefit described herein.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt
of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.
(12)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a
member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months
preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such
same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member,
including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve
months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement,
the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member
during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's
last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed
by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at
the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who
hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to
such member at the time of vesting.
(b) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly
average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty
service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement,
termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves
of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.
(13)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly
rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including
overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or
retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer
contributions and salary deductions will be based.
(b) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall
exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature
the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary
be the greater of:
(i) The basic salary the member would have received had such member
not served in the legislature; or
(ii) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative
public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional
contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary
under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under
(b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member
and employer contributions.
(14)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of
employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer,
for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not
exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter
service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United
States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all
service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after
the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law
enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more
hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of
any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.
(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under
the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service"
shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years
as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's
particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as
were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW
41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit
be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the
member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the
time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the
provisions of such prior act.
(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time
shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month
during which the member rendered such dual service.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a
member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for
ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a
service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or
more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy
hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute
one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for
one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than
seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.
Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a
state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this
retirement system.
Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the
total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any
fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be
taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or
benefits.
If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during
any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple
service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service
credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which
multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is
rendered.
(15) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions
made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2),
plus accrued interest credited thereon.
(16) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or
retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for
benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be
available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's
future benefits during the period of retirement.
(17) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of
the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the
computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to
present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and
employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and
retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement,
withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.
(18) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county
disability board or the city disability board established in RCW
41.26.110.
(19) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any
portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal
to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability
retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(20) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period
following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the
member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.
(21) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time,
which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.
(22) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the
following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for
these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.
(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital,
in its own behalf, for
(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless
private room is required by the attending physician due to the
condition of the patient.
(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room,
furnished by the hospital.
(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered
"other medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered
as "hospital expenses".
(i) The fees of the following:
(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.71 RCW;
(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the
provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;
(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25
RCW.
(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse
who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the
family of either the member or the member's spouse.
(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:
(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;
(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;
(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;
(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;
(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical
equipment;
(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;
(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the
member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by
a disease;
(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental
injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally
licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;
(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;
(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;
(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood
plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;
(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53
RCW.
(23) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(24) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the
retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.
(25) "Director" means the director of the department.
(26) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system prior to
October 1, 1977.
(29) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system on and after
October 1, 1977.
(30) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(31) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.
(32) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as its
primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but
not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department,
or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement
agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of
persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal
laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to,
the state departments of natural resources and social and health
services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission,
the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and the
state department of corrections.
(33) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as
domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.26.048 and 2007 c 487 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's
death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's
surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse or
domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if there
be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such member's
legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only when death
occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) as a result of an occupational disease or infection
that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under
this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall
be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.26.460 and 2003 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.26.430 or
disability retirement under RCW 41.26.470, a member shall elect to have
the retirement allowance paid pursuant to the following options,
calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.
(a) Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall
receive a retirement allowance payable throughout such member's life.
However, if the retiree dies before the total of the retirement
allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of such retiree's
accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
retiree's death, then to the surviving spouse or domestic partner; or
if there be neither such designated person or persons still living at
the time of death nor a surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to
the retiree's legal representative.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select
a retirement option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance
and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement
allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued
throughout the life of and paid to a designated person. Such person
shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty
percent survivor option.
(2)(a) A member, if married or a domestic partner, must provide the
written consent of his or her spouse or domestic partner to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married or a domestic partner and both the
member and member's spouse or domestic partner do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department will pay the
member a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the
member's spouse or domestic partner as the beneficiary. Such benefit
shall be calculated to be actuarially equivalent to the benefit options
available under subsection (1) of this section unless spousal or
domestic partner consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor
beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has been filed with the department at
least thirty days prior to a member's retirement:
(i) The department shall honor the designation as if made by the
member under subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) The spousal or domestic partner consent provisions of (a) of
this subsection do not apply.
(3)(a) Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who
elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection
(1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive a retirement
allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if they
meet the following conditions:
(i) The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has
predeceased the retiree; and
(ii) The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the
designated beneficiary's death.
(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1,
1998, or the date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever
comes last, shall be increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:
(i) One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this
subsection converted to a percent;
(ii) Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and
survivor option factor;
(iii) The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table
in effect as of July 1, 1998.
(d) The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from
the beginning of the month following the date of the designated
beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998, whichever comes last.
(4) No later than July 1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules
that allow a member additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit
options, and shall include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) A retired member who retired without designating a survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to designate their spouse or
domestic partner from a postretirement marriage or domestic partnership
as a survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the
date of the postretirement marriage or domestic partnership provided
the retirement allowance payable to the retiree is not subject to
periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as
provided for in RCW 41.50.670.
(ii) A member who entered into a postretirement marriage or
domestic partnership prior to the effective date of the rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse or
domestic partner as a survivor beneficiary following the adoption of
the rules.
(b) A retired member who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under this section and designated a nonspouse or a person not
their domestic partner as survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to remove the survivor designation and have their future
benefit adjusted.
(c) The department may make an additional charge, if necessary, to
ensure that the benefits provided under this subsection remain
actuarially equivalent.
(5) No later than July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to
permit:
(a) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made before retirement to provide that benefits payable
to a member who meets the length of service requirements of RCW
41.26.530(1) and the member's divorcing spouse or domestic partner be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse
or domestic partner.
The member shall have available the benefit options of subsection
(1) of this section upon retirement, and if remarried or in a domestic
partnership at the time of retirement remains subject to the spousal or
domestic partner consent requirements of subsection (2) of this
section. Any reductions of the member's benefit subsequent to the
division into two separate benefits shall be made solely to the
separate benefit of the member.
The nonmember ex spouse or former domestic partner shall be
eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon reaching the
ages provided in RCW 41.26.430(1) and after filing a written
application with the department.
(b) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made after retirement may only divide the benefit into
two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse or domestic
partner if the nonmember ex spouse or former domestic partner was
selected as a survivor beneficiary at retirement.
The retired member may later choose the survivor benefit options
available in subsection (4) of this section. Any actuarial reductions
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
Both the retired member and the nonmember divorced spouse or
domestic partner shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate
benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order with the
department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.
(c) The department may make an additional charge or adjustment if
necessary to ensure that the separate benefits provided under this
subsection are actuarially equivalent to the benefits payable prior to
the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.26.470 and 2006 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by
the director shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the
provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550. Such member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.26.420 and shall have such allowance actuarially reduced to reflect
the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the
attainment of age fifty-three, except under subsection (7) of this
section.
(2) Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of
this section shall be subject to such comprehensive medical
examinations as required by the department. If such medical
examinations reveal that such a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is no longer entitled to
benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be canceled
and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service
rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if
unable to perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's
request, in such other like or lesser rank as may be or become open and
available, the duties of which the member is then able to perform. In
no event shall a member previously drawing a disability allowance be
returned or be restored to duty at a salary or rate of pay less than
the current salary attached to the rank or position held by the member
at the date of the retirement for disability. If the department
determines that the member is able to return to service, the member is
entitled to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing
shall comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(3) Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in
the line of duty on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits
under RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW
41.04.535 shall receive or continue to receive service credit subject
to the following:
(a) No member may receive more than one month's service credit in
a calendar month.
(b) No service credit under this section may be allowed after a
member separates or is separated without leave of absence.
(c) Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the
rate in effect for the period of the service credited.
(d) Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and
paid to the department at the rate in effect for the period of service
credited.
(e) State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.45.060 and
41.45.067.
(f) Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which
the member would have received had the disability not occurred.
(g) The service and compensation credit under this section shall be
granted for a period not to exceed six consecutive months.
(h) Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized
under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is
entitled to receive the credit as a matter of contractual right.
(4)(a) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under
this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to
the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the
recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed
with the director, or, if there is no such designated person or persons
still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse or domestic partner, or, if there is neither such
designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her
death nor a surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her
legal representative.
(b) If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this
section died before April 27, 1989, and before the total of the
retirement allowance paid to the recipient equaled the amount of his or
her accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
department shall pay the balance of the accumulated contributions to
the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, then
in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving
spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.
(5) Should the disability retirement allowance of any disability
beneficiary be canceled for any cause other than reentrance into
service or retirement for service, he or she shall be paid the excess,
if any, of the accumulated contributions at the time of retirement over
all payments made on his or her behalf under this chapter.
(6) A member who becomes disabled in the line of duty, and who
ceases to be an employee of an employer except by service or disability
retirement, may request a refund of one hundred fifty percent of the
member's accumulated contributions. Any accumulated contributions
attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be
refunded at one hundred percent. A person in receipt of this benefit
is a retiree.
(7) A member who becomes disabled in the line of duty shall be
entitled to receive a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent
of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally
receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's
average final salary for each year of service beyond five.
(8) A member who is totally disabled in the line of duty is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance equal to seventy percent of
the member's final average salary. The allowance provided under this
subsection shall be offset by:
(a) Temporary disability wage-replacement benefits or permanent
total disability benefits provided to the member under Title 51 RCW;
and
(b) Federal social security disability benefits, if any;
so that such an allowance does not result in the member receiving
combined benefits that exceed one hundred percent of the member's final
average salary. However, the offsets shall not in any case reduce the
allowance provided under this subsection below the member's accrued
retirement allowance.
A member is considered totally disabled if he or she is unable to
perform any substantial gainful activity due to a physical or mental
condition that may be expected to result in death or that has lasted or
is expected to last at least twelve months. Substantial gainful
activity is defined as average earnings in excess of eight hundred
sixty dollars a month in 2006 adjusted annually as determined by the
director based on federal social security disability standards. The
department may require a person in receipt of an allowance under this
subsection to provide any financial records that are necessary to
determine continued eligibility for such an allowance. A person in
receipt of an allowance under this subsection whose earnings exceed the
threshold for substantial gainful activity shall have their benefit
converted to a line-of-duty disability retirement allowance as provided
in subsection (7) of this section.
Any person in receipt of an allowance under the provisions of this
section is subject to comprehensive medical examinations as may be
required by the department under subsection (2) of this section in
order to determine continued eligibility for such an allowance.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.26.510 and 2006 c 345 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's
credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing
to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as
if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or
domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse,
domestic partner, or eligible child or children shall elect to receive
either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.26.430, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.26.460 and if the member was not eligible
for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as
described in RCW 41.26.430; if a surviving spouse or domestic partner
who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or
children of the member under the age of majority, then such child or
children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to
that which was being received by the surviving spouse or domestic
partner, share and share alike, until such child or children reach the
age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner
eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's death,
such member's child or children under the age of majority shall receive
an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein provided making
the assumption that the ages of the spouse or domestic partner and
member were equal at the time of the member's death; or
(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or
(ii) If the member dies on or after July 25, 1993, one hundred
fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions, less any
amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any
accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW
41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and
is not survived by a spouse, domestic partner, or an eligible child,
then the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial reduction. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.26.420.
(5) The retirement allowance paid to the spouse or domestic partner
and dependent children of a member who is killed in the course of
employment, as set forth in RCW 41.05.011(14), shall include
reimbursement for any payments of premium rates to the Washington state
health care authority pursuant to RCW 41.05.080.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.26.520 and 2005 c 64 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes service
credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to
the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (7) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if the member makes the employer, member,
and state contributions plus interest as determined by the department
for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.
(4) A law enforcement member may be authorized by an employer to
work part time and to go on a part-time leave of absence. During a
part-time leave of absence a member is prohibited from any other
employment with their employer. A member is eligible to receive credit
for any portion of service credit not earned during a month of part-time leave of absence if the member makes the employer, member, and
state contributions, plus interest, as determined by the department for
the period of the authorized leave within five years of resumption of
full-time service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner. Any
service credit purchased for a part-time leave of absence is included
in the two-year maximum provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection
(3) or (4) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two
years of service credit during a member's working career for those
periods when a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an
employer. This may be done by paying the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.
(6) For the purpose of subsection (3) or (4) of this section the
contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded
supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and
41.45.067. The contributions required shall be based on the average of
the member's basic salary at both the time the authorized leave of
absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(7) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for
reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately
prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of
service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer and the state for
their respective contributions required under RCW 41.26.450 for the
period of military service, plus interest as determined by the
department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d) The surviving spouse, domestic partner, or eligible child or
children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the
uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for
retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date
of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall
establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse
or eligible child or children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.
(8) A member receiving benefits under Title 51 RCW who is not
receiving benefits under this chapter shall be deemed to be on unpaid,
authorized leave of absence.

--- END ---