BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known as the community
schools act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that young people need
a wide range of opportunities and a strong support system to succeed.
A quality academic program is necessary but is not sufficient, given
societal factors, family circumstances, poverty, and health problems.
All children, regardless of their economic, racial, or family
circumstances, deserve access to a full array of opportunities. The
legislature also finds that cooperative partnerships and joint use of
facilities between public schools, local governments, early learning
providers, health and social service providers, and postsecondary
institutions can result in the effective use of federal, state, local,
and community resources. Such partnerships build on community
strengths, foster family and community engagement, share accountability
for results, and set high expectations for all. The legislature
further finds that surplus schools are community assets that should be
reused for maximum public good to benefit communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The community schools program is created in the department of
commerce to provide capital grant funds for the development of
community schools and to convert empty school buildings into community
facilities.
(2) The purposes of the program are: (a) Improving the
coordination, availability, and effectiveness of services for children
and families; (b) helping children to come to school ready to learn
every day; (c) enabling families to participate in the education of
their children; (d) enabling more efficient use of federal, state,
local, and private sector resources that serve children and families;
(e) enabling the use and improving the access to surplus schools for
community purposes; and (f) assisting school districts with the
conversion of surplus schools from illiquid assets to liquid capital
funds.
(3) Grants provided through the program may be used for the
acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and improvement of
facilities to assist with the implementation of this act.
(4) The department of commerce shall:
(a) Establish a competitive process to solicit project proposals
that assist eligible entities in acquiring, constructing,
rehabilitating, or improving facilities, including surplus schools, to
be used for the delivery of nonresidential qualified services in
surplus school buildings, on school grounds, or within a reasonable
safe walking distance from the school given the age of the students;
(b) Evaluate and rank applications in consultation with an
independent advisory board using objective criteria;
(c) Establish a tiered system to determine the amount of matching
funds required from a grantee based on financial need, taking into
consideration:
(i) Community purpose; and
(ii) The ability of the applicant to obtain matching funds; and
(d) Establish a prioritized list of capital projects in
consultation with the advisory board and submit the list annually to
the governor and the legislature in the department's capital budget
request beginning with the 2011-2013 biennium. The list must include
a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project.
(5) In evaluating and ranking applications in consultation with an
independent advisory board, the department of commerce shall give
priority consideration to projects that provide multiple qualified
services and that demonstrate usage beyond the traditional school day
to include usage before and after school, on weekends, and all year
use.
(6) Nonstate matching funds may include cash, the value of real
property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(7) The department of commerce may not: (a) Require that state
funds be the last to be spent on a project; or (b) set a monetary limit
to funding requests.
(8) The department of commerce shall not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(9) In contracts for grants authorized under this act, the
department of commerce shall include provisions that require that
capital improvements must be held by the grantee for a specified period
of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(10) As part of the application process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan that includes information on the following:
(a) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
entity to provide or coordinate qualified services;
(b) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible entity
and each partner entity describing the role each entity will assume;
(c) Plans for joint utilization and maintenance of school and
community facilities by the lead eligible entity and its partner
entities, as well as liability considerations;
(d) The student, family, and school community to be served,
including information about the number of students, families, and
community residents to be served, frequency of services, and
information related to the percent of local elementary students that
receive free and reduced-price meals in the target area;
(e) Existing qualified services available at each school to be
served and in the community involved;
(f) The location of the proposed project, including that if the
project is not on school grounds, or is not a surplus school, then
documentation is required that the proposed project is within a
reasonable safe walking distance for the age of the students;
(g) Qualified services to be provided or coordinated by the lead
eligible entity and its partner entities; and
(h) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and qualified services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this act or from other federal, state, local, or private sources.
(11) Project applicants must also demonstrate that the proposed
project is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and
requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the
project.
(12) If state grant funds under this act are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, sale proceeds must be used by
the local school board disposing of such property for renovation,
replacement, or new construction of school facilities in the district.
(13) No state general funds may be used for development and
implementation of this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout section 3 of this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means an independent advisory board including,
but not limited to, a representative from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, an early learning expert, a youth
recreational facility expert, a social service facility expert, a local
school district representative, and a public higher education
representative.
(2) "Community school" means both a place and a set of partnerships
between entities including, but not limited to, public schools,
postsecondary institutions, local governments, nonprofit early learning
providers, and other nonprofit community resources with an integrated
focus on academics, health and social services, youth and community
development, and community engagement.
(3) "Eligible entity" means a public school district, local
government, nonprofit organization, nonprofit early learning provider,
or tribal government.
(4) "Qualified services" means the following:
(a) Early childhood education;
(b) Remedial education activities and academic enrichment
activities;
(c) Programs that promote parental involvement and family literacy;
(d) Youth development programs;
(e) Parent leadership development activities;
(f) Parenting education activities;
(g) Child care services;
(h) Community service opportunities;
(i) Programs that provide assistance to students who have been
truant, suspended, or expelled;
(j) Job training and career counseling services;
(k) Nutrition services;
(l) Primary health and dental care;
(m) Mental health prevention and treatment services;
(n) Adult education, including instruction in English as a second
language;
(o) Solely with respect to surplus schools any nonprofit, community
use or community purpose; and
(p) Other services as determined by the advisory board.
(5) "Surplus school" means a facility that is determined to be
surplus to the needs of a district by the local school board.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.525.050 and 2006 c 263 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
All applications by school districts for state assistance in
providing school plant facilities shall be made to the superintendent
of public instruction. Studies and surveys shall be conducted by the
superintendent for the purpose of securing information relating to (1)
the kind and extent of the school plant facilities required and the
urgency of need for such facilities in districts that seek state
assistance, (2) the ability of such districts to provide capital outlay
funds by local effort, (3) the need for improvement of school
administrative units and school attendance areas among or within such
districts, and (4) any other pertinent matters. School districts are
encouraged in studies and surveys to include an inventory of school
district facilities jointly used, or that could potentially be used for
other community purposes, including detail on cooperative partnerships.
Recommendations respecting action on the applications shall be
submitted to the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.335.130 and 2004 c 6 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 28A.335.240(1) and section 3 of this act,
the proceeds from any sale of school district real property by a board
of directors shall be deposited to the debt service fund and/or the
capital projects fund, except for amounts required to be expended for
the costs associated with the sale of such property, which moneys may
be deposited into the fund from which the expenditure was incurred.

--- END ---