BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.220 and 1998 c 245 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) State general funds appropriated to the department of health
for the purposes of funding community health centers to provide primary
health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity
health care services shall be transferred to the state health care
authority. Any related administrative funds expended by the department
of health for this purpose shall also be transferred to the health care
authority. The health care authority shall ((exclusively)) expend
these funds through contracts with community health centers to provide
primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and
maternity health care services. The administrator of the health care
authority shall establish requirements necessary to assure community
health centers provide quality health care services that are
appropriate and effective and are delivered in a cost-efficient manner.
The administrator shall further assure that community health centers
have appropriate referral arrangements for acute care and medical
specialty services not provided by the community health centers.
(2) The authority, in consultation with the department of health,
shall work with community and migrant health clinics and other
providers of care to underserved populations, to ensure that the number
of people of color and underserved people receiving access to managed
care is expanded in proportion to need, based upon demographic data.
(3) Within funds appropriated for community health care
collaborative grants, the authority may award grants for community-based health care collaborative programs that increase access to
appropriate, affordable health care for Washington residents,
consistent with requirements established by sections 2 through 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The community health care collaborative grant program is
established to further the efforts of community-based coalitions to
increase access to appropriate, affordable health care for Washington
residents, particularly employed low-income persons and children in
school who are uninsured and underinsured, through local programs
addressing one or more of the following: (a) Access to medical
treatment; (b) the efficient use of health care resources; and (c)
quality of care.
(2) Consistent with funds appropriated for community health care
collaborative grants specifically for this purpose or for community
grants established under RCW 41.05.220, two-year grants of up to five
hundred thousand dollars per organization may be awarded pursuant to
section 3 of this act by the administrator of the health care
authority.
(3) The health care authority shall provide administrative support
for the program. Administrative support activities may include health
care authority facilitation of statewide discussions regarding best
practices and standardized performance measures among grantees, or
subcontracting for such discussions.
(4) Eligibility for community health care collaborative grants
shall be limited to nonprofit organizations established to serve a
defined geographic region. To be eligible, a nonprofit organization
must have a formal collaborative governance structure and decision-making process that includes representation by hospitals, public
health, behavioral health, community health centers, rural health
clinics, and private practitioners that serve low-income persons in the
region, unless there are no such providers within the region, or
providers decline or refuse to participate or place unreasonable
conditions on their participation. The nature and format of the
application, and the application procedure, shall be determined by the
administrator of the health care authority. At a minimum, each
application shall: (a) Identify the geographic region served by the
organization; (b) show how the structure and operation of the
organization reflects the interests of, and is accountable to, this
region and members providing care within this region; (c) indicate the
size of the grant being requested, and how the money will be spent; and
(d) include sufficient information for an evaluation of the application
based on the criteria established in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The community health care collaborative grants shall be awarded
on a competitive basis based on a determination of which applicant
organization will best serve the purposes of the grant program
established in section 2 of this act. In making this determination,
priority for funding shall be given to the applicants that demonstrate:
(a) The initiatives to be supported by the community health care
collaborative grant are likely to address, in a measurable fashion,
documented health care access and quality improvement goals aligned
with state health policy priorities and needs within the region to be
served;
(b) An applicant organization documents formal, active
collaboration among key community partners that includes local
governments, school districts, large and small businesses, nonprofit
organizations, carriers, private health care providers, and public
health agencies;
(c) The applicant organization will match the community health care
collaborative grant with funds from other sources. The health care
authority may award grants solely to organizations providing at least
two dollars in matching funds for each community health care
collaborative grant dollar awarded;
(d) The community health care collaborative grant will enhance the
long-term capacity of the applicant organization and its members to
serve the region's documented health care access needs, including the
sustainability of the programs to be supported by the community health
care collaborative grant;
(e) The initiatives to be supported by the community health care
collaborative grant reflect creative, innovative approaches which
complement and enhance existing efforts to address the needs of the
uninsured and underinsured and, if successful, could be replicated in
other areas of the state; and
(f) The programs to be supported by the community health care
collaborative grant make efficient and cost-effective use of available
funds through administrative simplification and improvements in the
structure and operation of the health care delivery system.
(2) The administrator of the health care authority shall endeavor
to disburse community health care collaborative grant funds throughout
the state, supporting collaborative initiatives of differing sizes and
scales, serving at-risk populations.
(3) One-half the total amount of any award shall be disbursed to an
organization upon its selection as a community health care
collaborative grant recipient. The grantee shall submit quarterly
performance reports on standard outcome measures among all grantees
that show:
(a) Improved access to care and a medical home;
(b) Increased enrollment in coverage of the uninsured;
(c) Decreased unnecessary emergency room use; and
(d) Long-term sustainability.
(4) The remaining portion of the community health care
collaborative grant award must be disbursed one year later if the
administrator of the health care authority (a) timely receives all
quarterly progress reports from the organization and (b) determines
that the organization is satisfactorily serving the purposes of the
community health care collaborative grant program and meeting the
objectives identified in its application regarding: Access to medical
treatment; the efficient use of health care resources; and quality of
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1st of each fiscal year the administrator of the health
care authority shall provide the governor and the legislature with an
evaluation of the community health care collaborative grant program,
describing the organizations and collaborative initiatives funded and
the results achieved. Particularly successful coalitions shall be
highlighted with recommendations on whether, and how they could be
replicated statewide. The evaluation shall also summarize any
recommendations from the participating grantees regarding ways to
improve the community health care collaborative grant program and for
the state to otherwise support community-based coalitions working to
improve access to health care and quality improvement for Washington
residents, including any changes in state statutes or regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The health care authority may adopt rules to
implement this act.

--- END ---