BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state is authorized to establish a method that
allows service voters and overseas voters to cast a ballot over the
internet.
(2) In reviewing ways to implement this section, the secretary of
state will consider computing hardware and software systems that:
(a) Ensure the integrity and secrecy of the ballot and
authentication of the voter;
(b) Meet relevant and prevailing computer security standards;
(c) Use system components that are available for audit and
certification; and
(d) Allow for optional phased implementation.
(3) The secretary of state may seek alternative public or nonprofit
funding sources to implement this section.
(4) The method established by the secretary of state for allowing
service and overseas voters to vote over the internet is exempt from
chapter 29A.12 RCW.

--- END ---