BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that taxicab, limousine, and other for hire
vehicle operators are at significant risk of injury due to work-related
accidents, or work-related crimes such as robbery that may not be
covered by standard vehicle insurance policies. Since almost all
taxicab, limousine, and other for hire vehicle business operations are
independent small business franchises, their owners or operators may
opt out of industrial insurance coverage without full consideration for
the risk of financial exposure due to such action. As a result, health
care may be provided to them at public expense or not at all, and
erroneous claims may be made by health care providers for insurance
coverage, against the state department of labor and industries, private
businesses, or the taxicab associations in which certain municipalities
require participation. For hire vehicle operators do not enjoy the
benefit of the broad public policy embodied in this title that mandates
industrial insurance protection for workers. The legislature therefore
declares that all taxicab, limousine, and other for hire vehicle
businesses, defined in this act as "urban transportation business"
operations, and all for hire vehicle operators are subject to mandatory
industrial insurance coverage under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As an exception to the definition of "worker" under RCW
51.08.180, services performed by an individual for remuneration do not
constitute employment subject to this title if it is shown that the
person operating a for hire vehicle or an urban transportation
business: (a) Has an ownership or leasehold interest in a vehicle that
is operated as a "for hire vehicle" under chapters 46.72 and 46.72A
RCW, or under regulatory authority granted pursuant to chapter 81.72
RCW; and is operating such vehicle as a "for hire operator" as defined
in RCW 46.72.010; and (b) meets all the requirements in RCW 51.08.195
(1) through (6) to qualify for the exception to the definition of
"worker" under RCW 51.08.195.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "for hire vehicle" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 46.72.010 and "urban transportation
business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.16.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.010 and 2007 c 6 s 1023 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(3) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(4) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(5) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(6) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(7) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(8) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010: PROVIDED, That "motor transportation
business" shall not mean or include the transportation of logs or other
forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.
(9) "Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating:
(a) Any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (((a))) (i) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (((b))) (ii) operating entirely within and
between cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five
miles apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either
thereof. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is
the business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the
business of operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including
in such services the collection and distribution of property arriving
from or destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not
such collection or distribution be made by the person performing a
local or interstate line-haul of such property; or
(b) Any for hire vehicle as defined in RCW 46.72.010, limousine as
defined in RCW 46.72A.010, or a taxicab governed by the laws under
chapter 46.72 or 81.72 RCW, for the purpose of transporting persons or
goods for compensation. For the purpose of this subsection (9)(b) this
term does not include the leasing of equipment, or the leasing of
vehicles licensed under chapters 81.72, 46.72, and 46.72A RCW, or the
providing of any other services to urban transportation businesses.
(10)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9)
of this section or any business subject to control by the state, or
having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or
any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public
service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive
waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It
includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane
transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging
road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (10)(b) apply throughout
this subsection (10).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(12) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax
year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business," "engaging
in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and
"successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Operating under contract of service or in accordance with
applicable laws does not constitute evidence of control or direction
for the purposes of determining status as a worker or determining
employment or independent contractor status, pursuant to the exceptions
set forth in RCW 51.08.181 in regards to urban transportation
businesses as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or for hire vehicles or for hire
operators as defined in RCW 46.72.010.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.16.040 and 1996 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply to persons
engaging in one or more businesses taxable under this chapter whose
total gross income is less than two thousand dollars for a monthly
period or portion thereof unless such business is an urban
transportation business. Any person claiming exemption under this
section may be required to file returns even though no tax may be due.
If the total gross income for a taxable monthly period is two thousand
dollars, or more, no exemption or deductions from the gross operating
revenue is allowed by this provision.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.
(4) Fifty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1)(d)
of this section and from urban transportation businesses under
subsection (2) of this section must be remitted to the department of
labor and industries for the purpose of providing mandatory industrial
insurance to urban transportation businesses and their licensed for
hire vehicle operators, as provided pursuant to Title 51 RCW. For the
purposes of this subsection (4), "for hire vehicle operator" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 46.72.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any urban transportation business licensed pursuant to or
operating a for hire vehicle under chapter 46.72, 46.72A, or 81.72 RCW,
and who is operating such vehicle as a for hire operator, is within the
mandatory coverage of this title. Such urban transportation business
or for hire vehicle operator license must be granted by the department
of licensing subject to mandatory industrial insurance coverage and
must be suspended or revoked in the event of failure to file report of,
and pay, applicable premiums or taxes, including but not limited to the
public utility tax as levied upon urban transportation businesses
pursuant to RCW 82.16.020.
(2) A for hire vehicle operator must be registered or affiliated
with an urban transportation business and must have evidence of such
affiliation whenever operating a for hire vehicle. The department of
labor and industries, the department of revenue, and the department of
licensing must adopt rules to implement this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "for hire vehicle" and "for
hire operator" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.72.010 and
"urban transportation business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any urban transportation business as defined in RCW 82.16.010
with workers subject to the employment provisions of RCW 51.08.180, and
not otherwise eligible for an exemption, and accordingly paying
industrial insurance premiums, must receive as credit against such
premiums in the amount of any public utility tax paid under RCW
82.16.020, with credit to employers and employees proportionate to
their share of such insurance premiums paid.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, such employer
may opt for industrial insurance coverage for its urban transportation
business and for hire vehicle operators pursuant to, and under the
provisions of, this act.
(3) The department of labor and industries must adopt rules to
implement this section to ensure that costs and benefits of mandatory
industrial insurance are uniformly applied and received by all urban
transportation businesses, and for hire vehicle operators, without
regard to business employment or financial structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to control claims costs, particularly costs related to the
self-monitoring of industrial insurance claims by small, independently
operated urban transportation businesses, the department of labor and
industries may empower a panel with disinterested, independent third
party adjudicators with transportation industry experience and
expertise; authority to review, approve, or reject claims; and
authority to advise the department of labor and industries with respect
to such.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any entity regulating or setting consumer rates for urban
transportation businesses, including specifically cities, towns,
counties, and port districts setting the rates charged for taxicab
service under chapter 81.72 RCW, or for hire vehicles or limousines
operating under the authority of chapter 46.72 or 46.72A RCW or a
taxicab under chapter 46.72 RCW, must: (a) Consider the impact of the
public utility tax on urban transportation providers within its
jurisdiction in the calculation and setting of such consumer rates; and
(b) adjust such consumer rates to offset any increased cost to urban
transportation businesses and for hire vehicle operators of mandatory
industrial insurance coverage, within one hundred eighty days of the
effective date of this act.
(2) Rate-setting authority under this section is limited to the
setting of consumer rates for the provision of transportation services.
(3) Cities, towns, counties, and port districts that set consumer
rates charged for taxicab service pursuant to chapter 81.72 RCW, or for
other urban transportation businesses subject to the public utility tax
and subject to mandatory industrial insurance pursuant to this act, are
specifically prohibited from establishing, regulating, or otherwise
setting rates for the leasing of for hire vehicles, including licensed
taxicabs, by urban transportation industry service providers to urban
transportation businesses or their for hire vehicle operators for this
or any other purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must assess premiums, under the provisions of
this section, on urban transportation businesses in accordance with
chapter 51.12 RCW. This premium assessment must be for the purpose of
providing mandatory industrial insurance coverage while operating a for
hire vehicle under chapter 46.72, 46.72A, or 81.72 RCW. The department
may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the purposes of
this section, including rules providing for alternative reporting
periods and payment due dates for coverage under this section. The
department rules must ensure that premiums assessed upon urban
transportation businesses are proportionate to, and are assessed with
credit for, taxes paid by urban transportation businesses for mandatory
industrial insurance coverage levied in accordance with RCW
82.16.020(4) such that there must be no net revenue increase or
decrease to state tax revenue deposited to any fund, budget, or account
pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(6) except for the purposes of assessing and
collecting mandatory industrial insurance coverage insurance premiums
under this title including costs of premium collection.
(2) The department must compute industrial insurance premium rates
on a per license basis, which premium rate must be assessed at the time
of each issuance or renewal of the for hire vehicle operator license,
in an amount established by department rule for coverage under this
section, with initial payment at the time of for hire operator license
issuance, and further payment reported and paid by the urban
transportation business with which the for hire vehicle license is
affiliated, with the urban transportation business tax under chapter
51.12 RCW. Premium assessments must be determined in accordance with
the requirements of this title, except that assessments must be
experience rated with reference to all for hire vehicle operators
subject to mandatory insurance coverage under RCW 82.16.020.
(3) Alternate rules for the collection of premiums under this
section may be established by the department of revenue and the
department of licensing. Premiums must be deposited in the industrial
insurance trust funds as provided under rules of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---