BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.220 and 2000 c 107 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this title, the commission may make agreements to
obtain real or personal property or to transfer or convey property held
by the state to the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities,
units of local government of this state, public service companies, or
other persons, if in the judgment of the commission and the attorney
general the transfer and conveyance is consistent with public interest.
For purposes of this section, "local government" means any city, town,
county, special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation.
If the commission agrees to a transfer or conveyance under this
section or to a sale or return of real property under RCW 77.12.210,
the director shall certify, with the attorney general, to the governor
that the agreement has been made. The certification shall describe the
real property. The governor then may execute and the secretary of
state attest and deliver to the appropriate entity or person the
instrument necessary to fulfill the agreement.
No state moneys may be used to purchase property or easements for
potential water storage sites designated under the Columbia river basin
water supply development program, as identified in chapter 90.90 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease,
or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other
necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for
purposes consistent with this title. The commission may authorize the
director to acquire property under this section, but the power of
condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an
appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of
a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access
rights-of-way.
(2) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.
(3) No state moneys may be used to purchase property or easements
for potential water storage sites designated under the Columbia river
basin water supply development program, as identified in chapter 90.90
RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.41.270 and 2007 c 444 s 7 and 2007 c 241 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural
resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance
measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally
based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be
used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and
performance assessment.
(2) The office of financial management and the governor's salmon
recovery office, during the time it is constituted, shall assist
natural resource-related agencies in developing recommendations for a
monitoring program to measure outcome-focused performance measures
required by this section. The recommendations must be consistent with
the framework and coordinated monitoring strategy developed by the
monitoring oversight committee established in RCW 77.85.210.
(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan
recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental
organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office
of financial management on the implementation of this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation
commission, the recreation and conservation funding board, the salmon
recovery funding board, and the public works board within the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the
conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management
grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation commission water
quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention grants,
public participation grants, and remedial action grants under RCW
70.105D.070; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter
70.146 RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW 79.105.150;
habitat grants under the Washington wildlife and recreation program
under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon recovery grants under chapter 77.85 RCW;
and the public works trust fund program under chapter 43.155 RCW. The
term also includes programs administered by the department of fish and
wildlife related to protection or recovery of fish stocks which are
funded with moneys from the capital budget.
(6) No state moneys may be used to purchase property or easements
for potential water storage sites designated under the Columbia river
basin water supply development program, as identified in chapter 90.90
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.05.170 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any lands owned by the state parks and recreation commission,
which are determined to be surplus to the needs of the state for
development for state park purposes and which the commission proposes
to deed to a local government or other entity, shall be accompanied by
a clause requiring that if the land is not used for outdoor recreation
purposes, ownership of the land shall revert to the state parks and
recreation commission.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission, in cases where land
subject to such a reversionary clause is proposed for use or disposal
for purposes other than recreation, shall require that, if the land is
surplus to the needs of the commission for park purposes at the time
the commission becomes aware of its proposed use for nonrecreation
purposes, the holder of the land or property shall reimburse the
commission for the release of the reversionary interest in the land.
The reimbursement shall be in the amount of the fair market value of
the reversionary interest as determined by a qualified appraiser
agreeable to the commission. Appraisal costs shall be borne by the
local entity which holds title to the land.
(3) Any funds generated under a reimbursement under this section
shall be deposited in the parkland acquisition account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are to be used
solely for the purchase or acquisition of property for use as state
park property by the commission, as directed by the legislature; all
such funds shall be subject to legislative appropriation.
(4) No state moneys may be used to purchase property or easements
for potential water storage sites designated under the Columbia river
basin water supply development program, as identified in chapter 90.90
RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.70.040 and 2004 c 199 s 228 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is further authorized to purchase, lease, set
aside, or exchange any public lands which are deemed to be natural
areas: PROVIDED, That the appropriate state land trust receives the
fair market value for any interests that are disposed of: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That such transactions are approved by the board of natural
resources.
(2) An area consisting of public land designated as a natural area
preserve shall be held in trust and shall not be alienated except to
another public use upon a finding by the department of natural
resources of imperative and unavoidable public necessity.
(3) No state moneys may be used to purchase property or easements
for potential water storage sites designated under the Columbia river
basin water supply development program, as identified in chapter 90.90
RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.82.010 and 2007 c 506 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of general administration, on behalf of the agency
involved and after consultation with the office of financial
management, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise
acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be required by
elected state officials, institutions, departments, commissions,
boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies where joint state
and federal activities are undertaken and may grant easements and
transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part of any surplus
real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise have the
specific authority to dispose of real estate. This section does not
transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the
department of general administration.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of general
administration. The director of general administration shall report to
the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of
the legislature annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this
subsection.
(3) The director of general administration may fix the terms and
conditions of each lease entered into under this chapter, except that
no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in duration. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration upon a determination by the director
of the office of financial management that the long-term lease provides
a more favorable rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to
a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the
state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the
standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of
purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of general
administration shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it
may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred
to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this
subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of general administration shall provide
coordinated long-range planning services to identify and evaluate
opportunities for colocating and consolidating state facilities. Upon
the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new lease, or the purchase
of a facility, the director of general administration shall determine
whether an opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in
a single facility with other agencies located in the same geographic
area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of general
administration shall consult with the affected state agencies and the
office of financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would
have on the cost and delivery of agency programs, including whether
program delivery would be enhanced due to the centralization of
services. The director of general administration, in consultation with
the office of financial management, shall develop procedures for
implementing colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of general administration is authorized to
purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real
estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all or a part of such
real estate to state or federal agencies. The director of general
administration shall charge each using agency its proportionate rental
which shall include an amount sufficient to pay all costs, including,
but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and accounting
services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall not
exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen
expenses incident to management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of general administration determines that it is
necessary or advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration,
repair, or improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to
subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the director shall cause plans
and specifications thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to
be made and filed in his or her office and the state agency benefiting
thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work out of any available
funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work shall not exceed
the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand
dollars, other than that done by the owner of the property if other
than the state, shall be performed in accordance with the public works
law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of general administration shall make space utilization studies, and
shall establish standards for use of space by state agencies. Such
studies shall include the identification of opportunities for
colocation and consolidation of state agency office and support
facilities.
(10) The director of general administration may construct new
buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip,
all real estate under his or her management. Prior to the construction
of new buildings or major improvements to existing facilities or
acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase contract, the director
of general administration shall conduct an evaluation of the facility
design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering,
and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and
efficiency of the facility or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of general administration or the director's designee,
and recorded with the county auditor of the county in which the
property is located.
(12) The director of general administration may delegate any or all
of the functions specified in this section to any agency upon such
terms and conditions as the director deems advisable. By January 1st
of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall submit an
annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on all delegated leases.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of general administration may negotiate ground leases
for public lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing
contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the
state finance committee.
(15) The department of general administration shall report annually
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on facility leases executed for all state
agencies for the preceding year, lease terms, and annual lease costs.
The report must include leases executed under RCW 43.82.045 and
subsection (12) of this section.
(16) No state moneys may be used to purchase property or easements
for potential water storage sites designated under the Columbia river
basin water supply development program, as identified in chapter 90.90
RCW.

--- END ---