BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.050 and 2008 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount. Good cause reasons to
leave work are limited to the reasons listed in (b) of this subsection.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual has left work voluntarily with good cause and is
not disqualified from benefits under (a) of this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii)(A) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer: (1) Is outside
the existing labor market area; and (2) is in Washington or another
state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an individual
to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (II) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(B) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer, is outside the
existing labor market area; and (II) remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) With respect to individuals who separate from work on or after
June 12, 2008, the individual left work to enter an apprenticeship
program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training
council. Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to
the week in which the individual begins active participation in the
apprenticeship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies retroactively to claims
that have an effective date on or after January 4, 2004.

--- END ---