BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(a) Public educational facilities that are funded by the government
are not required to turn off their electrical machinery or lighting
systems when the buildings are unoccupied;
(b) Failure to turn off electrical lighting systems in unoccupied
public educational facilities wastes valuable governmental resources
that could be used for more important educational purposes; and
(c) Turning off all electrical lighting systems in unoccupied
public educational facilities nationwide could save the government
millions of tax dollars per year.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to direct public
educational facilities to turn off electrical lighting systems when
their facilities are unoccupied in order to conserve electricity and
avoid unnecessary state spending.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Electrical light" means any light that functions by means of
electricity, which may include, but is not limited to: Indoor lights,
security cameras, or stadium lighting.
(2) "Facility" includes any building that houses constituents of
public educational facilities, which may include, but is not limited
to, teachers, students, teacher aides, administrators, janitorial
staff, and security officers.
(3) "Fluorescent" means any lighting device that uses ultraviolet
light by means of a cathode ray tube.
(4) "Public educational facility" means any institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and any public school under
title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, public educational facilities must turn off all
electrical lights when the facility is unoccupied.
(2) This section does not apply to electrical lights that are
installed for security purposes if:
(a) The electrical lights function by means of fluorescence; or
(b) A motion detector is attached to the electrical light and only
functions when activated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
electricity in public schools act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---