BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that improving student
health fosters educational achievement and that educational achievement
enables student health. Recent research has shown that students at
risk from obesity, substance abuse, bullying, violence, tobacco use,
and other concerns are less likely to perform well academically, and
are less likely to graduate from high school. Research has also shown
that rates of illness and premature death are greater for those with
fewer years of education. Students who drop out of high school are
also more likely to experience early pregnancy, cardiovascular illness,
cancer, diabetes, asthma, and addictions. Additionally, over the
course of their lifetimes, those who drop out are more likely to engage
in criminal acts and are more likely to need taxpayer-supported health
and social services.
The legislature finds that both academic achievement and health
status in Washington vary significantly by income, gender, race, and
ethnicity. On-time high school graduation rates are half of the state
average within some groups. In addition many groups experiencing these
academic inequities also experience health inequities. The
legislature agrees with the conclusion of the Washington health
foundation's 2008 healthiest state report card that as long as these
conditions persist, Washington will not become the healthiest state in
the nation.
The legislature further finds that its recent investments in
medical services for children have great potential to remediate serious
and persistent health conditions. However, these investments have
limited potential to improve schools as health and social learning
environments. Despite the valiant efforts of teachers, health service
providers, administrators, counselors, school nurses, parents, and the
students themselves, student health and social-emotional learning
efforts are too often regarded as tangential to academic achievement,
are too often underfunded, and are too often characterized by
competition, duplication, and inconsistency.
The legislature believes there is great promise for student health
improvement and social-emotional learning in school-based efforts that
coordinate school health personnel and programs with community
resources through a school health advisory committee, and that provide
community-wide visibility regarding such efforts. As state government
provides additional health resources for children, including school-centered resources, the legislature believes such coordination and
visibility will promote their efficient and effective use toward the
support of student learning.
Therefore the legislature intends to establish a structure to
disclose efforts to improve health and social-emotional learning in
Washington schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.100 and 1999 c 388 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each school district board of directors shall:
(1)(a) Annually report to parents and to the community in a public
meeting and annually report in writing the following information:
(i) District-wide and school-level performance improvement goals;
(ii) Student performance relative to the goals; and
(iii) District-wide and school-level plans to achieve the goals,
including curriculum and instruction, parental or guardian involvement,
student health and social-emotional well-being, and resources available
to parents and guardians to help students meet the state standards;
(b) Report annually in a news release to the local media the
district's progress toward meeting the district-wide and school-level
goals; and
(c) Include the school-level goals, student performance relative to
the goals, and a summary of school-level plans to achieve the goals in
each school's annual school performance report under RCW 28A.655.110.
(2) School districts in which ten or fewer students in the district
or in a school in the district are eligible to be assessed in a grade
level are not required to report numerical improvement goals and
performance relative to the goals, but are required to report to
parents and the community their plans to improve student achievement.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.110 and 1999 c 388 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 1994-95 school year, to provide the local
community and electorate with access to information on the educational
programs in the schools in the district, each school shall publish
annually a school performance report and deliver the report to each
parent with children enrolled in the school and make the report
available to the community served by the school. The annual
performance report shall be in a form that can be easily understood and
be used by parents, guardians, and other members of the community who
are not professional educators to make informed educational decisions.
As data from the assessments in RCW 28A.655.060 becomes available, the
annual performance report should enable parents, educators, and school
board members to determine whether students in the district's schools
are attaining mastery of the student learning goals under RCW
28A.150.210, and other important facts about the schools' performance
in assisting students to learn. The annual report shall make
comparisons to a school's performance in preceding years and shall
include school level goals under RCW 28A.655.050, student performance
relative to the goals and the percentage of students performing at each
level of the assessment, a comparison of student performance at each
level of the assessment to the previous year's performance, and
information regarding school-level plans to achieve the goals.
(2) The annual performance report shall include, but not be limited
to: (a) A brief statement of the mission of the school and the school
district; (b) enrollment statistics including student demographics; (c)
expenditures per pupil for the school year; (d) a summary of student
scores on all mandated tests; (e) a concise annual budget report; (f)
student attendance, graduation, and dropout rates; (g) information
regarding the use and condition of the school building or buildings;
(h) a brief description of the learning improvement plans for the
school; ((and)) (i) efforts to coordinate health and social support
services, curricula, and school building policies and practices to
remove nonacademic barriers to student learning; and (j) an invitation
to all parents and citizens to participate in school activities.
(3)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop by
June 30, 1994, and update periodically, a model report form, which
shall also be adapted for computers, that schools may use to meet the
requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) By June 30, 2011, the model report format shall be amended to
include information regarding a school's implementation of health and
social and emotional learning requirements and goals, including at
least: Physical education requirements; school-based health
educational assessments; nutrition policies and practices; school
environmental health standards; availability of health services by
school nurses, clinics, or other means; availability of counseling
services; transportation policies that promote safe walking or biking
to school; public use of school facilities for after hours physical
activities; and membership contact information for any school health
committee that may have been created.
(c) In order to make school performance reports broadly accessible
to the public, the superintendent of public instruction, to the extent
feasible, shall make information on each school's report available on
or through the superintendent's internet web site.

--- END ---