BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog
fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including
forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood
pellets; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in section 1 of
this act; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---