BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that freshwater
lakes are vital to the state's economy and environment, and serve as a
source of recreational and scenic enjoyment. Lakes serve multiple
purposes such as habitat for fish and wildlife, mitigation of flood
damage, water storage for hydropower generation, and a source of water
supply for aquifer recharge, drinking water, and water for
agricultural, recreational, and industrial purposes.
(2) The legislature further finds that currently more than two
hundred lakes, or twenty-five percent of the publicly accessible lakes
within Washington state, have impaired water quality conditions or are
at risk for impairment. Since not all lakes are monitored for water
quality, the full extent of lake water quality problems is not known
but is likely much greater than that identified by current limited
monitoring.
(3) The legislature further finds that legislative studies a decade
ago identified several programmatic recommendations to strengthen state
and local responses to degradation in lakes health. While gains have
been made in addressing nutrient sources of algal and aquatic
vegetation growth in freshwater lakes, current programs are not
adequately addressing other lakes, challenges such as invasive species,
toxic algae, storm water management, discharge to lakes of toxic and
endocrine-disrupting compounds, biodiversity conservation, and impacts
from climate change.
(4) Therefore it is the purpose of this act to direct that a
comprehensive strategy for lakes protection and restoration be
developed, portions of which may be implemented within current
authority and funding, and that the strategy further include
recommendations for further legislative authorization and funding to
achieve a comprehensive statewide lakes protection and restoration
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a comprehensive lakes management
strategic plan. The plan shall serve primarily to guide state programs
that provide technical and financial assistance to other state
agencies, local governments, special purpose districts, and
nongovernmental entities for the protection and restoration of the
state's freshwater lakes.
(2) The plan must be developed in partnership with a lakes
management advisory committee, which shall be appointed by the director
and must include at least the following:
(a) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee;
(b) The director of the department of fish and wildlife, or the
director's designee;
(c) The executive director of the Puget Sound partnership or the
executive director's designee;
(d) Representatives of counties, cities, and special purpose
districts having lakes management interests;
(e) Representatives of tribal governments and federal agencies
having lakes management interests;
(f) A statewide association of lakes management interests;
(g) Representatives of lake users and residents, recreational
users, and residents of lake shore properties; and
(h) At least one scientist with lakes health expertise.
(3) The plan may be developed in segments consistent with the
direction and timelines in this section.
(4) Not later than December 1, 2009, a plan element must be
completed that provides guidance to the department's financial and
technical assistance programs serving lake management needs.
(5) Not later than September 1, 2010, the department shall complete
elements of the strategy to improve lakes protection and restoration in
the following activities:
(a) Lakes monitoring;
(b) Scientific research on lakes health;
(c) Education and technical assistance;
(d) Financial assistance;
(e) Intergovernmental coordination in regulatory programs,
financial and technical assistance, and lakes management; and
(f) Administration and budgeting for lakes management programs, and
recommendations for additional or modified monitoring.
(6) In developing the strategic plan, the department and the
committee must be informed by existing plans and recommendations that
address or relate to the protection and restoration of lakes. The plan
must include a summary of recommendations relating to lakes protection
from existing water body cleanup plans developed under chapter 90.48
RCW, and watershed plans developed under chapter 90.82 RCW. The
department shall also inform the committee on expenditures from RCW
70.105D.070 related to lakes.
(7) The department, the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of natural resources shall incorporate the guidance and
recommendations in the plan to the extent allowable under existing
authority and available funding in the administration of lakes-related
programs. The executive director of the Puget Sound partnership must
also provide the guidance and recommendations to the Puget Sound
partnership leadership council for consideration for inclusion in the
action agenda required under chapter 90.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Not later than December 31, 2010, the
department of ecology with the assistance of the lakes management
advisory committee shall provide recommendations for creating dedicated
state funding assistance for lakes restoration and protection to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives. The
recommendations must address the mechanism for making funding awards,
including creating a funding entity specific for lakes restoration and
protection. The recommendations must be based upon a goal of providing
for lakes not less than ten percent of total state financial assistance
provided directly to address point and nonpoint sources of water
pollution of state waters.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21A.662 and 1999 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The department shall ((appoint an advisory committee)) use
the lakes management advisory committee created in section 2 of this
act to oversee the freshwater aquatic weeds management program. For
oversight activities related to this program, the advisory committee
shall include representatives of recreational boaters, the aquatic
nuisance species committee created in RCW 77.60.130, pesticide
registrants, as defined in RCW 15.58.030(36), and certified pesticide
applicators, as defined in RCW 17.21.020(6), who specialize in the use
of aquatic pesticides.
(((2) The advisory committee shall include representatives from the
following groups:
(a) Recreational boaters interested in freshwater aquatic weed
management;
(b) Residents adjacent to lakes, rivers, or streams with public
boat launch facilities;
(c) Local governments;
(d) Scientific specialists;
(e) Pesticide registrants, as defined in RCW 15.58.030(34);
(f) Certified pesticide applicators, as defined in RCW
17.21.020(5), who specialize in the use of aquatic pesticides; and
(g) If chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (Senate Bill No. 5315) is
enacted by June 30, 1999, the aquatic nuisance species coordinating
committee.
(3) The advisory committee shall review and provide recommendations
to the department on freshwater aquatic weeds management program
activities and budget and establish criteria for grants funded from the
freshwater aquatic weeds account.))

--- END ---