BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Phosphorus loading of surface waters can stimulate the growth
of weeds and algae and that this growth can have adverse environmental,
health, and aesthetic effects;
(b) Lawn fertilizers contribute to phosphorus loading. Limits on
turf fertilizer containing phosphorus can significantly reduce the
discharge of phosphorus into the state's ground and surface waters;
(c) Turf fertilizers containing no or very low amounts of
phosphorus are readily available and maintaining established turf in a
healthy and green condition is not dependent upon the addition of
phosphorus fertilizers; and
(d) While significant reductions of phosphorus from laundry
detergent and dishwashing detergent have been achieved, similar
progress in reducing phosphorus contributions from turf fertilizer has
not been accomplished.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter
significantly limit the use of fertilizers containing the plant
nutrient phosphorus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(3) "Impervious surface" means a highway, street, sidewalk, parking
lot, driveway, or other artificial surface that prevents infiltration
of water into the soil.
(4) "Turf" means noncrop land planted in closely mowed, managed
grasses on residential property. Turf does not include managed
pasture, hayland, hay, turf grown on turf farms, home or commercial
vegetable production, horticultural beds, flower beds, general
landscaping, or any other form of agricultural production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, after January 1, 2011, a person may not apply to turf a
fertilizer containing the plant nutrient phosphorus.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when:
(a) Applying a solid fertilizer containing less than 0.67 percent
phosphate by weight or a liquid fertilizer applied at a rate not
greater than 0.3 pounds of phosphate per one thousand square feet of
turf;
(b) Laboratory test results or other certification by a turf
specialist is performed within the three years previous to the
application indicates that the level of available phosphorus in the
soil is insufficient to support healthy turf growth, and the test
results or certification, and the application rate, are consistent with
standards approved by the department in consultation with the
Washington State University extension service;
(c) The property owner or an agent of the property owner is first
establishing turf via seed or sod procedures and only during the first
growing season; or
(d) The fertilizer containing the plant nutrient phosphorus is
applied to a golf course consistent with golf course application
standards adopted by the department.
(3) This section does not apply to the application of turf
fertilizer for agricultural uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A person may not apply a fertilizer to an
impervious surface. Fertilizer released on an impervious surface must
be immediately contained and either legally applied to turf or another
legal site or returned to the original container or another appropriate
container.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department may issue a notice of
corrective action to a person in violation of section 3 or 4 of this
act.
(2) A city or county may adopt an ordinance providing for
enforcement of the requirements of sections 3 and 4 of this act. A
city or county adopting an ordinance has jurisdiction concurrent with
the department to enforce this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department may produce consumer
information on the application restrictions under section 3 of this act
and on recommended best practices for turf fertilizer and other
residential landscaping uses. The consumer information must be
produced in consultation with the Washington State University extension
service, fertilizer industry representatives, lakes health
organizations, and other interested parties. The consumer information
must be in a format and of a content suitable for posting and
distribution at retail points of sale of fertilizer that contains
phosphorus for use on turf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---