BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the purpose of this chapter to provide
for the licensure of persons offering colon hydrotherapy services to
the public and to ensure standards of competence and professional
conduct on the part of colon hydrotherapists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Colon hydrotherapist" means a person who is licensed under
this chapter.
(2) "Colon hydrotherapy" means a method of removing waste from the
large intestine by introducing filtered and temperature-regulated water
into the colon, resulting in evacuation through peristalsis.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In addition to any other authority
provided by law, the secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish all license, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(e) Develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to
applicants for a license under this chapter;
(f) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license
to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure.
However, denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired
practice is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;
(g) In consultation with the committee, approve examinations
prepared or administered by private testing agencies or organizations
for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing requirements under
section 5 of this act;
(h) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to
individuals credentialed in those states that have successfully
fulfilled the requirements of section 6 of this act;
(i) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(j) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
licensees; and
(k) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive license.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is unlawful for any person to practice or
offer to practice as a colon hydrotherapist, or to represent themselves
or other persons to be legally able to provide services as a colon
hydrotherapist, unless the person is licensed under the provisions of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An applicant for a colon hydrotherapist
license must:
(1) Have successfully completed an examination administered or
approved by the secretary; and
(2) Submit an application on forms prescribed by the secretary and
pay the licensure fee required under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Each applicant and license holder must
comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and
fees under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary shall furnish a
license to any person who applies and who has qualified under the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter restricts the
ability of colon hydrotherapists to work in the practice setting of his
or her choice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
require that a health carrier defined in RCW 48.43.005 contract with a
person licensed as a colon hydrotherapist under this chapter or to
require that a patient obtain a prescription in order to receive colon
hydrotherapy.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.130.040 and 2009 c 2 s 16 (Initiative Measure No.
1029) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxii) Recreational therapists;
(xxiii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiv) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; ((and))
(xxv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW; and
(xxvi) Colon hydrotherapists licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW (the
new chapter created in section 11 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The secretary of health may take the
necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective
date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---