BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.29.024 and 2004 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county treasurer may deduct the amounts necessary to reimburse
the treasurer's office for the actual expenses the office incurs and to
repay any county funds appropriated and expended for the initial
administrative costs of establishing a county investment pool provided
in RCW 36.29.022. These funds shall be used by the county treasurer as
a revolving fund to defray the cost of administering the pool without
regard to budget limitations. Any credits or payments to political
subdivisions shall be calculated and made in a manner which equitably
reflects the differing amounts of the political subdivision's
respective deposits in the county investment pool and the differing
periods of time for which the amounts were placed in the county
investment pool. As used in this section "actual expenses" include
only the county's direct and out-of-pocket costs and do not include
indirect or loss of opportunity costs.

--- END ---