BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Because employees of health care facilities are not engaged in
the type of work that allows employees to take intermittent meal and
rest periods in lieu of scheduled and uninterrupted meal and rest
periods, employees of health care facilities must be provided scheduled
and uninterrupted meal and rest periods of a duration no less than
specified in rules adopted by the department of labor and industries
under this chapter or as otherwise agreed to be provided by the
employer, whichever is longer in duration.
(2) The definitions in RCW 49.28.130 apply to this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.28.150 and 2002 c 112 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall investigate complaints
of violations of RCW 49.28.140 and section 1 of this act. A violation
of RCW 49.28.140 or section 1 of this act is a class 1 civil infraction
in accordance with chapter 7.80 RCW, except that the maximum penalty is
one thousand dollars for each infraction up to three infractions. If
there are four or more violations of RCW 49.28.140, section 1 of this
act, or any combination thereof for a health care facility, the
employer is subject to a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars for
the fourth violation, and five thousand dollars for each subsequent
violation. The department of labor and industries is authorized to
issue and enforce civil infractions according to chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---