BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2009, each regional university shall adopt, or
amend, a policy that prohibits the harassment, intimidation, or
bullying of any student or staff member. It is the responsibility of
each regional university to share this policy with parents or
guardians, students, volunteers, and staff members.
(2) As used in this section, "harassment, intimidation, or
bullying" means any intentional electronic, written, verbal, or
physical act, including but not limited to one shown to be motivated by
any characteristic in RCW 9A.36.080(3), or other distinguishing
characteristics, when the intentional electronic, written, verbal, or
physical act:
(a) Physically harms an individual or damages the individual's
property; or
(b) Has the effect of substantially interfering with a student's
education or the working conditions of a staff member; or
(c) Is so severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an
intimidating or threatening educational or work environment; or
(d) Has the effect of substantially disrupting the orderly
operation of the institution, or a subunit thereof.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the affected individual to
actually possess a characteristic that is a basis for the harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(4) The policy should be adopted or amended through a process that
includes representation of parents or guardians, university employees,
volunteers, students, administrators, and community representatives.
It is recommended that each such policy emphasize positive character
traits and values, including the importance of civil and respectful
speech and conduct, and the responsibility of the entire university
community to comply with the institution's policy prohibiting
harassment, intimidation, or bullying.
(5) Persistent or pervasive harassment, intimidation, bullying, or
verbal abuse of a student or staff member is prohibited. Individuals
who manifest objective symptoms of harassment, intimidation, bullying,
or verbal abuse may pursue a private civil action against the alleged
perpetrator for violation of this section, and may recover general,
special, and punitive damages, as determined by the trier of fact.
(6) If an individual claiming to be a victim of conduct prohibited
by subsection (5) of this section has lodged two formal complaints with
the institution and the institution has failed to take corrective
action to protect the individual by stopping the prohibited conduct
through any means necessary, including discharge or expulsion of the
alleged perpetrator, the institution shall be jointly and severally
liable for any civil damage award issued pursuant to subsection (5) of
this section.
(7) A person who prevails in a civil liability action pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section is entitled to recover his or her actual
attorneys' fees in addition to any damage award. Damages, costs, and
attorneys' fees awarded pursuant to this section are awards resulting
from an intentional tort.

--- END ---