BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) English is designated as the official language of the state of
Washington.
(2) The official language is designated as the language of any
official public record and any official public meeting.
(a) An official public record is any record officially compiled,
published, or recorded by the state and any other document or record
subject to public inspection and copying under the public records act,
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(b) An official public meeting is any meeting required to be open
under chapter 42.30 RCW.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, no state agency or
political or taxing subdivision of the state may be required to provide
any documents, information, literature, or other written materials in
any language other than English. Nothing prohibits state agencies or
political or taxing subdivisions from: (a) Publishing any official
public document or record in languages other than English at their
discretion, so long as the document or record is also published in
English; or (b) permitting a person who does not speak English to speak
or communicate at an official public meeting with the assistance of an
interpreter.
(4) This section shall not be construed in any way to infringe upon
the rights of citizens under the Washington state Constitution or the
United States Constitution in the use of language in any private
activity. No agency or officer of the state or any political or taxing
subdivision of the state may place any restrictions or requirements
regarding language usage in any business operating in the private
sector other than official documents, forms, submissions, or other
communications directed to government agencies and officers, which
communications shall be in the official language as recognized in this
section.
(5) The state of Washington recognizes the importance of
establishing and actively promoting English language classes, English
language training, or citizenship classes for nonnative speakers. The
institutions of higher education and community and technical colleges
are encouraged to offer such services and are encouraged to seek the
assistance of local political subdivisions, community-based agencies
and organizations, migrant worker groups, refugee resettlement
programs, schools, churches, and others in making nonnative speakers
aware of the availability of such classes and training and ensuring
their continuation and expansion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---