BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2008, the legislature required that the
high school Washington assessment of student learning in mathematics be
changed to a series of end-of-course assessments and specified a
timeline for that change. At the same time but in separate
legislation, the legislature determined that additional work was needed
to revise and perfect the high school mathematics standards. The
result of the two policies is an implementation timeline for the new
mathematics end-of-course assessment that is incongruous with other
statutory timelines for using the assessment as a high school
graduation requirement. The legislature further finds that, although
the current assessment has been determined to be technically valid and
reliable for use as a high stakes test, adequate time and opportunity
for review must be provided to make the same assurance for the new end-of-course assessment. Finally, the legislature finds that the issue of
whether revisions should be made to the high school science assessment,
including the timeline for requiring students to meet state standards
on the assessment for graduation, has not been resolved. Further
examination is timely because the science standards have been revised
and are ready for final adoption.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2007 c 354 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless extended by the state board of education under
subsection (2) of this section, beginning with the graduating class of
2008 and through ((no later than the graduating class)) the graduating
class of 2012, students may graduate from high school without earning
a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual
achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning or the sequence of
end-of-course assessments in mathematics under RCW 28A.655.066, an
approved objective alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment
developed for eligible special education students;
(b) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
additional high school mathematics credit or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics assessment at
least once annually until graduation; and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two additional mathematics credits or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the
student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
mathematics standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment
of student learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics
assessment at least once annually until graduation.
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ((ends the
application of this section with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply)) extends
the application of this section to a graduating class or classes after
the graduating class of 2012 if the board determines that additional
time is needed before students are required to meet the state standard
on the high school mathematics assessment for purposes of high school
graduation. The determination of the state board under this subsection
shall be based primarily on an examination of the reliability and
validity of the mathematics end-of-course assessments for use as a high
stakes test for graduation purposes, but may include other
considerations. The state board of education's authority under this
section does not alter the requirement that any change in performance
standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with RCW
28A.305.130.
(((3) This section expires August 31, 2013.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2008 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The superintendent shall
develop end-of-course assessments in algebra I((,)) and geometry((,
integrated mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II. The
superintendent shall make the algebra I and integrated mathematics I
end-of-course assessments available to school districts on an optional
basis in the 2009-10 school year. The end-of-course assessments in
algebra I, geometry, integrated mathematics I, and integrated
mathematics II)), and the assessments shall be implemented statewide in
the 2010-11 school year.
(2) For the graduating ((class)) classes of 2013 and 2014 and for
purposes of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061, a student may use: (a) Results from the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course assessment ((or));
(b) results from the integrated mathematics I end-of-course assessment
plus the integrated mathematics II end-of-course assessment ((may be
used)); or (c) results of the comprehensive mathematics assessment to
demonstrate that a student meets the state standard on the mathematics
content area of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of ((2014)) 2015 and for
purposes of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061, the mathematics content area of the Washington assessment
of student learning shall be assessed using ((either)) the algebra I
end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course assessment
((or the integrated mathematics I end-of-course assessment plus the
integrated mathematics II end-of-course assessment)). All of the
objective alternative assessments available to students under RCW
28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065 shall be available to any student who has
taken the sequence of end-of-course assessments once but does not meet
the state mathematics standard on the sequence of end-of-course
assessments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall report at least
annually or more often if necessary to keep the education committees of
the legislature informed on each step of the development and
implementation process under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education
and the professional educator standards board, must identify strategies
and develop an implementation plan intended to assure that all students
have the opportunity to learn the new mathematics and science
standards.
(2) The plan must include at least the following components:
(a) Strategies to help districts improve the alignment of
curriculum and instruction to the new standards;
(b) Provision of instructional models to help teachers; and
(c) Identification of effective intervention programs and
strategies for struggling students.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall also recommend
whether to use a comprehensive assessment or end-of-course assessments
for the high school assessment for students to demonstrate that they
have achieved proficiency on the state science standards. The office
shall also identify the costs for developing and implementing
end-of-course assessments in science.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2009, on the
mathematics and science implementation plan as well as the recommended
method of assessment for science.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning ((no later than)) with the graduating class of 2013,
a student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. ((The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply.)) However, the state board of education may
adopt a rule that implements the requirements of this subsection
beginning with a graduating class after the class of 2013, if the board
determines that additional time is needed before students are required
to meet the state standard on the high school science assessment for
purposes of high school graduation. The determination of the state
board under this subsection shall be based primarily on an examination
of the reliability and validity of the science assessments for use as
a high stakes test for graduation purposes, but may include other
considerations. The state board of education's authority under this
subsection (((4))) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the ((scholastic assessment test ())SAT(())) or the
((American college test ())ACT(())) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) ((Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the preliminary scholastic assessment test (PSAT) may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for
demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard for
the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the score students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in that
content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii))) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale
of one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

--- END ---