BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a lack of
statewide learning standards for financial literacy and personal
financial education has resulted in inconsistent teaching techniques,
curriculum, and assessment of student competencies. In 2008,
Washington high school seniors could correctly answer fewer than half
of the questions on a nationally administered survey on personal money
management. Standards have been developed by national organizations
with expertise in personal financial education and should be reviewed
and considered for statewide adoption in Washington. However, to
minimize additional burden on school districts and students,
instruction in financial literacy and personal financial education
should be included within an expansion of graduation requirements
rather than separately imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education shall convene a temporary work group
to examine available financial literacy and personal financial
education learning standards and shall recommend a set of standards for
adoption by the superintendent of public instruction. The work group
shall also advise the state board of education on the minimum content
to be required of all high school graduates. The temporary work group
must consist of representatives from the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the department of financial institutions, the
financial literacy public-private partnership, and educators and
representatives of the private financial sector with expertise in
financial education.
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for
financial literacy and personal financial education based on the
recommendations from the state board of education. The superintendent
of public instruction shall also develop and disseminate to school
districts for voluntary use, classroom-based assessments that measure
student performance on the essential academic learning requirements and
grade level expectations.
By July 1, 2010, the state board of education shall, under RCW
28A.230.090, amend the high school graduation requirement to include
instruction in financial literacy and personal financial education.
The requirement must permit the instruction as part of social studies,
career and technical education, or mathematics coursework.

--- END ---