BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, agencies
shall waive any fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions for
first-time paperwork violations by a small business.
(2) When an agency waives a fine, penalty, or sanction under this
section, it shall require the small business to correct the violation
within a reasonable period of time as specified by the agency.
(3) Exceptions to the waiver requirement of this section may be
made for any of the following reasons:
(a) The violation has the potential to cause serious harm to the
public interest as determined by the agency head;
(b) The violation involves a small business knowingly or willfully
engaging in conduct that may result in a felony conviction;
(c) The violation is of a law concerning the assessment or
collection of any tax, debt, revenue, or receipt;
(d) The violation presents a direct danger to the public health or
safety, results in a loss of income or benefits to an employee, or
presents the risk of severe environmental harm, as determined by the
agency head;
(e) When a program has been delegated to the state from the federal
government, the violation is a failure to comply with a federal
requirement and federal regulations mandate the imposition of a fine or
civil penalty;
(f) The small business violating a statutory or regulatory
requirement mandating the collection of information by a state
regulatory agency previously violated any similar requirement mandating
the collection of information; or
(g) The owner or operator of the small business violating a
statutory or regulatory requirement mandating the collection of
information by an agency owned or operated a different small business
which previously violated any similar requirement mandating the
collection of information.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from waiving
fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions incurred by a small
business for a paperwork violation that is not a first-time offense.
(b) Any fine, civil penalty, or administrative sanction that is
waived under this section may be reinstated and imposed in addition to
any additional fines, penalties, or administrative sanctions associated
with a subsequent violation for noncompliance with the same paperwork
requirement.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to diminish the
responsibility for any citizen or business to apply for and obtain a
permit, license, or authorizing document that is required to engage in
a regulated activity, or otherwise comply with state or federal law.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business" means a business with two hundred fifty or
fewer employees.
(b) "Paperwork violation" means the violation of any statutory or
regulatory requirement in the Revised Code of Washington, the
Washington Administrative Code, the Washington State Register, or any
other agency directive mandating the collection of information by an
agency.
(c) "First-time paperwork violation" means the first instance of a
paperwork violation.

--- END ---