BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.475 and 2007 c 229 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing
jurisdiction of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government. The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other local sales and use
taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
The rate of tax may be changed only on the first day of a fiscal year
as needed. Notice of rate changes must be provided to the department
on the first day of March to be effective on July 1st of the next
fiscal year.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall
be credited against the state taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection of such taxes
on behalf of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government at no cost to the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government and shall remit the taxes as provided in
RCW 82.14.060.
(3)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) Before July 1, 2008;
(ii) Before approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040; and
(iii) Before the sponsoring local government has received local
excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax allocation revenues,
or both, during the preceding calendar year.
(b) The tax imposed under this section shall expire when the bonds
issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 are retired, but not more
than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be distributed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues may constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(29)(c).
This requirement applies beginning January 1st of the fifth calendar
year after the calendar year in which the sponsoring local government
begins allocating local excise tax allocation revenues under RCW
39.102.110;
(e) The tax shall be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection shall belong to the state of
Washington.
(5) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined rates of the city and county tax shall not exceed the rate
provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other
local sales and use taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are
credited against the state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The combined amount of distributions received by
both the city and county may not exceed the state contribution.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring
local government, imposing sales and use tax under this section and
shall advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government when tax
distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (8) of this
section. Determinations by the department of the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of
any tax imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(c) of
this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the money in the
general fund.
(7) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails to
comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent
fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government complies and the department calculates the state
contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(8) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the department for
distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government in the
next fiscal year shall be equal to the state contribution and shall be
no more than the total local funds as described in RCW
39.102.020(29)(c). The department shall consider information from
reports described in RCW 39.102.140 when determining the amount of
state contributions for each fiscal year. A sponsoring or cosponsoring
local government shall not receive, in any fiscal year, more revenues
from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than the amount
approved annually by the department. The department shall not approve
the receipt of more distributions of sales and use tax under this
section to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government than is
authorized under subsection (4) of this section.
(9) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments is limited annually to not more than ((seven)) ten
million ((five)) nine hundred thousand dollars.
(10) The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(11) If a sponsoring local government is a federally recognized
Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax authorized
under this section shall be authorized through an interlocal agreement
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(12) Subject to RCW 39.102.195, the tax imposed under the authority
of this section may be applied either to provide for the payment of
debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the sponsoring
local government or to pay public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go
basis, or both.
(13) The tax imposed under the authority of this section shall
cease to be imposed if the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring
local government fails to issue bonds under the authority of RCW
39.102.150 by June 30th of the fifth fiscal year in which the local tax
authorized under this section is imposed.
(14) This section expires June 30, 2044.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.102.020 and 2008 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means ((seven)) ten million
((five)) nine hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
calendar year in which a sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, receives approval by the board for a
project award, provided that the approval is granted before October
15th. If approval by the board is received on or after October 15th
but on or before December 31st, the "base year" is the second calendar
year following the calendar year in which a sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, receives approval by
the board for a project award.
(4) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(5) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(6) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(7) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(8) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the revenue development area
was approved by the board, except that if a local government reduces
the rate of such tax after the revenue development area was approved by
the board, "local excise taxes" means the local revenues derived from
the imposition of the sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030
at the lower tax rate.
(9) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during the measurement
year from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of local excise taxes received by the local government
during the base year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "local excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of local excise taxes
received by the sponsoring local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
approval of the revenue development area by the board and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter;
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "local excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of local excise taxes received by the
sponsoring local government during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the revenue development area over and above an amount
of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local government
during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case may be, adjusted by the
department for any estimated impacts from retail sales and use tax
sourcing changes effective in 2008. The amount of base year adjustment
determined by the department is final; and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "local excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local
government during a calendar year period beginning with 2009 and
continuing with each measurement year thereafter.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(14) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(15) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure state and local excise tax
allocation revenues.
(16) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(17) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(18) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(19)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(20) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(21) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(22) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs;
and (g) any of the above-described costs that may have been incurred
before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the
public improvements.
(23) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(24) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area for taxes levied in the year in which the revenue development area
is adopted for collection in the following year, plus one hundred
percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property located
within a revenue development area that is placed on the assessment
rolls after the revenue development area is adopted, less the property
tax allocation revenue value.
(25) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(26) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area adopted
by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board, from which
local excise and property tax allocation revenues are derived for local
infrastructure financing.
(27) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(28) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(29) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The state excise tax allocation revenue and state property tax
allocation revenue received by the state during the preceding calendar
year;
(c) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both; or
(d) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040.
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes, other
than the local sales and use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475, imposed
on the same taxable events that are credited against the state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(31) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of
state excise taxes received by the state during the measurement year
from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of state excise taxes received by the state during the
base year from taxable activity within the revenue development area,
except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "state excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during a calendar year period beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter;
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "state excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of state excise taxes received by the state
during the measurement year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area over and above an amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case
may be, adjusted by the department for any estimated impacts from
retail sales and use tax sourcing changes effective in 2008. The
amount of base year adjustment determined by the department is final;
and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "state excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of state excise taxes received by the state during a
calendar year period beginning with 2009 and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter.
(32) "State property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the imposition of property taxes levied by the
state for the support of common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the
property tax allocation revenue value.
(33) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.102.040 and 2007 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to applying to the board to use local infrastructure
financing, a sponsoring local government shall:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
RCW 39.102.060;
(b) Certify that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met;
(c) Complete the process in RCW 39.102.080;
(d) Provide public notice as required in RCW 39.102.100; and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090.
(2) Any local government that has created an increment area under
chapter 39.89 RCW and has not issued bonds to finance any public
improvement may apply to the board and have its increment area
considered for approval as a revenue development area under this
chapter without adopting a new revenue development area under RCW
39.102.090 and 39.102.100 if it amends its ordinance to comply with RCW
39.102.090(1) and otherwise meets the conditions and limitations under
this chapter.
(3) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.475, a sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring
local government seeking authority to impose a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.475, must apply to the board and be approved for a project
award amount. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the board and include but not be limited to information establishing
that the applicant is an eligible candidate to impose the local sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.475, the anticipated effective date for
imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that the tax will be
imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be received in each
fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, each applicant must provide to the board a copy of the
ordinance or ordinances creating the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090. A notice of approval to use local
infrastructure financing shall contain a project award that represents
the maximum amount of state contribution that the applicant, including
any cosponsoring local governments, can earn each year that local
infrastructure financing is used. The total of all project awards
shall not exceed the annual state contribution limit. The
determination of a project award shall be made based on information
contained in the application and the remaining amount of annual state
contribution limit to be awarded. Determination of a project award by
the board is final.
(4)(a) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2007 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2007. By September 15, 2007, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2007 deadline.
No more than two million five hundred thousand dollars in competitive
project awards shall be approved in 2007. For projects not approved by
the board in 2007, sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments may
apply again to the board in 2008 for approval of a project.
(b) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2008 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2008. By September 18, 2008, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2008 deadline.
For projects not approved by the board in 2008, sponsoring and
cosponsoring local governments may apply again to the board in 2009 for
approval of a project.
(c) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2009 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2009. By September 30, 2009, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2009 deadline.
No more than one million seven hundred thousand dollars in competitive
project awards shall be approved in 2009. For projects not approved by
the board in 2009, sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments may
apply again to the board in 2010 for approval of a project.
(d) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2010 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
June 1, 2010. By September 30, 2010, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2010 deadline.
(e) Except as provided in RCW 39.102.050(2), a total of no more
than ((five)) eight million four hundred thousand dollars in
competitive project awards shall be approved for local infrastructure
financing.
(((d))) (f) The project selection criteria and weighting developed
prior to July 22, 2007, for the application evaluation and approval
process shall apply to applications received prior to November 1, 2007.
In evaluating applications for a competitive project award after
November 1, 2007, the board shall, in consultation with the Washington
state economic development commission, develop the relative weight to
be assigned to the following criteria:
(i) The project's potential to enhance the sponsoring local
government's regional and/or international competitiveness;
(ii) The project's ability to encourage mixed use and transit-oriented development and the redevelopment of a geographic area;
(iii) Achieving an overall distribution of projects statewide that
reflect geographic diversity;
(iv) The estimated wages and benefits for the project is greater
than the average labor market area;
(v) The estimated state and local net employment change over the
life of the project;
(vi) The current economic health and vitality of the proposed
revenue development area and the contiguous community and the estimated
impact of the proposed project on the proposed revenue development area
and contiguous community;
(vii) The estimated state and local net property tax change over
the life of the project;
(viii) The estimated state and local sales and use tax increase
over the life of the project;
(ix) An analysis that shows that, over the life of the project,
neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local property
tax allocation revenues will constitute more than eighty percent of the
total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(29)(c); and
(x) If a project is located within an urban growth area, evidence
that the project utilizes existing urban infrastructure and that the
transportation needs of the project will be adequately met through the
use of local infrastructure financing or other sources.
(((e)(i) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(e), the board
may not approve the use of local infrastructure financing within more
than one revenue development area per county.
(ii) In a county in which the board has approved the use of local
infrastructure financing, the use of such financing in additional
revenue development areas may be approved, subject to the following
conditions:
(A) The sponsoring local government is located in more than one
county; and
(B) The sponsoring local government designates a revenue
development area that comprises portions of a county within which the
use of local infrastructure financing has not yet been approved.
(iii) In a county where the local infrastructure financing tool is
authorized under RCW 39.102.050, the board may approve additional use
of the local infrastructure financing tool.))
(g) At least one project awarded in 2009 or 2010 must be for a
downtown redevelopment project in a city: (i) With less than one
hundred thousand population; (ii) fully planning under RCW 36.70A.040
of the growth management act; and (iii) receiving funds from the
streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account created in RCW
82.14.495.
(h) No project may be awarded in 2009 or 2010 for a project located
in a city with greater than three hundred thousand population.
(5) Once the board has approved the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local governments, to use local infrastructure
financing, notification must be sent by the board to the sponsoring
local government, and any cosponsoring local governments, authorizing
the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
governments, to impose the local sales and use tax authorized under RCW
82.14.475, subject to the conditions in RCW 82.14.475.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.160.030 and 2008 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of one member from each of the two
major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major caucuses
of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The
board shall also consist of the following members appointed by the
governor: A recognized private or public sector economist; one port
district official; one county official; one city official; one urban
planner; one representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe; one
representative of the public; one person representing organized labor;
one representative of small businesses each from: (a) The area west of
Puget Sound, (b) the area east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade
range, (c) the area east of the Cascade range and west of the Columbia
river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia river; one executive from
large businesses each from the area west of the Cascades and the area
east of the Cascades. The appointive members shall initially be
appointed to terms as follows: Three members for one-year terms, three
members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms
which shall include the chair. Thereafter each succeeding term shall
be for three years. The chair of the board shall be selected by the
governor. The members of the board shall elect one of their members to
serve as vice-chair. The director of community, trade, and economic
development, the director of revenue, the commissioner of employment
security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as nonvoting
advisory members of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the governor shall fill the same for
the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by
the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.102.904 and 2006 c 181 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
This ((act)) chapter expires June 30, ((2039)) 2044.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts are each
repealed:
(1) 2008 c 209 s 2 (uncodified); and
(2) 2007 c 229 s 17 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 3 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---