BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that approval of the state budget is the most
important act of the legislature in any year, having profound
consequences for every resident of the state. The legislature further
finds that the public is entitled to a reasonable opportunity to learn
how public funds are proposed to be expended before bills making
appropriations become law. The legislature further finds that public
notice, dissemination of information, and informed analysis of proposed
budgets is an essential requisite of transparent, accountable
government.
The state constitution charges the legislature, and only the
legislature, with the responsibility to fund the operation of state
government through the enactment of appropriations legislation. Yet
the abbreviated time frame in which the legislature acts on omnibus
operating appropriations legislation permits little opportunity for
informed legislative deliberation or public review and discussion,
which in turn impairs public trust in government. The legislature
finds that many other states, in their constitutions, statutes, or
legislative rules, require a reasonable opportunity for public and
legislative review of budget legislation.
The legislature therefore finds that it is in the public interest
to provide for an appropriate period of public and legislative review
of all omnibus appropriations bills before they are acted on by the
legislature and submitted to the governor for approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
An omnibus operating, capital, or transportation appropriations
bill, or any other bill that implements an omnibus operating, capital,
or transportation appropriations bill and is effective for the same
period as such appropriations bill, must be made publicly available to
the members of the legislature and the public at least five calendar
days before such a bill may be voted on by the senate or the house of
representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known and cited as the
budget sunshine act.

--- END ---