BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 100 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
Adoption of the omnibus appropriation bill or bills by the
legislature shall constitute adoption of the budget and the making of
appropriations therefor. A budget for state government shall be
finally adopted not later than thirty calendar days prior to the
beginning of the ensuing biennium. The legislature may not appropriate
an amount from any account for any fiscal period that is in excess of
the estimated amount of revenues and resources to that account for that
fiscal period as of the date the budget is adopted.

--- END ---