BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.33.020 and 2005 c 319 s 137 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the supervisor shall prepare, subject to
the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW
82.33.010:
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast that includes
all near general fund revenues as defined in RCW 43.135.025;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) The supervisor shall submit forecasts prepared under this
section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the committees on transportation of the
senate and house of representatives, including one copy to the staff of
each of the committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th in
the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June
20th, and September 20th. All forecasts shall include both estimated
receipts and estimated revenues in conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to economic and
revenue forecasts. Revenue collection information shall be available
to the supervisor the first business day following the conclusion of
each collection period.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff shall
co-locate and share information, data, and files with the tax research
section of the department of revenue but shall not duplicate the duties
and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the supervisor shall provide estimated revenue from tuition fees as
defined in RCW 28B.15.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.025 and 2005 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the near general fund ((and
related funds)) during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the
state expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW
43.135.045(((4)(b))) (2)(b), the state treasurer shall not issue or
redeem any check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a ((state))
near general fund ((or related fund)) expenditure for any fiscal year
in excess of the state expenditure limit established under this
chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW
43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties
provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, ((2007)) 2009, the phrase "the previous
fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state
expenditures from the ((state)) near general fund ((and related
funds)), not including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, ((2006)) 2008, plus the fiscal growth factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years.
(8) (("General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related)) "Near general fund" means the state general fund,
health services account, violence reduction and drug enforcement
account, public safety and education account, water quality account,
((or)) student achievement fund, and education legacy trust account.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79.460 and 1998 c 302 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated
to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures from the account.
(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may
create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable
to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial
management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.
Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the
authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for
the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state,
such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish
new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or
incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.
(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means
((state)) near general fund appropriations, as defined in RCW
43.135.025, that are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year,
excluding any amounts included in across-the-board reductions under RCW
43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations for:
(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the
extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have
been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program.
"Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for
which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third
parties or other entities;
(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;
(c) A specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an
appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not
achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or
limitation;
(d) Debt service on state obligations; and
(e) State retirement system obligations.
(4) The office of ((fiscal [financial])) financial management,
after consulting with the legislative fiscal committees, shall report
to the treasurer the amount of savings incentives achieved. By
December 1, 1998, and each December 1st thereafter, the office of
financial management shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature on the implementation of this section. The report
shall (a) evaluate the impact of this section on agency reversions and
end-of-biennium expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency
expenditures from the savings recovery account.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79.465 and 2004 c 275 s 64 are each amended to read
as follows:
The education savings account is created in the state treasury.
The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(1) Ten percent of legislative appropriations to the education
savings account shall be distributed as follows: (a) Fifty percent to
the distinguished professorship trust fund under RCW 28B.76.565; (b)
seventeen percent to the graduate fellowship trust fund under RCW
28B.76.610; and (c) thirty-three percent to the college faculty awards
trust fund under RCW 28B.50.837.
(2) The remaining moneys in the education savings account may be
appropriated solely for (a) common school construction projects that
are eligible for funding from the common school construction
account((,)) and (b) technology improvements in the common schools((,
and (c) during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, technology improvements in
public higher education institutions)).

Sec. 5 RCW 43.08.250 and 2008 c 329 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines,
forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway
safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil
representation of indigent persons under RCW 2.53.030, winter
recreation parking, drug court operations, and state game programs.
Appropriations may also be made to the savings incentive account and
the education savings account. Through the fiscal biennium ending June
30, 2009, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public safety
and education account for purposes of appellate indigent defense and
other operations of the office of public defense, the criminal
litigation unit of the attorney general's office, the treatment
alternatives to street crimes program, crime victims advocacy programs,
justice information network telecommunication planning, treatment for
supplemental security income clients, sexual assault treatment,
operations of the administrative office of the courts, security in the
common schools, alternative school start-up grants, programs for
disruptive students, criminal justice data collection, Washington state
patrol criminal justice activities, drug court operations, unified
family courts, local court backlog assistance, financial assistance to
local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs incurred in the
adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence treatment and related
services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing chapter
196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal and civil justice legislation,
the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based
tracking system, secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers,
HOPE beds, the family policy council and community public health and
safety networks, the street youth program, public notification about
registered sex offenders, and narcotics or methamphetamine-related
enforcement, education, training, and drug and alcohol treatment
services. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the public safety and education account to the state
general fund such amounts as to reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.
(2)(a) The equal justice subaccount is created as a subaccount of
the public safety and education account. The money received by the
state treasurer from the increase in fees imposed by sections 9, 10,
12, 13, 14, 17, and 19, chapter 457, Laws of 2005 shall be deposited in
the equal justice subaccount and shall be appropriated only for:
(i) Criminal indigent defense assistance and enhancement at the
trial court level, including a criminal indigent defense pilot program;
(ii) Representation of parents in dependency and termination
proceedings;
(iii) Civil legal representation of indigent persons; and
(iv) Contribution to district court judges' salaries and to
eligible elected municipal court judges' salaries.
(b) ((For the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, an amount equal to twenty-five percent of revenues to the equal justice subaccount, less one
million dollars, shall be appropriated from the equal justice
subaccount to the administrator for the courts for purposes of (a)(iv)
of this subsection.)) For the 2007-09 fiscal biennium and subsequent
fiscal biennia, an amount equal to fifty percent of revenues to the
equal justice subaccount shall be appropriated from the equal justice
subaccount to the administrator for the courts for the purposes of
(a)(iv) of this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.72.900 and 2005 c 518 s 930 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The health services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Subject
to the transfers described in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in
the account may be expended only for maintaining and expanding health
services access for low-income residents, maintaining and expanding the
public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of the
health care system, containing health care costs, ((and)) the
regulation, planning, and administering of the health care system, and
appropriations to the savings incentive account and the education
savings account.
(2) Funds deposited into the health services account under RCW
82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be used solely as follows:
(a) ((Five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, and five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated by the legislature for programs
that effectively improve the health of low-income persons, including
efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that harm low-income persons.
The department of health shall submit a report to the legislature on
March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and
illnesses that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making
recommendations to the legislature on which of these programs could
most effectively utilize the funds appropriated under this subsection.
(b))) Ten percent of the funds deposited into the health services
account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 ((remaining after the
appropriation under (a) of this subsection)) shall be transferred no
less frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco
prevention and control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds
transferred shall be used exclusively for implementation of the
Washington state tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used
only to supplement, and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention
and control account as of January 1, 2001((, however, these funds may
be used to replace funds appropriated by the legislature for further
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001)). For each state fiscal
year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand
dollars from the tobacco prevention and control account for
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan.
(((c))) (b) Because of its demonstrated effectiveness in improving
the health of low-income persons and addressing illnesses and diseases
that harm low-income persons, the remainder of the funds deposited into
the health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be
appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan enrollment as
provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated under this
subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities
only to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described
in this section.
(3) Prior to expenditure for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, funds deposited into the health services account
under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall first be transferred to the
following accounts to ensure the continued availability of previously
dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:
(a) To the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520, ((two million two hundred forty-nine thousand five
hundred dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four
million two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred eighty-nine
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six million
nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and)) six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand
dollars for each biennium ((thereafter)), as required by RCW
82.24.020(2);
(b) To the health services account under this section, ((nine
million seventy-seven thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2001, seventeen million one hundred eighty-eight
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
thirty-one million seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred
twenty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005,
and)) twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for
each biennium ((thereafter)), as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and
(c) To the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030, ((two
million two hundred three thousand five hundred dollars for the state
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-four
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and)) seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium
((thereafter)), as required by RCW 82.24.027(((2)(a).
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the health services account such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account to the state general fund)).

Sec. 7 RCW 69.50.520 and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 s 1107, and
2005 c 514 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), 82.24.020(2), 82.24.026(2)(c), 82.64.020, and section 420,
chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994
sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account
may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007
bienniums, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated
with providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter
338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender treatment services in
accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and operating costs of the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting
system, maintenance and operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration's client activity tracking system, civil indigent legal
representation, multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, transfers to
the health services account, and grants to community networks under
chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council. Appropriations may be
made from the account to the savings incentive account and the
education savings account.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.146.030 and 2007 c 522 s 955 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.24.026(2)(d), 82.26.020,
and 82.32.390, principal and interest from the repayment of any loans
granted pursuant to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to
the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. Appropriations may
also be made to the savings incentive account and the education savings
account. For the period July 1, 2007, to June 30, 2009, moneys in the
account may be used to process applications received by the department
that seek to make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for
other water resources and water quality activities, for water
conveyance projects, shoreline technical assistance((.[,])), Puget
Sound education and outreach(([,])), and for grants and technical
assistance to public bodies for watershed planning under chapter 90.82
RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys deposited in the account
may be used by the department to pay for the administration of the
grant and loan program authorized by this chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.135.045 and 2007 c 520 s 6035 and 2007 c 484 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The student achievement fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(2) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district. Appropriations may
also be made to the savings incentive account and the education savings
account.

Sec. 10 RCW 83.100.230 and 2008 c 329 s 924 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for deposit into the
student achievement fund, the savings incentive account, and the
education savings account and for expanding access to higher education
through funding for new enrollments and financial aid, and other
educational improvement efforts. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---