BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.085 and 2005 c 364 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a governmental agency responsible for the enforcement of a
building, housing, or other appropriate code has notified the landlord
that a dwelling is condemned or unlawful to occupy due to the existence
of conditions that violate applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, or
regulations, a landlord shall not enter into a rental agreement for the
dwelling unit until the conditions are corrected.
(2) If a landlord knowingly violates subsection (1) of this
section, the tenant shall recover either three months' periodic rent or
up to treble the actual damages sustained as a result of the violation,
whichever is greater, costs of suit, or arbitration and reasonable
attorneys' fees. If the tenant elects to terminate the tenancy as a
result of the conditions leading to the posting, or if the appropriate
governmental agency requires that the tenant vacate the premises, the
tenant also shall recover:
(a) The entire amount of any deposit prepaid by the tenant; and
(b) All prepaid rent.
(3)(a) If a governmental agency responsible for the enforcement of
a building, housing, or other appropriate code has notified the
landlord that a dwelling will be condemned or will be unlawful to
occupy due to the existence of conditions that violate applicable
codes, statutes, ordinances, or regulations, a landlord, who knew or
should have known of the existence of these conditions, shall be
required to pay relocation assistance to the displaced tenants except
that:
(i) A landlord shall not be required to pay relocation assistance
to any displaced tenant in a case in which the condemnation or no
occupancy order affects one or more dwelling units and directly results
from conditions caused by a tenant's or any third party's illegal
conduct without the landlord's prior knowledge;
(ii) A landlord shall not be required to pay relocation assistance
to any displaced tenant in a case in which the condemnation or no
occupancy order affects one or more dwelling units and results from
conditions arising from a natural disaster such as, but not
exclusively, an earthquake, tsunami, wind storm, or hurricane; and
(iii) A landlord shall not be required to pay relocation assistance
to any displaced tenant in a case in which a condemnation affects one
or more dwelling units and the tenant's displacement is a direct result
of the acquisition of the property by eminent domain.
(b) Relocation assistance provided to displaced tenants under this
subsection shall be the greater amount of two thousand dollars per
dwelling unit or three times the monthly rent. In addition to
relocation assistance, the landlord shall be required to pay to the
displaced tenants the entire amount of any deposit prepaid by the
tenant and all prepaid rent.
(c) The landlord shall pay relocation assistance and any prepaid
deposit and prepaid rent to displaced tenants within seven days of the
governmental agency sending notice of the condemnation, eviction, or
displacement order to the landlord. The landlord shall pay relocation
assistance and any prepaid deposit and prepaid rent either by making
individual payments by certified check to displaced tenants or by
providing a certified check to the governmental agency ordering
condemnation, eviction, or displacement, for distribution to the
displaced tenants. If the landlord fails to complete payment of
relocation assistance within the period required under this subsection,
the city, town, county, or municipal corporation may advance the cost
of the relocation assistance payments to the displaced tenants.
(d) During the period from the date that a governmental agency
responsible for the enforcement of a building, housing, or other
appropriate code first notifies the landlord of conditions that violate
applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, or regulations to the time that
relocation assistance payments are paid to eligible tenants, or the
conditions leading to the notification are corrected, the landlord may
not:
(i) Evict, harass, or intimidate tenants into vacating their units
for the purpose of avoiding or diminishing application of this section;
(ii) Reduce services to any tenant; or
(iii) Materially increase or change the obligations of any tenant,
including but not limited to any rent increase.
(e) Displaced tenants shall be entitled to recover any relocation
assistance, prepaid deposits, and prepaid rent required by (b) of this
subsection. In addition, displaced tenants shall be entitled to
recover any actual damages sustained by them as a result of the
condemnation, eviction, or displacement that exceed the amount of
relocation assistance that is payable. In any action brought by
displaced tenants to recover any payments or damages required or
authorized by this subsection (3)(e) or (c) of this subsection that are
not paid by the landlord or advanced by the city, town, county, or
municipal corporation, the displaced tenants shall also be entitled to
recover their costs of suit or arbitration and reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(f) If, after sixty days from the date that the city, town, county,
or municipal corporation first advanced relocation assistance funds to
the displaced tenants, a landlord has failed to repay the amount of
relocation assistance advanced by the city, town, county, or municipal
corporation under (c) of this subsection, then the city, town, county,
or municipal corporation shall assess civil penalties in the amount of
fifty dollars per day for each tenant to whom the city, town, county,
or municipal corporation has advanced a relocation assistance payment.
(g) In addition to the penalties set forth in (f) of this
subsection, interest will accrue on the amount of relocation assistance
paid by the city, town, county, or municipal corporation for which the
property owner has not reimbursed the city, town, county, or municipal
corporation. The rate of interest shall be the maximum legal rate of
interest permitted under RCW 19.52.020, commencing thirty days after
the date that the city, town, county, or municipal corporation first
advanced relocation assistance funds to the displaced tenants.
(h) If the city, town, county, or municipal corporation must
initiate legal action in order to recover the amount of relocation
assistance payments that it has advanced to low-income tenants,
including any interest and penalties under (f) and (g) of this
subsection, the city, town, county, or municipal corporation shall be
entitled to attorneys' fees and costs arising from its legal action.
(4) The governmental agency that has notified the landlord that a
dwelling will be condemned or will be unlawful to occupy shall notify
the displaced tenants that they may be entitled to relocation
assistance under this section.
(5) No payment received by a displaced tenant under this section
may be considered as income for the purpose of determining the
eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under
any state law or for the purposes of any tax imposed under Title 82
RCW, and the payments shall not be deducted from any amount to which
any recipient would otherwise be entitled under Title 74 RCW.
(6)(a) A person whose living arrangements are exempted from this
chapter under RCW 59.18.040(3) and who has resided in or occupied one
or more dwelling units within a hotel, motel, or other place of
transient lodging for thirty or more consecutive days with the
knowledge and consent of the owner of the hotel, motel, or other place
of transient lodging, or any manager, clerk, or other agent
representing the owner, is deemed to be a tenant for the purposes of
this section and is entitled to receive relocation assistance under the
circumstances described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section except
that all relocation assistance and other payments shall be made
directly to the displaced tenants.
(b) An interruption in occupancy primarily intended to avoid the
application of this section does not affect the application of this
section.
(c) An occupancy agreement, whether oral or written, in which the
provisions of this section are waived is deemed against public policy
and is unenforceable.

--- END ---