BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.58.010 and 2009 c 9 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Capitalization" means the measure or measures of
capitalization, other than net worth, of a depositary applying for
designation as or operating as a public depositary pursuant to this
chapter, based upon regulatory standards of financial institution
capitalization adopted by rule or resolution of the commission after
consultation with the director of the department of financial
institutions;
(2) "Collateral" means the particular assets pledged as security to
insure payment or performance of the obligations under this chapter as
enumerated in RCW 39.58.050;
(3) "Commission" means the Washington public deposit protection
commission created under RCW 39.58.030;
(4) "Commission report" means a formal accounting rendered by all
public depositaries to the commission in response to a demand for
specific information made by the commission detailing pertinent affairs
of each public depositary as of the close of business on a specified
date, which is the "commission report date." "Commission report due
date" is the last day for the timely filing of a commission report;
(5) "Depositary pledge agreement" means a tripartite agreement
executed by the commission with a financial institution and its
designated trustee. Such agreement shall be approved by the directors
or the loan committee of the financial institution and shall
continuously be a record of the financial institution. New securities
may be pledged under this agreement in substitution of or in addition
to securities originally pledged without executing a new agreement;
(6) "Director of the department of financial institutions" means
the Washington state director of the department of financial
institutions;
(7) "Eligible collateral" means securities which are enumerated in
RCW 39.58.050 (5) and (6) as eligible collateral for public deposits;
(8) "Financial institution" means any national or state-chartered
commercial bank or trust company, savings bank, ((or)) savings
association, or federal or state-chartered credit union, or branch or
branches thereof, located in this state and lawfully engaged in
business;
(9) "Investment deposits" means time deposits, money market deposit
accounts, and savings deposits of public funds available for
investment;
(10) "Liquidity" means the measure or measures of liquidity of a
depositary applying for designation as or operating as a public
depositary pursuant to this chapter, based upon regulatory standards of
financial institution liquidity adopted by rule or resolution of the
commission after consultation with the director of the department of
financial institutions;
(11) "Loss" means the issuance of an order by a regulatory or
supervisory authority or a court of competent jurisdiction (a)
restraining a public depositary from making payments of deposit
liabilities or (b) appointing a receiver for a public depositary;
(12) "Maximum liability," with reference to a public depositary's
liability under this chapter for loss per occurrence by another public
depositary, on any given date means:
(a) A sum equal to ten percent of:
(i) All uninsured public deposits held by a public depositary that
has not incurred a loss by the then most recent commission report date;
or
(ii) The average of the balances of said uninsured public deposits
on the last four immediately preceding reports required pursuant to RCW
39.58.100, whichever amount is greater; or
(b) Such other sum or measure as the commission may from time to
time set by resolution according to criteria established by rule,
consistent with the commission's broad administrative discretion to
achieve the objective of RCW 39.58.020.
As long as the uninsured public deposits of a public depositary are
one hundred percent collateralized by eligible collateral as provided
for in RCW 39.58.050, the "maximum liability" of a public depositary
that has not incurred a loss may not exceed the amount set forth in (a)
of this subsection.
This definition of "maximum liability" does not limit the authority
of the commission to adjust the collateral requirements of public
depositaries pursuant to RCW 39.58.040;
(13) "Net worth" of a public depositary means (a) the equity
capital as reported to its primary regulatory authority on the
quarterly report of condition or statement of condition, or other
required report required by its primary regulatory authority or federal
deposit insurer, and may include capital notes and debentures which are
subordinate to the interests of depositors, or (b) equity capital
adjusted by rule or resolution of the commission after consultation
with the director of the department of financial institutions;
(14) "Public deposit" means public funds on deposit with a public
depositary;
(15) "Public depositary" means a financial institution ((which does
not claim exemption from the payment of any sales or compensating use
or ad valorem taxes under the laws of this state,)) which has been
approved by the commission to hold public deposits, and which has
segregated for the benefit of the commission eligible collateral having
a value of not less than its maximum liability;
(16) "Public funds" means moneys under the control of a treasurer,
the state treasurer, or custodian belonging to, or held for the benefit
of, the state or any of its political subdivisions, public
corporations, municipal corporations, agencies, courts, boards,
commissions, or committees, including moneys held as trustee, agent, or
bailee belonging to, or held for the benefit of, the state or any of
its political subdivisions, public corporations, municipal
corporations, agencies, courts, boards, commissions, or committees;
(17) "Public funds available for investment" means such public
funds as are in excess of the anticipated cash needs throughout the
duration of the contemplated investment period;
(18) "State public depositary" means a Washington state-chartered
financial institution that is authorized as a public depositary under
this chapter;
(19) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington;
(20) "Treasurer" means a county treasurer, a city treasurer, a
treasurer of any other municipal corporation, and any other custodian
of public funds, except the state treasurer;
(21) "Trustee" means a third-party safekeeping agent which has
completed a depositary pledge agreement with a public depositary and
the commission. Such third-party safekeeping agent may be the federal
reserve bank of San Francisco, the federal home loan bank of Seattle,
or such other third-party safekeeping agent approved by the commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.38.060 and 1984 c 177 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Financial institution," as used in the foregoing provisions of
this chapter, means a branch of a bank engaged in banking in this state
in accordance with RCW 30.04.300, and any state bank or trust company,
national banking association, stock savings bank, mutual savings bank,
((or)) savings and loan association, or credit union, which institution
is located in this state and lawfully engaged in business.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.58.510 and 1965 c 7 s 35.58.510 are each amended to
read as follows:
All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks, and
institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, investment companies and other persons
carrying on a banking or investment business, all insurance companies,
insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance
business, and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees and
other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or
other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or
other obligations issued by a metropolitan municipal corporation
pursuant to this chapter. Such bonds and other obligations shall be
authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this
section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions and officers,
public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the
purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. Nothing contained in
this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as
relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in
selecting securities.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.48.060 and 1984 c 177 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Financial institution," whenever it occurs in RCW 36.48.010
through 36.48.050, means a branch of a bank engaged in banking in this
state in accordance with RCW 30.04.300, and any state bank or trust
company, national banking association, stock savings bank, mutual
savings bank, ((or)) savings and loan association, or credit union,
which institution is located in this state and lawfully engaged in
business.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.08.280 and 1999 c 293 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state treasurer is authorized to negotiate a statewide
custody contract for custody services for local governments and
institutions of higher education. The term of the contract shall be
for a minimum of four years.
(2) The state treasurer shall, as soon as is practical after
negotiations have been successfully completed, notify local governments
and institutions of higher education that a statewide custody contract
has been negotiated.
(3) Following such notification, each local government or
institution of higher education may, at its option, become a signatory
to the statewide contract. Each local government or institution of
higher education may only become a signatory to the contract by having
its authorized local government official or financial officer and the
statewide custodian execute the statewide contract. The contract is
between the statewide custodian and the respective local government or
institution of higher education. It is the responsibility of the local
government official or financial officer to fully understand the terms
and conditions of the statewide custody contract prior to its
execution, and to ensure those terms and conditions are observed by the
statewide custodian during the term of the contract.
(4) The state treasurer may adopt rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, those rules deemed necessary to provide
for an orderly transition in the event of a different statewide
custodian in a new statewide custody contract.
(5) Any statewide custodian who becomes a signatory to the
statewide custody contract may be exempted from the requirements of
chapter 39.58 RCW for the purposes of this section, based on rules
adopted by the public deposit protection commission.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Financial institution" means a bank, credit union, or trust
company chartered and supervised under state or federal law;
(b) "Local government" means any county, city, town, special
purpose district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or
quasi-municipal corporation, including any public corporation created
by such an entity, which legally possesses and exercises investment
authority;
(c) "Statewide custody contract" means a contract negotiated
between the state treasurer and a financial institution that
establishes terms and fees for custody services which are optional to
any local government for the term of the contract;
(d) "Statewide custodian" means the financial institution with whom
the state treasurer has negotiated a statewide custody contract;
(e) "Custody services" means services performed by a financial
institution such as the settlement, safekeeping, valuation, and market-value reporting of negotiable instruments owned by the local
government;
(f) "Local government official" means any officer or employee of a
local government who has been designated by statute or local charter,
ordinance, or resolution as the officer having the authority to invest
the funds of the local government. However, the county treasurer is
the only local government official for all political subdivisions for
which the county treasurer has statutory or contractual authority to
invest the funds thereof;
(g) "Financial officer" means the board-appointed treasurer of a
college, university, community or technical college district, or the
state board for community and technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW
to read as follows:
A credit union approved as a public depositary by the commission
may not accept funds in excess of the deposit insurance limits of the
insurance required under RCW 31.12.408.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---