BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.41.400 and 2007 c 401 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative ((education [evaluation])) evaluation and
accountability program committee, conduct collaborative analyses of
early learning, K-12, and higher education programs and education
issues across the P-20 system, which includes the department of early
learning, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, the state board of education, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the higher education coordinating board,
public and private nonprofit four-year institutions of higher
education, and the employment security department. The education data
center shall conduct collaborative analyses under this section with the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and provide
data electronically to the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, to the extent permitted by state and federal
confidentiality requirements. The education data center shall be
considered an authorized representative of the state educational
agencies in this section under applicable federal and state statutes
for purposes of accessing and compiling student record data for
research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(b) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to
ensure that legislative interests are served;
(c) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(d) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs; ((and))
(e) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and
among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system;
(f) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, report to
the higher education committees of the legislature on the percentage of
graduates, from public baccalaureate institutions of higher education,
who are employed in Washington. The report shall include:
(i) Employment rates at three quarters after graduation and at
fifteen quarters after graduation;
(ii) Employment rates by industry by major line of study;
(iii) Employment rates disaggregated by student characteristic
including race and ethnicity, gender, and receipt of student financial
assistance;
(g) Beginning on December 1, 2010, and every even-numbered year
thereafter, report to the higher education committees of the
legislature regarding student progress to degree. The public
institutions of higher education shall submit any additional data to
the education data center, under appropriate data sharing agreements,
that may be necessary to conduct the analysis. The report shall
include, but not be limited to:
(i) Longitudinal data analysis of resident undergraduate students'
major selection and course-taking behavior and the impact of those
factors on total credits earned upon graduation;
(ii) Analysis of progress to degree disaggregated by student
characteristic including race and ethnicity, gender, and prior academic
preparation. The analysis shall include students who enter
baccalaureate institutions of higher education directly from high
school and those who transfer from community and technical colleges.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public four-year institutions of higher education,
and employment security department shall work with the education data
center to develop data-sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall convene a work group that includes representatives from the
education data center, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the workforce education training and coordinating board, and
the employment security department. Representatives from the
independent colleges of Washington and the private vocational colleges
may participate. The work group shall:
(a) Recommend a process and timeline for creating and implementing
an online service through which employers could verify the completion
of a higher education degree or certificate, conferred by a public
institution of higher education, for individual employees or
individuals seeking employment. The service may be expanded to include
degrees conferred by private institutions of higher education;
(b) Identify potential issues with disclosure of personally
identifiable information and propose potential solutions; and
(c) Identify the resources necessary to create and maintain the
service, including but not limited to, contributions from employers
using the service.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010.

--- END ---