BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources and beginning in the 2009-10 academic
year, the public baccalaureate institutions of higher education shall
annually administer the collegiate learning assessment to a sample of
students attending at least half time. The sample of students shall
include the following elements:
(a) A minimum of one hundred freshmen and one hundred seniors shall
be assessed; institutions may include additional students in the sample
at the institution's discretion.
(b) The freshmen shall be assessed in the fall quarter or semester
of their first year; the seniors shall be assessed in the spring
quarter or semester before their graduation during the same academic
year.
(c) The sample shall include students from various majors, students
who receive student financial aid, and those who did not receive aid.
(2) Services and activities fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.041,
shall be waived or rebated for all students who participate in the
testing for the entire academic year in which they were tested.

--- END ---