BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall convene and staff an effectiveness and
efficiency work group composed of representatives from the state board
for community and technical colleges, the council of presidents, and
the four-year institutions of higher education. The work group shall
review all aspects of the provision of higher education and recommend
action items and systemic changes designed to optimize the use of
resources and yield savings and cost avoidances that can be redirected
so as to maintain academic and research quality, accommodate enrollment
demands, and moderate tuition increases. During the course of the
review and recommendation process, the work group shall give
consideration to:
(a) Increasing collaboration among institutions of higher education
in academic offerings, technology applications, and the procurement of
materials, equipment, and energy;
(b) Identifying means for shortening the time to degree;
(c) Redesigning large, high enrollment undergraduate courses in
order to improve learning outcomes and reduce the per student cost;
(d) Establishing and reaching faculty workload goals;
(e) Packaging need-based financial aid in order to increase access
for low-income students, first generation students, and students of
color;
(f) Eradicating unnecessary barriers to transfer between
institutions; and
(g) Other means for optimizing the use of resources and achieving
financial savings at state, institutional, and student levels.
(2) The board, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the council of presidents, and the institutions of higher
education shall make every effort to implement recommended action items
and systemic changes, quantify the associated efficiencies and savings
to the extent possible, and redirect the savings to preserve academic
and research quality, accommodate enrollment demands, and moderate the
need for increased state funding and tuition increases.
(3) By December 1, 2010, and every two years thereafter, the board
shall report the recommended action items and systemic changes
identified by the work group to the higher education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate. The report shall include
information concerning the status of implementation of each item or
change, quantify the associated efficiencies and savings achieved,
identify how the savings were redirected, and identify any legislative
action needed to implement any recommended items or changes.

--- END ---