BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2006 c 263 s 817 are each amended to
read as follows:
Partnership grants funded under this chapter shall operate one to
four specific route programs. Successful completion of the program
shall make a candidate eligible for residency teacher certification.
For route one and two candidates, the mentor of the teacher candidate
at the school and the supervisor of the teacher candidate from the
higher education teacher preparation program must both agree that the
teacher candidate has successfully completed the program. For route
three and four candidates, the mentor of the teacher candidate shall
make the determination that the candidate has successfully completed
the program.
(1) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route one
programs shall enroll currently employed classified instructional
employees with transferable associate degrees seeking residency teacher
certification with endorsements in special education, bilingual
education, or English as a second language. It is anticipated that
candidates enrolled in this route will complete both their
baccalaureate degree and requirements for residency certification in
two years or less, including a mentored internship to be completed in
the final year. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry
requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
((three)) one year((s)) of successful student interaction and
leadership as a classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam, when
available; and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route two
programs shall enroll currently employed classified staff with
baccalaureate degrees seeking residency teacher certification in
subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages due to
geographic location. Candidates enrolled in this route must complete
a mentored internship complemented by flexibly scheduled training and
coursework offered at a local site, such as a school or educational
service district, or online or via video-conference over the K-20
network, in collaboration with the partnership program's higher
education partner. In addition, partnership grant programs shall
uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
((three)) one year((s)) of successful student interaction and
leadership as classified staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the content test, once the state
content test is available;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam, when
available.
(3) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route three
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
not employed in the district at the time of application. When
selecting candidates for certification through route three, districts
shall give priority to individuals who are seeking residency teacher
certification in subject matter shortage areas or shortages due to
geographic locations. For route three only, the districts may include
additional candidates in nonshortage subject areas if the candidates
are seeking endorsements with a secondary grade level designation as
defined by rule by the professional educator standards board. The
districts shall disclose to candidates in nonshortage subject areas
available information on the demand in those subject areas. Cohorts of
candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer teaching
academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a mentored
internship, followed, if necessary, by a second summer teaching
academy. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry
requirements for candidates that include:
(a) ((Five years' experience in the workforce;
(b))) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited
institution of higher education. The individual's grade point average
may be considered as a selection factor;
(((c))) (b) Successful completion of the content test, once the
state content test is available;
(((d))) (c) External validation of qualifications, including
demonstrated successful experience with students or children, such as
reference letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(((e))) (d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal
fitness requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(((f))) (e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exams,
when available.
(4) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route four
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
employed in the district at the time of application, or who hold
conditional teaching certificates or emergency substitute certificates.
Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer
teaching academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a
mentored internship. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold
entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) ((Five years' experience in the workforce;
(b))) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited
institution of higher education. The individual's grade point average
may be considered as a selection factor;
(((c))) (b) Successful completion of the content test, once the
state content test is available;
(((d))) (c) External validation of qualifications, including
demonstrated successful experience with students or children, such as
reference letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(((e))) (d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal
fitness requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(((f))) (e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exams,
when available.

--- END ---