BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be
open and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any
meeting of the governing body of a public agency, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.
(2) A governing body of a public agency may record its closed
executive session meetings described under RCW 42.30.110. Executive
session recordings by a governing body are public records exempt from
disclosure, inspection, or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW unless
disclosure of specific recordings is explicitly authorized by
resolution of the governing body. If an agency elects to disclose a
recording that may otherwise be protected by a privilege or statutory
exemption, any privilege or statutory exemption is waived only for the
record produced.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.30.120 and 1985 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each member of the governing body who attends a meeting of such
governing body where action is taken in violation of any provision of
this chapter applicable to him or her, with knowledge of the fact that
the meeting is in violation thereof, shall be subject to personal
liability in the form of a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred
dollars. The civil penalty shall be assessed by a judge of the
superior court and an action to enforce this penalty may be brought by
any person. A violation of this chapter does not constitute a crime
and assessment of the civil penalty by a judge shall not give rise to
any disability or legal disadvantage based on conviction of a criminal
offense.
(2) Any person who prevails against a public agency in any action
in the courts for a violation of this chapter shall be awarded all
costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in connection
with such legal action. Pursuant to RCW 4.84.185, any public agency
((who)) that prevails in any action in the courts for a violation of
this chapter may be awarded reasonable expenses and attorneys' fees
upon final judgment and written findings by the trial judge that the
action was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.
(3) As a remedy for any intentional violation of this chapter, a
court shall order the recording of a governing body's closed executive
sessions for a period of two years from the date of the order.
Recordings shall be retained for a period of two years and are exempt
from disclosure, inspection, or copying under the public records act,
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4) An agency has conditional immunity from liability for damages
to any person that are a consequence of specific actions made without
legal authority in an executive session where the governing body:
(a) Self-discloses those specific actions in writing and by reading
aloud in public at the first regular meeting after the agency
discovers, should have discovered, or receives a complaint of an
unauthorized action in an executive session. The disclosure shall be
available for public inspection and copying;
(b) Before the self-disclosure, there is no final action related to
the specific action; and
(c) There is no actual or anticipated litigation related to the
specific action.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.30.210 and 2001 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general's office may provide information,
technical assistance, and training on the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The attorney general's office shall publish, and update when
appropriate, a pamphlet explaining this chapter written in plain
language.
(3) The attorney general and state auditor shall appoint an
advisory committee of public and governmental entity representatives to
make recommendations on the adoption of advisory model rules as
described in this section. The attorney general shall, by January 1,
2010, adopt advisory model rules for public agencies, as defined in RCW
42.30.020, with assistance from a committee of stakeholders, to address
the following subjects:
(a) Agencies, governmental entities, and advisory committees
subject to the open public meetings act;
(b) Meetings and actions required to be conducted openly;
(c) Procedures and requirements regarding quorums, notice, and
actions for meetings;
(d) Matters that may be conducted in closed session;
(e) Penalties and other consequences for failure to comply with
this chapter; and
(f) Any other issues pertaining to meetings under this chapter, as
determined by the attorney general.
(4) The attorney general, in his or her discretion, may from time
to time revise the model rules.
(5)(a) Each elected or appointed official who is a member of a
governmental body subject to this chapter shall complete training and
receive certification regarding the responsibilities of the
governmental body and its members under this chapter.
(b) Currently elected and appointed officials shall complete and
certify training within ninety days after the adoption of the attorney
general's model rules.
(c) Newly elected or appointed officials shall complete and certify
training within ninety days of assuming the responsibilities of office
after the adoption of the attorney general's model rules.
(6) The attorney general shall ensure that certified training is
made available that is based upon and consistent with the attorney
general's model rules. The office of the attorney general may provide
the training and may also approve any acceptable course of training to
be offered by a governmental body or other entity. The attorney
general or other entity providing the training shall provide a
certification of course completion to elected or appointed officials
who complete an approved training curriculum. The attorney general
shall ensure that at least one course of training approved or provided
by the attorney general is available by internet, videotape, or a
widely available medium at little or no cost.
(7) A governmental body shall maintain and make available for
public inspection and copying the record of each member's certification
of completion of training.

--- END ---