BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The district manager for district two as defined in WAC 16-390-010 is authorized to transfer one hundred fifty thousand dollars from
the fruit and vegetable district fund to the plant pest account within
the agricultural local fund. The amount transferred is to be derived
from fees collected for state inspections of tree fruits and is to be
used solely for activities related to the control of Rhagoletis
pomonella in district two. The transfer of money must occur by
September 1, 2009. On June 30, 2013, any unexpended portion of the one
hundred fifty thousand dollars must be transferred to the fruit and
vegetable inspection account and deposited in the district account for
the district that includes Yakima county.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 15.17.243 (District two -- Transfer of
funds -- Control of Rhagoletis pomonella) and 2005 c 49 s 1, 2003 c 14 s
1, 2002 c 322 s 4, 2001 c 92 s 1, 1999 c 47 s 1, & 1997 c 227 s 1 are
each repealed.

--- END ---