BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.090 and 2007 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who is injured in his or her business or property by a
violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede
to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may
bring a civil action in ((the)) superior court to enjoin further
violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or
both, together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable
attorney's fee((, and)). In addition, the court may in its discretion,
increase the award of damages up to an amount not to exceed three times
the actual damages sustained: PROVIDED, That such increased damage
award for violation of RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed ((ten)) twenty-five
thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such person may bring a civil
action in the district court to recover his or her actual damages,
except for damages which exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020,
and the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorney's fees. The
district court may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages to
an amount not more than three times the actual damages sustained, but
such increased damage award shall not exceed ((the amount specified in
RCW 3.66.020)) twenty-five thousand dollars. For the purpose of this
section, "person" ((shall)) includes the counties, municipalities, and
all political subdivisions of this state.
Whenever the state of Washington is injured, directly or
indirectly, by reason of a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue therefor in ((the)) superior court
to recover the actual damages sustained by it, whether direct or
indirect, and to recover the costs of the suit including a reasonable
attorney's fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
In a private action in which an unfair or deceptive act or practice
is alleged under RCW 19.86.020, a claimant may establish that the act
or practice is injurious to the public interest because it:
(1) Violates a statute which incorporates this chapter;
(2) Violates a statute which contains a specific legislative
declaration of public interest impact; or
(3)(a) Injured other persons; (b) had the capacity to injure other
persons; or (c) has the capacity to injure other persons.

--- END ---