BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by more than forty-five days,
including weekends and holidays, unless the term of the loan is
extended by agreement of both the borrower and the licensee and no
additional fee or interest is charged. The maximum principal amount of
any small loan, or the outstanding principal balances of all small
loans made by a licensee to a single borrower at any one time, may not
exceed seven hundred dollars. At any time, the combined principal
balances of all small loans may not exceed thirty percent of the gross
monthly income of the borrower.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars. If
a licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, and the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower exceeds five
hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may charge interest or
fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the
aggregated principal of all loans at any one time that is in excess of
five hundred dollars. The director may determine by rule which fees,
if any, are not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in
this section. It is a violation of this chapter for any licensee to
knowingly loan to a single borrower at any one time, in a single loan
or in the aggregate, more than the maximum principal amount described
in this section.
(4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(5) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 31.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may, by contract with a vendor or service provider
or otherwise, develop and implement a system by means of which a
licensee may determine:
(a) Whether a consumer has an outstanding small loan;
(b) The number of small loans the consumer has outstanding;
(c) Whether the borrower is eligible for a loan under RCW
31.45.073; and
(d) Any other information necessary to comply with chapter 31.45
RCW.
(2) The director may specify the form and contents of the system by
rule. Any system must provide that the information entered into or
stored by the system is:
(a) Accessible to and usable by licensees and the director from any
location in this state; and
(b) Secured against public disclosure, tampering, theft, or
unauthorized acquisition or use.
(3) If the system described in subsection (1) of this section is
developed and implemented, a licensee making small loans under chapter
31.45 RCW must enter or update the required information in subsection
(1) of this section at the time that the small loan transaction is
conducted by the licensee.
(4) A licensee must continue to enter and update all required
information for any loans subject to chapter 31.45 RCW that are
outstanding or have not yet expired after the date on which the
licensee no longer has the license or small loan endorsement required
by this chapter. Within ten business days after ceasing to make loans
subject to chapter 31.45 RCW, the licensee must submit a plan for
continuing compliance with this subsection to the director for
approval. The director must promptly approve or disapprove the plan
and may require the licensee to submit a new or modified plan that
ensures compliance with this subsection.
(5) If the system described in subsection (1) of this section is
developed and implemented, the director shall adopt by rule a fee or
fees that a vendor or service provider that operates or administers the
system may charge a licensee in making a small loan for use of the
system described in subsection (1) of this section. The fee or fees
may not exceed one dollar per loan transaction.
(6) The director shall adopt rules establishing standards for the
retention, archiving, and deletion of information entered into or
stored by the system described in subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The information in the system described in subsection (1) of
this section is not subject to public inspection or disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.230 and 2008 c 200 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (a) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (b) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law; ((and))
(5) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in section 2 of this act; and
(6) Documents and related materials and scanned images of documents
and related materials used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard.

--- END ---