BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
people and organizations hold different beliefs about whether certain
health care services are morally acceptable. It is the public policy
of the state to respect and protect the right of conscience of all
persons who refuse to obtain, receive, or accept, or who are engaged in
the delivery of, or arrangement for, health care services and medical
care whether acting individually, corporately, or in association with
other persons; and to prohibit all forms of discrimination,
disqualification, coercion, disability, or imposition of liability upon
such persons or entities by reason of their refusing to act contrary to
their conscience or conscientious convictions in refusing to obtain,
receive, accept, or deliver health care services and medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 3 through 13 of this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Health care" means any phase of patient care, including but
not limited to: Testing; diagnosis; prognosis; ancillary research;
instructions; family planning, counseling, referrals, or any other
advice in connection with the use or procurement of contraceptives and
sterilization or abortion procedures; medication; or surgery or other
care or treatment rendered by a physician or health care facility,
intended for the physical, emotional, and mental well-being of persons.
(2) "Physician" means any person who is licensed by the state of
Washington under chapter 18.71 RCW.
(3) "Health care personnel" means any pharmacist, pharmacist
assistant, nurse, nurses' aide, medical school student, professional,
paraprofessional, or any other person who furnishes, or assists in the
furnishing of, health care services.
(4) "Health care facility" means any public or private hospital,
clinic, center, medical school, medical training institution,
laboratory or diagnostic facility, physician's office, infirmary,
dispensary, ambulatory surgical treatment center, or other institution
or location wherein health care services are provided to any person,
including physician organizations and associations, networks, joint
ventures, and all other combinations of those organizations.
(5) "Conscience" means a sincerely held set of moral convictions
arising from belief in and relation to God, or which, though not so
derived, arises from a place in the life of its possessor parallel to
that filled by God among adherents to religious faiths.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No physician or health care personnel shall
be civilly or criminally liable to any person, estate, public or
private entity, or public official by reason of his or her refusal to
perform, assist, counsel, suggest, recommend, refer, or participate in
any way in any particular form of health care service that is contrary
to the conscience of such physician or health care personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is unlawful for any person, public or
private institution, or public official to discriminate against any
person in any manner, including but not limited to, licensing, hiring,
promotion, transfer, staff appointment, hospital, managed care entity,
or any other privileges, because of such person's conscientious refusal
to receive, obtain, accept, perform, assist, counsel, suggest,
recommend, refer, or participate in any way in any particular form of
health care services contrary to his or her conscience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Nothing in this chapter relieves a
physician from any duty, that may exist under any laws concerning
current standards, normal medical practices, and procedures to inform
his or her patient of the patient's condition, prognosis, and risks.
However, such physician is under no duty to perform, assist, counsel,
suggest, recommend, refer, or participate in any way in any form of
medical practice or health care service that is contrary to his or her
conscience.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to relieve a
physician or other health care personnel from obligations under the law
of providing emergency medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 It is unlawful for any public or private
employer, entity, agency, institution, official, or person, including
but not limited to, a medical, nursing, or other medical training
institution, to deny admission because of, to place any reference in
its application form concerning, to orally question about, to impose
any burdens in terms or conditions of employment on, or to otherwise
discriminate against, any applicant, in terms of employment, admission
to, or participation in any programs for which the applicant is
eligible, or to discriminate in relation thereto, in any other manner,
on account of the applicant's refusal to receive, obtain, accept,
perform, counsel, suggest, recommend, refer, assist, or participate in
any way in any forms of health care services contrary to his or her
conscience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 It is unlawful for any public official,
guardian, agency, institution, or entity to deny any form of aid,
assistance, or benefits, or to condition the reception in any way of
any form of aid, assistance, or benefits, or in any other manner to
coerce, disqualify, or discriminate against any person otherwise
entitled to such aid, assistance, or benefits, because that person
refuses to obtain, receive, accept, perform, assist, counsel, suggest,
recommend, refer, or participate in any way in any form of health care
services contrary to his or her conscience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) No person, association, or corporation
that owns, operates, supervises, or manages a health care facility
shall be civilly or criminally liable to any person, estate, or public
or private entity by reason of refusal of the health care facility to
permit or provide any particular form of health care service that
violates the facility's conscience as documented in its ethical
guidelines, mission statement, constitution, bylaws, articles of
incorporation, regulations, or other governing documents.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to relieve a
physician or other health care personnel from obligations under the law
of providing emergency medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 It is unlawful for any person, public or
private institution, or public official to discriminate against any
person, association, or corporation attempting to establish a new
health care facility or operating an existing health care facility, in
any manner, including but not limited to, denial, deprivation or
disqualification in licensing, granting of authorizations, aids,
assistance, benefits, medical staff, or any other privileges, and
granting authorization to expand, improve, or create any health care
facility, by reason of the refusal of such person, association, or
corporation planning, proposing, or operating a health care facility,
to permit or perform any particular form of health care service that
violates the health care facility's conscience as documented in its
existing or proposed ethical guidelines, mission statement,
constitution, bylaws, articles of incorporation, regulations, or other
governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 It is unlawful for any public official,
agency, institution, or entity to deny any form of aid, assistance,
grants, or benefits; or in any other manner to coerce, disqualify, or
discriminate against any person, association, or corporation attempting
to establish a new health care facility or operating an existing health
care facility that otherwise would be entitled to the aid, assistance,
grant, or benefit because the existing or proposed health care facility
refuses to perform, assist, counsel, suggest, recommend, refer, or
participate in any way in any form of health care services contrary to
the health care facility's conscience as documented in its existing or
proposed ethical guidelines, mission statement, constitution, bylaws,
articles of incorporation, regulations, or other governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Any person, association, corporation,
entity, or health care facility injured by any public or private
person, association, agency, entity, or corporation by reason of any
action prohibited by this chapter may commence a suit therefor, and
shall recover treble damages, including pain and suffering, sustained
by such person, association, corporation, entity, or health care
facility, the costs of the suit, and reasonable attorneys' fees; but in
no case shall recovery be less than two thousand five hundred dollars
for each violation in addition to costs of the suit and reasonable
attorneys' fees. These damage remedies shall be cumulative, and not
exclusive of other remedies afforded under any other state or federal
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
as excusing any person, public or private institution, or public
official from liability for refusal to permit or provide a particular
form of health care service if:
(1) The person, public or private institution, or public official
has entered into a contract specifically to provide that particular
form of health care service; or
(2) The person, public or private institution, or public official
has accepted federal or state funds for the sole purpose of, and
specifically conditioned upon, permitting or providing that particular
form of health care service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The exercise of the right of conscience
protected in this chapter is not a practice inconsistent with the peace
and safety of the state for purposes of Article I, section 11 of the
state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 13 of this act are each
added to chapter 9.02 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---