BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) There is a longstanding medical and
legal history requiring physicians to obtain voluntary informed consent
from a patient, and the parents or guardians in the case of a minor,
before any medical procedure or surgery. Likewise, following emergency
medical procedures, there is a longstanding medical and legal history
requiring physicians to notify parents or guardians of the procedure.
The legislature intends to make these longstanding requirements apply
to abortion.
(2) The legislature intends to encourage unmarried pregnant minors
to seek the advice and counsel of their parents or guardians when faced
with the difficult decision of whether or not to terminate a pregnancy.
The legislature finds that:
(a) Other medical procedures including, but not limited to, body
piercings, tattoos, and the administration of aspirin require the
consent of a parent or guardian, and wants the decision to terminate a
pregnancy treated no differently. The legislature also wants to ensure
that health care decisions regarding the termination of a pregnancy are
made with voluntary informed consent;
(b) Abortion procedures and treatments can lead to death and are,
therefore, major medical procedures;
(c) In almost every other major medical procedure, there is in-depth consultation with the attending physician, imaging, and securing
of voluntary informed consent. The legislature intends for abortion
procedures and treatments to be the same.
(3) The legislature acknowledges that in instances of medical
emergency, obtaining consent from parents or guardians may not be
feasible. Circumstances may also arise involving incest or where
contact of the parents or guardians for the purpose of obtaining
consent or giving notice may result in physical harm to the minor.
Therefore, the legislature intends for the procedures enumerated in
this act for such instances and circumstances to be strictly construed.
The legislature wants to ensure compliance with the spirit and intent
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) No person may knowingly perform an
abortion or treatment upon a pregnant unemancipated minor female or
upon a female for whom a guardian has been appointed because of a
finding of incompetency in the state of Washington, unless:
(i) The attending physician has secured the voluntary, written
informed consent of both of the minor's parents, if living, or the
surviving parent if one parent is deceased, or the legal guardian or
guardians if the minor is subject to guardianship no later than forty-eight hours before the procedure or treatment; or
(ii) The minor is emancipated and the attending physician has
received proof of emancipation and the minor's voluntary, written
informed consent no later than forty-eight hours before the procedure
or treatment; or
(iii) A medical emergency exists for the minor that is so urgent
that there is insufficient time for the physician to obtain the consent
of the parents or guardian, and the attending physician certifies such
in the minor's medical records. In so certifying, the attending
physician must include the factual circumstances supporting his or her
professional judgment that a medical emergency existed and the grounds
for the determination that there was insufficient time to obtain the
informed consent of the parents or guardian. The physician must still
secure voluntary, written informed consent. Immediately following an
abortion procedure or treatment under this subsection, the physician
shall, with due diligence, provide actual written notice to the parents
or guardians that the operation has been performed; or
(iv) The pregnancy is the result of incest where a parent or
guardian is a party to the incestuous act and the attending physician
certifies such in the minor's medical records. In so certifying, the
attending physician must include the factual circumstances surrounding
the incident and report the incident to local law enforcement within
twenty-four hours of performing the abortion procedure or treatment.
The physician need only obtain written consent, in person, of the
nonparty parent or guardian, if living, or any adult person standing in
loco parentis, provided that the adult person is not an employee of the
health care provider and physician performing the abortion procedure or
treatment; or
(v) Any judge of a juvenile court in the county where the minor
resides or the county where the abortion procedure or treatment is to
be caused or performed, upon petition, or motion, and after appropriate
hearing, shall determine, by clear and convincing evidence, that:
(A) It is in the best interest of the minor that the parent's or
guardian's consent be withheld;
(B) The minor is mature and capable of giving informed consent to
the abortion procedure or treatment; and
(C) The attending physician has secured the minor's voluntary
written, informed consent.
(b)(i) A minor shall have the legal capacity to make and prosecute
a petition or motion as provided for in this section and may
participate in proceedings in the court on her own behalf. The court
may appoint a guardian ad litem to assist her. The court shall advise
her that she has a right to court-appointed counsel, and shall provide
her with such counsel unless she wishes to appear with private counsel
or has knowingly and intelligently waived representation.
(ii) Court proceedings under this section are confidential and
shall be given such precedence over other pending matters as will
ensure that the court may reach a decision promptly and without delay.
In no case shall the court fail to rule within three business days of
the date of the petition or motion. The name of the pregnant minor
shall not be entered on any docket that is subject to public
inspection. All persons shall be excluded from hearings under this
section except the petitioner and such other persons whose presence is
specifically requested by the petitioner.
(iii) A court that conducts proceedings under this section shall
make in writing specific factual findings and legal conclusions
supporting its decision and shall, upon the initial filing of the
minor's petition or motion for judicial authorization of an abortion
procedure or treatment without parental or guardian consent, order a
sealed record of the petition, pleadings, submissions, transcripts,
exhibits, orders, evidence, and any other written material to be
maintained, which shall include its own findings and conclusions.
(iv) The petition or motion to the court as provided for in this
section shall be accompanied by a nonnotarized verification stating
that the information therein is true and correct to the best of the
minor's knowledge, and the petition or motion shall, at a minimum, set
forth the following facts:
(A) The initials of the pregnant minor;
(B) The age of the pregnant minor;
(C) The names and addresses of each parent or guardian;
(D) That voluntary, written informed consent has been obtained by
the attending physician;
(E) That the pregnant minor is of sound mind and has sufficient
intellectual capacity to consent to the abortion procedure or
treatment;
(F) A prayer for relief asking the court to grant the pregnant
minor judicial authorization for an abortion procedure or treatment
without parental or guardian consent;
(G) That the pregnant minor is aware that any false statements made
in the petition or motion are punishable by law; and
(H) The signature of the pregnant minor. If necessary to serve the
interest of justice, the court shall refer the pregnant minor to the
appropriate personnel for assistance in preparing the petition or
motion.
(v) At the hearings provided for under this section, the court
shall hear evidence relating to the emotional development, maturity,
intellect, and understanding of the pregnant minor, the fact and
duration of her pregnancy, the circumstances and facts showing why
judicial authorization of an abortion procedure or treatment without
parental or guardian consent is in the minor's best interest, and any
other evidence that the court may find useful in determining whether
judicial authorization should be granted. The court shall also notify
the pregnant minor at the hearing that it must rule on her petition or
motion within three business days of the date of its filing and that,
should the court fail to rule in favor of her petition or motion within
the allotted time, she has the right to appeal to the superior court.
(vi) An expedited confidential appeal shall be available to any
pregnant minor whom the court fails to grant judicial authorization for
an abortion procedure or treatment without parental or guardian consent
within the time specified in this section. Any court to which an
appeal is taken under this section shall give prompt and confidential
attention and shall rule within five business days of the filing of the
appeal. The supreme court may issue such rules, consistent with this
section, as may further assure that the process provided in this
section is conducted in such a manner as will ensure confidentiality
and sufficient precedence over other pending matters.
(vii) No filing fees shall be required of any pregnant minor
availing herself of the procedures provided by this section.
(c) Compliance with this section shall be considered reasonable
medical practice. Failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is prima facie evidence of failure to obtain voluntary, written
informed consent and of interference with family relations in
appropriate civil actions. This chapter shall not be construed to
preclude the award of exemplary damages, or damages for emotional
distress, even if unaccompanied by physical complications in any
appropriate civil action relevant to violation of this section.
Nothing shall be construed to limit the common law rights of parents.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Actual written notice" means a notice that shall be addressed
to the parents or guardian at the usual place of abode of the parents
or guardian, and delivered personally by the physician or physician's
agent within twenty-four hours of the abortion procedure or treatment.
In lieu of such delivery, notice may be made by certified mail
addressed to the parents or guardian at the usual place of abode of the
parents or guardian with return receipt requested and restricted
delivery to the addressee. If notice is made by certified mail, the
time of delivery shall be deemed to occur at twelve noon on the next
day on which regular mail delivery takes place subsequent to mailing.
(b) "Best interest" means a judicial finding of fact that more
likely than not, physical harm will occur to the minor if there is
contact with her parents or guardians for the purpose of giving notice
of, or obtaining consent for, an abortion procedure or treatment. The
threat to physical safety includes the potential for physical harm as
a repercussion for having the abortion procedure or treatment.
(c) "Medical emergency" is defined as any situation where the
continuation of the pregnancy will, more than likely, result in the
death of the minor.
(d) "Minor" means any female who is less than eighteen years of
age.
(e) "Physical harm" means physical pain or injury, illness, or an
impairment of physical condition.
(f) "Voluntary informed consent" means and only exists if:
(i) At least forty-eight hours before the abortion procedure or
treatment, the physician who is to perform the abortion procedure or
treatment, in a face-to-face consultation, orally and in writing
informs the minor of:
(A) The nature of the abortion procedure or treatment, and
specifically how the procedure will affect the fetus, and the risk and
alternatives to an abortion procedure or treatment that any person
would consider material to the decision of whether or not to undergo an
abortion;
(B) Specifically how, and by what means, the procedure or treatment
will affect the fetus;
(C) That the abortion procedure or treatment will terminate the
life of a living human being; and
(D) The probable gestational age and a description of the
development of the fetus at the time the abortion procedure or
treatment would be performed;
(ii) The physician who is to perform the abortion procedure or
treatment obtains the consent in writing; and
(iii) The physician performs a mandatory ultrasound of the fetus,
while displaying the ultrasound so that it is clearly visible to the
minor.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.02.100 and 1992 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The sovereign people hereby declare that every individual possesses
a fundamental right of privacy with respect to personal reproductive
decisions.
Accordingly, it is the public policy of the state of Washington
that:
(1) Every individual has the fundamental right to choose or refuse
birth control;
(2) Every woman has the fundamental right to choose or refuse to
have an abortion, except as specifically limited by RCW 9.02.100
through 9.02.170 ((and)), 9.02.900 through 9.02.902, and section 2 of
this act;
(3) Except as specifically permitted by RCW 9.02.100 through
9.02.170 ((and)), 9.02.900 through 9.02.902, and section 2 of this act,
the state shall not deny or interfere with a woman's fundamental right
to choose or refuse to have an abortion; and
(4) The state shall not discriminate against the exercise of these
rights in the regulation or provision of benefits, facilities,
services, or information.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.02.110 and 1992 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The state may not deny or interfere with a woman's right to choose
to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect her
life or health, except as specifically limited by section 2 of this
act.
A physician may terminate and a health care provider may assist a
physician in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.02.120 and 1992 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Unless authorized by RCW 9.02.110 and performed in compliance with
section 2 of this act, any person who performs an abortion on another
person shall be guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.02.140 and 1992 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
Any regulation promulgated by the state relating to abortion shall
be valid only if:
(1) The regulation is medically necessary to protect the life or
health of the woman terminating her pregnancy,
(2) The regulation is consistent with established medical practice,
and
(3) Of the available alternatives, the regulation imposes the least
restrictions on the woman's right to have an abortion as defined by RCW
9.02.100 through 9.02.170 ((and)), 9.02.900 through 9.02.902, and
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Except in a medical emergency, as defined
under section 2 of this act, no parent, guardian, or other person
standing in loco parentis shall coerce a pregnant unemancipated minor
or pregnant female subject to guardianship to undergo an abortion
procedure or treatment. Any pregnant unemancipated minor or pregnant
female subject to guardianship may apply to the superior court for
relief. The court shall provide her with counsel, give the matter
expedited consideration, and grant such relief as may be necessary to
prevent coercion. Should a minor be denied the financial support of
her parents by reason of her refusal to undergo an abortion procedure
or treatment, she shall be considered emancipated for purposes of
eligibility for assistance of benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 and 7 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.02 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act may be known and cited as the
healthy family daughter protection act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect December 1, 2009.

--- END ---