BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.477 and 1995 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless allowed by rule, under chapter 34.05 RCW, a person shall
not cause or allow any of the following materials to be burned in any
residential solid fuel burning device:
(a) Garbage;
(b) Treated wood;
(c) Plastics;
(d) Rubber products;
(e) Animals;
(f) Asphaltic products;
(g) Waste petroleum products;
(h) Paints; or
(i) Any substance, other than properly seasoned fuel wood, which
normally emits dense smoke or obnoxious odors.
(2) For the ((sole)) purpose of ((a contingency measure to meet the
requirements of)) achieving and maintaining attainment in areas of
nonattainment for fine particulates in accordance with section
172(((c)(9))) of the federal clean air act, a local authority or the
department, after seeking input from any county, city, or local health
department affected by a proposal to prohibit the use of solid fuel
burning devices, may prohibit the use of solid fuel burning devices,
except fireplaces as defined in RCW 70.94.453(3), wood stoves meeting
the standards set forth in RCW ((70.94.457)) 70.94.473(1)(b) or pellet
stoves ((either certified or issued an exemption by the United States
environmental protection agency in accordance with Title 40, Part 60 of
the code of federal regulations, if the United States environmental
protection agency, in consultation with)) if the department and the
local authority makes written findings that:
(a) The area ((has failed to make reasonable further progress or
attain or maintain a national ambient air quality standard)) is
designated nonattainment or maintenance status for fine particulate
matter by the United States environmental protection agency; ((and))
(b) Emissions from solid fuel burning devices from a particular
geographic area are a major contributing factor ((to such failure to
make reasonable further progress or attain or maintain a)) for
violating the national ambient air quality standard for fine
particulates; and
(c) The area has an adequately funded program to assist low-income
households to secure an adequate source of heat, which may include a
wood stove meeting the requirements of RCW 70.94.453(2).
(3) Whenever a local authority or the department prohibits the use
of solid fuel burning devices as authorized by this section, the
cities, counties, and local health districts serving that area shall
cooperate with the local authority to implement the prohibition.
(4) A prohibition issued by a local authority or the department
under this subsection shall not apply to a person in a residence or
commercial establishment that does not have an adequate source of heat
without burning wood.

--- END ---