BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.160 and 1995 c 396 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of the public facilities district shall
have authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the public
purposes of preparing and distributing information to the general
public and promoting, advertising, improving, developing, operating,
and maintaining facilities of the district. For promotional activities
the district board must: (a) Identify the proposed expenditure in its
annual budget; and (b) adopt written rules governing promotional
hosting by employees, agents, and the board, including requirements for
identifying and evaluating the public benefits to be derived and
documenting the public benefits realized.
(2) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to authorize
preparation and distribution of information to the general public for
the purpose of influencing the outcome of a district election.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.57.060 and 1999 c 165 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of directors of the public facilities district shall
have authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the public
purposes of preparing and distributing information to the general
public and promoting, advertising, improving, developing, operating,
and maintaining a regional center. For promotional activities the
district board must: (a) Identify the proposed expenditure in its
annual budget; and (b) adopt written rules governing promotional
hosting by employees, agents, and the board, including requirements for
identifying and evaluating the public benefits to be derived and
documenting the public benefits realized.
(2) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to authorize
preparation and distribution of information to the general public for
the purpose of influencing the outcome of a district election.

--- END ---