BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2008 c 329 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,807,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,010,000))
$35,053,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,377,000))
$70,420,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the legislature to contract
for an independent economic and actuarial analysis of health care
reform proposals pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6333.
The results of this evaluation will be submitted to the governor, the
health and fiscal policy committees of the legislature, and the work
group by December 15, 2008.

Sec. 102 2008 c 329 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,990,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,434,000))
$28,506,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,891,000))
$55,963,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the legislature to contract
for an independent economic and actuarial analysis of health care
reform proposals pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6333.
The results of this evaluation will be submitted to the governor, the
health and fiscal policy committees of the legislature, and the work
group by December 15, 2008.

Sec. 103 2008 c 329 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,378,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,355,000))
$2,912,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,769,000))
$6,326,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, the committee
may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's
2007-09 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review
committee to conduct a review of the method used to determine lease
rates for state-owned aquatic lands. The review shall include
classification of current lease base and lease rates by category of use
such as marinas; a review of previous studies of formulas for
state-owned aquatic land leases; and identification of pros and cons of
alternative approaches to calculating aquatic lands lease rates. The
committee shall complete the review by June 2008.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($50,000)) $16,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the joint
legislative audit and review committee to conduct an evaluation and
comparison of the cost efficiency of rental housing voucher programs
versus other housing projects intended to assist low-income households,
including construction and rehabilitation of housing units. The study
will consider factors including administrative costs, capital costs,
and other operating costs involved in operating voucher and other
housing programs. The study will compare the number of households that
can be served by voucher and other housing programs, given a set amount
of available funds. The department of community, trade, and economic
development, the housing finance commission, housing authorities,
community action agencies, and local governments shall provide the
joint legislative audit and review committee with information necessary
for the study. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall
solicit input regarding the study from interested parties, including
representatives from the affordable housing advisory board, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the housing
finance commission, representatives from the private rental housing
industry, housing authorities, community action agencies, county and
city governments, and nonprofit and for-profit housing developers. The
joint legislative audit and review committee shall present the results
of the study to the legislature by December 31, 2008.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a cost analysis of the programs and
activities administered by the department of fish and wildlife. In
conducting the study, the committee shall specifically identify the
total costs that support both hunting and fishing programs as well as
nongame programs, including appropriate shares of the agency's
administrative and indirect costs. The committee shall compare the
cost analysis to revenues that currently support the programs,
including the level of support received from game licenses and fees.
The committee shall base its analysis on available management
information and shall provide the results of its analysis to the
legislature by January 2008.
(5) $164,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review
committee to analyze gaps throughout the state in the availability and
accessibility of services identified in the federal adoption and safe
families act as directed by Substitute House Bill No. 1333 (child
welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an analysis of the
qualifications required to become a social worker I, II, III, or IV
within the department of social and health services children's
administration. The committee shall conduct an analysis of the
qualifications used by other states for equivalent categories of social
workers. The committee shall analyze the strengths and weaknesses of
Washington's qualifications relative to the other states. The findings
shall be reported to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(7) Within amounts provided in this section, the committee shall
conduct a review of the eligibility requirements and eligibility review
processes that apply to any state program that offers individual health
care coverage for qualified recipients.
(8) (($75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of)) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372
(Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1488 (oil spill program). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, the committee
shall review the constitutional, case law, and statutory objectives and
obligations of the department of natural resources' management of
state-owned aquatic lands. The review will include an assessment of
the degree to which the management practices of the department and
other agencies are meeting these objectives and complying with legal
obligations.
(11) (($38,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of)) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2641 (education
performance agreements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a preaudit for a
comprehensive review of boards and commissions. The preaudit study
will inventory the existing boards/commissions, identify criteria for
selecting entities for further review, propose the scope and objectives
of those reviews, and identify resource and schedule options for the
committee to consider before proceeding.
(13) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall develop
a framework for future efforts to quantify and analyze health care
spending across all sectors of the state. This effort would focus on
identifying the relevant types of spending in the public and private
sectors, the availability of information on each of those types of
spending, and the extent to which that available information could be
tracked over time. In conducting this work, the committee shall work
with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
and the University of Washington's institute for health metrics and
evaluation, as appropriate. The committee shall provide a report by
January 2009.

Sec. 104 2008 c 329 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,843,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,038,000))
$1,590,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,922,000))
$3,474,000

Sec. 105 2008 c 329 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,491,000))
$3,310,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,516,000))
$3,335,000
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for 2009 is provided solely for the purchase of actuarial
services to assist in the evaluation of the fiscal impact of health
benefit proposals.

Sec. 106 2008 c 329 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,057,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,151,000))
$8,432,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,300,000))
$17,581,000

Sec. 107 2008 c 329 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,811,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,220,000))
$5,066,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,106,000))
$9,952,000

Sec. 108 2008 c 329 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,392,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,598,000))
$7,542,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,990,000))
$14,934,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
implement the task force on domestic violence as requested by section
306 of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution
proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 109 2008 c 329 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,268,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,269,000))
$2,168,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,537,000))
$4,436,000

Sec. 110 2008 c 329 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,092,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,145,000))
$17,141,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,237,000))
$33,233,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
chapter 34, Laws of 2007 (Senate Bill No. 5351, court of appeals
judges' travel).

Sec. 111 2008 c 329 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,117,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,134,000))
$1,133,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,251,000))
$2,250,000

Sec. 112 2008 c 329 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,659,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,447,000))
$33,446,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,558,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,199,000))
$23,694,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,923,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($158,136,000))
$157,630,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs. Funding distributed in this subsection shall not
be used to supplant existing local funding for the court-appointed
special advocates program.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $1,500,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,500,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court
for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035.
The office of the administrator for the courts shall develop an
interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on
the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified
mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of
process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.
(3)(a) $1,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,641,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $6,612,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $6,612,000 of
the public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in
need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for
the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(4) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(5) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of the juror pay pilot
and research project.
(6) $830,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving interpreter services
at the trial court level.
(a) Of these amounts, $170,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $170,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts in
developing and implementing language assistance plans. The
administrator of the courts, in consultation with the interpreter
commission, shall adopt language assistance plan standards consistent
with chapters 2.42 and 2.43 RCW. The standards shall include
guidelines on local community input, provisions on notifying court
users on the right and methods to obtain an interpreter, information on
training for judges and court personnel, procedures for identifying and
appointing an interpreter, access to translations of commonly used
forms, and processes to evaluate the development and implementation of
the plan.
(b) Of these amounts, $610,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $950,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts with
interpreter services. In order to be eligible for assistance, a trial
court must have completed a language assistance plan consistent with
the standards established in (a) of this subsection that is approved by
the administrator of the courts and submit the amounts spent annually
on interpreter services for fiscal years 2005, 2006, and 2007. The
funding in this subsection (b) shall not be used to supplant existing
funding and cannot be used for any purpose other than assisting trial
courts with interpreter services. At the end of the fiscal year,
recipients shall report to the administrator of the court the amount
the trial court spent on interpreter services.
(c) $50,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely to the administrator of the courts for
administration of this subsection. By December 1, 2009, the
administrator of the courts shall report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature: (i) The number of trial courts
in the state that have completed a language assistance plan; (ii) the
number of trial courts in the state that have not completed a language
assistance plan; (iii) the number of trial courts in the state that
received assistance under this subsection, the amount of the
assistance, and the amount each trial court spent on interpreter
services for fiscal years 2005 through 2008 and fiscal year 2009 to
date.
(7) $443,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $543,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. Within the amounts provided:
(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for developing training materials for the
family court liaisons.
(b) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for reimbursement costs related to
the family law handbook;
(c) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to counties to
provide guardian ad litem services for the indigent for a reduced or
waived fee;
(d) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementing the data tracking
provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution).
(8)(a) $20,458,000 of the judicial information systems account--state appropriation is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the core case management system. In expending the
funds provided within this subsection, the following conditions must
first be satisfied before any subsequent funds may be expended:
(i) Completion of feasibility studies detailing linkages between
the objectives of the core case management system and the following:
The technology efforts required and the impacts of the new investments
on existing infrastructure and business functions, including the
estimated fiscal impacts to the judicial information systems account
and the near general fund accounts; the alignment of critical system
requirements of varying size courts at the municipal, district, and
superior court level with their respective proposed business processes
resulting from business process engineering, and detail on the costs
and other impacts to the courts for providing critical business
requirements not addressed by new common business processes; the
specific requirements and business process needs of state agencies
dependent on data exchange with the judicial information system; and
the results from a proof of implementation phase; and
(ii) Discussion with and presentation to the department of
information systems and the information services board regarding the
impact on the state agencies dependent on successful data exchange with
the judicial information system and the results of the feasibility
studies.
(b) The judicial information systems committee shall provide
quarterly updates to the appropriate committees of the legislature and
the department of information systems on the status of implementation
of the core case management system.
(c) The legislature respectfully requests the judicial information
systems committee invite representatives from the state agencies
dependent on successful data exchange to their regular meetings for
consultation as nonvoting members.
(9) $534,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No.
5320 (public guardianship office). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $29,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(11) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2822 (family and juvenile court). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2903 (access coordinator). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 113 2008 c 329 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,814,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,137,000))
$17,689,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,066,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,013,000))
$7,012,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,531,000))
$54,082,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided from the public safety and education
account appropriations include funding for expert and investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(((3))) (2) Starting with fiscal year 2009, the office shall adjust
its monthly, annual, and biennial accounting records so that the
expenditures by fund, object, and subobject are attributed to the
following programs: (a) Appellate indigent defense; (b) representation
of indigent parents qualified for appointed counsel in dependency and
termination cases; (c) trial court criminal indigent defense; (d) other
grants or contracted services; and (e) costs for administering the
office. The office may consult with the administrator for the courts,
the office of financial management, and the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee for guidance in adjusting its
accounting records.
(((4))) (3) $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement sections 2 and 3 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 114 2007 c 522 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,923,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,009,000))
$6,987,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,326,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,378,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,494,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,493,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,477,000))
$22,455,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($120,000)) $98,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue
support for the existing agricultural dispute resolution system funded
through the office of civil legal aid for disputes between farmers and
farm workers. The office of civil legal aid shall report to the
appropriate legislative committees on the effectiveness of this program
by December 31, 2008.
(2) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2)(a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.

Sec. 115 2008 c 329 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,615,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,959,000))
$6,349,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,289,000))
$19,679,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5224 (salmon office). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((3))) (2) $2,000,000 of the economic development and strategic
reserve account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided
solely to provide support and assistance to victims of the December
2007 storms and floods in Chehalis and Centralia.

Sec. 116 2008 c 329 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $798,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($821,000))
$793,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,709,000))
$1,681,000

Sec. 117 2008 c 329 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,546,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,448,000))
$2,360,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,994,000))
$4,906,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is for a feasibility study to
determine the cost of designing, developing, implementing, and
maintaining: (a) Software or other applications to accommodate
electronic filing by lobbyists reporting under RCW 42.17.150 and
42.17.170, by lobbyist employers reporting under RCW 42.17.180, and by
public agencies reporting under RCW 42.17.190; (b) a database and query
system that results in data that is readily available to the public for
review and analysis and that is compatible with current computer
architecture, technology, and operating systems, including but not
limited to Windows and Apple operating systems. The commission shall
contract for the feasibility study and consult with the department of
information services. The study may include other elements, as
determined by the commission, that promote public access to information
about lobbying activity reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW. The study
shall be provided to the legislature by January 2008.

Sec. 118 2008 c 329 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,863,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,816,000))
$20,782,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,279,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,339,000))
$8,337,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,344,000))
$15,342,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,511,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($119,166,000))
$118,128,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,290,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,556,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29A.52.330.
(4)(a) $2,465,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,501,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2007-09 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for humanities Washington's "we
the people" community conversations program.
(6) (($122,000 of the charitable organization education account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1777 (charitable organizations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7))) $575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for settlement costs and attorney fees
resulting from the resolution of Washington Association of Churches, et
al. v. Reed, United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Seattle, Case No. CV06-0726RSM.

Sec. 119 2008 c 329 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($463,000))
$437,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($811,000))
$785,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office shall assist the department of personnel on
providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal,
state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions
shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal
sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions
shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each
session. The department of personnel shall be responsible for all of
the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and
collection of the fees for the training.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the office to engage a contractor to
conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for Native American
students; analyze the progress in developing effective government-to-government relations and identification and adoption of curriculum
regarding tribal history, culture, and government as provided under RCW
28A.345.070; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing the achievement
gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left behind act for
all groups of students to meet academic standards by 2014; and identify
performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress. The
contractor shall conduct the analysis starting with the call to action
paper by the multi-ethnic think tank and as guided by the tribal leader
congress on education, the Washington state school directors
association, and other appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit
a study update by September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by
December 30, 2008, to the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the P-20 council, the basic
education finance task force, and the education committees of the
legislature.

Sec. 120 2008 c 329 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($548,000))
$543,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($805,000))
$800,000
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor
to conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for Asian
American students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing the
achievement gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left
behind act for all groups of students to meet academic standards by
2014; and identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly
progress. The contractor shall conduct the analysis starting with the
call to action paper by the multi-ethnic think tank and as guided by
the former members of the Asian Pacific Islander American think tank
and other appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit a study
update by September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by December 30,
2008, to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the
state board of education, the P-20 council, the basic education finance
task force, and the education committees of the legislature.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor
to conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for Pacific
Islander American students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing
the achievement gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left
behind act for all groups of students to meet academic standards by
2014; and identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly
progress. The contractor shall conduct the analysis starting with the
call to action paper by the multi-ethnic think tank and as guided by
the former members of the Asian Pacific Islander American think tank
and other appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit a study
update by September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by December 30,
2008, to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the
state board of education, the P-20 council, the basic education finance
task force, and the education committees of the legislature.

Sec. 121 2008 c 329 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,539,000))
$15,538,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $183,000 of the state treasurer's service
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (linked deposit program). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 122 2008 c 329 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($806,000))
$738,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,312,000))
$15,303,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,912,000))
$16,835,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $752,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($762,000)) $698,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff and
related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data
submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program
audits of state funded public school programs; establish the specific
amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and
the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public
school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net
committee when requested.
(3) $1,000 of the appropriation from the auditing services
revolving account--state is provided solely for an adjustment to the
agency lease rate for space occupied and parking in the Tacoma Rhodes
Center. The department of general administration shall increase lease
rates to meet the cash gain/loss break-even point for the Tacoma Rhodes
Center effective July 1, 2007.
(4) $313,000 of the auditing services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6776 (whistleblower protections). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 123 2008 c 329 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,000))
$222,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($384,000))
$381,000

Sec. 124 2008 c 329 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,973,000))
$5,541,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,960,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,228,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($229,849,000))
$229,579,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,997,000))
$249,295,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $9,446,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increases in salaries and benefits
of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2007. This funding is
provided solely for increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems, and shall not be used for the performance
management program or to fund general administration. The attorney
general shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by October
1, 2008, and provide detailed demographic information regarding
assistant attorneys general who received increased salaries and
benefits as a result of the appropriation. The report shall include at
a minimum information regarding the years of service, division
assignment within the attorney general's office, and client agencies
represented by assistant attorneys general receiving increased salaries
and benefits as a result of the amount provided in this subsection.
The report shall include a proposed salary schedule for all assistant
attorneys general using the same factors used to determine increased
salaries under this section. The report shall also provide initial
findings regarding the effect of the increases on recruitment and
retention of assistant attorneys general.
(4) $69,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $44,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972
(surface mining reclamation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (6) $110,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3274 (port district contracting). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((8))) (7) $346,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of sections 2 and
3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term
well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((9))) (8) $492,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((10))) (9) The agency shall submit a staffing model that supports
the need for increased resources due to casework associated with the
sexually violent predator population to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31,
2008.
(((11))) (10) The attorney general shall deposit to the health
services account at least $680,000 from the cy pres monetary portion of
the consent decree in settlement of the consumer protection act
litigation against Caremark Rx, LLC (King county superior court cause
no. 08-2- 06098-5). These moneys shall be expended pursuant to
legislative appropriation consistent with the terms of the consent
decree.

Sec. 125 2008 c 329 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($793,000))
$768,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,608,000))
$1,583,000

Sec. 126 2008 c 329 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,420,000))
$63,399,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,998,000))
$69,691,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,994,000))
$252,991,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,657,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,775,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,956,000
Tourism Promotion and Development Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,211,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,381,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,644,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,650,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,837,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,777,000))
$26,776,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000
Affordable Housing Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,650,000
Community Preservation and Development Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Home Security Fund Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000
Independent Youth Housing Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Manufacturing Innovation and Modernization Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($496,909,000))
$492,577,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $1,658,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,658,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for multijurisdictional drug task
forces.
(3) $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy.
(4) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit
them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the
program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms
included in the original loan agreements.
(5) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to support a task force on human
trafficking.
(6) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5092 (associate development organizations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the community services block
grant program.
(8) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to implement the
innovation partnership zone program.
(a) The director shall designate innovation partnership zones on
the basis of the following criteria:
(i) Innovation partnership zones must have three types of
institutions operating within their boundaries, or show evidence of
planning and local partnerships that will lead to dense concentrations
of these institutions:
(A) Research capacity in the form of a university or community
college fostering commercially valuable research, nonprofit
institutions creating commercially applicable innovations, or a
national laboratory;
(B) Dense proximity of globally competitive firms in a
research-based industry or industries or of individual firms with
innovation strategies linked to (a)(i) of this subsection. A globally
competitive firm may be signified through international organization
for standardization 9000 or 1400 certification, or other recognized
evidence of international success; and
(C) Training capacity either within the zone or readily accessible
to the zone. The training capacity requirement may be met by the same
institution as the research capacity requirement, to the extent both
are associated with an educational institution in the proposed zone;
(ii) The support of a local jurisdiction, a research institution,
an educational institution, an industry or cluster association, a
workforce development council, and an associate development
organization, port, or chamber of commerce;
(iii) Identifiable boundaries for the zone within which the
applicant will concentrate efforts to connect innovative researchers,
entrepreneurs, investors, industry associations or clusters, and
training providers. The geographic area defined should lend itself to
a distinct identity and have the capacity to accommodate firm growth;
(iv) The innovation partnership zone shall designate a zone
administrator, which must be an economic development council, port,
workforce development council, city, or county.
(b) By October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2008, the director shall
designate innovation partnership zones on the basis of applications
that meet the criteria in this subsection, estimated economic impact of
the zone, and evidence of forward planning for the zone.
(c) If the innovation partnership zone meets the other requirements
of the fund sources, then the innovation partnership zone is encouraged
to use the local infrastructure financing tool program, the sales and
use tax for public facilities in rural counties, the job skills program
and other state and local resources to promote zone development.
(d) The department shall convene at least one information sharing
event for innovation partnership zone administrators and other
interested parties.
(e) An innovation partnership zone shall provide performance
measures as required by the director, including but not limited to
private investment measures, job creation measures, and measures of
innovation such as licensing of ideas in research institutions,
patents, or other recognized measures of innovation.
(9) $430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the economic development
commission to work with the higher education coordinating board and
research institutions to: (a) Develop a plan for recruitment of ten
significant entrepreneurial researchers over the next ten years to lead
innovation research teams, which plan shall be implemented by the
higher education coordinating board; and (b) develop comprehensive
entrepreneurial programs at research institutions to accelerate the
commercialization process.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the cascade land
conservancy to develop and demonstrate one or more transfer of
development rights programs. These programs shall involve the purchase
or lease of development rights or conservation easements from family
forest landowners facing pressure to convert their lands and who desire
to keep their land in active forest management. The grant shall
require the conservancy to work in collaboration with family forest
landowners and affected local governments, and to submit an interim
written progress report to the department by September 15, 2008, and a
final report by June 30, 2009. The department shall transmit the
reports to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(11) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1422 (addressing children and families of incarcerated
parents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for KCTS public television to
support programming in the Spanish language. These funds are intended
to support the addition of a bilingual outreach coordinator to serve
Latino adults, families and children in western and central Washington;
multimedia promotion on Spanish-language media and website integration;
the production of targeted public affairs programs that seek to improve
education and the quality of life for Latinos; and to establish
partnerships with city and county library systems to provide
alternative access to the v-me Spanish language channel via the
internet.
(13) $1,000,000 of the tourism and promotion account--state
appropriation is provided for Substitute House Bill No. 1276 (creating
a public/private tourism partnership). Of this amount, $280,000 is for
the department of fish and wildlife's nature tourism infrastructure
program; $450,000 is for marketing the 2010 Olympic games; and $50,000
is for the Washington state games.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the African chamber of
commerce of the Pacific Northwest to support the formation of trade
alliances between Washington businesses and African businesses and
governments.
(15) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the emergency food assistance
program.
(16) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the energy facility site evaluation
council to contract for a review of the status of pipeline utility
corridor capacity and distribution for natural gas, petroleum and
biofuels in southwest Washington. The council shall submit its
findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(17) $513,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($2,463,000)) $2,443,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot
program to provide transitional housing assistance to offenders who are
reentering the community and are in need of housing as generally
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender
recidivism). The department shall operate the program through grants
to eligible organizations as described in RCW 43.185.060. A minimum of
two programs shall be established in two counties in which community
justice centers are located. The pilot programs shall be selected
through a request for proposal process in consultation with the
department of corrections. The department shall select the pilot sites
by January 1, 2008.
(a) The pilot program shall:
(i) Be operated in collaboration with the community justice center
existing in the location of the pilot site;
(ii) Offer transitional supportive housing that includes individual
support and mentoring available on an ongoing basis, life skills
training, and close working relationships with community justice
centers and community corrections officers. Supportive housing
services can be provided directly by the housing operator, or in
partnership with community-based organizations;
(iii) In providing assistance, give priority to offenders who are
designated as high risk or high needs as well as those determined not
to have a viable release plan by the department of corrections; and
(iv) Provide housing assistance for a period of up to twelve months
for a participating offender.
(b) The department may also use up to twenty percent of the funds
in this subsection to support the development of additional supportive
housing resources for offenders who are reentering the community.
(c) The department shall collaborate with the department of
corrections in the design of the program and development of criteria to
determine who will qualify for housing assistance, and shall report to
the legislature by November 1, 2008, on the number of offenders seeking
housing, the number of offenders eligible for housing, the number of
offenders who receive the housing, and the number of offenders who
commit new crimes while residing in the housing.
(18) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for community transition coordination
networks and county service inventories as generally described in
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender recidivism). Funds
are provided for: (a) Grants to counties to inventory services and
resources available to assist offenders reentering the community; (b)
a grant to the Washington institute for public policy to develop
criteria for conducting the inventory; and (c) the department of
community, trade, and economic development to assist with the inventory
and implement a community transition coordination network pilot
program.
(19) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a grant to the center for advanced
manufacturing to assist domestic businesses to compete globally.
(20) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the developmental
disabilities council to contract for legal services for individuals
with developmental disabilities entering or currently residing in the
department of social and health services division of developmental
disabilities community protection program.
(21) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to Safe Havens to
provide supervised visitation for families affected by domestic
violence and abuse.
(22) $408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($623,000)) $423,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to
county juvenile courts to expand the number of participants in juvenile
drug courts consistent with the conclusions of the Washington state
institute for public policy evaluation of effective programs to reduce
future prison populations.
(23) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5652 (microenterprise development), including grants to
microenterprise organizations for organizational capacity building and
provision of training and technical assistance. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(24) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5995 (economic development commission).
(25) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support international trade
fairs.
(26) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a study to survey best practices for
smart meters/smart grid/smart appliance technology and the range of
applications for smart meters around the country. The survey shall
include, but is not limited to, utilities using smart meters to: (a)
Meter responses to time-of-use pricing, (b) meter savings from direct
load control programs, (c) manage operations costs, (d) identify power
outages, (e) meter voluntary interruptible power programs, (f)
facilitate pay-as-you-go programs, and (g) enhance billing operations.
The study will compare the survey results with Washington's electric
utility power system including considerations of electricity price
variations between peak and off-peak prices, seasonal price variations,
forecast demand, conservation goals, seasonal or daily distribution or
transmission constraints, etc., to identify the applications where
smart meters may provide particular value to either individual
consumers, individual Washington electric utility power systems, or the
overall electric power grid in Washington, and to meeting state
conservation and energy goals. The department shall complete the study
and provide a report to the governor and the legislature by December 1,
2007.
(27) (((a) $500,000)) $18,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (financial
fraud). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to Grays Harbor county
for activities associated with southwest Washington coastal erosion
investigations and demonstrations.
(29) $112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($113,000)) $58,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to
the retired senior volunteer program.
(30) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the Benton and
Franklin county juvenile and drug courts. The grant is contingent upon
the counties providing equivalent matching funds.
(31) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the Seattle
aquarium for a scholarship program for transportation and admission
costs for classrooms with lower incomes, English as second language or
special needs.
(32) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the long-term care ombudsman
program.
(33) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Washington state
association of counties for the county training program.
(34) $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the northwest agriculture
business center. The department shall continue to fund these services
and funding shall not be reduced.
(35) $40,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2008
and $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for a program to build capacity and promote
the development of nonprofit community land trust organizations in the
state. Funds shall be granted through a competitive process to
community land trusts with assets under one million dollars, and these
funds shall be used for operating costs, technical assistance, and
other eligible capacity building expenses to be determined by the
department.
(36) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to centro latino to provide adult
basic education that includes but is not limited to: English as a
second language, Spanish literacy training, work-readiness training,
citizenship classes, programs to promote school readiness, community
education, and entrepreneurial services.
(37) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to resolution Washington to build
statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and
dispute resolution programs that guarantee that all citizens have
access to a low-cost resolution process as an alternative to
litigation. Of the fiscal year 2009 funding, $300,000 is to assist the
centers in providing mediation services for parties with parenting plan
disputes who either (a) are currently involved in dissolution
proceedings or (b) completed a dissolution within the past year. The
funding provided by this subsection does not constitute state funding
to counties for the purposes of RCW 26.09.015(2)(b).
(38) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($2,000,000)) $1,945,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (cleaner
energy). Of these amounts, $487,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely as pass-through
funding to the department of ecology to conduct the climate advisory
team stakeholder process and related staffing, analysis, and public
outreach costs. The department shall retain $1,013,000 for
expenditures related to the operations of the energy freedom authority,
and the support of the vehicle workgroup and the carbon market
stakeholder workgroup and any other activities required of the
department by the bill. The department shall enter into interagency
agreements with other agencies to implement the bill in the following
amounts: (a) $1,500,000 shall be provided to the climate impacts group
at the University of Washington for climate assessments; (b)
(($200,000)) $175,000 shall be provided to the University of Washington
college of forest resources for identification of barriers to using the
state's forest resources for fuel production; and (c) (($800,000))
$770,000 shall be provided to the Washington State University for
analyzing options for market incentives to encourage biofuels
production. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(39) $347,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to Western Washington University
to support small business development centers and underserved economic
development councils with secondary research services. Of the amounts
in this subsection, $500,000 is intended for research services and
shall be divided evenly between 25-50 small business development
centers and underserved economic development councils and $195,000
shall be used to develop infrastructure, training programs, and
marketing materials.
(40) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a study on improving the effectiveness
of the growth management act. Topics may include but are not limited
to: How best to meet and finance infrastructure and service needs of
growing communities; how to provide incentives to accommodate projected
growth and protect resource lands and critical areas; and how local
governments are prepared to address land use changes associated with
climate change.
(41) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Poulsbo marine science
center.
(42) $1,625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating and capital
equipment and facility grants to the following public television and
radio stations: KPBX/KSFC, $863,525; KPLU, $733,525; KVTI, $108,550;
KDNA, $29,205; KSER, $338,325; KNHC, $146,620; KSPS, $568,750; and
KBTC, $461,500. The department shall contract with all the
organizations listed in this subsection in the specified amounts.
(43) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the safe and drug free schools
and communities program.
(44) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($103,000)) $53,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
University of Washington's college of forest resources center for
international trade in forest products.
(45) $471,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $471,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla
Walla community college for its water and environmental center.
(46) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(47)(a) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study to examine the fiscal
health of counties. The study shall address spending and revenues, as
well as the demographic, geographic, social, economic, and other
factors contributing to or causing financial distress. The study shall
also examine the financial efficiencies, cost savings, and improved
levels of service that may be gained by authorizing noncharter counties
greater flexibility in altering their forms of governance, including
consolidating or merging constitutional or statutory functions or
structures.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may contract or consult with any agency, organization, or other public
or private entity as it deems necessary in order to complete the study
required under this section. The study may contain options and actions
for consideration by the governor and the legislature, but at minimum
shall recommend the changes to constitutional and statutory law
necessary to provide counties with the legal authority required to
implement the changes in governmental structures and functions needed
to promote optimum financial efficiency and improved services. The
study shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2007.
(48) $2,136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expense of
the "closing the achievement gap-flight program" of the Seattle public
schools during the 2007-09 biennium. The funds will be used in support
of a collaboration model between the Seattle public schools and the
community. The primary intent for this program is to close the
academic achievement gap for students of color and students in poverty
by promoting parent and family involvement and enhancing the social-emotional and the academic support for students. By June 30, 2009, the
Seattle public schools will provide and evaluation of the impact of the
activities funded on class size, graduation rates, student attendance,
student achievement, and closing the achievement gap.
(49) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $200,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for crime victim service centers. The department shall contract with
the centers for provision of these services.
(50) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($36,000)) $11,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for House Bill
No. 1038 (electric transmission lines). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(51) $1,000,000 of the independent youth housing account is
provided for Second Substitute House Bill No. 1922 (youth housing
program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(52) $227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1636 (development rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(53) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 1037
(electrical transmission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(54) $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1705 (health sciences and services).
(55) $881,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $882,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to: (a) Work
with a statewide asset building coalition to design, implement, and
fund a public education and outreach campaign; and (b) initiate,
expand, and strengthen community-based asset building coalitions by
providing them with technical assistance and grants. The department
shall conduct an application process and select at least twelve sites
by October 31, 2007. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no
more than 10 percent may be used by the department to administer the
technical assistance and grant program. The department shall report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of the
grant and technical assistance program by December 1, 2008.
(56) $15,200,000 of the affordable housing account--state
appropriation and $16,200,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1359 (affordable housing). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(57) $350,000 of the community preservation and development
authority account--state appropriation is provided solely for
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156 (development authorities). If this
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(58) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for distribution to community sexual
assault programs by the office of crime victims advocacy for the
purpose of enhancing services provided to child victims of sexual abuse
and their families. Enhanced services may include expanded hours of
medical and legal advocacy, expanded hours of therapy for the child
victim, increased support to nonoffending family members, and the
development of a standardized child-centered approach to service
delivery.
(59) $750,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to the office of
crime victims advocacy. These funds shall be contracted with the 39
county prosecuting attorneys' offices to support victim-witness
services. The funds must be prioritized to ensure a full-time victim-witness coordinator in each county. The office may retain only the
amount currently allocated for this activity for administrative costs.
(60) $75,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the update of
statewide sexual assault victim assistance protocols through a
coordinated effort led by the Washington coalition of sexual assault
programs.
(61) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the transitional housing operating and
rent program. The department shall continue to fund these services and
funding shall not be reduced.
(((63))) (62) $344,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington New Americans
program to provide naturalization assistance for legal permanent
residents who are eligible to become citizens. The department shall
conduct a competitive process to contract with an entity to provide
this assistance, which shall include, but is not limited to:
Curriculum design, counseling, outreach to immigrant communities,
application processing and legal screening, and citizenship preparation
services. The state funding is contingent upon receipt, by the
contractor(s) of at least a twenty-five percent match of nonstate
funding. The department and the contractor(s) shall develop
performance measures for the program and within sixty days of the close
of each fiscal year for which state funding is provided, shall report
to the governor and the legislature on the outcome of the program and
the performance measures. The department may retain up to five percent
of the funds provided in this subsection to administer the competitive
process and the contract. It is the intent of the legislature that
$2,000,000 be provided in the 2009-11 fiscal biennium to conclude this
program.
(((64))) (63) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to the Island
county associate development organization and is contingent upon the
enactment of, and provides specific funding for, Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6195 (definition of rural county for economic development
purposes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((65) $150,000)) (64) $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of sections 1 through 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6111 (tidal and wave energy). If these sections of
this bill are not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((66))) (65) $41,000 of the building code council account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2575 (fire sprinkler systems). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((67) $100,000)) (66) $37,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2712
(criminal street gangs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((68))) (67) $207,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2815 (greenhouse gas emissions). The
amount provided in this subsection includes $50,000 for the analysis
under section 9(3)(b) of the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((69) $50,000)) (68) $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute
House Bill No. 3120 (construction tax incentive). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((70))) (69) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6483 (local farms and healthy kids). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((71))) (70) $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2844 (urban forestry). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((72))) (71) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a grant to the Lucy Lopez
center for "the good citizen" bilingual radio programming pilot
project.
(((73))) (72) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a grant to the pacific science
center to support the "Lucy of Laetoli" exhibit.
(((74))) (73) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a grant to the local organizing
committee of 2008 Skate America to support the international skating
union grand prix series at the Everett events center in October, 2008.
(((75))) (74) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for development of the Lewis county
watershed planning and economic development demonstration project. The
purpose of the project is to identify lands and resources suitable for
economic development within Lewis county and outside of the floodplains
of Chehalis and Cowlitz river watersheds. It is the intent of the
legislature that $725,000 to complete this project will be provided in
the 2009-11 fiscal biennium.
(a) Of this amount, the department shall provide $75,000 each to
the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology to
develop a watershed characterization and to conduct a local habitat
assessment, develop recommendations, and provide technical assistance
in support of a demonstration watershed planning and economic
development project in Lewis county.
(b) $75,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided
solely for a grant to Lewis county to fund development of a subarea
plan, consistent with the provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW, for rural
economic development that is based on the watershed characterization
and local habitat assessment funded in (a) of this subsection. The
department may retain no more than thirty percent for grant
administration and technical assistance.
(c) The subarea plan to be funded shall be developed by a broad-based local stakeholder group with state agency technical assistance,
and shall include the following:
(i) Defined area or areas for future economic development outside
the 100-year floodplain. Areas planned for economic development
requiring urban levels of service must be designated on the land use
map as an urban growth area consistent with RCW 36.70A.110;
(ii) Defined area or areas of designated agricultural, forestry,
wildlife habitat, and other critical area lands;
(iii) Mechanisms to achieve long-term conservation of important
aquatic and terrestrial resources in the subarea;
(iv) Defined mitigation and restoration areas;
(v) Identification of capital facility improvements needed to
implement the plan, and a plan to finance such capital facilities
within projected funding capacities;
(vi) Discussion of the relationship between the plan and other
existing, adopted plans and regulations including but not limited to
county and city comprehensive plans, as appropriate, critical areas and
shoreline regulations, transportation, salmon recovery, watershed, and
water resource inventory area plans;
(vii) A plan for monitoring and adaptive management; and
(viii) Adoption by the local government affected as an amendment to
its comprehensive plan pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, after review and
recommendations on the plan by a broad-based local stakeholder group.
(((77))) (75) $306,000 of the manufacturing innovation and
modernization account--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6510 (manufacturing extension
services). $75,000 of this amount shall be to develop a rural
manufacturer export outreach program in collaboration with the small
business export finance assistance center and to contract with the
center to provide outreach services to rural manufacturing businesses
in Washington to inform them of the importance of, and opportunities
in, international trade and to inform them of the export assistance
programs available to assist these businesses to become exporters. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((79) $200,000)) (76) $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a grant to
HistoryLink to develop Alaska-Yukon-Pacific exposition commemoration
exhibits and programs.
(((80) $126,000)) (77) $76,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3142 (rapid response loan
program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((81))) (78) $100,000 of the prostitution prevention and
intervention account--nonappropriated is for distribution as grants by
the office of crime victims advocacy. The grants shall be prioritized
to law enforcement training including law enforcement training
regarding the availability of services for minors under chapter 13.32A
RCW, community outreach and education and treatment and services to
address the problems of minors who have a history of engaging in sexual
conduct for a fee or who are victims of commercial sexual abuse of a
minor or both, including but not limited to mental health and chemical
dependency services, parenting services, housing assistance, education
and vocational training, or intensive case management services.
(((82))) (79) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for tourism
promotion in Keystone.
(((83))) (80) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for tourism
promotion in Port Townsend.
(((85))) (81) $317,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6580 (climate change), including sections 2 and 3 of
the bill. If the bill and sections 2 and 3 are not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 127 2008 c 329 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($827,000))
$805,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,553,000))
$1,531,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The economic and revenue forecast council,
in its quarterly revenue forecasts, shall forecast the total revenue
for the state general fund and near general fund, as those funds are
determined by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.

Sec. 128 2008 c 329 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,290,000))
$33,790,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,934,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
((Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000))
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,049,000))
$83,426,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to continue the agricultural pilot programs that identify
projects to enhance farm income and improve natural resource
protection. Specific work will include project outreach and
refinement, stakeholder support, staffing the oversight committee,
seeking federal and private match funding, and further refining the
list of projects to be recommended for funding.
(2) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $254,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to fund "proof-of-concept" model and projects recommended by the
oversight committee, as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($580,000)) $505,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the
association of Washington cities and the Washington state association
of counties for improving project permitting and mitigation processes.
(4) $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($320,000)) $270,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office
of regulatory assistance to develop statewide multiagency permits for
transportation infrastructure and other projects that integrate local,
state, and federal permit requirements and mitigation standards.
(5) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5122 (regulatory assistance programs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement chapter 139, Laws of
2007 (student transportation funding) which requires development of two
options for a new K-12 pupil transportation funding formula.
(7) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for financial assistance to
local government agencies in counties representing populations of fewer
than 350,000 residents for the acquisition and development of
streamlined permitting technology infrastructure through an integrated
business portal approach. Grant awards may not exceed $100,000 per
local government agency per fiscal year. The funding must be used to
acquire and implement permit tracking systems that can support and are
compatible with a multijurisdictional, integrated approach. Prior to
granting funds, the office of regulatory assistance shall ensure that
the proposed systems and technology are based on open-industry
standards, allow for future integration of processes and sharing of
data, and are extendable.
(8) $474,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($831,000)) $331,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of sections 50 through 57 (health resources strategy) of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon
commission on health care). If the bill is not enacted by June 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely to implement section 3 of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 (preserving the viability of
agricultural lands). Funds are provided for a contract with the
Ruckelshaus center to examine conflicts between agriculture activities
and critical areas ordinances. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The education data center within the office of financial
management may convene a work group to assess the feasibility, costs,
and benefits of a higher education data system that uses privacy-protected student-level data.
(((13))) (11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 ((and $250,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for the
office of financial management to establish and provide staff support
for the Washington citizens' work group on health care reform, pursuant
to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6333.
(((14))) (12) $11,372,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the Washington assessment of student learning (WASL)
and related activities and is in addition to the funding amounts
provided in section 511 of this act. The funding provided in this
subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
office of financial management shall develop an interagency agreement
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
expenditure of these funds based on a quarterly allotment schedule.
Before releasing funds to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction each quarter, the office of financial management shall
ensure compliance with this subsection. Effective with the 2009
administration of the Washington assessment of student learning, while
maintaining the reliability and validity of the assessment, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall redesign the
assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in
all grades except high school by shortening test administration,
reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions,
and potentially decreasing the number of items utilized in the
assessment, particularly in grades tested under the requirements of the
federal no child left behind act. In selecting and developing the new
contractual obligations for the assessment contractor beginning in
fiscal year 2009, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall preserve legislative authority to set the student
learning assessment policy and potentially make minor or significant
changes to that policy in the future with the least amount of adverse
fiscal and other impacts to the state as possible. In doing this, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall advise and
consult with the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature and the Washington assessment of student learning work
group created in this subsection. Within the amounts appropriated in
this subsection, a legislative work group on the Washington assessment
of student learning is established. The work group will consist of a
maximum of nine members. Legislative members shall be appointed by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives
and shall represent the two largest caucuses of both the senate and the
house of representatives. The purpose of this work group is to review
and evaluate the current assessment system by January 1, 2009, and
potentially make recommendations to improve it. Of the amount provided
in this section, $150,000 is provided solely for costs associated with
hiring independent technical experts to advise the Washington
assessment of student learning work group created in this subsection.
(((15))) (13) Through prior legislation, many state activities that
protect the general public by safeguarding health, safety, employees,
and consumers are supported by fees assessed on items such as
licensing, registration, certification, and inspections. Moreover,
higher education, workforce training, and a number of other government
services are supported at least in part by fees assessed on those who
participate in these programs. Therefore, the office of financial
management shall conduct a review and analysis of all fees for which
the legislature has delegated to state agencies and institutions of
higher education the ability to establish and determine the amount,
either upon initial establishment or subsequent increases. Fees, as
used in this subsection, has the same meaning as used in RCW
43.135.055. The objective of the review and analysis is to document
the level of fees paid over the past five years, the cost of those
programs over that same time period, and, to the extent available, the
effectiveness of the activity in meeting its performance targets. The
review and analysis shall include the following information:
(a) Information about the program, including the statutory
authority for the program, date enacted, and the parties that benefit
from the program; and
(b) Information about the program fees, including name and
description of the fees, the parties that bear the cost of the fees,
the methodology for determining the fees, and whether the fees directly
fund the program; and
(c) Financial related information, including an assessment of the
program's fee amount assessed over the past five years, the scope of
the program and related costs over the past 5 years, and whether the
program's expenditures are subject to appropriation or allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW; and
(d) To the extent available, information on the program activities
and related performance measures that may assist in assessing the
effectiveness of the program in achieving its goals.
The office of financial management shall report its findings to the
governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1,
2008.

Sec. 129 2008 c 329 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,703,000))
$32,702,000

Sec. 130 2008 c 329 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,618,000))
$23,587,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,780,000))
$1,776,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,494,000))
$25,459,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

Sec. 131 2008 c 329 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,086,000))
$26,075,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may not
be expended by the Washington state lottery for any purpose associated
with a lottery game offered through any interactive electronic device,
including the internet.

Sec. 132 2008 c 329 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($422,000))
$417,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($683,000))
$678,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
commission to engage a contractor to conduct a detailed analysis of the
achievement gap for Hispanic students; recommend a comprehensive plan
for closing the achievement gap pursuant to goals under the federal no
child left behind act for all groups of students to meet academic
standards by 2014; and identify performance measures to monitor
adequate yearly progress. The contractor shall conduct the analysis
starting with the call to action paper by the multi-ethnic think tank
and as guided by the Latino/a educational achievement project and other
appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit a study update by
September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by December 30, 2008, to
the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board
of education, the P-20 council, the basic education finance task force,
and the education committees of the legislature.

Sec. 133 2008 c 329 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,000))
$257,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($519,000))
$514,000

Sec. 134 2008 c 329 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000))
$126,000
Dependent Care Administrative Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,556,000))
$48,419,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,243,000))
$48,982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1261 (duty disability service credit). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $43,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1680
(emergency medical technician service credit). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $72,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1649 (judges' past service credit purchases). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $33,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1262 (plan 1 post retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $315,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed House
Bill No. 2391 (gainsharing revisions). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $12,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5014 (contribution rates). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $17,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5175 (retirement annual increases). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($250,000)) $126,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to design a plan
for the operation of a universal voluntary retirement accounts program,
and then seek approval from the federal internal revenue service to
offer the plan to workers and employers in Washington on a tax
qualified basis. Features of Washington voluntary retirement accounts
plan include a defined contribution plan with a limited pre-selected
menu of investment options, administration by the department of
retirement systems, investment oversight by the state investment board,
tax-deferred payroll deductions, retirement account portability between
jobs, and a two-tier system with workplace based individual retirement
accounts open to all workers, and a deferred compensation 401(k)-type
program or SIMPLE IRA-type program open to all employers who choose to
participate for their employees. As part of this process, the director
shall consult with the department of financial institutions, the state
investment board, private sector retirement plan administrators and
providers and other relevant sectors of the financial services
industry, organizations promoting increased economic opportunities for
individuals, employers, workers, and any other individuals or entities
that the director determines relevant to the development of an
effective and efficient method for implementing and operating the
program. As part of this process, the director shall evaluate the most
efficient methods for providing this service and ways to avoid
competition with existing private sector vehicles. The director shall
undertake the legal and development work to determine how to implement
a universal voluntary retirement accounts program, managed through the
department of retirement systems directly or by contract. By December
1, 2008, the director shall report to the legislature on the program's
design and any required changes to state law that are necessary to
implement the program.
(9) $81,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed House Bill No. 2887 (judges' service credit purchases). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $51,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
House Bill No. 3019 (partial year service credit for school district
employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to contract with a skilled facilitator to
mediate discussions to identify and document all outstanding issues
related to the funding of retiree medical benefits in the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and
for staff resources to be used to conduct research in support of this
effort. The stakeholder group shall include representatives of retired
members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1, local government employers, the department of retirement
systems, and other groups as deemed necessary by the director of the
department of retirement systems.

Sec. 135 2008 c 329 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,951,000))
$103,217,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,788,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,900,000))
$3,000,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($216,392,000))
$212,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for the implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 1002 (taxation of vessels). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1891
(prescription drugs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(3)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to conduct a study of the taxation
of electronically delivered products. The legislature recognizes that
chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007,
relates to specific types of electronically delivered products and does
not address the taxation of numerous other types of electronically
delivered products. Therefore, a policy question remains concerning
the sales and use taxation of other electronically delivered products.
(b)(i) To perform the study, the department of revenue shall be
assisted by a committee. The committee shall include four legislative
members appointed as follows:
(A) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate; and
(B) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The department of revenue shall appoint additional members
with balanced representation from different segments of government and
industry, and shall consider representation from the following areas:
Small and large businesses that generate, deliver, or use
electronically delivered products; financial institutions; insurers;
persons with expertise in tax law in an academic or private sector
setting; and persons experienced in working with computers and
electronically delivered products. The department of revenue shall
appoint additional members from the department with expertise in the
excise taxation of electronically delivered products.
(iii) The committee shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(iv) The department and committee shall review the following
issues: The provision of explicit statutory definitions for
electronically delivered products; the current excise tax treatment of
electronically delivered products in the state of Washington and other
states as well as the tax treatment of these products under the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement; the administration, costs, and
potential recipients of the tax exemptions provided in chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007; and
alternatives to the excise taxation of electronically delivered
products.
(v) Legislative members of the committee are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the committee, except those representing an employer or organization,
are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The department shall report its preliminary findings and
recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 30, 2007. The department shall provide the final report of
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by September 1, 2008.
(4) (($1,250,000)) $250,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6809 (working families tax
exemption). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
in this subsection shall lapse. This subsection does not constitute
approval of the exemption under section 2, chapter . . . (ESSB 6809),
Laws of 2008 or authorize payments of remittances.
(5) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
3104 (domestic partnerships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 136 2008 c 329 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,333,000))
$24,332,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,500,000 of the state investment board expense account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development of an investment data
warehouse. This funding is intended to replace existing funding from
nonbudgeted funds, with the intent that further expenditures for this
project be made only by appropriation.
(2) $1,791,000 of the state investment board expense account is for
compensation and incentives for investment officers. Of this amount,
$852,000 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 3149 (state investment board personnel compensation). The state
investment board shall include funding for any future salary increases
authorized under RCW 43.33A.100 in the agency's budget request
submitted in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW in advance of granting
related salary increases. The biennial salary survey required under
RCW 43.33A.100 shall also be provided to the office of financial
management and to the fiscal committees of the legislature as part of
the state investment board's biennial budget submittal.

Sec. 137 2008 c 329 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,502,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,354,000))
$1,343,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,856,000))
$2,845,000

Sec. 138 2008 c 329 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $847,000
City and Town Research Services -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,458,000))
$4,457,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,730,000))
$5,729,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 3274 (port district
contracting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 139 2008 c 329 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,615,000))
$3,614,000

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is subject to the
following conditions and limitations: $19,000 of the OMWBE enterprise
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (linked deposit program).

Sec. 140 2008 c 329 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($590,000))
$557,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,651,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,929,000))
$36,893,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,761,000))
$41,692,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the temporary emergency food
assistance program.
(2) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1332 (affordable
housing).
(3) $391,000 of the general administration services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of costs associated with the planning of agency moves
out of the general administration building.
(4) The department shall work with the office of financial
management to develop a plan that balances revenues and expenditures
for each line of business within the general administration services
account. State agency rates developed for the 2009-2011 biennium must
equitably and reasonably reflect the actual cost of services provided
to state agencies including the appropriate allocation of agency
overhead costs. By August 31, 2008, the department shall submit to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature financial statements for each line of business that shall
inform the basis for agency rate development for the forthcoming
biennium.
(5) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature that responds
to each of the state auditor's motor pool audit recommendations by
August 31, 2008. This report shall consist of recommendations that
have been adopted by the department, progress made towards achieving
those recommendations not yet completed, and justification for why the
department is unable to fulfill any of the recommendations in the
report.

Sec. 141 2008 c 329 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,762,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,623,000))
$3,416,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,920,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $698,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,377,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,075,000))
$15,868,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($2,340,000)) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to connect
eastern state hospital to the integrated hospital information system,
which is intended to improve operations and allow greater interactions
between the hospital and community clinics, including electronic
transmission of inpatient data to outpatient clinics that will provide
care following discharge. Connection to this network will allow
consultation with specialists and provide access to training for staff.
Prior to any purchase of goods or services, a feasibility plan must be
approved by the information services board.
(2) (($1,250,000)) $1,151,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to support the
operations of the digital learning commons.
(3) $1,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($338,000)) $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an
evaluation of the information technology infrastructure capacity for
institutions operated by the department of social and health services,
department of veterans affairs, and department of corrections. The
evaluation will detail the status of the participating institutions'
infrastructure and recommend an improvement strategy that includes the
use of electronic medical records. The department shall report back to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on its findings by
January 1, 2009.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($250,000)) $120,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into
the data processing revolving account.
(5) $195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6438 (internet deployment/adoption),
including sections 1 through 5 of the bill. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 142 2008 c 329 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,564,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,442,000))
$45,404,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,006,000))
$46,968,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $464,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5717 (market conduct oversight). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $71,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
section 17 (reduce health care administrative costs) in accordance with
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care). If the
section is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $286,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
insurance commissioner to convene a work group of health care
providers, carriers, and payers, to identify and develop strategies to
achieve savings through streamlining administrative requirements and
procedures, as recommended in the report submitted pursuant to section
17, chapter 259, Laws of 2007. By December 1, 2008, the commissioner
shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature that
identifies the five highest priority goals for achieving significant
efficiencies and reducing health care administrative costs, and a plan
to accomplish these goals.

Sec. 143 2008 c 329 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,575,000))
$2,574,000

Sec. 144 2008 c 329 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,441,000))
$5,387,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase license fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055.

Sec. 145 2008 c 329 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,910,000
((General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,912,000))
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,430,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($194,799,000))
$194,556,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($212,051,000))
$209,896,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $91,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5859 (retail liquor licenses). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $2,070,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to operate an
additional 29 state stores on Sundays by September 1, 2007. The board
shall determine the impacts on sales as a result of operating the
additional stores on Sunday. In doing so, the liquor control board
shall also examine the sales of state and contract liquor stores in
proximity to those stores opened on Sundays to determine whether Sunday
openings have reduced the sales of other state and contract liquor
stores that are not open on Sundays. The board shall present this
information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 31, 2009.

Sec. 146 2008 c 329 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,042,000))
$1,041,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and
reserve officers' administrative account appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 1475 (additional board members). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 147 2008 c 329 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,118,000))
$31,071,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,167,000))
$3,163,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,535,000))
$1,533,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,980,000))
$35,927,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 81.66.030, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the costs of regulating the companies transporting
persons with special needs shall be borne by those companies. For each
company or class of companies covered by RCW 81.66.030, the commission
shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of
supervising and regulating the companies or classes of companies.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if
the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of supervision and
regulation.
(2) In accordance with RCW 81.70.350, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of regulating charter party carrier and
excursion service carriers shall be borne by those entities. For each
charter party carrier and excursion service carrier covered by RCW
81.70.350, the commission shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully
cover the cost of supervising and regulating such carriers. Pursuant
to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the commission
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the program's
supervision and regulation.
(3) The general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is
provided solely to conduct a survey to identify factors preventing the
widespread availability and use of broadband technologies. The survey
must collect and interpret reliable geographic, demographic, cultural,
and telecommunications technology information to identify broadband
disparities in the state. The commission shall consult appropriate
stakeholders in designing the survey. The names and identification
data of any person, household, or business participating in the survey
are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW. The
commission shall report its finding to the appropriate legislative
committees by December 31, 2007.

Sec. 148 2008 c 329 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,195,000))
$11,353,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,336,000))
$129,334,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,293,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,454,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,757,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $814,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,443,000))
$309,599,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $24,454,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $86,757,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) $556,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $1,269,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $61,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall implement Substitute House Bill No. 1507 (uniformed service
shared leave).
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the military department to
contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to operate a
statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the entire amount
for 2-1-1 and shall not take any of the funds for administrative
purposes.
(6) $200,000 of the enhanced 911 account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to recommend an appropriate funding
mechanism for the implementation of next generation 911. The
department shall consult with the utilities and transportation
commission, the department of revenue, local governments, and
representatives from companies providing telecommunications services in
order to complete the report required under this subsection. The
department may also consult with other public safety and medical
associations in order to complete the study. The department shall
submit the report to the finance committee and the technology, energy,
and communications committee of the house of representatives, and the
ways and means committee and the water, energy, and telecommunications
committee of the senate, by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 149 2008 c 329 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,247,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,296,000))
$3,180,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,287,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,830,000))
$9,714,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $112,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $107,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (higher education
exempt employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 150 2008 c 329 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,114,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,755,000))
$1,541,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,641,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,524,000))
$4,310,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2115 (heritage barn preservation). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) (($571,000)) $368,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 and $500,000 of the nonappropriated skeletal human
remains assistance account are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2624 (human remains). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to conduct a preliminary assessment to
determine the feasibility of seeking federal heritage area designation
for Washington state's maritime regions. The department shall
establish an advisory committee for the study. The department shall
submit a report of the preliminary assessment findings to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and to the
governor by January 1, 2010.

Sec. 151 2008 c 329 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,893,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,928,000))
$1,878,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,821,000))
$3,771,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2008 c 329 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,353,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,840,000))
$338,197,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($489,938,000))
$490,314,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,251,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,298,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,169,989,000))
$1,162,722,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($3,063,000)) $2,993,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the category
of services titled "intensive family preservation services."
(2) $945,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,020 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $429,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase services provided through children's
advocacy centers.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(10) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1472 (child welfare).
(11) $858,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $809,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5774
(background checks), including sections 6 and 7. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $4,962,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $9,548,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a statewide automated child welfare information system.
(13) $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $55,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5321 (child
welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $680,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $594,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1334 (child welfare proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $2,237,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,918,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $118,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1287
(foster children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy to study evidence-based,
cost-effective programs and policies to reduce the likelihood of
children entering and remaining in the child welfare system, including
both prevention and intervention programs. If the department does not
receive $100,000 in matching funds from a private organization for the
purpose of conducting this study, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The study shall be completed by April 30,
2008. The department shall cooperate with the institute in
facilitating access to data in their administrative systems. The board
of the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust the due
date for this project as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(18) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $407,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $48,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1131 (passport to college). This includes funding to develop,
implement, and administer a program of educational transition planning
for youth in foster care as specified in the bill. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) The department shall continue spending levels for continuum of
care in region one at the same level allotted during the 2005-2007
biennium.
(20) Within the amounts provided, the department shall develop and
implement a two-tiered reimbursement rate schedule for children from
birth through twenty-four months of age and children twenty-five months
of age through age five served by the medicaid treatment child care
program. The department shall work in collaboration with contracted
providers of the program to develop the rate schedule, taking into
consideration such factors as higher staff level and small group size
requirements for each age group. The department shall implement the
rate schedule no later than January 1, 2008, and neither reimbursement
rate in the two-tiered schedule shall be lower than the reimbursement
rate level from the 2007 fiscal year.
(21) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1624 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 384, Laws of 2007.
(23) The department shall work with the exclusive bargaining
representative for the children's administration social workers to
prioritize social worker tasks and devise methods by which to alleviate
from the social workers' workload lower priority tasks. Discussions on
methods shall include the use of contracting services and home support
specialists. The department and the bargaining representative shall
jointly report their efforts to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by submitting a progress report no later than July 1, 2008,
and a final report by November 15, 2008.
(24) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
largest nonprofit organization in the state conducting education and
outreach on RCW 13.34.360, the safety of newborn children law.
(25) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $184,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to contract with medical professionals for
comprehensive safety assessments of high-risk families. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. $400,000 of this amount is for comprehensive safety
assessments for families receiving in-home child protective services or
family voluntary services. $400,000 of this amount is for
comprehensive safety assessments of families with an infant age birth
to fifteen days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance
exposed and the department received an intake referral related to the
infant due to the substance exposure.
(((28))) (26) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $29,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the department to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6206 (child fatality). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((29))) (27) $857,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 3145 (foster parent licensing). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((30))) (28) $415,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $264,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the hiring of staff to expedite
the phase-in of the state's policy of a private and individual face-to-face visit each month with children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies and their caregivers.
(((31))) (29) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement sections 2 and 3 of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term well-being). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((32))) (30) The appropriations in this section provide specific
funds to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6792
(dependency matters).
(((35))) (31) $812,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire additional
staff to perform child health education and tracking screens.
(((37))) (32) $1,829,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 and $578,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with
nonprofit organizations to facilitate twice-monthly visits between
siblings living apart from each other in out-of-home care.

Sec. 202 2008 c 329 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,822,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,715,000))
$83,791,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,662,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,898,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,414,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,975,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,078,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($234,445,000))
$229,521,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $353,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice
assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,078,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,078,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation and $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended
to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services
(CJS) formula.
(3) $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and $2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided
in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,506,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $2,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($3,066,000)) $2,299,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to
county juvenile courts for the following programs identified by the
Washington state institute for public policy (institute) in its October
2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future
Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates":
Functional family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression
replacement training and interagency coordination programs or other
programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's
report. County juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration for funding for program-specific
participation and the administration shall provide grants to the courts
consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the
institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,287,000)) $787,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for expansion of
the following treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation
administration programs identified by the Washington state institute
for public policy in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public
Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice
Costs and Crime Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family
integrated transitions and aggression replacement training. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide a
block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile
services funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition to county juvenile courts, or groups of courts,
including the Pierce county juvenile court. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall
jointly write criteria for awarding and administering block grants to
county juvenile courts. In developing the criteria, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall seek
the advice of the Washington state institute for public policy. The
criteria shall address, but not be limited to:
(a) The selection of courts for participation in the block grant;
(b) The types of evidence-based programs and practices to which the
funds will be applied. The evidence-based programs and practices shall
either be consistent with those cost-beneficial options identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy in its October 2006
report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates," or be new
approaches that have the potential to demonstrate positive returns for
the taxpayer; and
(c) The protocols for participating courts to collect information
on the effectiveness of programs funded under the block grant,
including: (i) Developing intermediate client outcomes based on the
risk assessment tool currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration; (ii)
reporting treatment outcomes including a process evaluation to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council by
June 20, 2008, and an outcome evaluation of recidivism and benefit-cost
results submitted within eighteen months of the initiation of the
treatment, when follow-up data are available. The courts shall develop
these evaluations in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy; and (iii) documenting the process for
managing block grant funds on a quarterly basis and provide this report
to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy
council.
(8) $73,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $98,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 203 2008 c 329 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($305,747,000))
$305,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($328,783,000))
$303,162,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($382,032,000))
$395,388,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,157,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,032,719,000))
$1,020,439,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $103,989,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and (($104,080,000)) $118,528,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. ((These
funds)) Fiscal year 2009 rate reductions shall be distributed
proportionally to each regional support network's percentage of the
total state population. To the extent possible, levels of regional
support network spending shall be maintained in the following priority
order: (i) Crisis and commitment services; (ii) community inpatient
services; and (iii) residential care services, including personal care
and emergency housing assistance.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for development and initial implementation
of high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams,
and other proven program approaches that the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2008. Beginning January 1, 2009, the number of
nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at
eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic
beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 777 per day during the first and second quarters of
fiscal year 2008, and 677 per day from January 2008 through August
2008. Beginning September 2008, the number of nonforensic beds
allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 647 per day until May 2009, at which time the bed
allocation shall be 617 beds per day. Beginning January 2008, beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. Beginning that month, the department shall
separately charge regional support networks for persons served in the
PALS program.
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(f) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement. The department is authorized to transfer up
to $418,000 of these amounts each fiscal year to the economic services
program for purposes of facilitating prompt access after their release
from confinement to medical and income assistance services for which
defendants and offenders may be eligible.
(g) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,500,000)) $1,091,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants for
innovative mental health service delivery projects. Such projects may
include, but are not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for
integrated health care and behavioral health services for general
assistance recipients. These amounts shall supplement, and not
supplant, local or other funding currently being used for activities
funded under the projects authorized in this subsection. The
department shall not terminate early any grant that was contracted
under this subsection prior to January 1, 2009, for the use of funds
during fiscal year 2009.
(h) The department is authorized to continue to expend federal
block grant funds and special purpose federal grants through direct
contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks, and to allocate such funds through such formulas as it shall
adopt.
(i) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(j) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(k) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(((l) $2,981,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $3,248,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $2,016,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to modify the department's proposed
new payment rates for medicaid inpatient psychiatric services. Under
the department's proposed rate system, effective August 1, 2007, each
hospital's inpatient psychiatric payment rate would have been set at a
percentage of that hospital's estimated per diem cost for psychiatric
inpatient care during the most recent rebasing year. Within the amount
provided in this subsection (1)(m), beginning August 1, 2007, each
hospital's inpatient psychiatric payment rate shall instead be set at
the greater of a percentage of: (i) The hospital's estimated per diem
cost for psychiatric inpatient care during the most recent rebasing
year; or (ii) the statewide average per diem cost for psychiatric
inpatient care during the most recent rebasing year, adjusted for
regional wage differences and for differences in medical education
costs. At least thirty days prior to implementing adjustments to
regional support network medicaid capitation rates and nonmedicaid
allocations to account for changes in psychiatric inpatient payment
rates, the department shall report on the proposed adjustments to the
appropriations committee of the house of representatives and the ways
and means committee of the senate.
(m) $6,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $6,462,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase nonmedicaid
psychiatric inpatient payment rates over fiscal year 2005 levels. It
is expected that nonmedicaid rates will be set at approximately 85
percent of each hospital's medicaid psychiatric inpatient rate. At
least thirty days prior to implementing adjustments to regional support
network medicaid capitation rates and nonmedicaid allocations to
account for changes in psychiatric inpatient payment rates, the
department shall report on the proposed adjustments to the
appropriations committee of the house of representatives and the ways
and means committee of the senate.
(n) $7,396,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $15,146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $13,927,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase regional support network
medicaid capitation rates, or fee-for-service rates paid instead of
those capitation rates, and nonmedicaid allocations by 3.0 percent
effective July 1, 2007, and by an additional 3.0 percent effective July
1, 2008. The federal portion of these rate increases is contingent
upon federal approval. (i) The legislature intends and expects that
regional support networks and community mental health agencies will use
at least 67 percent of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(o)
to increase compensation for direct care personnel above and beyond
usual and customary wage increases. To this end, regional support
networks shall report to the department by October 15, 2007, on planned
uses of the rate increases within their network area. The report shall
describe the direct care job classifications to which increases are to
be provided; the number of full-time equivalent personnel employed in
each classification; the annualized dollar and percentage increases to
be provided each classification; the annualized dollar value of the
direct care compensation increases provided, in total and as a
percentage of the total rate increase; and the number of personnel in
each job classification covered by a collective bargaining agreement.
The department shall summarize and analyze the regional plans, and
report findings, options, and recommendations to the legislature by
December 1, 2007. (ii) Regional support networks shall maintain
documentation of how the rate increases have been applied. Such
documentation shall be subject to audit by the department. (iii) For
purposes of this subsection (1)(o), "direct care staff" means persons
employed by community mental health agencies whose primary
responsibility is providing direct treatment and support to people with
mental illness, or whose primary responsibility is providing direct
support to such staff in areas such as client scheduling, client
intake, client reception, client records-keeping, and facilities
maintenance. In agencies that provide both mental health and chemical
dependency services, nonmedicaid funds may also be used for
compensation increases for direct care staff whose primary
responsibility is direct care and treatment for people with chemical
dependency problems.
(o) $2,021,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,683,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1456 (mental health professionals). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. For purposes of organizing and delivering
training as required by the bill, the department may retain up to
fifteen percent of the amount appropriated for fiscal year 2008, and up
to ten percent of the amount appropriated for fiscal year 2009. The
remainders shall be distributed to regional support networks
proportional to each network's percentage of the total state
population.
(p))) (l) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($3,031,000)) $2,881,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,289,000 of the general
fund--private/local appropriation are provided solely to enable the
department to contract with Pierce county human services for the
provision of community mental health services to include crisis triage,
evaluation and treatment, and mobile crisis services. The legislature
intends this to be one-time funding while a replacement regional
support network is being secured. The department is authorized to
reserve $402,000 general fund--state and $201,000 general fund--local
of these amounts for reasonable costs incurred by Pierce county for the
provision of mental health crisis and related services that exceed
reimbursement levels contracted by the department. In order to receive
these funds, Pierce county must demonstrate to the department that the
total cost of mental health services provided by the county in
accordance with formal agreements has exceeded the revenues received
from the department and third-party payers for these services. The
department shall determine the documentation that is required.
(((q))) (m) $504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to reimburse
Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day
commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.
(((r))) (n) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Spokane
regional support network to implement a comprehensive plan for reducing
its utilization of eastern state hospital. Key elements of the plan,
which shall be developed and implemented in consultation with and with
the assistance of the department, may include but shall not be limited
to development of additional crisis triage, crisis stabilization, and
evaluation and treatment beds; provision of housing assistance for
high-utilizers of hospital and jail services who are at risk of
homelessness; implementation of an intensive outpatient treatment team
for persons with co-occurring disorders and other special needs; and
delivery of respite care to assist elderly individuals avoid or return
home after hospitalization. Spokane regional support shall receive a
proportional share of the fiscal year 2009 nonmedicaid rate reduction
out of its base funding distribution.
(((s) $6,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for regional support networks to
increase and improve delivery of nonmedicaid services. These funds
shall be distributed to regional support networks, other than Spokane
and Pierce county, proportional to each network's share of total
population among those networks.
(t) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to assist nongovernmental mental health
agencies in Pierce county with start-up and other extraordinary
administrative costs required by the conversion from a capitated to a
unit fee-based service delivery and billing system.))

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,340,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,973,000))
$129,272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,602,000))
$145,552,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,302,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($489,275,000))
$486,524,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(c) $18,575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to operate on a temporary basis
five additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals.
(d) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for safety training and for
protective equipment for staff at eastern and western state hospitals.
Protective equipment shall include shields, helmets, gloves, and body
protection.
(e) $304,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(e)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(f) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to pilot a direct care nurse
staffing plan for two high incident wards at eastern state hospital and
four high incident wards at western state hospital. The pilot provides
funding to fully staff registered nurses, licensed practical nurses,
and mental health technicians in accordance with the state psychiatric
hospitals direct care staffing review and recommendations. The
department shall have the authority to fill the positions with any mix
of these direct care nursing staff so long as a good faith effort is
made to first hire and recruit positions in accordance with the direct
care nurse staffing plan. The department shall monitor outcomes for
improved patient and staff safety and provide a written report to the
legislature by October 1, 2009.
(g) $617,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $334,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to cover additional operating
costs related to the October 11, 2007, laundry fire at western state
hospital.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,917,000))
$1,892,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,319,000))
$2,269,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,512,000))
$7,437,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,189,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 4, 7,
10, and other provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088
(children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds are
also appropriated in sections 207 and 209 of this act for
implementation of 5, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1088.
(((c))) (b) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $80,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely as one-time funding to make available a mental
health train the trainer first aid course consisting of twelve hours of
instruction based upon a program created by the department of
psychiatry, University of Melbourne in Australia. The course will
provide training to members of the public related to: (i) Giving
appropriate initial help and support to a person suffering from a
mental disorder and responding to mental health crisis situations; and
(ii) depression, anxiety disorders, psychosis, and substance use
disorder, including recognizing symptoms, possible causes or risk
factors, and evidenced-based treatment options. Participants in the
first aid course will train others to provide the training.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,177,000))
$4,500,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,557,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,700,000))
$17,023,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), to build upon the evaluation of the impacts
of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders), and to assess
program outcomes and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health
pilot projects as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(((c))) (b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with
a facilitator to coordinate a review and make recommendations on:
(i) Ward sizes at eastern and western state hospitals and patient
case mix by ward;
(ii) Discharge practices for state hospitals to include the child
and study treatment center; and
(iii) Community placements to include placements for adults and
children.
By October 15, 2008, the department shall provide to the
legislature recommendations for system improvement to include a
cost/benefit analysis. The department shall include representation
from regional support networks in the review and development of
recommendations for discharge practices and community placements.

Sec. 204 2008 c 329 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,327,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($380,811,000))
$362,290,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($636,595,000))
$653,680,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,366,637,000))
$1,365,201,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, $615,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $892,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$2,546,011 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $532.00 in
fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 in fiscal year 2009.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $4,903,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $9,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $15,016,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are at risk of institutionalization or who are aging out
of other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based
waiver program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate
need for increased services. First priority shall be given to children
who are at risk of institutionalization. The department shall ensure
that the average cost per day for all program services other than
start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the number
of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver
programs, the department will strive to limit new client placement
expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be
accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess funds,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(d) $2,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,961,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,849,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for
(i) clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (iii) clients participating in the community
protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis diversion
outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$349 in fiscal year 2008 and $356 in fiscal year 2009. In order to
maximize the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness
of the waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds if the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall implement the four new
waiver programs such that decisions about enrollment levels and the
amount, duration, and scope of services maintain expenditures within
appropriations. The department shall electronically report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(e) $13,198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $16,354,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,579,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for family support programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities. Of the amounts provided
in this subsection (e), $696,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are for state-only services
for individuals with developmental disabilities, as described in Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). By
January 1, 2008, and by November 1, 2008, the department shall provide
a status report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the individual and family services program for people
with developmental disabilities, which shall include the following
information: The number of applicants for funding; the total number of
awards; the number and amount of both annual and one-time awards,
broken down by household income levels; and the purpose of the awards.
(f) $1,692,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $3,645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $2,397,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients. The
legislature finds that some waiver clients are not receiving employment
services that are authorized under their waivers. Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, waiver clients must receive services as
authorized by their waiver, such as pathway to employment, while
waiting for paid employment to be developed. The department shall work
with the counties to establish a consistent proposed policy for minimum
direct service hours for clients, minimum hours of support, time frames
for seeking paid employment, and services provided under pathway to
employment while paid employment is sought. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on this proposal by November 1, 2008,
including estimated fiscal impacts and an option for making the policy
budget neutral for the current level of clients served. In order to
maximize the number of clients served, the department may serve
additional nonwaiver clients with unspent funds for waiver clients,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated.
(g) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(h)(i) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent for boarding homes,
effective July 1, 2007, including those currently receiving exceptional
care rates; and by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, for adult
family homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates.
(ii) The department shall implement phase one of full
implementation of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community
residential providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are
sufficient to increase adult family home provider payment rates on
average, effective July 1, 2008, including those currently receiving
exceptional care rates, and to adjust adult family home rates for the
first phase of a seventeen CARE level payment system. Effective July
1, 2008, the provider payment rate allocation for boarding homes
contracted as assisted living shall be the provider's June 30, 2008,
payment rate allocation, and the provider payment rate for boarding
homes contracted as ARCs and EARCs shall be adjusted to reflect phase
one of a seventeen CARE level payment system. This will be in effect
until such time as the rates are consistent between adult family homes
and boarding homes for delivery of the same patient care levels.
(iii) Amounts provided in this section and in section 206 of this
act are sufficient to assist adult family home providers with the cost
of paying liability insurance.
(i) $921,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $963,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development and implementation of a federal
home and community-based care waiver to provide intensive behavior
support services to up to one hundred children with developmental
disabilities who have intense behaviors, and their families.
(i) To receive services under the waiver, the child must have a
developmental disability and: (A) Meet an acuity measure, as
determined by the department, indicating that the child is at high risk
of needing an out-of-home placement; (B) be eligible for developmental
disabilities services and a home and community-based care waiver
program; (C) reside in his or her family home or temporarily in an
out-of-home placement with a plan to return home; and (D) have family
that demonstrates the willingness to participate in the services
offered through the waiver, and is not subject to a pending child
protective services referral.
(ii) The department shall authorize, contract for, and evaluate the
provision of intensive in-home services that support the ability of the
child to remain at home with their parents or relatives. Intensive
behavior support services under the waiver shall be provided directly
or by contract, and may include, but are not limited to: (A) Behavior
consultation and management, therapies and respite care; (B) minor home
or motor vehicle modifications and transportation; (C) specialized
nutrition and clothing; (D) training of families and other individuals
working with the child; and (E) inclusion in community activities.
(j) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the purpose of settling all claims in
the Washington Federation of State Employees, et. al v. State of
Washington, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 05-2-02422-4. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the release of all
claims in this case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection (j). If settlement is not executed by
June 30, 2008, the appropriation in this subsection (j) shall lapse.
(k) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall review current infant-toddler early intervention services
statewide and report to the office of financial management by November
1, 2008, and the appropriate committees of the legislature on a
recommended consistent funding approach per child for the 2009-11
biennium, recognizing the new level of funding anticipated by school
district participation. The recommendations must also include a budget
neutral option for the current level of clients served.
(l) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for state-only employment services for
young adults with developmental disabilities who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation.
(m) The department shall transfer all medicaid qualified
individuals who currently receive services under the existing state-only employment and day program to the basic waiver. The department
shall ensure that all individuals currently receiving services under
the state-only employment and day program who are not transferred to
the basic waiver will continue to receive services under this program.
(n) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
adult day health services.
(o) The department shall adopt emergency rules to redefine in-home
personal benefits based on client assessment data. Clients whose
assessments demonstrate they are able to manage their own plan of care
shall be eligible for personal care through an individual provider.
Clients whose assessments demonstrate the need for assistance with
managing their plan of care shall be eligible for personal care through
agency providers or an individual provider if they have someone to
assist them in managing their plan of care.
(p) The department shall implement phase one of the full
implementation of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community
residential providers. The department shall reduce fiscal year 2009
payment levels by 3.0 percent for boarding homes, boarding homes
contracted as assisted living, and adult family homes, including any
residential provider currently receiving exceptional care rates.
(q) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
subsidies to clients of residential habilitation center professional
providers to support the treatment of developmentally disabled clients
who do not reside in a residential habilitation center, but shall not
expand eligibility for these services.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,668,000))
$69,825,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($172,332,000))
$179,338,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,203,000))
$21,629,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($361,286,000))
$356,875,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for services provided to community
clients provided by licensed professionals at the state rehabilitation
centers. The division shall submit claims for reimbursement for
services provided to clients living in the community to medical
assistance or third-party health care coverage, as appropriate, and
shall implement a system for billing clients without coverage.
(c) $642,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,328,000))
$2,302,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,812,000))
$2,788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,402,000))
$7,352,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: As part of the needs assessment
instrument, the department shall collect data on family income for
minor children with developmental disabilities and all individuals who
are receiving state-only funded services. The department shall ensure
that this information is collected as part of the client assessment
process.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,841,000

Sec. 205 2008 c 329 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($753,881,000))
$707,620,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,534,175,000))
$1,569,187,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,525,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,212,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,015,461,000))
$3,004,212,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $10,456,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
$11,370,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009, and $26,778,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers
who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a
week. The state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
eligible participating worker per month shall be no greater than
$532.00 in fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 per month in fiscal year 2009.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $159.34 for
fiscal year 2008 and shall not exceed (($165.04)) $163.72 for fiscal
year 2009, including the rate add-on described in subsection (9) of
this section. For all nursing facilities, the direct care, therapy
care, support services, and operations component rates established in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions solely by 3.2 percent effective July 1, 2007((. For all
nursing facilities, adjustments for economic trends and conditions
effective July 1, 2008, shall be as specified in subsection (10)(c) of
this section)), and by 1.99 percent effective July 1, 2008; adjustment
factors for economic trends and conditions from prior fiscal years
shall not be accumulated. There shall be no additional adjustment to
the July 1, 2007, or the July 1, 2008, rates established in accordance
with chapter 74.46 RCW for economic trends and conditions. The
economic trends and conditions factors defined in this act shall not be
compounded with economic trends and conditions factors defined in any
prior biennium appropriations act.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2008; up to $16,000,000 of increased asset value
completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2009; and up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2010.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW. The department
shall not reduce and shall continue to provide adult day health
services.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(7) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $3,134,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase compensation for low-wage workers in
nursing homes beginning July 1, 2008. Within the funds provided, the
department shall provide an add-on per resident day per facility based
on the total funding divided by the total number of fiscal year 2009
medicaid patient days as forecasted by the caseload forecast council,
not to exceed $1.57. The department may reduce the level of add-on if
necessary to fit within this appropriation if the caseload forecasted
days increase from the February 2008 forecast. The add-on shall be
used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified
nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides,
housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose
statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar
year 2006, according to cost report data. The add-on may also be used
to address resulting wage compression for related job classes
immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. The
department shall implement reporting requirements and a settlement
process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(10) (($2,115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $6,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $9,152,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase nursing facility payment
rates.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $297,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $364,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $691,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to provide
funding for direct care rates required by Senate Bill No. 6629 (nursing
facility payment systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, then the amounts provided in this subsection (10)(a) shall lapse.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,818,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $1,552,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$3,526,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to fund projected increases in the weighted average nursing
facility payment rates for fiscal years 2008 and 2009 due to appeals,
client acuity, capital projects, bed changes, and other adjustments to
cost projections deemed necessary by the department.
(c) The remaining amounts provided in this subsection of $4,724,000
general fund--state for fiscal year 2009 and $4,935,000 general fund--federal are provided solely for an adjustment for economic trends and
conditions of 1.99 percent for direct care, therapy care, support
services, and operations effective July 1, 2008.
(11) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $170,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a review of the costs and benefits of a fair rental
system to reimburse capital expenditures. The department must report
its findings to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office
of financial management by July 1, 2009.
(12))) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
is authorized to expand the number of boarding homes and adult family
homes that receive exceptional care rates for persons with Alzheimer's
disease and related dementias who might otherwise require nursing home
care. The department may expand the number of licensed boarding home
facilities that specialize in caring for such conditions by up to 100
beds. Effective July 1, 2008, the department shall be authorized to
provide adult family homes that specialize in caring for such
conditions with exceptional care rates for up to 50 beds. The
department will develop standards for adult family homes to qualify for
such exceptional care rates in order to enhance consumer choice.
(((13) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $816,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2111 (adult family homes). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14))) (11) $1,212,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2055 (traumatic brain injury). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((15) Within amounts appropriated in this section and in section
205 of this act, the department of social and health services shall:
(a) Determine how geographic differences in community residential
provider payments affect provider and workforce turnover;
(b) Examine alternative community residential provider payment
systems that account for differences in direct care labor costs in
various areas of the state, including alternative peer groupings in its
payment systems that take such factors into account; and
(c) Submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
office of financial management and to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by June 30, 2008.
(16)(a) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to
increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent for boarding homes,
effective July 1, 2007, including those currently receiving exceptional
care rates; and by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, for adult
family homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates.
(b) The department shall implement phase one of full implementation
of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community residential
providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to
increase adult family home provider payment rates on average, effective
July 1, 2008, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates, and to adjust adult family home rates for the first phase of a
seventeen CARE level payment system. Effective July 1, 2008, the
provider payment rate allocation for boarding homes contracted as
assisted living shall be the provider's June 30, 2008, payment rate
allocation, and the provider payment rate for boarding homes contracted
as ARCs and EARCs shall be adjusted to reflect phase one of a seventeen
CARE level payment system. This will be in effect until such time as
the rates are consistent between adult family homes and boarding homes
for delivery of the same patient care levels.
(c) Amounts provided in this section and in section 205 of this act
are sufficient to assist adult family home providers with the cost of
paying liability insurance.
(17) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department contract for an evaluation of
training requirements for long-term care workers as generally described
in Second Substitute House Bill No. 2284 (training of care providers).
(18))) (12) The department shall implement phase one of the full
implementation of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community
residential providers. For the remainder of the fiscal year 2009, the
department shall reduce fiscal year 2009 payment levels by 3.0 percent
for boarding homes, boarding homes contracted as assisted living, and
adult family homes, including any residential provider currently
receiving exceptional care rates.
(13) The department shall contract for housing with service models,
such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service delivery and
responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by clustering hours
for clients that live in close proximity to each other.
(((19))) (14) $2,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 and $1,002,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement sections 4 and 8 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care
programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((20))) (15) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6220
(nurse delegation) or sections 11 and 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((22))) (16) Within the funds appropriated in the section, the
department shall establish one statewide hourly rate to reimburse home
care agencies for the costs related to state clients for hours worked
by direct care workers in receiving mandatory training. The statewide
hourly rate shall be based on the hourly wage paid to individual
providers plus mandatory taxes plus an adjustment based on the formula
created under RCW 74.39A.310.
(17) The department shall adopt emergency rules to redefine in-home
personal benefits based on client assessment data. Clients whose
assessments demonstrate they are able to manage their own plan of care
shall be eligible for personal care through an individual provider.
Clients whose assessments demonstrate the need for assistance with
managing their plan of care shall be eligible for personal care through
agency providers or an individual provider if they have someone to
assist them in managing their plan of care.

Sec. 206 2008 c 329 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $586,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($619,066,000))
$465,102,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,037,038,000))
$1,168,223,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,833,000))
$33,233,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,277,898,000))
$2,257,519,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $344,694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($363,284,000)) $362,304,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $733,276,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for all
components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for
the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using
state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for
needy families. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program,
the department shall:
(a) Establish a career services work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report by October 1, 2007, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2007-2009 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity;
(e) For fiscal year 2009, increase the temporary assistance for
needy families grant standard by three percent to account for increased
housing costs.
(2) Up to $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 of the amounts in subsection (1) of this section
are for the WorkFirst pathway to engagement program. The department
shall collaborate with community partners and represented staff to
identify additional services needed for WorkFirst clients in sanction
status. The department shall contract with qualified community-based
organizations to deliver such services, provided that such services are
complimentary to the work of the department and are not intended to
supplant existing staff or services. The department shall also
contract with community-based organizations for the provision of
services for WorkFirst clients who have been terminated after six
months of sanction. Contracts established pursuant to this subsection
shall have a performance-based component and shall include both
presanction termination and postsanction termination services. Clients
shall be able to choose whether or not to accept the services. The
department shall develop outcome measures for the program related to
outreach and reengagement, reduction of barriers to employment, and
client feedback and satisfaction. Nothing in this subsection is
intended to modify a collective bargaining agreement under chapter
41.80 RCW or to change the state's responsibility under chapter 41.80
RCW. The department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on program
implementation and outcomes. The department also shall report on
implementation of specialized caseloads for clients in sanction status,
including average caseload size, referral process and criteria, and
expected outcomes for specialized caseloads.
(3) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $396,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of section 8 of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1088 (children's mental health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1009 (child support schedule). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase naturalization
services. These amounts shall supplement and not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase limited English
proficiency pathway services. These amounts shall supplement and not
supplant state and federal resources currently provided by the
department for this purpose.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,782,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $6,431,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5244 (deficit reduction act). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall: (a) Increase the state supplemental payment by $1.77 per month
beginning July 1, 2007, and by an additional $1.83 per month beginning
July 1, 2008, for SSI clients who reside in nursing facilities,
residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and who receive a
personal needs allowance; and (b) decrease other state supplemental
payments.
(9) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department for the data
tracking provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6016 (workfirst program). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to award grants
to small mutual assistance associations or small community-based
organizations that contract with the department for immigrant and
refugee assistance services. The funds shall be awarded to demonstrate
the impact of providing funding for a case worker in the community
organization on the refugees' economic self-sufficiency through the
effective use of social services, and financial and medical assistance.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $850,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase the gross income limits for eligibility for
programs authorized under RCW 74.04.500 and 74.08A.120 to 200 percent
of the federal poverty level. The department shall adjust its rules
and information technology systems to make the eligibility change
effective October 1, 2008.
(14) The department, in conjunction with the House Bill No. 1290
work group, shall identify and analyze barriers preventing city,
county, and state referrals of persons potentially eligible for
expedited application processing authorized under RCW 74.09.555. The
department, in conjunction with the House Bill No. 1290 work group,
shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than November 15, 2008.
(15) $656,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to the department to increase immigration
and naturalization services. These funds shall not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(16) The department shall not increase the child care copayment for
families above 82 percent of the federal poverty level.

Sec. 207 2008 c 329 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,467,000))
$53,948,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($149,196,000))
$168,949,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,083,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,555,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,186,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,186,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,464,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,396,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($370,326,000))
$369,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,785,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers for the provision of this
program. For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the
program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) $11,113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $14,490,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $14,269,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of chemical
dependency treatment services for adult medicaid eligible and general
assistance-unemployable patients authorized under the 2005-07 biennial
appropriations act. By September 30, 2007, the department shall submit
an expenditure and program report relating to the patients receiving
treatment and other services pursuant to the funding provided in this
subsection (2), as well as to other patients receiving treatment funded
by the department. The report shall be submitted to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature. Subsequent updates to this report shall be
provided by January 31 and July 31 of each fiscal year of the 2007-09
biennium. The reports shall include, but not necessarily be limited
to, the following information: (a) The number and demographics
(including categories) of patients served; (b) geographic distribution;
(c) modality of treatment services provided (i.e. residential or
out-patient); (d) treatment completion rates; (e) funds spent; and (f)
where applicable, the estimated cost offsets in medical assistance on
a total and per patient basis.
(3) $698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $154,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion authorized under
the 2005-07 biennial appropriations act of chemical dependency
treatment services for minors who are under 200 percent of the federal
poverty level. The department shall monitor the number and type of
clients entering treatment, for purposes of determining potential cost
offsets.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
the following: (a) To continue an existing pilot program in Pierce
county limited to individuals who began chemical dependency treatment
using the prometa protocol prior to March 11, 2008; and (b) to contract
with an independent evaluator who will, to the extent possible,
evaluate the Pierce county pilot, as well as summarize other research
on the efficacy of the prometa protocol.
(5) $4,449,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment account
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6665 (crisis response), to continue existing pilot
programs and to expand the intensive crisis response pilot to Spokane
county. The continuation and expansion of the pilot programs expires
June 30, 2009. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
adult care and low-income treatment and detoxification services.
(7) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to support
the families in recovery program.
(8) The department shall not reduce and shall continue the student
employment program.
(9) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding for living allowances to clients in treatment under RCW
74.50.050.
(10) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding to drug courts for treatment.

Sec. 208 2008 c 329 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,669,581,000))
$1,534,493,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,344,748,000))
$4,439,060,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,946,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($421,762,000))
$392,857,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,883,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,447,469,000))
$8,377,788,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is at least
equivalent to the benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,111,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,110,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,591,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds
under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of the
available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share
of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively
smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal
medicaid program.
(7) $10,546,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $10,546,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $19,725,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2007-2009 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2007, and by November 1,
2008, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2008 and fiscal
year 2009, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain (a)
one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital
cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by
medical assistance; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal portion
of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under
federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established
using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims
submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the
program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a
baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total
of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid
during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program,
and (b) disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 that pertain to
fiscal year 2005. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed within two years after the end of the related fiscal year.
To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has
received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in
this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the
state when requested. $61,728,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, and
(($57,894,000)) $47,745,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section
204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, are provided solely
for state grants for the participating hospitals.
(9) $4,399,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $6,391,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $55,384,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system. The amounts are conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of section 902 of this act.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(11) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(12) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(13) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings.
(14) $1,688,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to incorporate a mental health
service component to the pilot project established pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section. Addition of the mental health service
component authorized in this subsection is contingent upon the managed
care contractor or the participating counties providing, alone or in
combination, matching funds in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to
one-ninth of the amounts appropriated in this subsection. The mental
health service component may include care coordination, mental health
services, and integrated medical and mental health service delivery for
general assistance clients with mental health disorders, as well as
primary care provider training and education. The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2009, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality
measures associated with the pilot projects during calendar year 2007
and 2008. To the extent possible, the report shall address any impact
that the mental health services component has had upon clients' use of
medical services, including but not limited to primary care physician's
visits, emergency room utilization, and prescription drug utilization.
(15) $341,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,054,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,461,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1201 (foster care youth medical). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(16) $6,728,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $8,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D prescription drug copayment
coverage in accordance with chapter 3, Laws of 2007 (part D copayment
drug program).
(17) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
financial impact associated with continuing to cover brand name
medications versus the same medication in its generic form. The study
shall account for all rebates paid to the state on each product studied
up until the point where the generic form is less expensive, net of
federally required rebates. The department shall submit its report to
the legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2007.
(18) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($268,000)) $134,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the first
two years of a four-year project by the Seattle-King county health
department to improve management of symptoms and reduce complications
related to asthma among medicaid eligible children. The department
shall contract with the Seattle-King county health department to have
trained community health workers visit medicaid eligible children in
their homes to identify and reduce exposure to asthma triggers, improve
clients' self-management skills, and coordinate clients' care with
their primary care and specialty providers. The contract shall include
an evaluation of the impact of the services provided under the contract
on urgent physician's visits, emergency room utilization, and inpatient
hospitalization.
(19) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($2,871,000)) $1,624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development
and implementation of an outreach program as provided in chapter 5,
Laws of 2007 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093, health services
for children).
(a) By December 15, 2007, the department shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress of
implementing the following activities:
(i) Feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system;
(ii) Development of data linkages with the office of superintendent
of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch enrollment
information and the department of early learning for child care subsidy
program enrollment information;
(iii) Informing insurers and providers when their enrollees'
eligibility is going to expire so insurers and providers can help
families reenroll;
(iv) Outreach contracts with local governmental entities, community
based organizations, and tribes;
(v) Results of data sharing with outreach contractors, and other
contracted entities such as local governments, community-based
organizations, tribes, health care providers, and insurers to engage,
enroll, and reenroll identified children;
(vi) Results of efforts to maximize federal matching funds,
wherever possible; and
(vii) Plans for sustaining outreach programs proven to be
successful.
(b)(i) Within the amounts provided under this subsection (19),
sufficient funding is provided to the department to develop and
implement in conjunction with the employment security department a plan
that would:
(A) Allow applicants and recipients of unemployment insurance to
request assistance with obtaining health coverage for household
members; and
(B) Authorize the exchange of information between the employment
security department and the department of social and health services to
more efficiently determine eligibility for health coverage under
chapter 74.09 RCW.
(ii) The plan developed in (b)(i) of this subsection should address
permissible uses of federal employment security funding and
infrastructure, identification of any necessary statutory changes, and
cost information. The department shall submit the plan in a report to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2008.
(20) $640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely ((to)) for a medicare advantage
program. The department shall:
(a) Pay the premiums associated with enrollment in a medicare
advantage plan for those full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries, as
defined in RCW 74.09.010, who were enrolled on or before November 14,
2006 in a medicare advantage plan sponsored by an entity accredited by
the national committee for quality assurance and for whom the
department had been paying Part C premium as of November 2006; and
(b) Undertake, directly or by contract, a study to determine the
cost-effectiveness of paying premiums for enrollment of full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries in medicare advantage plans in lieu of
paying full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries' medicare cost-sharing.
The study shall compare the cost and health outcomes experience,
including rates of nursing home placement and costs for groups of full
benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are enrolled in medicare
advantage plans, in medicare special needs plan or in medicare fee-for-service. The study shall compare the health status and utilization of
health and long-term care services for the three groups, and the impact
of access to a medical home and specialty care, over a period of two
years to determine any differences in health status, health outcomes,
and state expenditures that result. The department shall submit the
results of the study to the governor and the legislature by June 30,
2009. The department is authorized to accept private cash and in-kind
donations and grants to support the study and evaluation.
(c) Track enrollment and expenditures for this population on
department monthly management reports.
(21) The department may not transition to managed care delivery any
population that has been primarily served under fee-for-service
delivery unless the department first conducts a cost-effectiveness
evaluation of the transition, including an evaluation of historical
data on utilization patterns, and finds that the transition would
result in a more effective and cost-efficient form of service delivery,
pursuant to RCW 74.09.470. Any such finding must be provided to the
governor and the legislature no less than ninety days before the
transition begins.
(22) $756,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, $1,261,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,448,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections
5, 7, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088 (children's
mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $566,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon comm/health care). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(24) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department of social and health
services, in consultation with the health care authority and the
employment security department, to prepare and submit a report and
recommendations to the governor and the legislature related to coverage
of low-wage workers enrolled on state plans who are employed by
employers with more than fifty employees. The report shall address
multiple approaches, including but not limited to the proposal included
in House Bill No. 2094 (taxpayer health care fairness act). The
discussion of each approach included in the report should identify how
the approach would further the goal of shared responsibility for
coverage of low-wage workers, obstacles to implementation and options
to address them, and estimated implementation costs. The report shall
be submitted on or before November 15, 2007. The agencies shall
establish a workgroup, which shall be closely involved and consulted in
the development of the report and recommendations under this
subsection. The workgroup shall include the following participants:
Persons or organizations representing large employers in the retail,
agricultural and grocery trades, other large employers, organizations
representing employees of large employers, organizations representing
low-wage employees of large employers, state and local governmental
entities as employers, and organizations representing employees of
state and local governmental entities. In addition, the workgroup
shall include three members from each of the two largest caucuses of
the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker, and three
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate.
(25) $1,883,000 of the tobacco prevention and control account--state appropriation and $1,742,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are for the provision of smoking cessation benefits
pursuant to Senate Bill No. 6421 (smoking cessation). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(26) As part of the five-year plan on state purchasing to improve
health care quality under chapter 259, Laws of 2007, the department, in
collaboration with the department of health, shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining a strategy to
improve immunization rates for all children in the state, including but
not limited to vaccine administration fee increases and pay-for-performance incentives. The department shall submit the report to the
governor and the health policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 1, 2008.
(27) Within existing funds, the department shall evaluate the
fiscal impact of the federal upper limits on medicaid reimbursement to
pharmacies implemented under the federal deficit reduction act, and
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(28)(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a feasibility study to examine
processes and systems that would expeditiously link persons released
from confinement in state and local correctional facilities and
institutions for mental diseases to medical assistance benefits for
which they qualify. The study shall present an analysis of the costs
and benefits associated with:
(i) Suspending eligibility for persons who were receiving medical
assistance at the time their confinement began, such that upon the
person's release from confinement, medical assistance benefits would
immediately resume without the filing of a new application. In the
evaluation of eligibility suspension, the department shall examine
process modifications that would allow confined persons to recertify
eligibility before or immediately after release from confinement;
(ii) Improving the efficiency and expanding the scope of the
expedited medical assistance reinstatement and eligibility
determination process established under RCW 74.09.555, including
extending the process to persons other than those with mental
disorders, both for persons who had been previously eligible before
confinement and for persons who had not been eligible before
confinement;
(iii) Providing medical and mental health evaluations to determine
disability for purposes of the medical assistance program before the
person's release from confinement; and
(iv) Notifying the department in a timely manner when a person who
has been enrolled in medical assistance is confined in a state
correctional institution or institution for mental diseases or is
released from confinement.
(b) In conducting the study, the department shall collaborate with
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
department of corrections, the regional support networks, department
field offices, institutions for mental diseases, and correctional
institutions. The department shall submit the study to the governor
and the legislature by November 15, 2008.
(((30))) (29) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of the agency's responsibilities
in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (patient-centered
primary care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((31) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the senior dental access project pursuant to
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (long term care
programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.))
(30) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
family planning nurses and supplies at community services offices.
(31) The department shall not eliminate and shall continue to
provide a nurse hotline for foster parents.
(32) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
medical assistance to children under three-hundred percent of the
federal poverty level.
(33) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
maternity support services to pregnant and postpartum women.
(34) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
transportation services to patients receiving adult day health
services.
(35) The department shall continue children's health coverage
outreach and education efforts. These efforts shall rely on existing
relationships and systems developed to implement the program under RCW
74.09.470, such as those with local public health agencies, health care
providers, public schools, the women, infants, and children program,
the early childhood education and assistance program, child care
providers, newborn visiting nurses, and other community-based
organizations. The department shall seek public-private partnerships
and federal funds that may become available to provide on-going support
for outreach and education efforts.
(36) The department shall reduce expenditures on pharmaceuticals
and durable medical equipment.
(37) The department shall not reduce hospital rates.

Sec. 209 2008 c 329 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,543,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,323,000))
$8,182,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,975,000))
$95,975,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,932,000))
$117,791,000

Sec. 210 2008 c 329 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,549,000))
$52,216,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,055,000))
$104,722,000

Sec. 211 2008 c 329 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,502,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,125,000))
$38,596,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,805,000))
$62,737,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,526,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,752,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $913,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,648,000))
$149,051,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($250,000)) $230,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
expansion of the Washington state mentors program, which provides
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.
(2) $1,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,750,000)) $1,676,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
Washington council for prevention of child abuse and neglect to expand
its home visitation program.
(3) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the family policy council for
distribution as grants to community networks in counties with county
juvenile courts participating in decategorization of funding through
the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The council shall provide
grants of up to $50,000 per fiscal year to the Pierce County-Tacoma
urban community network and additional community networks supporting
counties or groups of counties in evaluating programs funded through a
block grant by the juvenile rehabilitation administration. Funds not
used for grants to community networks supporting counties or groups of
counties participating in the decategorization block grants shall
lapse.
(4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(5) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the continuation of the
postpartum depression campaign, including the design and production of
brochures in various languages, a radio public service announcement,
and other outreach and training efforts.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand and enhance the juvenile
detention alternatives initiative. This funding is intended to add
three new program sites, support the addition of a data analyst, and to
provide resources for the state to participate in annual national
conferences.
(7) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $101,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1422 (incarcerated parents). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $7,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 465, Laws of 2007.
(9) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $581,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development of a project plan, time line, and
budget plan for a more flexible payment system for independent home
care providers and others who collectively bargain for wages and
benefits. The legislature finds the amounts provided are sufficient to
fund the following related to a timely and expeditious transition to a
more flexible provider payroll system: (a) An appropriate request for
proposal; and (b) collection of the information necessary to develop
the budget proposal needed to seek budget authority for the system.

Sec. 212 2008 c 329 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,085,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,121,000))
$52,540,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,438,000))
$53,302,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,644,000))
$164,927,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $235,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and $111,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections 2 and
3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term
well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2008 c 329 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,937,000))
$4,934,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,543,000))
$41,497,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,478,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($302,832,000))
$291,795,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($622,417,000))
$611,331,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) (($4,062,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for additional
enrollment in the basic health plan. If available basic health plan
slots are exceeded, the authority shall maintain a waiting list and
provide for notification when slots become available.
(5))) Appropriations in this act include specific funding for
health records banking under section 10 of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission).
(((6))) (5) $11,934,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $11,834,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for funding for health care services provided through local
community clinics.
(((7))) (6) $784,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($1,676,000 of the health service
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009,)) $540,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation, and $8,200,000 of the state health
care authority administrative account--state appropriation are provided
for the development of a new benefits administration and insurance
accounting system.
(((8))) (7) $2,000,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the authority
to provide one-time competitive grants to community health centers to
increase the number of adults served on an ongoing basis. Each clinic
receiving grant funding shall report annually, beginning December 2008,
on key adult access indicators established by the authority, including
but not limited to increases in the number of low-income adults served.
(((9))) (8) $1,639,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 ((and $2,988,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are)) is
provided solely for section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1569 (health insurance partnership board) and related provisions of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon
commission on health care). ((An additional $750,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided
solely for premium subsidies to low-income employees of small employers
participating in the health insurance partnership, as generally
described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 2537 (modifications to
the health insurance partnership).
(10)) (9) $664,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 ((and $664,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are)) is
provided solely for the implementation of the Washington quality forum,
pursuant to section 9 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the section is not enacted by June
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((11))) (10) $600,000 of the state health care authority
administrative account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of the state employee health pilot, pursuant to section
41 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon
commission). If the section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((12))) (11) $250,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the health services
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for continuation of the community health collaborative grant program in
accordance with chapter 67, Laws of 2006 (E2SSB 6459). The applicant
organizations must assure measurable improvements in health access
within their service region, demonstrate active collaboration with key
community partners, and provide two dollars in matching funds for each
grant dollar awarded.
(((13))) (12) $731,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $977,000 of the health services
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for the dental residency program, including maintenance of the existing
residency positions and the establishment of six additional resident
positions in fiscal year 2008 (four in eastern Washington and two in
the Seattle area), and five additional positions in fiscal year 2009.
(((14))) (13) Appropriations in this act include funding for
sections 14 (reducing unnecessary emergency room use) and 40 (state
employee health program) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5930 (blue ribbon commission).
(((15))) (14) $100,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of the agency's responsibilities in Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (patient-centered primary care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 214 2008 c 329 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,377,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,699,000))
$3,580,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,523,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,599,000))
$8,480,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $115,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6776
(whistleblower protections). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2008 c 329 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,330,000))
$17,963,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,331,000))
$17,964,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,681,000))
$35,947,000

Sec. 216 2008 c 329 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,680,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,464,000))
$21,445,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,322,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,380,000))
$50,361,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $2,390,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,809,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for ten additional basic law enforcement academies in
fiscal year 2008 and nine additional basic law enforcement academies in
fiscal year 2009.
(3) $1,044,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,191,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs to continue to develop, maintain, and operate the jail booking
and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide automated victim
information and notification system (SAVIN).
(4) $28,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 10, Laws of 2007 (SSB 5191, missing persons).
(5) $5,400,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $6,922,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $150,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely to deliver multi-disciplinary team training sessions
aimed at improving the coordination of, and communication between,
agencies involved in the investigation of child fatality, child sexual
abuse, child physical abuse, and criminal neglect cases.
(7) $25,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 (gang-related
offenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for support of the coalition of small police agencies
major crimes task force. The purpose of this task force is to pool its
resources and to establish an efficient and cooperative approach in
addressing major violent crimes.
(9) $20,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (forest
fires/property access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $5,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address
and residency of all registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
under RCW 9A.44.130. The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall:
(a) Enter into performance-based agreements with units of local
government to ensure that registered offender address and residency are
verified:
(A) For level I offenders, every twelve months;
(B) For level II offenders, every six months; and
(C) For level III offenders, every three months.
For the purposes of this subsection, unclassified offenders and
kidnapping offenders shall be considered at risk level I unless in the
opinion of the local jurisdiction a higher classification is in the
interest of public safety.
(b) Collect performance data from all participating jurisdictions
sufficient to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of the address
and residency verification program.
(c) Submit a report on the effectiveness of the address and
residency verification program to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate by September 1,
2009.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up
to three percent of the amount provided in this subsection for the cost
of administration. Any funds not disbursed for address and residency
verification or retained for administration may be allocated to local
prosecutors for the prosecution costs associated with failing to
register offenses.
(11) $750,000 of the public safety and education fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2712 (criminal
street gangs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a grant program to pay for the costs
of local law enforcement agencies participating in specialized crisis
intervention training.

Sec. 217 2008 c 329 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,716,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,314,000))
$8,624,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,393,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,525,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $908,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,104,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,948,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,730,000))
$232,295,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($235,880,000))
$235,445,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,002,000))
$1,634,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($599,235,000))
$597,307,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,413,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for conducting utilization reviews of physical and
occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit and the associated
administrative costs, including those of entering data into the
claimant's file. The department shall develop and report performance
measures and targets for these reviews to the office of financial
management. The reports are due September 30th for the prior fiscal
year and must include the amount spent and the estimated savings per
fiscal year.
(2) $2,247,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5920
(vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $822,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for vocational services professional staff salary
adjustments necessary to recruit and retain positions required for
anticipated changes in work duties as a result of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5920 (vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Compensation for anticipated changes to work duties is subject
to review and approval by the director of the department of personnel
and is subject to collective bargaining.
(4) $8,000,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to establish a program of safety and health as
authorized by RCW 49.17.210 to be administered under rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, provided that projects funded involve
workplaces insured by the medical aid fund, and that priority is given
to projects fostering accident prevention through cooperation between
employers and employees or their representatives.
(5) $600,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to evaluate and recommend improvements to the
rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, including analyzing how risks are
pooled, the effect of including worker premium contributions in
adjustment calculations, incentives for accident and illness
prevention, return-to-work practices, and other sound risk-management
strategies that are consistent with recognized insurance principles.
(6) $181,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$181,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5443 (workers'
compensation claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $558,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290
(workers' compensation advisory committees). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $104,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $104,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $361,000
of the accident account--state appropriation, and $361,000 of the
medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5675 (workers'
compensation benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $730,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(10) $437,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$437,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5053
(industrial insurance ombudsman). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $74,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$74,000 of the medical aid--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5915 (notices to
employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $605,000 of the accident account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study of the incidence of
permanent total disability pensions in the state's workers'
compensation system. To conduct the study, the department shall
contract with an independent researcher that has demonstrated expertise
in workers' compensation systems. When selecting the independent
researcher, the department shall consult the labor and business members
of the workers' compensation advisory committee and, if the labor and
business members of the workers' compensation advisory committee agree
on a particular independent researcher, the department shall select
that independent researcher. The study must consider causes of the
recent increase in permanent total disability cases, future anticipated
permanent total disability trends, a comparison of Washington's
permanent total disability claims experience and injured workers with
other states and jurisdictions, the impact of the standard for finding
workers employable on the incidence of permanent total disability
pensions, and the impact of vocational rehabilitation under RCW
51.32.095 on the incidence of permanent total disability pensions. The
department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory
committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee,
and the senate labor, commerce, research and development committee on
the results of the study on or before July 1, 2008.
(13) $1,089,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of chapter 27, Laws of 2007 (ESHB 2171, crane
safety).
(14) $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$192,000 of the manufactured home installation training account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 2118
(mobile/manufactured homes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $107,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$107,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6839 (workers' compensation
coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $224,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $741,000 of the accident account--state appropriation, and
$741,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $408,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$72,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2602 (victims' employment
leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $3,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6246
(industrial insurance claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((21))) (19) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the department to conduct a
review of the need for regulation of general and specialty contractors
involved in the repair, alteration, or construction of single-family
homes using the public interest criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010
and as generally described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 3349
(residential contractors). By October 1, 2008, the department and the
department of licensing shall report their findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.
(((22))) (20) The department of labor and industries shall enter
into an interagency agreement with the employment security department
to expend funds from the family leave insurance account for the
implementation of the family leave insurance program.
(((23))) (21) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is
authorized to increase the following fees as necessary to meet the
actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section and by not more than 5.53 percent in fiscal year 2008:
Boiler inspection permits and fees; boiler permit fees; plumbers'
continuing education; and plumbers' licensing and examination fees.

Sec. 218 2008 c 329 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,876,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,012,000))
$1,937,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,888,000))
$3,813,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $224,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1220 (sentence review board). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 219 2008 c 329 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,124,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,142,000))
$1,926,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,276,000))
$4,060,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,264,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,593,000))
$5,476,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,317,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000
Veteran Estate Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,698,000))
$17,581,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $560,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5164 (veterans' conservation corps). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(b) The department shall not reduce field service contracts.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,984,000))
$5,484,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,126,000))
$43,120,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,574,000))
$31,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,632,000))
$88,121,000

Sec. 220 2008 c 329 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,721,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,731,000))
$1,537,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,452,000))
$3,258,000

Sec. 221 2008 c 329 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,352,000))
$81,232,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,258,000))
$80,686,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($477,072,000))
$477,065,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($119,919,000))
$119,875,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,877,000))
$68,726,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,606,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,041,000
Public Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,027,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,460,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,057,000))
$2,055,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,918,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,122,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,429,000))
$49,729,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,846,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,033,376,000))
$1,025,780,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
its fee-supported programs in excess of the fiscal growth factor
pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and RCW 43.70.250, the department is further
authorized to increase fees in its fee-supported programs as necessary
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section, as specifically authorized in LEAP Document
DOH-2008, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program on March 11, 2008.
(2) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) $877,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1099
(dental professions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2304 (cardiac care services). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $138,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an evaluation of chronic care
provider training.
(6) $51,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (sex education). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1837 (nonambulatory persons). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $201,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2087 (health care facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for public service announcements
regarding childhood lead poisoning, information pamphlets, rule
development, and for early identification of persons at risk of having
elevated blood-lead levels, which includes systematically screening
children under six years of age and other target populations identified
by the department. Priority will be given to testing children and
increasing the registry in the lead surveillance program.
(10) $101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $81,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $6,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (ambulatory surgical facilities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $55,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1397 (massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $58,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5398
(specialty hospitals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $224,000 of the oyster reserve land account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $571,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $458,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1106 (hospital acquired infections). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,000,000 of the public health services
account--state appropriation are provided solely for department of
health-funded family planning clinics to increase the capacity of the
clinics to provide family planning and reproductive health services to
low-income men and women who are not otherwise eligible for services
through the department of social and health services medical assistance
program and for clinical or other health services associated with
sexually transmitted disease testing through the infertility prevention
project. Funds appropriated and expended under this subsection for
fiscal year 2009 shall be distributed in a manner that allocates
funding to department of health-funded family planning clinics based
upon the percentage of medical assistance family planning waiver
clients in calendar year 2005 who received services from a provider
located in the geographic area served by the department of
health-funded clinic. Of these amounts, the department is authorized
to expend up to $1,000,000 of its general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 for services provided in fiscal year 2008, if
necessary, to offset reductions in federal funding.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for one-time funding to purchase and store antiviral
medications to be used in accordance with the state pandemic influenza
response plan. These drugs are to be purchased through the United
States department of health and human services to take advantage of
federal subsidies.
(17) $147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of health to
provide relevant information on measures taken to facilitate expanded
use of reclaimed water pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the lifelong AIDS alliance to
restore lost federal funding.
(19) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for medical nutritional therapy
for people with HIV/AIDS and other low-income residents in King county
with chronic illnesses.
(20) $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the neurodevelopmental center
system, which provides therapy and medical services for young, low-income children with developmental disabilities.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to continue the autism task force
established by chapter 259, Laws of 2005, through June 30, 2008. The
task force shall:
(a) Review and continue to refine criteria for regional autism
centers throughout Washington state based on community needs in each
area, and address the role of autism centers within the larger context
of developmental disabilities;
(b) Prioritize its December 2006 recommendations and develop an
implementation plan for the highest priorities. The plan should detail
how systems will coordinate to improve service and avoid duplication
between state agencies including the department of social and health
services, department of health, office of superintendent of public
instruction, as well as school districts, autism centers, and local
partners and providers. The plan shall also estimate the costs of the
highest priority recommendations and report to the legislature and
governor by December 1, 2007;
(c) Compile information for and draft the "Washington Service
Guidelines for Individuals with Autism - Birth Through Lifespan" book
described in the task force's recommendations. Funding to print and
distribute the book is expected to come from federal or private
sources; and
(d) Monitor the federal combating autism act and its funding
availability and make recommendations on applying for grants to assist
in implementation of the 2006 task force recommendations. The
department of health shall be the lead agency in providing staff for
the task force. The department may seek additional staff assistance
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
committee staff of the legislature. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses.
(22) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the
Washington state hepatitis C strategic plan.
(23) $142,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5403 (animal massage practitioners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(24) $174,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5503 (athletic trainers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $75,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5292 (physical therapist assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(26) $94,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6032 (medical use of marijuana). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $386,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $384,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5894 (large on-site sewage
systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $1,721,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of sections 11 and 12 (medical
information) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). If the sections are not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $10,000,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $10,000,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for distribution to local health jurisdictions and for the costs
of administering the public health related sections of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health
care), subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) During the month of January 2008, and January 2009, the
department of health shall distribute funds appropriated in this
section to local health jurisdictions, less an amount not to exceed
five percent for the costs of administering the public health related
sections of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). The amount of funding for
distribution to a jurisdiction before the administrative deduction
shall be the greater of: (i) One hundred thousand dollars; or (ii) (A)
a base level of funding of seventy-five thousand dollars plus the per
capita amount, for a jurisdiction with a population of four hundred
thousand persons or fewer; or (B) a base level of funding of twenty-five thousand dollars plus the per capita amount, for a jurisdiction
with a population greater than four hundred thousand persons. Amounts
distributed under this subsection must be used to fund core public
health functions of statewide significance as defined in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on
health care).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Per capita amount" means an amount equal to seven million five
hundred thousand dollars multiplied by the proportion of the population
of the jurisdiction in the previous calendar year to the population of
the state in the previous calendar year.
(ii) "Population" means the number of persons as last determined by
the office of financial management. If the jurisdiction comprises a
single county, "population" means the number of persons in the county.
For a jurisdiction comprising two or more counties, "population" means
the number of persons in all counties comprising the jurisdiction.
(iii) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.
(c) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
subsection.
(30) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for an evaluation of the economic
benefits to the state's health care system of the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program under chapter 18.50 RCW. In particular, the
department shall contract with a consultant to conduct a review of
existing research literature on whether these economic benefits exceed
the state expenditures to subsidize the cost of the midwifery licensing
and regulatory program under RCW 43.70.250. The evaluation shall
include an assessment of the economic benefits to consumers who elect
to have out-of-hospital births with midwives, including any reduced use
of procedures that increase the costs of childbirth. The department
shall submit the report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature by January 1, 2008.
(31) $147,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of health to
convene a work group to develop recommendations regarding the need to
regulate those individuals currently registered with the department of
health as counselors. The department of health shall submit
recommendations of the work group to the legislature and governor by
November 15, 2007. Based on the recommendations of the work group, the
department of health shall draft credentialing guidelines for all
registered counselors by January 1, 2008. Guidelines shall include
education in risk assessment, ethics, professional standards, and
deadlines for compliance.
(32) (($680,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the prescription monitoring
program under chapter 70.225 RCW to monitor the prescribing and
dispensing of drugs to reduce the likelihood of adverse drug effects,
particularly for senior citizens taking multiple medications. The
attorney general shall deposit to the health services account at least
$680,000 from the cy pres monetary portion of the consent decree in
settlement of the consumer protection act litigation against Caremark
Rx, LLC (King county superior court cause no. 08-2-06098-5). The
amount provided in this subsection may be expended only to the extent
that the attorney general deposits these moneys to the health services
account, to be expended consistent with the terms of the consent
decree.
(33))) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((34))) (33) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the senior falls prevention
pilot program, pursuant to section 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs).
(((35))) (34) $585,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state breast and
cervical health program to increase the provider reimbursement rate for
digital mammographies to the medicare equivalent rate.
(((36))) (35) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the child death review program.
The program shall be transferred from the community and family health
division to the injury prevention division within the department.
(((38))) (36) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the northwest sickle cell
collaborative program.
(((39))) (37) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $154,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the restoration of
maxillofacial/cleft palate teams in Yakima, Spokane, Seattle, and
Tacoma.
(((40))) (38) $17,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6220 (nurse delegation) or sections 11 and 12 of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((41))) (39) $11,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6439 (radiologist assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((42))) (40) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $4,261,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Fourth
Substitute House Bill No. 1103 (health professions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((43))) (41) $558,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2674 (counselor credentialing). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((44))) (42) The department of licensing and the department of
health shall jointly review and report to the appropriate policy
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, recommendations for
implementing a process of holding in abeyance for up to six months
following the conclusion of active duty service the expiration of, and
currency requirements for, professional licenses and certificates for
individuals who have been called to active duty military service.
(((45))) (43) The higher education coordinating board, the
department of licensing, and the department of health shall jointly
review and report to appropriate policy committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the
extent to which veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills
sets and education required while in service to certification,
licensure, and degree requirements.
(((47))) (44) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $80,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2647
(children's safe products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((48) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 2431 (cord
blood banking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(49))) (45) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6340
(water system program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((50) $309,000)) (46) $194,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (patient-centered care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((52))) (47) $96,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 2881 (practice of dentistry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((54))) (48) $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the midwifery licensure and
regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There
shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program. The department shall convene the
midwifery advisory committee on a quarterly basis to address issues
related to licensed midwifery.
(49) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington colon health program.
Through the program, the department shall provide grants to
participating counties to provide free colorectal screening exams to
individuals fifty to sixty-four years old who are below two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level.

Sec. 222 2008 c 329 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. (1) The appropriations to the
department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the
programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1,
2008, after approval by the director of financial management and unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2008 between
programs. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of
financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the
transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum
extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not federal funds.
The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing
seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels.
The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and
justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by
budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment
modifications or transfers.
(2) The department may transfer up to $15,000,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 into fiscal year 2008,
if deemed necessary by the department and approved in advance by the
director of financial management. The director of financial management
shall notify the fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven
days prior to approving a transfer under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the transfer including allotment detail by program, budget object, and
budget unit for both fiscal years, both before and after any transfers.

Sec. 223 2008 c 329 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,545,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,652,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,467,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,620,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $9,389,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of phase three of the
department's offender-based tracking system replacement project. This
amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of
section 902 of this act.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and support
of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.
(c) $169,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No.
1001 (auto theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422 (incarcerated parents).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(e) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(f) $314,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for four additional staff to
collect and analyze data for programs funded through the offender
reentry initiative and collect, analyze, and disseminate information
required by the GMAP process, performance audits, data requests, and
quality assessments and assurances.
(g) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6244 (conversion of facilities to house violators of community
supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((j))) (h) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2712 (criminal street gangs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($647,718,000))
$647,608,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,157,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,338,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,271,799,000))
$1,271,689,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2007-09 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(f) $358,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $980,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(g) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1097 (vulnerable adults). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(h) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1319 (correctional agency employee). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(i) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1592 (sentence review board). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(j) $544,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $496,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of individual
reentry plans to prepare offenders for release into the community as
generally described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157
(offender recidivism). Individual reentry plans shall be based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool.
The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a series of
individual plans that combine to meet the requirements. The individual
reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate;
(ii) A description of the offender's education, certifications,
work experience, skills, and training; and
(iii) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, and family reunification. The individual
reentry plan shall be updated as appropriate during the period of
incarceration, and prior to the inmate's release to address public
safety concerns, consistency with the offender risk management level
assigned by the department, housing, and connecting with a community
justice center in the area in which the offender will be residing, if
a community justice center is located in that area.
(iv) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,157,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,956,000))
$145,881,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,319,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,370,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($301,018,000))
$300,943,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(c) $1,167,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and
operation of community justice centers by the department as generally
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender
recidivism). At a minimum, a community justice center shall include:
(i) A violator program to allow the department to utilize a range
of available sanctions for offenders who violate conditions of their
supervision;
(ii) An employment opportunity program to assist an offender in
finding employment;
(iii) On-site services or resources for connecting offenders with
services such as mental health and substance abuse treatment,
transportation, training, family reunification, and community services;
and
(iv) The services of a transition coordinator to facilitate
connections between the former offender and the community. The
transition coordinator shall provide information to former offenders
regarding services available to them in the community including, but
not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, education,
vocational training, parent education, financial literacy, treatment
for substance abuse, mental health, anger management, and shall assist
offenders in their efforts to access needed services.
(v) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,357,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,358,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $124,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,192,000))
$28,082,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,228,000))
$63,118,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for expenditures
related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 224 2008 c 329 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,608,000))
$2,375,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,584,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,778,000))
$22,545,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for an adjustment to the agency lease
rate for space occupied and parking in the Tacoma Rhodes center. The
department of general administration shall increase lease rates to meet
the cash gain/loss break-even point for the Tacoma Rhodes center
effective July 1, 2007.
(2) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding for contracted services that provide employment support and
help with life activities for deaf and blind individuals in King
county.

Sec. 225 2008 c 329 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $937,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,233,000))
$1,151,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,170,000))
$2,088,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $295,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6596 (sex offender policy
board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 226 2008 c 329 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($282,000))
$272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($265,114,000))
$264,967,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,578,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,925,000))
$252,907,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,131,000))
$22,802,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,843,000
Family Leave Insurance Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,218,000))
$1,764,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($618,151,000))
$610,193,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.
(2) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to chapter
133, Laws of 2005 (unemployment insurance).
(3) $23,162,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions and department services to employers and job seekers.
(4) $372,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5653 (self-employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $12,054,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to fund the unemployment insurance tax
information system (TAXIS) technology initiative for the employment
security department.
(6) $430,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to replace high-risk servers used by the
unemployment security department.
(7) $503,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to provide a system to track computer
upgrades and changes for the unemployment security department.
(8) $183,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from the amounts made
available to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act
(Reed Act). This amount is authorized to conduct a feasibility study
to integrate job search data systems.
(9) $2,331,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for hardware and software to ensure the
ongoing, reliable operation of the telecenters.
(10) $488,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for the relocation of the WorkSource office
in Lakewood.
(11) $6,218,000 of the family leave insurance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the family leave
insurance program.
(a) The amount provided in this subsection assumes that, in
developing the information technology systems to support the payment of
benefits, the department will incorporate the claim filing and benefit
payment efficiencies recommended by the joint legislative task force on
family leave insurance in Part III of its final report dated January
23, 2008, including:
(i) Eliminating the option for awarding attorney fees and costs for
administrative hearings;
(ii) Authorizing claims for benefits to be filed in the six-week
period beginning on the first day of the calendar week in which the
individual is on family leave;
(iii) Not requiring claimants to verify the birth of a child or the
placement of a child for adoption;
(iv) Including an attestation from the claimant that written notice
has been provided to the employer of the intention to take family
leave; and
(v) Not deducting and withholding federal income taxes from benefit
payments.
(b) In addition, the department shall incorporate the following
claim filing and benefit payment efficiencies:
(i) Define "qualifying year" to mean the first four of the last
five completed calendar quarters or, if eligibility is not established,
the last four completed calendar immediately preceding the first day of
the application year;
(ii) Allow individuals to file a claim for benefits in the six-week
period beginning on the first day of the calendar year in which the
individual is on family leave; and
(iii) After an initial family leave insurance benefit is paid,
subsequent payments must be made biweekly, rather than semimonthly,
thereafter.
(12) $222,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2815 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $155,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely to implement Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2008 c 329 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($537,000))
$509,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,045,000))
$1,044,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,115,000))
$2,086,000

Sec. 302 2008 c 329 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,109,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,827,000))
$45,748,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,017,000))
$83,013,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,618,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,207,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,151,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,607,000))
$19,588,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,649,000))
$1,604,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $694,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,137,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,086,000))
$16,493,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,247,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,383,000))
$99,235,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,952,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,101,000))
$34,022,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,750,000))
$3,635,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,396,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,834,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,306,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,519,000))
$12,205,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,780,000))
$2,680,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,690,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,271,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($469,637,000))
$459,141,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $209,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $200,000 of the general fund--private local
appropriation are provided solely to implement activities associated
with a regional haze program. Funds shall be collected and expended in
accordance with the terms of the contract entered into with affected
businesses and the department of ecology.
(3) $2,000,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to local governments outside of Puget
Sound for municipal storm water programs, including but not limited to,
implementation of phase II municipal storm water permits, source
control for toxics in association with cleanup of contaminated sediment
sites, and source control programs for shellfish protection districts
where storm water is a significant contributor.
(4) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is further
authorized to increase the following fees in fiscal year 2009 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section: Wastewater discharge permit,
not more than 5.57 percent; dam periodic inspection permit, not more
than 5.57 percent; dam construction permit, not more than 5.57 percent;
and mixed waste management, not more than 14.14 percent.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $927,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve the performance of
wetland mitigation. Of this amount, $55,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support
a wetland in Whatcom county. The program will engage local, state, and
federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and others in the
creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures to protect
habitat functions and values while accommodating urban growth in the
region. Priority shall be given to state and local government
partnerships for wetland characterization. The department shall issue
a report of its findings and recommendations on how wetland mitigation
success can be improved to the office of financial management and the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature.
(6) $260,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot project to provide
grants to two local government jurisdictions located in the Puget Sound
area to improve compliance with existing environmental laws. Grant
funds shall be used for providing information on existing requirements,
providing technical assistance necessary to comply on a voluntary
basis, and taking enforcement action.
(8) $1,257,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5881 (water
power license fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(9) $694,000 of the underground storage tank account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5475 (underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(10) $2,026,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for local governments located near
hazardous waste clean-up sites, including Duwamish Waterway,
Commencement Bay, and Bellingham Bay, to work with small businesses and
citizens to safely manage hazardous and solid wastes to prevent the
contamination.
(11) $876,000 of the state toxics control account and $876,000 of
the local toxics control account are provided solely for public
participation grants related to toxic cleanup sites within and around
Puget Sound.
(12) $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,169,000)) $669,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement
watershed plans. Of this amount, $313,650 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($646,350)) $529,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to support the implementation of the WRIA 1 watershed plan and
the Bertrand watershed improvement district plan, including but not
limited to implementation of the Nooksack River basin stream gauging
program, study of the feasibility of a public utility district pipeline
in the Bertrand watershed, study and construction of water storage and
augmentation in the Bertrand watershed, and preparation and development
of the next subbasin watershed plan agreed to by the Bertrand instream
flow policy group.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop, by
rule, guidelines for the appropriate siting and operation of geoduck
aquaculture operations to be included in any master program under the
shorelines management act. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for convening a stakeholder group
to recommend establishing a sustainable statewide regional CBRNE/Hazmat
response capability.
(15) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement key recommendations
and actions identified in the "Washington's Ocean Action Plan:
Enhancing Management of Washington State's Ocean and Outer Coast". The
department shall provide a progress report on implementing this plan to
the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 31,
2008.
(16) $464,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to oversee
beach seaweed removal in the west Seattle Fauntleroy community. The
department may spend up to $25,000 of this amount for its cost of
administration.
(18) $693,000 of the state toxics control account is provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5421 (environmental
covenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(19) $99,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a marshland study of key areas
of salmon habitat along the Snohomish river estuary.
(20) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $19,000 of the oil spill prevention account
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(21) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
U.S. institute for environmental conflict resolution, a federal agency,
to develop a pilot water management process with three federally
recognized treaty Indian tribes. $50,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the northwest
Indian fisheries commission to help establish the pathway for the
process in federal agencies.
(22) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to continue the pilot water pathways
project through the remainder of the biennium. The department will
work with the northwest Indian fisheries commission and the U.S.
institute on environmental conflict resolution to find resolution on
persistent water policy issues between tribes and nontribal entities.
(23) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $241,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(24) $53,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5552 (penalties for oil spills). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to convene a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, composed of a balanced
representation from interested state regulatory agencies, Native
American tribes, local governments and the environmental and shellfish
farming communities. The group will be facilitated by the office of
regulatory assistance and will address federal, state, and local
regulatory issues related to shellfish farming.
(26) Within the appropriations provided in this section for the
development of water supplies in the Columbia river basin, the
department shall assist county governments located east of the crest of
the Cascade mountain range that: Have an international border; or
border a county with an international boundary and a county with four
hundred thousand or more residents, to identify water supply projects
to compete for funding from the Columbia river basin water management
program. The department shall provide technical assistance as needed
to further refine priority projects identified by these counties. The
department shall consider and balance regional water supply needs in
its funding allocation decisions made as a part of this program.
(((28))) (27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for coordinating with the
University of Washington to assess the current energy profile of
Washington state pulp and paper mills. The energy consumption and
energy generation capability will be determined for both steam and
electrical power. In addition, the sources and types of fuels used in
various boilers will be assessed.
(((29))) (28) $195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to support a collaborative process
to design a proposed comprehensive water management structure for the
Walla Walla river basin. The proposed structure should address the
allocation of functions, authorities, resource requirements, and issues
associated with interstate watershed management of the basin. Invited
participants should include but not be limited to the confederated
tribes of the Umatilla Indian reservation; appropriate state agencies;
and Walla Walla basin interests such as municipalities, irrigation
districts, conservation districts, fisheries, agriculture, economic
development, and environmental representatives. A report outlining the
proposed governance and water management structure shall be submitted
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2008.
(((30))) (29) $333,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2647 (children's safe products). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((31))) (30) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,027,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2815 (reducing greenhouse gases
emissions in the Washington economy). In participating in the western
climate initiative under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2815, the director of the department shall seek to ensure that the
design for a regional multisector market-based system confers equitable
economic benefits and opportunities to electric utilities operating in
Washington by having that system recognize at least the following: (a)
Voluntary investments made by Washington utilities in energy efficiency
measures; (b) emission reduction benefits that other state and
provincial participants in the western climate initiative derive from
consuming renewable energy generated in Washington; and (c) adverse
impacts that climate change uniquely has upon the capabilities of
hydroelectric power generation. Washington state's representatives to
the western climate initiative process shall advocate for a regional
multisector market-based design that addresses competitive
disadvantages that could be experienced by in-region industries as
compared to industries in states or countries that do not have
greenhouse gas reduction programs that are substantively equivalent to
the system designed under the western climate initiative process. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((34))) (31) Within the appropriations provided in this section
the department shall ensure that standard statewide protocols for
surface water monitoring are developed and included in status and
trends monitoring to utilize information from other entities, including
other state agencies, local governments, and volunteer groups.
(((35))) (32)(a) $2,000,000 of the Columbia river water delivery
account appropriation is provided solely for distribution to affected
counties as defined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874
(Columbia river water) to mitigate for negative impacts caused by
releases of Lake Roosevelt water for the purposes described in that
bill. The criteria for allocating these funds shall be developed by
the department in consultation with affected local governments.
(b) $150,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for the department to retain a
contractor to perform an independent analysis of legislative options to
protect rural communities in northeast Washington from disproportionate
economic, agricultural, and environmental impacts when upstream water
rights are purchased and transferred for use, or idled and used as
mitigation, in a downstream watershed or county. Before retaining a
contractor, the department shall consult with affected counties as
defined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
river water). The contractor selected shall conduct the independent
analysis and develop a report describing options and recommended
actions. The department of ecology shall provide the report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(c) If Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
river water delivery) is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((36))) (33) $210,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to clean up naturally occurring
asbestos from Swift Creek.
(((38))) (34) $80,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to create a
stakeholder advisory committee to review and develop recommendations to
help businesses achieve a fifty percent toxics reduction use goal. The
committee shall: (a) Review and make recommendations to improve the
effectiveness and delivery of technical assistance in pollution
prevention planning; (b) develop recommendations for strategies to
encourage moving away from "end-of-pipe" pollution reduction approaches
to increase hazardous waste prevention throughout the state; and (c)
review and make recommendations on revising the hazardous waste
planning fee under RCW 70.95E.030, including opportunities to provide
incentives that reward businesses for toxic use reduction successes in
meeting a fifty percent toxics use reduction goal. The committee shall
report its findings and recommendations to the fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 1,
2008.
(((40))) (35) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6805
(relating to promoting farm and forest land preservation and
environmental restoration through conservation markets). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 303 2008 c 329 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,970,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,187,000))
$45,503,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,731,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,559,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,829,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,534,000))
$37,334,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($147,827,000))
$144,943,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for project scoping and cost estimating
for the agency's 2009-11 capital budget submittal.
(4) $2,255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for costs associated with relocating the
commission's Tumwater headquarters office.
(5) $272,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with
relocating the commission's eastern Washington regional headquarters
office.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for replacing vehicles and
equipment.
(7) $1,611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,428,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for planned and emergency
maintenance of park facilities.
(8) $1,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the recreational boating safety
program.
(9) $954,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,007,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operations of Cama Beach
state park.
(10) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5219 (weather and avalanche center). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $264,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $217,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish a pilot lifeguard
program at Lake Sammamish and Nolte state parks. The department shall
complete a comprehensive risk analysis to determine if expansion of the
lifeguard program or other drowning risk reduction measures should be
implemented. The department shall report its findings to the office of
financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature
by July 1, 2009. The department shall fully implement this program as
intended in this subsection.
(14) $455,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a long-range plan for Fort Worden state park, including architectural and site
design guidelines, business and operations implementation, site and
facilities use plan, and for the department to convene a task force to
recommend alternative governance structures for the park.
(15) $1,600,000 of the parks renewal stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for operating state parks, developing
and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance,
enhancing park stewardship and other state park purposes, pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2275 (raising funds for state parks).
Expenditures from the amount provided in this subsection shall not
exceed actual revenues received under Substitute House Bill No. 2275.
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(17) $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for one-time financial assistance
to the northwest weather and avalanche center, administered by the
United States forest service, to keep the center operational through
the remainder of the biennium.
(((19))) (18) (($120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for)) Funds in this section are
sufficient for continued implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5010 (foster home pass). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 304 2008 c 329 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,592,000))
$1,514,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,382,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,773,000))
$2,772,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicles Activities Program
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,004,000
Boating Activities Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,070,000))
$27,991,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds shall be allocated to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute
activities as described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372
(Puget Sound partnership).
(3) $2,000,000 of the boating activities account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1651 (boating activities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 305 2008 c 329 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,144,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,142,000))
$1,109,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,286,000))
$2,253,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
condition and limitation: $10,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for employee
retirement buyout costs.

Sec. 306 2008 c 329 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,889,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,107,000))
$3,063,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,301,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,316,000))
$5,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,791,000))
$17,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for supplementary basic funding
grants to the state's lowest-income conservation districts. The
supplementary grant process shall be structured to aid recipients in
becoming financially self-sufficient in the future.
(2) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5108 (office of farmland preservation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the pioneers in conservation
program to provide grants through a competitive process to agricultural
landowners for projects that benefit fish and wildlife restoration and
farm operations. Grants must be matched by an equal amount or more
from nonstate sources with priority for projects identified in the
Puget Sound Chinook salmon recovery plan and the Puget Sound
partnership strategy.
(4) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute
activities as described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372
(Puget Sound partnership).
(5) $250,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for livestock nutrient program cost
share for the poultry industry.
(6) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for support of conservation resource
management.
(7) $174,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6805 (conservation markets). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 307 2008 c 329 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,158,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,319,000))
$49,062,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,273,000))
$52,270,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,189,000))
$37,184,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,022,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $323,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,992,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $753,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $842,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,589,000))
$63,549,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,279,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,187,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,478,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,911,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $483,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,383,000))
$340,078,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall use the department of printing for
printing needs. Funds provided in this section may not be used to
staff or fund a stand-alone printing operation.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(6) The department shall assist the office of regulatory assistance
in implementing activities consistent with the governor's regulatory
improvement program. The department shall support and provide
expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and business
interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes involving
state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(7) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.
(8) $609,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to implement a pilot
project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation to
develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus Woods
and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of lake
fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to state
and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the Columbia
River water supply program.
(a) For the purposes of the pilot project:
(i) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(ii) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(iii) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy
the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus
Woods;
(iv) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(v) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The director, in collaboration with the Colville Tribes, shall
provide an interim report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008. The
report shall describe the status of the pilot project, and make
recommendations as needed to fully implement the project, pursuant to
the state and tribal agreement on Lake Rufus Woods.
(9) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue the ballast water
management program in Puget Sound and expand the program to include the
Columbia river and coastal ports.
(10) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for hatchery facility maintenance
improvements.
(11) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $409,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for estimates of juvenile
abundance of federally listed salmon and steelhead populations. The
department shall report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with a letter stating
the use and measurable results of activities that are supported by
these funds.
(12) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the strategic budget and
accountability program.
(13) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(14) Prior to submitting its 2009-11 biennial operating and capital
budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office of
financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery
scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This review
shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG
recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on
their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the
recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed
requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The
department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of
financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by
October 1, 2008.
(15) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5447 (coastal Dungeness crab). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(17) $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $204,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5923 (aquatic invasive species). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(19) $352,000 of the wildlife rehabilitation account is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5188 (wildlife
rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of fish and
wildlife to participate in the upper Columbia salmon recovery plan
implementation, habitat conservation plan hatchery committees, and the
priest rapids salmon and steelhead agreement hatchery technical
committee.
(21)(a) Within existing funds, the department of fish and wildlife
shall sell the upper 20-acre parcel of the Beebe springs property.
(b) Proceeds from the sale are to be used to develop the Beebe
springs natural interpretive site. Up to $300,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
the development of the Beebe springs natural interpretive site. The
department shall not expend more than the amount received from the sale
proceeds.
(22) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2049 (marine resource committees). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study of introducing oxygen
to the waters of Hood Canal. The study shall propose a location in a
small marine area where a large number of bottom-dwelling fish species
exist, and analyze the impact of injected dissolved oxygen on aquatic
life. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the results of the study and recommend whether to
proceed with a project to inject oxygen into Hood Canal.
(24) $1,310,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to replace state wildlife account funds
for the engineering program and $610,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 are provided solely to replace state
wildlife account funds for the hydraulic project permitting program,
including the development of a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic
project approval program to make the program self supporting. Fees may
be based on factors relating to the complexity of the permit issuance.
The fees received by the department must be deposited into the state
wildlife account and shall be expended exclusively for the purposes of
the hydraulic project permitting program. By December 1, 2008, the
department shall provide a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic
project approval program to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(25) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely to the department to work in
cooperation with the department of natural resources to assist with the
implementation of the wild horse coordinated resource management plan.
Implementation may include providing grant funding to other state and
nonstate entities as needed.
(26) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to develop
siting guidelines for power generation facilities, provide technical
assistance for permitting, support voluntary compliance with the
guidelines, and to conduct bird and wildlife assessments on state lands
most eligible for wind power leases.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop and maintain an
electronic database for aquatic farmer registration. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(28) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall not make a
permanent closure of any hatchery facility currently in operation.
(29) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2008.
(30) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((33))) (31) The department shall complete an inventory of
department purchased or leased lands acquired for mixed agriculture and
fish and wildlife habitat and provide for each purchase or lease
agreement the cost and date of the agreement, the previous use of the
land, any agreement or deed specifying continuing use of the land, and
the current management cost and status of each parcel of purchased or
leased lands. The department shall provide the inventory to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(((34))) (32) $289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $301,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for selective fisheries.
(((35))) (33) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(((36))) (34) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a review of the effectiveness
of the department's existing hydraulic project approval process and
environmental outcomes.
(((37))) (35) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement the 2008 Wiley Slough
restoration project report to the legislature recommendation to
establish a private farmland, public recreation partnership that would
provide farmland preservation, waterfowl management, and public
recreational access.
(((38))) (36) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Ebey Island property management
costs.
(((39))) (37)(a) A work group on Electron dam salmon passage is
established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The department of fish and wildlife shall appoint at least
one representative from each of the following entities: The department
of fish and wildlife, Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and Puget Sound
energy.
(b) The department of fish and wildlife shall provide staff support
to the work group.
(c) The work group shall study possible enhancements for improving
outbound juvenile salmon passage at Electron dam on the Puyallup river.
(d) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(e) The expenses of the work group, other than travel expenses of
legislative members, shall be paid within existing funds from the
department of fish and wildlife.
(f) The work group shall present its findings and recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2009.
(g) This subsection expires January 1, 2009.
(((40))) (38) As part of its 2009-11 biennial budget request, the
department shall submit a report detailing the methodology for
determining the value of payment in lieu of taxes as provided in RCW
79.70.130. At a minimum, the report will show the number of acres
subject to the payment in lieu of taxes, the tax rates assumed by each
affected county, and the resulting value of the state general fund
obligation.
(((41))) (39) Within the appropriations in this section, specific
funding is provided to implement Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6821 (fish
and wildlife information).
(((42))) (40) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6227 (outer coast marine resources committees). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((43))) (41) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6231
(marine protected areas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 308 2008 c 329 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,328,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,345,000))
$48,695,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,855,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,616,000))
$57,603,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,196,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,524,000))
$2,523,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,899,000))
$7,897,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,326,000))
$94,633,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,280,000))
$3,279,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,349,000))
$1,348,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,650,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,047,000))
$2,046,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($325,169,000))
$321,807,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,021,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,043,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $13,920,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $13,542,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts provided
in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(3) Fees approved by the department of natural resources and the
board of natural resources in the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $199,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forests, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(5) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. The department shall compile the outcomes of these grants
annually and submit them to the office of financial management by
September 1 of 2008 and 2009.
(6) $400,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department shall prepare a feasibility study that analyzes
applicable business processes and develops the scope, requirements, and
alternatives for replacement of the department's current suite of
payroll-support systems. The department shall use an independent
consultant to assist with the study, and shall submit the completed
analysis to the office of financial management, the department of
personnel, and the department of information services by August 1,
2008.
(8) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue interagency agreements
with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology
for forest and fish report field implementation tasks.
(9) All department staff serving as recreation-management trail
stewards shall be noncommissioned.
(10) $112,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts. The
department may enter into agreements with federal agencies to eradicate
spartina from private lands that may provide a source of reinfestation
to public lands.
(11) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to convene and
staff a work group to study issues related to wildfire prevention and
protection. The work group shall be composed of members representing
rural counties in eastern and western Washington, fire districts,
environmental protection organizations, industrial forest landowners,
the agricultural community, the beef industry, small forest landowners,
the building industry, realtors, the governor or a designee, the
insurance commissioner or a designee, the office of financial
management, the state fire marshal or a designee, the state building
code council, and the commissioner or public lands or a designee. The
work group shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2008.
(12) $249,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(13) $2,000,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6044 (derelict vessels). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(14) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $14,000 of the forest development account--state appropriation
and $52,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the removal of one or two
large floating dry docks off Lake Washington near the Port Quendall
site in north Renton.
(17) $547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $22,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state
appropriation and $22,000 of the resources management cost account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (surface mining reclamation). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely to extend the 2005-2007 contract with
the University of Washington college of forestry resources for
additional research and technical assistance on the future of
Washington forests. Reports shall be submitted by June 30, 2009, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the following topics:
(a) An exploration of the potential markets for renewable energy
from biomass from Washington forests, especially from material removed
from eastern Washington forests as part of forest health improvement
efforts. This exploration shall assess the feasibility of converting
large amounts of underutilized forest biomass into useful products and
green energy by providing required analyses needed to efficiently
collect and deliver forest biomass to green energy end users. The role
of transportation and processing infrastructure in developing markets
for such material for both clean energy and value-added products shall
be included in the exploration. The college shall coordinate with
Washington State University efforts to identify what new biological,
chemical, and engineering technologies are emerging for converting
forest biomass to clean and efficient energy.
(b) Recommendations for the college's northwest environmental forum
for retaining the highest valued working forest lands at risk of
conversion to nonforest uses. These recommendations should include an
examination of means to enhance biodiversity through strategic
retention of certain lands, as well as economic incentives for
landowners to retain lands as working forests and provide ecosystem
services. The recommendations shall consider the health and value of
the forest lands, the rate of loss of working forest lands in the area,
the risk to timber processing infrastructure from continued loss of
working forest lands, and the multiple benefits derived from retaining
working forest lands. The recommendations shall prioritize forest
lands in the Cascade foothills, which include the area generally
encompassing the nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range
and drainages lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above
mean sea level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King,
Pierce, Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(20) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Chelan county, as the chair of
the Stemilt partnership, to perform the following:
(a) Work with private and public land management entities to
identify and evaluate land ownership possibilities;
(b) Allocate up to $10,000 to the department of fish and wildlife
to perform technical studies, baseline assessments, environmental
review, due diligence, and similar real estate evaluations; and
(c) Implement real estate transactions based on the results of the
studies.
(21) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for health benefits to Washington
conservation corps employees.
(22) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff support for the natural
heritage program to integrate, analyze, and provide bird area
information, and for state designations and mapping support, among
other activities.
(23) $48,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall participate in a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, convened by the department
of ecology. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $150,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5445 (cost-reimbursement agreements). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with
the Puget Sound partnership to complete a final habitat conservation
plan for state-owned aquatic lands and an environmental impact
statement by June 2009.
(26) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2844 (urban forestry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((28))) (27) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to complete maps of lower Hood
Canal, including subsurface geologic layers, lithology, digital layers,
and maps to identify liquifiable sediments for hazard mitigation. The
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on maps that were produced by December 1, 2008.
(((29))) (28) As part of its 2009-11 biennial budget request, the
department shall submit a report detailing the methodology for
determining the value of payment in lieu of taxes as provided in RCW
79.70.130. At a minimum, the report will show the number of acres
subject to the payment in lieu of taxes, the tax rates assumed by each
affected county, and the resulting value of the state general fund
obligation.
(((30))) (29) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to supplement other available funds
for an analysis of whether forest practices rules (including rules for
harvest on potentially unstable slopes, road construction and
maintenance, and post-harvest slash treatment) effectively protect
public resources and public safety from landslides, and other storm-related impacts. The analysis is to be accomplished using the forest
practices board adaptive management process. The cooperative
monitoring, evaluation, and research (CMER) committee of the adaptive
management program shall submit a report of its preliminary analysis
and conclusions to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008. The forest practices board shall submit a complete
report of the CMER study on the effectiveness of current prescriptions
and practices by June 30, 2009. This amount is ongoing solely to make
improvements to the state's geological survey.
(((31))) (30) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House
Bill No. 2472 (recreational opportunities).

Sec. 309 2008 c 329 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,073,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,555,000))
$13,020,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,329,000))
$11,325,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,052,000))
$2,051,000
Energy Freedom Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($605,000))
$604,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,100,000))
$4,098,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,297,000))
$46,754,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during fiscal year 2009 the
department is further authorized to increase the apple pest
certification assessment by up to $0.015 per hundredweight of fruit.
(2) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(3) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(4) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study to evaluate the use of
sugar beets for the production of biofuels.
(5) $275,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $275,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for direct allocation, without
deduction, to the Washington tree fruit research commission,
established under chapter 15.26 RCW, for development and implementation
of a pest management transition program to reduce the use by the tree
fruit industry of certain organophosphate insecticides.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($250,000)) $225,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution
to counties with weed boards to control invasive weeds. Of this
amount, $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to control Japanese knotweed in
counties with weed boards.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($250,000)) $162,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for pass through
funding to the nonprofit opportunities industrialization center to
provide training to agricultural workers related to farm skills,
English as a second language, and other skills.
(8) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $35,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for funding to the Pacific county
noxious weed control board to continue its planning and implementation
of spartina eradication activities.
(9) (($290,000)) $148,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) (($57,000)) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2815 (greenhouse gases emissions). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 310 2008 c 329 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($737,000))
$707,000

Sec. 311 2008 c 329 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($654,000))
$560,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,655,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,098,000
State Toxics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,710,000))
$1,510,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,147,000))
$15,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $600,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,400,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,500,000 of the general
fund--private/local appropriation are provided solely for the education
of citizens through attracting and utilizing volunteers to engage in
activities that result in environmental benefits.
(2) $2,208,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $370,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($630,000)) $560,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,155,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, then $2,208,000 of the
water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
$2,209,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $1,155,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are appropriated to the office of the governor for operation of
the Puget Sound action team.
(3) To implement the 2007-09 Puget Sound biennial plan required by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership),
funding is provided solely for Puget Sound recovery activities in the
budgets of selected agencies and institutions of higher education,
including the department of agriculture, department of community, trade
and economic development, conservation commission, department of
ecology, department of fish and wildlife, department of health,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, department of natural
resources, state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound
partnership, University of Washington, and Washington State University.
During the 2007-09 biennium, moneys are provided solely for these
agencies and institutions of higher education as provided for in LEAP
document PSAT-2007.
(4) $305,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $305,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for an outcome monitoring program
first for Puget Sound and Washington's coastline and then across the
remaining salmon recovery regions across the state.
(((6))) (5) $852,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $231,000 of the water quality
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $900,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of the 2020 action agenda.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2008 c 329 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,730,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,055,000))
$1,686,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,457,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,163,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,311,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,063,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,667,000
Business and Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,680,000))
$11,201,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Funeral Directors And Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,417,000))
$48,569,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or
business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that
profession, occupation, or business. For each licensing program
covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at levels
sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded
in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the
2007-09 fiscal biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of
the fiscal growth factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund
the costs of the licensing programs. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and
43.24.086, the department is further authorized to increase the
following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting
business and the appropriation levels in this section: Real estate
appraiser certification, by not more than $30 in fiscal year 2009; real
estate appraiser certification, original via reciprocity, by not more
than $30 in fiscal year 2009; security guard license, original, by not
more than $30 in fiscal year 2009; security guard license, renewal, by
not more than $30 in 2009; and skills testing fee, a new fee may be
established of not more than $100 for most drivers and $75 for
nonprofit ECEAP or head start program.
(2) $230,000 of the master license account--state appropriation is
provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1461
(manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $64,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6437 (bail bond agents). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $210,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6606 (home inspectors). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to conduct a review of
the need for regulation of general and specialty contractors involved
in the repair, alteration, or construction of single-family homes using
the public interest criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010 and as
generally described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 3349
(residential contractors). By October 1, 2008, the department and the
department of labor and industries shall report their findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(6) The department of licensing and the department of health shall
jointly review and report to the appropriate policy committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008, recommendations for implementing a
process of holding in abeyance for up to six months following the
conclusion of active duty service the expiration of, and currency
requirements for, professional licenses and certificates for
individuals who have been called to active duty military service.
(7) The higher education coordinating board, the department of
licensing, and the department of health shall jointly review and report
to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1,
2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the extent to which
veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills sets and
education required while in service to certification, licensure, and
degree requirements.

Sec. 402 2008 c 329 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,262,000))
$28,334,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,629,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,680,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,687,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,133,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,010,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,007,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,429,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,057,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,037,000))
$115,109,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $282,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $357,000 of the fingerprint identification
account--state appropriation are provided solely for workload
associated with implementation of the federal Adam Walsh Act -- the
Children's Safety and Violent Crime Reduction Act of 2006.
(2) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of performing
criminal history and background checks activities. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of
the criminal history and background check activities.
(3) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(4) $350,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement the provisions of Senate
Bill No. 6119 (firefighter apprenticeship training program). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for efforts to reduce the number of
convicted offender biological samples awaiting DNA analysis.
(6) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5642 (cigarette
ignition).

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2008 c 329 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(((1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS))
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,161,000))
$36,444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,223,000))
$38,830,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,292,000))
$77,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,676,000))
$152,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((a))) (1) A maximum of $11,920,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and a maximum of $12,019,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are ((provided
solely)) for the operation and expenses of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Within the amounts provided in
this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary
accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong
understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive
the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The students selected for
the award must demonstrate understanding through completion of at least
one of the classroom-based civics assessment models developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, and through leadership in the
civic life of their communities. The superintendent shall select two
students from eastern Washington and two students from western
Washington to receive the award, and shall notify the governor and
legislature of the names of the recipients.
(((b))) (2) $1,080,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $815,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses
of the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Within the amounts provided, the board shall implement the
provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education) for which it is responsible,
including: (((i))) (a) Develop a comprehensive set of recommendations
for an accountability system; (((ii))) (b) adopt high school graduation
requirements aligned with international performance standards in
mathematics and science and, in conjunction with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, identify no more than three
curricula that are aligned with these standards; and (((iii))) (c)
review all requirements related to the high school diploma as directed
by section 405, chapter 263, Laws of 2006.
(((c))) (3) $4,779,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $6,248,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the
professional educator standards board for the following:
(((i))) (a) $930,000 in fiscal year 2008 and (($1,284,000))
$1,257,000 in fiscal year 2009 are for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board, including
administering the alternative routes to certification program, pipeline
for paraeducators conditional scholarship loan program, and the
retooling to teach math conditional loan program. Within the amounts
provided in this subsection (((1)(d)(i))) (3)(a), the professional
educator standards board shall: (((A))) (i) Revise the teacher
mathematics endorsement competencies and alignment of teacher tests to
the updated competencies; (((B))) (ii) review teacher preparation
requirements in cultural understanding and make recommendations for
strengthening these standards; (((C))) (iii) create a new professional
level teacher assessment; (((D))) (iv) expand the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for business professionals and
instructional assistants who will teach math and science; (((E))) (v)
revise requirements for college and university teacher preparation
programs to match a new knowledge- and skill-based performance system;
and (((F))) (vi) test implementation of a revised teacher preparation
program approach that is classroom experience-intensive and
performance-based;
(((ii))) (b) $3,269,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($4,289,000)) $3,966,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are for conditional
scholarship loans and mentor stipends provided through the alternative
routes to certification program administered by the professional
educator standards board. Of the amounts provided in this subsection
(((1)(d)(ii))) (3)(b):
(((A))) (i) $500,000 each year is provided solely for conditional
scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in special education,
math, science, or bilingual education;
(((B))) (ii) $2,210,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $3,230,000 for
fiscal year 2009 are for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans
and mentor stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math, science, special
education or bilingual education ((as follows: (I) For route one
interns (those currently holding associates of arts degrees), in fiscal
year 2008, 120 interns seeking endorsements in the specified subject
areas and for fiscal year 2009, an additional 120 interns in the
specified subject areas; and (II) for all other routes, funding is
provided each year for 140 interns seeking endorsements in the
specified subject areas));
(((C))) (iii) Remaining amounts in this subsection (((1)(d)(ii)))
(3)(b) shall be used to continue existing alternative routes to
certification programs; and
(((D))) (iv) Candidates seeking math and science endorsements under
(((A))) (i) and (((B))) (ii) of this subsection (3)(b) shall receive
priority for funding;
(((iii))) (c) $236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington
teachers program established in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation);
(((iv))) (d) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and (($200,000)) $110,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 provided in this subsection
(((1)(d))) (3) are for $4,000 conditional loan stipends for
paraeducators participating in the pipeline for paraeducators
established in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education); and
(((v))) (e) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are for conditional stipends for certificated
teachers pursuing a mathematics or science endorsement under the
retooling to teach mathematics or science program established in Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education). The conditional stipends shall be for endorsement exam
fees as well as stipends for teachers who must also complete
coursework.
(((d) $555,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for increased attorney general
fees related to education litigation.
(e) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (4) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the professional educator standards board
(PESB) to convene a work group to develop recommendations for
increasing teacher knowledge, skills, and competencies to address the
needs of English language learner students, pursuant to Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673 (student learning opportunities). ((If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(f))) (5) $425,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,975,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are ((provided solely)) for
replacement of the apportionment system, which includes the processes
that collect school district budget and expenditure information,
staffing characteristics, and the student enrollments that drive the
funding process.
(((g) $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide)) (6) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for direct services
and support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach
to instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Specific integration efforts will
focus on science, math, and the social sciences. Integration between
basic education and career and technical education, particularly
agricultural and natural sciences education, is to be a major element.
(((h) $1,336,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,227,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (7) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the creation of a
statewide data base of longitudinal student information. This amount
is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in section
902 of this act.
(((i) $325,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (8) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for comprehensive cultural
competence and anti-bias education programs for educators and students.
The office of superintendent of public instruction shall administer
grants to school districts with the assistance and input of groups such
as the anti-defamation league and the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(((j) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (9) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is to promote the financial
literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the
financial literacy public-private partnership.
(((k) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (10) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5843 (regarding educational
data and data systems). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(l) $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (11) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1052 (legislative youth advisory council).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((m) $162,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (12) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422 (children and families
of incarcerated parents). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(n) $28,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (13) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (Washington college bound
scholarship). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((o) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (14) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (regarding providing
medically and scientifically accurate sexual health education in
schools). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(p) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the office of superintendent of public
instruction to convene a workgroup to develop school food allergy
guidelines and policies for school district implementation. The
workgroup shall complete the development of the food allergy guidelines
and policies by March 31, 2008, in order to allow for school district
implementation in the 2008-2009 school year. The guidelines developed
shall incorporate state and federal laws that impact management of food
allergies in school settings.
(q) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (15) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is ((to support)) for a program
to recognize the work of outstanding classified staff in school
districts throughout the state.
(((r) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (16) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is ((to support)) for a full-time
director of skills centers within the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.
(((s) $555,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (17) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is ((to)) for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to contract with the northwest
educational research laboratory (NWREL) to conduct two educational
studies. Specifically, NWREL shall:
(((i))) (a) Conduct a study regarding teacher preparation,
training, and coordinated instructional support strategies for English
language learners, as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and
achievement). An interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final
report is due December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the
governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the appropriate early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the
legislature; and
(((ii))) (b) Conduct a study of the effectiveness of the K-3
demonstration projects as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and
achievement). An interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final
report is due December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the
governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the appropriate early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the
legislature.
(((t) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (18) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is ((to)) for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to contract with Washington State
University social and economic sciences research center (WSU-SESRC) to
conduct to educational research studies. The WSU-SESRC shall:
(((i))) (a) Conduct a study which reviews chapter 207, Laws of 2002
(bullying in schools), evaluate the outcomes resulting from the
legislation, and to make recommendations for continued improvement.
The study shall, at a minimum, determine: (((A))) (i) Whether the
policies have been developed and implemented in all elementary, middle,
and high schools; (((B))) (ii) whether there has been any measurable
improvement in the safety and civility of schools' climate and
environment as a result of the legislation; (((C))) (iii) whether there
are still issues that need to be addressed in light of the original
intent of the legislation; and (((D))) (iv) recommended actions to be
taken at the school, district, and state level to address the
identified issues. Additionally, WSU-SESRC shall research and identify
effective programs and the components of effective programs. A report
shall be submitted to the education committees of the legislature and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction by September 1,
2008.
(((ii))) (b) Conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science
instructional coach program as described in Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). Findings
shall include an evaluation of the coach development institute,
coaching support seminars, and other coach support activities;
recommendations with regard to the characteristics required of the
coaches; identification of changes in teacher instruction related to
coaching activities; and identification of the satisfaction level with
coaching activities as experienced by classroom teachers and
administrators. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009. Both the interim and final report
shall be presented to the governor, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature.
(((u) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (19) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for additional costs incurred
by the state board of education in reviewing proposed math standards
and curriculum.
(((v))) (20) During the 2007-09 biennium, to the maximum extent
possible, in adopting new agency rules or making any changes to
existing rules or policies related to the fiscal provisions in the
administration of part V of this act, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall attempt to request approval through the
normal legislative budget process.
(((w) $142,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (21) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for ((the conducting of)) a comprehensive
analysis of math and science teacher supply and demand issues by the
professional educator standards board. By December 1, 2008, the
professional educator standards board shall submit a final report to
the governor and appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature, that includes, but is not limited to: (((i))) (a)
Specific information on the current number of math and science teachers
assigned to teach mathematics and science both with and without
appropriate certification in those subjects by region and statewide;
(((ii))) (b) projected demand information by detailing the number of K-12 mathematics and science teachers needed by the 2010-11 school year
by region and statewide; (((iii))) (c) specific recommendations on how
the demand will be met through recruitment programs, alternative route
certification programs, potential financial incentives, retention
strategies, and other efforts; and (((iv))) (d) identification of
strategies, based on best practices, to improve the rigor and
productivity of state-funded mathematics and science teacher
preparation programs. As part of the final report, the professional
educator standards board and the Washington state institute for public
policy shall provide information from a study of differential pay for
teachers in high-demand subject areas such as mathematics and science,
including the design, successes, and limitations of differential pay
programs in other states. In order for the professional educator
standards board to quantify demand, each school district shall provide
to the board, by a date and in a format specified by the board, the
number of teachers assigned to teach mathematics and science, both with
and without appropriate certification and endorsement in those
subjects, and the number of mathematics and science teaching vacancies
needing to be filled, and the board shall include this data, by
district, in its analysis.
(((x) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (22) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the implementation of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6556 (anaphylactic policy). ((If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(y) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (23) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the implementation of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6742 (guidelines for students with autism) and Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6743 (training for students with autism). ((If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(z))) (24) Within the appropriations in this section, specific
funding is provided for the implementation of Second Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5100 (health insurance information for
students).
(((aa) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (25) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for implementation of Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2722 (achievement gap for African-American students). The
center for the improvement of student learning will convene an advisory
committee to conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for
African-American students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing
the gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left behind act
for all groups of students to meet academic standards by 2014; and
identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress. A
study update shall be submitted by September 15, 2008, and the
committee's final report shall be submitted by December 30, 2008, to
the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education,
the governor, the P-20 council, the basic education finance task force,
and the education committees of the legislature. ((If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(bb))) (26) Within the appropriations in this section specific
funding is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2598
(online mathematics curriculum).
(((cc))) (27) Within the appropriations in this section specific
funding is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2635
(school district boundaries and organization).
(((dd))) (28) Within the appropriations in this section specific
funding is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 3129
(online learning programs for high school students to earn college
credit).
(((ee) $136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (29) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the office of superintendent of public
instruction to assign at least one full-time equivalent staff position
to serve as the world language supervisor.

(((2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,283,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,128,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,890,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,301,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (30) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for a corps of nurses located
at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent
of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(((ii) $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (31) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the school safety center
in the office of the superintendent of public instruction subject to
the following conditions and limitations:
(((A))) (a) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models
of school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(((B))) (b) The school safety center advisory committee shall
develop a training program, using the best practices in school safety,
for all school safety personnel.
(((iii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (32) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for a school safety training
program provided by the criminal justice training commission. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety
personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(((iv) $40,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (33) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the safety center advisory
committee to develop and distribute a pamphlet to promote internet
safety for children, particularly in grades seven through twelve. The
pamphlet shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's
web site. To the extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in
schools throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth,
including but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(((v) $10,344,000)) (34) $9,670,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for safe and drug free schools and
communities grants for drug and violence prevention activities and
strategies.
(((vi) $271,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (35) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for a nonviolence and
leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership. The program shall provide a request for proposal process,
with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership workshops
serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.
(((vii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (36) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for a pilot youth suicide
prevention and information program. The office of superintendent of
public instruction will work with selected school districts and
community agencies in identifying effective strategies for preventing
youth suicide.
(((viii) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (37) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for programs to improve safety
and emergency preparedness and planning in public schools, as generally
described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097. The superintendent of
public instruction shall design and implement the grant program in
consultation with the educational service districts, the school safety
advisory committee, and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs. The funding shall support grants to school districts
for the development and updating of comprehensive safe school plans,
school safety training, and the conducting of safety-related drills.
As a condition of receiving these funds, school districts must ensure
that schools (((A))) (a) conduct at least one lockdown and one shelter
in place safety drill each school year, and (((B))) (b) send updated
school mapping database information on an annual basis to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(((ix) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (38) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the Washington state school directors'
association to mediate and facilitate a school disciplinary action task
force to review and make recommendations on a model policy regarding
the use of physical force in schools. The model policy shall be
submitted to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2008.
(((b) TECHNOLOGY
(i) $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (39) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for K-20 telecommunications
network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures
and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing
and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(((ii))) (40) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall coordinate, in collaboration with educational service
districts, a system of outreach to school districts not currently
maximizing their eligibility for federal e-rate funding through the
schools and libraries program administered by the federal
communications commission. By December 15, 2008, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall issue a report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature identifying school districts that were
eligible but did not apply for e-rate funding for the last two years,
and an estimate of the amounts for which they were eligible in those
years. The report shall also include recommendations for following-up
on the findings relative to the e-rate program contained in the state
auditor's performance audit of educational service districts completed
September, 2007.
(((c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $652,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (41) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is to expand the special services
pilot project to include up to seven participating districts. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate these
funds to the district or districts participating in the pilot program
according to the provisions of RCW 28A.630.016. ((Of the amounts
provided, $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to conduct a study of the expanded special services
pilot.
(ii) $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (42) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.
(((iii) $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (43) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is ((to support)) for vocational
student leadership organizations.
(((iv) $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (44) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the Washington civil
liberties education program.
(((v) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (45) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the Washington
state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be used to
support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match
community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers
scholars.
(((vi) $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (46) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the Lorraine Wojahn
dyslexia pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(((vii) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (47) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for developing and
disseminating curriculum and other materials documenting women's role
in World War II.
(((viii) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (48) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for incentive grants for
districts and pilot projects to develop preapprenticeship programs.
Incentive grant awards up to $10,000 each shall be used to support the
program's design, school/business/labor agreement negotiations, and
recruiting high school students for preapprenticeship programs in the
building trades and crafts.
(((ix) $3,220,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $3,220,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (49) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the
dissemination of the Navigation 101 curriculum to all districts,
including disseminating electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of the implementation of Navigation 101 on
student performance, and grants to at least one hundred school
districts each year for the implementation of the Navigation 101
program. The implementation grants will be limited to a maximum of two
years and the school districts selected shall represent various regions
of the state and reflect differences in school district size and
enrollment characteristics.
(((x) $36,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (50) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the enhancement of civics
education. Of this amount, $25,000 each year is provided solely for
competitive grants to school districts for curriculum alignment,
development of innovative civics projects, and other activities that
support the civics assessment established in chapter 113, Laws of 2006.
(((xi) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (51) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1573 (authorizing a
statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention,
and retrieval). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(xii) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (52) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the communities in school
program in Pierce county.
(((xiii) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (53) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is ((to)) for support and
((expand)) expansion of the mentoring advanced placement program in
current operation in southwest Washington.
(((xiv) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (54) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for program initiatives to
address the educational needs of Latino students and families. ((Using
the full amounts of the appropriations under this subsection,)) The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with
the Seattle community coalition of compana quetzal to provide for three
initiatives: (((A))) (a) Early childhood education; (((B))) (b) parent
leadership training; and (((C))) (c) high school success and college
preparation programs. Campana quetzal shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 2009, regarding impact
of the programs on addressing the academic achievement gap, including
high school drop- out rates and college readiness rates, for Latino
students.
(((xvii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely)) (55) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2870 (professional development for
instructional assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((xix) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely)) (56) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for a pilot project to
encourage bilingual high school students to pursue public school
teaching as a profession. ((Using the full amounts of the
appropriation under this subsection,)) The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall contract with the Latino/a educational
achievement project (LEAP) to work with school districts to identify
and mentor not fewer than fifty bilingual students in their junior year
of high school, encouraging them to become bilingual instructors in
schools with high English language learner populations. Students shall
be mentored by bilingual teachers and complete a curriculum developed
and approved by the participating districts.

Sec. 502 2008 c 329 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,436,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,477,998,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,373,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,265,714,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2008-09 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (g)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(i) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (i) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
58.75 average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.11 percent in the 2007-08 school year and 16.75 percent in the 2008-09 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 17.04 percent in the
2007-08 school year and 18.72 percent in the 2008-09 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,703 per certificated staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a
maximum of $10,178 per certificated staff unit in the 2008- 09 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $23,831 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $24,999 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $18,489 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $19,395 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $555.20 for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) $1,870,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,421,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1432 (granting service credit to educational
staff associates for nonschool employment). ((If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.))
(10) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $16,620,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2008 and 2009
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $547,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2008
and a maximum of $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2009;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2008 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2009 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $393,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $9,373,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for allocations for equipment replacement in
vocational programs and skills centers. Each year of the biennium, the
funding shall be allocated based on $75 per full-time equivalent
vocational student and $125 per full-time equivalent skills center
student.
(f) (($2,991,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $4,403,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation
of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5790 (regarding skills centers).
((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.))
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.7 percent from the 2006-07 school year to the
2007-08 school year and 6.0 percent from the 2007-08 school year to the
2008-09 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(13) The appropriation levels in part V of this act assume
implementation of the reimbursement provisions of Senate Bill No. 6450
(school district reimbursement of performance audits).

Sec. 503 2008 c 329 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,519,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,248,000))
$8,530,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,767,000))
$16,049,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) $1,662,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2008 and $3,355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for regional professional
development related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instructional strategies. For each educational service district,
$184,933 is provided in fiscal year 2008 for professional development
activities related to mathematics curriculum and instruction and
$372,357 is provided in fiscal year 2009 for professional development
activities related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instruction. Each educational service district shall use this funding
solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff
with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional
development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures
related to providing regional professional development support. The
office of superintendent of public instruction shall also allocate to
each educational service district additional amounts provided in
section 504 of this act for compensation increases associated with the
salary amounts and staffing provided in this subsection (2).
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 504 2008 c 329 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,272,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,985,000))
$85,135,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($120,790,000))
$117,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,568,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($429,615,000))
$421,865,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $19,716,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($21,996,000)) $20,948,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $1,350,000 of the education legacy
trust account--state appropriation, and $15,870,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning
(WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of retake
assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and implementation
of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or
around June 10th of each year. In addition to the amounts provided for
the Washington assessments of student learning in this subsection,
$11,372,000 is also included in the appropriations to the office of
financial management in this act for an interagency agreement with the
office of superintendent of public instruction for the expenditure of
those funds based on compliance with certain requirements.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 3166 (design of the state assessment system and the Washington
assessment of student learning), including section 3 of the act
providing for end-of-course tests in math. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and (($4,400,000)) $1,630,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the development and
implementation of diagnostic assessments, subject to the following
terms and conditions:
(a) A maximum of $2,540,000 of the funding provided in this
subsection shall support the development and implementation of
voluntary classroom-based diagnostic assessments and progress
monitoring tools for all subject areas included in the WASL by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(b) $2,360,000 of the funding provided in this subsection is for
allocations to school districts to purchase assessment tools which
supplement the system of diagnostic tests developed by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction as described in (a) of this
subsection.
(4) (($70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for ((the)) second grade assessments.
(5) $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for (a) the tenth grade
mathematics assessment tool that: (i) Presents the mathematics
essential learnings in segments for assessment; (ii) is comparable in
content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics WASL when all segments
are considered together; (iii) is reliable and valid; and (iv) can be
used to determine a student's academic performance level; (b) tenth
grade mathematics knowledge and skill learning modules to teach middle
and high school students specific skills that have been identified as
areas of difficulty for tenth grade students; and (c) making the
modules available on-line.
(6) (($2,267,000)) $1,966,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and (($2,367,000)) $2,337,000 of the
education legacy trust account appropriation are provided solely to
develop a system of mathematics and science standards and instructional
materials that are internationally competitive and consistent with
emerging best practices research. Funding in this subsection shall
fund all of the following specific projects:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in mathematics as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education). Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
mathematics selected by the board, and convening education
practitioners and community members in an advisory capacity regarding
revised standards in mathematics.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic mathematics curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised
mathematics standards.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in science as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education. Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
science selected by the board, and convening education practitioners
and community members in an advisory capacity regarding revised
standards in science.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic science curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised science
standards.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate science textbooks, instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the
revised science standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted,
results will be shared with science teachers, other educators, and
community members.
(f) Funding is provided for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to develop WASL knowledge and skill learning modules
to assist students performing at tenth grade level 1 and level 2 in
science.
(g) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is
provided solely to the state board of education to increase capacity to
implement the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education) and Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(7) $8,950,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is ((provided solely)) for allocations to districts for salaries and
benefits for the equivalent of two additional professional development
days each school year for fourth and fifth grade teachers. The
allocations shall be made based on the calculations of certificated
instructional staff units for fourth and fifth grade provided in
section 502 of this act and on the calculations of compensation
provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008. In the 2007-08 school year, the
professional development activities funded by this subsection shall be
focused on development of mathematics knowledge and instructional
skills and on improving instruction in science. In the 2008-09 school
year, the additional professional development shall focus on skills
related to implementing the new international mathematics and science
standards and curriculum. Districts may use the funding to support
additional days for professional development as well as job-embedded
forms of professional development.
(8) $13,058,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
((provided solely)) for allocations to districts for salaries and
benefits for the equivalent of three additional professional
development days for middle and high school math teachers and the
equivalent of three additional professional development days for middle
and high school science teachers. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall develop rules to determine the number of math
and science teachers in middle and high schools within each district.
Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are intended to be
formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant budget
drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008. Districts may
use the funding to support additional days for professional development
as well as job-embedded forms of professional development, consistent
with the following:
(a) For middle school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on development of basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills and the additional science professional
development shall focus on examination of student science assessment
data and identification of science knowledge and skill areas in need of
additional instructional attention. For middle school teachers during
the 2008-09 school year the additional math professional development
shall focus on skills related to implementing the new international
mathematics standards and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international science standards.
(b) For high school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on skills related to implementing state math learning
modules, the segmented math class/assessment program, the collection of
evidence alternative assessment, and basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills, and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to examination of student
science assessment data and identification of science knowledge and
skill areas in need of additional instructional attention. For high
school teachers during the 2008-09 school year the additional math
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international mathematics standards and the additional science
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international science standards.
(9) $17,491,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
((provided solely)) for allocations to districts for specialized
professional development in math for one math teacher and one science
teacher in each middle school and one math teacher and one science
teacher in each high school. The allocations shall be based on five
additional professional development days per teacher and an additional
allocation per teacher of $1,500 for training costs. In order to
generate an allocation under this subsection, a teacher must
participate in specialized professional development that leads to the
implementation of mathematics and science courses that add new rigor to
the math and science course offerings in the school. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008.
(10) $5,376,000 of the education legacy trust account-- state
appropriation is provided solely for a math and science instructional
coaches program pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education). Funding shall be used
to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math in the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years and twenty-five instructional coaches in middle
and high school science in the 2008-09 school years; and up to $300,000
may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to administer and coordinate the program. Each instructional coach
will receive five days of training at a coaching institute prior to
being assigned to serve two schools each. These coaches will attend
meetings during the year to further their training and assist with
coordinating statewide trainings on math and science.
(11) $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). ((If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.)) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide allocations to districts for middle and
junior high school students in accordance with the funding formulas
provided in section 502 of this act. Although the allocations are
formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall consider the
funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall adjust
funding to stay within the amounts provided in this subsection.
(12) (($143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(13) (($5,303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $5,303,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for in-service
training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific science
center and for the Washington state leadership assistance for science
education reform (LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the
Pacific science center.
(14) $51,701,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill 5841 (enhancing student learning
opportunities and achievement). The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary
full-day program in a recipient school shall count as one-half of one
full-time equivalent student for the purpose of making allocations
under this subsection. Although the allocations are formula-driven,
the office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit the number of
recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts appropriated each
fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided in this
subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten programs for
10 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2007-08 school year and 20
percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2008-09 school year. Funding
priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty levels, as
measured by prior year free and reduced priced lunch eligibility rates
in each school. Additionally, as a condition of funding, school
districts must agree to provide the full-day program to the children of
parents who request it in each eligible school. For the purposes of
calculating a school district levy base, funding provided in this
subsection shall be considered a state block grant program under RCW
84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(15) (($65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is ((to)) for support of a full-day
kindergarten "lighthouse" resource program at the Bremerton school
district, as provided in Engrossed Second Senate Bill No. 5841
(enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). The
purpose of the program is to provide technical assistance to districts
in the initial stages of implementing a high quality full-day
kindergarten program.
(16) (($3,047,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for grants for three demonstration projects
for kindergarten through grade three. The purpose of the grants is to
implement best practices in developmental learning in kindergarten
through third grade pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement).
(17) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(18) (($661,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $684,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for grants to school districts to implement
emerging best practices activities in support of classroom teachers'
instruction of students, with a first language other than English, who
struggle with acquiring academic English skills, as outlined in
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement). Best practices shall focus on
professional development for classroom teachers and support of
instruction for English language learners in regular classrooms.
School districts qualifying for these grants shall serve a student
population that reflects many different first languages among their
students. The Northwest educational research laboratory (NWREL) shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the practices supported by the grants as
provided in section 501 of this act. Recipients of these grants shall
cooperate with NWREL in the collection of program data.
(19) (($548,000 of the fiscal year 2008 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2009 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for training of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as
provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(20) (($2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for mentor
teacher assistance, including state support activities, under RCW
28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000
of the amount in this subsection may be used each fiscal year to
operate a mentor academy to help districts provide effective training
for peer mentors. Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be
allocated to school districts based on the number of first year
beginning teachers.
(21) (($705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for the leadership internship program for
superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(22) $105,765,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(23)(((a) $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for a principal support
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
contract with an independent organization to administer the program.
The program shall include: (((i))) (a) Development of an
individualized professional growth plan for a new principal or
principal candidate; and (((ii))) (b) participation of a mentor
principal who works over a period of between one and three years with
the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her build the
skills identified as critical to the success of the professional growth
plan. Within the amounts provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to
support additional participation of secondary principals.
(((b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (24) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is ((to)) for the
office of the superintendent of public instruction for focused
assistance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall conduct educational audits of low-performing schools and enter
into performance agreements between school districts and the office to
implement the recommendations of the audit and the community. Each
educational audit shall include recommendations for best practices and
ways to address identified needs and shall be presented to the
community in a public meeting to seek input on ways to implement the
audit and its recommendations.
(((24) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (25) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for a high school
and school district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in subsection (25)(b) of this section. The state funding for
this improvement program will match an equal amount committed by a
nonprofit foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(((25) A maximum of $375,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and a maximum of $500,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided))
(26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
summer accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of
public instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff
with training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall offer at least one institute specifically for
improving instruction in mathematics in fiscal years 2008 and 2009 and
at least one institute specifically for improving instruction in
science in fiscal year 2009.
(((26) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided)) (27) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the evaluation of mathematics textbooks,
other instructional materials, and diagnostic tools to determine the
extent to which they are aligned with the state standards. Once the
evaluations have been conducted, results will be shared with math
teachers, other educators, and community members for the purposes of
validating the conclusions and then selecting up to three curricula,
supporting materials, and diagnostic instruments as those best able to
assist students to learn and teachers to teach the content of
international standards. In addition, the office of the superintendent
shall continue to provide support and information on essential
components of comprehensive, school-based reading programs.
(((27) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (28) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the
mathematics helping corps subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(((28) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (29) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(((29))) (30) $30,706,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the reading first program under Title I
of the no child left behind act.
(((a))) (31) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to award five grants to parent,
community, and school district partnership programs that will meet the
unique needs of different groups of students in closing the achievement
gap. The legislature intends that the pilot programs will help
students meet state learning standards, achieve the skills and
knowledge necessary for college or the workplace, reduce the
achievement gap, prevent dropouts, and improve graduation rates.
(((b))) (a) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as
to be supplemental to educational services provided in the district and
shall utilize a community partnership based approach to helping
students and their parents.
(((c))) (b) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(((d))) (c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall issue a report to the legislature in the 2009 session on the
progress of each of the pilot programs.
(((30) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (32) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to support and award
Washington community learning center program grants pursuant to
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((31) $1,643,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,667,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (33) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is ((to eliminate))
for the elimination of the lunch co-pay for students in grades
kindergarten through third grade that are eligible for reduced price
lunch.
(((32) $400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely)) (34) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for the development of mathematics support
activities provided by community organizations in after school
programs. Pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education), the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall administer grants to community organizations
that partner with school districts to provide these activities and
develop a mechanism to report program and student success.
(((33) $5,222,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $5,285,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (35) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for: (a) The meals
for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to
eliminate the breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price
lunch; and (c) for additional assistance for school districts
initiating a summer food service program.
(((34) $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (36) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the Washington
reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members
to low- performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2007 through August 31, 2009.
(((35) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (37) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for grants to
school districts to provide a continuum of care for children and
families to help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals from
school districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively
with community service providers. If a continuum of care program
exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the
greatest extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to
RCW 70.190.040.
(((36) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (38) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for improving
technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district
technology development, promoting standards for school district
technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology
support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate
a process to facilitate the evaluation and provision of online
curriculum courses to school districts which includes the following:
Creation of a general listing of the types of available online
curriculum courses; a survey conducted by each regional educational
technology support center of school districts in its region regarding
the types of online curriculum courses desired by school districts; a
process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best online
courses in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and
assistance to school districts in procuring and providing the courses
to students.
(((37) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided)) (39) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the development and posting of web-based
instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(((38) $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (40) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the operation of the
center for the improvement of student learning pursuant to RCW
28A.300.130.
(((39) $12,400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely)) (41) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for one-time allocations for technology
upgrades and improvements. The funding shall be allocated based on
$3,000 for each elementary school, $6,000 for each middle or junior
high school, and $11,000 for each high school. In cases where a
particular school's grade span or configuration does not fall into
these categories, the office of superintendent of public instruction
will develop an allocation to that school that recognizes the unique
characteristics but maintains the proportionate allocation identified
in this subsection.
(((40) $250,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely)) (42) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for costs associated with office of the
superintendent of public instruction establishing a statewide director
of technology position pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No.
1906 (improving mathematics and science education). ((If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(41)(a) $9,747,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $16,624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely)) (43)(a) Within
the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for the following
bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching
in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher in fiscal year 2008 and adjusted for inflation in fiscal year
2009. Beginning in the 2007-2008 school year and thereafter, national
board certified teachers who become public school principals shall
continue to receive this bonus for as long as they are principals and
maintain the national board certification;
(ii) During the 2007-2008 school year, for national board certified
teachers who teach in schools where at least 70 percent of student
headcount enrollment is eligible for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program, an additional $5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump
sum. Beginning in the 2008-2009 school year and thereafter, an
additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board
certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at
least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch; and
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits. Unless Senate Bill No. 6657 (salary
bonuses for individuals certified by the national board for
professional teaching standards) is enacted by June 30, 2008, the
annual bonus shall not be included in the definition of "earnable
compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "the percent of the student
headcount enrollment eligible for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program" shall be defined as: (i) For the 2007-08 and the 2008-09 school years, schools in which the prior year percentage of students
eligible for the federal free and reduced price lunch program meets the
criteria specified in subsection (41)(a)(ii) of this section; and (ii)
in the 2008-09 school year, any school that met the criterion in (c)(i)
of this subsection in the 2007-08 school year.
(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the office
of superintendent of public instruction shall revise rules to allow
teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching at the
Washington school for the deaf or Washington school for the blind, to
receive the annual bonus amounts specified in this subsection if they
are otherwise eligible.
(((42) $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely)) (44) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, funding is for the implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6377 (career and technical
education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(43) $4,000,000)) (45) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for an allocation
of four dollars and nine cents per full-time equivalent student, or as
much as the funding in this subsection will allow, to maintain and
improve library materials, collections, and services. The funding
provided in this subsection shall be used to augment current funding
for librarian programs provided through basic education and other
existing funding mechanisms. In order to receive allocations under
this section, school districts must agree that to the maximum extent
possible they will ensure that library programs and services are
equitably provided throughout the district.
(((44) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (46) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6483 (local farms-healthy kids and communities). ((Of
the amount provided in subsection, up to $30,000 is provided for
administrative costs associated with implementing the legislation and
at least $570,000 is provided for grants to school districts associated
with implementing the legislation. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(45) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (47) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673 (student learning opportunities) which
requires the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
explore online curriculum support in languages other than English.
((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(47) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) (48) Within the amounts appropriated in
this section, funding is for grants to five skills centers to develop
and plan for implementation of integrated English language
development/career skills programs that pair English language
development teachers with career/technical education instructors in the
classroom. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
skill center staff shall work with the state board for community and
technical colleges I-BEST program staff and local community and
technical college program staff to develop the program to assure
critical program elements are included and that the skill center
programs provide a seamless transition for high school students to the
community and technical college programs for students choosing that
pathway. The request for proposal or grant application shall be issued
no later than May 1, 2008, so that grant recipients can begin program
planning and development efforts on July 1, 2008. The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide the resulting implementation plans
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2008.
(49) (($150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated in this
section, funding is ((to)) for support of public high schools'
participation in the FIRST robotics program. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall issue grants not to exceed
$10,000 per school to be used for teacher stipends, registration fees,
equipment, and other costs associated with direct participation in the
program. High-poverty schools and schools starting up robotics
programs shall be given priority in funding.

Sec. 505 2008 c 329 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,654,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,660,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $559,648,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $220.34 per funded student for the
2007-08 school year and $265.08 per funded student for the 2008-09
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund -- state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(e) If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673 (student learning
opportunities) is enacted by June 30, 2008, in addition to the amounts
allocated in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, an additional amount
shall be allocated to school districts with high concentrations of
poverty and English language learner students beginning in the 2008-2009 school year, subject to the following rules and conditions:
(i) To qualify for additional funding under this subsection, a
district's October headcount enrollment in grades kindergarten through
grade twelve must have at least twenty percent enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program based on an average of the
program headcount taken in October and May of the prior school year;
and must also have at least forty percent eligible for free or reduced
price lunch based on October headcount enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve in the prior school year.
(ii) Districts meeting the specifications in (e)(i) of this
subsection shall receive additional funded students for the learning
assistance program at the rates specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section. The number of additional funded student units shall be
calculated by subtracting twenty percent from the district's percent
transitional bilingual instruction program enrollment as defined in
(e)(i) of this subsection, and the resulting percent shall be
multiplied by the district's kindergarten through twelve annual average
full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school year.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.
(6) (($15,065,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely)) Within the amounts appropriated
in this section, funding is for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673 (student learning opportunities) which
establishes the extended learning program to provide additional
instructional services for eligible students in grades eight, eleven,
and twelve during the regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at
other times in order to meet the needs of these students. This funding
is in addition to the estimated $986,000 of associated compensation
increases associated with this legislation in section 504 of this act.
((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 506 2008 c 329 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,369,000
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($444,970,000))
$436,910,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($868,339,000))
$860,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $450.00 per FTE student for the 2007-
08 school year and $458.10 per FTE student for the 2008-09 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly ((apportionment))
schedule defined in RCW ((28A.510.250)) 28A.505.220.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2008 c 329 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act,
((and)) sections 605 through 611 of this 2008 act, and sections 602
through 608 of this 2009 act, provide state support for full-time
equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher education.
Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by
institutions assumed in this act.

2007-08
Annual
Average 2008-09
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 33,782 34,197

Bothell campus 1,760 1,980

Tacoma campus 2,109 2,349

Washington State University

Main campus 19,112 19,272

Tri-Cities campus 800 865

Vancouver campus 1,888 2,113

Central Washington University 8,952 9,322

Eastern Washington University 8,996 9,184

The Evergreen State College 4,165 4,213

Western Washington University 12,022 12,175

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 136, 102 139, 237

(2) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the Bothell, Tacoma,
Tri-Cities, and Vancouver campuses are the minimum levels at which the
universities should seek to enroll students for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments among campuses.
Intent notice shall be provided to the office of financial management
and reassignment of funded enrollment is contingent upon satisfying
data needed by the forecast division for tracking and monitoring state-supported college enrollment.

Sec. 602 2008 c 329 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $617,805,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($665,052,000))
$631,586,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,432,000))
$105,429,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,800,000
Administrative Contingencies Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,441,039,000))
$1,407,570,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,040,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation and $10,920,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are to expand general enrollments by 900 student
FTEs in academic year 2008 and by an additional 1,050 student FTEs in
academic year 2009.
(2) (($5,720,000)) $21,678,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation and (($11,440,000)) $19,569,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are to expand
((high-demand)) targeted enrollments by ((650)) 1,175 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional ((650)) 1,905 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but are not
limited to, mathematics ((and)); health sciences; early childhood
education programs with a focus on early math awareness; basic skills
education; integrated basic education, skills and language program
(IBEST); apprenticeship training programs; and the existing four
applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges as authorized in chapter 28B.50 RCW. The state board shall
provide data to the office of financial management that is required to
track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the employment of
college graduates related to state investments in high-demand
enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) (($1,960,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand early childhood education programs with a
focus on early math and science awareness by 100 student FTEs in fiscal
year 2008 and by an additional 150 student FTEs in 2009. The board
shall provide data to the office of financial management regarding math
and science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college
graduates related to state investments in math and science programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(4))) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as special funds
for training and related support services, including financial aid, as
specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support up to
6,200 full-time equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(((5) $3,813,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation and $7,625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are for basic skills education enrollments at
community and technical colleges. Budgeted enrollment levels shall
increase by 625 student FTEs each year.
(6))) (4) $3,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $7,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase
salaries and related benefits for part-time faculty. It is intended
that part-time faculty salaries will increase relative to full-time
faculty salaries after all salary increases are collectively bargained.
(((7) $7,350,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is to increase enrollment levels in the integrated basic
education, skills, and language program (I-BEST) by 250 student FTEs
per year. Each student participating on a full-time basis is budgeted
and shall be reported as a single FTE for purposes of this expansion.
(8))) (5) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the transitions math
project. This phase of work shall include the establishment of a
single math placement test to be used at colleges and universities
statewide.
(((9) $2,835,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is to increase enrollment in apprenticeship training
programs by 150 student FTEs in each fiscal year.
(10))) (6) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the community and technical college system by 1,700
students each year. TRIO eligible students include low-income,
first-generation, and college students with disabilities. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 65 percent for TRIO students and other low-income
and first-generation students served through this appropriation.
(((11))) (7)(a) The higher education coordinating board, the office
of financial management, and the higher education institutions
negotiated a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July
31, 2007, the state board for community and technical colleges and the
higher education coordinating board shall review and revise these
targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act.
In addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight global challenge states identified in the
Washington Learns study.
(b) The targets previously agreed by the state board and the higher
education coordinating board are enumerated as follows:
(i) Increase the percentage and number of academic students who are
eligible to transfer to baccalaureate institutions to 18,700;
(ii) Increase the percentage and number of students prepared for
work to 23,490; and
(iii) Increase the percentage and number of basic skills students
who demonstrate substantive skill gain by 22,850.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall report
their progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of
this section to the higher education coordinating board prior to
November 1, 2009.
(((12))) (8) $452,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for start-up and planning funds for
two applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges, of which one degree program must be at a technical college.
The applied baccalaureate degrees shall be specifically designed for
individuals who hold associate of applied science degrees, or
equivalent, in order to maximize application of their technical course
credits toward the applied baccalaureate degree.
(((13))) (9) $2,502,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $5,024,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for faculty
salary increments and associated benefits and may be used in
combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to
provide salary increments and associated benefits for faculty who
qualify through professional development and training. To the extent
general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the
general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount. The state
board shall determine the method of allocating to the community and
technical colleges the appropriations granted for academic employee
increments, provided that the amount of the appropriation attributable
to the proportionate share of the part-time faculty salary base shall
only be accessible for part-time faculty.
(((14))) (10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for higher education student
child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(((15))) (11) $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $2,725,000 of the ((general fund--state
appropriation)) administrative contingency account for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely for administration and customized training
contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make
an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding
implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the
distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state,
and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.
(((16) $504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for 80 student FTEs in the existing four
applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges as authorized in chapter 28B.50 RCW.
(17))) (12) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $15,000,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1096 (postsecondary opportunities).
The state board shall seek additional private sector involvement and
support for the opportunity grants program. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation shall lapse. Remaining amounts in this subsection shall
be used for an opportunity grant program to provide grants covering
community and technical college tuition and fees for up to 45 credits
and books or other materials to be awarded to eligible students.
Program participants will earn credentials or certificates in industry-defined occupations with a need for skilled employees.
(((18))) (13) From within the funds appropriated in this section,
community and technical colleges shall increase salaries for employees
subject to the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732 by an average
of 3.7 percent effective July 1, 2007, and by an average of 3.9 percent
effective July 1, 2008.
(((19))) (14) $1,717,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for
employees who are subject to the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732 by an average of one-half of one percent effective July 1, 2008.
(((20))) (15) From within the funds appropriated in this section,
community and technical colleges shall increase salaries for exempt
professional staff by an average of 3.2 percent effective September 1,
2007, and by an average of 2.0 percent effective September 1, 2008.
(((21))) (16) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for competitive grants to
labor, management, and college partnerships to develop or expand and
evaluate innovative training programs for incumbent hospital workers
that lead to careers in nursing and other high-demand health care
fields. The board shall report to appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008, on the initial
implementation of the program, including components of the program
created, the program sites, and program enrollments including student
background and early progress. By November 2009, the board shall
provide a follow up report that additionally includes information on
student progress and outcomes.
(((22))) (17) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the gateway center pilot
project at Highline community college for coaching and managing student
participants in the pilot program. The coach will be responsible for
credentials interpretation, evaluating prior learning experience,
ensuring licensure guidance, providing academic advising and
translation services, and helping establish employer relationships.
(((25))) (18) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the design, development,
training, and related expenses associated with a joint labor/management
apprenticeship program established under the auspices of an
international union representing aerospace workers, which will include
but not be limited to training in composite technology. Of this
amount, $2,150,000 may be used for program development, curriculum
development and equipment, training, and related expenses; and $850,000
shall be used to support 130 enrollment slots at no more than three
community and technical colleges with at least one college being
located east of the Cascade mountains, for related supplemental
instruction and related expenses. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall select the colleges using a joint selection
process between the state board and the joint labor/management
apprenticeship program.
(((26))) (19) $1,178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to Edmonds community college
for operating expenses related to leasing the employment resource
center.
(((27))) (20) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Renton technical college to
implement workplace-based instructional programs that will enable low-wage working immigrants to improve their English language and work-related skills.
(((28))) (21) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to convert classes taught by
faculty employed in part-time positions to classes taught by faculty
employed in full-time, tenure-track positions. Particular emphasis
shall be placed upon increasing the number of full-time faculty in the
departments of mathematics, science, adult basic education, early
childhood education, and English. The state board shall determine the
distribution of these funds among the colleges in consultation with
representatives of faculty unions.
(((29))) (22) The appropriations in this section include specific
funding to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104 (applied
baccalaureate degrees).
(23) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, the state
board for community and technical colleges shall minimize impacts on
academic programs, maximize reductions in administration, and not
reduce enrollments below enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s
604 and section 601 of this act.

Sec. 603 2008 c 329 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($375,998,000))
$358,727,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,181,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,513,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,371,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($806,089,000))
$788,818,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,744,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 625 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 625 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009. Of these, 165 FTEs in 2008 and 165 FTEs in 2009 are expected to
be graduate student FTEs.
(2) $6,975,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science undergraduate enrollments
by 250 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs expanded shall
include mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in math
and science programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, authorized by chapter 70.220 RCW.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at the
University of Washington by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students
in this program.
(6) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish the state
climatologist position.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center to identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support,
a process to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2007.
Work will continue after the submission of the initial report, to
include continuing research and the development of financial and policy
options and a progress report on fact finding efforts and stakeholder
positions due December 1, 2008.
(8) $3,830,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at
the University of Washington. Consistent with the medical and dental
school extension program appropriations at Washington State University
and Eastern Washington University, funding is provided to expand
classes at the University of Washington. Medical and dental students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane and the second year of courses at the University of
Washington in Seattle.
(9) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the University
of Washington are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 8,850;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 1,380;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 3,610;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 74.7 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 76.0 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 93.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92 percent
at the Seattle campus and 92.5 percent at the Bothell and Tacoma
campuses, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
subsection.
The University of Washington shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(10) $750,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to increase participation in international learning
opportunities, particularly for students with lower incomes who would
otherwise not have the chance to study, work, or volunteer outside the
United States.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(12) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for coastal marine research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(13) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for increased education, training,
and support services for the families of children with autism, and for
the production and distribution of digital video discs in both English
and Spanish about strategies for working with people with autism.
(14) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support for the
department of global health.
(15) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(16) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the rural technology initiative
(initiative) at the University of Washington and the transportation
research group (group) at the Washington State University to conduct an
economic analysis of the costs to safely provide log hauling services.
The initiative will be the lead investigator and administer the
project. Neither the University of Washington nor the Washington State
University may make a deduction for administrative costs. The project
shall rely upon the Washington state patrol for determination of basic
safe characteristics, consistent with applicable state and federal law.
The analysis shall include:
(a) An estimate of log haulers' cost to operate and maintain a
basic and safe log truck without operator including:
(i) Variable costs such as fuel, etc;
(ii) Quasi-variable costs such as:
(A) Tires, brakes, wrappers, and other safety related equipment;
(B) Vehicle insurance, taxes, fees, etc;
(C) Maintenance costs such as oil, lubrication, and minor repairs;
and
(D) Depreciation and replacement costs;
(b) The source of these cost estimates where possible should be
independent vendors of equipment and services or already existing
studies;
(c) A calculation of costs for safe operation expressed as per
mile, hour or load volume including consideration for regional
differences as well as off-road vs. on-road;
(d) An evaluation of comparable trucking services; and
(e) A review of log truck safety statistics in Washington state.
In conducting the analysis, the initiative shall consult with the
northwest log truckers cooperative, the Washington trucking
association, the Washington contract loggers association, the
Washington farm forestry association, and the Washington forest
protection association. By June 30, 2008, the initiative shall provide
a report of its findings to the legislature and governor and distribute
the findings to interested industry groups.
(17) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Burke museum to support
science and social science educational programs including public
outreach programs, new educational programs and resources, web-based
interactive learning experiences, teacher training, and traveling
educational opportunities.
(18) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences.
(19) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
to gather data and conduct research associated with preparing the
basin-wide assessment and to solicit nominations for review and
submittal to the Washington academy of sciences for the creation of the
Puget Sound science panel pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
(20)(a) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the University of Washington
school of law loan repayment assistance program endowment fund. The
University of Washington shall conduct fund-raising activities to
increase private sector support of the endowment program and $250,000
of the appropriation in this subsection is contingent on a private
sector match. Funds in the law school repayment assistance program
endowment fund shall be used to provide graduates who pursue careers in
public interest legal positions with payment assistance toward their
student loan debt.
(b) The University of Washington law school shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2010, information about the loan repayment
assistance program. The report shall contain at least the following
information:
(i) A financial summary of the endowment program;
(ii) The number of individuals receiving assistance from the
program and information related to the positions in which these
individuals are working;
(iii) Any available information regarding the effect of the loan
repayment assistance program on student recruitment and enrollment; and
(iv) Other information the school of law deems relevant to the
evaluation of the program.
(c) In its rules for administering the program, the school of law
must make provision for cases of hardship or exceptional circumstances,
as defined by the school of law. Examples of such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, family leave, medical leave, illness
or disability, and loss of employment.
(d) The loan repayment assistance program must be available to
otherwise eligible graduates of the law school who work in positions
with nonprofit organizations or government agencies. Such positions
must be located within Washington state. Government agencies shall
include the various branches of the military.
(21) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
geriatric education center to develop a voluntary adult family home
certification program. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Individuals completing the
requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and the voluntary adult family home
certification program shall be issued a certified adult family home
license by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this subsection.
(22) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center for implementation of section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3123 (nurse staffing). If section 5 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((25))) (23) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to establish an e-Science
institute that will provide infrastructure and consulting expertise to
university researchers in advanced computational techniques needed to
capture, store, organize, access, mine, visualize, and interpret
massive data sets.
(((28))) (24) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for incentive grants to support
medical research or medical training projects focused upon improvement
of services to persons with developmental disabilities. The university
shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2008, on incentive grants awarded, and other efforts to improve
training for medical students in treating persons with developmental
disabilities.
(25) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, the
University of Washington shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 604 2008 c 329 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,201,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($235,108,000))
$223,819,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,884,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($503,643,000))
$492,354,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,315,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 290 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 300 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009.
(2) $3,525,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science enrollments by 65 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2008, and by an additional 90 FTE students in
fiscal year 2009, of which 15 FTEs in each fiscal year are expected to
be graduate enrollments. The programs expanded shall include
mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences. Fifty student
FTEs in each year will be shifted from general enrollments to high-demand, high-cost fields, and thus do not affect the enrollment levels
listed in section 602 of this act. The university shall provide data
to the office of financial management regarding math and science
enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science programs. Data may be
provided through the public centralized higher education enrollment
system or through an alternative means agreed to by the institutions
and the office of financial management.
(3) $2,356,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is to expand bachelors-level, masters-level, and PhD enrollment at the
Tri-Cities and Spokane campuses by 45 FTE students in fiscal year 2008,
and by an additional 40 FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(4) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for research and commercialization
in bio-products and bio-fuels. Of this amount, $2,000,000 shall be
targeted at the development of new crops to be used in the bio-products
facility at WSU-Tri-Cities. The remainder shall be used for research
into new bio-products created from agricultural waste to be conducted
in the Tri-Cities in a joint program between Washington State
University and Pacific Northwest national laboratories.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Washington
State University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to promote the development of the
Spokane-based applied sciences laboratory into a strong,
self-sustaining research organization. The state funds shall be used
to recruit and retain at least three senior research scientists; to
employ business development and administrative personnel; and to
establish and equip facilities for computational modeling and for
materials and optical characterization.
(7) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, under chapter 70.220 RCW.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(9) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center to identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support,
a process to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2007.
Work will continue after the submission of the initial report, to
include continuing research and the development of financial and policy
options and a progress report on fact finding efforts and stakeholder
positions due December 1, 2008.
(10) $6,360,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences offerings in
Spokane. The university shall enroll 20 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009 in a University of Washington medical school extension program at
the Riverpoint campus of WSU in Spokane. Students shall take the first
year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane,
and shall do their clinical rotations and other upper level training in
the inland northwest.
(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for start-up and ongoing operation
of the Vancouver campus-based electrical engineering program.
(12) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Washington
State University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 4,170;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 630;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 1,090;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 63.2 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 65.4 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 84.8 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
The Washington State University shall report its progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(13) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(14) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support the unified agriculture
initiative at Washington State University. Funds are provided for
competitive agriculture grant funds, of which $400,000 is provided for
biological intensive and organic agriculture grants; for operating and
program support for the university's research and extension centers, of
which $735,000 is for maintenance and operations support for the Mount
Vernon research facility; and for positions to fill research gaps in
the development of value-added agricultural products and economically
and environmentally sustainable food production.
(15) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for support of basic operations
and research at the university's grizzly bear study center.
(16) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the energy development center
to establish certification standards and to process applications for
renewable energy cost recovery incentives, as provided in chapters 300
and 301, Laws of 2005.
(17) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Washington State University to
gather data and conduct research associated with preparing the basin-wide assessment and to solicit nominations for review and submittal to
the Washington academy of sciences for the creation of the Puget Sound
science panel pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
(18) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center for implementation of section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3123 (nurse staffing). If section 5 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((20))) (19) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for administrative resources and
personnel necessary for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2963 (WSU collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((21))) (20) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement a teacher preparation
program at Washington State University-Vancouver that will prepare
currently- licensed teachers to more effectively educate K-12 students
who are deaf or hearing-impaired. The program will use a variety of
distance learning instructional methods and delivery formats in order
to reach teachers throughout the state.
(((24))) (21) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of section 6 of
Senate Bill No. 6438 (high speed internet deployment). If section 6 of
Senate Bill No. 6438 is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((25))) (22) The appropriations in this section include specific
funding to implement Senate Bill No. 6187 (food animal veterinarians).
(23) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, Washington
State University shall minimize impacts on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 605 2008 c 329 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,911,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,959,000))
$45,771,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,753,000))
$14,748,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,381,000))
$114,188,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $930,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 130 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 30 FTEs in 2009 are expected to be
graduate student FTEs.
(2) $1,170,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand high-demand undergraduate enrollments by 50
student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs expanded shall include,
but are not limited to, mathematics, engineering, and health sciences.
The university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in
high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the
public centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Eastern
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(4) $1,021,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the RIDE program. The program
shall enroll eight student FTEs in the University of Washington school
of dentistry in fiscal year 2009. Students shall take the first year
of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, and
their second and third years at the University of Washington school of
dentistry.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Eastern
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2035;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 405;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 550;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 50.0 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.0 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 76.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 81.0
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Eastern Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(((8))) (7) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the institute for public policy
and economic analysis to conduct an assessment of the likely medical,
health care delivery, and economic consequences of the proposed sale of
a major eastern Washington health care delivery system.
(((9))) (8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the northwest autism center to
increase child diagnostic services and teacher training services.
(9) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, Eastern
Washington University shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 606 2008 c 329 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,978,000))
$45,272,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,219,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($116,218,000))
$113,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,474,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase general enrollments by 70 FTE students in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 211 FTE enrollments in fiscal
year 2009. At least 30 of the additional fiscal year 2009 enrollments
are expected to be graduate students.
(2) $1,816,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is to increase math and science
enrollments by 105 FTE students in fiscal year 2008 and by an
additional 89 FTE students in fiscal year 2009. The university shall
provide data to the office of financial management regarding math and
science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science enrollment programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $1,801,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase high-demand undergraduate enrollments by
85 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 70 FTE
students in fiscal year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but
are not limited to, bilingual education and information technology.
The university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Central
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Central
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,050;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 49;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 196;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 51.1 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.3 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 78.2 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 86.6
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Central Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1497
(Central Washington University operating fee waivers). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, this appropriation shall lapse.
(7) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(8) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, Central
Washington University shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 607 2008 c 329 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,747,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,403,000))
$27,973,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,758,000))
$4,725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,908,000))
$62,445,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $562,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand upper division math and science enrollments
by 22 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 28 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $260,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is for 20 student FTE graduate
enrollments in the masters in education program.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at The
Evergreen State College by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 80 percent for students served
in this program, with a goal of reaching a retention rate in excess of
85 percent.
(4) $614,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to increase the number and value of tuition waivers
awarded to state-supported students.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the college and the board shall review and revise these
targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act.
In addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight global challenge states identified in the
Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and The Evergreen
State College are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 1182;
(b) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 92;
(c) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 57.0 percent;
(d) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.8 percent;
(e) Improve the freshman retention rate to 73.9 percent;
(f) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 97.0
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(g) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
The Evergreen State College shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(7) $435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) to assist the joint task force on basic education
finance created pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5627 (requiring a review and development of basic education funding).
The institute shall assist the joint task force in a review of the
definition of basic education and the development of options for a new
funding structure for K-12 public schools. The task force on basic
education as created in chapter 399, Laws of 2007 shall consider the
ruling of the King County Superior Court in the matter of Federal Way
School District v. The State of Washington in developing
recommendations for a new basic education school finance formula. The
recommendations should include proposals that directly address the
issue of equity in salary allocations in the new school finance
formula.
(8) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to study the program effectiveness and cost-benefit
of state-funded programs that meet the criteria of evidence-based
programs and practices, and emerging best practice/promising practice,
as defined in RCW 71.24.025 (12) and (13) for adult offenders in the
department of corrections, and juvenile offenders under state and local
juvenile authority.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to evaluate the effectiveness of current methods for
screening and treating depression in women who receive temporary
assistance for needy families (TANF), and to make recommendations for
their improvement.
(10) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1472 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the
Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for
projects included on the institute's 2007-09 workplan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(12) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) to (a) conduct a national review of state
programs for youth transitioning out of foster care and analyze state
policies on eligibility requirements for continued foster care, age
thresholds for transition services, types of services provided, and use
of state funds to supplement federal moneys; and (b) survey foster
youth and foster parents in Washington regarding how well current
services are meeting the needs of youth transitioning out of foster
care to independence. The institute shall issue a preliminary report
by September 1, 2008, with a final report by December 31, 2008.
(((14))) (13) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy (WSIPP) for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((15))) (14) $69,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to study the status of adult literacy education in
Washington. The study shall include an analysis of literacy rates by
county; a review of the research literature; a description of literacy-related services provided by state agencies and community-based
organizations; and an analysis of the characteristics of persons
receiving those services. The institute shall report its findings to
the governor, appropriate committees of the legislature, and to the
state board for community and technical colleges by December 1, 2008.
(((16))) (15) $23,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement the evaluation
required by Senate Bill No. 6665 (crisis response programs). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((17))) (16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct a review of research on service and
support programs for children and adults with developmental
disabilities, excluding special education, and an economic analysis of
net program costs and benefits. The institute shall submit a
preliminary report of findings by January 1, 2009, and a final report
by June 30, 2009.
(((19))) (17) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to analyze local practices regarding RCW 28A.225.020,
28A.225.025, and 28A.225.030.
(a) The institute shall: (i) Sample school districts' and superior
courts' expenditures in fiscal years 2005, 2006, 2007, and 2008 used to
comply with RCW 28A.225.020, 28A.225.025, and 28A.225.030; (ii)
evaluate evidence-based, research-based, promising, and consensus-based
truancy intervention and prevention programs and report on local
practices that could be designated as such; (iii) survey school
district truancy petition and intervention programs and services
currently available and report on any gaps in accessing services; (iv)
survey the districts' definitions of "absence" and "unexcused absence";
(v) survey the courts' frequency of use of contempt proceedings and
barriers to the use of proceedings; and (vi) analyze the academic
impact of RCW 28A.225.030 by sampling school districts' student
academic records to ascertain the students' post-petition attendance
rate, grade progression, and high school graduation for students where
the school district filed a truancy petition in superior court.
(b) In conducting its analysis, the institute may consult with
employees and access data systems of the office of the superintendent
of public instruction and any educational service district or school
district and the administrative office of the courts, each of which
shall provide the institute with access to necessary data and
administrative systems.
(18) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, The
Evergreen State College shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 608 2008 c 329 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,774,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,085,000))
$64,450,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,845,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($146,704,000))
$143,069,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $281,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science enrollments by 8 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 8 student FTEs in fiscal
year 2009. Programs expanded include cell and molecular biology. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
regarding math and science enrollments, graduations, and the employment
of college graduates related to state investments in math and science
enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(2) $4,013,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 235 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 130 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009. Of these, 24 FTEs in each fiscal year are expected to be
graduate student FTEs.
(3) $920,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand high demand enrollments by 50 FTE students
in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 15 FTE students in fiscal year
2009. Programs expanded include early childhood education and teaching
English as a second language. The university shall provide data to the
office of financial management regarding high-demand enrollments,
graduations, and employment of college graduates related to state
investments in high demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided
through the centralized higher education enrollment system or through
an alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of low-income and
first-generation students served in the student outreach services
program at Western Washington University by 500 students over the
biennium. The student outreach services program shall report annually
to the office of financial management and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and completion
rates of students served through this appropriation. Retention rates
shall continue to exceed 80 percent for students served in this
program, with a goal of reaching a retention rate in excess of 85
percent.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Western
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,968;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 371;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 375;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 62.8 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.4 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 85.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 95.6
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Western Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, the university shall
report progress towards developing and implementing outreach programs
designed to increase awareness of higher education to K-12 populations
to the higher education coordinating board by October 1st of each year.
(7) $1,169,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is for the advanced materials science and engineering program. The
program shall develop the advanced materials science and engineering
center for research, teaching, and development which will offer a minor
degree in materials science and engineering beginning in the fall 2009.
(8) $444,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of the biomedical
research activities in neuroscience (BRAIN) program. The program shall
link biology and chemistry curriculum to prepare students for
biomedical research positions in academia and industry.
(9) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, Western
Washington University shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 609 2008 c 329 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,008,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,231,000))
$6,533,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,333,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,572,000))
$17,874,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain and update a
scholarship clearinghouse that lists every public and private
scholarship available to Washington students. The higher education
coordinating board shall develop a web-based interface for students and
families as well as a common application for these scholarships.
(2) $339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (the passport to college promise). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for administration of conditional
scholarships.
(5) Except for moneys provided in this section for specific
purposes, and to the extent that the executive director finds that the
agency will not require the full amount appropriated for a fiscal year
in this section, the unexpended appropriation shall be transferred to
the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140 for
purposes of fulfilling unfunded scholarship commitments that the board
made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to implement a capital facility and technology capacity study
which will compare the 10-year enrollment projections with the capital
facility requirements and technology application and hardware capacity
needed to deliver higher education programs for the period 2009-2019.
The higher education coordinating board shall:
(a) Develop the study in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges, four-year universities, and the
Washington independent colleges;
(b) Determine the 10-year capital facilities and technology
application and hardware investment needed by location to deliver
higher education programs to additional student FTE;
(c) Estimate operational and capital costs of the additional
capacity; and
(d) Report findings to the legislature on October 1, 2008.
(7) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the board to prepare a program
and operating plan for a higher education center in the Kitsap county
area. The plan shall be developed in consultation with an advisory
committee of civic, business, and educational leaders from Clallam,
Jefferson, Kitsap, and Mason counties. It shall include a projection
of lower and upper division and graduate enrollment trends in the study
area; a review of assessments of employer needs; an inventory of
existing and needed postsecondary programs; recommended strategies for
promoting active program participation in and extensive program
offerings at the center by public and private baccalaureate
institutions; and an estimate of operating and capital costs for the
creation and operation of the center. The board shall submit its
findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature by
December 1, 2008.
(((10))) (8) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
House Bill No. 2641 (education performance agreements). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((11))) (9) The higher education coordinating board, the
department of licensing, and the department of health shall jointly
review and report to appropriate policy committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the
extent to which veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills
sets and education required while in service to certification,
licensure, and degree requirements.
(((12))) (10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the higher education
coordinating board to convene interested parties from Snohomish,
Island, and Skagit counties to consider the November 2007 site options
and recommendations for a new campus of the University of Washington in
Snohomish county. The three local communities shall develop a
consensus recommendation on a single preferred site and present the
recommendation to the higher education coordinating board. The higher
education coordinating board shall then present the single preferred
site recommendation to the appropriate legislative fiscal and policy
committees by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 610 2008 c 329 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,286,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($188,998,000))
$188,498,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,113,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,585,000))
$473,085,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $154,760,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $178,707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $49,902,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $40,050,000 of the education legacy
trust account appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,886,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for student
financial aid payments under the state need grant; the state work study
program including a four percent administrative allowance; the
Washington scholars program; and the Washington award for vocational
excellence. All four programs shall increase grant awards sufficiently
to offset the full cost of the resident undergraduate tuition increases
authorized under this act.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall be expanded to include students with family
incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income,
adjusted for family size. Awards for students with incomes between 66
percent and 70 percent of the state median shall be 50 percent of the
award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the
median.
(3) To the extent that the executive director determines that the
agency will not award the full amount appropriated in subsection (1) of
this section for a fiscal year, unexpended funds shall be transferred
to the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140
for purposes first of fulfilling the unfunded scholarship commitments
that the board made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(4) $7,400,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for investment to fulfill the scholarship
commitments that the state incurs in accordance with Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $2,500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the gaining early awareness
and readiness for undergraduate programs project to at least 25
additional school districts.
(6) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to increase the future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program
by at least 35 students per year. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to support state work study positions for students to intern in
secondary math and science classrooms.
(7) $2,336,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (passport to
college). Funds are provided for student scholarships, and for
incentive payments to the colleges they attend for individualized
student support services which may include, but are not limited to,
college and career advising, counseling, tutoring, costs incurred for
students while school is not in session, personal expenses, health
insurance, and emergency services. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for community scholarship matching grants and its
administration. To be eligible for the matching grant, nonprofit
groups organized under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code must demonstrate they have raised at least $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. Groups may receive no more than one $2,000 matching grant per
year and preference shall be given to groups affiliated with
scholarship America. Up to a total of $46,000 per year of the amount
appropriated in this section may be awarded to a nonprofit community
organization to administer scholarship matching grants, with preference
given to an organization affiliated with scholarship America.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1179 (state need grant). State need grants
provided to students enrolled in just three to five credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, shall not exceed
the amounts appropriated in this subsection. By November 1 of each
year, the board shall report to the office of financial management and
to the operating budget committees of the house of representatives and
senate on the number of eligible but unserved students enrolled in just
three to five quarterly credits, or the semester equivalent, and the
estimated cost of serving them. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $5,000,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1779 (GET ready for math and science). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the health professional scholarship
and loan program. The funds provided in this subsection (a) shall be
prioritized for health care deliver sites demonstrating a commitment to
serving the uninsured; and (b) shall be allocated between loan
repayments and scholarships proportional to current program
allocations.

Sec. 611 2008 c 329 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,757,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,736,000))
$1,698,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,996,000))
$53,995,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,489,000))
$57,450,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the board to:
(a) Allocate grants on a competitive basis to establish and support
industry skill panels. Grant recipients shall provide an employer
match of at least twenty-five percent, and identify work force
strategies to benefit employers and workers across the industry; and
(b) Establish industry skill panel standards that identify the
expectations for industry skill panel products and services.
(2) $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve the oversight of
private vocational and career schools.
(3) The appropriations in this section include specific funding to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5254 (industry skills panels) and
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6261 (adult youth).
(4) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funds to
implement section 2 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6295
(workplace e-learning).

Sec. 612 2008 c 329 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,745,000))
$1,668,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,463,000))
$3,386,000

Sec. 613 2008 c 329 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,304,000))
$69,120,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,192,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($330,864,000))
$323,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $47,919,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $56,437,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services.
(a) Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial
amount of state matching dollars required to receive federal child care
and development fund grant dollars.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the number of children receiving early
childhood education and assistance program services by 2,250 slots.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the minimum provider per slot payment to
$6,500 in fiscal year 2008. Any provider receiving slot payments
higher than $6,500 shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor rate increase in
fiscal year 2008. All providers shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor
rate increase in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($4,225,000)) $1,825,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to: (a) Develop
a quality rating and improvement system; and (b) pilot the quality
rating and improvement system in multiple locations. Four of the pilot
sites are to be located within the following counties: Spokane, Kitsap,
King, and Yakima. The department shall analyze and evaluate the pilot
sites and report initial findings to the legislature by December 1,
2008. Prior to statewide implementation of the quality rating and
improvement system, the department of early learning shall present the
system to the legislature and the legislature shall formally approve
the implementation of the system through the omnibus appropriations act
or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(3) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
child care referral services.
(4) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers. This
includes funding for the department to conduct a random sample survey
of parents to determine the types of early learning services and
materials parents are interested in receiving from the state. The
department shall report the findings to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2008.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a child care consultation
pilot program linking child care providers with evidence-based and best
practice resources regarding caring for infants and young children who
present behavior concerns.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the child care career
and wage ladder program created by chapter 507, Laws of 2005.
(7) $172,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to purchase licensing
capability from the department of social and health services through
the statewide automated child welfare information system.
(8) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a childcare grant program for
public community colleges and public universities. A community college
or university that employs collectively bargained staff to operate
childcare programs may apply for up to $25,000 per year from the
department per each type of the following programs: Head start,
childcare, early childhood assistance and education. The funding shall
only be provided for salaries for collectively bargained employees.
(9) Beginning October 1, 2007, the department shall be the lead
agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund
grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care
licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs
associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a
portion of this grant to the department of social and health services
to partially fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of
social and health services on behalf of the department of early
learning.
(10) Prior to the development of an early learning information
system, the department shall submit to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature a completed feasibility study and a
proposal approved by the department of information systems and the
information services board. The department shall ensure that any
proposal for the early learning information system includes the cost
for modifying the system as a result of licensing rule changes and
implementation of the quality rating and improvement system.
(11) (($250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3168 (Washington head start program). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12))) The department, in conjunction with the early learning
advisory council, shall report by June 30, 2009, to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the following:
(a) Administration of the state training and registry system,
including annual expenditures, participants, and average hours of
training provided per participant; and
(b) An evaluation of the child care resource and referral network
in providing information to parents and training and technical
assistance to child care providers.
(((13))) (12) The department shall use child care development fund
money to satisfy the federal audit requirement of the improper payments
act (IPIA) of 2002. In accordance with the IPIA's rules, the money
spent on the audits will not count against the five percent state limit
on administrative expenditures.
(((14))) (13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the department of early
learning to work with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and collaborate with thrive by five Washington, to study
and make recommendations regarding the implementation of a statewide
kindergarten entry assessment. The department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall jointly submit a report with
recommendations for implementing the kindergarten entry assessment to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2008. In the study and development of the
recommendations, the department shall:
(a) Consult with early learning experts, including research and
educator associations, early learning and kindergarten teachers, and
Washington Indian tribes;
(b) Identify a preferred kindergarten entry assessment based on
research and examples of other assessments, and which is sensitive to
cultural and socioeconomic differences influencing the development of
young children;
(c) Recommend a plan for the use of the assessment in a pilot phase
and a voluntary use phase, and recommend a time certain when school
districts must offer the assessment;
(d) Recommend how to report the results of the assessment to
parents, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the department of early learning in a common format, and for a
methodology for conducting the assessments;
(e) Analyze how the assessment could be used to improve instruction
for individual students entering kindergarten and identify whether and
how the assessment results could be used to improve the early learning
and K-12 systems, including the transition between the systems;
(f) Identify the costs of the assessment, including the time
required to administer the assessment; and
(g) Recommend how to ensure that the assessment shall not be used
to screen or otherwise preclude children from entering kindergarten if
they are otherwise eligible.
(((15))) (14) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for encouraging private match
investment for innovative, existing local early learning coalitions to
achieve one or more of the following:
(a) Increase communities' abilities to implement their business
plans for comprehensive local and regional early learning systems;
(b) Involve parents in their children's education;
(c) Enhance coordination between the early childhood and K-12
system; or
(d) Improve training and support for raising the level of child
care givers' professional skills to ensure that children are healthy
and ready to succeed in school and life.

Sec. 614 2008 c 329 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,969,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,105,000))
$6,069,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,635,000))
$13,599,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to defend the state's interpretive
position in the case of Delyria & Koch v. Washington State School for
the Blind.
(2) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one-half of one percent effective
July 1, 2008.

Sec. 615 2008 c 329 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,858,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,915,000))
$8,764,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,089,000))
$17,938,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $84,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the operation of the shared
reading video outreach program. The school for the deaf shall provide
this service to the extent it is funded by contracts with school
districts and educational service districts.
(2) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one-half of one percent effective
July 1, 2008.

Sec. 616 2008 c 329 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,541,000))
$2,454,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,382,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,625,000))
$6,538,000

Sec. 617 2008 c 329 s 620 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,558,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,798,000))
$3,696,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,356,000))
$7,254,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $255,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
Washington state Holocaust education resource center for the purposes
of preserving Washington's historical connection to the Holocaust and
expanding understanding of the Holocaust and genocide. Grant moneys
may be used to develop and disseminate education and multimedia
curriculum resources; provide teacher training; acquire and maintain
primary source materials and Holocaust artifacts; collect and preserve
oral accounts from Washington state Holocaust survivors, liberators,
and witnesses; and build organizational capacity.

Sec. 618 2008 c 329 s 621 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,918,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,069,000))
$2,016,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,987,000))
$3,934,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $88,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to catalog the
American Indian collection.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2007 c 522 s 709 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,188,000
((General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,509,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,697,000))

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

Sec. 702 2007 c 522 s 715 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
((General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000))

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The appropriation((s are)) is
provided solely for expenditure into the reading achievement account.

Sec. 703 2008 c 329 s 708 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,274,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,274,000))
$21,274,000

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The appropriations ((is)) are
provided solely for expenditure into the water quality capital account.

Sec. 704 2008 c 3 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The sum of seven hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof
as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2008, from the general fund to the department of financial
institutions for homeownership prepurchase outreach and education and
postpurchase counseling and support.
(2) The sum of ((eight hundred)) seven hundred eighty-two thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
department of financial institutions for homeownership prepurchase
outreach and education and postpurchase counseling and support.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2008 c 329 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,654,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,557,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions. Of this amount,
$903,000 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6297 (prosecuting attorney salaries).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,902,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat
conservation program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,245,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account
Appropriation for the Confederated
Tribes of the Colville Reservation.
This amount is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia River
water delivery). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, this amount
shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account
Appropriation for the Spokane Tribe
of Indians. This amount is provided
solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
River water delivery). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, this amount
shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,192,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation
for distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,753,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,127,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,636,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,397,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,148,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution;
PROVIDED: That the legislature, in making this
appropriation for distribution under the formula
prescribed in RCW 43.08.290 for the 2007-09
biennium, ratifies and approves the prior
distributions, as certified by the department
of revenue to the state treasurer, made for the
2005-07 biennium from the appropriation in
section 801, chapter 372, Laws of 2006 as amended
by section 1701, chapter 522, Laws of 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,865,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation
for distribution to local taxing jurisdictions
to mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution
effect of the sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,600,000))
$22,980,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($431,697,000))
$423,077,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2008 c 329 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
(($21,000,000)) $31,000,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,000,000))
$41,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operations Account:
For transfer to the state general fund on June 30,
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Capital Account:
For transfer to the state general fund on
June 30, 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000,000
After the transfers in this section are made from
the state convention and trade center operations
and capital accounts, these accounts will
have sufficient funds for: (1) A ten million
dollar requirement for the retrofit of the museum
of history and industry; (2) the requirements of
RCW 67.40.040(5) and 67.40.040(6); and (3) a
sufficient capital reserve. After the transfer
is made, the capital reserve may be applicable for
payment of debt service or operating shortfalls.
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$11,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water
quality account, $12,200,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,201,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,401,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account,
$7,200,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,800,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the job development account, $25,000,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $25,000,000 for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to
the oil spill prevention account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual amount
of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,111,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the
life sciences discovery fund, in an amount
not to exceed the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment
to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the water
quality account, $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2008
and $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, $3,466,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $3,466,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the tobacco
prevention and control account,
$10,523,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$10,168,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,691,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline
sales and use tax account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
General Fund: For transfer to the health services
account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Reading Achievement Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, an amount not to exceed the
actual balance of the reading achievement account.
This transfer is intended to liquidate the reading
achievement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,691,000
Family Leave Insurance Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, an amount not to exceed
the actual balance of the family leave insurance
account. This transfer is intended to liquidate
the family leave insurance account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,458,000
Streamline Sales Tax Account: For transfer to the
state general fund on June 30, 2009, an amount not
to exceed the actual balance of the streamline sales
tax account. . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,620,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,204,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,088,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2008 c 170 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Total distributions from the student achievement fund to each
school district shall be based upon the average number of full-time
equivalent students in the school district during the previous school
year as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that moneys generated
by skill center students are returned to skill centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation as defined in RCW 43.135.025(8). These allocations per
full-time equivalent student from the student achievement fund shall be
supported from the following sources:
(a) Distributions from state property tax proceeds deposited into
the student achievement fund under RCW 84.52.068; and
(b) Distributions from the education legacy trust account created
in RCW 83.100.230.
(3) Any funds deposited in the student achievement fund under RCW
43.135.045 shall be allocated to school districts on a one-time basis
using a rate per full-time equivalent student. These funds are
provided in addition to any amounts allocated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(5) However, during the 2008-09 school year, the school district
annual amounts as defined in this section shall be distributed as
follows:
September: 9.0 percent;
October: 9.0 percent;
November: 5.5 percent;
December: 9.0 percent;
January: 9.0 percent;
February: 9.0 percent;
March: 9.0 percent;
April: 9.0 percent;
May: 5.5 percent;
June: 4.2 percent;
July: 11.8 percent; and
August: 10.0 percent.

Sec. 902 RCW 43.79.460 and 1998 c 302 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated
to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures from the account.
(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may
create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable
to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial
management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.
Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the
authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for
the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state,
such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish
new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or
incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.
(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state
general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a
fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board
reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations
for:
(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the
extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have
been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program.
"Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for
which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third
parties or other entities;
(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;
(c) A specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an
appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not
achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or
limitation;
(d) Debt service on state obligations; and
(e) State retirement system obligations.
(4) The office of ((fiscal [financial])) financial management,
after consulting with the legislative fiscal committees, shall report
to the treasurer the amount of savings incentives achieved. By
December 1, 1998, and each December 1st thereafter, the office of
financial management shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature on the implementation of this section. The report
shall (a) evaluate the impact of this section on agency reversions and
end-of-biennium expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency
expenditures from the savings recovery account. The office of
financial management is relieved from having to submit a report by
December 1, 2008.
(5) For fiscal year 2009, the legislature may transfer from the
savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state
general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008.

Sec. 903 RCW 43.79.465 and 2004 c 275 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education savings account is created in the state treasury.
The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(1) Ten percent of legislative appropriations to the education
savings account shall be distributed as follows: (a) Fifty percent to
the distinguished professorship trust fund under RCW 28B.76.565; (b)
seventeen percent to the graduate fellowship trust fund under RCW
28B.76.610; and (c) thirty-three percent to the college faculty awards
trust fund under RCW 28B.50.837.
(2) The remaining moneys in the education savings account may be
appropriated solely for (a) common school construction projects that
are eligible for funding from the common school construction account,
(b) technology improvements in the common schools, ((and)) (c) during
the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, technology improvements in public higher
education institutions, and (d) during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the education savings account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account attributable to unspent state general fund appropriations
for fiscal year 2008.

Sec. 904 RCW 43.79.485 and 2006 c 120 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The reading achievement account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. The purposes of the account are to establish a
depository for state and other funds made available for reading
achievement, and to ensure that unspent amounts appropriated for
reading achievement continue to be available for that purpose in future
biennia.
(2) The director of early learning shall deposit in the account all
appropriations to the department and nonstate moneys received by the
department for reading achievement, including reading foundations and
implementation of research-based reading models.
Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the
fiscal period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after
the fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the
director may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes for
which they were appropriated, and the expenditures are subject to any
other conditions or limitations placed on the appropriations.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only for reading
achievement, including reading foundations, implementation of research-based reading models, and grants to school districts. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the reading
achievement account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account.
(4) Only the director of early learning or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 905 RCW 49.86.170 and 2007 c 357 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The family leave insurance account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the purposes of the family leave insurance program. Only the director
of the department of labor and industries or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is
required for administrative expenses, but not for benefit payments.
During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the family leave insurance account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 906 RCW 50.16.010 and 2008 c 329 s 915 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(viii) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) During the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for the (i) cost of the job skills
program at the community and technical colleges and worker retraining
programs at the community and technical colleges or administered by the
state board for community and technical colleges, and (ii) reemployment
services such as business and project development assistance, local
economic development capacity building, and local economic development
financial assistance at the department of community, trade, and
economic development, and the remaining appropriation upon the
direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor,
whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary
solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may
only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in
this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 907 RCW 82.14.495 and 2007 c 6 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account is created
in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall transfer into the
account from the general fund amounts as directed in RCW 82.14.500.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purpose of
mitigating the negative fiscal impacts to local taxing jurisdictions as
a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to
RCW 82.14.020. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, the state treasurer, as directed by the
department, shall distribute the funds in the streamlined sales and use
tax mitigation account to local taxing jurisdictions in accordance with
RCW 82.14.500.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 82.14.390 and 82.14.500.
(a) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.32.020.
(b) "Local taxing jurisdiction" means counties, cities,
transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities
districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation
benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transit authorities
under chapter 81.112 RCW, that impose a sales and use tax.
(c) "Loss" or "losses" means the local sales and use tax revenue
reduction to a local taxing jurisdiction resulting from the sourcing
provisions in RCW ((82.14.020)) 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of
2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020.
(d) "Net loss" or "net losses" means a loss offset by any voluntary
compliance revenue.
(e) "Voluntary compliance revenue" means the local sales tax
revenue gain to each local taxing jurisdiction reported to the
department from persons registering through the central registration
system authorized under the agreement.
(f) "Working day" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.45.180.

Sec. 908 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2006 c 119 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2011, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(11) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 Section 908 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 276
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 151, 152
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 293
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 126
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 299
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 273
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 289
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 300
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 300
WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 300
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 292
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 255
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 126
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 297
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 297
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 302
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 304
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 230
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 229
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 222
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 249
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 252
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 278
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 261
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 298
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 298
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 268
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 283
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 291
--- END ---