BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.4013 and 2003 c 53 s 334 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess a controlled
substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant
to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates
this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.4014 and 2003 c 53 s 335 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 69.50.401(2)(c), any person found guilty
of ((possession of)) knowingly possessing forty grams or less of
marihuana is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---