BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Household incomes have not kept pace with rising housing costs
in many areas of the state and this imbalance creates a potential
competitive disadvantage for Washington state employers.
(2) Employers have an interest in assisting their employees obtain
and retain safe, decent, and affordable housing.
(3) It is in the public interest, and is consistent with the state
policies and goals of the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, to
offer a tax incentive to promote employer-assisted housing that enables
employees to obtain appropriate housing close to jobs and services.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a fifty percent
credit is allowed against the tax imposed under this chapter for
contributions made by a person ("employer") to the employer-assisted
housing program (the "program"), as described in section 3 of this act.
(2) The employer must make the contribution to the employer-assisted housing program before claiming a credit authorized under this
section. Credits earned under this section may be claimed against
taxes due for the calendar year in which the contribution is made. The
amount of credit claimed for a reporting period may not exceed the tax
otherwise due under this chapter for that reporting period. No refunds
may be granted for any unused credits.
(3)(a) Only employers located in local jurisdictions with plans,
policies, or programs in place that promote and support affordable
housing, as certified by the Washington state housing finance
commission, are eligible to participate in the program and claim the
credit created in subsection (1) of this section. The local
jurisdiction in which an employer is located must have an affordable
housing plan, policy, or program to be certified, which may include:
(i) Specific affordable housing or homeless housing plans;
(ii) Incentive programs intended to encourage or facilitate
affordable housing development;
(iii) Programs for the distribution of funds for affordable housing
development or preservation; or
(iv) Programs that receive funds for affordable housing from the
department of housing and urban development, department of agriculture,
office of rural development, the Washington state department of
community, trade, and economic development, or the Washington state
housing finance commission.
(b) The commission must retain records of such certifications for
a minimum of ten years and provide the records to the department upon
request.
(4) An amount of credit otherwise allowable under this section not
claimed by the employer in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the employer's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year; and any credit not used in that second succeeding
calendar year may be carried over and claimed against the employer's
tax liability for the third succeeding calendar year, but may not be
carried over for any calendar year thereafter.
(5) Credits are available on a first intime basis. The department
must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed statewide under this section during any
calendar year to exceed one million dollars. If the one million dollar
limitation is reached, the department must notify the commission and
all employers having claimed tax credits under this section to date
that the annual statewide limit has been met. In addition, the
department must provide written notice to any employer that has claimed
tax credits after the one million dollar limitation in this subsection
has been met. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and must
provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such
notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(6) The department may not allow any credits, or portion thereof,
that would cause the total amount of credits claimed statewide under
this section by any employer to exceed two hundred thousand dollars.
(7) To claim a credit under this section, an employer must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(8) The commission must provide to the department, upon request,
such information needed to verify eligibility for credit under this
section, including information regarding contributions received by the
commission for the program, certifications as described in subsection
(3) of this section, and qualified housing benefits distributed by the
commission.
(9) Credit may not be claimed under this section for contributions
to the program, if such contribution occurred before the effective date
of this act.
(10) Credit may not be claimed under this section for any
contributions to the program that occur prior to the first fiscal year
where projected state general fund revenue equals or is in excess of
fiscal year 2008 general fund revenue multiplied by 1.03.
(11) Credit may not be claimed under this section for any
contributions to the program that occur on or after July 1, 2017.
(12) The department must issue an annual report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the amount of credits claimed by
employers under this section with the first report due December 31,
2009. The annual report must be issued in collaboration and
conjunction with the commission's report required in section 3 of this
act.
(13) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created within the Washington state housing finance
commission (the "commission") the employer-assisted housing program
(the "program"), through which the commission will assist Washington
employers in providing a qualified housing benefit to qualified
employees. An employer making a financial contribution to the
employer-assisted housing program may specifically designate that
qualified housing benefits be distributed to its own qualified
employees, to qualified employees of qualified beneficiary entities, or
to a combination of the two options, except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Employer-assisted housing program account" means a bank
account established by the commission for the deposit and distribution
of funds contributed by an employer approved by the commission to
participate in the employer-assisted housing program. The commission
must use any interest earned from funds deposited in this account to
help pay the administrative costs of the program. The commission may
collect such other funds from participating employers as agreed with
the department to cover such other administrative costs as it may
incur.
(b) "Qualified employee" means an individual employed by an
employer contributing to the employer-assisted housing program or
employed by a designated qualified beneficiary entity, who has an
income of no more than eighty percent, of either:
(i) The median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the employee resides; or
(ii) The state median income, whichever is greater.
(c) "Qualified beneficiary entity" means a nonprofit corporation
recognized by the Washington secretary of state, a school district,
city, town, county, fire district, public hospital, or state
university.
(d) "Qualified housing benefit" means financial assistance, which
must be determined by each employer contributing to the employer-assisted housing program in collaboration with the commission, that are
designed to assist qualified employees to obtain and retain affordable
housing including:
(i) Down payment assistance;
(ii) Closing cost assistance;
(iii) Rental assistance, which is limited to one-time assistance
for the payment of first and last month's rent and a required security
deposit; and
(iv) Such other assistance as may be determined by the employer and
the commission to be necessary to help a qualified employee to obtain
affordable housing through the purchase or rental of a residence.
(3) Qualified employees that apply to the commission for qualified
housing benefits are entitled to receive such benefits on a first
intime basis. The commission must verify that applicants are qualified
and thus eligible to receive benefits and must distribute housing
benefits to qualified employees.
(4) Moneys contributed by employers must be distributed as
qualified housing benefits to qualified employees within thirty-six
months. Each participating employer must designate, or by default
allow the commission to designate, at least one qualified beneficiary
entity whose employees shall receive qualified housing benefits should
employer contributions exceed the amount of qualified housing benefits
the commission is able to distribute to qualified employees of the
employer within a thirty-six month period.
(5) The commission must maintain records of program activities for
a minimum of ten years and must report on program activities, outcomes,
and performance measures, as determined by the commission in
collaboration with the department of revenue to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31st of each year.
Performance measures must include measures to gauge program
effectiveness, program efficiency, and customer satisfaction. Other
information to be reported upon by the commission shall include:
(a) The number of employers and employees participating in the
program;
(b) The geographic distribution of program participants;
(c) The types of housing benefits distributed to employees; and
(d) The outcomes of housing benefit assistance received.
(6)(a) The joint legislative audit and review committee must
conduct an evaluation of the employer-assisted housing program after
thirty-six months using performance measurement data as well as other
information supplied by the commission as well as information provided
by the employers and employees participating in the program.
(b) The Washington state housing finance commission and the
department of revenue must provide the information necessary for the
joint legislative audit and review committee to perform the review
required under this section. The Washington state housing finance
commission must be the designated lead entity in regards to the sunset
termination of the program.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---