BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) The deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and
technology advancements enhances economic development and public safety
for the state's communities, as well as offering improved health care
and access to consumer and legal services, increased educational and
civic participation opportunities, and a better quality of life for the
state's residents.
(2) Improvements in the deployment and adoption of high-speed
internet services and the strategic inclusion of technology
advancements and technology education are critical to ensuring that
Washington remains competitive and continues to provide a skilled
workforce, attract businesses, and stimulate job growth.
(3) The state must encourage and support strategic partnerships of
public, private, nonprofit, and community-based sectors in the
continued growth and development of high-speed internet services and
information technology for state residents and businesses. This
includes ensuring digital inclusion in internet access, technology
literacy, digital media literacy, and that all Washingtonians are able
to obtain and utilize broadband fully, regardless of location, economic
status, literacy level, age, disability, or the size of the business or
nonprofit organization.
(4) In light of the importance of broadband deployment and adoption
to the economy, health, safety, and welfare of the people of
Washington, it is essential the legislature create a broadband programs
management structure to ensure development and implementation of
statewide broadband strategies, with the ultimate goal of making high-speed internet service more readily available throughout the state,
especially in areas with an uptake rate for high-speed internet below
the state median.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may continue the work of the high-speed internet
strategy work group convened in 2008 by continuing to consult with
representatives of telecommunications providers, technology companies,
telecommunications unions, health care providers, community technology
organizations, higher education, K-12 educators, and other relevant
entities to implement high-speed internet deployment and adoption
strategies, subject to available funding, that may include, but is not
limited to:
(1) Developing programs to provide low-income families with reduced
cost internet access or programs to provide low-cost internet access to
nonprofit entities as suggested in the K-20 program;
(2) Securing additional funding for technology literacy, digital
media literacy, and digital inclusion programs;
(3) Identifying broadband demand opportunities in communities by
working cooperatively with local organizations, government agencies,
and businesses;
(4) Developing last-mile technology loan programs targeting small
businesses or businesses located in underserved areas; and
(5) Establishing low-cost hardware, software, and internet
purchasing programs such as including community technology
organizations in state hardware and software purchasing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may apply for and receive federal funding for
the purposes of creating or supporting broadband adoption and
deployment opportunities consistent with section 2 of this act.
(2) The department is designated as the single eligible entity in
the state to receive federal funding for purposes of the broadband data
improvement act, P.L. 110-385.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of federal or state funding
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must track
residential, nonprofit organization, and business adoption of high-speed internet, computers, and related information technology through
publicly available sources and must work with communities to identify
barriers to the adoption of broadband services and related information
technology services by individuals, nonprofit organizations, and
businesses.

--- END ---