BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of federal or state funding
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall implement
a high-speed internet deployment and adoption strategy on behalf of the
state, beginning in underserved areas and areas with an uptake rate for
high-speed internet below the state median.
(2) The department may accept aggregated data from providers of
telecommunications or high-speed internet infrastructure for the
purposes of creating a geographic information system map of the current
state of high-speed internet infrastructure and service availability
and adoption.
(3) The department may solicit and receive gifts, grants, and
bequests for high-speed internet deployment and adoption efforts.
(4) The department may create an interactive web site to allow
residents to self-report whether high-speed internet is available at
their home or residence and at what speed.
(5) The department may receive federal funds made available for
broadband or high-speed internet purposes according to the provisions
of the acts of congress making the funds available. Funds must be
expended in accordance with federal and state law and any conditions
contingent in the grant of those funds.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section and section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a detailed survey of all high-speed internet infrastructure owned or leased by state agencies.
(2) Within existing resources, the department shall use the
information gathered under subsection (1) of this section to create a
geographic information system map of all high-speed internet
infrastructure owned or leased by the state by December 1, 2016.
(3) State agencies shall respond to any request for information
from the department in a reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed
one hundred twenty days.
(4) For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every
state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
state agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.350 and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of ((compliance with section 2, chapter 262, Laws
of 2008 or)) any ((subsequent)) state high-speed internet deployment
and adoption initiative, the department of information services, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the utilities
and transportation commission, and any other government agent or agency
shall not ((gather or request any information related to high-speed
internet infrastructure or service from)) require providers of
telecommunications or high-speed internet services ((that is)) to
provide information related to high-speed internet infrastructure or
service that may be classified by the provider as proprietary or
competitively sensitive, but may accept, store, and use such
information if voluntarily offered by the provider or if provided by
the federal government to facilitate implementation of a high-speed
internet deployment and adoption initiative.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
authority of a state agency or local government to gather or request
information from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services for other purposes pursuant to its statutory authority.

--- END ---