BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
assess what high-speed internet infrastructure is already publicly
owned or leased in order to better understand opportunities to leverage
existing resources, with the ultimate goal of making high-speed
internet service more readily available throughout the state,
especially in underserved areas and areas with an uptake rate for high-speed internet below the state median.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as an eligible entity for purposes
of the broadband data improvement act, P.L. 110-385.
(2) The department is authorized to receive federal funds made
available for broadband or high-speed internet purposes according to
the provisions of the acts of congress making the funds available.
Funds must be expended in accordance with federal and state law and any
conditions contingent in the grant of those funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of federal or state funding
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall:
(a) Conduct a detailed survey of all high-speed internet
infrastructure owned or leased by state agencies; and
(b) Use the surveyed information to create a geographic information
system map of all high-speed internet infrastructure owned or leased by
the state.
(2) State agencies shall respond to any request for information
from the department in a reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed
one hundred twenty days. State agencies shall disclose to the
department, at a minimum:
(a) The total bandwidth of high-speed internet infrastructure owned
or leased;
(b) The cost of maintaining that high-speed internet
infrastructure, if owned, or the price paid for the high-speed internet
infrastructure, if leased; and
(c) The leasing entity, if applicable.
(3) The department may create an interactive web site to allow
residents to self-report whether high-speed internet is available at
their home or residence and at what speed.
(4) For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every
state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
state agency.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.350 and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of ((compliance with section 2, chapter 262, Laws
of 2008 or)) any ((subsequent)) state high-speed internet deployment
and adoption initiative, the department of information services, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the utilities
and transportation commission, and any other government agent or agency
shall not ((gather or request any information related to high-speed
internet infrastructure or service from)) require providers of
telecommunications or high-speed internet services ((that is)) to
provide information related to high-speed internet infrastructure or
service that may be classified by the provider as proprietary or
competitively sensitive, but may accept, store, and use such
information if voluntarily offered by the provider or if provided by
the federal government to facilitate implementation of a high-speed
internet deployment and adoption initiative.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
authority of a state agency or local government to gather or request
information from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services for other purposes pursuant to its statutory authority.

--- END ---