BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
pursue deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services in the
state to promote economic development and the creation of green jobs,
with the ultimate goal of making high-speed internet more readily
available throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as an eligible entity for purposes
of the broadband data improvement act, P.L. 110-385.
(2) The department is authorized to receive federal funds made
available for broadband or high-speed internet purposes according to
the provisions of the acts of congress making the funds available.
Funds must be expended in accordance with federal and state law and any
conditions contingent in the grant of those funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of federal or state funding
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall implement
a high-speed internet deployment and adoption strategy on behalf of the
state, beginning in areas with an uptake rate for high-speed internet
below the state median. Implementation of the strategy may include:
(a) Developing an interactive web site to allow residents to self-report whether high-speed internet is available at their home or
residence and at what speed;
(b) Soliciting and receiving gifts, grants, and bequests for high-speed internet deployment and adoption efforts; and
(c) Conducting a detailed survey of all high-speed internet
infrastructure owned or leased by state agencies and creating a
geographic information system map of all high-speed internet
infrastructure owned or leased by the state.
(2) State agencies responding to a survey request from the
department under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall respond in a
reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed one hundred twenty days.
State agencies, if surveyed, shall disclose to the department, at a
minimum:
(a) The total bandwidth of high-speed internet infrastructure owned
or leased;
(b) The cost of maintaining that high-speed internet
infrastructure, if owned, or the price paid for the high-speed internet
infrastructure, if leased; and
(c) The leasing entity, if applicable.
(3) The department may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every
state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
state agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized, through a competitive bidding
process, to procure on behalf of the state a geographic information
system map detailing high-speed internet infrastructure, service
availability, and adoption. This geographic information system map may
include adoption information, availability information, type of high-speed internet deployment technology, and available speed tiers for
high-speed internet based on publicly available form 477 aggregated
data collected by the federal communications commission.
(2) The department may procure this map either by:
(a) Contracting for and purchasing a completed map from a third
party; or
(b) Working directly with the federal communications commission to
accept publicly available data based on form 477 data.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.105.350 and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of ((compliance with section 2, chapter 262, Laws
of 2008 or)) any ((subsequent)) state high-speed internet deployment
and adoption initiative, the department of information services, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the utilities
and transportation commission, and any other government agent or agency
shall not ((gather or request any information related to high-speed
internet infrastructure or service from)) require providers of
telecommunications or high-speed internet services ((that is)) to
provide information related to high-speed internet infrastructure or
service that may be classified by the provider as proprietary or
competitively sensitive, but may accept, store, and use such
information if voluntarily offered by the provider or if provided by
the federal government to facilitate implementation of a high-speed
internet deployment and adoption initiative.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
authority of a state agency or local government to gather or request
information from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services for other purposes pursuant to its statutory authority.

--- END ---