BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purposes of section 2 and 3 of this
act and RCW 43.88.090, "new program" means:
(1) A newly created agency;
(2) Services not supported in the previous biennium by the state;
(3) Services to a population or other entity not served by the
state in the previous biennium; or
(4) Any activity not undertaken by the state in the previous
biennium. "Activity" means a discrete work element carried out by
state government agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) On July 1st of each calendar year, the
state auditor shall publish a draft list on its web site of all new
programs funded by any appropriation or allotment of state funds during
the previous fiscal year. The state auditor shall provide written
notice of publication to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house
of representatives and senate and to the office of financial
management.
(2) The list shall include:
(a) The name of the program;
(b) A brief description of the program and the expected result;
(c) The name of the agencies receiving the funding; and
(d) The amounts appropriated, by fund or account.
(3) Within thirty days of the publication of the draft list of new
programs, the legislature and the office of financial management may
provide any comments it may have on the draft list to the state
auditor's office.
(4) Within sixty days after the publication of the draft list, the
state auditor shall publish a final list of new programs on its web
site. The state auditor shall provide written notice of the final
publication to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate and to the office of financial
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Three years after the initial funding of
any new program, as defined in section 1 of this act, the state auditor
shall conduct a fiscal and performance audit of each new program.
(2) The audit shall:
(a) Identify the original objective or objectives of the new
program;
(b) Identify the data collected by the program and the performance
measures;
(c) Assess how effective the program was at meeting the objective
or objectives;
(d) Determine how efficiently the resources were used; and
(e) Suggest changes to the program to increase effectiveness and
efficiency, including alternative approaches or termination of the
program.
(3) The state auditor shall provide a final copy of the audit to
the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
the senate and to the office of financial management by December 31st
of the calendar year for that audit period.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.88.090 and 2005 c 386 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature,
the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty,
to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and
other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall
direct. The governor shall communicate statewide priorities to
agencies for use in developing biennial budget recommendations for
their agency and shall seek public involvement and input on these
priorities. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall
be transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget
without revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall
be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all
such estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways
and means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed
with the governor and the office of financial management.
The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by
agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal
matching revenues. The budget document must also include a listing of
all new programs funded in the previous two years. For each new
program, the list shall include: Program name; program objective; a
brief description of the program; performance measures; current annual
funding levels by agency; and the funding level proposed in the
governor's biennial budget request. The list shall include all new
programs funded in the previous two years regardless of whether the
governor proposes funding those programs for the ensuing biennium. The
estimates shall be revised as necessary to reflect legislative
enactments and adopted appropriations and shall be included with the
initial biennial allotment submitted under RCW 43.88.110. The
estimates must reflect that the agency considered any alternatives to
reduce costs or improve service delivery identified in the findings of
a performance audit of the agency by the joint legislative audit and
review committee. Nothing in this subsection requires performance
audit findings to be published as part of the budget.
(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish
measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive
its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency
shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals.
This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or
goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent
of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to
statutory direction and limitations.
(3) For the purpose of assessing activity performance, each state
agency shall establish quality and productivity objectives for each
major activity in its budget. The objectives must be consistent with
the missions and goals developed under this section. The objectives
must be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based,
objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a different
standard is granted by the office of financial management and approved
by the legislative committee on performance review. Objectives must
specifically address the statutory purpose or intent of the program or
activity and focus on data that measure whether the agency is achieving
or making progress toward the purpose of the activity and toward
statewide priorities. The office of financial management shall provide
necessary professional and technical assistance to assist state
agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the mission
of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies, and
performance measurement systems.
(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for and perform
continuous self-assessment of each activity, using the mission, goals,
objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section. The assessment of the activity must also include an
evaluation of major information technology systems or projects that may
assist the agency in achieving or making progress toward the activity
purpose and statewide priorities. The evaluation of proposed major
information technology systems or projects shall be in accordance with
the standards and policies established by the information services
board. Agencies' progress toward the mission, goals, objectives, and
measurements required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section is
subject to review as set forth in this subsection.
(a) The office of financial management shall regularly conduct
reviews of selected activities to analyze whether the objectives and
measurements submitted by agencies demonstrate progress toward
statewide results.
(b) The office of financial management shall consult with the
higher education coordinating board and the state board for community
and technical colleges in those reviews that involve institutions of
higher education.
(c) The goal is for all major activities to receive at least one
review each year.
(d) The office of financial management shall consult with the
information services board when conducting reviews of major information
technology systems in use by state agencies. The goal is that reviews
of these information technology systems occur periodically.
(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget
recommendations must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission
and program, quality, and productivity goals and objectives.
Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must include
integration of performance measures that allow objective determination
of an activity's success in achieving its goals. When a review under
subsection (4) of this section or other analysis determines that the
agency's objectives demonstrate that the agency is making insufficient
progress toward the goals of any particular program or is otherwise
underachieving or inefficient, the agency's budget request shall
contain proposals to remedy or improve the selected programs. The
office of financial management shall develop a plan to merge the budget
development process with agency performance assessment procedures. The
plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans and
performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's
budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify
those agencies that will implement the revised budget process in the
1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003 biennium.
In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, the office of
financial management shall recommend statutory and procedural
modifications to the state's budget, accounting, and reporting systems
to facilitate the performance assessment procedures and the merger of
those procedures with the state budget process. The plan and
recommended statutory and procedural modifications must be submitted to
the legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 1996.
(6) In reviewing agency budget requests in order to prepare the
governor's biennial budget request, the office of financial management
shall consider the extent to which the agency's activities demonstrate
progress toward the statewide budgeting priorities, along with any
specific review conducted under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall
invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend
all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish
the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such
information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements.
The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such
questions during the hearings and require such information as the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may
make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which,
with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the
legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such
estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.09 RCW.

--- END ---