BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.090 and 1991 c 3 s 290 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any child shall be exempt in whole or in part from the
immunization measures required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170
upon the presentation of any one or more of the following, on a form
prescribed by the department of health:
(((1))) (a) A ((written certification)) certificate of exemption
signed by ((any physician licensed to practice medicine pursuant to
chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW)) a health care practitioner stating that a
particular vaccine or vaccines required by rule of the state board of
health is or are, in his or her medical judgment, not advisable for the
child: PROVIDED, That when it is determined that ((this)) a particular
vaccine is no longer contraindicated, the child will be required to
have the vaccine;
(((2))) (b) A ((written certification)) certificate of exemption
signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child, or ((any adult in
loco parentis to the child)) other person authorized by rules of the
state board of health, stating that the religious beliefs of the
signator are contrary to the required immunization measures; ((and)) or
(((3))) (c) A ((written certification)) certificate of exemption
that includes both:
(i) A certification signed and dated by any parent or legal
guardian of the child or ((any adult in loco parentis to the child that
the signator has either)) other person authorized by rules of the state
board of health, requesting the exemption on the basis of a
philosophical or personal ((objection to the immunization of the
child)) belief that includes the following:
(A) The particular vaccine or vaccines for which an exemption is
being requested, and an explanation of the reasons for requesting the
exemption; and
(B) An acknowledgement that the child may be prohibited from
attending school during an outbreak of a disease for which the child
has not been immunized; and
(ii) A certification signed and dated by a health care practitioner
stating that the parent, legal guardian, or other person authorized by
rules of the state board of health received information about the
benefits and risks of immunization.
(2) For purposes of this section, "health care practitioner" means
a physician licensed to practice medicine under chapter 18.71 or 18.57
RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, or an advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

--- END ---