BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.96.080 and 1989 c 415 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a
franchise ((by the manufacturer under this chapter)), the manufacturer
shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer, at a minimum:
(a) Dealer cost plus any charges by the manufacturer for
distribution, delivery, and taxes, less all allowances paid or credited
to the dealer by the manufacturer, of unused, undamaged, and unsold new
motor vehicles in the new motor vehicle dealer's inventory that were
acquired from the manufacturer or another new motor vehicle dealer of
the same line make in the ordinary course of business within the
previous twelve months;
(b) Dealer cost for all unused, undamaged, and unsold supplies,
parts, and accessories in original packaging, except that in the case
of sheet metal, a comparable substitute for original packaging may be
used, if the supply, part, or accessory was acquired from the
manufacturer or from another new motor vehicle dealer ceasing
operations as a part of the new motor vehicle dealer's initial
inventory as long as the supplies, parts, and accessories appear in the
manufacturer's current parts catalog, list, or current offering;
(c) Dealer cost for all unused, undamaged, and unsold inventory,
whether vehicles, parts, or accessories, the purchase of which was
required by the manufacturer;
(d) The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the new
motor vehicle dealer that bears a common name, trade name, or trademark
of the manufacturer, if acquisition of the sign was recommended or
required by the manufacturer and the sign is in good and usable
condition less reasonable wear and tear, and has not been depreciated
by the dealer more than fifty percent of the value of the sign;
(e) The fair market value of all equipment, furnishings, and
special tools owned or leased by the new motor vehicle dealer that were
acquired from the manufacturer or sources approved by the manufacturer
and that were recommended or required by the manufacturer and are in
good and usable condition, less reasonable wear and tear. However, if
the equipment, furnishings, or tools are leased by the new motor
vehicle dealer, the manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer
such amounts that are required by the lessor to terminate the lease
under the terms of the lease agreement; and
(f) The cost of transporting, handling, packing, and loading of new
motor vehicles, supplies, parts, accessories, signs, special tools,
equipment, and furnishings.
To the extent the franchise agreement provides for payment or
reimbursement to the new motor vehicle dealer in excess of that
specified in this section, the provisions of the franchise agreement
shall control.
(2)(a) For the nonrenewal or termination of a franchise that is
implemented as a result of the sale of assets or stock of the motor
vehicle dealer, the party purchasing the assets or stock of the motor
vehicle dealer may negotiate for the purchase or other transfer of some
or all unused, undamaged, and unsold new motor vehicles in the selling
new motor vehicle dealer's inventory that were acquired from the
manufacturer or another new motor vehicle dealer of the same line make
in the ordinary course of business within the previous twelve months.
(b) For the nonrenewal or termination of a franchise that is
implemented as a result of the sale of assets or stock of the motor
vehicle dealer, this section does not prohibit a manufacturer from
negotiating with the purchasing party for the purchase or other
transfer of some or all unused, undamaged, and unsold new motor
vehicles in the selling new motor vehicle dealer's inventory that were
acquired from the manufacturer or another new motor vehicle dealer of
the same line make in the ordinary course of business within the
previous twelve months.
(c) A manufacturer's obligation under (a) of this subsection
extends only to vehicles not purchased or otherwise transferred to the
party purchasing the assets or stock of the motor vehicle dealer.
(3) The manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer the
sums specified in subsection (1) of this section within ninety days
after the ((tender of the property)) termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of the franchise, if the new motor vehicle dealer has clear
title to the property or can provide clear title to the property upon
payment by the manufacturer and is in a position to convey that title
to the manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---