BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.135.070 and 2006 c 284 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a criminal prosecution for any crime under Washington law in
which the insurance company is a victim, the insurance company is
entitled to be considered as a victim in any restitution ordered by the
court under RCW 9.94A.753, as part of the criminal penalty imposed
against the defendant convicted for such a violation.
(2) An insurance company that is a victim of a criminal action
under subsection (1) of this section, has a cause of action against the
defendant to recover compensatory damages, plus all reasonable
investigation and litigation expenses, including reasonable attorneys'
fees.

--- END ---