BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Maury Island
aquatic reserve is an important native ecosystem in Washington that
benefits both the aquatic habitat and species in the state.
It is the intent of the legislature that the lands adjacent to the
Maury Island aquatic reserve be protected in order to preserve the
ecosystem of the aquatic reserve. By protecting the lands adjacent to
the Maury Island aquatic reserve it is the intent of the legislature to
safeguard the sole source aquifer and springs from which many residents
of Maury Island rely on as their drinking water.

--- END ---