BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.355 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((For computations made before January 1, 2007, the employment
security department shall compute, on or before the fifteenth day of
June of each year, an "average annual wage", an "average weekly wage",
and an "average annual wage for contributions purposes" from
information for the specified preceding calendar years including
corrections thereof reported within three months after the close of the
final year of the specified years by all employers as defined in RCW
50.04.080.
(a) The "average annual wage" is the quotient derived by dividing
the total remuneration reported by all employers for the preceding
calendar year by the average number of workers reported for all months
of the preceding calendar year and if the result is not a multiple of
one dollar, rounding the result to the next lower multiple of one
dollar.
(b) The "average weekly wage" is the quotient derived by dividing
the "average annual wage" obtained under (a) of this subsection by
fifty-two and if the result is not a multiple of one dollar, rounding
the result to the next lower multiple of one dollar.
(c) The "average annual wage for contributions purposes" is the
quotient derived by dividing by three the total remuneration reported
by all employers subject to contributions for the preceding three
consecutive calendar years and dividing this amount by the average
number of workers reported for all months of these three years by these
same employers and if the result is not a multiple of one dollar,
rounding the result to the next lower multiple of one dollar.
(2) For computations made on or after January 1, 2007,)) The
employment security department shall compute, on or before the
fifteenth day of June of each year, an "average annual wage," an
"average weekly wage," and an "average annual wage for contributions
purposes" from information for the preceding calendar year including
corrections thereof reported within three months after the close of
that year by all employers as defined in RCW 50.04.080.
(a) The "average annual wage" is the quotient derived by dividing
the total remuneration reported by all employers by the average number
of workers reported for all months and if the result is not a multiple
of one dollar, rounding the result to the next lower multiple of one
dollar.
(b) The "average weekly wage" is the quotient derived by dividing
the "average annual wage" obtained under (a) of this subsection by
fifty-two and if the result is not a multiple of one dollar, rounding
the result to the next lower multiple of one dollar.
(c) The "average annual wage for contributions purposes" is the
quotient derived by dividing the total remuneration reported by all
employers subject to contributions by the average number of workers
reported for all months by these same employers and if the result is
not a multiple of one dollar, rounding the result to the next lower
multiple of one dollar.
(2) The employment security department shall also compute, on or
before the fifteenth day of June of each year, the median annual wage
and the median weekly wage from information for the preceding calendar
year including corrections thereof reported within three months after
the close of that year by all employers as defined in RCW 50.04.080.
The department shall also compute the average annual wages and weekly
wages for each decile. If not multiples of one dollar, the results
shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

--- END ---