BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.047 and 2005 c 223 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An insurer may not offer any health benefit plan to any small
employer without complying with RCW 48.21.045(3).
(2) ((Employers purchasing health plans provided through
associations or through member-governed groups formed specifically for
the purpose of purchasing health care are not small employers and the
plans are not subject to RCW 48.21.045(3).)) Notwithstanding subsection
(1) of this section, health benefit plans provided by an insurer
through an association or member-governed group to employers or
individuals are not subject to RCW 48.21.045(3). For purposes of
regulatory and rating requirements, such health benefit plans are
considered large group plans in which the entire association or member-governed group constitutes the group. The insurer shall base the rates
for the association or member-governed group on the health care claims
or health status of the entire association or member-governed group and
may only vary the rates for the rating factors that are generally
accepted in the large group rating such as age, geographic area, family
size, industry factor, and smoker or nonsmoker.
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" or "small group" mean the same as defined
in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.024 and 2003 c 248 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health care service contractor may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with RCW
48.44.023(3).
(2) ((Employers purchasing health plans provided through
associations or through member-governed groups formed specifically for
the purpose of purchasing health care are not small employers and the
plans are not subject to RCW 48.44.023(3).)) Notwithstanding subsection
(1) of this section, health benefit plans provided by a contractor
through an association or member-governed group to employers or
individuals are not subject to RCW 48.44.023(3). For purposes of
regulatory and rating requirements, such health benefit plans are
considered large group plans in which the entire association or member-governed group constitutes the group. The health care service
contractor shall base the rates for the association or member-governed
group on the health care claims or health status of the entire
association or member-governed group and may only vary the rates for
the rating factors that are generally accepted in the large group
rating such as age, geographic area, family size, industry factor, and
smoker or nonsmoker.
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" or "small group" mean the same as defined
in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.068 and 2003 c 248 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health maintenance organization may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with RCW
48.46.066(3).
(2) ((Employers purchasing health plans provided through
associations or through member-governed groups formed specifically for
the purpose of purchasing health care are not small employers and are
not subject to RCW 48.46.066(3).)) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of
this section, health benefit plans provided by a health maintenance
organization through an association or member-governed group to
employers or individuals are not subject to RCW 48.46.066(3). For
purposes of regulatory and rating requirements, such health benefit
plans are considered large group plans in which the entire association
or member-governed group constitutes the group. The health maintenance
organization shall base the rates for the association or member-governed group on the health care claims or health status of the entire
association or member-governed group and may only vary the rates for
the rating factors that are generally accepted in the large group
rating such as age, geographic area, family size, industry factor, and
smoker or nonsmoker.
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" or "small group" mean the same as defined
in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.21.045 and 2008 c 143 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer((, either directly or through an association or member-governed group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health
care,)) may offer and actively market to the small employer a health
benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care
services. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from
offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit
plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those included in
the product offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a
health benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.244, 48.21.250,
48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.44.023 and 2008 c 143 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer((, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care,)) may offer and actively market to
the small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule
of covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and 48.44.460.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.46.066 and 2008 c 143 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer((, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care,)) may offer and actively market to
the small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule
of covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all the
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.350,
48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, and
48.46.530.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide
coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small
employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

--- END ---