BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.41.060 and 2008 c 217 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the general powers and authority granted
under the laws of this state to insurance companies, health care
service contractors, and health maintenance organizations, licensed or
registered to offer or provide the kinds of health coverage defined
under this title. In addition thereto, the board shall:
(a) Designate or establish the standard health questionnaire to be
used under RCW 48.41.100 and 48.43.018, including the form and content
of the standard health questionnaire and the method of its application.
The questionnaire must provide for an objective evaluation of an
individual's health status by assigning a discreet measure, such as a
system of point scoring to each individual. The questionnaire must not
contain any questions related to pregnancy, and pregnancy shall not be
a basis for coverage by the pool. The questionnaire shall be designed
such that it is reasonably expected to identify the eight percent of
persons who are the most costly to treat who are under individual
coverage in health benefit plans, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, in
Washington state or are covered by the pool, if applied to all such
persons;
(b) Obtain from a member of the American academy of actuaries, who
is independent of the board, a certification that the standard health
questionnaire meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection;
(c) Approve the standard health questionnaire and any modifications
needed to comply with this chapter. The standard health questionnaire
shall be submitted to an actuary for certification, modified as
necessary, and approved at least every ((eighteen)) thirty-six months.
The designation and approval of the standard health questionnaire by
the board shall not be subject to review and approval by the
commissioner. The standard health questionnaire or any modification
thereto shall not be used until ninety days after public notice of the
approval of the questionnaire or any modification thereto, except that
the initial standard health questionnaire approved for use by the board
after March 23, 2000, may be used immediately following public notice
of such approval;
(d) Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments,
expense allowances, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial
functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not be
unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience,
and expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may
be adjusted for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation
in claim costs and shall take into consideration appropriate risk
factors in accordance with established actuarial underwriting practices
consistent with Washington state individual plan rating requirements
under RCW 48.44.022 and 48.46.064;
(e)(i) Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter, and make advance interim assessments as may be
reasonable and necessary for the organizational or interim operating
expenses. Any interim assessments will be credited as offsets against
any regular assessments due following the close of the year.
(ii) Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements are subject
to assessment under this subsection only in the event that assessments
are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of
1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing assessments on these
arrangements before imposing the assessment. Once the legality of the
assessments has been determined, the multiple employer welfare
arrangement certified by the insurance commissioner must begin payment
of these assessments.
(iii) If there has not been a final determination of the legality
of these assessments, then beginning on the earlier of (A) the date the
fourth multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the
insurance commissioner, or (B) April 1, 2006, the arrangement shall
deposit the assessments imposed by this subsection into an interest
bearing escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final
determination that the assessments are not preempted by the employee
retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001
et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account shall be
transferred to the board;
(f) Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter;
(g) Establish procedures for the administration of the premium
discount provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a)(iii);
(h) Contract with the Washington state health care authority for
the administration of the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii);
(i) Set a reasonable fee to be paid to an insurance producer
licensed in Washington state for submitting an acceptable application
for enrollment in the pool; and
(j) Provide certification to the commissioner when assessments will
exceed the threshold level established in RCW 48.41.037.
(2) In addition thereto, the board may:
(a) Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out
the provisions and purposes of this chapter including the authority,
with the approval of the commissioner, to enter into contracts with
similar pools of other states for the joint performance of common
administrative functions, or with persons or other organizations for
the performance of administrative functions;
(b) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary
to avoid the payment of improper claims against the pool or the
coverage provided by or through the pool;
(c) Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as
necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool,
policy, and other contract design, and any other function within the
authority of the pool; and
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the
pool to have an annual audit of its operations by an independent
certified public accountant.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or
authorize the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.41.100 and 2007 c 259 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following persons who are residents of this state are
eligible for pool coverage:
(a) Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's decision not to
accept him or her for enrollment in an individual health benefit plan
as defined in RCW 48.43.005 based upon, and within ninety days of the
receipt of, the results of the standard health questionnaire designated
by the board and administered by health carriers under RCW 48.43.018;
(b) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool coverage based
upon the results of the standard health questionnaire designated by the
board and administered by the pool administrator pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section;
(c) Any person who resides in a county of the state where no
carrier or insurer eligible under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool, and who makes direct application to the pool; and
(d) Any medicare eligible person upon providing evidence of a
rejection for medical reasons, a requirement of restrictive riders, an
up-rated premium, or a preexisting conditions limitation on a medicare
supplemental insurance policy under chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of
which is to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a
person considered a standard risk by at least one member within six
months of the date of application.
(2) The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the
pool:
(a) Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i)
twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can
show continuous other coverage which has been involuntarily terminated
for any reason other than nonpayment of premiums. However, these
exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(b) Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out two million
dollars in benefits;
(c) Inmates of public institutions and those persons ((whose
benefits are duplicated under public programs)) who become eligible for
medical assistance after June 30, 2008, as defined in RCW 74.09.010.
However, these exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as
defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability
and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(d) Any person who resides in a county of the state where any
carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, or pursuant to subsection
(1)(d) of this section.
(3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a county where no
carrier had been offering an individual health benefit plan:
(a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005, any person enrolled in a pool
plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section in that county shall
no longer be eligible for coverage under that plan pursuant to
subsection (1)(c) of this section, but may continue to be eligible for
pool coverage based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire designated by the board and administered by the pool
administrator. The pool administrator shall offer to administer the
questionnaire to each person no longer eligible for coverage under
subsection (1)(c) of this section within thirty days of determining
that he or she is no longer eligible;
(b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this subsection (3)
does not affect a person's eligibility for pool coverage under
subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section; and
(c) The pool administrator shall provide written notice to any
person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a pool plan under
this subsection (3) within thirty days of the administrator's
determination that the person is no longer eligible. The notice shall:
(i) Indicate that coverage under the plan will cease ninety days from
the date that the notice is dated; (ii) describe any other coverage
options, either in or outside of the pool, available to the person;
(iii) describe the procedures for the administration of the standard
health questionnaire to determine the person's continued eligibility
for coverage under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and (iv) describe
the enrollment process for the available options outside of the pool.
(4) The board shall ensure that an independent analysis of the
eligibility standards for the pool coverage is conducted, including
examining the eight percent eligibility threshold, eligibility for
medicaid enrollees and other publicly sponsored enrollees, and the
impacts on the pool and the state budget. The board shall report the
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.41.100 and 2008 c 317 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following persons who are residents of this state are
eligible for pool coverage:
(a) Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's decision not to
accept him or her for enrollment in an individual health benefit plan
as defined in RCW 48.43.005 based upon, and within ninety days of the
receipt of, the results of the standard health questionnaire designated
by the board and administered by health carriers under RCW 48.43.018;
(b) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool coverage based
upon the results of the standard health questionnaire designated by the
board and administered by the pool administrator pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section;
(c) Any person who resides in a county of the state where no
carrier or insurer eligible under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool, and who makes direct application to the pool; and
(d) Any medicare eligible person ((upon providing)):
(i) Who does not have access to a reasonable choice of more than
one medicare part C coverage option, at least one of which is not a
private fee for service plan; and
(ii) Who provides (A) evidence of a rejection for medical reasons,
(B) a requirement of restrictive riders, (C) an up-rated premium, or
(D) a preexisting conditions limitation on a medicare supplemental
insurance policy under chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of any of which is
to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a person
considered a standard risk by at least one member within six months of
the date of application.
(2) The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the
pool:
(a) Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i)
twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can
show continuous other coverage which has been involuntarily terminated
for any reason other than nonpayment of premiums. However, these
exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(b) Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out two million
dollars in benefits;
(c) Inmates of public institutions, and those persons who become
eligible for medical assistance after June 30, 2008, as defined in RCW
74.09.010. However, these exclusions do not apply to eligible
individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
300gg-41(b));
(d) Any person who resides in a county of the state where any
carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, or pursuant to subsection
(1)(d) of this section.
(3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a county where no
carrier had been offering an individual health benefit plan:
(a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005, any person enrolled in a pool
plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section in that county shall
no longer be eligible for coverage under that plan pursuant to
subsection (1)(c) of this section, but may continue to be eligible for
pool coverage based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire designated by the board and administered by the pool
administrator. The pool administrator shall offer to administer the
questionnaire to each person no longer eligible for coverage under
subsection (1)(c) of this section within thirty days of determining
that he or she is no longer eligible;
(b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this subsection (3)
does not affect a person's eligibility for pool coverage under
subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section; and
(c) The pool administrator shall provide written notice to any
person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a pool plan under
this subsection (3) within thirty days of the administrator's
determination that the person is no longer eligible. The notice shall:
(i) Indicate that coverage under the plan will cease ninety days from
the date that the notice is dated; (ii) describe any other coverage
options, either in or outside of the pool, available to the person;
(iii) describe the procedures for the administration of the standard
health questionnaire to determine the person's continued eligibility
for coverage under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and (iv) describe
the enrollment process for the available options outside of the pool.
(4) The board shall ensure that an independent analysis of the
eligibility standards for the pool coverage is conducted, including
examining the eight percent eligibility threshold, eligibility for
medicaid enrollees and other publicly sponsored enrollees, and the
impacts on the pool and the state budget. The board shall report the
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board of the Washington state health
insurance pool shall conduct a study of options for equitable, stable,
and broad-based funding sources for the operation of the pool. The
board is authorized to solicit funds to conduct the study. The board
shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 15,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect if
section 4, chapter 317, Laws of 2008 is null and void on the effective
date of this act; otherwise section 2 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect if
section 4, chapter 317, Laws of 2008 is in effect on the effective date
of this act; otherwise section 3 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---