BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.115 and 2006 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall develop and maintain a cross-state trail
facility with appropriate appurtenances.
(2) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2019, if the department
of transportation does not enter into a franchise agreement for a rail
line over the portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor between
Ellensburg and Lind by July 1, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.120 and 2006 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To facilitate completion of a cross-state trail under the
management of the parks and recreation commission, management and
control of lands known as the Milwaukee Road corridor shall be
transferred between state agencies as follows on the date a franchise
agreement is entered into for a rail line over portions of the
Milwaukee Road corridor:
(a) Portions owned by the state between Ellensburg and the Columbia
river that are managed by the parks and recreation commission are
transferred to the department of transportation;
(b) Portions owned by the state between the west side of the
Columbia river and Royal City Junction and between Warden and Lind that
are managed by the department of natural resources are transferred to
the department of transportation; and
(c) Portions owned by the state between Lind and the Idaho border
that are managed by the department of natural resources are transferred
to the parks and recreation commission as of June 7, 2006.
(2) The department of natural resources may, by mutual agreement
with the parks and recreation commission, transfer management authority
over portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor to the state parks and
recreation commission, at any time prior to the department of
transportation entering into a franchise agreement.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2019, and no transfers
shall occur if the department of transportation does not enter into a
franchise agreement for a rail line over the portions of the Milwaukee
Road corridor between Ellensburg and Lind by July 1, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.125 and 2006 c 160 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall negotiate a franchise
with a rail carrier to establish and maintain a rail line over portions
of the Milwaukee Road corridor owned by the state between Ellensburg
and Lind. The department of transportation may negotiate such a
franchise with any qualified rail carrier. Criteria for negotiating
the franchise and establishing the right-of-way include:
(a) Assurances that resources from the franchise will be sufficient
to compensate the state for use of the property, including completion
of a cross-state trail between Easton and the Idaho border;
(b) Types of payment for use of the franchise, including payment
for the use of federally granted trust lands in the transportation
corridor;
(c) Standards for maintenance of the line;
(d) Provisions ensuring that both the conventional and intermodal
rail service needs of local shippers are met. Such accommodations may
comprise agreements with the franchisee to offer or maintain adequate
service or to provide service by other carriers at commercially
reasonable rates;
(e) Provisions requiring the franchisee, upon reasonable request of
any other rail operator, to provide rail service and interchange
freight over what is commonly known as the Stampede Pass rail line from
Cle Elum to Auburn at commercially reasonable rates;
(f) If any part of the franchise agreement is invalidated by
actions or rulings of the federal surface transportation board or a
court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining portions of the
franchise agreement are not affected;
(g) Compliance with environmental standards; and
(h) Provisions for insurance and the coverage of liability.
(2) The franchise may provide for periodic review of financial
arrangements under the franchise.
(3) The department of transportation, in consultation with the
parks and recreation commission and the senate and house transportation
committees, shall negotiate the terms of the franchise, and shall
present the agreement to the parks and recreation commission for
approval of as to terms and provisions affecting the cross-state trail
or affecting the commission.
(4) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2019, if the department
of transportation does not enter into a franchise agreement for a rail
line over portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor between Ellensburg
and Lind by July 1, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.05.130 and 2006 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The cross-state trail account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Eleven million five hundred thousand dollars is
provided to the state parks and recreation commission to acquire,
construct, and maintain a cross-state trail. This amount may consist
of: (a) Legislative appropriations intended for trail development; (b)
payments for the purchase of federally granted trust lands; and (c)
franchise fees derived from use of the rail corridor. The legislature
intends that any amounts provided from the transportation fund are to
be repaid to the transportation fund from franchise fees.
(2) The department shall deposit franchise fees from use of the
rail corridor according to the following priority: (a) To the
department of transportation for actual costs incurred in administering
the franchise; (b) to the department of natural resources as
compensation for use of federally granted trust lands in the rail
corridor; (c) to the transportation fund to reimburse any amounts
transferred or appropriated from that fund by the legislature for trail
development; (d) to the cross-state trail account, not to exceed eleven
million five hundred thousand dollars, provided that this amount shall
be reduced proportionate with any funds transferred or appropriated by
the 1996 legislature or paid from franchise fees for the purchase of
federally granted trust lands or for trail development; and (e) the
remainder to the essential rail assistance account, created under RCW
47.76.250. Expenditures from the cross-state trail account may be used
only for the acquisition, development, operation, and maintenance of
the cross-state trail. Only the director of the state parks and
recreation commission or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.
(3) The commission may acquire land from willing sellers for the
cross-state trail, but not by eminent domain.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules describing the cross-state
trail.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2019, if the department
of transportation does not enter into a franchise agreement for a rail
line over portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor between Ellensburg
and Lind by July 1, ((2009)) 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---