BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that development of
renewable sources of energy is crucial for strengthening Washington's
economy and for reducing greenhouse gas emissions. The legislature
also finds that it is important for all communities, especially low-income and underserved communities, to have access to conservation
practices and green jobs that are created as renewable energy
production is increased and as Washington transitions to a green
economy. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to spur the
development of renewable energy production and encourage installation
of conservation measures by training a highly skilled workforce using
the opportunity grants program funded through the green industry jobs
training account to ensure that people from low-income and underserved
communities may have an opportunity to participate in the development
of Washington's renewable energy economy and long-term prosperity.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The tax levied)) (a) A partial exemption in the form of a
refund is provided for the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall not
apply to)) for sales of machinery and equipment used directly in
generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as
the principal source of power, or to sales of or charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such machinery,
equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not less than two
hundred watts of electricity ((and provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files)).
(b) Buyers who receive this partial exemption must comply with the
prevailing wage requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW on all installations.
(c) Buyers who receive this partial exemption for installation
projects with equipment or machinery costs of thirty-five thousand
dollars or more must ensure that no less than fifteen percent of the
labor hours installing the equipment or machinery are performed by
apprentices.
(2) Sellers must collect the tax on sales subject to this
exemption. The buyer must apply for a refund directly from the
department in a form and manner required by the department. The refund
is for seventy percent of the state sales tax.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:
(a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas
as the principal source of power;
(c) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity with fuel cells or by wind energy, solar energy, or
landfill gas power if it provides any part of the process that captures
the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas, converts that energy to
electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems;
(e) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst;
(f) "Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in an apprenticeship
training program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship
council; and
(g) "Labor hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project.
"Labor hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by the
contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor
hours" does not include hours worked by foremen, superintendents,
owners, and workers who are not subject to prevailing wage
requirements.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The provisions of this chapter shall not apply)) (a) A
partial exemption in the form of a refund is provided for the tax
imposed under this chapter with respect to machinery and equipment used
directly in generating not less than two hundred watts of electricity
using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of
power, or to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment.
(b) Buyers who receive this partial exemption must comply with the
prevailing wage requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW on all installations.
(c) Buyers who receive this partial exemption for installation
projects with equipment or machinery costs of thirty-five thousand
dollars or more must ensure that no less than fifteen percent of the
labor hours installing the equipment or machinery are performed by
apprentices.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax must collect tax on sales
subject to this exemption. The buyer must apply for a refund directly
from the department in a form and manner required by the department.
The refund is for seventy percent of the state use tax.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(((3))) (4) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state treasurer must periodically transfer from the general
fund to the green industries jobs training account created in RCW
43.330.310, the thirty percent portion of tax refund requests not
subject to a refund under RCW 82.08.02567 or 82.12.02567.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "electricity generation
sales and use tax exemption" means the sales and use tax exemption
under RCW 82.08.02567 and 82.12.02567.
(b) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(c)(i) A person who receives the benefit of an electricity
generation sales and use tax exemption must make an annual report to
the department detailing employment, wages, use of apprentices, and
employer-provided health and retirement benefits. The report must
detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and
temporary positions. The report must detail compliance with the
prevailing wage requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW on all installations
and the use of apprentices for all installations of electricity
generation equipment and machinery that costs thirty-five thousand
dollars or more.
(ii) The report is due by March 31st following any year in which a
tax exemption is claimed or used. The report may not include names of
employees. The first report filed under this subsection must include
employment, wage, benefit information, and use of apprentices for the
twelve-month period immediately before first use of a tax exemption.
(iii) Information in a report under this section is not subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to
the public upon request.
(iv) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department must declare
the amount of taxes exempted for that year to be immediately due and
payable. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(d) The department must study the electricity generation sales and
use tax exemption authorized under RCW 82.08.02567 and 82.12.02567.
The department must submit a report to the finance committee of the
house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate
by December 1, 2011, and December 1, 2014. The report must detail
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement
benefits. The report must measure compliance with the prevailing wage
requirements on all installations and the use of apprentices for all
installations of electricity generation equipment and machinery that
costs thirty-five thousand dollars or more.

--- END ---