BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.304 and 1990 c 250 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Moped" means a motorized device designed to travel with not more
than three ((sixteen-inch or larger diameter)) wheels in contact with
the ground((, having fully operative pedals for propulsion by human
power,)) and having an electric or a liquid fuel motor with a cylinder
displacement not exceeding fifty cubic centimeters which produces no
more than two gross brake horsepower (developed by a prime mover, as
measured by a brake applied to the driving shaft) that is capable of
propelling the device at not more than thirty miles per hour on level
ground.
((The Washington state patrol may approve of and define as a
"moped" a vehicle which fails to meet these specific criteria, but
which is essentially similar in performance and application to
motorized devices which do meet these specific criteria.))

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.330 and 2003 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more
than three wheels in contact with the ground, on which the driver:
(1) Rides ((astride the motor unit or power train)) on a seat or
saddle and the motor vehicle is designed to be steered with a handle
bar((, but excluding)); or
(2) Rides on a seat in a partially or completely enclosed seating
area that is equipped with safety belts and the motor vehicle is
designed to be steered with a steering wheel.
"Motorcycle" excludes a farm tractor, a power wheelchair, an
electric personal assistive mobility device, a motorized foot scooter,
an electric-assisted bicycle, and a moped.
((The Washington state patrol may approve of and define as a
"motorcycle" a motor vehicle that fails to meet these specific
criteria, but that is essentially similar in performance and
application to motor vehicles that do meet these specific criteria.))

Sec. 3 RCW 46.04.336 and 2003 c 353 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motorized foot scooter" means a device with no more than two ten-inch or smaller diameter wheels that has handlebars, is designed to be
stood ((or sat)) upon by the operator, and is powered by an internal
combustion engine or electric motor that is capable of propelling the
device with or without human propulsion at a speed no more than twenty
miles per hour on level ground.
For purposes of this section, a motor-driven cycle, a moped, an
electric-assisted bicycle, or a motorcycle is not a motorized foot
scooter.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.37.530 and 2003 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful:
(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven
cycle not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides ((of the
motorcycle)) which shall be so located as to give the driver a complete
view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the
rear of the motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That
mirrors shall not be required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
over twenty-five years old originally manufactured without mirrors and
which has been restored to its original condition and which is being
ridden to or from or otherwise in conjunction with an antique or
classic motorcycle contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no mirror is required on any motorcycle manufactured
prior to January 1, 1931;
(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven
cycle which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles,
or a face shield of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state
patrol;
(c) For any person to operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway, county road, or city street
unless wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle helmet except when the
vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or ((automobile that is
licensed as a motorcycle or)) when the vehicle is equipped with ((seat
belts and roll bars approved by the state patrol)) all of the
following:
(i) Steering wheel;
(ii) Seat belts that conform to standards prescribed under 49
C.F.R. Part 571; and
(iii) Partially or completely enclosed seating area for the driver
and passenger that is certified by the manufacturer as meeting the
standards prescribed under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.216.
The motorcycle helmet neck or chin strap must be fastened securely
while the motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle is in motion.
Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot
scooters shall comply with all laws and regulations related to the use
of bicycle helmets;
(d) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;
(e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet
that does not meet the requirements established by this section.
(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules((, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act,)) concerning standards for glasses,
goggles, and face shields.
(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a
protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell,
padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin
strap type retention system, with ((a sticker)) the manufacturer's
certification applied in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.218
indicating that the motorcycle helmet meets standards established by
the United States department of transportation.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.44.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 213 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be unlawful to operate any vehicle upon public highways
with a wheelbase between any two axles thereof of less than three feet,
six inches when weight exceeds that allowed for one axle under RCW
46.44.042 or 46.44.041. It shall be unlawful to operate any motor
vehicle upon the public highways of this state with a wheelbase between
the frontmost axle and the rearmost axle of less than three feet, six
inches((: PROVIDED, That the minimum wheelbase for mopeds is thirty-eight inches)).
For the purposes of this section, wheelbase shall be measured upon
a straight line from center to center of the vehicle axles designated.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.610 and 1975 c 62 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person operating a motorcycle shall ride only upon the permanent
and regular seat attached thereto, and such operator shall not carry
any other person nor shall any other person ride on a motorcycle unless
such motorcycle is designed to carry more than one person, in which
event a passenger may ride upon the permanent and regular seat if
designed for two persons, or upon another seat firmly attached to the
motorcycle at the rear or side of the operator((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That)). However, the motorcycle must contain foot pegs((, of a type
approved by the equipment commission,)) or be equipped with an
additional bucket seat and seat belt meeting standards prescribed under
49 C.F.R. Part 571 for each person such motorcycle is designed to
carry.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.61.688 and 2007 c 510 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, ((the term)) "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Motorcycle," meaning a three-wheeled motor vehicle that is
designed (i) so that the driver rides on a seat in a partially or
completely enclosed seating area that is equipped with safety belts and
(ii) to be steered with a steering wheel.
(b) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers;
(((b))) (c) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor
vehicles with motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten
persons or less that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with
special features for occasional off-road operation;
(((c))) (d) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled, electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed
attainable in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more
than twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations
under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500;
(((d))) (e) "Medium-speed electric vehicle" meaning a self-propelled, electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle, equipped
with a roll cage or crush-proof body design, whose speed attainable in
one mile is more than thirty miles per hour but not more than thirty-five miles per hour and otherwise meets or exceeds the federal
regulations set forth in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500;
(((e))) (f) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive
power, except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or
trailers, designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(((f))) (g) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2)(a) This section only applies to:
(i) Motor vehicles that meet the manual seat belt safety standards
as set forth in ((federal motor vehicle safety standard 208 and to)) 49
C.F.R. Sec. 571.208;
(ii) Motorcycles, when equipped with safety belts that meet the
standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. Part 571; and
(iii) Neighborhood electric vehicles and medium-speed electric
vehicles that meet the seat belt standards as set forth in 49 C.F.R.
Sec. 571.500.
(b) This section does not apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no
safety belt is available when all designated seating positions as
required ((by federal motor vehicle safety standard 208)) under 49
C.F.R. Part 571 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does
not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.61.710 and 2003 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall operate a moped upon the highways of this state
unless the moped has been assigned a moped registration number and
displays a moped permit in accordance with the provisions of RCW
46.16.630.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moped may not be
operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or
hiking or recreational trail.
(3) Operation of a moped, electric personal assistive mobility
device, motorized foot scooter, or an electric-assisted bicycle on a
fully controlled limited access highway is unlawful. Operation of a
moped, motorized foot scooter, or an electric-assisted bicycle on a
sidewalk is unlawful.
(4) Removal of any muffling device or pollution control device from
a moped is unlawful.
(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section do not apply to
electric-assisted bicycles. Electric-assisted bicycles and motorized
foot scooters may have access to highways, other than limited access
highways, of the state to the same extent as bicycles. Subject to
subsection (6) of this section, electric-assisted bicycles and
motorized foot scooters may be operated on a multipurpose trail or
bicycle lane, but local jurisdictions may restrict or otherwise limit
the access of electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters,
and state agencies may regulate the use of motorized foot scooters on
facilities and properties under their jurisdiction and control.
(6) Subsections (1) and (4) of this section do not apply to
motorized foot scooters. Subsection (2) of this section applies to
motorized foot scooters when the bicycle path, trail, bikeway,
equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail was built or is
maintained with federal highway transportation funds. Additionally,
any new trail or bicycle path or readily identifiable existing trail or
bicycle path not built or maintained with federal highway
transportation funds may be used by persons operating motorized foot
scooters only when appropriately signed.
(7) A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility
device (EPAMD) shall obey all speed limits and shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and human-powered devices at all times. An
operator must also give an audible signal before overtaking and passing
a pedestrian. Except for the limitations of this subsection, persons
operating an EPAMD have all the rights and duties of a pedestrian.
(8) The use of an EPAMD may be regulated in the following
circumstances:
(a) A municipality and the department of transportation may
prohibit the operation of an EPAMD on public highways within their
respective jurisdictions where the speed limit is greater than twenty-five miles per hour;
(b) A municipality may restrict the speed of an EPAMD in locations
with congested pedestrian or nonmotorized traffic and where there is
significant speed differential between pedestrians or nonmotorized
traffic and EPAMD operators. The areas in this subsection must be
designated by the city engineer or designee of the municipality.
Municipalities shall not restrict the speed of an EPAMD in the entire
community or in areas in which there is infrequent pedestrian traffic;
(c) A state agency or local government may regulate the operation
of an EPAMD within the boundaries of any area used for recreation, open
space, habitat, trails, or conservation purposes.

--- END ---