BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.42.005 and 2007 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the health and safety of its
citizens, natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of
the state that must be protected to preserve the state's quality of
life. The legislature also finds that the state's economic well-being
is a vital interest that depends upon the development of fair,
accessible, and coordinated permitting and regulatory requirements that
ensure that the state not only protects public health and safety and
natural resources but also encourages appropriate activities that
stimulate growth and development. The legislature further finds that
Washington's permitting and regulatory programs have established strict
standards to protect public health and safety and the environment.
(2) The legislature also finds that, as the number of environmental
and land use laws and requirements have grown in Washington, so have
the number of permits required of business and government. The
increasing number of permits and permitting agencies has generated the
potential for conflict, overlap, and duplication among state, local,
and federal permitting and regulatory requirements.
(3) The legislature further finds that not all project proponents
require the same type of assistance. Proponents with small projects
may merely need information and assistance in starting the permitting
and application process, while intermediate-sized projects may require
more of a facilitated and periodically assisted permitting process, and
large complex projects may need extensive and more continuous
coordination among local, state, and federal agencies and tribal
governments.
(4) The legislature further finds that persons doing business in
Washington state should have access to clear and appropriate
information regarding regulations, permit requirements, and agency
rule-making processes.
(5) The legislature, therefore, finds that a range of assistance
and coordination options should be available to project proponents from
a state office independent of any local, state, or federal permit
agency. The legislature finds that citizens, businesses, and project
proponents should be provided with:
(a) A reliable and consolidated source of information concerning
federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and
procedures that may apply to any given project;
(b) Facilitated interagency forums for discussion of significant
issues related to the multiple permitting processes if needed for some
project proponents; and
(c) Active coordination of all applicable regulatory and land use
permitting procedures if needed for some project proponents.
(6) The legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is
to:
(a) Assure that citizens, businesses, and project proponents will
continue to be provided with vital information regarding environmental
and land use laws and with assistance in complying with environmental
and land use laws to promote understanding of these laws and to protect
public health and safety and the environment;
(b) Ensure that facilitation of project permit decisions by permit
agencies promotes both process efficiency and environmental protection;
(c) Allow for coordination of permit processing for large projects
upon project proponents' request and at project proponents' expense to
promote efficiency, ensure certainty, and avoid conflicts among permit
agencies; and
(d) Provide these services through an office independent of any
permit agency to ensure that any potential or perceived conflicts of
interest related to providing these services or making permit decisions
can be avoided.
(7) The legislature also declares that the purpose of this chapter
is to provide citizens of the state with access to information
regarding state regulations, permit requirements, and agency rule-making processes in Washington state.
(8))) The legislature finds that: The health and safety of its
citizens and environment are of vital interest to the state's long-term
quality of life; Washington state is a national leader in protecting
its environment; and Washington state has a vibrant and diverse economy
that is dependent on the state maintaining high environmental
standards. Further, the legislature finds that a complex and confusing
network of environmental and land use laws and business regulations can
create obstacles to sustainable growth.
It is the intent of the legislature to promote accountability,
timeliness, and predictability for citizens, business, and state,
federal, and local permitting agencies, and to provide information and
assistance on the regulatory process through the creation of the office
of regulatory assistance in the governor's office.
(2) The office of regulatory assistance is created to work to
continually improve the function of environmental and business
regulatory processes by identifying conflicts and overlap in the
state's rules, statutes, and operational practices; the office is to
provide project proponents and business owners with active assistance
for all permitting, licensing, and other regulatory procedures required
for completion of specific projects; and the office is to ensure that
citizens, businesses, and local governments have access to, and clear
information regarding, regulatory processes for permitting and business
regulation, including state rules, permit and license requirements, and
agency rule-making processes.
(3) The legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to
provide direction and practical resources for improving the regulatory
process and for assistance through regulatory processes on individual
projects in furtherance of the state's goals of governmental
transparency and accountability.
(4) The legislature intends that establishing an office of
regulatory assistance will provide these services without abrogating or
limiting the authority of any agency to make decisions on permits
((and)), licenses, regulatory requirements ((that it requires)), or
((any rule-making)) agency ((to make decisions on regulations)) rule
making. The legislature ((therefore declares)) further intends that
the office of regulatory assistance shall have authority to provide
((these)) services but shall not have any authority to make decisions
on permits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.020 and 2007 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Principles of accountability and transparency shall guide the
office in its operations. The office shall ((operate on the principle
that citizens of the state of Washington should receive)) provide the
following information regarding permits to citizens and businesses:
(a) ((A date and time for a decision on a permit or regulatory
requirement)) An agency's average turnaround time from the date of
application to date of decision for the required permit, licenses, or
other necessary regulatory decisions, or the most relevant information
the agency can provide, for projects of a comparable size and
complexity;
(b) The information required for an agency to make a decision on a
permit or regulatory requirement, including the agency's best estimate
of the number of times projects of a similar size and complexity have
been asked to clarify, improve, or provide supplemental information
before a decision, and the expected agency response time, recognizing
that changes in the project or other circumstances may change the
information required; and
(c) An estimate of the maximum amount of costs in fees((,)) to be
paid to state agencies, the type of any studies an agency expects to
need, ((or)) and the timing of any expected public processes ((that
will be incurred by)) for the project ((proponent)).
(2) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.42.030 and 2007 c 94 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of the office of regulatory
assistance.
(2) "Fully coordinated permit process" means a comprehensive
coordinated permitting assistance approach supported by a written
agreement between the project proponent, the office of regulatory
assistance, and the agencies participating in the fully coordinated
permit process.
(3) "General coordination services" means services that bring
interested parties together to explore opportunities for cooperation
and to resolve conflicts. General coordination services may be
provided as a stand-alone event or as an element of broader project
assistance, nonproject-related interagency coordination, or policy and
planning teamwork.
(4) "Office" means the office of regulatory assistance ((in the
office of financial management)) established in RCW 43.42.010.
(((2))) (5) "Permit" means any permit, license, certificate, use
authorization, or other form of governmental review or approval
required in order to construct, expand, or operate a project in the
state of Washington.
(((3))) (6) "Permit agency" means any state, local, or federal
agency authorized by law to issue permits.
(((4))) (7) "Project" means any activity, the conduct of which
requires a permit or permits from one or more permit agencies.
(((5))) (8) "Project proponent" means a citizen, business, or any
entity applying for or seeking a permit or permits in the state of
Washington.
(9) "Project scoping" means the identification of relevant issues
and information needs of a project proponent and the permitting
agencies, and reaching a common understanding regarding the process,
timing, and sequencing for obtaining applicable permits.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.42.010 and 2007 c 231 s 5 and 2007 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and shall be administered by the office of the
governor to help improve the regulatory system and assist citizens,
businesses, and project proponents.
(2) The governor shall appoint a director. The director may employ
a deputy director and a confidential secretary and such staff as are
necessary, or contract with another state agency pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW for support in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.
(3) The office shall offer to:
(a) ((Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW
43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with governmental agencies to continue to develop a range
of permitting and regulatory assistance options for project proponents;
(f) Help local jurisdictions comply with the requirements of RCW
36.70B.080 by:
(i) Providing information about best practices and compliance with
the requirements of RCW 36.70B.080; and
(ii) Providing technical assistance in reducing the turnaround time
between submittal of an application for a development permit and the
issuance of the permit;
(g) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit proponents;
(h) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness; and
(i))) Act as the central point of contact for the project proponent
in communicating about defined issues;
(b) Conduct project scoping as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Verify that the project proponent has all the information
needed to correctly apply for all necessary permits;
(d) Provide general coordination services;
(e) Coordinate the efficient completion among participating
agencies of administrative procedures, such as collecting fees or
providing public notice;
(f) Maintain contact with the project proponent and the permit
agencies to promote adherence to agreed schedules;
(g) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit
requirements and conditions;
(h) Coordinate, to the extent practicable, with relevant federal
permit agencies and tribal governments;
(i) Facilitate meetings;
(j) Manage a fully coordinated permit process, as provided in RCW
43.42.060;
(k) Help local jurisdictions comply with the requirements of
chapter 36.70B RCW by providing information about best permitting
practices methods to improve communication with, and solicit early
involvement of, state agencies when needed; and
(l) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW 43.42.040.
(4) The office shall provide the following ((reports)) by ((June))
September 1, ((2008)) 2009, and biennially thereafter, to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature:
(((i))) (a) A performance report((, based on the customer surveys
required in (h) of this subsection)) including:
(i) Information regarding use of the office's voluntary cost-reimbursement services as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(ii) The number and type of projects where the office provided
services and the resolution provided by the office on any conflicts
that arose on such projects; and
(iii) The agencies involved on specific projects; and
(((ii) A report on)) (b) Recommendations on system improvements
including recommendations regarding:
(i) Measurement of overall system performance; and
(ii) Resolving any conflicts ((identified by the office in the
course of its duties)) or inconsistencies arising from differing
statutory or regulatory authorities, roles and missions of agencies,
timing and sequencing of permitting and procedural requirements((, or
otherwise, and how these were resolved; and
(iii) A report regarding negotiation and implementation of
voluntary cost-reimbursement agreements and use of outside independent
consultants under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of
work performed and implementation of requirements relating to costs.
(3) The office shall ensure the equitable delivery and provision of
assistance services, regardless of project type, scale, fund source, or
assistance request)) as identified by the office in the course of its
duties.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.42.050 and 2007 c 94 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((At the request of a project proponent, the office shall assist
the project proponent in determining what regulatory requirements,
processes, and permits apply to the project, as provided in this
section.
(1) The office shall assign a project facilitator who shall discuss
applicable regulatory requirements, permits, and processes with the
project proponent and explain the available options for obtaining
required permits and regulatory review.))
(1) Upon request of a project proponent, the office shall determine
the level of project scoping needed by the project proponent, taking
into consideration the complexity of the project and the experience of
those expected to be involved in the project application and review
process.
(2) ((If the project proponent and the project facilitator agree
that the project would benefit from a project scoping, the project
facilitator shall conduct a project scoping with the project proponent
and the relevant permitting and regulatory agencies. The project
facilitator shall invite the participation of the relevant federal
agencies and tribal governments.
(a) The purpose of the project scoping is to identify the issues
and information needs of the project proponent and the participating
permit agencies regarding the project, share perspectives, and jointly
develop a strategy for the processing of required permits by each
participating permit agency.
(b) The scoping)) Project scoping shall consider the complexity,
size, and needs for assistance of the project and shall address as
appropriate:
(((i))) (a) The permits that are required for the project;
(((ii))) (b) The permit application forms and other application
requirements of the participating permit agencies;
(((iii))) (c) The specific information needs and issues of concern
of each participant and their significance;
(((iv))) (d) Any statutory or regulatory conflicts that might arise
from the differing authorities and roles of the permit agencies;
(((v))) (e) Any natural resources, including federal or state
listed species, that might be adversely affected by the project and
might cause an alteration of the project or require mitigation; and
(((vi))) (f) The anticipated time required for permit decisions by
each participating permit agency, including the estimated time required
to determine if the permit application is complete, to conduct
environmental review, and to review and process the application. In
determining the estimated time required, full consideration must be
given to achieving the greatest possible efficiencies through any
concurrent studies and any consolidated applications, hearings, and
comment periods.
(((c))) (3) The outcome of the project scoping shall be documented
in writing, furnished to the project proponent, and be made available
to the public.
(((d))) (4) The project scoping shall be completed ((within)) prior
to the passage of sixty days of the project proponent's request for a
project scoping unless the director finds that better results can be
obtained by delaying the project scoping meeting or meetings to ensure
full participation.
(((e))) (5) Upon completion of the project scoping, the
participating permit agencies shall proceed under their respective
((authority. The agencies are encouraged to remain)) authorities. The
agencies may remain in communication ((for purposes of coordination
until their final permit decisions are made)) with the office as
needed.
(((3))) (6) This section does not create an independent cause of
action, affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits
for purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.42.060 and 2007 c 94 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The office may coordinate the processing by participating
permit agencies of permits required for a project, at the request of
the project proponent through a cost-reimbursement agreement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section or with the agreement of the
project proponent as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The office shall assign a project coordinator to perform any or
all of the following functions, as specified by the terms of a cost-reimbursement agreement under subsection (3) of this section or an
agreement under subsection (4) of this section:
(a) Serve as the main point of contact for the project proponent;
(b) Conduct a project scoping as provided in RCW 43.42.050(2);
(c) Verify that the project proponent has all the information
needed to complete applications;
(d) Coordinate the permit processes of the permit agencies;
(e) Manage the applicable administrative procedures;
(f) Work to assure that timely permit decisions are made by the
permit agencies and maintain contact with the project proponent and the
permit agencies to ensure adherence to schedules;
(g) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit
requirements and conditions; and
(h) Coordinate with relevant federal permit agencies and tribal
governments to the extent possible.
(3) At the request of a project proponent and as provided in RCW
43.42.070, the project coordinator shall coordinate negotiations among
the project proponent, the office, and participating permit agencies to
enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement and shall coordinate
implementation of the agreement, which shall govern coordination of
permit processing by the participating permit agencies.
(4) For industrial projects of statewide significance or if the
office determines that it is in the public interest to coordinate the
processing of permits for certain projects that are complex in scope,
require multiple permits, involve multiple jurisdictions, or involve a
significant number of affected parties, the office shall, upon the
proponent's request, enter into an agreement with the project proponent
and the participating permit agencies to coordinate the processing of
permits for the project. The office may limit the number of such
agreements according to the resources available to the office and the
permit agencies at the time.)) (1) A project proponent may submit a
written request to the director of the office for participation in a
fully coordinated permit process. Designation as a fully coordinated
project requires that:
(a) The project proponent enters into a cost-reimbursement
agreement pursuant to RCW 43.42.070;
(b) The project has a designation under chapter 43.157 RCW; or
(c) The director determine that (i)(A) the project raises complex
coordination, permit processing, or substantive permit review issues;
or (B) if completed, the project would provide substantial benefits to
the state; and (ii) the office, as well as the participating permit
review agencies, have sufficient capacity within existing resources to
undertake the full coordination process without reimbursement and
without seriously affecting other services.
(2) A project proponent who requests designation as a fully
coordinated permit process project must provide the office with a full
description of the project. The office may request any information
from the project proponent that is necessary to make the designation
under this section, and may convene a scoping meeting or a work plan
meeting of the likely participating permit agencies.
(3) When a project is designated for the fully coordinated permit
process, the office shall serve as the main point of contact for the
project proponent and participating agencies with regard to the permit
process for the project as a whole. The office shall keep an
up-to-date project management log and schedule illustrating required
procedural steps in the permitting process, and highlighting
substantive issues as appropriate that must be resolved in order for
the project to move forward. In carrying out these responsibilities,
the office shall:
(a) Ensure that the project proponent has been informed of all the
information needed to apply for the permits that are included in the
coordinated permit process;
(b) Coordinate the timing of review for those permits by the
respective participating permit agencies;
(c) Facilitate communication between project proponents,
consultants, and agency staff to promote timely permit decisions;
(d) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among the
permit requirements and conditions that are expected to be imposed by
the participating permit agencies; and
(e) Make contact, at least once, with any local, tribal, or federal
jurisdiction that is responsible for issuing a permit for the project
and invite them to participate in the coordinated permit process or to
receive periodic updates in the project.
(4) Within thirty days, or longer with agreement of the project
proponent, of the date that the office designates a project for the
fully coordinated permit process, it shall convene a work plan meeting
with the project proponent and the participating permit agencies to
develop a coordinated permit process schedule. The meeting agenda
shall include at least the following:
(a) Review of the permits that are required for the project;
(b) A review of the permit application forms and other application
requirements of the agencies that are participating in the coordinated
permit process;
(c) An estimation of the timelines that will be used by each
participating permit agency to make permit decisions, including the
estimated time periods required to determine if the permit applications
are complete and to review or respond to each application or submittal
of new information.
(i) The estimation must also include the estimated number of
revision cycles for the project, or the typical number of revision
cycles for projects of similar size and complexity.
(ii) In the development of this timeline, full attention shall be
given to achieving the maximum efficiencies possible through concurrent
studies and consolidated applications, hearings, and comment periods.
(iii) Estimated action or response times for activities of the
office that are required before or trigger further action by a
participant must also be included;
(d) Available information regarding the timing of any public
hearings that are required to issue permits for the project and a
determination of the feasibility of coordinating or consolidating any
of those required public hearings; and
(e) A discussion of fee arrangements for the coordinated permit
process, including an estimate of the costs allowed by statute, any
reimbursable agency costs, and billing schedules, if applicable.
(5) Each agency shall send at least one representative qualified to
discuss the applicability and timelines associated with all permits
administered by that agency or jurisdiction. At the request of the
project proponent, the office shall notify any relevant local or
federal agency or federally recognized Indian tribe of the date of the
meeting and invite that agency's participation in the process.
(6) Any accelerated time period for the consideration of a permit
application shall be consistent with any statute, rule, or regulation,
or adopted state policy, standard, or guideline that requires the
participation of other agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, or
interested persons in the application process.
(7) If a permit agency or the project proponent foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet the estimated timelines or other
obligations under the agreement, it shall notify the office of the
reasons for the problem and offer potential solutions or an amended
timeline for resolving the problem. The office shall notify the
participating permit agencies and the project proponent and, upon
agreement of all parties, adjust the schedule, or, if necessary,
schedule another work plan meeting.
(8) The project proponent may withdraw from the coordinated permit
process by submitting to the office a written request that the process
be terminated. Upon receipt of the request, the office shall notify
each participating permit agency that a coordinated permit process is
no longer applicable to the project.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.42.070 and 2007 c 94 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may ((coordinate negotiation and implementation of
a written agreement among the)) enter into cost-reimbursement
agreements with a project proponent((, the office, and participating
permit agencies)) to recover from the project proponent the reasonable
costs incurred by the office in carrying out the provisions of RCW
43.42.050(((2) and 43.42.060(2) and by participating)). The agreement
shall include the permit agencies ((in)) that are participating in the
cost-reimbursement project and carrying out permit processing tasks
((specified)) referenced in the agreement.
(2) ((The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of
a written agreement among the project proponent, the office, and
participating permit agencies to recover from the project proponent the
reasonable costs incurred by outside independent consultants selected
by the office and participating permit agencies to perform permit
processing tasks.
(3) Outside independent consultants may only bill for the costs of
performing those permit processing tasks that are specified in a cost-reimbursement agreement under this section. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments.
(4))) The office shall ((adopt a policy to coordinate)) maintain
policies or guidelines for coordinating cost-reimbursement agreements
with participating agencies, project proponents, and outside
independent consultants. ((Cost-reimbursement agreements coordinated))
Policies or guidelines must ensure that, in developing cost-reimbursement agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated.
Contracts with independent consultants hired by the office under this
section must be based on competitive bids that are awarded for each
agreement from a prequalified consultant roster.
(((5) Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement shall report directly to the permit agency. The office shall
assure that final decisions are made by the permit agency and not by
the consultant.
(6) The office shall develop procedures for determining,
collecting, and distributing cost reimbursement for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) For a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office and
participating permit agencies shall negotiate a work plan and schedule
for reimbursement. Prior to distributing scheduled reimbursement to
the agencies, the office shall verify that the agencies have met the
obligations contained in their work plan.
(8) Prior to commencing negotiations with the project proponent for
a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office shall request work load
analyses from each participating permitting agency. These analyses
shall be available to the public. The work load of a participating
permit agency may only be modified with the concurrence of the agency
and if there is both good cause to do so and no significant impact on
environmental review.
(9) The office shall develop guidance to ensure that, in developing
cost-reimbursement agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated.
(10))) (3) For ((project)) fully coordinated permit processes
((that it coordinates)), the office shall coordinate the negotiation of
all cost-reimbursement agreements executed under RCW 43.21A.690,
43.30.490, 43.70.630, 43.300.080, and 70.94.085. The office, project
proponent, and the permit agencies shall be signatories to the
agreement or agreements. Each permit agency shall manage performance
of its portion of the agreement. Independent consultants hired under
a cost-reimbursement agreement shall report directly to the hiring
office or permit agency. Any cost-reimbursement agreement must require
that final decisions are made by the permit agency and not by a hired
consultant.
(((11))) (4) For a fully coordinated project using cost
reimbursement, the office and participating permit agencies shall
include a cost-reimbursement work plan, including deliverables and
schedules for invoicing and reimbursement in the fully coordinated
project work plan described in RCW 43.42.060. Upon request, the office
shall verify that the agencies have met the obligations contained in
the cost-reimbursement work plan and agreement. The cost-reimbursement
agreement shall identify the tasks of each agency and the maximum costs
for work conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a
schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application for comparable projects;
(b) The anticipated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A process for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(5) If a permit agency or the project proponent foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the cost-reimbursement agreement and fully coordinated project work plan, it
shall notify the office and state the reasons, along with proposals for
resolving the problems and potentially amending the timelines. The
office shall notify the participating permit agencies and the project
proponent and, upon agreement of all parties, adjust the schedule, or,
if necessary, coordinate revision of the cost-reimbursement agreement
and fully coordinated project work plan.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.21A.690 and 2007 c 94 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the
((specific)) tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be
conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule
that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
shall be used by the department to contract with an independent
consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. The department may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to assign current
staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary
technical assistance when an independent consultant with comparable
technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and
necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants or hire temporary employees to replace the
time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the project.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.
((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current
level of staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.30.490 and 2007 c 188 s 1 and 2007 c 94 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit or lease applicant or project proponent to
recover from the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred
by the department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as
well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to
permit coordination, environmental review, application review,
technical studies, establishment of development units and approval or
establishment of pooling agreements under chapter 78.52 RCW, including
necessary technical studies, permit or lease processing, and monitoring
for permit compliance.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the
((specific)) tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be
conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule
that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit or lease applicant or project proponent.
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the
applicant or proponent shall be used by the department to contract with
an independent consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may also use funds provided
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to
assign current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit or lease. The department shall, in developing the agreement,
ensure that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the
agency and not by the consultant. The department shall make an
estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the permits
or leases, and shall contract with consultants or hire temporary
employees to replace the time and functions committed by these
permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall provide for
accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. ((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements
shall not reduce the current level of staff available to work on
permits or leases not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The
department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement
to replace or supplant existing funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.70.630 and 2007 c 94 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the
((specific)) tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be
conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule
that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
or proponent shall be used by the department to contract with an
independent consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may also use funds provided
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to
assign current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants or hire temporary employees to replace the
time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the project.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.
((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current
level of staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.300.080 and 2007 c 94 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the
((specific)) tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be
conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule
that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
shall be used by the department to contract with an independent
consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. The department may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to hire temporary employees, to assign current
staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary
technical assistance when an independent consultant with comparable
technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and
necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants or hire temporary employees to replace the
time and functions committed by these permanent staff to the project.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.
((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current
level of staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.94.085 and 2007 c 94 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authority may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
authority in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the
((specific)) tasks((,)) and costs((, and schedule)) for work to be
conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a schedule
that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application;
(b) The estimated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A date for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(((2))) (3) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be
negotiated with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
or proponent shall be used by the air pollution control authority to
contract with an independent consultant to carry out the work covered
by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The air pollution control
authority may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement
agreement to hire temporary employees, to assign current staff to
review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary technical
assistance when an independent consultant with comparable technical
skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and necessary direct
and indirect costs that arise from processing the permit. The air
pollution control authority shall, in developing the agreement, ensure
that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency
and not by the consultant. The air pollution control authority shall
make an estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the
permits, and shall contract with consultants or hire temporary
employees to replace the time and functions committed by these
permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall provide for
accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. ((Use of cost-reimbursement agreements
shall not reduce the current level of staff available to work on
permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The air
pollution control authority may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing funding.))
(4) The cost-reimbursement agreement must not negatively impact the
processing of other permit applications. In order to maintain permit
processing capacity, the agency may hire outside consultants, temporary
employees, or make internal administrative changes. Consultants or
temporary employees hired as part of a cost-reimbursement agreement or
to maintain agency capacity are hired as agents of the state not of the
permit applicant. The provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any
cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a
cost-reimbursement agreement. Members of the air pollution control
authority's board of directors shall be considered as state officers,
and employees of the air pollution control authority shall be
considered as state employees, for the sole purpose of applying the
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter shall not be construed to limit or abridge the powers
and duties granted to a participating permit agency under the law that
authorizes or requires the agency to issue a permit for a project.
Each participating permit agency shall retain its authority to make all
decisions on all nonprocedural matters with regard to the respective
component permit that is within its scope of its responsibility
including, but not limited to, the determination of permit application
completeness, permit approval or approval with conditions, or permit
denial. The office may not substitute its judgment for that of a
participating permit agency on any such nonprocedural matters.

--- END ---