BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.112 and 2005 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A primary is a first stage in the public process by which
voters elect candidates to public office.
(2) Whenever candidates for a partisan office are to be elected,
the general election must be preceded by a primary conducted under this
chapter. Based upon votes cast at the primary, the top two candidates
will be certified as qualified to appear on the general election
ballot, unless only one candidate qualifies as provided in RCW
((29A.36.170)) 29A.36.171.
(3) For partisan office, if a candidate has expressed:
(a) A major political party ((or independent)), as defined in RCW
29A.04.086, preference on the declaration of candidacy, then that
preference will be shown after the name of the candidate on the primary
and general election ballots by appropriate abbreviation as set forth
in rules ((of)) by the secretary of state. ((A candidate may express
no party or independent preference.)) An expression of major political
party preference may be done by the party name, in whole or in part, or
trademark on the declaration of candidacy. If a candidate uses a major
political party name or trademark as part of the party preference on
the candidate's declaration of candidacy in conjunction with other
descriptors, the preference that will be used will be simply the name
of the major political party;
(b) A minor political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.097,
preference may be done by the party name, in whole or in part, or
trademark on the declaration of candidacy, then that preference will be
shown after the name of the candidate on the primary and general
election ballots by appropriate abbreviation as set forth in rules by
the secretary of state. If a candidate uses a minor political party
name or trademark as part of the party preference on the candidate's
declaration of candidacy in conjunction with other descriptors, the
preference that will be used will be simply the name of the minor
political party;
(c) A party preference not meeting (a) or (b) of this subsection,
an independent preference, or no indication of party preference on the
declaration of candidacy, then the preference that will be shown after
the name of the candidate on the primary and general election ballots
will be "independent" and as set forth in rules by the secretary of
state.
(4) Any party or independent preferences are shown for the
information of voters only and may in no way limit the options
available to voters.

--- END ---