BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.340 and 2008 c 282 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ignition interlock device revolving account is created in the
((state treasury)) custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
the fee assessed under RCW 46.20.385(6) must be deposited into the
account. ((Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.)) Expenditures from the account may be used only for
administering and operating the ignition interlock device revolving
account program. Only the director or the director's designees may
expend money from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

--- END ---