BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that an expansion
of the use of plug-in hybrid vehicles can play an important role in
development of a green economy and carbon reduction planning. Plug-in
vehicles not only dramatically reduce carbon loading in the atmosphere,
but their use also provides electric utilities with the advantages of
distributed generation that can be utilized on demand by the utility.
(2) The legislature further finds that developing local knowledge
and training capacity relating to plug-in hybrid vehicles will position
Washington within an important emerging marketplace. Investments made
in plug-in hybrid vehicle technology, and other technologies relating
to green energy and carbon emissions reductions, will help Washington
build a strong and vibrant economic sector prepared to take advantage
of current and future green economy opportunities.
(3) The legislature further finds that Washington's own Shoreline
Community College has been recognized as a state community college
center for excellence in alternative energy curriculum development.
Shoreline Community College is also the principle training center for
Toyota dealerships, and is situated in a unique position to leverage
its industry contacts with a rapidly growing zero-energy buildings
program and become a training center for vehicle-to-grid development.
(4) The legislature further finds that Shoreline Community College,
together with the Washington State University energy program's
Northwest solar center, is in the process of developing a prototype
solar/vehicle-to-grid charging station as an adjunct to a zero-energy
house demonstration and training center on the campus of Shoreline
Community College. The prototype charging station, to be developed by
students of Shoreline Community College in collaboration with Toyota,
will be designed to provide virtually all of the energy necessary to
operate plug-in hybrid vehicles. Shoreline Community College intends
for the vehicles retrofitted by the program to be first in a series of
retrofits to Toyota hybrid cars and other vehicles that can be
retrofitted to receive power from the grid.
(5) The legislature further finds that the program being developed
by Shoreline Community College and Washington State University will
assist the state in establishing an early leadership position in an
important area of technical development. The acquisition of the
materials needed for the program, including two hybrid cars, will allow
the college to retrofit hybrid cars, sell the converted vehicles, and
establish a revolving account within the college that provides ongoing
funding resources for the program into the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two hundred thirteen thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, from the general fund to the
Shoreline Community College for the purchase of two hybrid vehicles, a
charging structure, and hybrid conversion kits. Moneys may also be
used for curriculum development and an instructor's salary.

--- END ---