BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.260 and 2008 c 296 s 1, 2008 c 217 s 100, and
2008 c 81 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, ((2009)) 2015, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or
biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be
equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities shall be equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall, in the case of manufacturers, be equal
to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of
sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for
hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured and
the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case
of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business shall, in the case of extractors, be equal to the value of
products, including byproducts, extracted, or in the case of extractors
for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of products, including byproducts,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent
from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14) A person reporting pursuant to subsection (1)(e) or (f) of
this section must file a complete annual survey with the department
pursuant to section 8 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4335 and 2003 c 339 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of
tax amounts received from the retail sale, or for the distribution, of
wood biomass fuel.
(b) A person claiming the deduction provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department pursuant to section
8 of this act.
(2) For the purposes of this ((act [section])) section, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, used in internal combustion engines, and
produced from wood, forest, or field residue, or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.
(b) "Distribution" means any of the actions specified in RCW
82.36.020(2).
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.960 and 2003 c 339 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of a wood biomass fuel blend. Structures and machinery and
equipment that are used for the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel
blend and for other purposes are exempt only on the portion used
directly for the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel blend.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
delivery vehicles or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the vehicles including repair parts and replacement parts if
at least seventy-five percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles
is a wood biomass fuel blend.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) A person claiming an exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 8 of
this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in ((RCW
82.69.010 [2003 c 339 § 1] and)) this subsection apply.
(a) "Wood biomass fuel blend" means fuel that contains at least
twenty percent wood biomass fuel by volume.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts that are integral and necessary for the delivery of a wood
biomass fuel blend into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle.
(((5))) (6) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2015.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.960 and 2003 c 339 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of eligible
machinery and equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of machinery and equipment used directly for
the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel blend.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of fuel delivery vehicles including repair parts and replacement
parts and to services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the vehicles if at least seventy-five
percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles is a wood biomass fuel
blend.
(3) A person claiming an exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 8 of
this act.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.08.960 apply.
(((4))) (5) This section expires July 1, ((2009)) 2015.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.29A.135 and 2008 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Anaerobic digester" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.900.
(c) "Biodiesel feedstock" means oil that is produced from an
agricultural crop for the sole purpose of ultimately producing
biodiesel fuel.
(d) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(e) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, used in internal combustion engines, and
produced from wood, forest, or field residue, or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.
(2)(a) All leasehold interests in buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property which are used primarily for the
manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, biodiesel fuel,
biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an anaerobic digester, the
land upon which this property is located, and land that is reasonably
necessary in the manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel,
biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an anaerobic
digester, but not land necessary for growing of crops, which together
comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
manufacturing facility, are exempt from leasehold taxes for a period of
six years from the date on which the facility or the addition to the
existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, the amount of the leasehold tax exemption shall be based
upon the annual percentage of the total value of all products
manufactured that is the value of the alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel,
biodiesel fuel, and biodiesel feedstock manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the department of revenue on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the department of revenue. Once filed, the
exemption is valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The
department of revenue shall verify and approve claims as the department
of revenue determines to be justified and in accordance with this
section. No claims may be filed after December 31, ((2009, except for
claims for anaerobic digesters, which may be filed no later than
December 31,)) 2012.
(4) A person claiming an exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 8 of
this act.
(5) The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to properly administer this
section.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.36.635 and 2008 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Anaerobic digester" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.900.
(c) "Biodiesel feedstock" means oil that is produced from an
agricultural crop for the sole purpose of ultimately producing
biodiesel fuel.
(d) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(2)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which are used primarily for the manufacturing of alcohol
fuel, biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an
anaerobic digester, the land upon which this property is located, and
land that is reasonably necessary in the manufacturing of alcohol fuel,
biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an anaerobic
digester, but not land necessary for growing of crops, which together
comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
manufacturing facility, are exempt from property taxation for the six
assessment years following the date on which the facility or the
addition to the existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, the amount of
the property tax exemption shall be based upon the annual percentage of
the total value of all products manufactured that is the value of the
alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, and biodiesel feedstock manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The assessor shall
verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified
and in accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after
December 31, ((2009, except for claims for anaerobic digesters, which
may be filed no later than December 31,)) 2012.
(4) A person claiming an exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department of revenue under
section 8 of this act.
(5) The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.36.640 and 2003 c 339 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a
pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis gas-derived liquid fuel, used in
internal combustion engines, and produced from wood, forest, or field
residue, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.
(2)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which is used primarily for the manufacturing of wood biomass
fuel, the land upon which this property is located, and land that is
reasonably necessary in the manufacturing of wood biomass fuel, but not
land necessary for growing of crops, which together comprise a new
manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing manufacturing
facility, are exempt from property taxation for the six assessment
years following the date on which the facility or the addition to the
existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to wood biomass fuel, the amount of the property tax exemption shall be
based upon the annual percentage of the total value of all products
manufactured that is the value of the wood biomass fuel manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The assessor shall
verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified
and in accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after
December 31, ((2009)) 2012.
(4) A person claiming an exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department of revenue under
section 8 of this act.
(5) The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A person claiming a tax preference that requires a survey
under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department by March 31st of the year following any calendar year in
which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section, as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, excluding the names of employees,
for the year that the tax preference was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions, as
a percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions, according to the
following wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; more than
thirty thousand dollars but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty
thousand dollars or more. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have medical, dental,
and retirement benefits provided by an employer, by each of the wage
bands.
(c) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax preference claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax preference claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in subsection
(5) of this section. If the amount of the tax preference claimed as
reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or
otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax
returns or other information known to the department, the amount
actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but
fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey
or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.32.590 and 2008 c 81 s 13 and 2008 c 15 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.650, 82.32.630, 82.32.610, section 8 of this act, 82.82.020, or
82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the
control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the time for
filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a period of
thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.32.600 and 2008 c 81 s 14 and 2008 c 15 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.545, 82.32.610, section 8 of this
act, 82.32.630, 82.82.020, or 82.74.040 must electronically file with
the department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms or
information the department requires in an electronic format as provided
or approved by the department. As used in this section, "returns" has
the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 4, 8, and 10 of this act
are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect June 30, 2009.

--- END ---