BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2008 c 276 s 301 and 2008 c 219 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055. These enhancements shall
be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions.
(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1,
2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term
is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added
to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation
enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual
motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall
be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified
under RCW 9A.28.020:
(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both;
(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a
class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or
both;
(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;
(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the
offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of
this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual
motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements,
for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not
a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to
all felony crimes;
(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds
the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the
statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence
representing the enhancement may not be reduced;
(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the
offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before
any earned early release time is credited to the offender;
(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from
imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.
(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the
standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on
or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to
engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year
enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for
all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the
enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079,
9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted,
solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage
the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional
one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range
determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this
subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual
contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.
(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any
criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person
compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the
minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence
range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range
defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of
the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection
exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory
maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of
the felony offense is an element of the offense.
(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is
unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will
seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW
9.94A.535.
(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the
standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a
police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included
a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons
under RCW 9.94A.834.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2008 c 282 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one
year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one
year. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term
of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may
order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of
imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
one year and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of
imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one
year and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring.
Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than one year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if: (a) The person
has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or (b) the person has
ever previously been convicted of: (i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(ii) a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug; or (iii) an out-of-state offense
comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.
(5)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of an
alcohol-related violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 to apply for an
ignition interlock driver's license from the department under RCW
((46.20.385)) 46.20.720 and to have a functioning ignition interlock
device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.
(b) The installation of an ignition interlock device is not
necessary on vehicles owned by a person's employer and driven as a
requirement of employment during working hours. The person must
provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085
from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires
the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer during working
hours.
(c) An ignition interlock device imposed under this section shall
be calibrated to prevent a motor vehicle from being started when the
breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more.
(d) The court may waive the requirement that a person obtain an
ignition interlock driver's license and operate only vehicles equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock device if the court makes a
specific finding in writing that the devices are not reasonably
available in the local area, that the person does not operate a
vehicle, or the person is not eligible to receive an ignition interlock
driver's license under RCW 46.20.385.
(e) When the requirement that a person obtain an ignition interlock
driver's license and operate only vehicles equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock device is waived by the court, the court shall order
the person to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection
breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology
designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay
for the cost of the monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
(f) The period of time for which ignition interlock use or alcohol
monitoring is required will be as follows:
(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (f)(i)
of this subsection, a period of five years;
(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (f)(ii)
of this subsection, a period of ten years.
(6) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(7) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(8) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(9) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(10) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(11)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes less than
one year in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a
period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court
shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a
motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive and
proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a
motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing
to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of
probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug
treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be
appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(12) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-five days.
(13) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1) (a) or (c),
if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed
as a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(b);
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(((v))) (vi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522(1) (b)
or (c), if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally
filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a);
(vii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(((vi))) (viii) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that
would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (((iv), or)) (v),
or (vii) of this subsection if committed in this state;
(((vii))) (ix) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW
granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504,
or an equivalent local ordinance; or
(((viii))) (x) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW
granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an
equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred
prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years of the arrest for the current offense.

--- END ---