BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.146.010 and 2008 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person.
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
mortgage broker or loan originator in an effort to obtain or seek
advice or information on obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan for himself, herself, or persons including himself or
herself, regardless of whether the person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Computer loan information systems" or "CLI system" means a
real estate mortgage financing information system that facilitates the
provision of information to consumers by a mortgage broker, loan
originator, lender, real estate agent, or other person regarding
interest rates and other loan terms available from different lenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(6) "Designated broker" means a natural person designated as the
person responsible for activities of the licensed mortgage broker in
conducting the business of a mortgage broker under this chapter and who
meets the experience and examination requirements set forth in RCW
19.146.210(1)(e).
(7) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(8) "Employee" means an individual who has an employment
relationship with a mortgage broker, and the individual is treated as
an employee by the mortgage broker for purposes of compliance with
federal income tax laws.
(9) "Federal banking agencies" means the board of governors of the
federal reserve system, comptroller of the currency, director of the
office of thrift supervision, national credit union administration, and
federal deposit insurance corporation.
(10) "Independent contractor" or "person who independently
contracts" means any person that expressly or impliedly contracts to
perform mortgage brokering services for another and that with respect
to its manner or means of performing the services is not subject to the
other's right of control, and that is not treated as an employee by the
other for purposes of compliance with federal income tax laws.
(((10))) (11)(a) "Loan originator" means a natural person who
(((a))) for direct or indirect compensation or gain, or in the
expectation of direct or indirect compensation or gain (i) takes a
residential mortgage loan application for a mortgage broker, or (((b)))
(ii) offers or negotiates terms of a mortgage loan((, for direct or
indirect compensation or gain, or in the expectation of direct or
indirect compensation or gain)). "Loan originator" also includes a
person who holds themselves out to the public as able to perform any of
these activities. "Loan originator" does not mean persons performing
purely administrative or clerical tasks for a mortgage broker. For the
purposes of this subsection, "administrative or clerical tasks" means
the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
processing of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a
borrower to obtain information necessary for the processing of a loan.
A person who holds himself or herself out to the public as able to
obtain a loan is not performing administrative or clerical tasks.
(((11))) (b) "Loan originator" does not include a person or entity
that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or
registered in accordance with applicable state law, unless the person
or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other
mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such a lender, mortgage
broker, or other mortgage loan originator. For purposes of this
chapter, the term "real estate brokerage activity" means any activity
that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to
the public, including:
(i) Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a
buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;
(ii) Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase,
lease, rental, or exchange of real property;
(iii) Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a
contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of
real property, other than in connection with providing financing with
respect to such a transaction;
(iv) Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the
activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate
agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and
(v) Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity,
described in (b)(i) through (iv) of this subsection.
(c) "Loan originator" does not include a person or entity solely
involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that
term is defined in section 101(53D) of Title 11, United States Code.
(12) "Loan processor" means an individual who performs clerical or
support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the
supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from
licensing, under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(13) "Lock-in agreement" means an agreement with a borrower made by
a mortgage broker or loan originator, in which the mortgage broker or
loan originator agrees that, for a period of time, a specific interest
rate or other financing terms will be the rate or terms at which it
will make a loan available to that borrower.
(((12))) (14) "Mortgage broker" means any person who for
compensation or gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain (a)
assists a person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan or (b) holds himself or herself out as being able to
assist a person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan.
(((13))) (15) "Mortgage loan originator" has the same meaning as
"loan originator."
(16) "Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry" means a
mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of
state bank supervisors and the American association of residential
mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan
originators.
(17) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, company, limited
liability corporation, partnership, or association.
(((14))) (18) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly
or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or alone or in
concert with others, a ten percent or greater interest in a
partnership, company, association, or corporation, and the owner of a
sole proprietorship.
(((15))) (19) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily
for personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(((16))) (20) "S.A.F.E. act" means the secure and fair enforcement
for mortgage licensing act of 2008, or Title V of the housing and
economic recovery act of 2008 ("HERA"), P.L. 110-289, effective July
30, 2008.
(21) "Third-party provider" means any person other than a mortgage
broker or lender who provides goods or services to the mortgage broker
in connection with the preparation of the borrower's loan and includes,
but is not limited to, credit reporting agencies, title companies,
appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or escrow companies.
(22) "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier
assigned by protocols established by the nationwide mortgage licensing
system and registry.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.146.020 and 2006 c 19 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided under subsections (2) through (4) of this
section,)) The following are exempt from all provisions of this
chapter:
(a)(((i))) Any person doing business under the laws of the state of
Washington or the United States, and any federally insured depository
institution doing business under the laws of any other state, relating
to commercial banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, trust
companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, insurance
companies, or real estate investment trusts as defined in 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 856 and the affiliates, subsidiaries, and service corporations
thereof((; and
(ii) Subject to the director's written approval, the exclusive
agents of an affiliate of a bank that is wholly owned by the bank
holding company that owns the bank));
(b) Any person doing business under the consumer loan act is exempt
from this chapter only for that business conducted under the authority
and coverage of the consumer loan act;
(c) An attorney licensed to practice law in this state who is not
principally engaged in the business of negotiating residential mortgage
loans when such attorney renders services in the course of his or her
practice as an attorney;
(d) Any person doing any act under order of any court, except for
a person subject to an injunction to comply with any provision of this
chapter or any order of the director issued under this chapter;
(e) ((Any person making or acquiring a residential mortgage loan
solely with his or her own funds for his or her own investment without
intending to resell the residential mortgage loans;
(f))) A real estate broker or salesperson licensed by the state who
obtains financing for a real estate transaction involving a bona fide
sale of real estate in the performance of his or her duties as a real
estate broker and who receives only the customary real estate broker's
or salesperson's commission in connection with the transaction;
(((g) Any mortgage broker approved and subject to auditing by the
federal national mortgage association or the federal home loan mortgage
corporation;
(h))) (f) The United States of America, the state of Washington,
any other state, and any Washington city, county, or other political
subdivision, and any agency, division, or corporate instrumentality of
any of the entities in this subsection (1) (((h))) (f); ((and
(i))) (g) A real estate broker who provides only information
regarding rates, terms, and lenders in connection with a CLI system,
who receives a fee for providing such information, who conforms to all
rules of the director with respect to the providing of such service,
and who discloses on a form approved by the director that to obtain a
loan the borrower must deal directly with a mortgage broker or lender.
However, a real estate broker shall not be exempt if he or she does any
of the following:
(i) Holds himself or herself out as able to obtain a loan from a
lender;
(ii) Accepts a loan application, or submits a loan application to
a lender;
(iii) Accepts any deposit for third-party services or any loan fees
from a borrower, whether such fees are paid before, upon, or after the
closing of the loan;
(iv) Negotiates rates or terms with a lender on behalf of a
borrower; or
(v) Provides the disclosure required by RCW 19.146.030(1);
(h) Registered mortgage loan originators, or any individual
required to be registered; and
(i) A manufactured or modular home retailer employee who performs
purely administrative or clerical tasks and who receives only the
customary salary or commission from the employer in connection with the
transaction.
(2) ((Those persons and their loan originators otherwise exempt
under subsection (1)(e), (g), or (4) of this section must comply with
RCW 19.146.0201 through 19.146.080. For violations of RCW 19.146.0201
through 19.146.080, the director has authority to issue a cease and
desist order as provided in RCW 19.146.220 and 19.146.227, to impose
penalties as provided in RCW 19.146.220, and to obtain and review books
and records that are relevant to any allegation of such a violation as
provided in RCW 19.146.235.
(3))) Any person otherwise exempted from the licensing provisions
of this chapter may voluntarily submit an application to the director
for a mortgage broker's license. The director shall review such
application and may grant or deny licenses to such applicants upon the
same grounds and with the same fees as may be applicable to persons
required to be licensed under this chapter.
(a) Upon receipt of a license under this subsection, the licensee
is required to continue to maintain a valid license, is subject to all
provisions of this chapter, and has no further right to claim exemption
from the provisions of this chapter except as provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) Any licensee under this subsection who would otherwise be
exempted from the requirements of licensing by this section may apply
to the director for exemption from licensing. The director shall adopt
rules for reviewing such applications and shall grant exemptions from
licensing to applications which are consistent with those rules and
consistent with the other provisions of this chapter.
(((4) The director may exempt an exclusive agent under subsection
(1)(a) of this section provided that the affiliate in subsection (1)(a)
of this section:
(a) Applies for and maintains a license as provided by subsection
(3) of this section;
(b) Has on file with the director a binding written agreement under
which the affiliate assumes responsibility for the exclusive agent's
violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; and
(c) Maintains a bond or other security in an amount required by the
director that runs to the benefit of the state and any person who
suffers loss by reason of the exclusive agent's violation of this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.))

Sec. 3 RCW 19.146.0201 and 2006 c 19 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a violation of this chapter for a loan originator((,)) or
mortgage broker required to be licensed under this chapter((, or
mortgage broker otherwise exempted from this chapter under RCW
19.146.020(1)(e), (g), or (4))) to:
(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice
to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person;
(2) Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person;
(3) Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;
(4) Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides
in substance that the mortgage broker may earn a fee or commission
through the mortgage broker's "best efforts" to obtain a loan even
though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower;
(5) Solicit, advertise, or enter into a contract for specific
interest rates, points, or other financing terms unless the terms are
actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising, or
contracting from a person exempt from licensing under RCW 19.146.020(1)
(((g) or (h))) (f) or a lender with whom the mortgage broker maintains
a written correspondent or loan broker agreement under RCW 19.146.040;
(6) Fail to make disclosures to loan applicants and
noninstitutional investors as required by RCW 19.146.030 and any other
applicable state or federal law;
(7) Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or
representation with regard to the rates, points, or other financing
terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan or engage in bait
and switch advertising;
(8) Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully
make any omission of material fact in connection with any reports filed
by a mortgage broker or in connection with any investigation conducted
by the department;
(9) Make any payment, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of
a property, for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of
the appraiser with respect to the value of the property;
(10) Advertise any rate of interest without conspicuously
disclosing the annual percentage rate implied by such rate of interest;
(11) Fail to comply with any requirement of the truth-in-lending
act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226; the real
estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 and Regulation X,
24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500; the equal credit opportunity act, 15 U.S.C. Sec.
1691 and Regulation B, Sec. 202.9, 202.11, and 202.12; Title V,
Subtitle A of the financial modernization act of 1999 (known as the
"Gramm-Leach-Bliley act"), 12 U.S.C. Secs. 6801-6809; the federal trade
commission's privacy rules, 16 C.F.R. Parts 313-314, mandated by the
Gramm-Leach-Bliley act; the home mortgage disclosure act, 12 U.S.C.
Sec. 2801 et seq. and Regulation C, home mortgage disclosure; the
federal trade commission act, 12 C.F.R. Part 203, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 45(a);
the telemarketing and consumer fraud and abuse act, 15 U.S.C. Secs.
6101 to 6108; and the federal trade commission telephone sales rule, 16
C.F.R. Part 310, as these acts existed on January 1, 2007, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, in any
advertising of residential mortgage loans, or any other applicable
mortgage broker or loan originator activities covered by the acts. The
department may adopt by rule requirements that mortgage brokers and
loan originators comply with other applicable federal statutes and
regulations in any advertising of residential mortgage loans, or any
other mortgage broker or loan originator activity;
(12) Fail to pay third-party providers no later than thirty days
after the recording of the loan closing documents or ninety days after
completion of the third-party service, whichever comes first, unless
otherwise agreed or unless the third-party service provider has been
notified in writing that a bona fide dispute exists regarding the
performance or quality of the third-party service;
(13) Collect, charge, attempt to collect or charge or use or
propose any agreement purporting to collect or charge any fee
prohibited by RCW 19.146.030 or 19.146.070;
(14)(a) Except when complying with (b) and (c) of this subsection,
act as a loan originator in any transaction (i) in which the loan
originator acts or has acted as a real estate broker or salesperson or
(ii) in which another person doing business under the same licensed
real estate broker acts or has acted as a real estate broker or
salesperson;
(b) Prior to providing mortgage services to the borrower, a loan
originator, in addition to other disclosures required by this chapter
and other laws, shall provide to the borrower the following written
disclosure:

THIS IS TO GIVE YOU NOTICE THAT I OR ONE OF MY ASSOCIATES
HAVE/HAS ACTED AS A REAL ESTATE BROKER OR SALESPERSON
REPRESENTING THE BUYER/SELLER IN THE SALE OF THIS PROPERTY TO
YOU. I AM ALSO A LOAN ORIGINATOR, AND WOULD LIKE TO PROVIDE
MORTGAGE SERVICES TO YOU IN CONNECTION WITH YOUR LOAN TO
PURCHASE THE PROPERTY.

YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO USE ME AS A LOAN ORIGINATOR IN
CONNECTION WITH THIS TRANSACTION. YOU ARE FREE TO COMPARISON
SHOP WITH OTHER MORTGAGE BROKERS AND LENDERS, AND TO SELECT ANY
MORTGAGE BROKER OR LENDER OF YOUR CHOOSING; and

(c) A real estate broker or salesperson licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW who also acts as a mortgage broker shall carry on such
mortgage broker business activities and shall maintain such person's
mortgage broker business records separate and apart from the real
estate broker activities conducted pursuant to chapter 18.85 RCW. Such
activities shall be deemed separate and apart even if they are
conducted at an office location with a common entrance and mailing
address, so long as each business is clearly identified by a sign
visible to the public, each business is physically separated within the
office facility, and no deception of the public as to the separate
identities of the broker business firms results. This subsection
(14)(c) shall not require a real estate broker or salesperson licensed
under chapter 18.85 RCW who also acts as a mortgage broker to maintain
a physical separation within the office facility for the conduct of its
real estate and mortgage broker activities where the director
determines that maintaining such physical separation would constitute
an undue financial hardship upon the mortgage broker and is unnecessary
for the protection of the public; or
(15) Fail to comply with any provision of RCW 19.146.030 through
19.146.080 or any rule adopted under those sections.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.146.205 and 2006 c 19 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a mortgage broker license under this chapter
((shall)) must be ((in writing)) made to the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry and in the form prescribed by the
director. The application shall contain at least the following
information:
(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security
numbers previously used by the applicant, unless waived by the
director;
(b) If the applicant is a partnership or association, the name,
address, date of birth, and social security number of each general
partner or principal of the association, and any other names, dates of
birth, or social security numbers previously used by the members,
unless waived by the director;
(c) If the applicant is a corporation, the name, address, date of
birth, and social security number of each officer, director, registered
agent, and each principal stockholder, and any other names, dates of
birth, or social security numbers previously used by the officers,
directors, registered agents, and principal stockholders unless waived
by the director;
(d) The street address, county, and municipality where the
principal business office is to be located;
(e) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the applicant's designated broker, and any other names, dates of birth,
or social security numbers previously used by the designated broker and
a complete set of the designated broker's fingerprints taken by an
authorized law enforcement officer; and
(f) Such other information regarding the applicant's or designated
broker's background, financial responsibility, experience, character,
and general fitness as the director may require by rule.
(2) As a part of or in connection with an application for any
license under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, the
applicant shall furnish information concerning his or her identity,
including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol,
the federal bureau of investigation, ((and)) the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry, or any governmental agency or entity
authorized to receive this information for a state and national
criminal history background check; personal history; experience;
business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as the director
may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with an
application for a license under this chapter, the director is
authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes
nonconviction data as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The department may
only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section to
criminal justice agencies. This section does not apply to financial
institutions regulated under chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles
30, 32, and 33 RCW.
(3) In order to reduce the points of contact which the federal
bureau of investigation may have to maintain, the director may use the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry as a channeling agent
for requesting information from and distributing information to the
department of justice or any governmental agency.
(4) In order to reduce the points of contact which the director may
have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry as a channeling agent for requesting and
distributing information to and from any source so directed by the
director.
(5) At the time of filing an application for a license under this
chapter, each applicant shall pay to the director through the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry the appropriate
application fee in an amount determined by rule of the director in
accordance with RCW 43.24.086 to cover, but not exceed, the cost of
processing and reviewing the application. The director shall deposit
the moneys in the financial services regulation fund, unless the
consumer services account is created as a dedicated, nonappropriated
account, in which case the director shall deposit the moneys in the
consumer services account.
(((4)(a))) (6) Each applicant for a mortgage broker's license shall
file and maintain a surety bond, in an amount ((of not greater than
sixty thousand dollars nor less than twenty thousand dollars)) which
the director deems adequate to protect the public interest, executed by
the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a
surety business in this state as surety. The bonding requirement as
established by the director ((may)) shall take the form of a ((uniform
bond amount for all licensees or the director may establish by rule a
schedule establishing a)) range of bond amounts which shall vary
according to the annual ((average number of loan originators of a))
loan origination volume of the licensee. The bond shall run to the
state of Washington as obligee, and shall run first to the benefit of
the borrower and then to the benefit of the state and any person or
persons who suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or its loan
originator's violation of any provision of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter. The bond shall be conditioned that the
obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and abide by this
chapter and all rules adopted under this chapter, and shall reimburse
all persons who suffer loss by reason of a violation of this chapter or
rules adopted under this chapter. Borrowers shall be given priority
over the state and other persons. The state and other third parties
shall be allowed to receive distribution pursuant to a valid claim
against the remainder of the bond. In the case of claims made by any
person or entity who is not a borrower, no final judgment may be
entered prior to one hundred eighty days following the date the claim
is filed. The bond shall be continuous and may be canceled by the
surety upon the surety giving written notice to the director of its
intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation shall be effective thirty
days after the notice is received by the director. Whether or not the
bond is renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise
extended, replaced, or modified, including increases or decreases in
the penal sum, it shall be considered one continuous obligation, and
the surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate or
cumulative amount exceeding the penal sum set forth on the face of the
bond. In no event shall the penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two
or more points in time be added together in determining the surety's
liability. The bond shall not be liable for any penalties imposed on
the licensee, including, but not limited to, any increased damages or
attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW 19.86.090. The applicant
may obtain the bond directly from the surety or through a group bonding
arrangement involving a professional organization comprised of mortgage
brokers if the arrangement provides at least as much coverage as is
required under this subsection.
(((b) Subsection (4)(b) and (c) of this section applies only to
applications received on or before January 1, 2007. Before January 1,
2007, in lieu of a surety bond, the applicant may, upon approval by the
director, file with the director a certificate of deposit, an
irrevocable letter of credit, or such other instrument as approved by
the director by rule, drawn in favor of the director for an amount
equal to the required bond.
(c) Before January 1, 2007, in lieu of the surety bond or
compliance with (b) of this subsection, an applicant may obtain
insurance or coverage from an association comprised of mortgage brokers
that is organized as a mutual corporation for the sole purpose of
insuring or self-insuring claims that may arise from a violation of
this chapter. An applicant may only substitute coverage under this
subsection for the requirements of (a) or (b) of this subsection if the
director, with the consent of the insurance commissioner, has
authorized such association to organize a mutual corporation under such
terms and conditions as may be imposed by the director to ensure that
the corporation is operated in a financially responsible manner to pay
any claims within the financial responsibility limits specified in (a)
of this subsection.))

Sec. 5 RCW 19.146.228 and 2006 c 19 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall establish fees ((by rule in accordance with the
policy established in RCW 43.24.086 and fees shall be)) sufficient to
cover, but not exceed, the costs of administering this chapter. These
fees may include:
(1) An annual assessment paid by each licensee on or before a date
specified by rule;
(2) An investigation fee to cover the costs of any investigation of
the books and records of a licensee or other person subject to this
chapter; and
(3) An application fee to cover the costs of processing
applications made to the director under this chapter.
Mortgage brokers and loan originators shall not be charged
investigation fees for the processing of complaints when the
investigation determines that no violation of this chapter occurred or
when the mortgage broker or loan originator provides a remedy
satisfactory to the complainant and the director and no order of the
director is issued. All moneys, fees, and penalties collected under
the authority of this chapter shall be deposited into the financial
services regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is
created as a dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case all
moneys, fees, and penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the consumer services account.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.146.235 and 2006 c 19 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director or a designee has authority to conduct investigations
and examinations as provided in this section.
(1) For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints
arising under this chapter, the director or his or her designee may
make an investigation of the operations of any mortgage broker or loan
originator as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.
(2) Every mortgage broker shall make available to the director or
a designee its books and records relating to its operations.
(a) For the purpose of examinations, the director or his or her
designee may have access to such books and records during normal
business hours and interview the officers, principals, loan
originators, employees, independent contractors, and agents of the
licensee concerning their business.
(b) For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints
arising under this chapter, the director may at any time, either
personally or by a designee, investigate the business, including but
not limited to the books, accounts, records, and files used therein, of
every licensee and of every person engaged in the business of mortgage
brokering, whether such a person acts or claims to act under, or
without the authority of, this chapter.
(c) The director or designated person may direct, subpoena, or
order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose
testimony may be required about the loans or the business or subject
matter of any such examination or investigation, and may direct,
subpoena, or order such person to produce books, accounts, records,
files, and any other documents the director or designated person deems
relevant to the inquiry.
(3) ((Once during the first five years of licensing, including
branch licensing,)) The director may visit, either personally or by
designee, the licensee's place or places of business to conduct an
examination. The scope of the examination is limited to documents and
information necessary to determine compliance with this chapter and
attendant rules. In general, the examination scope may include:
(a) A review for trust accounting compliance;
(b) Loan file review to determine the mortgage broker's compliance
with this chapter and applicable federal regulations covering the
business of mortgage brokering and lending;
(c) Interviews for the purpose of understanding business and
solicitation practices, transactional events, disclosure compliance,
complaint resolution, or determining specific compliance with this
chapter and the attendant rules; and
(d) A review of general business books and records, including
employee records, for the purpose of determining specific compliance
with this chapter and the attendant rules.
(4) The purpose of an examination is to make certain that licensees
are conducting business in compliance with the law. Therefore,
protocols for examination findings and corrective action directed from
an examination must be established by rule of the director. To
accomplish this purpose, these protocols must include the following:
(a) A reporting mechanism from the director to the licensee;
(b) A process for clear notification of violations and an
opportunity for response by the licensee; and
(c) The criteria by which the frequency of examinations will be
determined.
(5) If the examination findings clearly identify the need to expand
the scope of the examination, the director or a designee, upon five
days' written notification to the licensee with an explanation of the
need, may:
(a) Expand the examination review to locations other than the
examined location regardless of the number of years a location has held
a license; or
(b) Expand the time period of the examination beyond the five-year
period of licensing, provided the expansion of time does not exceed a
date certain identified in the written notification in this subsection.
(6) The director or a designee may consider reports made by
independent certified professionals for the mortgage broker covering
the same general subject matter as the examination. The director or a
designee may incorporate all or part of the report in the report of the
examination.
(7) The director may retain attorneys, accountants, or other
professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, or investigators
to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations.
The cost of these services for investigations only must be billed in
accordance with RCW 19.146.228.
(8) The director may establish by rule travel costs for examination
of out-of-state entities.
(9)(a) No person subject to examination or investigation under this
chapter may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or
secrete any books, records, computer records, or other information.
(b) A person who commits an act under (a) of this subsection is
guilty of a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b) or
punishable by a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 19.146 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each loan originator applicant shall complete at least twenty
hours of prelicensing education approved by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry. The prelicensing education shall
include at least three hours of federal law and regulations; three
hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer
protection, and fair lending issues; two hours of training related to
lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace;
and at least two hours of training specifically related to Washington
law.
(2) A loan originator applicant having successfully completed the
prelicensing education requirements approved by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry for any state shall be accepted as credit
towards completion of prelicensing education requirements in this
state.
(3) This chapter does not preclude any prelicensing education
course, as approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and
registry, that is provided by the employer of the loan originator
applicant or an entity which is affiliated with the applicant by an
agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such an employer or
entity. Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom,
online, or by any other means approved by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 19.146 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To obtain a loan originator license, an individual must pass a
test developed by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry
and administered by a test provider approved by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry based upon reasonable standards.
(2) An individual is not considered to have passed a test unless
the individual achieves a test score of not less than seventy-five
percent correct answers to questions.
(a) An individual may retake a test three consecutive times with
each consecutive taking occurring at least thirty days after the
preceding test.
(b) After failing three consecutive tests, an individual must wait
at least six months before taking the test again.
(c) A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a
valid license for a period of five years or longer must retake the
test, not taking into account any time during which that individual is
a registered mortgage loan originator.
(3) This section does not prohibit a test provider approved by the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry from providing a test
at the location of the employer of the loan originator applicant or any
subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or any entity
with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the
business of a mortgage loan originator.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.146.300 and 2006 c 19 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a loan originator license under this chapter
((shall)) must be ((in writing)) made to the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry and in the form prescribed by the
director. The application shall contain at least the following
information:
(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the loan originator applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or
social security numbers previously used by the loan originator
applicant, unless waived by the director; and
(b) Such other information regarding the loan originator
applicant's background, experience, character, and general fitness as
the director may require by rule.
(2)(a) As part of or in connection with an application for any
license under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, the
loan originator applicant shall furnish information concerning his or
her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington
state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, ((and)) the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, or any governmental
agency or entity authorized to receive this information for a state and
national criminal history background check; personal history;
experience; business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as
the director may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with
an application for a license under this chapter, or periodically upon
license renewal, the director is authorized to receive criminal history
record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction data
obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section
does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12
and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW.
(b) In order to reduce the points of contact which the federal
bureau of investigation may have to maintain, the director may use the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry as a channeling agent
for requesting information from and distributing information to the
department of justice or any governmental agency.
(c) In order to reduce the points of contact which the director may
have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry as a channeling agent for requesting and
distributing information to and from any source so directed by the
director.
(d) As part of or in connection with an application for a license
under this section, the loan originator applicant must furnish to the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry personal history and
experience in a form prescribed by the nationwide mortgage licensing
system and registry, including the submission of authorization for the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry and the director to
obtain:
(i) An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting
agency described in section 603(p) of the federal fair credit reporting
act; and
(ii) Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal
findings by any governmental jurisdiction.
(3) At the time of filing an application for a license under this
chapter, each loan originator applicant shall pay to the director the
appropriate application fee in an amount determined by rule of the
director in accordance with RCW 19.146.228 to cover the cost of
processing and reviewing the application. The director shall deposit
the moneys in the financial services regulation fund.
(4) The director must establish by rule procedures for accepting
and processing incomplete applications.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.146.310 and 2006 c 19 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a loan originator license
if, after investigation, the director makes the following findings:
(a) The loan originator applicant has paid the required license
fees;
(b) The loan originator applicant has met the requirements of RCW
19.146.300;
(c) The loan originator applicant has ((not)) never had a license
issued under this chapter or any similar state statute ((suspended or))
revoked ((within five years of the filing of the present application))
except that, for the purposes of this subsection, a subsequent formal
vacation of a revocation is not a revocation;
(d)(i) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of a
gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or financial misconduct or ((a
felony)) has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere
to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court within seven
years of the filing of the present application; and
(ii) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of, or
pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or
military court at any time preceding the date of application if the
felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, or money
laundering;
(e) The loan originator applicant has passed a written examination
whose content shall be established by rule of the director;
(f) The loan originator applicant has not been found to be in
violation of this chapter or rules;
(g) The loan originator applicant has demonstrated financial
responsibility, character, and general fitness such as to command the
confidence of the community and to warrant a belief that the business
will be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this
chapter. For the purposes of this section, an applicant has not
demonstrated financial responsibility when the applicant shows
disregard in the management of his or her financial condition. A
determination that an individual has shown disregard in the management
of his or her financial condition may include, but is not limited to,
an assessment of: Current outstanding judgments, except judgments
solely as a result of medical expenses; current outstanding tax liens
or other government liens and filings; foreclosures within the last
three years; or a pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the
past three years; and
(h) The loan originator licensee has completed, during the calendar
year preceding a licensee's annual license renewal date, a minimum of
eight hours of continuing education as established by rule of the
director. ((The director shall establish standards in rule for
approval of professional organizations offering continuing education to
loan originators. The director may approve continuing education taken
by loan originators in other states if the director is satisfied that
such continuing education meets the requirements of the continuing
education required by this chapter.))
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the loan
originator license. The director shall notify the loan originator
applicant of the denial and return to the loan originator applicant any
remaining portion of the license fee that exceeds the department's
actual cost to investigate the license.
(3) The director shall issue a new loan originator license under
this chapter to any licensee that has a valid license and is otherwise
in compliance with this chapter.
(4) A loan originator license issued under this section expires on
the date one year from the date of issuance which, for license renewal
purposes, is also the renewal date. The director shall establish rules
regarding the loan originator license renewal process created under
this chapter.
(5) A loan originator licensee may surrender a license by
delivering to the director written notice of surrender, but the
surrender does not affect the loan originator licensee's civil or
criminal liability or any administrative actions arising from acts or
omissions occurring before such surrender.
(6) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a loan originator
license and to facilitate the business of a loan originator, an interim
loan originator license with a fixed date of expiration may be issued
when the director determines that the loan originator has substantially
fulfilled the requirements for loan originator licensing as defined by
rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A licensed mortgage loan originator must complete a minimum of
eight hours of continuing education, eight of which is approved by the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry which must include at
least three hours of federal law and regulations; two hours of ethics,
which must include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair
lending issues; and two hours of training related to lending standards
for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace. Additionally, the
director may require at least one hour of continuing education on
Washington law provided by and administered through an approved
provider.
(2) The nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry must
review and approve continuing education courses. Review and approval
of a continuing education course must include review and approval of
the course provider.
(3) A licensed mortgage loan originator may only receive credit for
a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken,
and may not take the same approved course in the same or successive
years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.
(4) A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an instructor of an
approved continuing education course may receive credit for the
licensed mortgage loan originator's own annual continuing education
requirement at the rate of two hours credit for every one hour taught.
(5) A person having successfully completed the education
requirements approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and
registry for any state must have their credits accepted as credit
towards completion of continuing education requirements in this state.
(6) This section does not preclude any education course, as
approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, that
is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an
entity which is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an
agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or
entity. Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom,
online, or by any other means approved by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
The director shall establish a process whereby mortgage loan
originators may challenge information entered into the nationwide
mortgage licensing system and registry by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient licensing
process, the director may establish licensing rules and interim
procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications. For
previously registered or licensed individuals, the director may
establish expedited review and licensing procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 31.04 RCW
to read as follows:
An individual defined as a mortgage loan originator shall not
engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator without first
obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this act. Each
licensed mortgage loan originator must register with and maintain a
valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide mortgage licensing
system and registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 1512 of the S.A.F.E.
act, the requirements under any federal law or chapter 42.56 RCW
regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material
provided to the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, and
any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules
of any federal or state court, with respect to that information or
material, continues to apply to the information or material after the
information or material has been disclosed to the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry. Information and material may be shared
with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry
oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of
confidentiality protections provided by federal law or state law.
(2) For the purposes under subsection (1) of this section, the
director is authorized to enter agreements or sharing arrangements with
other governmental agencies, the conference of state bank supervisors,
the American association of residential mortgage regulators, or other
associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule,
regulation, or order of the director.
(3) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or
confidentiality under subsection (1) of this section is not subject to:
(a) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the
disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency
of the federal government or the respective state; or
(b) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any
private civil action or administrative process unless, with respect to
any privilege held by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and
registry with respect to that information or material, the person to
whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part,
in the discretion of that person, that privilege.
(4) Chapter 42.56 RCW relating to the disclosure of confidential
supervisory information or any information or material described in
subsection (1) of this section that is inconsistent with subsection (1)
of this section is superseded by the requirements of this section.
(5) This section does not apply to the information or material
relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated
disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators
that is included in the nationwide mortgage licensing system and
registry for access by the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the director is
authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the nationwide
mortgage licensing system and registry or other entities designated by
the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry to collect and
maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to
licensees or other persons subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
Each mortgage broker licensee shall submit to the nationwide
mortgage licensing system and registry reports of condition, which must
be in the form and must contain the information as the nationwide
mortgage licensing system and registry may require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
The director is authorized to regularly report violations of this
act, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to
the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) In order to facilitate an orderly
transition to licensing and minimize disruption in the mortgage
marketplace, sections 4, 6 through 9, 11, 12, 14, and 17 are effective
January 1, 2010.
(2) In order to facilitate an orderly transition to licensing and
minimize disruption in the mortgage marketplace, mortgage loan
originators who were previously exempt as exclusive agents under RCW
19.146.020(1)(a)(ii) must obtain a mortgage loan originator license
under this chapter before July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The director of financial institutions or
the director's designee may take the actions necessary to ensure this
act is implemented on July 1, 2010.

--- END ---