BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.120 and 2003 c 111 s 1512 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballots picked up from the precincts during the polling
hours may be counted only at the counting center before the polls have
closed. Election returns from the count of these ballots must be held
in secrecy until the polls have been closed.
(2) Upon breaking the seals and opening the ballot containers from
the precincts, all voted ballots must be manually inspected for damage,
write-in votes, and incorrect or incomplete marks. If it is found that
any ballot is damaged so that it cannot properly be counted by the vote
tallying system, a true duplicate copy must be made of the damaged
ballot in the presence of witnesses and the major party observers, if
they choose to witness the duplication, and substituted for the damaged
ballot. All damaged ballots must be kept by the county auditor until
sixty days after the primary or election or according to federal law,
whichever is longer.
(3) The returns produced by the vote tallying system, to which have
been added the counts of questioned ballots, write-in votes, and
absentee votes, constitute the official returns of the primary or
election in that county.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.125 and 2005 c 243 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
If inspection of the ballot reveals a physically damaged ballot or
ballot that may be otherwise unreadable or uncountable by the
tabulating system, the county auditor may refer the ballot to the
county canvassing board or duplicate the ballot if so authorized by the
county canvassing board. The voter's original ballot may not be
altered. A ballot may be duplicated only if the intent of the voter's
marks on the ballot is clear and the electronic voting equipment might
not otherwise properly tally the ballot to reflect the intent of the
voter. Ballots must be duplicated by teams of two or more people
working together in view of the major party observers, if they choose
to witness the duplication. When duplicating ballots, the county
auditor shall take the following steps to create and maintain an audit
trail of the action taken:
(1) Each original ballot and duplicate ballot must be assigned the
same unique control number, with the number being marked upon the face
of each ballot, to ensure that each duplicate ballot may be tied back
to the original ballot;
(2) A log must be kept of the ballots duplicated, which must at
least include:
(a) The control number of each original ballot and the
corresponding duplicate ballot;
(b) The initials of at least two people who participated in the
duplication of each ballot; and
(c) The total number of ballots duplicated.
Original and duplicate ballots must be sealed in secure storage at
all times, except during duplication, inspection by the canvassing
board, or tabulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, major political party observers
shall be allowed close enough to election workers to provide meaningful
monitoring of the processing of ballots, as determined by the
canvassing board. This includes, but is not limited to viewing
individual ballots, hearing conversations between election workers,
observing any modifications or duplications of ballots, and the
selection of ballots for a random check. Observers may only engage in
direct conversations with those election workers identified by the
county auditor.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.64.041 and 2004 c 271 s 179 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At the time and place established for a recount, the canvassing
board or its duly authorized representatives, in the presence of all
witnesses who may be in attendance, shall open the sealed containers
containing the ballots to be recounted, and shall recount the votes for
the offices or issues for which the recount has been ordered. Ballots
shall be handled only by the members of the canvassing board or their
duly authorized representatives.
Witnesses shall be permitted to observe the ballots and the process
of tabulating the votes, but they shall not be permitted to handle the
ballots. The canvassing board shall not permit the tabulation of votes
for any nomination, election, or issue other than the ones for which a
recount was applied for or required.
(2) At any time before the ballots from all of the precincts listed
in the application for the recount have been recounted, the applicant
may file with the board a written request to stop the recount.
(3) The recount may be observed by persons representing the
candidates affected by the recount or the persons representing both
sides of an issue that is being recounted. The designated observers
shall be allowed close enough to the election workers performing the
recount to provide meaningful monitoring of the process, as determined
by the canvassing board. This shall include, but not be limited to,
being able to view individual ballots and hearing conversations among
the election workers. Observers may only engage in direct conversation
with those election workers identified by the county auditor. The
observers may not make a record of the names, addresses, or other
information on the ballots, poll books, or applications for absentee
ballots unless authorized by the superior court. The secretary of
state or county auditor may limit the number of observers to not less
than two on each side if, in his or her opinion, a greater number would
cause undue delay or disruption of the recount process.

--- END ---