BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) All reports required to be submitted to the legislature
shall be provided only in an electronic format. Reports must be
submitted electronically to the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate. The chief clerk of
the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall
provide an online site for reports submitted to the legislature on the
legislative internet home page. The reports shall be organized in such
a way as to make the reports easy to find and accessible by
legislators, staff, and the public.
(b) Upon electronic submittal of the required report to the chief
clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate,
the agency shall send a letter, also by electronic means, to the
appropriate legislative committee that the report has been filed. The
letter may include a brief summary of the report. The public entity
submitting the report may make hard copies available by request.
(2)(a) All annual and biennial reports to the governor shall be
provided only in an electronic format. The governor shall provide an
online site for reports on the governor's official state web site. The
reports shall be organized in such a way as to make the reports easy to
find and accessible by the public.
(b) Upon electronic submittal of the required report to the
governor's office, the agency shall send a letter, also by electronic
means, that the report has been filed. The letter may include a brief
summary of the report. The entity submitting the report may make hard
copies available by request.

--- END ---