BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that continuity of
care in children's early learning and preschool environments promotes
the positive attachments and nurturing relationships children need for
healthy development across multiple domains. The legislature also
finds that the primary mechanisms through which children acquire school
readiness skills are the social relationships children form with their
caregivers. The legislature further finds that when subsidized child
care systems are structured to promote continuity of care for children,
low-income parents are also supported in their efforts to achieve goals
relating to education, employment, self-sufficiency, and asset
building. Supporting parents in these efforts can improve the family's
well-being and reduce reliance on public supports. The legislature
also finds that children of all ages in substitute care, including
school-age programs, benefit from the continuity of positive
relationships with their caregivers. The legislature intends to direct
the development for a plan to reform components of Washington's
subsidized child care system in order to implement a system of
subsidized child care that promotes continuity of care for children and
that is aligned with the state's philosophy and goals regarding early
learning and school-age programs; is affordable for parents needing
financial assistance; and is uncomplicated and predictable for
providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of early learning, jointly with the economic
services administration of the department of social and health
services, shall collaborate with stakeholders from early learning and
school-age programs serving families receiving working connections
child care subsidies and prepare a plan to implement the policies in
this section for administering the working connections child care
program. Policies for the expenditure of funds constituting the
working connections child care program also shall be consistent with
the outcome measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410. The implementation
plan shall include recommendations for a reasonable and cost-efficient
method of phasing in the following policies:
(a) Eligibility determinations and authorizations for working
connections subsidies shall be effective for twelve months unless a
parent or caregiver reports a change in circumstances necessitating
reauthorization prior to the end of the twelve-month period. This
requirement may include a mid-year review of eligibility consistent
with the administration of public assistance programs.
(b) The maximum amount of the working connections monthly parent
copay for all children combined in the parent's household shall be not
more than ten percent of the household's monthly gross income.
(c) The number of child absence days for which a provider is
eligible to receive a working connections subsidy for a child's care
shall be not fewer than ten days each month.
(2) The department of early learning and the department of social
and health services shall brief the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2009, and shall include
recommendations for a process of coordination and regular communication
between the department of early learning and the department of social
and health services to promote the alignment of the administration of
the working connections child care program with the state's philosophy
and goals relating to early learning and school-age child care.

--- END ---