BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The small school district contingency fund program is created
to provide assistance in the form of a loan to small school districts
facing a short-term and temporary shortfall in budgeted operating funds
due to an unforeseen circumstance that is outside the control of the
school district board of directors. An unforeseen circumstance does
not include any labor dispute between a school district board of
directors and any employee of the school district.
(2) School districts with an annual average full-time equivalent
student enrollment of one hundred or fewer students may submit an
application to the contingency fund committee for a loan of moneys from
the small school district contingency fund account. Applications must
describe the unforeseen circumstance, the proposed use of moneys from
the loan, and how the loan will be repaid.
(3) A contingency fund committee composed of the superintendents of
each of the educational service districts or their designees shall
oversee the administration of the program. The committee shall develop
criteria and an expedited process for reviewing and approving or
denying applications and establish maximum loan amounts. The
procedures developed by the committee shall be adopted as
administrative rules by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(4) The contingency fund committee shall select districts to
receive a loan from the account under section 2 of this act based on
review of the applications. The amount of the loan shall be determined
by the committee, and the committee may make a loan from the small
school district contingency fund account to a school district only to
the extent that moneys are available in the account.
(5) Each school district receiving a loan from the small school
district contingency fund account shall negotiate a repayment plan with
the contingency fund committee. Repayments shall begin within one year
and all moneys shall be repaid in full no later than three years after
the loan is approved by the committee. No standard or fixed repayment
schedule is required, and the contingency fund committee and the
superintendent of public instruction may not charge interest or fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The small school district contingency fund account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer for the purposes of making short-term loans to small school districts under section 1 of this act.
Appropriations made by the legislature for the purposes of section 1 of
this act shall be deposited into the account, along with any repayments
to the fund made by school districts as provided under section 1 of
this act. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account
and only at the direction of the contingency fund committee. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Moneys deposited
into the fund shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal period for which
they were appropriated. Funds appropriated for and deposited into the
account shall not be considered as basic education funding.

--- END ---