BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.030 and 2008 c 211 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the ombudsman's
office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse
or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to
be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as
provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8)(a) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(b) If the department is notified by a hospital administrator or
physician regarding a parent or guardian's refusal to consent to
available lifesaving medical treatment for a minor pursuant to RCW
26.44.056(4), the department must investigate the referral according to
the policies and timelines for urgent cases.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(13) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ombudsman of the contents of the report. The department
shall also notify the ombudsman of the disposition of the report.
(14) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(15) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(16) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(17) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(18) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.053 and 1997 c 386 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any judicial proceeding under this chapter or chapter 13.34
RCW in which it is alleged that a child has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect or is at substantial risk of death because of a parent
or guardian's refusal to consent to available lifesaving medical
treatment for the child, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem
for the child as provided in chapter 13.34 RCW. The requirement of a
guardian ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented
by counsel in the proceedings.
(2) At any time prior to or during a hearing in such a case, the
court may, on its own motion, or the motion of the guardian ad litem,
or other parties, order the examination by a physician, psychologist,
or psychiatrist, of any parent or child or other person having custody
of the child at the time of the alleged child abuse or neglect, if the
court finds such an examination is necessary to the proper
determination of the case. The hearing may be continued pending the
completion of such examination. The physician, psychologist, or
psychiatrist conducting such an examination may be required to testify
concerning the results of such examination and may be asked to give his
or her opinion as to whether the protection of the child requires that
he or she not be returned to the custody of his or her parents or other
persons having custody of him or her at the time of the alleged child
abuse or neglect. Persons so testifying shall be subject to cross-examination as are other witnesses. No information given at any such
examination of the parent or any other person having custody of the
child may be used against such person in any subsequent criminal
proceedings against such person or custodian concerning the alleged
abuse or neglect of the child.
(3) A parent or other person having legal custody of a child
alleged to be abused or neglected shall be a party to any proceeding
that may impair or impede such person's interest in and custody or
control of the child.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.056 and 1983 c 246 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An administrator of a hospital or similar institution or any
physician, licensed pursuant to chapters 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, may detain
a child without consent of a person legally responsible for the child
whether or not medical treatment is required, if the circumstances or
conditions of the child are such that the detaining individual has
reasonable cause to believe that permitting the child to continue in
his or her place of residence or in the care and custody of the parent,
guardian, custodian or other person legally responsible for the child's
care would present an imminent danger to that child's safety:
PROVIDED, That such administrator or physician shall notify or cause to
be notified the appropriate law enforcement agency or child protective
services pursuant to RCW 26.44.040. Such notification shall be made as
soon as possible and in no case longer than seventy-two hours. Such
temporary protective custody by an administrator or doctor shall not be
deemed an arrest. Child protective services may detain the child until
the court assumes custody, but in no case longer than seventy-two
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
(2) Whenever an administrator or physician has reasonable cause to
believe that a child would be in imminent danger if released to a
parent, guardian, custodian, or other person or is in imminent danger
if left in the custody of a parent, guardian, custodian, or other
person, the administrator or physician may notify a law enforcement
agency and the law enforcement agency shall take the child into custody
or cause the child to be taken into custody. The law enforcement
agency shall release the child to the custody of child protective
services. Child protective services shall detain the child until the
court assumes custody or upon a documented and substantiated record
that in the professional judgment of the child protective services the
child's safety will not be endangered if the child is returned. If the
child is returned, the department shall establish a six-month plan to
monitor and assure the continued safety of the child's life or health.
The monitoring period may be extended for good cause.
(3) A child protective services employee, an administrator, doctor,
or law enforcement officer shall not be held liable in any civil action
for the decision for taking the child into custody, if done in good
faith under this section.
(4) An administrator of a hospital or similar institution or any
physician, licensed pursuant to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW who has
knowledge of a parent or guardian's refusal to consent to available
lifesaving medical treatment for a minor and such refusal creates a
substantial risk of death to the minor, the administrator or physician
must notify the department of social and health services, child
protective services staff at the earliest opportunity.

--- END ---