BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that parents and
guardians are their children's first and best teachers and that
improving student achievement requires that parents be partners in
their children's education. The legislature further finds that
increased knowledge of and input regarding public education is
particularly needed in low-income and ethnic minority communities.
The legislature intends to increase public awareness of the
importance of parental and community involvement in education and
foster mutually respectful interactions in an atmosphere of
collaboration and cooperation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Annually, school districts shall inform students and their
parents or guardians of the rights set forth in this section, either
orally or in writing depending on the mode of communication that best
assures that the students and their parents or guardians understand
their rights.
(2) A reasonable effort shall be made to ensure that students and
their parents or guardians are afforded the following rights:
(a) To be treated respectfully by school staff and administrators;
(b) To have their questions answered and their messages returned in
a timely manner;
(c) To be genuinely welcomed and encouraged to be involved, at
school and at home, in the education process so as to promote and
support student learning;
(d) To receive timely communications from schools regarding
standards and assessments, student performance, available educational
programs and materials, and opportunities for parental involvement in
their children's education and the school community;
(e) To access education records in accordance with state and
federal laws and to be advised of the policies and procedures regarding
such access;
(f) To be advised of their right to inspect, and the location of,
all required school district policies, including but not limited to
policies regarding bullying prevention and sexual harassment; and
(g) To be advised of the existence, purposes, and contact
information of the office of the education ombudsman.
(3) This section does not authorize a school to inform a parent or
guardian, or to permit participation by a parent or guardian, if to do
so would conflict with a valid restraining order, protective order, or
order for custody or visitation issued by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(4) The legislature intends that students, their parents or
guardians, the education ombudsman, and others who may seek to assist
students, use the least formal means available to satisfactorily
resolve disputes that may arise regarding the rights set forth in this
section. Wherever feasible, direct discussion with school staff or
administrators should be employed. This section is not intended to and
shall not be construed to create a new private right of action.
Nothing in this section may be construed to limit a party's ability to
bring an action based on rights conferred by other state or federal
law.
(5) As used in this section, "parents" means: (a) Natural,
adoptive, or foster parents; (b) guardians; and (c) individuals acting
in the place of parents, including grandparents, stepparents, or other
relatives, with whom the child lives, or individuals who are legally
responsible for the child's welfare, consistent with the definition of
"parent" as defined in the federal individuals with disabilities
education act as existing on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.06B RCW
to read as follows:
The education ombudsman shall report to the legislature regarding
whether school districts have implemented the rights afforded in
section 2 of this act. In so doing, the education ombudsman shall
consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
school districts, parent and teacher organizations, and student groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---