BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that providing access
to higher education is important both for the betterment of our
citizens and revitalization of our economy. Providing that access to
all citizens equally is the bedrock of the higher education system.
The legislature also finds that during times of economic downturn,
demand for higher education increases. Whether people have been laid
off and need retraining or people need more education to keep their
current jobs, demand on the state's institutions of higher education
increases when the supply of state revenue decreases. Colleges and
universities must make adjustments, some of which impact students.
However, the legislature also finds that the manner in which
colleges and universities respond to budget pressures must be
consistent, equitable, and aligned with the state's economic needs. In
2008, the legislature adopted the strategic master plan for higher
education, which articulated the state's need for highly skilled
workers over the next decade. College and university admissions
policies and procedures must reflect the priorities in that strategic
plan, even in the face of difficult economic times. While the
legislature finds that it is sometimes necessary to prioritize certain
programs of study to meet state needs, the legislature also recognizes
the necessity to treat students equitably and consistently in the
admissions process. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to
ensure that institutions of higher education implement enrollment
reductions in a manner that reflects state priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislature reduces or does not increase enrollments over
the previous biennium as specified in the omnibus appropriations act,
or if the institutions of higher education reduce enrollment for any
academic term, the reduction shall apply to all categories of students
on an equal basis. Special exemptions for certain high-demand programs
of study may be made at the discretion of the institution of higher
education. Exemptions for classifications of students, including but
not limited to student athletes, may not be made.

--- END ---