BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.340 and 2005 c 436 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making all discretionary decisions regarding release plans
for and supervision of sex offenders, the department shall set
priorities and make decisions based on an assessment of public safety
risks.
(2) The department shall, no later than September 1, 1996,
implement a policy governing the department's evaluation and approval
of release plans for sex offenders. The policy shall include, at a
minimum, a formal process by which victims, witnesses, and other
interested people may provide information and comments to the
department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or classes
of individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall
make all reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this
process through currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the
assistance of courts, prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims'
advocacy groups in doing so. Notice of an offender's proposed
residence shall be provided to all people registered to receive notice
of an offender's release under RCW ((9.94A.612)) 72.09.712(2), except
that in no case may this notification requirement be construed to
require an extension of an offender's release date.
(3)(a) For any offender convicted of a felony sex offense ((against
a minor victim)) after June 6, 1996, the department shall not approve
a residence location if the proposed residence: (i) Includes a minor
victim or child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim who
the department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the
offender's residence in the household; or (ii) is within ((close
proximity)) fifty miles of, or is in the same county as, the current
residence of a ((minor)) victim, unless the whereabouts of the
((minor)) victim cannot be determined or unless such a restriction
would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the court or
directed by the department of social and health services. The
department is further authorized to reject a residence location for an
offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim if
the proposed residence is within close proximity to schools, child care
centers, playgrounds, or other grounds or facilities where children of
similar age or circumstance as a previous victim are present who the
department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the sex
offender's residence at that location.
(b) In addition, for any offender prohibited from living in a
community protection zone under RCW ((9.94A.712(6)(a)(ii)))
9.94A.703(1)(c), the department may not approve a residence location if
the proposed residence is in a community protection zone.
(4) When the department requires supervised visitation as a term or
condition of a sex offender's community placement under RCW
((9.94A.700)) 9.94B.050(6), the department shall, prior to approving a
supervisor, consider the following:
(a) The relationships between the proposed supervisor, the
offender, and the minor; (b) the proposed supervisor's acknowledgment
and understanding of the offender's prior criminal conduct, general
knowledge of the dynamics of child sexual abuse, and willingness and
ability to protect the minor from the potential risks posed by contact
with the offender; and (c) recommendations made by the department of
social and health services about the best interests of the child.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.270 and 2008 c 231 s 48 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual
reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every offender who is
committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:
(a) Offenders who are sentenced to life without the possibility of
release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW; and
(b) Offenders who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1227.
(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a
series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of
this section.
(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess all offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits.
(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than forty-five days of
being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but,
whenever possible, no later than sixty days after completion of the
assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, and other areas which
are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the community.
(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any offender, the department shall:
(i) Evaluate the offender's needs and, to the extent possible,
connect the offender with existing services and resources that meet
those needs; and
(ii) Connect the offender with a community justice center and/or
community transition coordination network in the area in which the
offender will be residing once released from the correctional system if
one exists.
(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an
offender's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the
period of partial confinement for the offender as allowed pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the offender's transition to the community.
(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing
information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved
with the offender's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed
appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared
electronically.
(8)(a) Except as provided in RCW 72.09.340(3)(a)(ii), in
determining the county of discharge for an offender released to
community custody, the department may not approve a residence location
that is not in the offender's county of origin unless it is determined
by the department that the offender's return to his or her county of
origin would be inappropriate considering any court-ordered condition
of the offender's sentence, victim safety concerns, negative influences
on the offender in the community, or the location of family or other
sponsoring persons or organizations that will support the offender.
(b) If the offender is not returned to his or her county of origin,
the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county
in which the offender is placed with a written explanation.
(c) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the offender's first felony conviction in
Washington.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---