BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
interests of justice and public safety that the work of the state crime
laboratory remains above criticism. The legislature further finds that
recent events have called into question the truth of reports from the
state crime laboratory. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent that
oversight of the laboratory by the Washington state forensic
investigations council must be strengthened with the addition of
members, including attorneys who regularly represent criminal
defendants and a scientist from a state university in the state of
Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.103.040 and 1995 c 398 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall consist of ((twelve)) fifteen members who shall
be selected as follows: One county coroner; one county prosecutor; one
county prosecutor who also serves as ex officio county coroner; one
county medical examiner; one county sheriff; one chief of police; the
chief of the state patrol; two members of a county legislative
authority; one pathologist who is currently in private practice;
((and)) two members of a city legislative authority; two attorneys
whose practice of law includes significant experience in the area of
representation of clients charged with criminal offenses; and one
member with a doctorate in a physical science who is a tenured faculty
member at a university or college in the state of Washington which is
a member institution of a recognized accrediting association and has
operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site
classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within
the state of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at least seven
hundred full-time equivalent students.
The governor shall appoint members to the council from among the
nominees submitted for each position as follows: The Washington
association of county officials shall submit two nominees each for the
coroner position and the medical examiner position; the Washington
state association of counties shall submit two nominees each for the
two county legislative authority positions; the association of
Washington cities shall submit two nominees each for the two city
legislative authority positions; the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys shall submit two nominees each for the county
prosecutor-ex officio county coroner and for the county prosecutor
position; the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall submit two nominees each for the county sheriff position and the
chief of police position; ((and)) the Washington association of
pathologists shall submit two nominees for the private pathologist
position; the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers and
the Washington defender association shall each submit two nominees for
the criminal defense attorney positions; and the president of an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016(4) or the
president of a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site
classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within
the state of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at least seven
hundred full-time equivalent students may each forward to the governor
a nomination of a member of the faculty at the college or university at
which the president serves. No president shall be required to submit
a nomination, and the governor shall not be restricted to appointing a
member, to the council from among individuals nominated by a president.

--- END ---