BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.70.011 and 2006 c 364 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Vehicle" means and includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled and
every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and which is
required to be registered and titled under this title ((46 RCW, Motor
Vehicles)).
(3) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary
residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile
home lot.
(4) "Vehicle dealer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, not excluded by subsection (5) of this section,
engaged in the business of buying, selling, listing, exchanging,
offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising the sale of new or used vehicles, or
arranging or offering or attempting to solicit or negotiate on behalf
of others, a sale, purchase, or exchange of an interest in new or used
motor vehicles, irrespective of whether the motor vehicles are owned by
that person. Vehicle dealers shall be classified as follows:
(a) A "motor vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals in new
or used motor vehicles, or both;
(b) A "mobile home and travel trailer dealer" is a vehicle dealer
that deals in mobile homes, park trailers, or travel trailers, or more
than one type of these vehicles;
(c) A "miscellaneous vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in motorcycles or vehicles other than motor vehicles or mobile homes
and travel trailers or any combination of such vehicles;
(d) A "recreational vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in travel trailers, motor homes, truck campers, or camping trailers
that are primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, are
either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, are
transient, are not occupied as a primary residence, and are not
immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot.
(5) The term "vehicle dealer" does not include, nor do the
licensing requirements of RCW 46.70.021 apply to, the following
persons, firms, associations, or corporations:
(a) Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or
other persons appointed by, or acting under a judgment or order of, any
court; or
(b) Public officers while performing their official duties; or
(c) Employees of vehicle dealers who are engaged in the specific
performance of their duties as such employees; or
(d) Any person engaged in an isolated sale of a vehicle in which
that person is the registered or legal owner, or both, thereof; or
(e) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, engaged
in the selling of equipment other than vehicles, subject to
registration, used for agricultural or industrial purposes; or
(f) A real estate broker licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, or an
affiliated licensee, who, on behalf of another negotiates the purchase,
sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in
conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental, or lease of the
land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or will be,
located; or
(g) Owners who are also operators of the special highway
construction equipment or of the highway construction equipment for
which a vehicle license and display vehicle license number plate is
required as defined in RCW 46.16.010; or
(h) Any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, credit union, and any parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate thereof, authorized to do business in this state under
state or federal law with respect to the sale or other disposition of
a motor vehicle owned and used in their business; or with respect to
the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the entity has acquired an interest as a lessor, lessee, or
secured party; or
(i) Any person who is regularly engaged in the business of
acquiring leases or installment contracts by assignment, with respect
to the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the person has acquired an interest as a result of the business.
(6) "Vehicle salesperson" means any person who for any form of
compensation sells, auctions, leases with an option to purchase, or
offers to sell or to so lease vehicles on behalf of a vehicle dealer.
(7) "Department" means the department of licensing, which shall
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(8) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(9) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or
assembles new and unused vehicles or remanufactures vehicles in whole
or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new and unused vehicle to
vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale, vehicles
to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer, or for directing or
supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives,
and further includes any sales promotion organization, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of
new and unused vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to
vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their vehicles or for supervising
or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(10) "Established place of business" means a location meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.70.023(1) at which a vehicle dealer conducts
business in this state.
(11) "Principal place of business" means that dealer firm's
business location in the state, which place the dealer designates as
their principal place of business.
(12) "Subagency" means any place of business of a vehicle dealer
within the state, which place is physically and geographically
separated from the principal place of business of the firm or any place
of business of a vehicle dealer within the state, at which place the
firm does business using a name other than the principal name of the
firm, or both.
(13) "Temporary subagency" means a location other than the
principal place of business or subagency within the state where a
licensed vehicle dealer may secure a license to conduct the business
and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten days for a
specific purpose such as auto shows, shopping center promotions, tent
sales, exhibitions, or similar merchandising ventures. No more than
six temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a licensee in any
twelve-month period.
(14) "Wholesale vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who buys and
sells other than at retail.
(15) "Retail vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who may buy and
sell at both wholesale and retail.
(16) "Listing dealer" means a used mobile home dealer who makes
contracts with sellers who will compensate the dealer for obtaining a
willing purchaser for the seller's mobile home.
(17) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of exchanges
between an auctioneer and the members of the audience, constituting a
series of oral invitations for offers for the purchase of vehicles made
by the auctioneer, offers to purchase by members of the audience, and
the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer to purchase.
(18) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, or other legal or commercial entity licensed under chapter
18.11 RCW that only sells or offers to sell vehicles at auction or only
arranges or sponsors auctions.
(19) "Buyer's agent" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or corporation retained or employed by a consumer to arrange for or to
negotiate, or both, the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle on
behalf of the consumer, and who is paid a fee or receives other
compensation from the consumer for its services.
(20) "New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under Title 46
RCW, has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee,
and is not a "used vehicle" as defined under RCW 46.04.660.
(21) "Defect" means:
(a) A malfunction or nonconformity in any component part of a motor
vehicle that impedes the buyer's ability to control or operate the used
motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonable intended purposes and for
which the cost of repairs for the defect exceeds two hundred dollars
for parts and labor; or
(b) Any unrepaired damage sustained by the motor vehicle due to
fire, water, collision, or other causes for which the combined cost of
repairs for all the damage exceeds two hundred dollars for parts and
labor.
(22) "Component part" means, either individually or collectively,
the vehicle's: Engine; drivetrain; frame; suspension system; brakes;
steering mechanism; wheel alignment; lights; odometer; tires and tire
pressure; seats and shoulder harness safety belts; airbags and any
other passive or supplemental restraint system; and other mechanisms
and equipment determined by the director or department to be necessary
for the normal and safe operations of a motor vehicle.
(23) "Drivetrain" means those components and systems within a motor
vehicle that transfer power from the engine of the vehicle to the
wheels of the vehicle, including a transmission, driveshaft, clutch,
torque converter, differential, universal joint, and constant velocity
joint.
(24) "Known" means that a vehicle dealer or the vehicle dealer's
agent or employee has obtained facts or information about the condition
of a used vehicle that would lead a reasonable person in similar
circumstances to believe that the used vehicle contained a defect.
"Known" encompasses knowledge obtained through an inspection, from a
previous owner, from the salesperson at an auction or another vehicle
dealer, or through any other means.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.70.070 and 2001 c 272 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before issuing a vehicle dealer's license, the department shall
require the applicant to file with the department a surety bond in the
amount of:
(a) ((Thirty)) One hundred thousand dollars for motor vehicle
dealers that have more than fifty vehicles offered for sale at any
time;
(b) Fifty thousand dollars for motor vehicle dealers that have more
than nine and fewer than fifty vehicles offered for sale at any time;
(c) Thirty thousand dollars for all other motor vehicle dealers,
including motor vehicle dealers organized as or operated by a nonprofit
corporation under Title 24 RCW that has a primarily philanthropic or
charitable purpose;
(((b))) (d) Thirty thousand dollars for mobile home, park trailer,
and travel trailer dealers;
(((c))) (e) Five thousand dollars for miscellaneous dealers,
running to the state, and executed by a surety company authorized to do
business in the state. Such bond shall be approved by the attorney
general as to form and conditioned that the dealer shall conduct his or
her business in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.
Any retail purchaser, consignor who is not a motor vehicle dealer,
or a motor vehicle dealer who has purchased from, sold to, or otherwise
transacted business with a wholesale dealer, who has suffered any loss
or damage by reason of breach of warranty or by any act by a dealer
which constitutes a violation of this chapter shall have the right to
institute an action for recovery against such dealer and the surety
upon such bond. However, under this section, motor vehicle dealers who
have purchased from, sold to, or otherwise transacted business with
wholesale dealers may only institute actions against wholesale dealers
and their surety bonds. Successive recoveries against said bond shall
be permitted, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall in no event exceed the amount of the bond. Upon exhaustion of
the penalty of said bond or cancellation of the bond by the surety the
vehicle dealer license shall automatically be deemed canceled.
(2) Except for nonprofit motor vehicle dealers identified in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, the bond for any vehicle dealer
licensed or to be licensed under more than one classification shall be
the highest bond required for any such classification.
(3) Vehicle dealers shall maintain a bond for each business
location in this state and bond coverage for all temporary subagencies.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.70.180 and 2007 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each of the following acts or practices is unlawful:
(1) To cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed,
published, distributed, broadcasted, televised, or disseminated in any
manner whatsoever, any statement or representation with regard to the
sale, lease, or financing of a vehicle which is false, deceptive, or
misleading, including but not limited to the following:
(a) That no down payment is required in connection with the sale of
a vehicle when a down payment is in fact required, or that a vehicle
may be purchased for a smaller down payment than is actually required;
(b) That a certain percentage of the sale price of a vehicle may be
financed when such financing is not offered in a single document
evidencing the entire security transaction;
(c) That a certain percentage is the amount of the service charge
to be charged for financing, without stating whether this percentage
charge is a monthly amount or an amount to be charged per year;
(d) That a new vehicle will be sold for a certain amount above or
below cost without computing cost as the exact amount of the factory
invoice on the specific vehicle to be sold;
(e) That a vehicle will be sold upon a monthly payment of a certain
amount, without including in the statement the number of payments of
that same amount which are required to liquidate the unpaid purchase
price.
(2)(a) To incorporate within the terms of any purchase and sale or
lease agreement any statement or representation with regard to the
sale, lease, or financing of a vehicle which is false, deceptive, or
misleading, including but not limited to terms that include as an added
cost to the selling price or capitalized cost of a vehicle an amount
for licensing or transfer of title of that vehicle which is not
actually due to the state, unless such amount has in fact been paid by
the dealer prior to such sale. However, an amount not to exceed fifty
dollars per vehicle sale or lease may be charged by a dealer to recover
administrative costs for collecting motor vehicle excise taxes,
licensing and registration fees and other agency fees, verifying and
clearing titles, transferring titles, perfecting, releasing, or
satisfying liens or other security interests, and other administrative
and documentary services rendered by a dealer in connection with the
sale or lease of a vehicle and in carrying out the requirements of this
chapter or any other provisions of state law.
(b) A dealer may charge the documentary service fee in (a) of this
subsection under the following conditions:
(i) The documentary service fee is disclosed in writing to a
prospective purchaser or lessee before the execution of a purchase and
sale or lease agreement;
(ii) The documentary service fee is not represented to the
purchaser or lessee as a fee or charge required by the state to be paid
by either the dealer or prospective purchaser or lessee;
(iii) The documentary service fee is separately designated from the
selling price or capitalized cost of the vehicle and from any other
taxes, fees, or charges; and
(iv) Dealers disclose in any advertisement that a documentary
service fee in an amount up to fifty dollars may be added to the sale
price or the capitalized cost.
For the purposes of this subsection (2), the term "documentary
service fee" means the optional amount charged by a dealer to provide
the services specified in (a) of this subsection.
(3) To set up, promote, or aid in the promotion of a plan by which
vehicles are to be sold or leased to a person for a consideration and
upon further consideration that the purchaser or lessee agrees to
secure one or more persons to participate in the plan by respectively
making a similar purchase and in turn agreeing to secure one or more
persons likewise to join in said plan, each purchaser or lessee being
given the right to secure money, credits, goods, or something of value,
depending upon the number of persons joining the plan.
(4) To commit, allow, or ratify any act of "bushing" which is
defined as follows: Entering into a written contract, written purchase
order or agreement, retail installment sales agreement, note and
security agreement, or written lease agreement, hereinafter
collectively referred to as contract or lease, signed by the
prospective buyer or lessee of a vehicle, which:
(a) Is subject to any conditions or the dealer's or his or her
authorized representative's future acceptance, and the dealer fails or
refuses within four calendar days, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, or
legal holiday, and prior to any further negotiations with said buyer or
lessee to inform the buyer or lessee either: (i) That the dealer
unconditionally accepts the contract or lease, having satisfied,
removed, or waived all conditions to acceptance or performance,
including, but not limited to, financing, assignment, or lease
approval; or (ii) that the dealer rejects the contract or lease,
thereby automatically voiding the contract or lease, as long as such
voiding does not negate commercially reasonable contract or lease
provisions pertaining to the return of the subject vehicle and any
physical damage, excessive mileage after the demand for return of the
vehicle, and attorneys' fees authorized by law, and tenders the refund
of any initial payment or security made or given by the buyer or
lessee, including, but not limited to, any down payment, and tenders
return of the trade-in vehicle, key, other trade-in, or certificate of
title to a trade-in. Tender may be conditioned on return of the
subject vehicle if previously delivered to the buyer or lessee.
The provisions of this subsection (4)(a) do not impair, prejudice,
or abrogate the rights of a dealer to assert a claim against the buyer
or lessee for misrepresentation or breach of contract and to exercise
all remedies available at law or in equity, including those under
chapter 62A.9A RCW, if the dealer, bank, or other lender or leasing
company discovers that approval of the contract or financing or
approval of the lease was based upon material misrepresentations made
by the buyer or lessee, including, but not limited to,
misrepresentations regarding income, employment, or debt of the buyer
or lessee, as long as the dealer, or his or her staff, has not, with
knowledge of the material misrepresentation, aided, assisted,
encouraged, or participated, directly or indirectly, in the
misrepresentation. A dealer shall not be in violation of this
subsection (4)(a) if the buyer or lessee made a material
misrepresentation to the dealer, as long as the dealer, or his or her
staff, has not, with knowledge of the material misrepresentation,
aided, assisted, encouraged, or participated, directly or indirectly,
in the misrepresentation.
When a dealer informs a buyer or lessee under this subsection
(4)(a) regarding the unconditional acceptance or rejection of the
contract, lease, or financing by an electronic mail message, the dealer
must also transmit the communication by any additional means;
(b) Permits the dealer to renegotiate a dollar amount specified as
trade-in allowance on a vehicle delivered or to be delivered by the
buyer or lessee as part of the purchase price or lease, for any reason
except:
(i) Failure to disclose that the vehicle's certificate of ownership
has been branded for any reason, including, but not limited to, status
as a rebuilt vehicle as provided in RCW 46.12.050 and 46.12.075; or
(ii) Substantial physical damage or latent mechanical defect
occurring before the dealer took possession of the vehicle and which
could not have been reasonably discoverable at the time of the taking
of the order, offer, or contract; or
(iii) Excessive additional miles or a discrepancy in the mileage.
"Excessive additional miles" means the addition of five hundred miles
or more, as reflected on the vehicle's odometer, between the time the
vehicle was first valued by the dealer for purposes of determining its
trade-in value and the time of actual delivery of the vehicle to the
dealer. "A discrepancy in the mileage" means (A) a discrepancy between
the mileage reflected on the vehicle's odometer and the stated mileage
on the signed odometer statement; or (B) a discrepancy between the
mileage stated on the signed odometer statement and the actual mileage
on the vehicle; or
(c) Fails to comply with the obligation of any written warranty or
guarantee given by the dealer requiring the furnishing of services or
repairs within a reasonable time.
(5) To commit any offense relating to odometers, as such offenses
are defined in RCW 46.37.540, 46.37.550, 46.37.560, and 46.37.570. A
violation of this subsection is a class C felony punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) For any vehicle dealer or vehicle salesperson to refuse to
furnish, upon request of a prospective purchaser or lessee, for
vehicles previously registered to a business or governmental entity,
the name and address of the business or governmental entity.
(7) To commit any other offense under RCW 46.37.423, 46.37.424, or
46.37.425.
(8) To commit any offense relating to a dealer's temporary license
permit, including but not limited to failure to properly complete each
such permit, or the issuance of more than one such permit on any one
vehicle. However, a dealer may issue a second temporary permit on a
vehicle if the following conditions are met:
(a) The lienholder fails to deliver the vehicle title to the dealer
within the required time period;
(b) The dealer has satisfied the lien; and
(c) The dealer has proof that payment of the lien was made within
two calendar days, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday,
after the sales contract has been executed by all parties and all
conditions and contingencies in the sales contract have been met or
otherwise satisfied.
(9) For a dealer, salesperson, or mobile home manufacturer, having
taken an instrument or cash "on deposit" from a purchaser or lessee
prior to the delivery of the bargained-for vehicle, to commingle the
"on deposit" funds with assets of the dealer, salesperson, or mobile
home manufacturer instead of holding the "on deposit" funds as trustee
in a separate trust account until the purchaser or lessee has taken
delivery of the bargained-for vehicle. Delivery of a manufactured home
shall be deemed to occur in accordance with RCW 46.70.135(5). Failure,
immediately upon receipt, to endorse "on deposit" instruments to such
a trust account, or to set aside "on deposit" cash for deposit in such
trust account, and failure to deposit such instruments or cash in such
trust account by the close of banking hours on the day following
receipt thereof, shall be evidence of intent to commit this unlawful
practice: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a motor vehicle dealer may keep a
separate trust account which equals his or her customary total customer
deposits for vehicles for future delivery. For purposes of this
section, "on deposit" funds received from a purchaser of a manufactured
home means those funds that a seller requires a purchaser to advance
before ordering the manufactured home, but does not include any loan
proceeds or moneys that might have been paid on an installment
contract.
(10) For a dealer or manufacturer to fail to comply with the
obligations of any written warranty or guarantee given by the dealer or
manufacturer requiring the furnishing of goods and services or repairs
within a reasonable period of time, or to fail to furnish to a
purchaser or lessee, all parts which attach to the manufactured unit
including but not limited to the undercarriage, and all items specified
in the terms of a sales or lease agreement signed by the seller and
buyer or lessee.
(11) For a vehicle dealer to pay to or receive from any person,
firm, partnership, association, or corporation acting, either directly
or through a subsidiary, as a buyer's agent for consumers, any
compensation, fee, purchase moneys or funds that have been deposited
into or withdrawn out of any account controlled or used by any buyer's
agent, gratuity, or reward in connection with the purchase, sale, or
lease of a new motor vehicle.
(12) For a buyer's agent, acting directly or through a subsidiary,
to pay to or to receive from any motor vehicle dealer any compensation,
fee, gratuity, or reward in connection with the purchase, sale, or
lease of a new motor vehicle. In addition, it is unlawful for any
buyer's agent to engage in any of the following acts on behalf of or in
the name of the consumer:
(a) Receiving or paying any purchase moneys or funds into or out of
any account controlled or used by any buyer's agent;
(b) Signing any vehicle purchase orders, sales contracts, leases,
odometer statements, or title documents, or having the name of the
buyer's agent appear on the vehicle purchase order, sales contract,
lease, or title; or
(c) Signing any other documentation relating to the purchase, sale,
lease, or transfer of any new motor vehicle.
It is unlawful for a buyer's agent to use a power of attorney
obtained from the consumer to accomplish or effect the purchase, sale,
lease, or transfer of ownership documents of any new motor vehicle by
any means which would otherwise be prohibited under (a) through (c) of
this subsection. However, the buyer's agent may use a power of
attorney for physical delivery of motor vehicle license plates to the
consumer.
Further, it is unlawful for a buyer's agent to engage in any false,
deceptive, or misleading advertising, disseminated in any manner
whatsoever, including but not limited to making any claim or statement
that the buyer's agent offers, obtains, or guarantees the lowest price
on any motor vehicle or words to similar effect.
(13) For a buyer's agent to arrange for or to negotiate the
purchase, or both, of a new motor vehicle through an out-of-state
dealer without disclosing in writing to the customer that the new
vehicle would not be subject to chapter 19.118 RCW. This subsection
also applies to leased vehicles. In addition, it is unlawful for any
buyer's agent to fail to have a written agreement with the customer
that: (a) Sets forth the terms of the parties' agreement; (b)
discloses to the customer the total amount of any fees or other
compensation being paid by the customer to the buyer's agent for the
agent's services; and (c) further discloses whether the fee or any
portion of the fee is refundable.
(14) Being a manufacturer, other than a motorcycle manufacturer
governed by chapter 46.93 RCW, to:
(a) Coerce or attempt to coerce any vehicle dealer to order or
accept delivery of any vehicle or vehicles, parts or accessories, or
any other commodities which have not been voluntarily ordered by the
vehicle dealer: PROVIDED, That recommendation, endorsement,
exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument are not deemed to
constitute coercion;
(b) Cancel or fail to renew the franchise or selling agreement of
any vehicle dealer doing business in this state without fairly
compensating the dealer at a fair going business value for his or her
capital investment which shall include but not be limited to tools,
equipment, and parts inventory possessed by the dealer on the day he or
she is notified of such cancellation or termination and which are still
within the dealer's possession on the day the cancellation or
termination is effective, if: (i) The capital investment has been
entered into with reasonable and prudent business judgment for the
purpose of fulfilling the franchise; and (ii) the cancellation or
nonrenewal was not done in good faith. Good faith is defined as the
duty of each party to any franchise to act in a fair and equitable
manner towards each other, so as to guarantee one party freedom from
coercion, intimidation, or threats of coercion or intimidation from the
other party: PROVIDED, That recommendation, endorsement, exposition,
persuasion, urging, or argument are not deemed to constitute a lack of
good faith;
(c) Encourage, aid, abet, or teach a vehicle dealer to sell or
lease vehicles through any false, deceptive, or misleading sales or
financing practices including but not limited to those practices
declared unlawful in this section;
(d) Coerce or attempt to coerce a vehicle dealer to engage in any
practice forbidden in this section by either threats of actual
cancellation or failure to renew the dealer's franchise agreement;
(e) Refuse to deliver any vehicle publicly advertised for immediate
delivery to any duly licensed vehicle dealer having a franchise or
contractual agreement for the retail sale or lease of new and unused
vehicles sold or distributed by such manufacturer within sixty days
after such dealer's order has been received in writing unless caused by
inability to deliver because of shortage or curtailment of material,
labor, transportation, or utility services, or by any labor or
production difficulty, or by any cause beyond the reasonable control of
the manufacturer;
(f) To provide under the terms of any warranty that a purchaser or
lessee of any new or unused vehicle that has been sold or leased,
distributed for sale or lease, or transferred into this state for
resale or lease by the vehicle manufacturer may only make any warranty
claim on any item included as an integral part of the vehicle against
the manufacturer of that item.
Nothing in this section may be construed to impair the obligations
of a contract or to prevent a manufacturer, distributor,
representative, or any other person, whether or not licensed under this
chapter, from requiring performance of a written contract entered into
with any licensee hereunder, nor does the requirement of such
performance constitute a violation of any of the provisions of this
section if any such contract or the terms thereof requiring
performance, have been freely entered into and executed between the
contracting parties. This paragraph and subsection (14)(b) of this
section do not apply to new motor vehicle manufacturers governed by
chapter 46.96 RCW.
(15) Unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle
as defined in RCW 19.116.050.
(16) To knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a
registered owner of a vehicle to repossess and return or resell the
vehicle to the registered owner in an attempt to avoid a suspended
license impound under chapter 46.55 RCW. However, compliance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW in repossessing, selling, leasing, or otherwise
disposing of the vehicle, including providing redemption rights to the
debtor, is not a violation of this section.
(17)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, to enter into
a written contract, written purchase order or agreement, retail
installment sales agreement, or note and security agreement, signed by
the prospective buyer of a used vehicle, which attempts to disclaim,
exclude, or modify any implied warranties of merchantability or fitness
for a particular purpose as to any known defect or to disclaim,
exclude, or modify the buyer's remedies for breach of those warranties
as to any known defect.
(b) The parties may agree as provided in RCW 62A.2-316 that the
buyer disclaims the warranties of merchantability or fitness of
purpose, or both, regarding any existing, known defect that the vehicle
dealer has disclosed to the buyer in writing prior to the buyer signing
any contract or agreement to purchase the vehicle. It is the vehicle
dealer's burden to prove that the buyer purchased the vehicle with
actual knowledge of the defect and agreed to accept the vehicle in that
condition.
(c) If the buyer discovers an undisclosed defect in any component
part within one hundred eighty days of purchase, the buyer may choose
to void the transaction or seek any other appropriate remedy under this
chapter or any other applicable chapter, provided that the undisclosed
defect existed at the time of purchase and was known to the vehicle
dealer and the buyer contacts the vehicle dealer within thirty days of
the buyer's discovery of the defect. It is the vehicle dealer's burden
to prove that the defect was not known or did not exist at the time of
sale.
(18) To offer for sale any used vehicle without first conducting a
reasonably thorough inspection of the soundness and safety of the used
vehicle's component parts or sell or transfer any used vehicle without
first disclosing in clear and conspicuous writing the existence of any
known defect to the buyer or transferee.
(19) To misrepresent the condition of a motor vehicle.
(20) To state directly or by implication that a used motor vehicle,
or any component part of the used motor vehicle, is free from defect at
the time of sale, unless the vehicle dealer has a reasonable basis for
making such statement or implication.
(21) To fail to comply with the requirements of section 4 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
vehicle dealer that primarily negotiates a vehicle purchase in any
language other than English shall deliver to the buyer a translation,
written in the language in which the deal was negotiated, of any
document material to the purchase, including any written contract,
written purchase order or an agreement, retail installment sales
agreement, note and security agreement, and any disclosures required by
state or federal law before any such document is executed or agreed to
by the buyer or an agreement is reached between the parties. The
vehicle dealer shall ensure that the buyer sign each translation if the
buyer is also required to sign the English language version of the
translated document.
(2) Any vehicle dealer that primarily negotiates a vehicle purchase
in any language other than English shall conspicuously display a
written notice in that language at the time and place where the used
vehicle purchase was negotiated. The notice must state that the
vehicle dealer is required to provide a translation of all documents
material to the purchase, including any sales contract, retail
installment contract, documents related to financing a used vehicle
purchase, and any disclosures required by state or federal law before
the parties reach a final agreement on the vehicle transaction in the
language in which the purchase was negotiated.
(3) A translation under this section may retain the following
elements of the executed English language contract or agreement without
translation: Names and titles of individuals and other persons;
addresses; brand names; trade names; trademarks; registered service
marks; full or abbreviated designations of the make and model of goods
or services; alphanumeric codes; numerals; dollar amounts expressed in
numerals; dates; and individual words or expressions having no
generally accepted non-English translation.
(4) The terms of the documents that are executed in the English
language determine the rights and obligations of the parties. However,
the translation of the documents required under subsection (1) of this
section are admissible in evidence to show that no contract was entered
into because of a difference in the material terms and conditions of
the English language documents and the translations.

--- END ---