BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.200 and 2008 c 113 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When premises are rented for an indefinite time, with
monthly or other periodic rent reserved, such tenancy shall be
construed to be a tenancy from month to month, or from period to period
on which rent is payable, and ((shall be terminated by written notice
of twenty days or more, preceding the end of any of the months or
periods of tenancy, given by either party to the other.
(b))) may not be terminated unless one of the parties gives written
notice to the other party of his or her intention to terminate the
tenancy under this section or as allowed under RCW 59.12.030 (3), (4),
(5), and (7).
(b) A tenant may terminate a rental agreement by written notice of
twenty days or more, preceding the end of any of the months or periods
of tenancy or as otherwise permitted by law or the terms and conditions
of the tenant's rental agreement.
(c) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependant, may terminate a rental agreement with less than twenty days'
notice if the tenant receives reassignment or deployment orders that do
not allow a twenty-day notice.
(d) A landlord who is prohibited by the terms and conditions of the
rental agreement or by federal, state, or local law from evicting the
tenant or terminating the tenancy, except for tenant malfeasance or
other good cause, may terminate a rental agreement by written notice of
twenty days or more specifying the reasons for the termination,
preceding the end of any of the months or periods of tenancy.
(2)(a) Whenever a landlord plans to terminate a rental agreement
without cause and the tenant has occupied the dwelling unit for less
than twelve months, the landlord may terminate a rental agreement by
written notice of thirty days or more, preceding the end of any of the
months or periods of tenancy. Whenever a landlord plans to terminate
a rental agreement without cause and the tenant has occupied the
dwelling unit for twelve months or more, the landlord shall give a
written notice to a tenant at least sixty days preceding the end of any
of the months or periods of tenancy.
(b) Whenever a landlord plans to change to a policy of excluding
children, the landlord shall give a written notice to a tenant at least
ninety days before termination of the tenancy to effectuate such change
in policy. Such ninety-day notice shall be in lieu of the notice
required by subsection (1)(a) of this section. However, if after
giving the ninety-day notice the change in policy is delayed, the
notice requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section shall apply
unless waived by the tenant.
(((b))) (c) Whenever a landlord plans to change any apartment or
apartments to a condominium form of ownership, the landlord shall
provide a written notice to a tenant at least one hundred twenty days
before termination of the tenancy, in compliance with RCW 64.34.440(1),
to effectuate such change. The one hundred twenty-day notice is in
lieu of the notice required in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
However, if after providing the one hundred twenty-day notice the
change to a condominium form of ownership is delayed, the notice
requirements in subsection (1)(a) of this section apply unless waived
by the tenant.

--- END ---