BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2006 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection((s)) (3)
((and (4))) of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy
percentage as defined in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year ((2005)) 2010
and thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations
in (a) through (((c))) (e) of this subsection received by the district
for the prior school year and the amounts determined under this
subsection (((4) of this section)), including allocations for
compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by
the percent increase per full-time equivalent student as stated in the
state basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget
between the prior school year and the current school year and divided
by fifty-five percent. A district's levy base shall not include local
school district property tax levies or other local revenues, or state
and federal allocations not identified in (a) through (((c))) (e) of
this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; ((and))
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes((.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2011, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a)));
(d) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year ((had RCW 84.52.068 not been
amended by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.)) using the
Initiative 728 base and the allocation the district received in the
current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068((. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added to
a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(a) by any
additional per student allocations included in a district's levy base
pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people subsequent to
June 10, 2004)); and
(((b))) (e) The difference between the allocations the district
would have received the prior school year ((had RCW 28A.400.205 not
been amended by chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.)) using the
Initiative 732 base and the allocations the district actually received
the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205. ((The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added to
a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) by any
additional salary increase allocations included in a district's levy
base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people
subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5))) (4) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((6))) (5) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((6))) (5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsection((s)) (3) ((and (4))) of this section: (a) That are not
attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or
inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically
identified as levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy
reduction funds are dependent on formula factors which would not be
finalized until after the start of the current school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the total amount of
levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in place of
current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.
(((7) For the purposes of this section,)) (6) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(((8) For the purposes of this section,)) (b) "Current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 base" means the allocation to the student
achievement fund for the prior year that would have been made under
chapter 3, Laws of 2001, as approved by the voters, if all annual
adjustments to the initial 2001 allocation had been made in previous
years and in each subsequent year as provided for under chapter 3, Laws
of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's annual salary
cost-of-living increases as they would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, as approved by the voters, if each annual
cost-of-living increase had been made in previous years and in each
subsequent year as provided for under chapter 4, Laws of 2001.
(((9))) (7) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((10))) (8) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules ((and regulations)) and inform school districts of the pertinent
data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that school districts request voter
approval for two-year through four-year levies based on their projected
levy capacities at the time that the levies are submitted to the
voters. It is the intent of the legislature to permit school districts
with voter-approved maintenance and operation levies to seek an
additional approval from the voters, if subsequently enacted
legislation would permit a higher levy.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.053 and 2007 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner
and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such
taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the
case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for
maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities,
which includes the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2)(f), in the year in
which the first annual levy is made.
(2) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance
and operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no
further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of
the district for that period may be authorized, except for additional
levies to provide for subsequently enacted increases affecting the
district's levy base or maximum levy percentage. For the purpose of
applying the limitation of this subsection, a two-year through six-year
levy to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
school facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for maintenance
and operation support of a school district.
(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by
the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication
in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections,
at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2004 c 21 s 3 (uncodified); and
(2) 2006 c 119 s 3 (uncodified).

--- END ---