BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.101.070 and 2005 c 157 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The moneys shall be distributed to each county determined to be
eligible to receive moneys by the office of public defense as
determined under this section. ((Ninety)) fifty-eight percent of the
funding appropriated shall be designated as "county moneys" and shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) Six percent of the county moneys appropriated shall be
distributed as a base allocation among the eligible counties. A
county's base allocation shall be equal to this six percent divided by
the total number of eligible counties.
(2) Ninety-four percent of the county moneys appropriated shall be
distributed among the eligible counties as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of this amount shall be distributed on a pro rata
basis to each eligible county based upon the population of the county
as a percentage of the total population of all eligible counties; and
(b) Fifty percent of this amount shall be distributed on a pro rata
basis to each eligible county based upon the annual number of criminal
cases filed in the county superior court as a percentage of the total
annual number of criminal cases filed in the superior courts of all
eligible counties.
(3) Under this section:
(a) The population of the county is the most recent number
determined by the office of financial management;
(b) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court is determined by the most recent annual report of the
courts of Washington, as published by the office of the administrator
for the courts;
(c) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 2005-2007 biennium shall be based on 2004 figures for the annual number of
criminal cases that are filed as described under (b) of this
subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (b) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.101.080 and 2007 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The moneys under RCW 10.101.050 shall be distributed to each city
determined to be eligible under this section by the office of public
defense. ((Ten)) Forty-two percent of the funding appropriated shall
be designated as "city moneys" and distributed as follows:
(1) The office of public defense shall administer a grant program
to select the cities eligible to receive city moneys. Incorporated
cities may apply for grants. Applying cities must conform to the
requirements of RCW 10.101.050 and 10.101.060.
(2) City moneys shall be distributed in a timely manner to
accomplish the goals of the grants.
(3) Criteria for award of grants shall be established by the office
of public defense after soliciting input from the association of
Washington cities. Award of the grants shall be determined by the
office of public defense.

--- END ---