BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.801 and 2007 c 291 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative youth advisory council is established to
examine issues of importance to youth, including but not limited to
education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in
state and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance
abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty,
homelessness, and youth access to services on a statewide and municipal
basis.
(2) The council consists of twenty-two members as provided in this
subsection who, at the time of appointment, are aged fourteen to
eighteen. The council shall select a chair from among its members.
(3) Except for initial members, members shall serve two-year terms,
and if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.
One-half of the initial members shall be appointed to one-year terms,
and these appointments shall be made in such a way as to preserve
overall representation on the committee.
(4)(a) By July 2, 2007, and annually thereafter, students may apply
to be considered for participation in the program by completing an
online application form and submitting the application to the
legislative youth advisory council. The council may develop selection
criteria and an application review process. The council shall
recommend candidates whose names will be submitted to the office of the
lieutenant governor for final selection. The office of the lieutenant
governor shall notify all applicants of the final selections.
(b) The office of the lieutenant governor shall make the
application available on the lieutenant governor's web site.
(5) The council shall have the following duties:
(a) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation,
including state budget expenditures and policy matters relating to
youth;
(b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study
commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to
youth;
(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding
leadership, government, and the legislature;
(d) Accepting and soliciting for grants and donations from public
and private sources to support the activities of the council; and
(e) Reporting annually by December 1st to the legislature on its
activities, including proposed legislation that implements
recommendations of the council.
(6) In carrying out its duties under this section, the council may
meet at least three times but not more than six times per year. The
council shall consider conducting at least some of the meetings via the
K-20 telecommunications network. ((Councils are)) The council is
encouraged to invite local state legislators to participate in the
meetings. The council is encouraged to poll other students in order to
get a broad perspective on the various issues. The council is
encouraged to use technology to conduct the polling, including the
council's web site, if the council has a web site.
(7) Members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(8) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall
provide administration, coordination, and facilitation assistance to
the council. The senate and house of representatives may provide
policy and fiscal briefings and assistance with drafting proposed
legislation. The senate and the house of representatives shall each
develop internal policies relating to staff assistance provided to the
council. Such policies may include applicable internal personnel and
practices guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement
guidelines, and applicable ethics mandates. Provision of funds,
resources, and staff, as well as the assignment and direction of staff,
remains at all times within the sole discretion of the chamber making
the provision.
(9) The office of the lieutenant governor, the office of (([the]))
the superintendent of public instruction, the legislature, any agency
of the legislature, and any official or employee of such office or
agency are immune from liability for any injury that is incurred by or
caused by a member of the youth advisory council and that occurs while
the member of the council is performing duties of the council or is
otherwise engaged in activities or receiving services for which
reimbursement is allowed under subsection (7) of this section. The
immunity provided by this subsection does not apply to an injury
intentionally caused by the act or omission of an employee or official
of the superintendent of public instruction or the legislature or any
agency of the legislature.
(((10) This section expires June 30, 2009.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---