BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
Sec. 101 RCW 42.17.360 and 1973 c 1 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Develop and provide forms for the reports and statements
required to be made under ((this)) chapters 42.17, 42.30, and 42.56
RCW;
(2) Prepare and publish a manual setting forth recommended uniform
methods of bookkeeping and reporting for use by persons required to
make reports and statements under ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW;
(3) Compile and maintain a current list of all filed reports and
statements;
(4) Investigate whether properly completed statements and reports
have been filed within the times required by ((this)) chapter 42.17
RCW;
(5) Upon complaint or upon its own motion, investigate and report
apparent violations of this chapter to the appropriate law enforcement
authorities;
(6) Prepare and publish an annual report to the governor as to the
effectiveness of ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW and its enforcement by
appropriate law enforcement authorities; ((and))
(7) Enforce ((this)) chapters 42.17, 42.30, and 42.56 RCW according
to the powers granted it by law;
(8) Investigate, review, and adjudicate complaints alleging
violations of chapters 42.56 and 42.30 RCW;
(9) Issue interpretative opinions of chapters 42.30 and 42.56 RCW;
and
(10) Provide confidential consultation regarding the duties under
chapters 42.30 and 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 102 RCW 42.17.365 and 1999 c 401 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall conduct a sufficient number of audits and
field investigations so as to provide a statistically valid finding
regarding the degree of compliance with the provisions of ((this))
chapter 42.17 RCW by all required filers. Any documents, records,
reports, computer files, papers, or materials provided to the
commission for use in conducting audits and investigations must be
returned to the candidate, campaign, or political committee from which
they were received within one week of the commission's completion of an
audit or field investigation.

Sec. 103 RCW 42.17.367 and 1999 c 401 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
By February 1, 2000, the commission shall operate a web site or
contract for the operation of a web site that allows access to reports,
copies of reports, or copies of data and information submitted in
reports, filed with the commission under RCW 42.17.040, 42.17.065,
42.17.080, 42.17.100, and 42.17.105. By January 1, 2001, the web site
shall allow access to reports, copies of reports, or copies of data and
information submitted in reports, filed with the commission under RCW
42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, and 42.17.180. In addition, the
commission shall attempt to make available via the web site other
public records submitted to or generated by the commission that are
required by ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW to be available for public use
or inspection.

Sec. 104 RCW 42.17.369 and 2000 c 237 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 1999, the commission shall make available to
candidates, public officials, and political committees that are
required to file reports under ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW an electronic
filing alternative for submitting financial affairs reports,
contribution reports, and expenditure reports, including but not
limited to filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or the internet.
(2) By January 1, 2002, the commission shall make available to
lobbyists and lobbyists' employers required to file reports under RCW
42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, or 42.17.180 an electronic filing
alternative for submitting these reports including but not limited to
filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or the internet.
(3) The commission shall make available to candidates, public
officials, political committees, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers an
electronic copy of the appropriate reporting forms at no charge.

Sec. 105 RCW 42.17.3691 and 2000 c 237 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2002, each candidate or political
committee that expended twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
preceding year or expects to expend twenty-five thousand dollars or
more in the current year shall file all contribution reports and
expenditure reports required by ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW by the
electronic alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369
(as recodified by this act). The commission may make exceptions on a
case-by-case basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack the
technological ability to file reports using the electronic alternative
provided by the commission.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2004, each candidate or political
committee that expended ten thousand dollars or more in the preceding
year or expects to expend ten thousand dollars or more in the current
year shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports
required by ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW by the electronic alternative
provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369 (as recodified by this
act). The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for
candidates whose authorized committees lack the technological ability
to file reports using the electronic alternative provided by the
commission.
(3) Failure by a candidate or political committee to comply with
this section is a violation of this chapter.

Sec. 106 RCW 42.17.370 and 1995 c 397 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission is empowered to:
(1) Adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable administrative
rules to carry out the policies and purposes of ((this)) chapter 42.17
RCW, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule
relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related forms
that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election
year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general
election in that year;
(2) Appoint and set, within the limits established by the committee
on agency officials' salaries under RCW 43.03.028, the compensation of
an executive director who shall perform such duties and have such
powers as the commission may prescribe and delegate to implement and
enforce ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW efficiently and effectively. The
commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind
rules nor shall it delegate authority to determine whether an actual
violation of ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW has occurred or to assess
penalties for such violations;
(3) Prepare and publish such reports and technical studies as in
its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of ((this)) chapter
42.17 RCW, including reports and statistics concerning campaign
financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and
enforcement of this chapter;
(4) Make from time to time, on its own motion, audits and field
investigations;
(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to
determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions
to be considered, and the results thereof;
(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel
attendance, take evidence and require the production of any books,
papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other records relevant or
material for the purpose of any investigation authorized under ((this))
chapter 42.17 RCW, or any other proceeding under ((this)) chapter 42.17
RCW;
(7) Adopt and promulgate a code of fair campaign practices;
(8) Relieve, by rule, candidates or political committees of
obligations to comply with the provisions of ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW
relating to election campaigns, if they have not received contributions
nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of more
than one thousand dollars;
(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping
accounts of and reporting on a quarterly basis costs incurred by state
agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and political
subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing legislative
information. The term "legislative information," for the purposes of
this subsection, means books, pamphlets, reports, and other materials
prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a substantial
purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of
each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts,
and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and
recommendations in his or her examination reports concerning those
agencies;
(10) After hearing, by order approved and ratified by a majority of
the membership of the commission, suspend, or modify any of the
reporting requirements of ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW in a particular
case if it finds that literal application of ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW
works a manifestly unreasonable hardship and if it also finds that the
suspension or modification will not frustrate the purposes of the
chapter. The commission shall find that a manifestly unreasonable
hardship exists if reporting the name of an entity required to be
reported under RCW 42.17.241(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to adversely
affect the competitive position of any entity in which the person
filing the report or any member of his or her immediate family holds
any office, directorship, general partnership interest, or an ownership
interest of ten percent or more. Any suspension or modification shall
be only to the extent necessary to substantially relieve the hardship.
The commission shall act to suspend or modify any reporting
requirements only if it determines that facts exist that are clear and
convincing proof of the findings required under this section. Requests
for renewals of reporting modifications may be heard in a brief
adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494
and in accordance with the standards established in this section. No
initial request may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding and no
request for renewal may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if
the initial request was granted more than three years previously or if
the applicant is holding an office or position of employment different
from the office or position held when the initial request was granted.
The commission shall adopt administrative rules governing the
proceedings. Any citizen has standing to bring an action in Thurston
county superior court to contest the propriety of any order entered
under this section within one year from the date of the entry of the
order; and
(11) Revise, at least once every five years but no more often than
every two years, the monetary reporting thresholds and reporting code
values of ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW. The revisions shall be only for
the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by an
inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management.
The revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period
commencing with the month of December preceding the last revision and
concluding with the month of December preceding the month the revision
is adopted. As to each of the three general categories of this chapter
(reports of campaign finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and reports
of the financial affairs of elected and appointed officials), the
revisions shall equally affect all thresholds within each category.
Revisions shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05 RCW. The first
revision authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic changes
from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the
respective code or threshold through December 1985;
(12) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of
reports required under ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW which are transmitted
by facsimile or electronically to the commission. Implementation of
the program is contingent on the availability of funds.

Sec. 107 RCW 42.17.375 and 1983 c 294 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
With regard to the reports required by ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW
to be filed with a county auditor or county elections official, the
commission shall adopt rules governing the arrangement, handling,
indexing, and disclosing of those reports by the county auditor or
county elections official. The rules shall ensure ease of access by
the public to the reports and shall include, but not be limited to,
requirements for indexing the reports by the names of candidates or
political committees and by the ballot proposition for or against which
a political committee is receiving contributions or making
expenditures.

Sec. 108 RCW 42.17.380 and 1982 c 35 s 196 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the secretary of state shall be designated as a
place where the public may file papers or correspond with the
commission and receive any form or instruction from the commission.
(2) The attorney general, through his or her office, shall supply
such assistance as the commission may require in order to carry out its
responsibilities under ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW. The commission may
employ attorneys who are neither the attorney general nor an assistant
attorney general to carry out any function of the attorney general
prescribed in ((this)) chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 109 RCW 42.30.120 and 1985 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each member of the governing body who attends a meeting of such
governing body where action is taken in violation of any provision of
this chapter applicable to him or her, with knowledge of the fact that
the meeting is in violation thereof, shall be subject to personal
liability in the form of a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred
dollars. The civil penalty shall be assessed by a judge of the
superior court and an action to enforce this penalty may be brought by
any person. A violation of this chapter does not constitute a crime
and assessment of the civil penalty by a judge shall not give rise to
any disability or legal disadvantage based on conviction of a criminal
offense.
(2) Any person may file a complaint alleging a violation of this
chapter with the public disclosure commission for investigation and
adjudication pursuant to its powers under chapter 43.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 301 of this act).
(3) Any person who prevails against a public agency in any action
in the courts for a violation of this chapter shall be awarded all
costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in connection
with such legal action. Pursuant to RCW 4.84.185, any public agency
((who)) that prevails in any action in the courts for a violation of
this chapter may be awarded reasonable expenses and attorneys' fees
upon final judgment and written findings by the trial judge that the
action was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 A new section is added to chapter 42.56
RCW to read as follows:
Whenever a state or local agency concludes that a public record is
exempt from disclosure and denies a person opportunity to inspect or
copy a public record for that reason, the person may file a complaint
with the public disclosure commission. The public disclosure
commission shall investigate and adjudicate the complaint pursuant to
its powers under chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
301 of this act).

PART II
STATUTORY REFERENCES
Sec. 201 RCW 18.25.210 and 2008 c 134 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission may conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. If the commission intends to
conduct a pilot project, it must provide a notice in writing to the
secretary by June 1, 2008. If the commission chooses to conduct a
pilot project, the pilot project shall begin on July 1, 2008, and
conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 and 42.17.370 (as recodified by this
act); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to chiropractors licensed under this chapter;
and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.79.390, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 202 RCW 18.32.765 and 2008 c 134 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission may conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. If the commission intends to
conduct a pilot project, it must provide a notice in writing to the
secretary by June 1, 2008. If the commission chooses to conduct a
pilot project, the pilot project shall begin on July 1, 2008, and
conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 and 42.17.370 (as recodified by this
act); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to its professions, dentists licensed under this
chapter and expanded function dental auxiliaries and dental assistants
regulated under chapter 18.260 RCW; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.79.390, and 18.25.210, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 203 RCW 18.71.430 and 2008 c 134 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. The pilot project shall begin on
July 1, 2008, and conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 and 42.17.370 (as recodified by this
act); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to its professions, physicians regulated under
this chapter and physician assistants regulated under chapter 18.71A
RCW; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.79.390, 18.25.210, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 204 RCW 18.79.390 and 2008 c 134 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. The pilot project shall begin on
July 1, 2008, and conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 and 42.17.370 (as recodified by this
act); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to advanced registered nurses, registered
nurses, and licensed practical nurses regulated under this chapter; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.25.210, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 205 RCW 29A.04.225 and 2005 c 274 s 248 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county auditor or county elections official shall ensure that
reports filed pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW are arranged, handled,
indexed, and disclosed in a manner consistent with the rules of the
public disclosure commission adopted under RCW 42.17.375 (as recodified
by this act).

Sec. 206 RCW 42.17.020 and 2008 c 6 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350
(as recodified by this act).
(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17.040; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(15)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as
long as he or she has no authority to authorize expenditures or make
decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of January after the date of the last previous general election for the
office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the
next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st
after the special election.
(20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or
satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic partner,
dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the
household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790,
"immediate family" means an individual's spouse or domestic partner,
and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the
spouse or the domestic partner of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse or domestic
partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person.
(27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an
elected office.
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(30) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(34) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried out as
part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise of
personal judgment or discretion.
(35) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular
election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(36) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(37) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(38) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or opposition
in any election campaign.
(39) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(40) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(41) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county,
city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other
state political subdivision elective office.
(42) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(43) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending
thirty days after the recall election.
(44) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications, independent
expenditures, or political advertising" means the person paying for the
electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political
advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed
by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the
sponsor.
(45) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(46) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(47) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(48) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(49) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 207 RCW 42.17.3691 and 2000 c 237 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2002, each candidate or political
committee that expended twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
preceding year or expects to expend twenty-five thousand dollars or
more in the current year shall file all contribution reports and
expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369 (as
recodified by this act). The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack the
technological ability to file reports using the electronic alternative
provided by the commission.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2004, each candidate or political
committee that expended ten thousand dollars or more in the preceding
year or expects to expend ten thousand dollars or more in the current
year shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports
required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the
commission under RCW 42.17.369 (as recodified by this act). The
commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates
whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file
reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.
(3) Failure by a candidate or political committee to comply with
this section is a violation of this chapter.

Sec. 208 RCW 42.17.395 and 2006 c 315 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission may (a) determine whether an actual violation of
this chapter has occurred; and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate
order following such determination.
(2) The commission, in cases where it chooses to determine whether
an actual violation has occurred, shall hold a hearing pursuant to the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to make such
determination. Any order that the commission issues under this section
shall be pursuant to such hearing.
(3) In lieu of holding a hearing or issuing an order under this
section, the commission may refer the matter to the attorney general or
other enforcement agency as provided in RCW 42.17.360 (as recodified by
this act).
(4) The person against whom an order is directed under this section
shall be designated as the respondent. The order may require the
respondent to cease and desist from the activity that constitutes a
violation and in addition, or alternatively, may impose one or more of
the remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390 (2) through (5). No individual
penalty assessed by the commission may exceed one thousand seven
hundred dollars, and in any case where multiple violations are involved
in a single complaint or hearing, the maximum aggregate penalty may not
exceed four thousand two hundred dollars.
(5) An order issued by the commission under this section shall be
subject to judicial review under the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW. If the commission's order is not satisfied and no
petition for review is filed within thirty days as provided in RCW
34.05.542, the commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review could be
filed under that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in
connection with the commission's petition shall be in accordance with
RCW 42.17.397.

Sec. 209 RCW 42.17.647 and 2006 c 348 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall adopt rules to carry out the policies of
chapter 348, Laws of 2006 and is not subject to the time restrictions
of RCW 42.17.370(1) (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 210 RCW 42.17.660 and 2005 c 445 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A contribution by a political committee with funds that have
all been contributed by one person who exercises exclusive control over
the distribution of the funds of the political committee is a
contribution by the controlling person.
(2) Two or more entities are treated as a single entity if one of
the two or more entities is a subsidiary, branch, or department of a
corporation that is participating in an election campaign or making
contributions, or a local unit or branch of a trade association, labor
union, or collective bargaining association that is participating in an
election campaign or making contributions. All contributions made by
a person or political committee whose contribution or expenditure
activity is financed, maintained, or controlled by a trade association,
labor union, collective bargaining organization, or the local unit of
a trade association, labor union, or collective bargaining organization
are considered made by the trade association, labor union, collective
bargaining organization, or local unit of a trade association, labor
union, or collective bargaining organization.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out this section and
is not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 42.17.370(1) (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 211 RCW 42.17.690 and 1993 c 2 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the beginning of each even-numbered calendar year, the
commission shall increase or decrease all dollar amounts in this
chapter based on changes in economic conditions as reflected in the
inflationary index used by the commission under RCW 42.17.370 (as
recodified by this act). The new dollar amounts established by the
commission under this section shall be rounded off by the commission to
amounts as judged most convenient for public understanding and so as to
be within ten percent of the target amount equal to the base amount
provided in this chapter multiplied by the increase in the inflationary
index since December 3, 1992.

Sec. 212 RCW 43.70.695 and 2006 c 236 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with the workforce training
and education coordinating board, shall distribute survey questions for
the purpose of gathering data related to workforce supply and
demographics to all health care providers who hold a license to
practice a health profession. The department shall adopt a schedule
for distributing surveys by profession so that each profession is
surveyed every two years. In developing the survey, the department
shall seek advice from researchers that are likely to use the survey
data.
(2)(a) At a minimum, the survey shall include questions related to
understanding the following characteristics of individuals in the
health care workforce:
(i) Specialty;
(ii) Birthdate and gender;
(iii) Race and ethnicity;
(iv) Hours in practice per week;
(v) Practice statistics, including hours spent in direct patient
care;
(vi) Zip codes of the location where the provider practices;
(vii) Years in practice, years in practice in Washington, location
and years in practice in other jurisdictions;
(viii) Education and training background, including the location
and types of education and training received; and
(ix) Type of facilities where the provider practices.
(b) The department may approve proposals for the distribution of
surveys containing additional data elements to selected health care
professions if it determines that there is a legitimate research
interest in obtaining the information, the additional burden on members
of the health care profession is not unreasonable, the effect on survey
response rates is not unreasonable, and there are funds available. The
department may accept funds through contracts, grants, donations, or
other forms of contributions to support more detailed surveys.
(3) The department must make a public data set available that meets
the confidentiality requirements of subsection (5) of this section.
The department may respond to requests for data and other information
from the registry for special studies and analysis pursuant to a data-sharing agreement. Any use of the data by the requestor must comply
with the confidentiality requirements of subsection (5) of this
section. The department may require requestors to pay any or all of
the reasonable costs associated with such requests that may be
approved.
(4) The failure to complete or return the survey may not be grounds
to withhold, fail to renew, or revoke a license or to impose any other
disciplinary sanctions against a credentialed health care provider.
(5) The department must process the surveys that it receives in
such a way that the identity of individual providers remains
confidential. Data elements related to the identification of
individual providers are confidential and are exempt from RCW 42.56.040
through 42.56.570 and 42.17.350 (as recodified by this act) through
42.17.450, except as provided in a data-sharing agreement approved by
the department pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(6) By July 1, 2009, the department shall provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of using
a survey to obtain information on the supply of health care
professionals, the distribution and use of the information obtained by
the surveys by employers and health professions education and training
programs(([,])), and the extent to which the surveys have alleviated
identified shortages of trained health care providers.

Sec. 213 RCW 43.370.050 and 2007 c 259 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office may respond to requests for data and other
information from its computerized system for special studies and
analysis consistent with requirements for confidentiality of patient,
provider, and facility-specific records. The office may require
requestors to pay any or all of the reasonable costs associated with
such requests that might be approved.
(2) Data elements related to the identification of individual
patient's, provider's, and facility's care outcomes are confidential,
are exempt from RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.570 and 42.17.350 (as
recodified by this act) through 42.17.450, and are not subject to
discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence.

Sec. 214 RCW 70.168.090 and 2005 c 274 s 344 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1991, the department shall establish a statewide data
registry to collect and analyze data on the incidence, severity, and
causes of trauma, including traumatic brain injury. The department
shall collect additional data on traumatic brain injury should
additional data requirements be enacted by the legislature. The
registry shall be used to improve the availability and delivery of
prehospital and hospital trauma care services. Specific data elements
of the registry shall be defined by rule by the department. To the
extent possible, the department shall coordinate data collection from
hospitals for the trauma registry with the health care data system
authorized in chapter 70.170 RCW. Every hospital, facility, or health
care provider authorized to provide level I, II, III, IV, or V trauma
care services, level I, II, or III pediatric trauma care services,
level I, level I-pediatric, II, or III trauma-related rehabilitative
services, and prehospital trauma-related services in the state shall
furnish data to the registry. All other hospitals and prehospital
providers shall furnish trauma data as required by the department by
rule.
The department may respond to requests for data and other
information from the registry for special studies and analysis
consistent with requirements for confidentiality of patient and quality
assurance records. The department may require requestors to pay any or
all of the reasonable costs associated with such requests that might be
approved.
(2) By January 1994, in each emergency medical services and trauma
care planning and service region, a regional emergency medical services
and trauma care systems quality assurance program shall be established
by those facilities authorized to provide levels I, II, and III trauma
care services. The systems quality assurance program shall evaluate
trauma care delivery, patient care outcomes, and compliance with the
requirements of this chapter. The emergency medical services medical
program director and all other health care providers and facilities who
provide trauma care services within the region shall be invited to
participate in the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
quality assurance program.
(3) Data elements related to the identification of individual
patient's, provider's and facility's care outcomes shall be
confidential, shall be exempt from RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.570 and
42.17.350 (as recodified by this act) through 42.17.450, and shall not
be subject to discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence.
(4) Patient care quality assurance proceedings, records, and
reports developed pursuant to this section are confidential, exempt
from chapter 42.56 RCW, and are not subject to discovery by subpoena or
admissible as evidence. In any civil action, except, after in camera
review, pursuant to a court order which provides for the protection of
sensitive information of interested parties including the department:
(a) In actions arising out of the department's designation of a
hospital or health care facility pursuant to RCW 70.168.070; (b) in
actions arising out of the department's revocation or suspension of
designation status of a hospital or health care facility under RCW
70.168.070; or (c) in actions arising out of the restriction or
revocation of the clinical or staff privileges of a health care
provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2), subject to any further
restrictions on disclosure in RCW 4.24.250 that may apply. Information
that identifies individual patients shall not be publicly disclosed
without the patient's consent.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The following sections are recodified in
the following order in a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.
RCW 42.17.350
RCW 42.17.360
RCW 42.17.362
RCW 42.17.365
RCW 42.17.367
RCW 42.17.369
RCW 42.17.3691
RCW 42.17.370
RCW 42.17.375
RCW 42.17.380

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Section 212 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

--- END ---