BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2008 c 231 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, a sentence within
the standard sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, relating to community custody;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(v) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative;
(viii) RCW ((9.94A.712)) 9.94A.507, relating to certain sex
offenses;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(x) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.603, relating to felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and felony physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.702 not
to exceed one year; and/or other legal financial obligations. The
court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of
confinement and a community custody term under RCW 9.94A.701 if the
court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in
RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community custody that exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2008 c 231 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. ((If the sentencing court
determines that the offender is eligible for this alternative, the
court may order an examination of the offender. The examination shall,
at a minimum, address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report,)) (3) If the
sentencing court determines that the offender is eligible for this
alternative and that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the
court shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence
range and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based
alternative under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section or a
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under
subsection (((6))) (5) of this section. If the court is considering
the residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under
subsection (5) of this section, then the court may order an examination
of the offender as described in subsection (5) of this section. The
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative is only
available if the midpoint of the standard range is twenty-four months
or less.
(((5))) (4) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months,
whichever is greater. During incarceration in the state facility,
offenders sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive
substance abuse assessment and receive, within available resources,
treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment
services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation
with the department of corrections;
(b) ((The remainder of)) One-half the midpoint of the standard
range as a term of community custody which must include appropriate
substance abuse treatment in a program that has been approved by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services. If the department finds that conditions of community
custody have been willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified
to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender
who fails to complete the program or who is administratively terminated
from the program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of
his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 to be
imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the
special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(((6))) (5)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence
under the residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
in this subsection, then the court may order an examination of the
offender. The examination shall, at a minimum, address the following
issues:
(i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(iii) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(iv) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(b) The examination report must also contain:
(i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(c) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(((a))) (i) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the
midpoint of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is
greater, conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in
residential chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter
70.96A RCW for a period set by the court between three and six months.
If the court imposes a term of community custody, the department shall,
within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and
treatment services available to the offender during the term of
community custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community
custody, treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under
(b) of this subsection (((3)(b) of this section)). The department may
impose conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.633,
9.94A.703, 9.94A.704, 9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. If the court imposes
a sentence under this subsection, then the treatment provider must send
the treatment plan to the court within thirty days of the offender's
arrival to the residential chemical dependency treatment program. The
court shall schedule a progress hearing during the period of
residential chemical dependency treatment, and schedule a treatment
termination hearing for three months before the expiration of the term
of community custody;
(((b))) (ii) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination
hearing, the treatment provider and the department shall submit written
reports to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance
with treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations
regarding termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(((i))) (A) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's
community custody status on the expiration date determined under
(((a))) (c)(i) of this subsection; or
(((ii))) (B) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration
date of community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(((iii))) (C) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half
the midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.701;
(((c))) (iii) If the court imposes a term of total confinement
under (((b)(iii))) (c)(ii)(C) of this subsection, the department shall,
within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and
treatment services available to the offender during the terms of total
confinement and community custody.
(((7))) (6) The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per
month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring for
alcohol or controlled substances.
(((8))) (7) The court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations; or
(b) Perform community restitution work.
(((9))) (8)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under
this section back into court at any time on its own initiative to
evaluate the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any
violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c)
of this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the
offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(((10))) (9) In serving a term of community custody imposed upon
failure to complete, or administrative termination from, the special
drug offender sentencing alternative program, the offender shall
receive no credit for time served in community custody prior to
termination of the offender's participation in the program.
(((11))) (10) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based
alternative under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section is found by
the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by the
offender, and, if the department finds that the offender is subject to
a valid deportation order, the department may administratively
terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the offender to
serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.
(((12))) (11) An offender sentenced under this section shall be
subject to all rules relating to earned release time with respect to
any period served in total confinement.
(((13))) (12) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans
under ((subsections (2) and (3) of)) this section may be paid, at the
option of the county, from funds provided to the county from the
criminal justice treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---