BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Concurrent with the federal safe, accountable, flexible, efficient
transportation equity act of 2005, a safe routes to school program is
established within the department. The purpose of the program is to:
(1) Enable and encourage children, including those with
disabilities, to walk and bicycle to school;
(2) Make bicycling and walking to school a safer and more appealing
transportation alternative, encouraging a healthy and active lifestyle
from an early age; and
(3) Facilitate the planning, development, and implementation of
projects and activities that will improve safety and reduce traffic,
fuel consumption, and air pollution in the vicinity of schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall administer a competitive grant program for the
safe routes to school program established under section 1 of this act.
The following guidelines apply for the grant program:
(1)(a) The grant application process must include questions that
assess the possible eligibility of a disadvantaged school. Primary
variables that may define a disadvantaged school include:
(i) Exceeds the state median in the school's proportion of free and
reduced-price meals;
(ii) Falls below the state median in the school's student scores on
the Washington assessment of student learning; or
(iii) Past history of traffic collisions in and around the school's
area.
(b) Grants awarded to disadvantaged schools must constitute at
least fifty percent of the number of grants awarded.
(2) The department shall use grant funds to award noninfrastructure
grants, which emphasize education, encouragement, and enforcement
efforts, only if the grant applicant can establish that the current
engineered infrastructure of the school provides adequate safe walking
and biking routes within the relevant school walk boundary.
Noninfrastructure grants awarded must constitute at least twenty-five
percent of the amount of grants awarded.
(3) The grant application process must include questions that
assess the strength of the relationships between schools, school
districts, and corresponding municipalities.
(4) The department must attempt to make the grant application
process as streamlined as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide information, resources, outreach,
training, and program evaluation support to grantees awarded grants
under the grant program described in section 2 of this act. The
department shall contract with a nonprofit or a consortium of
nonprofits that demonstrate an expertise in alternative transportation
programs and policies, including implementation of the safe routes to
school program.
(2) The department shall coordinate evaluation methods and findings
with those of the national center for safe routes to school in order to
standardize program evaluation, measure Washington's progress to that
of other states, and learn from safe routes to school programs across
the country. Current measurement criteria from the national center for
safe routes to school include:
(a) Number of children who walk and bike to school;
(b) Number of children bused to school;
(c) Reduced number of car trips to and from school;
(d) Awareness of the program; and
(e) Parent acceptance/attitude towards biking and walking.
(3) Additional indicators that the department may compile and
report upon include:
(a) Personal health - general levels of physical activity, body
weight;
(b) Traffic safety - vehicular crashes, number of traffic calming
or other pedestrian-oriented traffic safety measures installed, number
of miles of sidewalks and bike paths installed;
(c) Environmental health - reduced congestion and pollution,
emissions levels and asthma rates;
(d) Student achievement – absenteeism, tardiness, grades, test
scores; and
(e) Community aspects - leveraged funds from other sources, parent
attitudes toward yellow school bus transportation, public transit to
school, and driving.

--- END ---