BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.19.020 and 1998 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:

ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

KEY: A AGE 0-11 B AGE 12-18

COMBINED

MONTHLY ONE TWO

NET CHILD CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B

((0

100

200

300 For income less than $600 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses of
each household. Minimum support shall not be
less than $25 per child per month except when
allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

400

500

600 133 164 103 127

700 155 191 120 148

800 177 218 137 170

900 199 246 154 191))

For income less than $1000 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses of
each household. Minimum support may not be
less than $50 per child per month except when
allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000 220 272 171 211

1100 242 299 188 232

1200 264 326 205 253

1300 285 352 221 274

1400 307 379 238 294

1500 327 404 254 313

1600 347 428 269 333

1700 367 453 285 352

1800 387 478 300 371

1900 407 503 316 390

2000 427 527 331 409

2100 447 552 347 429

2200 467 577 362 448

2300 487 601 378 467

2400 506 626 393 486

2500 526 650 408 505

2600 534 661 416 513

2700 542 670 421 520

2800 549 679 427 527

2900 556 686 431 533

3000 561 693 436 538

3100 566 699 439 543

3200 569 704 442 546

3300 573 708 445 549

3400 574 710 446 551

3500 575 711 447 552

3600 577 712 448 553

3700 578 713 449 554

3800 581 719 452 558

3900 596 736 463 572

4000 609 753 473 584

4100 623 770 484 598

4200 638 788 495 611

4300 651 805 506 625

4400 664 821 516 637

4500 677 836 525 649

4600 689 851 535 661

4700 701 866 545 673

4800 713 882 554 685

4900 726 897 564 697

5000 738 912 574 708

5100 751 928 584 720

5200 763 943 593 732

5300 776 959 602 744

5400 788 974 612 756

5500 800 989 622 768

5600 812 1004 632 779

5700 825 1019 641 791

5800 837 1035 650 803

5900 850 1050 660 815

6000 862 1065 670 827

6100 875 1081 680 839

6200 887 1096 689 851

6300 899 1112 699 863

6400 911 1127 709 875

6500 924 1142 718 887

6600 936 1157 728 899

6700 949 1172 737 911

6800 961 1188 747 923

6900 974 1203 757 935

7000 986 1218 767 946

7100 998 1233 776 958

7200 1009 1248 785 971

7300 1021 1262 794 982

7400 1033 1276 803 993

7500 1044 1290 812 1004

7600 1055 1305 821 1015

7700 1067 1319 830 1026

7800 1078 1333 839 1037

7900 1089 1346 848 1048

8000 1100 1360 857 1059

8100 1112 1374 865 1069

8200 1123 1387 874 1080

8300 1134 1401 882 1091

8400 1144 1414 891 1101

8500 1155 1428 899 1112

8600 1166 1441 908 1122

8700 1177 1454 916 1133

8800 1187 1467 925 1143

8900 1198 1481 933 1153

9000 1208 1493 941 1163

9100 1219 1506 949 1173

9200 1229 1519 957 1183

9300 1239 1532 966 1193

9400 1250 1545 974 1203

9500 1260 1557 982 1213

9600 1270 1570 989 1223

9700 1280 1582 997 1233

9800 1290 1594 1005 1242

9900 1300 1606 1013 1252

10000 1310 1619 1021 1262

10100 1319 1631 1028 1271

10200 1329 1643 1036 1281

10300 1339 1655 1044 1290

10400 1348 1666 1051 1299

10500 1358 1678 1059 1308

10600 1367 1690 1066 1318

10700 1377 1701 1073 1327

10800 1386 1713 1081 1336

10900 1395 1724 1088 1345

11000 1404 1736 1095 1354

11100 1413 1747 1102 1363

11200 1422 1758 1110 1371

11300 1431 1769 1117 1380

11400 1440 1780 1124 1389

11500 1449 1791 1131 1398

11600 1458 1802 1138 1406

11700 1467 1813 1145 1415

11800 1475 1823 1151 1423

11900 1484 1834 1158 1431

12000 1492 1844 1165 1440

COMBINED

MONTHLY THREE FOUR FIVE

NET CHILDREN CHILDREN CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B A B

((0

100

200

300 For income less than $600 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living
expenses of each household. Minimum
support shall not be less than $25 per child
per month except when allowed by RCW
26.19.065(2).

400

500

600 86 106 73 90 63 78

700 100 124 85 105 74 91

800 115 142 97 120 84 104

900 129 159 109 135 95 118))

For income less than $1000 the obligation
is based upon the resources and living
expenses of each household. Minimum
support may not be less than $50 per child
per month except when allowed by RCW
26.19.065(2).

1000 143 177 121 149 105 130

1100 157 194 133 164 116 143

1200 171 211 144 179 126 156

1300 185 228 156 193 136 168

1400 199 246 168 208 147 181

1500 212 262 179 221 156 193

1600 225 278 190 235 166 205

1700 238 294 201 248 175 217

1800 251 310 212 262 185 228

1900 264 326 223 275 194 240

2000 277 342 234 289 204 252

2100 289 358 245 303 213 264

2200 302 374 256 316 223 276

2300 315 390 267 330 233 288

2400 328 406 278 343 242 299

2500 341 421 288 356 251 311

2600 346 428 293 362 256 316

2700 351 435 298 368 259 321

2800 356 440 301 372 262 324

2900 360 445 305 376 266 328

3000 364 449 308 380 268 331

3100 367 453 310 383 270 334

3200 369 457 312 386 272 336

3300 371 459 314 388 273 339

3400 372 460 315 389 274 340

3500 373 461 316 390 275 341

3600 374 462 317 391 276 342

3700 375 463 318 392 277 343

3800 377 466 319 394 278 344

3900 386 477 326 404 284 352

4000 395 488 334 413 291 360

4100 404 500 341 422 298 368

4200 413 511 350 431 305 377

4300 422 522 357 441 311 385

4400 431 532 364 449 317 392

4500 438 542 371 458 323 400

4600 446 552 377 467 329 407

4700 455 562 384 475 335 414

4800 463 572 391 483 341 422

4900 470 581 398 491 347 429

5000 479 592 404 500 353 437

5100 487 602 411 509 359 443

5200 494 611 418 517 365 451

5300 503 621 425 525 371 458

5400 511 632 432 533 377 466

5500 518 641 439 542 383 473

5600 527 651 446 551 389 480

5700 535 661 452 559 395 488

5800 543 671 459 567 401 495

5900 551 681 466 575 407 502

6000 559 691 473 584 413 509

6100 567 701 479 593 418 517

6200 575 710 486 601 424 524

6300 583 721 493 609 430 532

6400 591 731 500 617 436 539

6500 599 740 506 626 442 546

6600 607 750 513 635 448 554

6700 615 761 520 643 454 561

6800 623 770 527 651 460 568

6900 631 780 533 659 466 575

7000 639 790 540 668 472 583

7100 647 800 547 677 478 591

7200 654 809 554 684 484 598

7300 662 818 560 693 490 605

7400 670 828 567 701 496 613

7500 677 837 574 709 502 620

7600 685 846 581 718 507 627

7700 692 855 587 726 513 634

7800 700 865 594 734 519 642

7900 707 874 601 742 525 649

8000 714 883 607 750 531 656

8100 722 892 614 759 536 663

8200 729 901 620 767 542 670

8300 736 910 627 775 548 677

8400 743 919 633 783 553 684

8500 750 928 640 791 559 691

8600 758 936 646 799 565 698

8700 765 945 653 807 570 705

8800 772 954 659 815 576 712

8900 779 962 665 822 582 719

9000 786 971 672 830 587 726

9100 792 980 678 838 593 732

9200 799 988 684 846 598 739

9300 806 996 691 854 604 746

9400 813 1005 697 861 609 753

9500 820 1013 703 869 614 759

9600 826 1021 709 877 620 766

9700 833 1030 716 884 625 773

9800 840 1038 722 892 631 779

9900 846 1046 728 900 636 786

10000 853 1054 734 907 641 793

10100 859 1062 740 915 647 799

10200 866 1070 746 922 652 806

10300 872 1078 752 930 657 812

10400 879 1086 758 937 662 819

10500 885 1094 764 944 668 825

10600 891 1102 770 952 673 832

10700 898 1109 776 959 678 838

10800 904 1117 782 966 683 844

10900 910 1125 788 974 688 851

11000 916 1132 794 981 693 857

11100 922 1140 799 988 698 863

11200 928 1147 805 995 703 869

11300 934 1155 811 1002 708 876

11400 940 1162 817 1009 714 882

11500 946 1170 822 1017 719 888

11600 952 1177 828 1024 723 894

11700 958 1184 834 1031 728 900

11800 964 1191 839 1038 733 906

11900 970 1199 845 1045 738 912

12000 975 1206 851 1051 743 919

The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes
up to and including ((five)) twelve thousand dollars. ((When combined
monthly net income exceeds five thousand dollars, support shall not be
set at an amount lower than the presumptive amount of support set for
combined monthly net incomes of five thousand dollars unless the court
finds a reason to deviate below that amount. The economic table is
advisory but not presumptive for combined monthly net incomes that
exceed five thousand dollars.)) When combined monthly net income
exceeds ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars, the court may ((set support
at an advisory amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes
between five thousand and seven thousand dollars or the court may))
exceed the ((advisory)) presumptive amount of support set for combined
monthly net incomes of ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars upon written
findings of fact.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.19.065 and 1998 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Limit at forty-five percent of a parent's net income. Neither
parent's ((total)) child support obligation owed for all his or her
biological or legal children may exceed forty-five percent of net
income except for good cause shown. ((Good cause includes but is not
limited to possession of substantial wealth, children with day care
expenses, special medical need, educational need, psychological need,
and larger families.))
(a) Each child is entitled to a pro rata share of the income
available for support, but the court only applies the pro rata share to
the children in the case before the court.
(b) Before determining whether to apply the forty-five percent
limitation, the court must consider whether it would be unjust to apply
the limitation after considering the best interests of the child and
the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances include, but are
not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's
household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to
the affected households, assets or liabilities, and any involuntary
limits on either parent's earning capacity including incarceration,
disabilities, or incapacity.
(c) Good cause includes, but is not limited to, possession of
substantial wealth, children with day care expenses, special medical
need, educational need, psychological need, and larger families.
(2) ((Income below six hundred dollars)) Presumptive minimum
support obligation. (a) When ((combined)) a parent's monthly net
income is ((less than six hundred dollars)) below one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty guideline, a support order of not
less than ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars per child per month shall be
entered ((for each parent)) unless the obligor parent establishes that
it would be unjust ((or inappropriate)) to do so in that particular
case. The decision whether there is a sufficient basis to deviate
below the presumptive minimum payment must take into consideration the
best interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such
circumstances can include leaving insufficient funds in the custodial
parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative
hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and earning
capacity. ((A parent's))
(b) The basic support obligation of the parent making the transfer
payment, excluding health care, day care, and special child-rearing
expenses, shall not reduce his or her net income below ((the need
standard for one person established pursuant to RCW 74.04.770)) the
self-support reserve of one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal
poverty level, except for the presumptive minimum payment of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars per child per month or ((in cases where the court
finds reasons for deviation)) when it would be unjust to apply the
self-support reserve limitation after considering the best interests of
the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the
custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child,
comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities,
and earning capacity. This section shall not be construed to require
monthly substantiation of income.
(3) Income above ((five thousand and seven)) twelve thousand
dollars. The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net
incomes up to and including ((five)) twelve thousand dollars. ((When
combined monthly net income exceeds five thousand dollars, support
shall not be set at an amount lower than the presumptive amount of
support set for combined monthly net incomes of five thousand dollars
unless the court finds a reason to deviate below that amount. The
economic table is advisory but not presumptive for combined monthly net
incomes that exceed five thousand dollars.)) When combined monthly net
income exceeds ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars, the court may ((set
support at an advisory amount of support set for combined monthly net
incomes between five thousand and seven thousand dollars or the court
may)) exceed the ((advisory)) presumptive amount of support set for
combined monthly net incomes of ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars upon
written findings of fact.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.19.071 and 2008 c 6 s 1038 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consideration of all income. All income and resources of each
parent's household shall be disclosed and considered by the court when
the court determines the child support obligation of each parent. Only
the income of the parents of the children whose support is at issue
shall be calculated for purposes of calculating the basic support
obligation. Income and resources of any other person shall not be
included in calculating the basic support obligation.
(2) Verification of income. Tax returns for the preceding two
years and current paystubs shall be provided to verify income and
deductions. Other sufficient verification shall be required for income
and deductions which do not appear on tax returns or paystubs.
(3) Income sources included in gross monthly income. Except as
specifically excluded in subsection (4) of this section, monthly gross
income shall include income from any source, including:
(a) Salaries;
(b) Wages;
(c) Commissions;
(d) Deferred compensation;
(e) Overtime, except as excluded for income in subsection (4)(h) of
this section;
(f) Contract-related benefits;
(g) Income from second jobs, except as excluded for income in
subsection (4)(h) of this section;
(h) Dividends;
(i) Interest;
(j) Trust income;
(k) Severance pay;
(l) Annuities;
(m) Capital gains;
(n) Pension retirement benefits;
(o) Workers' compensation;
(p) Unemployment benefits;
(q) Maintenance actually received;
(r) Bonuses;
(s) Social security benefits; ((and))
(t) Disability insurance benefits; and
(u) Income from self-employment, rent, royalties, contracts,
proprietorship of a business, or joint ownership of a partnership or
closely held corporation.
(4) Income sources excluded from gross monthly income. The
following income and resources shall be disclosed but shall not be
included in gross income:
(a) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner or income of
other adults in the household;
(b) Child support received from other relationships;
(c) Gifts and prizes;
(d) Temporary assistance for needy families;
(e) Supplemental security income;
(f) General assistance; ((and))
(g) Food stamps; and
(h) Overtime or income from second jobs beyond forty hours per week
averaged over a twelve-month period worked to provide for a current
family's needs, to retire past relationship debts, or to retire child
support debt, when the court finds the income will cease when the party
has paid off his or her debts.
Receipt of income and resources from temporary assistance for needy
families, supplemental security income, general assistance, and food
stamps shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.
(5) Determination of net income. The following expenses shall be
disclosed and deducted from gross monthly income to calculate net
monthly income:
(a) Federal and state income taxes;
(b) Federal insurance contributions act deductions;
(c) Mandatory pension plan payments;
(d) Mandatory union or professional dues;
(e) State industrial insurance premiums;
(f) Court-ordered maintenance to the extent actually paid;
(g) Up to ((two)) five thousand dollars per year in voluntary
((pension payments)) retirement contributions actually made if the
contributions ((were made for the two tax years preceding the earlier
of the (i) tax year in which the parties separated with intent to live
separate and apart or (ii) tax year in which the parties filed for
dissolution)) show a pattern of contributions during the one-year
period preceding the action establishing the child support order unless
there is a determination that the contributions were made for the
purpose of reducing child support; and
(h) Normal business expenses and self-employment taxes for self-employed persons. Justification shall be required for any business
expense deduction about which there is disagreement.
Items deducted from gross income under this subsection shall not be
a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.
(6) Imputation of income. The court shall impute income to a
parent when the parent is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily
underemployed. The court shall determine whether the parent is
voluntarily underemployed or voluntarily unemployed based upon that
parent's work history, education, health, and age, or any other
relevant factors. A court shall not impute income to a parent who is
gainfully employed on a full-time basis, unless the court finds that
the parent is voluntarily underemployed and finds that the parent is
purposely underemployed to reduce the parent's child support
obligation. Income shall not be imputed for an unemployable parent.
Income shall not be imputed to a parent to the extent the parent is
unemployed or significantly underemployed due to the parent's efforts
to comply with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child. ((In the absence of information to the contrary, a parent's
imputed income shall be based on the median income of year-round full-time workers as derived from the United States bureau of census,
current populations reports, or such replacement report as published by
the bureau of census.)) In the absence of records of a parent's actual
earnings, the court shall impute a parent's income in the following
order of priority:
(a) Full-time earnings at the current rate of pay;
(b) Full-time earnings at the historical rate of pay based on
reliable information, such as employment security department data;
(c) Full-time earnings at a past rate of pay where information is
incomplete or sporadic;
(d) Full-time earnings at minimum wage in the jurisdiction where
the parent resides if the parent has a recent history of minimum wage
earnings, is recently coming off public assistance, general assistance-unemployable, supplemental security income, or disability, has recently
been released from incarceration, or is a high school student;
(e) Median net monthly income of year-round full-time workers as
derived from the United States bureau of census, current population
reports, or such replacement report as published by the bureau of
census.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.19.075 and 2008 c 6 s 1039 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reasons for deviation from the standard calculation include but
are not limited to the following:
(a) Sources of income and tax planning. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation after consideration of the following:
(i) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner if the parent
who is married to the new spouse or in a partnership with a new
domestic partner is asking for a deviation based on any other reason.
Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner is not, by itself, a
sufficient reason for deviation;
(ii) Income of other adults in the household if the parent who is
living with the other adult is asking for a deviation based on any
other reason. Income of the other adults in the household is not, by
itself, a sufficient reason for deviation;
(iii) Child support actually received from other relationships;
(iv) Gifts;
(v) Prizes;
(vi) Possession of wealth, including but not limited to savings,
investments, real estate holdings and business interests, vehicles,
boats, pensions, bank accounts, insurance plans, or other assets;
(vii) Extraordinary income of a child; ((or))
(viii) Tax planning considerations. A deviation for tax planning
may be granted only if the child would not receive a lesser economic
benefit due to the tax planning; or
(ix) Income that has been excluded under RCW 26.19.071(4)(h) if the
person earning that income asks for a deviation for any other reason.
(b) Nonrecurring income. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation based on a finding that a particular source of income
included in the calculation of the basic support obligation is not a
recurring source of income. Depending on the circumstances,
nonrecurring income may include overtime, contract-related benefits,
bonuses, or income from second jobs. Deviations for nonrecurring
income shall be based on a review of the nonrecurring income received
in the previous two calendar years.
(c) Debt and high expenses. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation after consideration of the following expenses:
(i) Extraordinary debt not voluntarily incurred;
(ii) A significant disparity in the living costs of the parents due
to conditions beyond their control;
(iii) Special needs of disabled children;
(iv) Special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the
children; or
(v) Costs incurred or anticipated to be incurred by the parents in
compliance with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child.
(d) Residential schedule. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation if the child spends a significant amount of time with the
parent who is obligated to make a support transfer payment. The court
may not deviate on that basis if the deviation will result in
insufficient funds in the household receiving the support to meet the
basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving temporary
assistance for needy families. When determining the amount of the
deviation, the court shall consider evidence concerning the increased
expenses to a parent making support transfer payments resulting from
the significant amount of time spent with that parent and shall
consider the decreased expenses, if any, to the party receiving the
support resulting from the significant amount of time the child spends
with the parent making the support transfer payment.
(e) Children from other relationships. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation when either or both of the parents before the
court have children from other relationships to whom the parent owes a
duty of support.
(i) The child support schedule shall be applied to the mother,
father, and children of the family before the court to determine the
presumptive amount of support.
(ii) Children from other relationships shall not be counted in the
number of children for purposes of determining the basic support
obligation and the standard calculation.
(iii) When considering a deviation from the standard calculation
for children from other relationships, the court may consider only
other children to whom the parent owes a duty of support. The court
may consider court-ordered payments of child support for children from
other relationships only to the extent that the support is actually
paid.
(iv) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children from other relationships, deviations under this section shall
be based on consideration of the total circumstances of both
households. All child support obligations paid, received, and owed for
all children shall be disclosed and considered.
(2) All income and resources of the parties before the court, new
spouses or new domestic partners, and other adults in the households
shall be disclosed and considered as provided in this section. The
presumptive amount of support shall be determined according to the
child support schedule. Unless specific reasons for deviation are set
forth in the written findings of fact and are supported by the
evidence, the court shall order each parent to pay the amount of
support determined by using the standard calculation.
(3) The court shall enter findings that specify reasons for any
deviation or any denial of a party's request for any deviation from the
standard calculation made by the court. The court shall not consider
reasons for deviation until the court determines the standard
calculation for each parent.
(4) When reasons exist for deviation, the court shall exercise
discretion in considering the extent to which the factors would affect
the support obligation.
(5) Agreement of the parties is not by itself adequate reason for
any deviations from the standard calculation.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.19.080 and 1996 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The basic child support obligation derived from the economic
table shall be allocated between the parents based on each parent's
share of the combined monthly net income.
(2) ((Ordinary)) Health care ((expenses)) costs are not included in
the economic table. Monthly health care ((expenses that exceed five
percent of the basic support obligation)) costs shall be ((considered
extraordinary health care expenses. Extraordinary health care expenses
shall be)) shared by the parents in the same proportion as the basic
child support obligation. Health care costs shall include, but not be
limited to, medical, dental, orthodontia, vision, chiropractic, mental
health treatment, prescription medications, and other similar costs for
care and treatment.
(3) Day care and special child rearing expenses, such as tuition
and long-distance transportation costs to and from the parents for
visitation purposes, are not included in the economic table. These
expenses shall be shared by the parents in the same proportion as the
basic child support obligation. If an obligor pays court or
administratively ordered day care or special child rearing expenses
that are not actually incurred, the obligee must reimburse the obligor
for the overpayment if the overpayment amounts to at least twenty
percent of the obligor's annual day care or special child rearing
expenses. The obligor may institute an action in the superior court or
file an application for an adjudicative hearing with the department of
social and health services for reimbursement of day care and special
child rearing expense overpayments that amount to twenty percent or
more of the obligor's annual day care and special child rearing
expenses. Any ordered overpayment reimbursement shall be applied first
as an offset to child support arrearages of the obligor. If the
obligor does not have child support arrearages, the reimbursement may
be in the form of a direct reimbursement by the obligee or a credit
against the obligor's future support payments. If the reimbursement is
in the form of a credit against the obligor's future child support
payments, the credit shall be spread equally over a twelve-month
period. Absent agreement of the obligee, nothing in this section
entitles an obligor to pay more than his or her proportionate share of
day care or other special child rearing expenses in advance and then
deduct the overpayment from future support transfer payments.
(4) The court may exercise its discretion to determine the
necessity for and the reasonableness of all amounts ordered in excess
of the basic child support obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---