BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that working
forests, farmlands, and open rural zoned lands in the central Puget
Sound region are rapidly being converted to other uses. More than
eighteen thousand acres of forests and farms in King, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Kittitas counties are developed each year, a trend that
threatens the state's farm and forestry economies. The legislature
further finds that if conversion rates are not controlled, the four
hundred thousand acres of rural and agricultural zoned lands in King,
Pierce, and Snohomish counties will be fractionated in the next twenty
years, and will likely be developed by the end of the twenty-first
century.
(2) The legislature also finds that this pattern of growth leads to
a number of unfavorable conditions, including: (a) The removal of
large areas from economically beneficial agricultural and forestry
uses; (b) the loss of an important and diversified industry sector and
associated employment; (c) the wasteful use of scarce public funds for
roads, infrastructure, and fire and safety services; (d) reductions in
carbon sequestration benefits from forestry uses; (e) inefficient water
withdrawals; and (f) the generation of polluted storm water from
impervious surfaces.
(3) The legislature intends to provide for an examination of the
environmental, economic, and social consequences of current and
expected patterns of growth in rural and resource lands, and to secure
a common understanding of associated factors. The legislature intends
for this examination to result in a widely accepted strategy for
identifying how best to maintain the character of rural and resource
lands in ways that: (a) Support the goals of the growth management act
and the Puget Sound regional council's vision 2040, goals and
objectives that direct growth into existing cities and towns; (b)
respect landowner rights, values, and concerns; (c) assist in
maintaining forest and farmlands and their associated employment; and
(d) support Puget Sound restoration activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the availability of amounts
for this specific purpose, the William D. Ruckelshaus Center, in
partnership with the Puget Sound regional council, must conduct an
examination of trends affecting, and policies guiding, the maintenance
of rural and resource lands in Washington. The examination must
commence by July 1st of the year in which funds are made available.
(2) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the center
must: (a) Work and consult with willing participants including, but
not limited to, stakeholders representing agricultural, environmental,
forestry, development, realty, tribal, and local government interests;
and (b) involve and apprise legislators and legislative staff of its
efforts.
(3) The center must conduct fact-finding and stakeholder
discussions with participants identified in subsection (2) of this
section. These discussions must identify stakeholder concerns,
barriers, opportunities, and desired principles for maintaining rural
character and conserving resource lands. The fact-finding must
identify existing regulatory, management, and scientific information
related to rates of growth in rural and resource lands, and associated
policies guiding development in these lands. The center must issue two
reports of its fact-finding efforts and stakeholder discussions to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the house of representatives
and the senate: One by December 1st of the year in which funds for the
examination become available; and one by the following July 1st.
(4) The center must facilitate discussions between the stakeholders
identified in subsection (2) of this section for the purposes of
identifying options and recommendations for addressing expected growth
in a manner that maintains rural character and conserves forest, farm,
and natural areas.
(5) The center must work to achieve agreement among participating
stakeholders and to develop a coalition that can be used to support
agreed upon changes or new approaches to: (a) Maintaining the
character of rural lands; and (b) conserving agricultural and forest
lands of long-term significance.
(6) The center must issue a final report of findings and
legislative recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September
1st of the year following the year in which funds for the examination
become available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The rural and resource lands study account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources, in trust or otherwise, shall
be deposited into the account. Moneys from the state general fund may
not be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for an examination that complies with the requirements of
section 2 of this act. Only the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures.
(2) The legislature intends for the rural and resource lands study
account established in this section to be populated exclusively with
nongeneral fund moneys.

--- END ---