BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.28.130 and 2002 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.28.140 and 49.28.150 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Employee" means:
(a) A licensed practical nurse or a registered nurse licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW employed by a health care facility who is involved in
direct patient care activities or clinical services and receives an
hourly wage; or
(b) A corrections officer or sergeant employed by a city or county
jail located in a county with a population of more than one million
five hundred thousand.
(2) "Employer" means:
(a) An individual, partnership, association, corporation, state
institution, political subdivision of the state, or person or group of
persons, acting directly or indirectly in the interest of a health care
facility; or
(b) A city or county that is primarily responsible for the
operation of a jail.
(3) "Health care facility" means the following facilities, or any
part of the facility, that operates on a twenty-four hours per day,
seven days per week basis: Hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW,
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care
facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, and psychiatric hospitals
licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, and includes such facilities if owned
and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state. If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51 RCW or a home
health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW is operating under the
license of a health care facility, the nursing home or home health
agency is considered part of the health care facility for the purposes
of this subsection.
(4) "Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour
period:
(a) Not to exceed twelve hours in a twenty-four hour period or
eighty hours in a consecutive fourteen-day period for employees defined
in subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
(b) Not to exceed eight and seventeen one-hundredths hours in a
twenty-four hour period or forty and eighty-five one-hundredths hours
in a seven-day period, where the hours are worked in only five out of
the seven days, for employees defined in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(5) "On-call time" means time spent by an employee who is not
working on the premises of the place of employment but who is
compensated for availability or who, as a condition of employment, has
agreed to be available to return to the premises of the place of
employment on short notice if the need arises.
(6) "Reasonable efforts" means that the employer, to the extent
reasonably possible, does all of the following but is unable to obtain
staffing coverage:
(a) Seeks individuals to volunteer to work extra time from all
available qualified staff who are working;
(b) Contacts qualified employees who have made themselves available
to work extra time;
(c) Seeks the use of per diem staff; and
(d) Seeks personnel from a contracted temporary agency when such
staffing is permitted by law or an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, and when the employer regularly uses a contracted temporary
agency.
(7) "Unforeseeable emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen
declared national, state, or municipal emergency; (b) when a health
care facility disaster plan is activated; ((or)) (c) any unforeseen
disaster or other catastrophic event which substantially affects or
increases the need for health care services; or (d) any unforeseen
event that poses a substantial risk to public safety or the safety of
other corrections officers.
(8) "Jail" means the same as in RCW 70.48.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.28.140 and 2002 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) No employee of a health care facility may be required to work
overtime. Attempts to compel or force employees of health care
facilities to work overtime are contrary to public policy, and any such
requirement contained in a contract, agreement, or understanding is
void; and
(b) No employee as defined in RCW 49.28.130(1)(b) may be required
to work more than four hours of overtime per day. Attempts to compel
or force employees to work overtime are contrary to public policy, and
any such requirement contained in a contract, agreement, or
understanding is void.
(2) The acceptance by any employee of overtime is strictly
voluntary, and the refusal of an employee to accept such overtime work
is not grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any other
penalty, threat of reports for discipline, or employment decision
adverse to the employee.
(3) This section does not apply to overtime work that occurs:
(a) Because of any unforeseeable emergent circumstance;
(b) Because of prescheduled on-call time;
(c) When the employer documents that the employer has used
reasonable efforts to obtain staffing. An employer has not used
reasonable efforts if overtime work is used to fill vacancies resulting
from chronic staff shortages; or
(d) When an employee is required to work overtime to complete a
patient care procedure already in progress where the absence of the
employee could have an adverse effect on the patient.

--- END ---