BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual may purchase up to two collector vehicles per
year that are production vehicles manufactured by a major vehicle
manufacturer that meet the following criteria:
(a) Are rated for at least forty miles per gallon;
(b) Are not currently produced in the United States;
(c) Meet or exceed federal clean air standards at the time of
importation; and
(d) The purchaser is not a vehicle dealer and the vehicles are not
purchased for resale.
(2) The department shall title and register these vehicles as
collector vehicles regardless of age along with issuing collector
license plates. The vehicles must display collector license plates on
the front and rear of the vehicle, except for motorcycles and scooters
which must display one collector license plate on the rear of the
vehicle. The payment of the initial fees as required under this
chapter and the additional special license plate fee established by the
department are valid for the life of the vehicle for which the
application is approved by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
If a collector vehicle as described under section 1 of this act
becomes a production vehicle in the United States or if section 1 of
this act is repealed, the collector vehicle will retain its collector
vehicle status.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.015 and 2002 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Neither the department of licensing nor its agents may issue or
renew a motor vehicle license for any vehicle or change the registered
owner of a licensed vehicle, for any vehicle that is required to be
inspected under chapter 70.120 RCW, unless the application for issuance
or renewal is: (a) Accompanied by a valid certificate of compliance or
a valid certificate of acceptance issued pursuant to chapter 70.120
RCW; or (b) exempted from this requirement pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section. The certificates must have a date of validation which
is within six months of the date of application for the vehicle license
or license renewal. Certificates for fleet or owner tested diesel
vehicles may have a date of validation which is within twelve months of
the assigned license renewal date.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the following
vehicles:
(a) New motor vehicles whose equitable or legal title has never
been transferred to a person who in good faith purchases the vehicle
for purposes other than resale;
(b) Motor vehicles with a model year of 1967 or earlier;
(c) Motor vehicles that use propulsion units powered exclusively by
electricity;
(d) Motor vehicles fueled by propane, compressed natural gas, or
liquid petroleum gas, unless it is determined that federal sanctions
will be imposed as a result of this exemption;
(e) Motorcycles as defined in RCW 46.04.330 and motor-driven cycles
as defined in RCW 46.04.332;
(f) Farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.181;
(g) Used vehicles which are offered for sale by a motor vehicle
dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(h) Classes of motor vehicles exempted by the director of the
department of ecology;
(i) Collector cars as identified by the department of licensing
under RCW 46.16.305(1);
(j) Beginning January 1, 2000, vehicles that are less than five
years old or more than twenty-five years old; ((or))
(k) Hybrid motor vehicles that obtain a rating by the environmental
protection agency of at least fifty miles per gallon of gas during city
driving. For purposes of this section, a hybrid motor vehicle is one
that uses propulsion units powered by both electricity and gas; or
(l) Collector vehicles in production in countries outside the
United States that are rated for at least forty miles per gallon.
The provisions of (a) of this subsection may not be construed as
exempting from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section
applications for the renewal of licenses for motor vehicles that are or
have been leased.
(3) The department of ecology shall provide information to motor
vehicle owners regarding the boundaries of emission contributing areas
and restrictions established under this section that apply to vehicles
registered in such areas. In addition the department of ecology shall
provide information to motor vehicle owners on the relationship between
motor vehicles and air pollution and steps motor vehicle owners should
take to reduce motor vehicle related air pollution. The department of
licensing shall send to all registered motor vehicle owners affected by
the emission testing program notice that they must have an emission
test to renew their registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to registrations due or to
become due on or after January 1, 2010.

--- END ---