BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.46.020 and 2003 c 53 s 69 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of harassment if:
(a) Without lawful authority, the person knowingly threatens:
(i) To cause bodily injury immediately or in the future to the
person threatened or to any other person; or
(ii) To cause physical damage to the property of a person other
than the actor; or
(iii) To subject the person threatened or any other person to
physical confinement or restraint; or
(iv) To commit a sex offense against a person with a disability; or
(v) Maliciously to do any other act which is intended to
substantially harm the person threatened or another with respect to his
or her physical or mental health or safety; and
(b) The person by words or conduct places the person threatened in
reasonable fear that the threat will be carried out. "Words or
conduct" includes, in addition to any other form of communication or
conduct, the sending of an electronic communication.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who
harasses another is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(b) A person who harasses another is guilty of a class C felony if
either of the following applies: (i) The person has previously been
convicted in this or any other state of any crime of harassment, as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060, of the same victim or members of the victim's
family or household or any person specifically named in a no-contact or
no-harassment order; or (ii) the person harasses another person under
subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section by threatening to kill the person
threatened or any other person.
(3) The penalties provided in this section for harassment do not
preclude the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available
under law.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person with a disability" means a person who:
(i) Has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits
one or more major life activities; and
(ii) Either:
(A) Has a record of the impairment; or
(B) Was regarded by the perpetrator as having the impairment.
(b) "Sex offense" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

--- END ---