BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state board for community and technical
colleges shall create an interdisciplinary work group with faculty from
a paramedic training program, faculty from an associate degree nursing
program, faculty from a bachelor's degree nursing program, a
representative of the Washington center for nursing, and a
representative of the Washington state nursing association. The work
group shall review the training and curriculum of the programs to
establish a set of recognized course equivalencies or skill
competencies between the programs. The work group shall report its
findings and any recommendations to the board by July 1, 2010. The
board may use the findings and recommendations as the basis for any
proposals for statewide policies regarding articulation between
paramedic training programs and nursing programs. This section expires
December 1, 2010.

--- END ---