BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95M.010 and 2003 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience switch,
such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury switch in
antilock brake systems)) "Bulk mercury" includes any elemental,
nonamalgamated mercury, regardless of volume quantity or weight.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Health care facility" includes a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic,
physician's office, or health maintenance organization.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a mercury-added product or an importer or
domestic distributor of a mercury-added product produced in a foreign
country. In the case of a multicomponent product containing mercury,
the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or assemble the
product. If the multicomponent product or mercury-added product is
produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is the first importer
or domestic distributor.
(6) "Mercury-added button-cell battery" means a button-cell battery
to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for the
operation of the battery.
(7) "Mercury-added general purpose lights" means mercury-added
lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other devices that provide functional
illumination in homes, offices, and outdoors.
(8) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added product intended
mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment. Mercury-added
novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended for use as
practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards, ornaments,
yard statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday decorations, items
of apparel, and other similar products. Mercury-added novelty does not
include games, toys, or products that require a button-cell or lithium
battery, liquid crystal display screens, or a lamp that contains
mercury.
(((8))) (9) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity, or
chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a
mercury compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or
chemical in order to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or
quality, or to perform a specific function, or for any other reason.
Mercury-added products include those products listed in the interstate
mercury education and reduction clearinghouse (IMERC) mercury-added
products database, but are not limited to, mercury thermometers,
mercury thermostats, mercury barometers, lamps, and mercury switches
((in motor vehicles)) or relays.
(((9))) (10) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product that
is used for measuring blood pressure.
(((10))) (11) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product
that is used for measuring temperature.
(((11))) (12) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added
product.
(13) "Switch" means any device, which may be referred to as a
switch, sensor, valve, probe, control, transponder, or any other
apparatus, that directly regulates or controls the flow of electricity,
gas, or other compounds, such as relays or transponders. The term
"switch" includes all components of the unit necessary to perform its
flow control function. "Automotive mercury switch" includes a
convenience switch, such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a
mercury switch in antilock brake systems. "Utility switch" includes,
but is not limited to, all devices that open or close an electrical
circuit, or a liquid or gas valve. "Utility relay" includes, but is
not limited to, all products or devices that open or close electrical
contacts to control the operation of other devices in the same or other
electrical circuit.
(14) "Wholesaler" means a wholesaler of a mercury-added product.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95M.020 and 2003 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2004, a manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may not knowingly sell ((at retail)) a fluorescent lamp if the
fluorescent lamp contains mercury and was manufactured after November
30, 2003, unless the fluorescent lamp is labeled in accordance with the
guidelines listed under subsection (2) of this section. Primary
responsibility for affixing labels required under this section is on
the manufacturer, and not on the wholesaler or retailer.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a lamp is
considered labeled pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the
lamp has all of the following:
(a) A label affixed to the lamp that displays the internationally
recognized symbol for the element mercury; and
(b) A label on the lamp's packaging that: (i) Clearly informs the
purchaser that mercury is present in the item; (ii) explains that the
fluorescent lamp should be disposed of according to applicable federal,
state, and local laws; and (iii) provides a toll-free telephone number,
and a uniform resource locator internet address to a web site, that
contains information on applicable disposal laws.
(3) The manufacturer of a mercury-added lamp is in compliance with
the requirements of this section if the manufacturer is in compliance
with the labeling requirements of another state.
(4) ((The provisions of this section do not apply to products
containing mercury-added lamps.)) (a) Effective January 1, 2011, all
state-funded public agency facilities including, but not limited to,
learning institutions must recycle their end-of-life mercury-added
general purpose lights. An exception process may be established by the
department to accommodate small local governments and educational
institutions serving populations less than five thousand people.
(b) Effective July 1, 2011, all commercial, industrial, and retail
facilities and office buildings must recycle their end-of-life
mercury-added general purpose lights.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95M.050 and 2003 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for sale,
or distribute for sale or use in this state a mercury-added novelty.
A manufacturer of mercury-added novelties must notify all retailers
that sell the product about the provisions of this section and how to
properly dispose of any remaining mercury-added novelty inventory.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for
sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a manometer used to
measure blood pressure or a thermometer that contains mercury. This
subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:
(i) An electronic thermometer with a button-cell battery containing
mercury;
(ii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is used for food
research and development or food processing, including meat, dairy
products, and pet food processing;
(iii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is a component
of an animal agriculture climate control system or industrial
measurement system or for veterinary medicine until such a time as the
system is replaced or a nonmercury component for the system or
application is available;
(iv) A thermometer or manometer that contains mercury that is used
for calibration of other thermometers, manometers, apparatus, or
equipment, unless a nonmercury calibration standard is approved for the
application by the national institute of standards and technology;
(v) A thermometer that is provided by prescription. A manufacturer
of a mercury thermometer shall supply clear instructions on the careful
handling of the thermometer to avoid breakage and proper cleanup should
a breakage occur; or
(vi) A manometer or thermometer sold or distributed to a hospital,
or a health care facility controlled by a hospital, if the hospital has
adopted a plan for mercury reduction consistent with the goals of the
mercury chemical action plan developed by the department under section
302, chapter 371, Laws of 2002.
(b) A manufacturer of thermometers that contain mercury must notify
all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this
section and how to properly dispose of any remaining thermometer
inventory.
(3) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, install, or
reinstall a commercial or residential thermostat that contains mercury
unless the manufacturer of the thermostat conducts or participates in
a thermostat recovery or recycling program designed to assist
contractors in the proper disposal of thermostats that contain mercury
in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq., the federal resource
conservation and recovery act.
(4) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or
use in this state a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006,
if the motor vehicle contains an automotive mercury switch.
(5) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.
(6) Effective June 30, 2010, the sale or purchase and delivery of
bulk mercury is prohibited, including sales through the internet or
sales by private parties. However, the prohibition in this subsection
does not apply to immediate dangerous waste recycling facilities or
treatment, storage, and disposal facilities as approved by the
department and sales to research facilities, or industrial facilities
that provide products or services to entities exempted from this
chapter. The facilities described in this subsection must submit an
inventory of their purchase and use of bulk mercury to the department
on an annual basis, as well as any mercury waste generated from such
actions.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95M.080 and 2003 c 260 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall, to the extent practicable, make every
effort to educate all persons regarding the requirements of this
chapter, in preparation for its full implementation. A violation of
this chapter is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one
thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first violation.
Repeat violators are liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five
thousand dollars for each repeat violation. Penalties collected under
this section must be deposited in the state toxics control account
created in RCW 70.105D.070.
(2) Households are exempt from penalties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall participate in national and global mercury
forums to advocate reduction of global emissions and permanent
isolation of elemental mercury.
(2) By July 1, 2010, the department, in consultation with the
United States environmental protection agency, shall study the
feasibility of the development of a national repository for mercury.
The department shall develop recommendations and provide its findings
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of ecology, in
consultation with the solid waste advisory committee created under RCW
70.95.040, shall conduct research and develop recommendations for the
implementation and financing of a convenient and effective
mercury-added general purpose light recycling program for residents,
small businesses, small government agencies, charities, and schools
throughout the state. The department of ecology and the solid waste
advisory committee shall consult with stakeholders including persons
who represent retailers of mercury-added general purpose lights, waste
haulers, mercury-added general purpose light recyclers, mercury-added
general purpose light manufacturers, cities, counties, environmental
organizations, public interest organizations, and other interested
parties that have a role or interest in the recycling of mercury-added
general purpose lights.
(2) The department of ecology shall assess ways for a convenient
and effective statewide recycling program for mercury-added general
purpose lights to be established and financed. Factors to be
considered include:
(a) Urban versus rural recycling challenges and issues;
(b) The involvement of mercury-added general purpose light
manufacturers;
(c) Different methods of financing the recycling programs for
mercury-added general purpose lights;
(d) Methods to encourage the return of mercury-added general
purpose lights for recycling;
(e) The impact of the approach on local governments, nonprofit
organizations, waste haulers, and other stakeholders;
(f) Information obtained from existing mercury-added general
purpose light recycling programs, particularly those programs that
exist in counties that prohibit the disposal of mercury-added general
purpose lights in solid waste facilities, and information obtained from
existing infrastructure for recycling of mercury-added general purpose
lights; and
(g) Environmentally sound options for managing the mercury.
(3)(a) The department of ecology shall consider alternatives that
utilize the infrastructure and system established in chapter 81.77 RCW
when developing collection systems for general purpose mercury-added
lights.
(b) Nothing in this act changes or limits the authority of the
Washington utilities and transportation commission to regulate
collection of solid waste in the state of Washington, including
curbside collection or residential recyclable materials, nor does this
act change or limit the authority of a city or town to provide such
service itself or by contract under RCW 81.77.020.
(4) The department of ecology shall also develop a description of
what could be accomplished voluntarily and what would require the
adoption of rules or legislation if needed to implement the recommended
statewide recycling program for mercury-added general purpose lights.
(5) The department of ecology shall report its findings and
recommendations for implementing and financing a recycling program for
mercury-added general purpose lights to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(6) This section expires September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 70.95M.090 (Crematories -- Nonapplicability of chapter) and 2003 c 260 s 10 are each repealed.

--- END ---