BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.28.110 and 1939 c 172 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person producing, manufacturing, bottling, or
distributing wine shall put upon all packages a distinctive label
((such as)) that will provide the consumer with adequate information as
to the identity and quality of the product, the alcoholic content
thereof, the net contents of the package, the name of the producer,
manufacturer, or bottler thereof, and such other information as the
board may by ((regulation)) rule prescribe.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is "Washington," then at least ninety-five percent of the
grapes used in the production of the wine must have been grown in
Washington.
(b) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is "Washington" and the name of an American viticultural
area located wholly within Washington, then at least ninety-five
percent of the grapes used in the production of the wine must have been
grown in Washington.
(c) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is "Washington" and the name of an American viticultural
area located within both Washington and an adjoining state, then at
least ninety-five percent of the grapes used in the production of the
wine must have been grown within the defined boundaries of that
American viticultural area or in Washington.
(3) Upon evidence of material damage, destruction, disease, or
other loss to one or more vineyards in any American viticultural area,
region, subregion, or other discrete area, the director of the
department of agriculture must notify the board and the board may
suspend the requirements of subsection (2) of this section with respect
to the adversely affected area for such period of time as the board
reasonably may determine.
(4) For purposes of this section, "American viticultural area" is
a delimited grape growing region distinguishable by geographical
features, the boundaries of which have been recognized and defined by
the federal alcohol and trade tax bureau and recognized by the board.
(5) This section does not apply to wines that are produced with the
addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

--- END ---