BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.30.010 and 1985 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" includes any individual, firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or unit or agency of state or local
government.
(2) "Farm labor contractor" or "contractor" means any person, or
his or her agent or subcontractor, who, for a fee, performs any farm
labor contracting activity.
(3) "Farm labor contracting activity" means recruiting, soliciting,
employing, supplying, transporting, or hiring agricultural
((employees)) workers.
(4) "Agricultural association" means any nonprofit or cooperative
association of agricultural employers, incorporated or qualified under
applicable state law, that performs any farm labor contracting
activity.
(5) "Agricultural employer" means any person engaged in
agricultural activity, including the growing, producing, or harvesting
of farm or nursery products, or engaged in the forestation or
reforestation of lands, which includes but is not limited to the
planting, transplanting, tubing, precommercial thinning, and thinning
of trees and seedlings, the clearing, piling, and disposal of brush and
slash, the harvest of Christmas trees, and other related activities.
(((5))) (6) "Agricultural guest worker" means an agricultural
worker who is temporarily present in the United States as a
nonimmigrant under federal law including, but not limited to,
subparagraph (H)(ii) of section 101(a)(15) of the federal immigration
and naturalization act.
(7) "Agricultural ((employee)) worker" means any person who renders
or seeks to render personal services to, or under the direction of, an
agricultural employer in connection with the employer's agricultural
activity.
(((6) This chapter shall not apply to employees of the employment
security department acting in their official capacity or their agents,
nor to any common carrier or full time regular employees thereof while
transporting agricultural employees, nor to any person who performs any
of the services enumerated in subsection (3) of this section only
within the scope of his or her regular employment for one agricultural
employer on whose behalf he or she is so acting, unless he or she is
receiving a commission or fee, which commission or fee is determined by
the number of workers recruited, or to a nonprofit corporation or
organization which performs the same functions for its members. Such
nonprofit corporation or organization shall be one in which:
(a) None of its directors, officers, or employees are deriving any
profit beyond a reasonable salary for services performed in its behalf.
(b) Membership dues and fees are used solely for the maintenance of
the association or corporation.
(7))) (8) "Fee" means:
(a) Any money or other valuable consideration paid or promised to
be paid for services rendered or to be rendered by a farm labor
contractor.
(b) Any valuable consideration received or to be received by a farm
labor contractor for or in connection with any of the services
described in subsection (3) of this section, and shall include the
difference between any amount received or to be received by him or her,
and the amount paid out by him or her for or in connection with the
rendering of such services.
(((8))) (9) "Director" ((as used in this chapter)) means the
director of the department of labor and industries ((of the state of
Washington)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to all transactions, acts, and omissions
of farm labor contractors and other persons performing farm labor
contracting activities that are within the constitutional power of the
state to regulate, and not preempted by federal law including, but not
limited to, the recruitment of workers in this state to perform work
outside this state, the recruitment of workers outside this state to
perform work in whole or in part in this state, the housing of workers
in this state for work in another state, the housing of workers from
outside this state in connection with work to be performed in this
state, the transportation of workers within this state, and the payment
terms and conditions, disclosure, and recordkeeping required with
respect to work performed outside this state by workers recruited in
this state.
(2) For purposes of establishing personal jurisdiction under this
chapter, a farm labor contractor or a person performing farm labor
contracting activities is deemed to be doing business in Washington
and, therefore, subject to the jurisdiction of Washington courts if the
contractor or person contracts for services with a Washington resident
or is considered to be doing business under any other provision or rule
of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) Employees of the employment security department acting in their
official capacities, or their agents;
(b) Common carriers' or full-time regular employees thereof, while
transporting agricultural workers; or
(c) Agricultural associations or agricultural employers performing
farm labor contracting activities with respect to agricultural workers
who are not agricultural guest workers.
(2) The licensing requirements under this chapter, including the
requirements of RCW 19.30.040, do not apply to agricultural
associations or agricultural employers performing farm labor
contracting activities with respect to agricultural guest workers.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.30.030 and 1985 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall not issue to any person a license to act as a
farm labor contractor until:
(1) Such person has executed a written application on a form
prescribed by the director, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant,
and containing (a) a statement by the applicant of all facts required
by the director concerning the applicant's character, competency,
responsibility, and the manner and method by which he or she proposes
to conduct operations as a farm labor contractor if such license is
issued, and (b) the names and addresses of all persons financially
interested, either as partners, stockholders, associates, profit
sharers, or providers of board or lodging to agricultural ((employees))
workers in the proposed operation as a farm labor contractor, together
with the amount of their respective interests;
(2) The director, after investigation, is satisfied as to the
character, competency, and responsibility of the applicant;
(3) The applicant has paid to the director a license fee of:
(((1))) (a) Thirty-five dollars in the case of a farm labor contractor
not engaged in forestation or reforestation, or (((2))) (b) one hundred
dollars in the case of a farm labor contractor engaged in forestation
or reforestation or such other sum as the director finds necessary, and
adopts by rule, for the administrative costs of evaluating
applications;
(4) The applicant has filed proof satisfactory to the director of
the existence of a policy of insurance with any insurance carrier
authorized to do business in the state of Washington in an amount
satisfactory to the director, which insures the contractor against
liability for damage to persons or property arising out of the
contractor's operation of, or ownership of, any vehicle or vehicles for
the transportation of individuals in connection with the contractor's
business, activities, or operations as a farm labor contractor;
(5) The applicant has filed a surety bond or other security which
meets the requirements set forth in RCW 19.30.040;
(6) The applicant executes a written statement which shall be
subscribed and sworn to and shall contain the following declaration:
"With regards to any action filed against me concerning my
activities as a farm labor contractor, I appoint the director of the
Washington department of labor and industries as my lawful agent to
accept service of summons when I am not present in the jurisdiction in
which the action is commenced or have in any other way become
unavailable to accept service"; and
(7) The applicant has ((stated)) described on his or her
application ((whether or not)):
(a) Any past violations or settlements related to labor protection
laws in any jurisdiction in the United States or other countries, and
any current allegations or claims that the applicant has violated
labor protection laws;
(b) Any suspension, revocation, or denial of his or her
contractor's license or the license of any of his or her agents,
partners, associates, stockholders, or profit sharers ((has ever been
suspended, revoked, or denied)) by any ((state or federal agency,))
governmental authority; and ((whether or not there are))
(c) Any outstanding ((judgments)) debts against him or her or any
of his or her agents, partners, associates, stockholders, or profit
sharers ((in)) from any ((state or federal court)) jurisdiction arising
out of activities as a farm labor contractor or employer.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.30.040 and 1987 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall require the deposit of a surety bond by any
person acting as a farm labor contractor ((under this chapter)) to
insure compliance with ((the provisions of)) this chapter. Such bond
shall be in an amount specified by the director in accordance with such
criteria as the director adopts by rule but shall not be less than
((five)): Twenty-five thousand dollars if the contractor performs farm
labor contracting activities with respect to no more than twenty
agricultural workers; fifty thousand dollars if the contractor performs
farm labor contracting activities with respect to twenty-one to fifty
agricultural workers; and seventy-five thousand dollars if the
contractor performs farm labor contracting activities with respect to
more than fifty agricultural workers. The bond shall be payable to the
state of Washington and be conditioned on payment of sums legally owing
((under contract)) to an agricultural ((employee)) worker. The
aggregate liability of the surety upon such bond for all claims which
may arise thereunder shall not exceed the face amount of the bond.
(2) The amount of the bond may be raised or additional security
required by the director, upon his or her own motion or upon petition
to the director by any person, when it is shown that the security or
bond is insufficient to satisfy the contractor's potential liability
for the licensed period.
(3) No surety insurer may provide any bond, undertaking,
recognizance, or other obligation for the purpose of securing or
guaranteeing any act, duty, or obligation, or the refraining from any
act with respect to a contract using the services of a farm labor
contractor unless the farm labor contractor has made application for or
has a valid license issued under RCW 19.30.030 at the time of issuance
of the bond, undertaking, recognizance, or other obligation.
(4) Surety bonds may not be canceled or terminated during the
period in which the bond is executed unless thirty days' notice is
provided by the surety to the department. The bond is written for a
one-year term and may be renewed or extended by continuation
certification at the option of the surety.
(5) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the
contractor may file with the director a deposit consisting of cash or
other security acceptable to the director. The deposit shall not be
less than ((five)): Twenty-five thousand dollars ((in value)) if the
contractor performs farm labor contracting activities with respect to
no more than twenty agricultural workers; fifty thousand dollars if the
contractor performs farm labor contracting activities with respect to
twenty-one to fifty agricultural workers; and seventy-five thousand
dollars if the contractor performs farm labor contracting activities
with respect to more than fifty agricultural workers. The security
deposited with the director in lieu of the surety bond shall be
returned to the contractor at the expiration of three years after the
farm labor contractor's license has expired or been revoked if no legal
action has been instituted against the contractor or on the security
deposit at the expiration of the three years.
(6) If a contractor has deposited a bond with the director and has
failed to comply with the conditions of the bond as provided by this
section, and has departed from this state, service may be made upon the
surety as prescribed in RCW 4.28.090.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.30.045 and 1987 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person((,)) having a claim for ((wages pursuant to)) any
violation of this chapter may bring suit upon the surety bond or
security deposit filed by the contractor pursuant to RCW 19.30.040, in
any court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the claim
arose, or in which either the claimant or contractor resides.
(2) The right of action is assignable in the name of the director
or any other person.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.30.050 and 1985 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person may protest the grant or renewal of a license under this
section. In accordance with the procedures in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
director shall deny an application for a license to ((operate)) act as
a farm labor contractor ((shall be denied)) if the director determines
that:
(1) ((To any person who)) The applicant has made any material
misrepresentations in his or her application;
(2) The applicant has failed to fully satisfy outstanding debts
owed to workers in relation to labor protection laws;
(3) The applicant sells or proposes to sell intoxicating liquors in
a building or on premises where he or she operates or proposes to
operate as a farm labor contractor((,)); or
(((2) To a person whose license)) (4) Any prior farm labor
contractor license of the applicant's has been revoked within three
years from the date of application.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.30.060 and 1997 c 58 s 846 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may protest the grant, continuation, or renewal of
a license under this section. In accordance with the procedures in
chapter 34.05 RCW, the director may revoke((,)) or suspend((, or refuse
to issue or renew any)) a license ((when it is shown)) to act as a farm
labor contractor if the director determines that:
(((1))) (a) The farm labor contractor or any agent of the
contractor has ((violated or failed to comply with any of the
provisions of this chapter)) engaged in actions that would result in
the denial or refusal of a license under RCW 19.30.050;
(((2) The farm labor contractor has made any misrepresentations or
false statements in his or her application for a license;
(3))) (b) The conditions under which the license was issued have
changed or no longer exist;
(((4))) (c) The farm labor contractor, or any agent of the
contractor, has violated or willfully aided or abetted any person in
the violation of, or failed to comply with, any law of the state of
Washington regulating employment in agriculture, the payment of wages
to ((farm employees)) agricultural workers, or the conditions, terms,
or places of employment affecting the health and safety of ((farm
employees)) agricultural workers, which is applicable to the business
activities, or operations of the contractor in his or her capacity as
a farm labor contractor; or
(((5))) (d) The farm labor contractor or any agent of the
contractor has in recruiting ((farm labor)) agricultural workers
solicited or induced the violation of any then existing contract of
employment of such ((laborers; or
(6) The farm labor contractor or any agent of the contractor has an
unsatisfied judgment against him or her in any state or federal court,
arising out of his or her farm labor contracting activities)) workers.
(2) The director may order summary suspension of a license to act
as a farm labor contractor in accordance with RCW 34.05.422.
(3) The director shall immediately suspend the license ((or
certificate)) of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential or
visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license ((or certificate)) shall be automatic upon the director's
receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.30.110 and 1985 c 280 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person acting as a farm labor contractor shall:
(((1))) (a) Carry a current farm labor contractor's license at all
times and exhibit it to all persons with whom the contractor intends to
deal in the capacity of a farm labor contractor prior to so dealing.
(((2))) (b) Disclose to every person with whom he or she deals in
the capacity of a farm labor contractor the amount of his or her bond
and the existence and amount of any claims against the bond.
(((3))) (c) File at the United States post office serving the
address of the contractor, as noted on the face of the farm labor
contractor's license, a correct change of address immediately upon each
occasion the contractor permanently moves his or her address, and
notify the director within ten days after an address change is made.
(((4))) (2) Every person acting as a farm labor contractor and
every agricultural association and agricultural employer performing
farm labor contracting activities with respect to agricultural guest
workers shall:
(a) Promptly when due, pay or distribute to the individuals
entitled thereto all moneys or other things of value entrusted to the
contractor, association, or employer by any third person for such
purpose.
(((5))) (b) Comply with the terms and provisions of ((all legal and
valid agreements and)) any working arrangement, whether oral or
written, entered into between the contractor, association, or employer
and all persons recruited or hired to work for that person or an
agricultural employer, and comply with all contracts entered into
between the ((contractor in the capacity of a farm labor)) contractor,
association, or employer and third persons.
(((6))) (c) File information regarding work offers with the nearest
employment service office, such information to include wages and work
to be performed and any other information prescribed by the director.
(((7))) (d) On a form prescribed by the director, furnish to each
worker, at the time of hiring, recruiting, soliciting, or supplying,
whichever occurs first, a written statement in English and any other
language common to workers who are not fluent or literate in English
that contains a description of:
(((a))) (i) The compensation to be paid and the method of computing
the rate of compensation;
(((b))) (ii) The terms and conditions of any bonus offered,
including the manner of determining when the bonus is earned;
(((c))) (iii) The terms and conditions of any loan made to the
worker;
(((d))) (iv) The conditions of any transportation, housing, board,
health, and day care services or any other employee benefit to be
provided by the ((farm labor)) contractor, association, or employer or
by his or her agents, and the costs to be charged for each of them;
(((e))) (v) The terms and conditions of employment, including the
approximate length of season or period of employment and the
approximate starting and ending dates thereof, and the crops on which
and kinds of activities in which the worker may be employed, and any
production standards that an agricultural worker will be required to
meet in order to retain employment;
(((f))) (vi) The terms and conditions under which the worker is
furnished clothing or equipment;
(((g))) (vii) The place of employment;
(((h))) (viii) The name and address of the owner of all operations,
or the owner's agent, where the worker will be working as a result of
being recruited, solicited, supplied, or employed by the ((farm labor))
contractor, association, or employer;
(((i))) (ix) The existence of a labor dispute at the worksite;
(((j))) (x) The name and address of the ((farm labor)) contractor,
association, or employer;
(((k))) (xi) The existence of any arrangements with any owner or
agent of any establishment at the place of employment under which the
((farm labor)) contractor, association, or employer is to receive a fee
or any other benefit resulting from any sales by such establishment to
the workers; and
(((l))) (xii) The name and address of the surety on the
contractor's bond and the workers' right to claim against the bond, if
applicable.
(((8))) (e) Disclose to every person with whom he or she deals when
performing farm labor contracting activities that no fees may be
charged for recruitment by the contractor, association, or employer, or
by any other person with whom that person has an agreement.
(f) Furnish to the worker each time the worker receives a
compensation payment from the ((farm labor)) contractor, association,
or employer, a written statement itemizing the total payment and the
amount and purpose of each deduction therefrom, hours worked, rate of
pay, and pieces done if the work is done on a piece rate basis, and if
the work is done under the Service Contract Act (41 U.S.C. Secs. 351
through 401) or related federal or state law, a written statement of
any applicable prevailing wage.
(((9))) (g) With respect to each worker recruited, solicited,
employed, supplied, or hired by the ((farm labor)) contractor,
association, or employer:
(((a))) (i) Make, keep, and preserve for three years a record of
the following information:
(((i))) (A) The basis on which wages are paid;
(((ii))) (B) The number of piecework units earned, if paid on a
piecework basis;
(((iii))) (C) The number of hours worked;
(((iv))) (D) The total pay period earnings;
(((v))) (E) The specific sums withheld and the purpose of each sum
withheld; and
(((vi))) (F) The net pay; and
(((b))) (ii) Provide to any other ((farm labor)) contractor,
association, or employer and to any user of farm labor for whom he or
she recruits, solicits, supplies, hires, or employs workers copies of
all records, with respect to each such worker, which the contractor,
association, or employer is required by this chapter to make, keep, and
preserve. The recipient of such records shall keep them for a period
of three years from the end of the period of employment. When
necessary to administer this chapter, the director may require that any
((farm labor)) contractor, association, or employer provide the
director with certified copies of his or her payroll records for any
payment period.
(3) The recordkeeping requirements of this chapter shall be met if
either the ((farm labor)) contractor, association, or employer or any
user of the contractor's services makes, keeps, and preserves for the
requisite time period the records required under this section, and so
long as each worker receives the written statements specified in
subsection (((8))) (2)(f) of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.30.120 and 1985 c 280 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person ((acting as a)) performing farm labor ((contractor))
contracting activities shall:
(1) Make any misrepresentation or false statement in an application
for a license.
(2) Make or cause to be made, to any person, any false, fraudulent,
or misleading representation, or publish or circulate or cause to be
published or circulated any false, fraudulent, or misleading
information concerning the terms or conditions or existence of
employment at any place or places, or by any person or persons, or of
any individual or individuals.
(3) Send or transport any worker to any place where the farm labor
contractor knows a strike or lockout exists.
(4) Do any act in the capacity of a farm labor contractor, or cause
any act to be done, which constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude
under any law of the state of Washington.
(5) Charge, directly or indirectly, any fee to an agricultural
worker which relates to recruiting, soliciting, or supplying an
agricultural worker, or allow any such fee to be charged by another
person or entity.

Sec. 11 RCW 19.30.170 and 1987 c 216 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After filing a notice of a claim with the director, in addition
to any other penalty provided by law, any person aggrieved by a
violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter may
bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction of the county in
which the claim arose, or in which either the plaintiff or respondent
resides, without regard to the amount in controversy and without regard
to exhaustion of any alternative administrative remedies provided in
this chapter. No such action may be commenced later than three years
after the date of the violation giving rise to the right of action. In
any such action the court may award to the prevailing party, in
addition to costs and disbursements, reasonable attorney fees at trial
and appeal.
(2) In any action under subsection (1) of this section, if the
court finds that the respondent has violated this chapter or any rule
adopted under this chapter, it ((may)) shall award ((damages up to and
including an amount equal to the amount of)) actual damages, or
statutory damages of five hundred dollars per plaintiff per violation,
whichever is greater((, or other equitable relief)).
(3) Without regard to other remedies provided in this chapter, a
person having a claim against the farm labor contractor for any
violation of this chapter may bring suit against the farm labor
contractor and the surety bond or security deposit filed by the
contractor pursuant to RCW 19.30.040, in any court of competent
jurisdiction of the county in which the claim arose, or in which either
the claimant or contractor resides.
(4) An action upon the bond or security deposit shall be commenced
by serving and filing the summons and complaint within three years from
the date of expiration or cancellation of the bond or expiration or
cancellation of the license, whichever is sooner, or in the case of a
security deposit, within three years of the date of expiration or
revocation of the license.
(5) A copy of the summons and complaint in any such action shall be
served upon the director at the time of commencement of the action and
the director shall maintain a record, available for public inspection,
of all suits so commenced. Such service shall constitute service on
the farm labor contractor and the surety for suit upon the bond and the
director shall transmit the complaint or a copy thereof to the
contractor at the address listed in his or her application and to the
surety within forty-eight hours after it has been received.
(6) The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the director and
the parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of
the action an amount equal to the claims or the amount of the bond less
the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied therefrom and to
the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond shall be exonerated.
(7) If the actions commenced and pending at any one time exceed the
amount of the bond then unimpaired, the claims shall be satisfied from
the bond in the following order:
(a) Wages, including employee benefits;
(b) Other ((contractual)) damages owed to the ((employee))
agricultural worker;
(c) Any costs and attorneys' fees the ((claimant)) agricultural
worker may be entitled to recover by contract or statute.
(8) If any final judgment impairs the bond so furnished so that
there is not in effect a bond undertaking in the full amount prescribed
by the director, the director shall suspend the license of the
contractor until the bond liability in the required amount unimpaired
by unsatisfied judgment claims has been furnished. If such bond
becomes fully impaired, a new bond must be furnished.
(9) A claimant against a security deposit shall be entitled to
damages under subsection (2) of this section. If the farm labor
contractor has filed other security with the director in lieu of a
surety bond, any person having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the contractor for any violation of this chapter may execute upon the
security deposit held by the director by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
director. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy, the
director shall pay or order paid from the deposit, through the registry
of the court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the
unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the director shall be
the order of receipt by the director, but the director shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) An agricultural employer shall have the liability of a farm
labor contractor or an agricultural association to any agricultural
worker if:
(a) No solvent farm labor contractor who would be liable to the
agricultural worker is subject to service of process under the laws of
the state of Washington; or
(b) The court determines that it is highly probable that the
agricultural worker would be unable to enforce a judgment against the
farm labor contractor or an agricultural association.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.30.190 and 1985 c 280 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
No ((farm labor contractor or agricultural employer)) person may
intimidate, threaten, coerce, blackmail, discharge, or in any other
manner discriminate against any ((employee)) agricultural worker
because:
(1) The ((employee)) agricultural worker has made or is about to
make a claim against ((the)) a farm labor contractor or ((agricultural
employer)) a person performing farm labor contracting activities for
((compensation for the employee's personal services)) monetary damages
or injunctive relief based on the worker's employment or promised
employment.
(2) The ((employee)) agricultural worker has ((caused to be))
instituted or is about to institute any proceedings ((under or))
related to ((RCW 19.30.180)) this chapter.
(3) The ((employee)) agricultural worker has testified or is about
to testify in any ((such)) proceedings related to this chapter.
(4) The ((employee)) agricultural worker has discussed or consulted
with anyone concerning the ((employee's)) worker's rights ((under))
related to this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.30.200 and 2000 c 171 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may utilize the services of any farm labor contractor to
supply any agricultural worker unless the person first takes reasonable
steps to determine that the farm labor contractor possesses a valid
license. Any person who ((knowingly uses the services of an unlicensed
farm labor contractor)) violates this section shall be personally,
jointly, and severally liable with the person acting as a farm labor
contractor to the same extent and in the same manner as provided in
this chapter. ((In making determinations under this section, any user
may rely)) The only defense that may be asserted to avoid liability
under this section is that the person relied upon either the license
issued by the director to the farm labor contractor under RCW 19.30.030
or the director's representation that such contractor is licensed as
required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect November 1, 2009.

--- END ---