BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.020 and 2005 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter.
Parcels of land described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection
shall, upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a
surviving spouse, be subject to the limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(d) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which meet one of
the following criteria:
(i) Has produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent
to two hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter;
(ii) Has standing crops with an expectation of harvest within seven
years, except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, and a
demonstrable investment in the production of those crops equivalent to
one hundred dollars or more per acre in the current or previous
calendar year; or
(iii) Has a standing crop of short rotation hardwoods with an
expectation of harvest within fifteen years and a demonstrable
investment in the production of those crops equivalent to one hundred
dollars or more per acre in the current or previous calendar year;
(e) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall also
include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands"; or
(((e))) (f) The land on which housing for employees and the
principal place of residence of the farm operator or owner of land
classified pursuant to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing
or residence is on or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use
of the housing or the residence is integral to the use of the
classified land for agricultural purposes.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
shall mean the contract vendee.
(6) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property
held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but
otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, shall be considered
contiguous.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.108 and 2007 c 54 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner
has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the
new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section
to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board
of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted. The written
notice by the assessor must provide information regarding the process
to appeal a determination by a county assessor under this subsection
(1)(d) including timelines, petition forms, and county board of
equalization contact information.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or
(3). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of
the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of
the land from current use classification, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The
seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the
amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the
date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land," "farm and
agricultural land," or "timber land" and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become
a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land is removed
from classification under this chapter and shall have priority to and
shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any additional tax unpaid on its
due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of
delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate
applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal
of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted
solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(((e))) (f);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(6)(k).

--- END ---