BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.250.030 and 2008 c 271 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A subscriber ((who provides express, opt-in consent under RCW
19.250.010 and 19.250.020 may revoke that consent)) may request that a
directory provider or a radio communications service company remove
their wireless phone number at any time. A radio communications
service company ((and)) or a directory provider shall comply with the
subscriber's request to ((opt out)) remove their wireless phone number
from a printed or online directory within a reasonable period of time,
not to exceed sixty days for printed directories and not to exceed
thirty days for online directories.
(2) At the subscriber's request, a provider of a reverse phone
number search service must allow a subscriber to perform a reverse
phone number search free of charge to determine whether the
subscriber's wireless phone number is listed in the reverse phone
number search service. If the subscriber finds that his or her
wireless phone number is contained in the reverse phone number search
service, the subscriber may ((opt out of having)) request that his or
her wireless phone number ((included in)) be removed from the reverse
phone number search service at any time. The provider of the reverse
phone number search service must comply with the subscriber's request
((to opt out)) within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed thirty
days.
(3) A subscriber shall not be charged for ((opting out of having))
requesting that his or her wireless phone number ((listed in)) be
removed from a directory or reverse phone number search service.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.250.070 and 2008 c 271 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to the provision of wireless phone
numbers, for the purposes indicated, to:
(1) Any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public
health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county
emergency services planning agency, or ((private for-profit))
corporation operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one
or more of these agencies, for the exclusive purpose of ((responding to
a 911 call or communicating an imminent threat to life or property))
carrying out their official duties. Information or records provided to
a ((private for-profit)) corporation pursuant to ((subsection (2) of))
this section must be held in confidence by that corporation and by any
individual employed by or associated with that corporation. Such
information or records are not open to examination for any purpose not
directly connected with the administration of the services specified in
this subsection;
(2) A lawful process issued under state or federal law;
(3) A telecommunications company providing service between service
areas for the provision of telephone services to the subscriber between
service areas, or to third parties for the limited purpose of providing
billing services;
(4) A telecommunications company to effectuate a customer's request
to transfer the customer's assigned telephone number from the
customer's existing provider of telecommunications services to a new
provider of telecommunications services;
(5) The utilities and transportation commission pursuant to its
jurisdiction and control over telecommunications companies;
(6) A sales agent to provide the subscriber's wireless phone
numbers to the radio communications service company for the limited
purpose of billing and customer service;
(7) ((A directory provider that has undertaken a reasonable
investigation pursuant to RCW 19.250.020 and is unable to determine
whether the phone number is a wireless phone number;
(8))) A directory provider that publishes a subscriber's wireless
phone number in a directory that is obtained directly from a radio
communications service company and that radio communications service
company has obtained the required express, opt-in consent for including
in any directory the subscriber's wireless phone number as specified in
RCW 19.250.010;
(((9))) (8) A person that publishes a subscriber's wireless phone
number in a directory where the subscriber pays a fee to have the
number published for commercial purposes;
(((10))) (9) A person that publishes a subscriber's wireless phone
number that was ported from listed wireline service to wireless service
within the previous fifteen months; ((and
(11))) (10) A consumer reporting agency as defined in RCW
19.182.010 for use as a unique identifier of a consumer in a consumer
report as defined in RCW 19.182.010; and
(11) A person for uses permitted or authorized under the federal
fair credit reporting act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681(b)), or for uses
permitted or authorized under Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15
U.S.C. Sec. 6801, et seq.).

Sec. 3 RCW 19.250.050 and 2008 c 271 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every knowing violation of RCW 19.250.010 is punishable by a
fine of not less than two thousand dollars and no more than fifty
thousand dollars for each violation. ((Including a wireless phone
number in a directory without a subscriber's express, opt-in consent
pursuant to RCW 19.250.020)) Failure to remove a wireless phone number
within a reasonable period of time as required in RCW 19.250.030 is a
violation of this chapter and is punishable by a fine of up to fifty
thousand dollars ((unless the directory provider first conducted a
reasonable investigation as required in RCW 19.250.020 and was unable
to determine if the published number was a wireless phone number)).
(2) The attorney general may bring actions to enforce compliance
with this section. For the first violation by any company,
organization, or person under this chapter, the attorney general may
notify the company, organization, or person with a letter of warning
that this chapter has been violated.
(3) A telecommunications company or directory provider, or any
official or employee of a telecommunications company or directory
provider, is not subject to criminal or civil liability for the release
of customer information as authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 19.250.020 (Reasonable investigation required -- Consent) and
2008 c 271 s 4; and
(2) RCW 19.250.060 (Directories maintained before June 12, 2008--Application of section) and 2008 c 271 s 8.

--- END ---