BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington should
maintain its leadership on climate change policy by implementing a cap
on carbon emissions and developing strategies to achieve those
reductions, including continuing Washington's participation in the
design of a regional cap-and-trade program with the western climate
initiative.
The legislature finds that by continuing Washington's participation
in the design of a regional cap-and-trade program, Washington is in a
unique position to help influence and guide the creation of a potential
federal cap-and-trade program that would reflect Washington's emissions
portfolio and aid Washington's forest resources and agricultural land.
The legislature finds that acting now provides predictability for
business, drives investment in the new clean energy economy, creates
jobs, positions Washington business to receive credit for early
reductions of greenhouse gases, and maximizes Washington's ability to
shape the development of any potential federal cap-and-trade program.
However, the legislature does not intend for a carbon auction to take
place in Washington without prior approval from the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.235.010 and 2008 c 14 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agriculture carbon working group" means the stakeholder group
formed by the department and the department of community, trade, and
economic development to develop the recommendations required under RCW
70.235.030(3)(g).
(2) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" means a ((metric)) measure used to
compare the emissions from various greenhouse gases based upon their
global warming potential.
(((2))) (3) "Climate advisory team" means the stakeholder group
formed in response to executive order 07-02.
(((3))) (4) "Climate impacts group" means the University of
Washington's climate impacts group.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((5))) (6) "Direct emissions" means emissions of greenhouse gases
from sources of emissions, including stationary combustion sources,
mobile combustion emissions, process emissions, and fugitive emissions.
(((6))) (7) "Director" means the director of the department.
(((7))) (8) "Early reduction allowance" means an allowance for
reductions in greenhouse gas emissions that occur after January 1,
1990, and before January 1, 2012, and that are approved by the
department.
(9) "Forest carbon working group" means the stakeholder group
formed by the departments of ecology and community, trade, and economic
development to develop the recommendations required under RCW
70.235.030(3)(g).
(10) "Greenhouse gas" and "greenhouse gases" includes carbon
dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons,
and sulfur hexafluoride.
(((8))) (11) "Indirect emissions" means emissions of greenhouse
gases associated with the purchase of electricity, heating, cooling, or
steam.
(((9))) (12) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise
holder, association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any
subdivision or instrumentality of the state.
(((10))) (13) "Program" means the department's climate change
program.
(((11))) (14) "Total emissions of greenhouse gases" means all
direct emissions and all indirect emissions.
(((12))) (15) "Transportation fuel" means any carbon based fossil
fuel including combustible gas or liquid used for the propulsion of
equipment and vehicles.
(16) "Western climate initiative" means the collaboration of
states, Canadian provinces, Mexican states, and tribes to design a
multisector market-based mechanism as directed under the western
regional climate action initiative signed by the governor on February
22, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The forecasting office of the office of
financial management, in consultation with members of the governor's
council of economic advisors, shall initiate an independent economic
analysis of the impact to Washington consumers, businesses, and
citizens if Washington entered into a regional or federal cap-and-trade
program. The economic analysis must include:
(a) Various economic scenarios, such as when Washington has a
robust economy and when Washington is in an economic downturn;
(b) The economic impact sector by sector, including the impact to
the forest products manufacturing sector and Washington's port
districts;
(c) How to address trade competition from countries and states that
are not participating in a cap-and-trade program;
(d) How to ensure that economic benefits are available to both
urban and rural communities; and
(e) The impact on the cost and affordability of food, housing,
energy, transportation, and other routine expenses on low and moderate-income people.
(2) The forecasting office of the office of financial management
shall submit the report to the legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In 2012, the cap must cover emissions that meet or exceed
twenty-five thousand metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalents annually
from:
(a) Electricity that is generated or consumed within the state;
(b) Combustion at industrial and commercial facilities; and
(c) Industrial processes.
(2) In addition to the emissions covered in subsection (1) of this
section, in 2015 the cap must cover emissions that meet or exceed
twenty-five thousand metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalents annually
from:
(a) Transportation fuel combustion within the state;
(b) Residential fuel combustion within the state; and
(c) Fuel delivered or sold for industrial and commercial combustion
within the state where the fuel is used by persons not otherwise
covered by the cap in 2012.
(3) Except for purposes of reporting, the following carbon dioxide
emissions are not covered by the cap:
(a) Emissions from industrial combustion of biomass in the form of
fuel wood, wood waste, wood by-products, and wood residuals as long as
the region's silvicultural sequestration capacity is maintained or
increased;
(b) Emissions from the combustion of biofuels or the biofuel
component of blended fuels as the term "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010; and
(c) Manufacturing-related emissions from pulp and paper production.
(4) With respect to energy facilities covered under chapter 80.50
RCW and notwithstanding RCW 80.50.120, this chapter applies to all
energy facilities, as that term is defined in RCW 80.50.020. Nothing
in this chapter may be construed as conflicting with chapter 80.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The annual allowance caps and other complementary policies must
ensure that Washington will meet the emission reduction requirements in
RCW 70.235.020.
(2) The allowance caps for each year from 2012 to 2014 must be set
in advance of 2012. Allowance caps for each year after 2014 must be
set at least three years in advance of the start of the next compliance
period.
(3) The allowance caps must decline each year until Washington's
greenhouse gas emissions are reduced as required by RCW 70.235.020.
(4)(a) The allowance cap for 2012 must be set based on the
department's best estimate of the expected actual emissions covered by
the cap in that year as adjusted by the reallocation provided for in
subsection (7) of this section, if any.
(b) The price of an allowance may not exceed twelve dollars for the
years 2012 and 2013.
(5) The allowance cap for 2015 will be increased by the
department's best estimate of expected new emissions to be included in
the cap in that year, after the annual reduction is made to the cap.
(6) The allowance caps may not take into account early reduction
allowances.
(7) If Washington's participation in a regional cap-and-trade
program is authorized by the legislature, Washington must set aside one
percent of its 2012 allowance cap in order to participate in a regional
redistribution allocation.
(8) The allowance cap may also be adjusted as necessary to account
for expansion of the capped region or discovery of incorrect or
inaccurate data used to determine the allowance cap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of ecology, in consultation
with the forest practices board, the department of natural resources,
and the forest carbon working group, shall develop and deliver to the
legislature by December 31, 2010, legislation to implement a financial
incentives program for forestry and forest products that will recognize
activities such as:
(1) Forest landowners maintaining and actively managing their
forestland using management activities such as thinning, lengthening of
rotations, increased retention of trees at harvest, fertilization,
genetics, timber stand improvement, and fire management;
(2) Forest landowners utilizing transfer development right
programs;
(3) Forest landowners continuing the production of wood products
while maintaining or increasing their carbon stocks on the ground;
(4) Retention by forest landowners of high carbon stocks where
there is no obligation to retain such stocks; and
(5) The use by developers and builders of wood building materials
instead of more intensive fossil fuel products such as concrete and
steel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of ecology, in consultation
with the forest practices board, the department of natural resources,
and the forest carbon working group, shall develop recommendations for
the state's policy for forestry offset projects within Washington. The
agencies and the forest carbon working group shall use the 2008 report
of the forest carbon working group as the starting point in developing
the policy. A report on the progress of the development of this
policy, including any preliminary drafts of the policy, must be
submitted to the legislature for review by December 31, 2010. The
final policy must be submitted to the legislature by July 1, 2011. The
policy recommendations must include:
(1) Specific standards and guidelines that will support carbon
accounting in managed forests participating in an offset program;
(2) How to ensure that any carbon that is reduced or sequestered by
a forestry offset project will be eligible for an offset credit within
a regional cap-and-trade program;
(3) Recognition of management activities that increase carbon
stocks including, but not limited to, thinning, lengthening rotations,
increased retention of trees after harvest, fertilization, genetics,
timber stand improvement, fire management, and specific site class and
productivity of a managed forest;
(4) Specific standards and guidelines to support wood products
accounting, recognizing that carbon is stored in products after trees
are harvested including the use of the one hundred year method which
estimates the amount of carbon stored in the wood products that are
projected to remain in use after one hundred years;
(5) Guidelines on how forestry offset projects and forestry
financial incentive programs can work together so that Washington's
forest landowners will not be disadvantaged in comparison to other
jurisdictions participating in a regional cap-and-trade program; and
(6) How to verify or certify carbon stocks that will not be
administratively burdensome.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of ecology, in consultation
with Washington State University and the Washington state department of
agriculture shall reestablish the agriculture carbon working group to
develop recommendations for agricultural offset projects within
Washington. A report on the progress of the agriculture carbon working
group must be submitted to the legislature for review by December 31,
2010. The final recommendations of the agriculture carbon working
group must be submitted to the legislature by July 1, 2011. The policy
recommendations must include:
(1) A process and timeline to survey and catalog Washington soils
in order to establish the carbon emission soil sequestration level of
the soils;
(2) Activities that would qualify for carbon emission soil
sequestration offset projects;
(3) Guidelines and standards for carbon emission soil sequestration
offset projects; and
(4) How Washington agricultural lands can participate in a
regional, national, and international offset market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must consult with tribal governments upon
request on any elements of a cap-and-trade program that may impact
tribal governments, such as their voluntary development of offset
projects.
(2) Nothing in this chapter is intended to expand state authority
over Indian country as that term is defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.94.151 and 2008 c 14 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may
classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or
regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air
pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other
characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may
require registration or reporting or both for any such class or
classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state
as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall
be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and
social factors, and physical effects on property.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration or reporting shall register therewith and make reports
containing information as may be required by such department or board
concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information
as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of
being assembled. In the case of emissions of greenhouse gases as
defined in RCW 70.235.010 the department shall adopt rules requiring
reporting of those emissions. The department or board may require that
such registration or reporting be accompanied by a fee, and may
determine the amount of such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED,
That the amount of the fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of
administering such registration or reporting program which shall be
defined as initial registration and annual or other periodic reports
from the source owner providing information directly related to air
pollution registration, on-site inspections necessary to verify
compliance with registration requirements, data storage and retrieval
systems necessary for support of the registration program, emission
inventory reports and emission reduction credits computed from
information provided by sources pursuant to registration program
requirements, staff review, including engineering or other reliable
analysis for accuracy and currentness, of information provided by
sources pursuant to registration program requirements, clerical and
other office support provided in direct furtherance of the registration
program, and administrative support provided in directly carrying out
the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such registration
made with either the board or the department shall preclude a further
registration and reporting with any other board or the department,
except that emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010
must be reported as required under subsection (5) of this section.
All registration program and reporting fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the air pollution control account.
All registration program fees collected by the local air authorities
shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain;
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
(5)(a) The department shall adopt rules requiring the reporting of
emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010. The rules
must include a de minimis amount of emissions below which reporting
will not be required for both indirect and direct emissions. The rules
must require that emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the
burning of fossil fuels be reported separately from emissions of
greenhouse gases resulting from the burning of biomass.
(b) Except as provided in (((b))) (f) of this subsection, the
department shall, under the authority granted in subsection (1) of this
section, adopt rules requiring: (i) Any owner or operator((: (i))) of
a fleet of on-road motor vehicles that as a fleet emit at least twenty-five hundred metric tons of greenhouse gas annually in the state to
report the emissions of greenhouse gases generated from or emitted by
that fleet; ((or)) and (ii) any owner or operator of a source or
combination of sources that emit at least ten thousand metric tons of
greenhouse gas annually in the state to report their total annual
emissions of greenhouse gases; (iii) the importer, seller, deliverer,
or distributor of fuels for use in Washington where the annual
emissions in the state associated with the combustion of the fuel
delivered equal or exceed ten thousand metric tons of greenhouse gas to
report the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with the combustion
of those fuels; and (iv) the importer, seller, deliverer, or
distributor of electricity from outside Washington for consumption in
Washington to report the emissions of greenhouse gases associated with
the generation of the electricity delivered into the state where the
annual emissions associated with electricity equal or exceed ten
thousand metric tons of greenhouse gas. Reporting required in (b)(i)
and (ii) of this subsection must begin in 2010 for emissions in 2009.
Reporting required in (b)(iii) and (iv) of this subsection must begin
in 2011 for emissions in 2010. The department must adopt rules that
require that emissions from electricity generation within the state be
reported separately from emissions from electricity generation located
outside the state.
(c) In calculating emissions of greenhouse gases for purposes of
determining whether or not reporting is required, only direct emissions
shall be included. For purposes of reporting emissions of greenhouse
gases in chapter 14, Laws of 2008, "source" means any stationary source
as defined in RCW 70.94.030, or mobile source used for transportation
of people or cargo. The emissions of greenhouse gases must be reported
as carbon dioxide equivalents.
(d) The rules must require that persons report 2009 emissions
starting in 2010. The rules must establish an annual reporting
schedule that takes into account the time needed to allow the owner or
operator reporting emissions of greenhouse gases to gather the
information needed and to verify the emissions being reported.
However, in no event may reports be submitted later than October 31st
of the year in which the report is due.
(e) The department may phase in the reporting requirements for
sources or combinations of sources under (((a))) (b)(ii) of this
subsection until the reporting threshold is met, which must be met by
January 1, 2012. The department may from time to time amend the rules
to include other persons that emit less than the annual greenhouse gas
emissions levels set out in this subsection if necessary to comply with
any federal reporting requirements for emissions of greenhouse gases.
(((b))) (f) In its rules, the department may defer the reporting
requirement under (a) of this subsection for emissions associated with
interstate and international commercial aircraft, rail, truck, or
marine vessels until (i) there is a federal requirement to report these
emissions; or (ii) the department finds that there is a generally
accepted reporting protocol for determining interstate emissions from
these sources.
(((c))) (g) The department shall share any reporting information
reported to it with the local air authority in which the owner or
operator reporting under the rules adopted by the department operates.
(((d))) (h) The fee provisions in subsection (2) of this section
apply to reporting of emissions of greenhouse gases. Owners and
operators required to report under (a) of this subsection who fail to
report or pay the fee required in subsection (2) of this section are
subject to enforcement penalties under this chapter. The department
shall enforce the reporting rule requirements unless it approves a
local air authority's request to enforce the requirements for sources
operating within the authority's jurisdiction.
(((e))) (i) The energy facility site evaluation council shall,
simultaneously with the department, adopt rules that impose greenhouse
gas reporting requirements in site certifications on owners or
operators of a facility permitted by the energy facility site
evaluation council. The greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed
by the energy facility site evaluation council must be the same as the
greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed by the department. The
department shall share any information reported to it from facilities
permitted by the energy facility site evaluation council with the
council, including notice of a facility that has failed to report as
required. The energy facility site evaluation council shall contract
with the department to monitor the reporting requirements adopted under
this section.
(((f))) (j) In developing its rules, the department shall, with the
assistance of the department of transportation, identify a mechanism to
report an aggregate estimate of the annual emissions of greenhouse
gases generated from or emitted by otherwise unreported on-road motor
vehicles.
(((g))) (k) The inclusion or failure to include any person, source,
classes of persons or sources, or types of emissions of greenhouse
gases into the department's rules for reporting under this section does
not indicate whether such a person, source, or category is appropriate
for inclusion in the multisector market-based system designed under RCW
70.235.020.
(((h))) (l) Should the federal government adopt rules sufficient to
track progress toward the emissions reductions required by chapter 14,
Laws of 2008 governing the reporting of greenhouse gases, the
department shall amend its rules, as necessary, to seek consistency
with the federal rules to ensure duplicate reporting is not required.
Nothing in this section requires the department to increase the
reporting threshold established in (a) of this subsection or otherwise
require the department's rules be identical to the federal rules in
scope.
(((i))) (m) The definitions in RCW 70.235.010 apply throughout this
subsection (5) unless the context clearly requires otherwise. However,
for the purposes of this subsection (5), the term "person" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 70.94.030.
(n) For violations of this subsection (5), in addition to other
enforcement authority under this chapter, the department may issue
penalties of up to ten thousand dollars per day per violation for each
day that emissions are not reported beyond the deadline to report
established by rule.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310,
((and)) 90.56.330, and chapter 70.235 RCW.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, ((and)) 90.56.330, and chapter 70.235 RCW.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---