BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.34.180 and 2001 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county, city, and town is responsible for the prosecution,
adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration of misdemeanor and gross
misdemeanor offenses committed by adults in their respective
jurisdictions, and referred from their respective law enforcement
agencies, whether filed under state law or city ordinance, and must
carry out these responsibilities through the use of their own courts,
staff, and facilities, or by entering into contracts or interlocal
agreements under this chapter to provide these services. Nothing in
this section is intended to alter the statutory responsibilities of
each county for the prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and
incarceration for not more than one year of felony offenders, nor shall
this section apply to any offense initially filed by the prosecuting
attorney as a felony offense or an attempt to commit a felony offense.
(2) If a county declines to file a charge that meets the statutory
definition of a felony and refers the case to a city or town to
consider filing the charge as a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, the
county shall reimburse the city or town for the costs of the referral.
For purposes of this subsection, reimbursement shall not be required
for such a referral if the county's decision to decline to file is
based on proof issues that reduce the potential charge to a misdemeanor
or gross misdemeanor, as opposed to a county's filing standards. Costs
of such a referral shall include attorney time, support staff time,
photocopying costs, and the cost of any other materials relating to the
case. The costs shall begin accruing at the time the city or town
receives the referral and shall continue to accrue until the case is
closed, which may include any appellate or writ proceedings. In lieu
of reimbursing costs as required by this subsection, cities and
counties may enter into interlocal agreements pursuant to this section,
in the manner described in this section.
(3) The following principles must be followed in negotiating
interlocal agreements or contracts: Cities and counties must consider
(a) anticipated costs of services; and (b) anticipated and potential
revenues to fund the services, including fines and fees, criminal
justice funding, and state-authorized sales tax funding levied for
criminal justice purposes.
(((3))) (4) If an agreement as to the levels of compensation within
an interlocal agreement or contract for gross misdemeanor and
misdemeanor services cannot be reached between a city and county, then
either party may invoke binding arbitration on the compensation issued
by notice to the other party. In the case of establishing initial
compensation, the notice shall request arbitration within thirty days.
In the case of nonrenewal of an existing contract or interlocal
agreement, the notice must be given one hundred twenty days prior to
the expiration of the existing contract or agreement and the existing
contract or agreement remains in effect until a new agreement is
reached or until an arbitration award on the matter of fees is made.
The city and county each select one arbitrator, and the initial two
arbitrators pick a third arbitrator.
(((4))) (5) A city or county that wishes to terminate an agreement
for the provision of court services must provide written notice of the
intent to terminate the agreement in accordance with RCW 3.50.810 and
35.20.010.
(((5))) (6) For cities or towns that have not adopted, in whole or
in part, criminal code or ordinance provisions related to misdemeanor
and gross misdemeanor crimes as defined by state law, this section
shall have no application until July 1, 1998.

--- END ---