BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.12.150 and Code 1881 s 617 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the mortgaged premises cannot be sold in parcels, the court
shall order the whole to be sold, and the proceeds of the sale shall be
applied first to the payment of the principal due, interest and costs,
and then to the residue secured by the mortgage and not due; and if the
residue does not bear interest, a deduction shall be made therefrom by
discounting the legal interest((; and)). In all cases where the
proceeds of the sale ((shall be)) are more than sufficient to pay the
amount due and costs, the surplus shall be applied to all interests in,
or liens or claims of liens against, the property eliminated by sale
under this section in the order of priority that the interest, lien, or
claim attached to the property. Any remaining surplus shall be paid to
the mortgage debtor, his or her heirs and assigns.

--- END ---