BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that Article
I, section 16 of the state Constitution prohibits state and local
governments from taking private property for public or private use
without just compensation.
(2) The legislature finds that some local governments require
property owners to buy and place signs on private property that are for
the public benefit, such as signs to identify critical areas.
(3) The legislature intends this act to prohibit local governments
and state agencies from requiring private property owners to pay for or
locate signs for the public benefit on properties without providing
compensation to the property owners for the taking of the land. The
legislature further intends this act to be broadly construed in favor
of the property owner in accordance with takings jurisprudence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Development regulations adopted under this chapter may not require
private property owners to: (1) Pay for signs identifying critical
areas, shorelines, fish and wildlife habitat areas, or public access
areas; or (2) place signs identifying critical areas, shorelines, fish
and wildlife habitat areas, or public access areas on private property
without providing compensation to owners for the taking of the land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not authorize state agencies to require private
property owners to: (1) Pay for signs identifying critical areas,
shorelines, fish and wildlife habitat areas, or public access areas; or
(2) place signs identifying critical areas, shorelines, fish and
wildlife habitat areas, or public access areas on private property
without providing compensation to owners for the taking of the land.

--- END ---