BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Development regulations adopted under this chapter may not
regulate, impose conditions upon, or otherwise restrict persons from
annually removing three or fewer trees and surrounding vegetation from
their property for the purpose of preventing potential harm to persons
or structures on their property or on abutting properties.

--- END ---