BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any city or town ordinance in effect at the
time of an annexation, or thereafter, pertaining to pet or livestock
ownership, a property owner residing in the unincorporated area of a
rural county that is annexed retains the right to own and possess a pet
or pets or livestock lawfully in his or her possession at the time of
the annexation, subject to the following conditions:
(a) After the annexation the possession of the pet or pets or
livestock continues to be in accordance with the pertinent statutes and
county ordinances in effect at the time of annexation;
(b) The right of a property owner to possess a specific type of pet
under this section continues only as long as the pet owned at the time
of the annexation remains alive; and
(c) The possession of the pet or pets or livestock does not violate
the provisions of chapter 16.30 RCW, regarding potentially dangerous
wild animals.
(2) The right to the possession of livestock under subsection (1)
of this section continues for so long as the original property owner or
his or her immediate family members retain ownership of the property.
If the property owner is a business entity, the right to retain
possession of livestock under subsection (1) of this section continues
for so long as the property remains under the ownership of the same
entity.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "pet" means a domesticated or
tamed animal that is not owned for a commercial, breeding, or business
purpose and which is not otherwise prohibited under chapter 16.30 RCW.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as
determined by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any city or town ordinance in effect at the
time of an annexation, or thereafter, pertaining to pet or livestock
ownership, a property owner residing in the unincorporated area of a
rural county that is annexed retains the right to own and possess a pet
or pets or livestock lawfully in his or her possession at the time of
the annexation, subject to the following conditions:
(a) After the annexation the possession of the pet or pets or
livestock continues to be in accordance with the pertinent statutes and
county ordinances in effect at the time of annexation;
(b) The right of a property owner to possess a specific type of pet
under this section continues only as long as the pet owned at the time
of the annexation remains alive; and
(c) The possession of the pet or pets or livestock does not violate
the provisions of chapter 16.30 RCW, regarding potentially dangerous
wild animals.
(2) The right to the possession of livestock under subsection (1)
of this section continues for so long as the original property owner or
his or her immediate family members retain ownership of the property.
If the property owner is a business entity, the right to retain
possession of livestock under subsection (1) of this section continues
for so long as the property remains under the ownership of the same
entity.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "pet" means a domesticated or
tamed animal that is not owned for a commercial, breeding, or business
purpose and which is not otherwise prohibited under chapter 16.30 RCW.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as
determined by the office of financial management.

--- END ---