BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.04.280 and 2004 c 175 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that language used in reference to
individuals with disabilities shapes and reflects society's attitudes
towards people with disabilities. Many of the terms currently used
diminish the humanity and natural condition of having a disability.
Certain terms are demeaning and create an invisible barrier to
inclusion as equal community members. The legislature finds it
necessary to clarify preferred language for new and revised laws by
requiring the use of terminology that puts the person before the
disability.
(2)(a) The code reviser is directed to avoid all references to:
Disabled, developmentally disabled, mentally disabled, mentally ill,
mentally retarded, handicapped, cripple, and crippled, in any new
statute, memorial, or resolution, and to change such references in any
existing statute, memorial, or resolution as sections including these
references are otherwise amended by law.
(b) The code reviser is directed to replace terms referenced in (a)
of this subsection as appropriate with the following revised
terminology: "Individuals with disabilities," "individuals with
developmental disabilities," "individuals with mental illness," and
"individuals with ((mental retardation)) intellectual disabilities."
(c) The code reviser is directed to replace the term "mental
retardation" with the term "intellectual disability."
(3) No statute, memorial, or resolution is invalid because it does
not comply with this section.

--- END ---