BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For any public work estimated to cost over one million
dollars, the contract must contain a provision requiring all contracts
entered into by the prime contractor, all subcontractors and their
subcontractors, and employers who are not required to register as
contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW to submit a certified list of any
off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project-specific items produced
under the terms of each respective contract and produced outside
Washington. The list must be submitted to the awarding agency and to
the department of labor and industries within ten days of delivery of
the item under the respective contract. The list must provide:
(i) A general description of the item;
(ii) The name and address of the contractor, subcontractor, or
employer;
(iii) The name and address of the contractor, subcontractor, or
employer that produced the item if other than the contractor,
subcontractor, or employer; and
(iv) The federal employer identification number of the contractor,
subcontractor, or employer that produced the item.
(b) If the awarding agency is aware of incidences of noncompliance
with the requirement to submit a list under (a) of this subsection, the
awarding agency must report such incidences to the department of labor
and industries. The failure to file a certified list required under
(a) of this subsection constitutes the failure to file a record
required to be filed under this chapter and subjects the contractor,
subcontractor, or employer to the penalties in RCW 39.12.050. However,
no penalty may be imposed for a first violation if the contractor,
subcontractor, or employer files the certified list within a reasonable
time as determined by the department of labor and industries.
(2)(a) For any public work estimated to cost over one million
dollars, the contract must contain a provision requiring that all
contracts entered into by the prime contractor, all subcontractors and
their subcontractors, and employers who are not required to register as
contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW for the production of off-site,
prefabricated, nonstandard, project-specific items which are produced
outside Washington contain a requirement for the production of
certified copies of payroll records as provided in subsection (3) of
this section. The contract must also state that the contractor or
employer producing the items consents to the jurisdiction of Washington
for the enforcement of subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If the director of the department of labor and industries
determines after a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW that a prime
contractor, subcontractor, or employer has failed to comply with this
subsection, the prime contractor, subcontractor, or employer is subject
to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each second or
subsequent failure to comply. Civil penalties shall be deposited into
the public works administration account. The civil penalty does not
apply to a violation determined by the director to be an inadvertent
error.
(3) Within ten days of receipt of a request by an interested party,
contractors, subcontractors, and employers producing the items
identified in subsection (2)(a) of this section outside Washington must
file with the awarding agency and the department of labor and
industries certified copies of payroll records. The payroll records
must contain the number of labor hours expended producing the items and
the hourly rate of wages paid to the workers in each trade or
occupation used in producing the items. If the awarding agency is
aware of incidences of noncompliance with the requirement to submit
payroll records under this subsection, the awarding agency must report
such incidences to the department of labor and industries. The failure
to produce the certified copies constitutes the failure to file a
record required to be filed under this chapter and subjects the
contractor, subcontractor, or employer to the penalties in RCW
39.12.050.
(4) This section does not apply to entities responsible for
supplying the materials to the manufacturers, fabricators, or employers
that will be used to complete, construct, or assemble the items prior
to their delivery to the public works site.
(5)(a) The required lists, payroll records, and certifications
under this section must be submitted on forms made available by the
department of labor and industries.
(b) The department of general administration shall develop standard
contract language to meet the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and
(2)(a) of this section and make the language available on its web site.
(6) For purposes of this section, "off-site, prefabricated,
nonstandard, project-specific items" means products or items that are:
(a) Made primarily of architectural or structural precast concrete,
fabricated steel, pipe and pipe systems, or sheet metal and sheet metal
duct work; (b) produced specifically for the public work and not
considered to be regularly available shelf items; (c) produced or
manufactured by labor expended to assemble or modify standard items;
and (d) produced at an off-site location.
(7) This section applies to contracts entered into on or after
September 1, 2009, and expires December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The expiration of section 1 of this act does
not affect any request or proceeding instituted prior to the expiration
of section 1 of this act.

--- END ---