BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
ensure that the public bidding process be a fair and open one and to
protect subcontractors against the possibility of bid shopping by
requiring all prime contractors who bid on public works projects to
include as part of their bid submittals a list of all subcontractors
that the prime contractor will directly contract with on a public works
project.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.30.060 and 2003 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every invitation to bid on a prime contract that is expected to
cost one million dollars or more for the construction, alteration, or
repair of any public building or public work of the state or a state
agency or municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or an institution
of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 shall require each
prime contract bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour
after the published bid submittal time, the names of ((the
subcontractors with whom the bidder, if awarded the contract, will
subcontract for performance of the work of: HVAC (heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning); plumbing as described in chapter
18.106 RCW; and electrical as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to
name itself for the work)): (a) The first tier subcontractors who will
perform work valued at fifty thousand dollars or more; and (b) all
subcontractors who will perform work valued in excess of three hundred
fifty thousand dollars. The prime contract bidder must list all
subcontract work that it will perform.
(2) The prime contract bidder shall not list more than one
subcontractor for each category of work identified, unless
subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in which case the prime
contract bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for
which alternate. Failure of the prime contract bidder to submit as
part of the bid the names of such subcontractors or to name itself to
perform such work or the naming of two or more subcontractors to
perform the same work shall render the prime contract bidder's bid
nonresponsive and, therefore, void.
(((2))) (3) The public entity shall open all bids submitted by
prime contract bidders, alternates, and subcontractors that are
required to be listed under this section at the end of the published
bid submittal time. Bids submitted by prime contract bidders and their
subcontractors may not be opened separately.
(4) Substitution of a listed subcontractor ((in furtherance of bid
shopping or bid peddling)) before or after the award of the prime
contract is prohibited, except as provided under subsection (5) of this
section, and the originally listed subcontractor is entitled to recover
monetary damages from the prime contract bidder who executed a contract
with the public entity and the substituted subcontractor but not from
the public entity inviting the bid. It is the original subcontractor's
burden to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that bid shopping or
bid peddling occurred.
(5) Substitution of a listed subcontractor may only be made by the
prime contractor for the following reasons:
(a) ((Refusal of)) The listed subcontractor fails or refuses to
sign a contract with the prime contractor after having a reasonable
opportunity to do so. The contract must be a standard or master
agreement customarily used by the prime contractor when contracting
with subcontractors for projects in similar size and scope in the state
of Washington;
(b) ((Bankruptcy or insolvency of)) The listed subcontractor is
bankrupt or insolvent;
(c) ((Inability of)) The listed subcontractor is unable to perform
the requirements of the proposed contract or the project;
(d) ((Inability of)) The listed subcontractor is unable to obtain
the necessary licenses, certifications, bonding, insurance, or to meet
any other statutory requirements necessary to perform the work detailed
in the contract; ((or))
(e) The listed subcontractor is barred from participating in the
project as a result of a court order or summary judgment;
(f) The listed subcontractor has demonstrated a repeated history or
pattern of being unable to successfully perform the work or meet the
terms of public works subcontracts during the five years preceding the
award of the contract;
(g) The listed subcontractor fails to meet the requirements
established in RCW 39.04.350 for responsible bidders;
(h) The listed subcontractor is barred from bidding on or
participating in the project as a result of a court order or summary
judgment, or in accordance with the terms established in RCW
39.12.065(3);
(i) The listed subcontractor did not include the entire cost of the
subcontract in the bid submittal;
(j) The listing of the subcontractor was due to an inadvertent
clerical error;
(k) The subcontractor who legitimately presented the lowest bid
prior to bid opening was mistakenly not listed and the listed
subcontractor was not the lowest bidder for the subcontract;
(l) The listed subcontractor did not include the entire cost of the
subcontract in the bid submittal; or
(m) Good cause. Good cause includes, but is not limited to, the
financial instability of a subcontractor.
(((3))) (6) Nothing in this section may diminish the prime
contractor's right to terminate a contract with a subcontractor for
failure to meet the terms of the contract.
(7) The requirement of this section to name the prime contract
bidder's proposed ((HVAC, plumbing, and electrical)) subcontractors
applies ((only)) to ((proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical))
subcontractors who ((will)) contract directly with the prime contract
bidder submitting the bid to the public entity.
(((4))) (8) A violation of this section entitles the prevailing
plaintiff to recover damages. Any action brought pursuant to this
section may be resolved through binding arbitration or in the superior
court of the county in which the public work is located.
(9) This section does not apply to job order contract requests for
proposals under RCW ((39.10.130)) 39.10.420.

--- END ---