BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public safety is
one of the paramount duties of the state and an essential function of
government. The legislature further finds that systemic problems exist
with the department of corrections that must be addressed expeditiously
and unequivocally in order to rebuild public confidence in the state's
ability to best protect them from criminal offenders who have been
released from full incarceration but are still serving their sentences
on community custody. Turnstile justice is not conducive to building
public safety, public confidence in and support for our criminal
justice system as a whole, and the morale of personnel working within
our department of corrections, law enforcement agencies, and
prosecutors' offices. Citizens expect and demand predictability,
proportionality, uniformity, transparency, and justice when dealing
with criminal offenders and due consideration for the severe and
detrimental impact of crime on victims and their families and friends
when dealing with such offenders. The legislature also recognizes the
need to ensure the safety of the public while offenders are released
into communities. To further the goal of ensuring public safety, the
legislature intends to improve the monitoring of offenders on
supervision and hold those who violate the conditions of supervision
accountable for their actions. The legislature intends to increase the
effectiveness of supervision of offenders on community custody through
methods such as providing community corrections officers increased
flexibility in determining sanctions for supervision violations and in
searches of offenders on community custody with the goal of enhancing
public safety and preventing future offenses and supervision
violations.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest of the
offender without a warrant, pending a determination by the court. If
there is reasonable cause to believe that an offender has violated a
condition or requirement of the sentence, an offender may be required
to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person, residence,
automobile, or other personal property. An offender may be required to
submit to a search without reasonable cause to believe that he or she
has violated a condition or requirement of the sentence if the search
is a condition of his or her community custody under section 3 of this
act. A community corrections officer may also arrest an offender for
any crime committed in his or her presence. The facts and
circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be reported by the
community corrections officer, with recommendations, to the court.
If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of
an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court, pursuant to a written
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Offenders in total confinement may be subjected to random,
unannounced inspections without violating the constitutional
requirement that all searches be reasonable;
(b) Offenders on community custody, including escapees and
absconders, have the same expectation of privacy as offenders in total
confinement; and
(c) Requiring an offender on community custody, including escapees
and absconders, to submit to random, unannounced inspections is
therefore reasonable under the federal and state Constitutions.
(2) When a court sentences an offender to a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.545, 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715,
for a crime committed on or after the effective date of this act, the
court shall require the offender, as a condition of community custody,
to submit to random, unannounced inspections of his or her person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall allow community
corrections officers to inspect the person, residence, automobile, or
other personal property of an offender, including escapees and
absconders, under its supervision in the community whenever the
community corrections officer, based on the officer's professional
judgment and discretion, has reasonable cause to believe that the
offender has violated a condition or requirement of his or her
sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall allow community
corrections officers, based on the officer's professional judgment and
discretion, to perform random, unannounced inspections of the person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property of every offender,
including escapees and absconders, under the department's supervision
pursuant to a term of community custody imposed for a crime committed
on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) The community corrections officer shall document his or her
rationale for conducting an inspection under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A community corrections officer is not
liable for civil damages arising from an act or omission that occurs
when the community corrections officer provides assistance to a law
enforcement officer so long as the community corrections officer was
acting at the request of the law enforcement officer, unless the act or
omission constitutes gross negligence.
(2) A community corrections officer is not liable for civil damages
arising from an act or omission that occurs when the community
corrections officer interacts with a third party who is attempting to
intervene in a situation in which the community corrections officer is
contacting an offender on community custody or community supervision,
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.737 and 2008 c 231 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the department prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and
shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall
develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.
(2) The hearing procedures required under subsection (1) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command
separate from that of community corrections officers;
(b) The department shall provide the offender with written notice
of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement
of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to
file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the department;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within fifteen working days, but
not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the violation. For
offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within five
working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
officer. Within seven days after the hearing officer's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing officers
designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The
sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds
that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the
offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.
(3) When determining the sanction to be imposed on an offender who
violates any condition of community custody, a hearing officer shall
give due consideration to the community corrections officer's
recommendation and shall have the option, based on the hearing
officer's professional determination and discretion, to impose the
maximum sanction or sanctions allowed under law or the maximum response
option adopted by the department regardless of the response option
range or violation response score.
(4) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 72.04A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a plan, using the existing staffing
matrix, to reduce the supervision caseload of community corrections
officers by December 1, 2010, and increase partnerships such as the
neighborhood corrections initiative. Prior to 2010, the department
shall hire additional community corrections officers to the extent
funding is provided in the operating budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 and 6 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.94A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 4 and 5 of this act are each added
to chapter 72.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---