BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public safety is
one of the paramount duties of the state and an essential function of
government. The legislature further finds that systemic problems exist
with the department of corrections that must be addressed expeditiously
and unequivocally in order to rebuild public confidence in the state's
ability to best protect them from criminal offenders who have been
released from full incarceration but are still serving their sentences
on community custody. Turnstile justice is not conducive to building
public safety, public confidence in and support for our criminal
justice system as a whole, and the morale of personnel working within
our department of corrections, law enforcement agencies, and
prosecutors' offices. Citizens expect and demand predictability,
proportionality, uniformity, transparency, and justice when dealing
with criminal offenders and due consideration for the severe and
detrimental impact of crime on victims and their families and friends
when dealing with such offenders. The legislature also recognizes the
need to ensure the safety of the public while offenders are released
into communities. To further the goal of ensuring public safety, the
legislature intends to improve the monitoring of offenders on
supervision and hold those who violate the conditions of supervision
accountable for their actions. The legislature intends to increase the
effectiveness of supervision of offenders on community custody through
methods such as providing community corrections officers increased
flexibility in searches of offenders on community custody with the goal
of enhancing public safety and preventing future offenses and
supervision violations.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest of the
offender without a warrant, pending a determination by the court. If
there is reasonable cause to believe that an offender has violated a
condition or requirement of the sentence, an offender may be required
to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person, residence,
automobile, or other personal property. An offender may be required to
submit to a search without reasonable cause to believe that he or she
has violated a condition or requirement of the sentence if the search
is a condition of his or her community custody under section 3 of this
act. A community corrections officer may also arrest an offender for
any crime committed in his or her presence. The facts and
circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be reported by the
community corrections officer, with recommendations, to the court.
If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of
an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court, pursuant to a written
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Offenders in total confinement may be subjected to random,
unannounced inspections without violating the constitutional
requirement that all searches be reasonable;
(b) Offenders on community custody, including escapees and
absconders, have the same expectation of privacy as offenders in total
confinement; and
(c) Requiring an offender on community custody, including escapees
and absconders, to submit to random, unannounced inspections is
therefore reasonable under the federal and state Constitutions.
(2) When a court sentences an offender to a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.545, 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715,
for a crime committed on or after the effective date of this act, the
court shall require the offender, as a condition of community custody,
to submit to random, unannounced inspections of his or her person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall allow community
corrections officers to inspect the person, residence, automobile, or
other personal property of an offender, including escapees and
absconders, under its supervision in the community whenever the
community corrections officer, based on the officer's professional
judgment and discretion, has reasonable cause to believe that the
offender has violated a condition or requirement of his or her
sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall allow community
corrections officers, based on the officer's professional judgment and
discretion, to perform random, unannounced inspections of the person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property of every offender,
including escapees and absconders, under the department's supervision
pursuant to a term of community custody imposed for a crime committed
on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) The community corrections officer shall document his or her
rationale for conducting an inspection under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 4 and 5 of this act are each added
to chapter 72.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---