BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) College and university faculty members are specialists with
extensive experience in teaching and learning assessment, as well as
expertise in specialized fields that directly benefit their
institutions and the people of the state;
(2) College and university faculty members are innovators who
conduct research to discover new technologies and produce knowledge,
design courses and curricula, assess student development, train
teachers, supervise student research, and pursue grants and funding for
programs and projects that drive the economy and civic life of our
state; their efforts can affect the health, economy, and social well-being of its citizens and communities, and assist in the production of
cultural and artistic achievements that benefit citizens throughout the
state;
(3) College and university faculty members participate in the
fundamental missions of their institutions by designing and monitoring
programs, including standards, curricula, and degree requirements, at
the level of department school/college, and for the college or
university as a whole;
(4) The boards of regents and trustees of Washington's universities
and colleges are charged with the establishment of their admission and
degree requirements to schools, colleges, and departments, and are
responsible for assessing the outcomes and budgeting of state funds;
(5) Faculty can provide valuable insights into the fundamental
missions of the colleges and universities that will encourage and
support innovative thinking, bring an important, long-range perspective
to board deliberations, and contribute a wealth of experience in
assessment of viable educational practices;
(6) Faculty, like all member of boards of regents or trustees,
represent the citizens of the state and not specific constituencies;
and
(7) RCW 28B.10.520 stipulates that "each member of a board of
regents or board of trustees of a university or other state institution
of higher education, before entering upon his duties, shall take and
subscribe an oath to discharge faithfully and honestly his duties and
to perform strictly and impartially the same to the best of his
ability, such oath to be filed with the secretary of state." This oath
is further defined by the ethics in public service act chapter 42.52
RCW and individual boards' policies for avoiding conflict of interest
in decision making.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.100 and 2006 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ((ten)) eleven members, one of whom
shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the
effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or
emeritus member of the faculty of the university at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the governing body of the associated students. ((They)) The governor
shall select the faculty member from a list of five candidates
submitted by the governing body of the university faculty. Board
members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate, and, except for the faculty member and student member, shall
hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified.
The faculty member shall hold his or her office for a term of three
years from the first day of October and until his or her successor
shall be appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The faculty
member shall be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty of the
university at the time of the appointment and for the duration of the
appointed term. If the faculty member is no longer a member of the
faculty at the university, then the faculty member's appointment to the
board shall end effective on the faculty member's last day at that
university. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term
of one year from the first day of July until the first day of July of
the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time
student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(5) The faculty member appointed under this section shall excuse
himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to:
(a) The hiring, discipline, tenure, or compensation of faculty
members and personnel;
(b) Any matters subject to collective bargaining; and
(c) Any matters relating to the review, negotiation, or approval of
a collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.100 and 2006 c 78 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of Washington State University shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ((ten)) eleven members one of whom
shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the
effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or
emeritus member of the faculty of the university at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the governing body of the associated students. ((They)) The governor
shall select the faculty member from a list of five candidates
submitted by the governing body of the university faculty. Board
members shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the consent of
the senate and, except for the faculty member and student member, shall
hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
faculty member shall hold his or her office for a term of three years
from the first day of October and until his or her successor shall be
appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The faculty member shall
be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty of the university at
the time of the appointment and for the duration of the appointed term.
If the faculty member is no longer a member of the faculty at the
university, then the faculty member's appointment to the board shall
end effective on the faculty member's last day at that university. The
student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from
the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year
or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is
later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good
standing at the university at the time of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) Each regent shall, before entering upon the discharge of his
respective duties as such, execute a good and sufficient bond to the
state of Washington, with two or more sufficient sureties, residents of
the state, or with a surety company licensed to do business within the
state, in the penal sum of not less than five thousand dollars,
conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as such regent:
PROVIDED, That the university shall pay any fees incurred for any such
bonds for their board members.
(5) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(6) The faculty member appointed under this section shall excuse
himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to:
(a) The hiring, discipline, tenure, or compensation of faculty
members and personnel;
(b) Any matters subject to collective bargaining; and
(c) Any matters relating to the review, negotiation, or approval of
a collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.35.100 and 2006 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of each of the regional universities shall be
vested in a board of trustees consisting of ((eight)) nine members, one
of whom shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment
after the effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty of the respective university at
the time of appointment. The governor shall select the student member
from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five,
submitted by the governing body of the associated students. ((They))
The governor shall select the faculty member from a list of five
candidates submitted by the governing body of the university faculty.
Board members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate and, except for the faculty member and student member, shall
hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
faculty member shall hold his or her office for a term of three years
from the first day of October and until his or her successor shall be
appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The faculty member shall
be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty of the university at
the time of the appointment and for the duration of the appointed term.
If the faculty member is no longer a member of the faculty at the
university, then the faculty member's appointment to the board shall
end effective on the faculty member's last day at that university. The
student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from
the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following
year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified,
whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in
good standing at the respective university at the time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(5) The faculty member appointed under this section shall excuse
himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to:
(a) The hiring, discipline, tenure, or compensation of faculty
members and personnel;
(b) Any matters subject to collective bargaining; and
(c) Any matters relating to the review, negotiation, or approval of
a collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.40.100 and 2006 c 78 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested
in a board of trustees consisting of ((eight)) nine members, one of
whom shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after
the effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or
emeritus member of the faculty of the college at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the student body. ((They)) The governor shall select the faculty
member from a list of five candidates submitted by the college faculty.
Board members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate and, except for the faculty member and student member, shall
hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
faculty member shall hold his or her office for a term of three years
from the first day of October and until his or her successor shall be
appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The faculty member shall
be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty of the college at the
time of the appointment and for the duration of the appointed term. If
the faculty member is no longer a member of the faculty at the college,
then the faculty member's appointment to the board shall end effective
on the faculty member's last day at the college. The student member
shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day
of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until
his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later.
The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the
college at the time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(5) The faculty member appointed under this section shall excuse
himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to:
(a) The hiring, discipline, tenure, or compensation of faculty
members and personnel;
(b) Any matters subject to collective bargaining; and
(c) Any matters relating to the review, negotiation, or approval of
a collective bargaining agreement.

--- END ---