BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.32.080 and 2007 c 419 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol is responsible for enforcement of
safety requirements for commercial motor vehicles including, but not
limited to, safety audits and compliance reviews. Those motor carriers
that have operations in this state are subject to the patrol's safety
audits and compliance review programs. Compliance reviews may result
in the initiation of an enforcement action, which may include monetary
penalties. The utilities and transportation commission is responsible
for adoption and enforcement of safety requirements for vehicles
operated by entities holding authority under chapters 81.66, 81.68,
81.70, and 81.77 RCW, and by household goods carriers holding authority
under chapter 81.80 RCW.
(2) Motor vehicles owned and operated by farmers in the
transportation of their own farm, orchard, or dairy products, including
livestock and plant or animal wastes, from point of production to
market or disposal, or supplies or commodities to be used on the farm,
orchard, or dairy, must have a department of transportation number, as
defined in RCW 46.16.004, but are exempt from safety audits and
compliance reviews.
(3) All records and documents required of motor carriers with
operations in this state must be available for review and inspection
during normal business hours. Duly authorized agents of the state
patrol conducting safety audits and compliance reviews may enter the
motor carrier's place of business, or any location where records or
equipment are located, at reasonable times and without advanced notice.
Motor carriers who do not permit duly authorized agents to enter their
place of business, or any location where records or equipment are
located, for safety audits and compliance reviews are subject to
enforcement action, including a monetary penalty.
(4)(a) All motor carriers with a commercial motor vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.16.004, that operate in this state must apply for a
department of transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16.004, by
January 1, 2008. All entities with authority under chapters 81.66,
81.68, 81.70, and 81.77 RCW, and all household goods carriers with
authority under chapter 81.80 RCW, must apply for a department of
transportation number by January 1, 2010.
(b) All motor carriers operating in this state who (i) have not
applied under (a) of this subsection for a department of transportation
number, as defined in RCW 46.16.004, and (ii) have a commercial motor
vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of 7,258 kilograms
(16,001 pounds) or more, must apply for a department of transportation
number by January 1, 2011.
(c) The state patrol may deny an application if the ((motor
carrier)) applicant does not meet the requirements and standards under
this chapter. The state patrol shall not issue a department of
transportation number to ((a motor carrier)) an applicant who at the
time of application has been placed out of service by the federal motor
carrier safety administration. Commercial motor vehicles must be
marked as prescribed by the state patrol. Those ((motor carriers))
applicants with a current United States department of transportation
number are exempt from applying for a department of transportation
number.
(d) The state patrol may (i) place a motor carrier out of service
or (ii) refuse to issue or recognize as valid a department of
transportation number to ((a motor carrier)) an applicant who: (A)
Formerly held a department of transportation number that was placed out
of service for cause, and where cause has not been removed; (B) is a
subterfuge for the real party in interest whose department of
transportation number was placed out of service for cause, and where
cause has not been removed; (C) as an individual licensee, or officer,
director, owner, or managing employee of a nonindividual licensee, had
a department of transportation number and was placed out of service for
cause, and where cause has not been removed; or (D) has an unsatisfied
debt to the state assessed under this chapter.
(e) Upon a finding by the chief of the state patrol or the chief's
designee that a motor carrier is an imminent hazard or danger to the
public health, safety, or welfare, the state patrol shall notify the
department, and the department shall revoke the registrations for all
commercial motor vehicles that are owned by the motor carrier subject
to RCW 46.32.080. In determining whether a motor carrier is an
imminent hazard or danger to the public health, safety, or welfare, the
chief or the chief's designee shall consider safety factors.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.32.085 and 2007 c 419 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the
department of licensing, shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter
to regulate vehicle safety requirements for motor carriers who own,
control, manage, or operate a commercial motor vehicle within this
state. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the rules adopted
by the state patrol under this section must be as rigorous as federal
regulations governing certain interstate motor carriers at 49 C.F.R.
Parts 40 and 380 through 397, which cover the areas of commercial motor
carrier driver training, controlled substance and alcohol use and
testing, compliance with the federal driver's license requirements and
penalties, vehicle equipment and safety standards, hazardous material
practices, financial responsibility, driver qualifications, hours of
service, vehicle inspection and corrective actions, and assessed
penalties for noncompliance. The state patrol shall amend these rules
periodically to maintain, to the extent permissible under this chapter,
standards as rigorous as the federal regulations governing certain
interstate motor carriers. The state patrol shall submit a report to
the legislature by December 31st of each year that outlines new rules
or rule changes and explains how the state rules compare to the federal
regulations.
(2) Motor vehicles operated by entities with authority under
chapters 81.66, 81.68, 81.70, and 81.77 RCW, and by household goods
carriers operating under chapter 81.80 RCW, must comply with rules
regulating vehicle safety adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.32.090 and 2007 c 419 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall collect a fee of sixteen dollars, in addition
to all other fees and taxes, for each motor vehicle base plated in the
state of Washington that is subject to highway inspections and
compliance reviews by the state patrol under RCW 46.32.080, at the time
of registration and renewal of registration under chapter 46.16 or
46.87 RCW, or the international registration plan if base plated in a
foreign jurisdiction. The fee must be apportioned for those vehicles
operating interstate and registered under the international
registration plan. This fee does not apply to nonmotor-powered
vehicles, including trailers. Refunds will not be provided for fees
paid under this section when the vehicle is no longer subject to RCW
46.32.080. The department may deduct an amount equal to the cost of
administering the program. All remaining fees shall be deposited with
the state treasurer and credited to the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.32.100 and 2007 c 419 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, and
except as provided otherwise in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection, a commercial motor vehicle that is subject to compliance
reviews under this chapter and an officer, agent, or employee of a
company operating a commercial motor vehicle who violates or who
procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this title or any order or
rule of the state patrol is liable for a penalty of one hundred dollars
for each violation((, except for each violation)).
(i) It is a violation of this chapter for a person operating a
commercial motor vehicle to fail to comply with the requirements of 49
C.F.R. Pt. 382, controlled substances and alcohol use and testing, 49
C.F.R. Sec. 391.15, disqualification of drivers, and 49 C.F.R. Sec.
396.9(c)(2), moving a vehicle placed out of service before the out of
service defects have been satisfactorily repaired((, for which)). For
each violation the person is liable for a penalty of five hundred
dollars.
(ii) The driver of a commercial motor vehicle who violates an out-of-service order is liable for a penalty of at least one thousand one
hundred dollars but not more than two thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars for each violation.
(iii) An employer who allows a driver to operate a commercial motor
vehicle when there is an out-of-service order is liable for a penalty
of at least two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars but not more than
eleven thousand dollars for each violation.
(iv) Each violation under this subsection (1)(a) is a separate and
distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's
continuance is a separate and distinct violation.
(b) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, any motor
carrier, company, or any officer or agent of a motor carrier or company
operating a commercial motor vehicle subject to compliance reviews
under this chapter who refuses entry or to make the required records,
documents, and vehicles available to a duly authorized agent of the
state patrol is liable for a penalty of at least five thousand dollars
as well as an out-of-service order being placed on the department of
transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16.004, and vehicle
registration to operate. Each violation is a separate and distinct
offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance
is a separate and distinct violation.
(c) A motor carrier operating a commercial motor vehicle after
receiving a final unsatisfactory rating or being placed out of service
is liable for a penalty of not more than eleven thousand dollars for
each violation. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and
in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate
and distinct violation.
(d) A high-risk carrier is liable for double the amount of the
penalty of a prior violation if the high-risk carrier repeats the same
violation during a follow-up compliance review. Each repeat violation
is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a repeat continuing
violation every day's continuance is a separate and distinct violation.
(2) The Washington state patrol may place an out-of-service order
on a department of transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16.004,
for violations of this chapter or for nonpayment of any monetary
penalties assessed by the state patrol or the utilities and
transportation commission, as a result of compliance reviews, or for
violations of cease and desist orders issued by the utilities and
transportation commission. The state patrol shall notify the
department of licensing when an out-of-service order has been placed on
a motor carrier's department of transportation number. The state
patrol shall notify the motor carrier when there has been an out-of-service order placed on the motor carrier's department of
transportation number and the vehicle registrations have been revoked
by sending a notice by first-class mail using the last known address
for the registered or legal owner or owners, and recording the
transmittal on an affidavit of first-class mail. Notices under this
section fulfill the requirements of RCW 46.12.160. Motor carriers may
not be eligible for a new department of transportation number, vehicle
registration, or temporary permits to operate unless the violations
that resulted in the out-of-service order have been corrected.
(3) Any penalty provided in this section is due and payable when
the person incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state
patrol describing the violation and advising the person that the
penalty is due. ((If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
state patrol within twenty days after the later of (a) receipt of the
notice imposing the penalty, or (b) disposition of an adjudicative
proceeding regarding the penalty, the state patrol may commence an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW in the name of the
state of Washington to confirm the violation and recover the penalty.))
(a)(i) Any motor carrier who incurs a penalty as provided in this
section, except for a high-risk carrier that incurs a penalty for a
repeat violation during a follow-up compliance review, may, upon
written application, request that the state patrol mitigate the
penalty. An application for mitigation must be received by the state
patrol within twenty days of the receipt of notice.
(ii) The state patrol may decline to consider any application for
mitigation.
(b) Any motor carrier who incurs a penalty as provided in this
section has a right to an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW to contest the violation or the penalty imposed, or both. In all
such ((proceedings)) hearings, the procedure and rules of evidence are
as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW except as otherwise provided in this
chapter. Any request for an administrative hearing must be made in
writing and must be received by the state patrol within twenty days
after the later of (i) receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or
(ii) disposition of a request for mitigation, or the right to a hearing
is waived.
(c) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into
the state treasury and credited to the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.615 and 2007 c 419 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall refuse to register a commercial motor
vehicle that is owned by a motor carrier subject to RCW 46.32.080,
46.87.294, and 46.87.296 upon notification to the department by the
Washington state patrol or the federal motor carrier safety
administration that an out-of-service order has been placed on the
department of transportation number issued to the motor carrier.
(2) The department shall revoke the vehicle registration of all
commercial motor vehicles that are owned by a motor carrier subject to
RCW 46.32.080, upon notification to the department by the Washington
state patrol or the federal motor carrier safety administration that an
out-of-service order has been placed on the department of
transportation number issued to the motor carrier. The revocation must
remain in effect until the department has been notified by the
Washington state patrol that the out-of-service order has been
rescinded.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
by June 30, 2009, any original or renewal application for registration
of a commercial motor vehicle that is owned by a motor carrier subject
to RCW 46.32.080 that is submitted to the department must be
accompanied by:
(a) The department of transportation number issued to the motor
carrier; and
(b) The federal taxpayer identification number of the motor
carrier.
(4) ((Beginning on)) By June 30, 2010, the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section apply to any original or renewal
application that is submitted to the department for registration of a
commercial motor vehicle that is to be operated by an entity with
authority under chapter 81.66, 81.68, 81.70, or 81.77 RCW, or by a
household goods carrier with authority under chapter 81.80 RCW.
(5) By June 30, 2012, the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section apply to any original or renewal application that is submitted
to the department for registration of a commercial motor vehicle that
is owned by a motor carrier subject to RCW 46.32.080, and that has a
gross vehicle weight rating of 7,258 kilograms (16,001 pounds) or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 2007 c 419 s 18 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to vehicles exempted from registration
by RCW 46.16.020.

--- END ---