BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.130 and 1979 c 158 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall have the general supervision
and control of the issuing of vehicle licenses and vehicle license
number plates and shall have the full power to do all things necessary
and proper to carry out the provisions of the law relating to the
licensing of vehicles; the director shall have the power to appoint and
employ deputies, assistants and representatives, and such clerks as may
be required from time to time, and to provide for their operation in
different parts of the state, and the director shall have the power to
appoint the county auditors of the several counties as ((his)) the
director's agents for the licensing of vehicles.
(2)(a) The director shall investigate the conviction records and
pending charges of any current employee of or prospective employee
being considered for any position with the department that has or will
have:
(i) The ability to create or modify records of applicants for
enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards issued under RCW 46.20.202;
and
(ii) The ability to issue enhanced drivers' licenses and
identicards under RCW 46.20.202.
(b) The investigation consists of a background check as authorized
under RCW 10.97.050, 43.43.833, and 43.43.834, and the federal bureau
of investigation. The background check must be conducted through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which is
through the submission of fingerprints. The director shall use the
information solely to determine the character, suitability, and
competence of current or prospective employees subject to this section.
(c) The director shall investigate the conviction records and
pending charges of an employee subject to this subsection every five
years.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director with
information that they may possess and that the director may require
solely to determine the employment suitability of current or
prospective employees subject to this section.

--- END ---