BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.15.060 and 2007 c 241 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and
priorities for distributions from the habitat conservation account.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this chapter may not be used by the board to fund staff positions
or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local agency to
fund operation or maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter.
(3) Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to acquisition, including, but not
limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and signing.
(4) ((Moneys appropriated for this section may be used to fund
mitigation banking projects involving the restoration, creation,
enhancement, or preservation of critical habitat and urban wildlife
habitat, provided that the parties seeking to use the mitigation bank
meet the matching requirements of subsection (5) of this section. The
moneys from this section may not be used to supplant an obligation of
a state or local agency to provide mitigation. For the purposes of
this section, a mitigation bank means a site or sites where critical
habitat or urban wildlife habitat is restored, created, enhanced, or in
exceptional circumstances, preserved expressly for the purpose of
providing compensatory mitigation in advance of authorized project
impacts to similar resources.
(5))) The board may not approve a local project where the local
agency share is less than the amount to be awarded from the habitat
conservation account.
(((6))) (5) In determining acquisition priorities with respect to
the habitat conservation account, the board shall consider, at a
minimum, the following criteria:
(a) For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:
(i) Community support for the project;
(ii) The project proposal's ongoing stewardship program that
includes control of noxious weeds, detrimental invasive species, and
that identifies the source of the funds from which the stewardship
program will be funded;
(iii) Recommendations as part of a watershed plan or habitat
conservation plan, or a coordinated regionwide prioritization effort,
and for projects primarily intended to benefit salmon, limiting
factors, or critical pathways analysis;
(iv) Immediacy of threat to the site;
(v) Uniqueness of the site;
(vi) Diversity of species using the site;
(vii) Quality of the habitat;
(viii) Long-term viability of the site;
(ix) Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;
(x) Enhancement of existing public property;
(xi) Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or
statewide recreational or resource plan, including projects that assist
in the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated according
to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated according to RCW
36.70A.130;
(xii) Educational and scientific value of the site;
(xiii) Integration with recovery efforts for endangered,
threatened, or sensitive species;
(xiv) For critical habitat proposals by local agencies, the
statewide significance of the site.
(b) For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the
criteria of (a) of this subsection:
(i) Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;
(ii) Proximity to other wildlife habitat;
(iii) Potential for public use; and
(iv) Potential for use by special needs populations.
(((7))) (6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
board shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list of all state
agency and local projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.040(1) (a),
(b), and (c). The governor may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board and shall submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but
not be limited to, a description of each project and any particular
match requirement, and describe for each project any anticipated
restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the project.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.15.120 and 2007 c 241 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The riparian protection account is established in the state
treasury. The board must administer the account in accordance with
chapter 79A.25 RCW and this chapter, and hold it separate and apart
from all other money, funds, and accounts of the board.
(2) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the riparian protection
account must be distributed for the acquisition or enhancement or
restoration of riparian habitat. All enhancement or restoration
projects, except those qualifying under subsection (((10))) (9)(a) of
this section, must include the acquisition of a real property interest
in order to be eligible.
(3) State and local agencies and lead entities under chapter 77.85
RCW may apply for acquisition and enhancement or restoration funds for
riparian habitat projects under subsection (1) of this section. Other
state agencies not defined in RCW 79A.15.010, such as the department of
transportation and the department of corrections, may enter into
interagency agreements with state agencies to apply in partnership for
funds under this section.
(4) The board may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and
priorities for distributions from the riparian protection account.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this section may not be used by the board to fund staff positions
or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local agency to
fund operation or maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter.
(6) Moneys appropriated for this section may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to restoration and acquisition,
including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.
(7) ((Moneys appropriated for this section may be used to fund
mitigation banking projects involving the restoration, creation,
enhancement, or preservation of riparian habitat, provided that the
parties seeking to use the mitigation bank meet the matching
requirements of subsection (8) of this section. The moneys from this
section may not be used to supplant an obligation of a state or local
agency to provide mitigation. For the purposes of this section, a
mitigation bank means a site or sites where riparian habitat is
restored, created, enhanced, or in exceptional circumstances, preserved
expressly for the purpose of providing compensatory mitigation in
advance of authorized project impacts to similar resources.
(8))) The board may not approve a local project where the local
agency share is less than the amount to be awarded from the riparian
protection account. In-kind contributions, including contributions of
a real property interest in land may be used to satisfy the local
agency's share.
(((9))) (8) State agencies receiving grants for acquisition of land
under this section must pay an amount in lieu of real property taxes
equal to the amount of tax that would be due if the land were taxable
as open space land under chapter 84.34 RCW except taxes levied for any
state purpose, plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds
equal to that which would be paid if such lands were privately owned.
The county assessor and county legislative authority shall assist in
determining the appropriate calculation of the amount of tax that would
be due.
(((10))) (9) In determining acquisition priorities with respect to
the riparian protection account, the board must consider, at a minimum,
the following criteria:
(a) Whether the project continues the conservation reserve
enhancement program. Applications that extend the duration of leases
of riparian areas that are currently enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program shall be eligible. Such applications are
eligible for a conservation lease extension of at least twenty-five
years of duration;
(b) Whether the projects are identified or recommended in a
watershed planning process under chapter 247, Laws of 1998, salmon
recovery planning under chapter 77.85 RCW, or other local plans, such
as habitat conservation plans, and these must be highly considered in
the process;
(c) Whether there is community support for the project;
(d) Whether the proposal includes an ongoing stewardship program
that includes control of noxious weeds, detrimental invasive species,
and that identifies the source of the funds from which the stewardship
program will be funded;
(e) Whether there is an immediate threat to the site;
(f) Whether the quality of the habitat is improved or, for projects
including restoration or enhancement, the potential for restoring
quality habitat including linkage of the site to other high quality
habitat;
(g) Whether the project is consistent with a local land use plan,
or a regional or statewide recreational or resource plan. The projects
that assist in the implementation of local shoreline master plans
updated according to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated
according to RCW 36.70A.130 must be highly considered in the process;
(h) Whether the site has educational or scientific value; and
(i) Whether the site has passive recreational values for walking
trails, wildlife viewing, or the observation of natural settings.
(((11))) (10) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
board will recommend to the governor a prioritized list of projects to
be funded under this section. The governor may remove projects from
the list recommended by the board and will submit this amended list in
the capital budget request to the legislature. The list must include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and any particular
match requirement.

--- END ---