BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
reduce boating fatalities and injuries, and increase the general safety
of Washington's waterways by implementing the recommendations of recent
state studies regarding the enhancement of boating safety. These
studies include, improving coordination of state services to
recreational boaters, conducted for the Washington state recreation and
conservation office in 2008; Washington state boaters survey regarding
safety, education, and law enforcement, conducted for the state parks
and recreation commission in 2007; recreational boating safety in
Washington, a report on methods to achieve safer boating practices,
conducted by the state parks and recreation commission in 2003; and
recommendations on child drowning prevention, conducted by the
department of health's child death review state committee in 2004. It
is the intent of the legislature to improve boating safety by focusing
on increased support to marine law enforcement as recommended in the
various studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Within existing funds, the state parks
and recreation commission shall develop a plan to implement the
following recommendations regarding boating safety and marine law
enforcement:
(a) Increase state and local law enforcement presence on waterways;
(b) Enhance standardized and specialized training for marine law
enforcement regarding boating safety laws and boating accident
investigation;
(c) Increase training opportunities for state and local law
enforcement marine program personnel;
(d) Increase enforcement of boating laws, including enforcement
against alcohol and drug-related boating;
(e) Increase the provision of on-site safety information and
practical education to boaters;
(f) Designate the department of fish and wildlife as a boating
safety program;
(g) Maximize existing funding sources for the purpose of expanding
law enforcement on-the-water activities including patrols and
enforcement, prevention activities, education activities, and search
and rescue;
(h) Enhance state and local law enforcement's capabilities to
conduct safety and equipment checks and courtesy inspections at boat
access sites;
(i) Review data sharing or other technology issues that impact law
enforcement ability to enforce boating laws and increase boating
safety.
(2) The plan shall include provisions for the funding provided to
the state from the recreational boating safety grant program
administered through the United States coast guard to be allocated on
the following basis: Twenty percent to the state parks and recreation
commission and eighty percent to approved boating safety programs.
(3) The plan shall include timelines for implementation of the
recommendations. If any of the recommendations require legislative
action, those recommendations will be noted in the plan and
subsequently reported to the governor and the legislature.
(4) The state parks and recreation commission shall provide a copy
of the plan and a report detailing the status of recommendations
implementation to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2009.

--- END ---