BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to, with malice, kill or cause
substantial bodily harm to livestock owned or bred for commercial or
subsistence purposes belonging to another person, without consent of
the owner.
(2) This section does not apply to individuals meeting the
definition of slaughterer or packer, as those terms are defined in RCW
16.50.110, who, when conducting activities consistent with those
definitions, do so in furtherance of their responsibilities in the
regular course of employment.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Livestock" means any domesticated or semidomesticated breed or
population of animal intentionally reared in an agricultural setting
for the purposes of profit or subsistence, whether for food, fiber,
dairy, draft, breeding, sport, or other product or labor, and includes
bison, cattle, deer, donkeys, goats, hogs, horses, llamas, mules, pigs,
rabbits, sheep, other fur bearing animals, and other mammals, farmed
birds such as chickens, geese, pigeons, turkeys, and other birds, and
ratites such as emus, ostriches, and rheas, but does not include fish,
shellfish, frogs, and reptiles.
(b) "Malice" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.04.110, but
applied to acts against livestock.
(4) A violation of this section constitutes a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Any owner of livestock, as defined in section 1 of this act, who
suffers damage as a result of an unauthorized act described in section
1 of this act may bring an action against the person or persons
committing the act in a court of competent jurisdiction for exemplary
damages up to three times the actual damages sustained, plus reasonable
attorneys' fees.

--- END ---