BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.28.130 and 2002 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.28.140 and 49.28.150 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Employee" means ((a licensed practical nurse or a registered
nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW)) an individual employed by a
health care facility who is involved in direct patient care activities
or clinical services and receives an hourly wage.
(2) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, state institution, political subdivision of the state, or
person or group of persons, acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of a health care facility.
(3) "Health care facility" means the following facilities, or any
part of the facility, that operates on a twenty-four hours per day,
seven days per week basis: Hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW,
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care
facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, and psychiatric hospitals
licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, and includes such facilities if owned
and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state. If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51 RCW or a home
health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW is operating under the
license of a health care facility, the nursing home or home health
agency is considered part of the health care facility for the purposes
of this subsection.
(4) "Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour
period not to exceed twelve hours in a twenty-four hour period or
eighty hours in a consecutive fourteen-day period.
(5) "On-call time" means time spent by an employee who is not
working on the premises of the place of employment but who is
compensated for availability or who, as a condition of employment, has
agreed to be available to return to the premises of the place of
employment on short notice if the need arises.
(6) "Reasonable efforts" means that the employer, to the extent
reasonably possible, does all of the following but is unable to obtain
staffing coverage:
(a) Seeks individuals to volunteer to work extra time from all
available qualified staff who are working;
(b) Contacts qualified employees who have made themselves available
to work extra time;
(c) Seeks the use of per diem staff; and
(d) Seeks personnel from a contracted temporary agency when such
staffing is permitted by law or an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, and when the employer regularly uses a contracted temporary
agency.
(7) "Unforeseeable emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen
declared national, state, or municipal emergency; (b) when a health
care facility disaster plan is activated; or (c) any unforeseen
disaster or other catastrophic event which substantially affects or
increases the need for health care services.

--- END ---