BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other disclosure required under this chapter
or by state or federal law, a licensee with a small loan endorsement
must provide a disclosure statement that informs a potential borrower
that possible alternatives to a small loan exist and that the borrower
may qualify for other assistance or loans. The statement must:
(a) Be a separate document;
(b) Be in at least twelve-point type;
(c) Be provided to the potential borrower along with or prior to an
application;
(d) Provide examples of possible alternatives and contact
information, including:
(i) The army emergency relief program;
(ii) The navy-marine corps relief society quick assist loan
program;
(iii) The air force aid society falcon loan program;
(iv) The coast guard mutual assistance program;
(v) The diversion cash assistance program offered by the department
of social and health services; and
(vi) Other alternatives required by the director;
(e) Provide a list of independent financial counseling agencies in
the area or region; and
(f) Be approved by the director prior to use. If the director
later withdraws approval, the licensee must cease using the disapproved
statement.
(2) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---