BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.80.010 and 2007 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for consumer-owned utilities under its jurisdiction; or
(b) an independent auditor selected by a consumer-owned utility that is
not under the jurisdiction of the state auditor.
(3) "Average available greenhouse ((gases [gas])) gas emissions
output" means the level of greenhouse ((gases [gas])) gas emissions as
surveyed and determined by the energy policy division of the department
of community, trade, and economic development under RCW 80.80.050.
(4) "Baseload electric generation" means electric generation from
a power plant that is designed and intended to provide electricity at
an annualized plant capacity factor of at least sixty percent and that,
regardless of ownership, is dispatched by an electric utility.
(5) "Cogeneration facility" means a power plant in which the heat
or steam is also used for industrial or commercial heating or cooling
purposes and that meets federal energy regulatory commission standards
for qualifying facilities under the public utility regulatory policies
act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 824a-3), as amended.
(6) "Combined-cycle natural gas thermal electric generation
facility" means a power plant that employs a combination of one or more
gas turbines and steam turbines in which electricity is produced in the
steam turbine from otherwise lost waste heat exiting from one or more
of the gas turbines.
(7) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(8) "Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal utility formed under
Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an
irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative
formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association
formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, or port district within which an
industrial district has been established as authorized by Title 53 RCW,
that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more
than one retail electric customer in the state.
(9) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(10) "Distributed generation" means electric generation connected
to the distribution level of the transmission and distribution grid,
which is usually located at or near the intended place of use.
(11) "Electric utility" means an electrical company or a consumer-owned utility.
(12) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(13) "Governing board" means the board of directors or legislative
authority of a consumer-owned utility.
(14) "Greenhouse gases" includes carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous
oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride.
(15) "Long-term financial commitment" means:
(a) Either a new ownership interest in baseload electric generation
or an upgrade to a baseload electric generation facility; or
(b) A new or renewed contract for baseload electric generation with
a term of five or more years for the provision of retail power or
wholesale power to end-use customers in this state.
(16) "Plant capacity factor" means the ratio of the electricity
produced during a given time period, measured in kilowatt-hours, to the
electricity the unit could have produced if it had been operated at its
rated capacity during that period, expressed in kilowatt-hours.
(17) "Power plant" means a facility for the generation of
electricity that ((is permitted as a single plant by the energy
facility site evaluation council or a local jurisdiction)) includes one
or more generating units at the same location.
(18) "Upgrade" means any modification made for the primary purpose
of increasing the electric generation capacity of a baseload electric
generation facility. "Upgrade" does not include routine or necessary
maintenance, installation of emission control equipment, installation,
replacement, or modification of equipment that improves the heat rate
of the facility, or installation, replacement, or modification of
equipment for the primary purpose of maintaining reliable generation
output capability that does not increase the heat input or fuel usage
as specified in existing generation air quality permits as of July 22,
2007, but may result in incidental increases in generation capacity.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.80.040 and 2007 c 307 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2008, the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions
performance standard for all baseload electric generation for which
electric utilities enter into long-term financial commitments on or
after such date is the lower of:
(a) One thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gases per
megawatt-hour; or
(b) The average available greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions output
as determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(2) All baseload electric generation facilities in operation as of
June 30, 2008, are deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse
((gases)) gas emissions performance standard established under this
section until the facilities are the subject of long-term financial
commitments. All baseload electric generation that commences operation
after June 30, 2008, and is located in Washington, must comply with the
greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance standard established in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) All electric generation facilities or power plants powered
exclusively by renewable resources, as defined in RCW 19.280.020, where
renewable energy credits have not been sold separately for that
electricity, are deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse
((gases)) gas emissions performance standard established under this
section. As referenced in this subsection, a renewable energy credit
is a tradable certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of a
renewable resource where the certificate includes all of the nonpower
attributes, as defined in RCW 19.285.030, associated with that one
megawatt-hour of electricity.
(4) All cogeneration facilities in the state that are fueled by
natural gas or waste gas or a combination of the two fuels, and that
are in operation as of June 30, 2008, are deemed to be in compliance
with the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance standard
established under this section until the facilities are the subject of
a new ownership interest or are upgraded.
(5) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for
baseload electric generation, the total emissions associated with
producing electricity shall be included.
(6) The department shall establish an output-based methodology to
ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for a
cogeneration facility recognizes the total usable energy output of the
process, and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in
the production of both electrical and thermal energy. In developing
and implementing the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance
standard, the department shall consider and act in a manner consistent
with any rules adopted pursuant to the public utilities regulatory
policy act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 824a-3), as amended.
(7) The following greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions produced by
baseload electric generation owned or contracted through a long-term
financial commitment shall not be counted as emissions of the power
plant in determining compliance with the greenhouse ((gases)) gas
emissions performance standard:
(a) Those emissions that are injected permanently in geological
formations;
(b) Those emissions that are permanently sequestered by other means
approved by the department; and
(c) Those emissions sequestered or mitigated as approved under
subsection (13) of this section.
(8) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse ((gases)) gas
emissions performance standard, the department of community, trade, and
economic development energy policy division, in consultation with the
commission, the department, the Bonneville power administration, the
western electricity coordination council, the energy facility site
evaluation council, electric utilities, public interest
representatives, and consumer representatives, shall consider the
effects of the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance standard
on system reliability and overall costs to electricity customers.
(9) Commencing on the effective date of this section, in developing
and implementing the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance
standard, the department shall((, with assistance of the commission,
the department of community, trade, and economic development energy
policy division, and electric utilities, and to the extent practicable,
address long-term purchases of electricity from unspecified sources in
a manner consistent with this chapter)) allow no more than twelve
percent of delivered electricity from unspecified resources over the
life of a long-term financial commitment.
(10) The directors of the energy facility site evaluation council
and the department shall each adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW in
coordination with each other to implement and enforce the greenhouse
((gases)) gas emissions performance standard. The rules necessary to
implement this section shall be adopted by June 30, 2008, and updated
by December 31, 2009.
(11) In adopting the rules for implementing this section, the
energy facility site evaluation council and the department shall
include criteria to be applied in evaluating the carbon sequestration
plan, for baseload electric generation that will rely on subsection (7)
of this section to demonstrate compliance, but that will commence
sequestration after the date that electricity is first produced. The
rules shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Provisions for financial assurances, as a condition of plant
operation, sufficient to ensure successful implementation of the carbon
sequestration plan, including construction and operation of necessary
equipment, and any other significant costs;
(b) Provisions for geological or other approved sequestration
commencing within five years of plant operation, including full and
sufficient technical documentation to support the planned
sequestration;
(c) Provisions for monitoring the effectiveness of the
implementation of the sequestration plan;
(d) Penalties for failure to achieve implementation of the plan on
schedule;
(e) Provisions for an owner to purchase emissions reductions in the
event of the failure of a sequestration plan under subsection (13) of
this section; and
(f) Provisions for public notice and comment on the carbon
sequestration plan.
(12)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, as part of
its role enforcing the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance
standard, the department shall determine whether sequestration or a
plan for sequestration will provide safe, reliable, and permanent
protection against the greenhouse gases entering the atmosphere from
the power plant and all ancillary facilities.
(b) For facilities under its jurisdiction, the energy facility site
evaluation council shall contract for review of sequestration or the
carbon sequestration plan with the department consistent with the
conditions under (a) of this subsection, consider the adequacy of
sequestration or the plan in its adjudicative proceedings conducted
under RCW 80.50.090(3), and incorporate specific findings regarding
adequacy in its recommendation to the governor under RCW 80.50.100.
(13) A project under consideration by the energy facility site
evaluation council by July 22, 2007, is required to include all of the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section in its carbon
sequestration plan submitted as part of the energy facility site
evaluation council process. A project under consideration by the
energy facility site evaluation council by July 22, 2007, that receives
final site certification agreement approval under chapter 80.50 RCW
shall make a good faith effort to implement the sequestration plan. If
the project owner determines that implementation is not feasible, the
project owner shall submit documentation of that determination to the
energy facility site evaluation council. The documentation shall
demonstrate the steps taken to implement the sequestration plan and
evidence of the technological and economic barriers to successful
implementation. The project owner shall then provide to the energy
facility site evaluation council notification that they shall implement
the plan that requires the project owner to meet the greenhouse
((gases)) gas emissions performance standard by purchasing verifiable
greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions reductions from an electric
generating facility located within the western interconnection, where
the reduction would not have occurred otherwise or absent this
contractual agreement, such that the sum of the emissions reductions
purchased and the facility's emissions meets the standard for the life
of the facility.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.80.060 and 2007 c 307 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No electrical company may enter into a long-term financial
commitment unless the baseload electric generation supplied under such
a long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases))
gas emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040.
(2) In order to enforce the requirements of this chapter, the
commission shall review in a general rate case or as provided in
subsection (5) of this section any long-term financial commitment
entered into by an electrical company after June 30, 2008, to determine
whether the baseload electric generation to be supplied under that
long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases))
gas emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040.
(3) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for
baseload electric generation, the commission shall consider the design
of the power plant and its intended use, based upon the electricity
purchase contract, if any, permits necessary for the operation of the
power plant, and any other matter the commission determines is relevant
under the circumstances.
(4) Upon application by an electric utility, the commission may
provide a case-by-case exemption from the greenhouse ((gases)) gas
emissions performance standard to address: (a) Unanticipated electric
system reliability needs; or (b) catastrophic events or threat of
significant financial harm that may arise from unforeseen
circumstances.
(5) Upon application by an electrical company, the commission shall
determine whether the company's proposed decision to acquire electric
generation or enter into a power purchase agreement for electricity
complies with the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance
standard established under RCW 80.80.040, whether the company has a
need for the resource, and whether the specific resource selected is
appropriate. The commission shall take into consideration factors such
as the company's forecasted loads, need for energy, power plant
technology, expected costs, and other associated investment decisions.
The commission shall not decide in a proceeding under this subsection
(5) issues involving the actual costs to construct and operate the
selected resource, cost recovery, or other issues reserved by the
commission for decision in a general rate case or other proceeding for
recovery of the resource or contract costs. A proceeding under this
subsection (5) shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW (part
IV). The commission shall adopt rules to provide that the schedule for
a proceeding under this subsection takes into account both (a) the
needs of the parties to the proposed resource acquisition or power
purchase agreement for timely decisions that allow transactions to be
completed; and (b) the procedural rights to be provided to parties in
chapter 34.05 RCW (part IV), including intervention, discovery,
briefing, and hearing.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an
electrical company may account for and defer for later consideration by
the commission all costs incurred in connection with the ((long-term
financial commitment)) construction or acquisition of any facility,
including operating and maintenance costs, depreciation, taxes, and
cost of invested capital. The deferral begins with the date on which
the ((power plant)) facility begins commercial operation or the
effective date of the ((power)) purchase ((agreement)) of an existing
operating facility and continues for a period not to exceed twenty-four
months; provided that if during such period the company files a general
rate case or other proceeding for the recovery of such costs, deferral
ends on the effective date of the final decision by the commission in
such proceeding. Creation of such a deferral account does not by
itself determine the actual costs of the ((long-term financial
commitment)) facility, whether recovery of any or all of these costs is
appropriate, or other issues to be decided by the commission in a
general rate case or other proceeding for recovery of these costs.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "facility" means an
electric generation plant, or a power purchase agreement with a term of
five years or greater that is associated with the output of an electric
generation plant, with greenhouse gas emissions that are the lower of
(i) one thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gas per megawatt-hour; or (ii) the average available greenhouse gas emissions output as
determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(7) The commission shall consult with the department to apply the
procedures adopted by the department to verify the emissions of
greenhouse gases from baseload electric generation under RCW 80.80.040.
The department shall report to the commission whether baseload electric
generation will comply with the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions
performance standard for the duration of the period the baseload
electric generation is supplied to the electrical company.
(8) The commission shall adopt rules for the enforcement of this
section with respect to electrical companies and adopt procedural rules
for approving costs incurred by an electrical company under subsection
(4) of this section.
(9) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section by December 31, 2008.

--- END ---