BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.090 and 1988 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Cable television business" means the business of providing
cable service as provided in the federal telecommunications act of
1996.
(b) "Light and power business" and "gas distribution business" are
defined as provided in RCW 82.16.010.
(c) "Solid waste collection business" is defined as provided in RCW
82.18.010.
(d) "Telecommunications service business" is defined as provided in
RCW 82.04.065.
(2) Any customer billing issued by a cable television business,
light or power business ((or)), gas distribution business, solid waste
collection business, or telecommunications service business, that
serves a total of more than ((twenty)) five thousand customers and
operates within the state, shall include the following information:
(((1))) (a) The rates and amounts of state and local excise taxes
paid directly by the customer upon products or services rendered by the
((light and power business or gas distribution)) business; and
(((2))) (b) The rate, origin, and ((approximate)) amount of each
state and local excise tax levied upon the ((revenue of the light and
power business or gas distribution business and)) business that is
added as a component of the amount charged to the customer. Taxes
((based upon revenue of the light and power business or gas
distribution business)) to be listed on the customer billing need not
include taxes or fees levied by the federal government or taxes or fees
levied under chapter((s)) 54.28, 80.24, or 82.04 RCW.
(3) The first customer billing issued after the beginning of each
calendar year shall provide an annual summary of taxes directly paid by
the customer and the amount of tax added as a component of the amount
charged the customer during the previous year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for
the labor, software, and other costs to modify a business's billing
system, as required by the amendatory changes made in section 1,
chapter . . . ., Laws of 2009 (section 1 of this act).
(2) The credit earned in one reporting period may be carried over
to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent reporting period.
However, credit may not be carried over for more than twelve months
from the ending date of the reporting period in which the credit was
earned.
(3) A business claiming a credit under this section may not claim
credit under section 3 of this act.
(4) No credit may be earned under this section on or after January
1, 2010.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for
the labor, software, and other costs to modify a business's billing
system, as required by the amendatory changes made in section 1,
chapter . . . ., Laws of 2009 (section 1 of this act).
(2) The credit earned in one reporting period may be carried over
to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent reporting period.
However, credit may not be carried over for more than twelve months
from the ending date of the reporting period in which the credit was
earned.
(3) A business claiming a credit under this section may not claim
credit under section 2 of this act.
(4) No credit may be earned under this section on or after January
1, 2010.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.090 is recodified as a section in
chapter 82.32A RCW.

--- END ---