BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.835 and 2006 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of OG-300 rated solar water heating systems, OG-100 rated solar water heating
collectors, solar heat exchangers, or differential solar controllers,
including associated components and repair and replacement parts for
such equipment, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving such equipment or associated components.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "OG-300 rated solar water heating system" means those fully
integrated solar water heating systems that have been rated as having
met the operational guidelines currently set and listed by the solar
rating and certification corporation.
(b) "OG-100 rated solar water heating collector" means those
collectors that convert light energy to heat and that have been rated
as having met the operational guidelines currently set and listed by
the solar rating and certification corporation.
(c) "Solar heat exchanger" means a device that is used to transfer
heat from one fluid to another through a separating wall.
(d) "Differential solar controller" means a controlling device that
reads and adjusts the temperature at the solar water heating collector
and the heated water collection tank.
(e) "Associated component" includes all tangible personal property
which is attached to and a part of a solar water heating system, solar
water heating collector, solar heat exchanger, or differential solar
controller as defined under this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.835 and 2006 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of OG-300 rated solar water heating systems, OG-100 rated solar
water heating collectors, solar heat exchangers, or differential solar
controllers; associated components; repair and replacement parts for
such equipment; or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving such equipment and associated components.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.08.835 apply.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 2006 c 218 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---