BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Dentists in the United States purchase approximately thirty-four tons of elemental mercury annually. There are one hundred
seventy-five thousand dentists in the United States and the state of
Washington has approximately five thousand five hundred dentists.
Proportionally, that means that Washington dentists import over two
thousand one hundred forty pounds of elemental mercury per year into
Washington. This importation of elemental mercury is an unacceptable
burden to the state's environment, especially its waterways and fishing
industry;
(2) Chairside traps and amalgam separators catch some of the
mercury waste from dental offices which, along with mercury in
biohazard bags, is recycled, incinerated, or buried as hazardous waste.
However, most mercury used in dental offices is implanted into the
mouths of the adults and children in Washington, where it ultimately
returns directly into the environment through human waste via
wastewater treatment plants and septic systems, cremations that emit
mercury into the air, and burials that place mercury in the ground.
Thus, mercury imported for dental fillings is a major contributor of
mercury into the environment of the state of Washington;
(3) Mercury from dentistry harms the Washington economy, which is
dependent on fishing, outdoor recreation, and other activities
requiring clean water and clean air;
(4) Mercury fillings are no longer necessary in dentistry. Current
dental technology provides nonmercury dental materials for every cavity
for any person. According to a 2007 survey, fifty-two percent of all
dentists are now mercury-free, and all dentists know how to place
alternatives to mercury fillings;
(5) Mercury fillings cause exposure to mercury, an acute
neurotoxin, which is known to damage the developing brain of a child or
fetus. Scientists for the United States environmental protection
agency report that six hundred thirty thousand babies are born each
year in the United States, one in six with so much in utero exposure to
mercury they are at risk of brain damage. Thus, mercury exposure from
any source should be avoided;
(6) The goal of the Washington state mercury chemical action plan
is to target mercury as the first priority in the state's persistent,
bioaccumulative toxins strategy and describes elements of a statewide
campaign to virtually eliminate the use and release of human-caused
mercury in Washington state. This goal cannot be met if the state
allows an exemption for dentistry; and
(7) A transition to mercury-free dentistry is both feasible and
necessary, and can be undertaken in a manner beneficial to dentists,
dental workers, and dental consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning August 1, 2009, all state and local government dental
insurance plans, medicaid dental insurance plans, and private sector
dental insurance plans must provide alternatives to mercury amalgam as
a dental tooth restoration material. If there is a difference in cost
for alternative nonmercury restoration materials, third-party payers
may limit the coverage to the cost of the amalgam restoration unless
the dental consumer is allowed to pay the difference.
(2) Beginning August 1, 2009, any person or institution in the
state that offers training in dentistry, including dental hygiene and
dental assisting, must teach the risks of exposure to mercury in dental
offices and dental laboratories and safe techniques for protection of
workers and patients.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2010, no mercury amalgam dental filling
may be placed in children under six years of age or in pregnant women.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2012, no mercury amalgam dental filling
may be placed in any person in the state of Washington.
(5)(a) Dentists and corporations providing consumer dental services
are immune from liability for harm to dental consumers from past
exposures to mercury in mercury amalgam dental fillings placed prior to
the dates listed in subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section.
(b) There is no immunity from liability for any entity involved in
placing mercury amalgam dental fillings after the dates listed in
subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section.

--- END ---