BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
consumer protection of access to complementary and alternative health
care act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that, based upon
a comprehensive report by the national institutes of health, a study
published by the New England Journal of Medicine, and other research
data, hundreds of thousands of individuals in this state are presently
receiving a substantial amount of health care from providers of health
care services who are not licensed, registered, or certified by this
state. Those studies further indicate that individuals from a wide
variety of age, ethnic, socioeconomic, and other demographic categories
use these health care services, often referred to as complementary and
alternative health care practices or natural healing therapies and
modalities.
(2) The legislature, in RCW 18.120.010, stated its intent that all
individuals should be permitted to enter into a health profession
unless there is an overwhelming need for the state to protect the
interests of the public by restricting entry into the profession and,
where such a need is identified, the regulation adopted by the state
should be set at the least restrictive level consistent with the public
interest to be protected. This continues to be the intent of the
legislature. However, notwithstanding this intent, a practitioner of
the healing arts who is not licensed, certified, or registered by this
state as a member of a health profession as defined in RCW
18.120.020(4) could currently be subject to investigations,
disciplinary actions, fines, penalties, the restriction of practice, or
the issuance of a cease and desist order although the practice does not
cross the threshold of state regulatory concern for the public as set
out in chapter 18.120 RCW.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to protect the right of all
individuals to access every type of health care service and
practitioner that they desire whenever possible. Protecting consumer
access to health care services must include protecting consumer access
to health care services from practitioners who are not licensed,
certified, or registered by the state. This means that the health care
service practitioners who are not licensed, certified, or registered by
the state must be able to provide the services that individuals seek
without risking civil or criminal investigations or sanctions sought by
the state, its agencies, boards, or commissions.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature to allow health care
practitioners who are not licensed, certified, or registered by the
state, to provide any health care services sought by individuals,
unless there exists clear and convincing evidence that the specific
health care service causes serious physical or mental harm or causes
imminent and significant risk of discernable, significant, and serious
physical or mental injury, under the circumstances in which the health
care practitioner knew, or in the exercise of reasonable care should
have known, would result in such injury.
(5) It is recognized that this chapter may authorize conduct by
health care practitioners who are not licensed, certified, or
registered by the state, which may be interpreted by the department of
health or regulatory boards or commissions as overlapping with the
statutory definition of the unlicensed practice of a health profession
in RCW 18.120.020(4). It is the intent of this chapter to provide
those practicing under this chapter safe harbor from violations of
other provisions in this title.
(6) Because the legislature finds that health care services
provided by practitioners who are not regulated by the state are widely
used by consumers and desirable under certain circumstances, and in
order to maximize and protect consumer options in health care, the
legislature intends to remove current barriers to the public's access
to such practitioners providing health care services with appropriate
consumer protections, as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Health care services" means health care and healing therapies
and methods that are not prohibited by section 4 of this act and that
are provided by a person who is not licensed, certified, or registered
as a health care practitioner by this state. "Health care services"
include, but are not limited to, the use of:
(a) Natural elements such as air, heat, water, and light;
(b) Class I or class II medical devices approved by the federal
food and drug administration for approved treatments as well as for
off-label use;
(c) Other medical devices, tools, or procedures that may be
nontraditional, unique, or experimental;
(d) Vitamins, minerals, herbs, natural food products and their
extracts, and nutritional supplements;
(e) Dietary supplements as defined by the federal dietary
supplement and health education act of 1994;
(f) Homeopathic remedies;
(g) Detoxification practices, including but not limited to sauna,
foot baths, baths including the addition of herbs or other substances,
colon hydrotherapy, and oxidative therapies; and
(h) Traditional cultural health care practices.
(2) "Diagnosis" means an intentional statement that someone has a
specific medical disease reflected in the ICD-10 coding scheme. If a
health care practitioner uses medical terminology or common words to
describe a health condition or advise a client to see a licensed,
certified, or registered health care practitioner in order to rule out
a diagnosable condition, it is not a diagnosis. A statement by a
health care practitioner who is not licensed, certified, or registered
that symptoms may be indicative of or consistent with a specific
medical condition, or that they have some probability significantly
less than one hundred percent of having a specific medical condition,
is not a diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
a person who provides health care services in accordance with this
chapter, but who is not licensed, certified, or registered by this
state as a health care professional or practitioner, shall not be in
violation of a law based on the unlicensed practice of a health
profession as defined in RCW 18.120.020(4) unless the person:
(1) Performs surgery or any other procedure that harmfully severs
or penetrates the tissue of the body, except for finger pricking for
screening purposes. Penetration of natural body cavities or orifices
is not penetration of tissues;
(2) Prescribes or administers X-ray radiation or any other form of
ionizing radiation to any person;
(3) Prescribes or dispenses corrective vision lenses or prescribes
or administers vision therapy;
(4) Prescribes or administers a legend drug or controlled substance
that state or federal law requires be prescribed or dispensed to the
end user exclusively by a licensed, certified, or registered health
care practitioner;
(5) Performs a chiropractic adjustment of the articulations of
joints or the spine;
(6) Provides deep stroking of the muscle tissue of the human body,
or represents that a practice is massage therapy;
(7) Sets fractures;
(8) Performs a health care service that is specifically described
as the exclusive purview of the licensed practitioner in the individual
practice acts of health professions as defined in RCW 18.120.020(4) and
is included in the curriculum of the profession's required educational
programs, and is routinely practiced by members of that profession,
provided that it does not fall under any exception in this chapter and
is not routinely performed by laymen as self-directed care in private
life;
(9) Intentionally diagnoses and treats a physical or mental
condition of any person that causes an individual serious physical or
mental harm or causes imminent and significant risk of discernable and
significant physical or mental injury, under the circumstances in which
the health care practitioner knew, or in the exercise of reasonable
care should have known, would result in such injury. The potential for
such injury must be easily recognizable and not remote or dependent
upon tenuous argument and must be proven by clear and convincing
evidence. Delay of conventional allopathic treatments alone cannot be
determined to be, or potentially to be, serious physical or mental
harm; or
(10) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises, or implies to any
person that he or she is a licensed, certified, or registered health
care practitioner under the laws of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any person providing health care
services who is not licensed, certified, or registered by this state
and who is advertising or charging a fee for health care services,
shall, prior to providing such services, disclose to the individual, in
a plainly worded written statement that the practitioner is not a state
licensed, certified, or registered practitioner.
(a) The practitioner's name, business address, and telephone
number;
(b) The nature of the health care services to be provided; and
(c) The highest academic degree or credential obtained by the
practitioner, and the field of study or major for that degree or
credential shall be disclosed. If the degree or credential was
obtained from an institution that is not accredited or generally
recognized then the name of the institution shall also be disclosed.
The practitioner may, at their sole discretion, choose to disclose
additional degrees, experience, accomplishments, and qualifications.
(2) A written copy of said statement must be posted in a prominent
location in the office or treatment location of the practitioner
providing the service in at least a twelve-pitch font size, or shall be
incorporated in other written materials provided to the clients if the
practitioner does not physically meet with them in a fixed business
location. Reasonable accommodations shall be made for those clients
who cannot read or who have communication impairments and those who do
not read or speak English or the language of the providing
practitioner.
(3) Before a practitioner provides health care services to a client
for the first time, such practitioner must obtain a written
acknowledgment on paper, including by facsimile, or in digital form,
from the client stating that he or she has been provided with the
information described in this section. The client shall be provided
with a copy of this written acknowledgment and it must be maintained
for at least two years as a confidential health document by the person
providing the services. Preexisting clients may continue to be
provided services under whatever disclosure was legally operative at
the date of first service. Any acknowledgement by the client of lack
of practitioner licensing, registration, or certification by the state
shall be sufficient for clients under care prior to the effective date
of this act.
(4) Before enforcement proceedings begin regarding disclosure
compliance, a notification, educational, or mediative approach must be
utilized by the state and parties to bring a practitioner into
compliance with this section.
(5) The practitioner must also obtain informed consent prior to
providing services, as that term has been construed by common law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1)(a) The legislature finds that the
practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable
in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.
(b) The attorney general may bring an action to obtain a cease and
desist order against a practitioner for a violation. In any proceeding
under this chapter, the attorney general bears the burden of proof and
must meet that burden with clear and convincing evidence. However,
before enforcement proceedings may commence, good faith mediation must
be utilized by the state in an attempt to bring a practitioner into
voluntary compliance with this section.
(2) Notwithstanding state laws that define the unlicensed practice
of a health profession as defined in RCW 18.120.020(4), any alternative
or complementary health care services that are being provided or
practitioners that are providing services in compliance with this act
are outside the scope and jurisdiction of the professional quality
assurance commissions or regulatory boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any pending investigations or disciplinary
actions that could not be brought under the provisions of this chapter
shall be dismissed within thirty days of the effective date of this
act. Any disciplinary sanctions that have been imposed in pending or
final actions that could not be brought under the provisions of this
chapter, are revoked and must be expunged within sixty days of the
effective date of this act without application by the health care
practitioner. All fines or costs collected shall be refunded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act does not prevent any health care
professional who is licensed, certified, or registered by this state,
from providing health care services under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2009.

--- END ---