BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.50.003 and 2008 c 227 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "City" means an incorporated city or town.
(2) "Contracting city" means any city that contracts with a hosting
jurisdiction for the delivery of either judicial services or judicial
support services, or both.
(3) "Hosting jurisdiction" means a county or city designated in an
interlocal agreement as receiving compensation for providing either
judicial services or judicial support services, or both to a
contracting city.
(4) "Judicial services" means the service of a judge, judge pro
tem, or court commissioner.
(5) "Judicial support services" means the services of court clerks,
bailiffs, court administrators, probation positions, or other judicial
administrative support personnel as may be deemed necessary by a
contracting city for the operation of a municipal court.
(6) "Mayor" means the mayor, city manager, or other chief
administrative officer of the city.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.50.020 and 2008 c 227 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The municipal court shall have ((exclusive)) original jurisdiction
over traffic infractions arising under city ordinances and
((exclusive)) original criminal jurisdiction of all violations of city
ordinances duly adopted by the city and shall have original
jurisdiction of all other actions brought to enforce or recover license
penalties or forfeitures declared or given by such ordinances or by
state statutes. A hosting jurisdiction shall have ((exclusive))
concurrent original criminal and other jurisdiction as described in
this section for all matters ((filed by)) subject to a contract for
judicial services between the hosting jurisdiction and a contracting
city. The municipal court shall also have the jurisdiction as
conferred by statute. The municipal court is empowered to forfeit cash
bail or bail bonds and issue execution thereon; and in general to hear
and determine all causes, civil or criminal, including traffic
infractions, arising under such ordinances and to pronounce judgment in
accordance therewith. A municipal court participating in the program
established by the administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW
2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail,
and arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued
by any court of limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.50.125 and 1984 c 258 s 122 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transfer of a case from the municipal court to either another
municipal judge of the same city, a judge from a hosting jurisdiction
providing services to a contracting city under a contract for judicial
services, or to a judge pro tempore appointed in the manner prescribed
by this chapter shall be allowed in accordance with RCW 3.66.090 in all
civil and criminal proceedings.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.50.815 and 2008 c 227 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city may meet any or all of the requirements of RCW 39.34.180
by entering into an interlocal agreement with the county in which the
city is located or with one or more cities.
(2) The provisions of RCW 3.50.040, 3.50.050, 3.50.055, and
3.50.057 do not apply to any judicial position of a contracting city
filled through an interlocal contract for judicial services with a
hosting jurisdiction.
(3) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit a city
from filling one or more of its judicial positions as permitted by RCW
3.50.040, 3.50.050, or 3.50.070 and contemporaneously filling any or
all remaining judicial positions through an interlocal contract for
judicial services with a hosting jurisdiction.
(4) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit a city
from internally providing some of its own judicial support services and
contemporaneously obtaining additional judicial support services
through an interlocal contract for judicial support services with a
hosting jurisdiction.

--- END ---