BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that effective,
vigorous, and fair competition in the business marketplace facilitates:
(a) Increased innovation, higher efficiency, and the reduction of
overall product and service costs;
(b) The creation and provision of better products, processes, and
services to consumers; and
(c) The creation of new family wage jobs and the production of
additional tax revenues for the state that comes with new business
formation.
(2)(a) Solid waste collection companies, subject to regulation by
the utilities and transportation commission as to rates and service
under chapter 81.77 RCW, may engage in both regulated and unregulated
business activities within the state of Washington.
(b) Without proper regulation and control, it is increasingly
possible that the capital assets or the operating revenues and expenses
associated with engaging in an unregulated, competitive business
activity may become inextricably commingled with the capital assets or
the operating revenues and expenses associated with the regulated
business activity with its guaranteed coverage of costs and protected
rate of return.
(c) It is not in the public's interest for solid waste collection
companies, subject to regulation by the utilities and transportation
commission as to rates and service under chapter 81.77 RCW, to use
their special status as a government-sanctioned monopoly to compete
unfairly against other Washington businesses.
(d) Allowing solid waste collection companies to use regulated
ratepayer resources to subsidize unregulated business activities is
detrimental to the state's goal of increasing recycling rates.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature in this act to:
(a) Clarify current statutes to ensure that solid waste collection
companies and their affiliated interests, subject to regulation by the
utilities and transportation commission as to rates and service under
chapter 81.77 RCW, keep separate the capital assets or operating
revenues and expenses associated with any business activity not subject
to regulation by the utilities and transportation commission as to
rates and service under chapter 81.77 RCW; and
(b) Prohibit the utilities and transportation commission, when
setting the rates for a solid waste collection company or an affiliated
interest that is subject to regulation as to rates and service under
chapter 81.77 RCW, from considering any capital assets or operating
revenues and expenses associated with any business activity not subject
to regulation under chapter 81.77 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A solid waste collection company or affiliated interest,
subject to regulation by the commission as to rates and service under
this chapter, that engages in any business activity not subject to
regulation by the commission as to rates and service under this chapter
must keep distinctly separate the capital assets and the operating
revenues and expenses employed in such a business activity.
(2) In determining rates for a solid waste collection company, as
provided in RCW 81.04.250 and 81.77.030, the commission may not
consider, under any standard, formula, method, or theory of valuation
reasonably calculated to arrive at the objective of prescribing and
authorizing just and reasonable rates, the capital assets or the
operating revenues and expenses associated with any business activity
not subject to regulation by the commission under this chapter.
(3) A solid waste collection company or affiliated interest,
subject to regulation by the commission as to rates and service under
this chapter, must annually provide the commission with any accounting
records, as prescribed by the commission and in appropriately specific
detail, necessary for the commission to exclude from rate-making
consideration the capital assets or the operating revenues and expenses
associated with any business activity not subject to regulation by the
commission under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "fair competition for the environment act of 2009."

--- END ---