BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.093 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each
component city or town shall pay such proportion of the supplemental
income to the authority as determined by either one of the following
prescribed methods or by a combination of fifty percent of one and
fifty percent of the other as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this
section:
(a) Each component city or town shall pay such proportion of the
supplemental income as the assessed valuation of property within its
limits bears to the total assessed valuation of taxable property within
the activated authority.
(b) Each component city or town shall pay such proportion of the
supplemental income as the total population of such city or town bears
to the total population of the activated authority. The population of
the city or town shall be determined by the most recent census,
estimate or survey by the federal bureau of census or any state board
or commission authorized to make such a census, estimate or survey.
(c) A combination of the methods prescribed in (a) and (b) of this
subsection: PROVIDED, That such combination shall be of fifty percent
of the method prescribed in (a) of this subsection and fifty percent of
the method prescribed in (b) of this subsection.
(2) Each component county shall pay such proportion of such
supplemental income to the authority as determined by either one of the
following prescribed methods or by a combination of fifty percent of
one and fifty percent of the other as prescribed in subsection (2)(c)
of this section:
(a) Each component county shall pay such proportion of such
supplemental income as the assessed valuation of the property within
the unincorporated area of such county lying within the activated
authority bears to the total assessed valuation of taxable property
within the activated authority.
(b) Each component county shall pay such proportion of the
supplemental income as the total population of the unincorporated area
of such county bears to the total population of the activated
authority. The population of the county shall be determined by the
most recent census, estimate or survey by the federal bureau of census
or any state board or commission authorized to make such a census,
estimate or survey.
(c) A combination of the methods prescribed in (a) and (b) of this
subsection: PROVIDED, That such combination shall be of fifty percent
of the method prescribed in (a) of this subsection and fifty percent of
the method prescribed in (b) of this subsection.
(3) In making such determination of the assessed valuation of
property in the component cities, towns and counties, the board shall
use the last available assessed valuations. The board shall certify to
each component city, town and county, prior to the fourth Monday in
June of each year, the share of the supplemental income to be paid by
such component city, town or county for the next calendar year. The
latter shall then include such amount in its budget for the ensuing
calendar year, and during such year shall pay to the activated
authority, in equal quarterly installments, the amount of its
supplemental share.
(4) Component cities and towns, with a population of one thousand
people or fewer, located wholly within a federally recognized Indian
reservation are exempt from the supplemental income requirements of
this section.

--- END ---