BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.041 and 2000 c 79 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All individual health benefit plans, other than catastrophic
health plans((, offered or renewed on or after October 1, 2000)) and
plans for young adults described in subsection (3) of this section,
shall include benefits described in this section. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require a carrier to offer an individual
health benefit plan.
(a) Maternity services that include, with no enrollee cost-sharing
requirements beyond those generally applicable cost-sharing
requirements: Diagnosis of pregnancy; prenatal care; delivery; care
for complications of pregnancy; physician services; hospital services;
operating or other special procedure rooms; radiology and laboratory
services; appropriate medications; anesthesia; and services required
under RCW 48.43.115; and
(b) Prescription drug benefits with at least a two thousand dollar
benefit payable by the carrier annually.
(2) If a carrier offers a health benefit plan that is not a
catastrophic health plan to groups, and it chooses to offer a health
benefit plan to individuals, it must offer at least one health benefit
plan to individuals that is not a catastrophic health plan.
(3) Carriers may design and offer a separate health plan targeted
at young adults between nineteen and thirty-four years of age. The
plan may include the benefits required under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section but is not required to include these benefits. The health
plan designed for young adults is exempt from the requirements of RCW
48.43.045(1), 48.43.515(5), 48.44.327, 48.20.392, 48.46.277, 48.43.043,
48.20.580, 48.21.241, 48.44.341, and 48.46.291. Carriers who choose to
exclude maternity services from a young adult plan offered under this
section must allow enrollees who become pregnant to transfer to another
health benefit plan with similar cost-sharing provisions that provides
coverage for maternity services, once pregnancy is confirmed by a
licensed provider. Carriers shall allow the transfer to occur without
applying a preexisting condition waiting period or other limitation or
penalty including, but not limited to, satisfying a new deductible or
stop-loss requirement.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.022 and 2006 c 100 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.44.021,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health care service contractor shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health care service contractor shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.44.021, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023. Carriers
may treat young adults and products developed specifically for them
consistent with RCW 48.43.041(3) as a single-banded experience pool for
purposes of establishing rates. The rates established for this age
group are not subject to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.44.023 "health benefit
plan," "small employer," "adjusted community rates," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.064 and 2006 c 100 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.46.063,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.46.063, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066. Carriers
may treat young adults and products developed specifically for them
consistent with RCW 48.43.041(3) as a single-banded experience pool for
purposes of establishing rates. The rates established for this age
group are not subject to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.46.066, "health benefit
plan," "adjusted community rate," "small employer," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.20.029 and 2006 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals who purchase
the plan as a member of a purchasing pool:
(a) Consisting of five hundred or more individuals affiliated with
a particular industry;
(b) To whom care management services are provided as a benefit of
pool membership; and
(c) Which allows contributions from more than one employer to be
used towards the purchase of an individual's health benefit plan;
shall be calculated using the adjusted community rating method that
spreads financial risk across the entire purchasing pool of which the
individual is a member. All such rates shall conform to the following:
(i) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(A) Geographic area;
(B) Family size;
(C) Age;
(D) Tenure discounts; and
(E) Wellness activities.
(ii) The adjustment for age in (c)(i)(C) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(iii) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer, and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates are subject to the requirements of this subsection.
(iv) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(v) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(vi) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(A) Changes to the family composition;
(B) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual;
or
(C) Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit
plan.
(vii) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(viii) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health
plan of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.21.045. Carriers
may treat young adults and products developed specifically for them
consistent with RCW 48.43.041(3) as a single-banded experience pool for
purposes of establishing rates. The rates established for this age
group are not subject to subsection (1)(c)(iv) of this section.
(3) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "adjusted
community rates," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in
RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the insurance commissioner shall make available
educational and outreach materials targeted to young adults aged
nineteen to thirty-four, as funding becomes available. Education and
outreach efforts shall focus on educating young consumers on the
importance and value of health insurance, including educational
materials, public service messages, and other outreach activities. The
commissioner is authorized to fund these activities with grants,
donations, in-kind contributions, or other funding that may be
available.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.47.020 and 2007 c 259 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children:
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan;
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; ((and))
(vi) Who is 35 years of age or older; and
(vii) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan;
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv)
and (((vi))) (vii) of this subsection and who is a foster parent
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the
time of enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv) and (((vi))) (vii) of this
subsection and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is
more than two hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one
percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services.
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their
employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as
consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee, a
nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollee.
(10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

--- END ---