BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The certificate of need process established
in chapter 70.38 RCW is hereby abolished. By November 15, 2009, the
code reviser shall recommend to the legislature appropriate legislation
that effectuates the purposes of this act by removing references to the
certificate of need process in sections of the Revised Code of
Washington not repealed by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.370.040 (Department of health -- Certificate of need
review program) and 2007 c 259 s 53;
(2) RCW 70.38.015 (Declaration of public policy) and 2007 c 259 s
55, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 601, 1983 c 235 s 1, 1980 c 139 s 1, & 1979
ex.s. c 161 s 1;
(3) RCW 70.38.018 (Statewide health resources strategy--Consistency -- Waivers) and 2007 c 259 s 56;
(4) RCW 70.38.025 (Definitions) and 2000 c 175 s 22, 1997 c 210 s
2, 1991 c 158 s 1, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 602, 1988 c 20 s 1, 1983 1st
ex.s. c 41 s 43, 1983 c 235 s 2, 1982 c 119 s 1, 1980 c 139 s 2, & 1979
ex.s. c 161 s 2;
(5) RCW 70.38.095 (Public disclosure) and 2005 c 274 s 332 & 1979
ex.s. c 161 s 9;
(6) RCW 70.38.105 (Health services and facilities requiring
certificate of need -- Fees) and 2004 c 261 s 6, 1996 c 50 s 1, 1992 c 27
s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 4, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 603, 1984 c 288 s 21,
1983 c 235 s 7, 1982 c 119 s 2, 1980 c 139 s 7, & 1979 ex.s. c 161 s
10;
(7) RCW 70.38.111 (Certificates of need -- Exemptions) and 1997 c 210
s 1, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 71, 1993 c 508 s 5, 1992 c 27 s 2, 1991 c
158 s 2, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 604, 1982 c 119 s 3, & 1980 c 139 s 9;
(8) RCW 70.38.115 (Certificates of need -- Procedures -- Rules--Criteria for review -- Conditional certificates of need -- Concurrent
review -- Review periods -- Hearing -- Adjudicative proceeding -- Amended
certificates of need) and 1996 c 178 s 22, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 72, &
1993 c 508 s 6;
(9) RCW 70.38.118 (Certificates of need -- Applications submitted by
hospice agencies) and 2000 c 175 s 23;
(10) RCW 70.38.125 (Certificates of need -- Issuance -- Duration--Penalties for violations) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 606, 1983 c 235 s 9,
1980 c 139 s 10, & 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 12;
(11) RCW 70.38.128 (Certificates of need -- Elective percutaneous
coronary interventions -- Rules) and 2007 c 440 s 1;
(12) RCW 70.38.135 (Services and surveys -- Rules) and 2007 c 259 s
57, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 607, 1983 c 235 s 10, & 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 13;
(13) RCW 70.38.155 (Certificates of need -- Savings -- 1979 ex.s. c
161) and 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 15;
(14) RCW 70.38.156 (Certificates of need -- Savings -- 1980 c 139) and
1980 c 139 s 11;
(15) RCW 70.38.157 (Certificates of need -- Savings -- 1983 c 235) and
1983 c 235 s 11;
(16) RCW 70.38.158 (Certificates of need -- Savings -- 1989 1st ex.s.
c 9 §§ 601 through 607) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 608;
(17) RCW 70.38.220 (Ethnic minorities -- Nursing home beds that
reflect cultural differences) and 1991 c 271 s 1;
(18) RCW 70.38.230 (Residential hospice care centers -- Defined--Change in bed capacity -- Applicability of chapter) and 1998 c 322 s 50;
(19) RCW 70.38.250 (Redistribution and addition of beds--Determination) and 1999 c 376 s 2;
(20) RCW 70.38.905 (Conflict with federal law -- Construction) and
1983 c 235 s 12 & 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 16;
(21) RCW 70.38.910 (Severability -- 1983 c 235; 1979 ex.s. c 161) and
1983 c 235 s 13 & 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 17;
(22) RCW 70.38.911 (Severability -- 1980 c 139) and 1980 c 139 s 12;
(23) RCW 70.38.914 (Pending certificates of need -- 1983 c 235) and
1983 c 235 s 14;
(24) RCW 70.38.915 (Effective dates -- Pending certificates of need--1979 ex.s. c 161) and 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 19;
(25) RCW 70.38.916 (Effective date -- 1980 c 139) and 1980 c 139 s
14;
(26) RCW 70.38.918 (Effective dates -- Pending certificates of need--1989 1st ex.s. c 9) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 609; and
(27) RCW 70.38.920 (Short title) and 1979 ex.s. c 161 s 22.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---