BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Health care providers licensed under Title 18 RCW and health
care facilities licensed under Title 70 RCW, shall provide the
following to a patient upon request:
(a) An estimate of fees and charges related to a specific service,
visit, or stay; and
(b) Information regarding other types of fees or charges a patient
may receive in conjunction with their visit to the provider or
facility.
(2) Providers and facilities listed in subsection (1) of this
section may, after disclosing estimated charges and fees to a patient,
refer the patient to the patient's insurer, if applicable, for specific
information on the insurer's negotiated charges and fees, and any cost-
sharing responsibilities required of the patient.

--- END ---