BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a person
conducting business as a sole proprietorship may credit against the tax
imposed by this chapter fifty percent of the value paid during the
reporting period for health insurance premiums. The credit may not
exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the reporting
period. Unused credit may be carried over and used in subsequent tax
reporting periods. No refunds are granted for credits under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for
fifty percent of the amount paid by small employers to provide health
care services for its employees during the reporting period. The
credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
reporting period. Payments made by employees are not eligible for
credit under this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Small employer" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030
that employs an average of at least two but not more than one hundred
fifty employees; and
(b) "Health care services" means a health benefit plan as defined
in RCW 48.43.005, contributions to health savings accounts as defined
by the United States internal revenue service, or other health care
services purchased by the small employer for its employees.
(3) A small employer taking a credit under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The taxes imposed in RCW 48.14.020 and 48.14.0201 do not apply
to premiums and prepayments collected or received for high deductible
health plans sold or maintained in connection with a health savings
account under the applicable provisions of Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 223 of
the federal internal revenue code.
(2) An insurer receiving an exemption under this section shall
reduce premiums and prepayments collected or received by an amount
equal to the exemption.
(3) An insurer taking an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the commissioner to verify eligibility under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---