BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A joint select committee on high-speed
rail is established. The committee shall consider, but is not limited
to, developing a plan to build and finance a high-speed rail network
running from Bellingham to Portland, Oregon and from Seattle to
Spokane. The high-speed rail network must be capable of traveling at
speeds of least two hundred twenty-five miles per hour.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority
leader of the senate shall select two members from each of the two
largest caucuses in the house of representatives and each of the two
largest caucuses in the senate to serve on the committee.
(3) The committee may seek assistance from other members of the
senate and the house of representatives and other interested parties to
provide advice and technical assistance.
(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the house
of representatives office of program research and the senate committee
services.
(5) Legislative members of the committee may be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(6) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(7) The committee shall examine and analyze the following items:
(a) The best available technology for a high-speed rail network
based on the following criteria:
(i) Cost per mile for operation and construction;
(ii) Long-term costs;
(iii) Best top speed;
(iv) Flexibility;
(v) Ability to handle freight cargo;
(vi) Energy consumption; and
(vii) Reliability;
(b) Identification of potential rights-of-way and routes for new
construction;
(c) Identification of public-private financing opportunities
including:
(i) Design/build/operate;
(ii) Sale of development rights;
(iii) The potential for private ownership of all or portions of a
new rail system, the operations of a rail system, and operations of
ancillary services associated with the rail line; and
(iv) Potential operating costs and public subsidies;
(d) Examination of opportunities to colocate high-speed rail
network tracks with a new power grid infrastructure;
(e) Quantification of economic development potential of
constructing new rail lines.
(8) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to
the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by December 1, 2010.
(9) This section expires February 1, 2011.

--- END ---