BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.22.280 and 2008 c 129 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any city of the first class shall have power:
(1) To provide for general and special elections, for questions to
be voted upon, and for the election of officers;
(2) To provide for levying and collecting taxes on real and
personal property for its corporate uses and purposes, and to provide
for the payment of the debts and expenses of the corporation;
(3) To control the finances and property of the corporation, and to
acquire, by purchase or otherwise, such lands and other property as may
be necessary for any part of the corporate uses provided for by its
charter, and to dispose of any such property as the interests of the
corporation may, from time to time, require;
(4) To borrow money for corporate purposes on the credit of the
corporation, and to issue negotiable bonds therefor, on such conditions
and in such manner as shall be prescribed in its charter; but no city
shall, in any manner or for any purpose, become indebted to an amount
in the aggregate to exceed the limitation of indebtedness prescribed by
chapter 39.36 RCW as now or hereafter amended;
(5) To issue bonds in place of or to supply means to meet maturing
bonds or other indebtedness, or for the consolidation or funding of the
same;
(6) To purchase or appropriate private property within or without
its corporate limits, for its corporate uses, upon making just
compensation to the owners thereof, and to institute and maintain such
proceedings as may be authorized by the general laws of the state for
the appropriation of private property for public use;
(7) To lay out, establish, open, alter, widen, extend, grade, pave,
plank, establish grades, or otherwise improve streets, alleys, avenues,
sidewalks, wharves, parks, and other public grounds, and to regulate
and control the use thereof, and to vacate the same, and to authorize
or prohibit the use of electricity at, in, or upon any of said streets,
or for other purposes, and to prescribe the terms and conditions upon
which the same may be so used, and to regulate the use thereof;
(8) To change the grade of any street, highway, or alley within its
corporate limits, and to provide for the payment of damages to any
abutting owner or owners who shall have built or made other
improvements upon such street, highway, or alley at any point opposite
to the point where such change shall be made with reference to the
grade of such street, highway, or alley as the same existed prior to
such change;
(9) To authorize or prohibit the locating and constructing of any
railroad or street railroad in any street, alley, or public place in
such city, and to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which any
such railroad or street railroad shall be located or constructed; to
provide for the alteration, change of grade, or removal thereof; to
regulate the moving and operation of railroad and street railroad
trains, cars, and locomotives within the corporate limits of said city;
and to provide by ordinance for the protection of all persons and
property against injury in the use of such railroads or street
railroads;
(10) To provide for making local improvements, and to levy and
collect special assessments on property benefited thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof;
(11) To acquire, by purchase or otherwise, lands for public parks
within or without the limits of such city, and to improve the same.
When the language of any instrument by which any property is so
acquired limits the use of said property to park purposes and contains
a reservation of interest in favor of the grantor or any other person,
and where it is found that the property so acquired is not needed for
park purposes and that an exchange thereof for other property to be
dedicated for park purposes is in the public interest, the city may,
with the consent of the grantor or such other person, his heirs,
successors, or assigns, exchange such property for other property to be
dedicated for park purposes, and may make, execute, and deliver proper
conveyances to effect the exchange. In any case where, owing to death
or lapse of time, there is neither donor, heir, successor, or assignee
to give consent, this consent may be executed by the city and filed for
record with an affidavit setting forth all efforts made to locate
people entitled to give such consent together with the facts which
establish that no consent by such persons is attainable. Title to
property so conveyed by the city shall vest in the grantee free and
clear of any trust in favor of the public arising out of any prior
dedication for park purposes, but the right of the public shall be
transferred and preserved with like force and effect to the property
received by the city in such exchange;
(12) To construct and keep in repair bridges, viaducts, and
tunnels, and to regulate the use thereof;
(13) To determine what work shall be done or improvements made at
the expense, in whole or in part, of the owners of the adjoining
contiguous, or proximate property, or others specially benefited
thereby; and to provide for the manner of making and collecting
assessments therefor;
(14) To provide for erecting, purchasing, or otherwise acquiring
waterworks, within or without the corporate limits of said city, to
supply said city and its inhabitants with water, or authorize the
construction of same by others when deemed for the best interests of
such city and its inhabitants, and to regulate and control the use and
price of the water so supplied;
(15) To provide for lighting the streets and all public places, and
for furnishing the inhabitants thereof with gas or other lights, and to
erect, or otherwise acquire, and to maintain the same, or to authorize
the erection and maintenance of such works as may be necessary and
convenient therefor, and to regulate and control the use thereof;
(16) To establish and regulate markets, and to provide for the
weighing, measuring, and inspection of all articles of food and drink
offered for sale thereat, or at any other place within its limits, by
proper penalties, and to enforce the keeping of proper legal weights
and measures by all vendors in such city, and to provide for the
inspection thereof. Whenever the words "public markets" are used in
this chapter, and the public market is managed in whole or in part by
a public corporation created by a city, the words shall be construed to
include all real or personal property located in a district or area
designated by a city as a public market and traditionally devoted to
providing farmers, crafts vendors and other merchants with retail space
to market their wares to the public. Property located in such a
district or area need not be exclusively or primarily used for such
traditional public market retail activities and may include property
used for other public purposes including, but not limited to, the
provision of human services and low-income or moderate-income housing;
(17) To erect and establish hospitals and pesthouses, and to
control and regulate the same;
(18) To provide for establishing and maintaining reform schools for
juvenile offenders;
(19) To provide for the establishment and maintenance of public
libraries, and to appropriate, annually, such percent of all moneys
collected for fines, penalties, and licenses as shall be prescribed by
its charter, for the support of a city library, which shall, under such
regulations as shall be prescribed by ordinance, be open for use by the
public;
(20) To regulate the burial of the dead, and to establish and
regulate cemeteries within or without the corporate limits, and to
acquire land therefor by purchase or otherwise; to cause cemeteries to
be removed beyond the limits of the corporation, and to prohibit their
establishment within two miles of the boundaries thereof;
(21) To direct the location and construction of all buildings in
which any trade or occupation offensive to the senses or deleterious to
public health or safety shall be carried on, and to regulate the
management thereof; and to prohibit the erection or maintenance of such
buildings or structures, or the carrying on of such trade or occupation
within the limits of such corporation, or within the distance of two
miles beyond the boundaries thereof;
(22) To provide for the prevention and extinguishment of fires and
to regulate or prohibit the transportation, keeping, or storage of all
combustible or explosive materials within its corporate limits, and to
regulate and restrain the use of fireworks;
(23) To establish fire limits and to make all such regulations for
the erection and maintenance of buildings or other structures within
its corporate limits as the safety of persons or property may require,
and to cause all such buildings and places as may from any cause be in
a dangerous state to be put in safe condition;
(24) To regulate the manner in which stone, brick, and other
buildings, party walls, and partition fences shall be constructed and
maintained;
(25) To deepen, widen, dock, cover, wall, alter, or change the
channels of waterways and courses, and to provide for the construction
and maintenance of all such works as may be required for the
accommodation of commerce, including canals, slips, public landing
places, wharves, docks, and levees, and to control and regulate the use
thereof;
(26) To control, regulate, or prohibit the anchorage, moorage, and
landing of all watercrafts and their cargoes within the jurisdiction of
the corporation;
(27) To fix the rates of wharfage and dockage, and to provide for
the collection thereof, and to provide for the imposition and
collection of such harbor fees as may be consistent with the laws of
the United States;
(28) To license, regulate, control, or restrain wharf boats, tugs,
and other boats used about the harbor or within such jurisdiction;
(29) To require the owners of public halls or other buildings to
provide suitable means of exit; to provide for the prevention and
abatement of nuisances, for the cleaning and purification of
watercourses and canals, for the drainage and filling up of ponds on
private property within its limits, when the same shall be offensive to
the senses or dangerous to health; to regulate and control, and to
prevent and punish, the defilement or pollution of all streams running
through or into its corporate limits, and for the distance of five
miles beyond its corporate limits, and on any stream or lake from which
the water supply of said city is taken, for a distance of five miles
beyond its source of supply; to provide for the cleaning of areas,
vaults, and other places within its corporate limits which may be so
kept as to become offensive to the senses or dangerous to health, and
to make all such quarantine or other regulations as may be necessary
for the preservation of the public health, and to remove all persons
afflicted with any infectious or contagious disease to some suitable
place to be provided for that purpose;
(30) To declare what shall be a nuisance, and to abate the same,
and to impose fines upon parties who may create, continue, or suffer
nuisances to exist;
(31) To regulate the selling or giving away of intoxicating, malt,
vinous, mixed, or fermented liquors as authorized by the general laws
of the state: PROVIDED, That no license shall be granted to any person
or persons who shall not first comply with the general laws of the
state in force at the time the same is granted;
(32) To grant licenses for any lawful purpose, and to fix by
ordinance the amount to be paid therefor, and to provide for revoking
the same. However, no license shall be granted to continue for longer
than one year from the date thereof.
(a) A city may not require a business to be licensed based solely
upon registration under or compliance with the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement.
(b) A city may not require a business to be licensed if the only
activity conducted within the city by the business is the delivery,
including delivery by common carrier and delivery by the business's own
vehicle, of tangible personal property sold by the business;
(33) To regulate the carrying on within its corporate limits of all
occupations which are of such a nature as to affect the public health
or the good order of said city, or to disturb the public peace, and
which are not prohibited by law, and to provide for the punishment of
all persons violating such regulations, and of all persons who
knowingly permit the same to be violated in any building or upon any
premises owned or controlled by them;
(34) To restrain and provide for the punishment of vagrants,
mendicants, prostitutes, and other disorderly persons;
(35) To provide for the punishment of all disorderly conduct, and
of all practices dangerous to public health or safety, and to make all
regulations necessary for the preservation of public morality, health,
peace, and good order within its limits, and to provide for the arrest,
trial, and punishment of all persons charged with violating any of the
ordinances of said city. The punishment shall not exceed a fine of
five thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail for one year, or
both such fine and imprisonment. The punishment for any criminal
ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for
the same crime. Such cities alternatively may provide that violations
of ordinances constitute a civil violation subject to monetary
penalties, but no act which is a state crime may be made a civil
violation;
(36) To project or extend its streets over and across any tidelands
within its corporate limits, and along or across the harbor areas of
such city, in such manner as will best promote the interests of
commerce;
(37) To provide in their respective charters for a method to
propose and adopt amendments thereto.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.23.440 and 2008 c 129 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The city council of each second-class city shall have power and
authority:
(1) Ordinances: To make and pass all ordinances, orders, and
resolutions not repugnant to the Constitution of the United States or
the state of Washington, or the provisions of this title, necessary for
the municipal government and management of the affairs of the city, for
the execution of the powers vested in said body corporate, and for the
carrying into effect of the provisions of this title.
(2) License of shows: To fix and collect a license tax, for the
purposes of revenue and regulation, on theatres, melodeons, balls,
concerts, dances, theatrical, circus, or other performances, and all
performances where an admission fee is charged, or which may be held in
any house or place where wines or liquors are sold to the
participators; also all shows, billiard tables, pool tables, bowling
alleys, exhibitions, or amusements.
(3) Hotels, etc., licenses: To fix and collect a license tax for
the purposes of revenue and regulation on and to regulate all taverns,
hotels, restaurants, banks, brokers, manufactories, livery stables,
express companies and persons engaged in transmitting letters or
packages, railroad, stage, and steamboat companies or owners, whose
principal place of business is in such city, or who have an agency
therein.
(4) Peddlers', etc., licenses: To license, for the purposes of
revenue and regulation, tax, prohibit, suppress, and regulate all
raffles, hawkers, peddlers, pawnbrokers, refreshment or coffee stands,
booths, or sheds; and to regulate as authorized by state law all
tippling houses, dram shops, saloons, bars, and barrooms.
(5) Dance houses: To prohibit or suppress, or to license and
regulate all dance houses, fandango houses, or any exhibition or show
of any animal or animals.
(6) License vehicles: To license for the purposes of revenue and
regulation, and to tax hackney coaches, cabs, omnibuses, drays, market
wagons, and all other vehicles used for hire, and to regulate their
stands, and to fix the rates to be charged for the transportation of
persons, baggage, and property.
(7) Hotel runners: To license or suppress runners for steamboats,
taverns, or hotels.
(8) License generally: To fix and collect a license tax for the
purposes of revenue and regulation, upon all occupations and trades,
and all and every kind of business authorized by law not heretofore
specified. However, on any business, trade, or calling not provided by
law to be licensed for state and county purposes, the amount of license
shall be fixed at the discretion of the city council, as they may deem
the interests and good order of the city may require.
(a) A city may not require a business to be licensed based solely
upon registration under or compliance with the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement.
(b) A city may not require a business to be licensed if the only
activity conducted within the city by the business is the delivery,
including delivery by common carrier and delivery by the business's own
vehicle, of tangible personal property sold by the business.
(9) Riots: To prevent and restrain any riot or riotous
assemblages, disturbance of the peace, or disorderly conduct in any
place, house, or street in the city.
(10) Nuisances: To declare what shall be deemed nuisances; to
prevent, remove, and abate nuisances at the expense of the parties
creating, causing, or committing or maintaining the same, and to levy
a special assessment on the land or premises whereon the nuisance is
situated to defray the cost or to reimburse the city for the cost of
abating the same.
(11) Stock pound: To establish, maintain, and regulate a common
pound for estrays, and to appoint a poundkeeper, who shall be paid out
of the fines and fees imposed and collected of the owners of any
animals impounded, and from no other source; to prevent and regulate
the running at large of any and all domestic animals within the city
limits or any parts thereof, and to regulate or prevent the keeping of
such animals within any part of the city.
(12) Control of certain trades: To control and regulate
slaughterhouses, washhouses, laundries, tanneries, forges, and
offensive trades, and to provide for their exclusion or removal from
the city limits, or from any part thereof.
(13) Street cleaning: To provide, by regulation, for the
prevention and summary removal of all filth and garbage in streets,
sloughs, alleys, back yards, or public grounds of such city, or
elsewhere therein.
(14) Gambling, etc.: To prohibit and suppress all gaming and all
gambling or disorderly houses, and houses of ill fame, and all immoral
and indecent amusements, exhibitions, and shows.
(15) Markets: To establish and regulate markets and market places.
(16) Speed of railroad cars: To fix and regulate the speed at
which any railroad cars, streetcars, automobiles, or other vehicles may
run within the city limits, or any portion thereof.
(17) City commons: To provide for and regulate the commons of the
city.
(18) Fast driving: To regulate or prohibit fast driving or riding
in any portion of the city.
(19) Combustibles: To regulate or prohibit the loading or storage
of gunpowder and combustible or explosive materials in the city, or
transporting the same through its streets or over its waters.
(20) Property: To have, purchase, hold, use, and enjoy property of
every name or kind whatsoever, and to sell, lease, transfer, mortgage,
convey, control, or improve the same; to build, erect, or construct
houses, buildings, or structures of any kind needful for the use or
purposes of such city.
(21) Fire department: To establish, continue, regulate, and
maintain a fire department for such city, to change or reorganize the
same, and to disband any company or companies of the said department;
also, to discontinue and disband said fire department, and to create,
organize, establish, and maintain a paid fire department for such city.
(22) Water supply: To adopt, enter into, and carry out means for
securing a supply of water for the use of such city or its inhabitants,
or for irrigation purposes therein.
(23) Overflow of water: To prevent the overflow of the city or to
secure its drainage, and to assess the cost thereof to the property
benefited.
(24) House numbers: To provide for the numbering of houses.
(25) Health board: To establish a board of health; to prevent the
introduction and spread of disease; to establish a city infirmary and
to provide for the indigent sick; and to provide and enforce
regulations for the protection of health, cleanliness, peace, and good
order of the city; to establish and maintain hospitals within or
without the city limits; to control and regulate interments and to
prohibit them within the city limits.
(26) Harbors and wharves: To build, alter, improve, keep in
repair, and control the waterfront; to erect, regulate, and repair
wharves, and to fix the rate of wharfage and transit of wharf, and levy
dues upon vessels and commodities; and to provide for the regulation of
berths, landing, stationing, and removing steamboats, sail vessels,
rafts, barges, and all other watercraft; to fix the rate of speed at
which steamboats and other steam watercraft may run along the
waterfront of the city; to build bridges so as not to interfere with
navigation; to provide for the removal of obstructions to the
navigation of any channel or watercourses or channels.
(27) License of steamers: To license steamers, boats, and vessels
used in any watercourse in the city, and to fix and collect a license
tax thereon.
(28) Ferry licenses: To license ferries and toll bridges under the
law regulating the granting of such license.
(29) Penalty for violation of ordinances: To provide that
violations of ordinances with the punishment for any offense not
exceeding a fine of five thousand dollars or imprisonment for more than
one year, or both fine and imprisonment, but the punishment for any
criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in
state law for the same crime. Alternatively, such a city may provide
that a violation of an ordinance constitutes a civil violation subject
to monetary penalties or to determine and impose fines for forfeitures
and penalties, but no act which is a state crime may be made a civil
violation. A violation of an order, regulation, or ordinance relating
to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian
offenses is a traffic infraction, except that violation of an order,
regulation, or ordinance equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW
set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.
(30) Police department: To create and establish a city police; to
prescribe their duties and their compensation; and to provide for the
regulation and government of the same.
(31) Examine official accounts: To examine, either in open session
or by committee, the accounts or doings of all officers or other
persons having the care, management, or disposition of moneys,
property, or business of the city.
(32) Contracts: To make all appropriations, contracts, or
agreements for the use or benefit of the city and in the city's name.
(33) Streets and sidewalks: To provide by ordinance for the
opening, laying out, altering, extending, repairing, grading, paving,
planking, graveling, macadamizing, or otherwise improving of public
streets, avenues, and other public ways, or any portion of any thereof;
and for the construction, regulation, and repair of sidewalks and other
street improvements, all at the expense of the property to be benefited
thereby, without any recourse, in any event, upon the city for any
portion of the expense of such work, or any delinquency of the property
holders or owners, and to provide for the forced sale thereof for such
purposes; to establish a uniform grade for streets, avenues, sidewalks,
and squares, and to enforce the observance thereof.
(34) Waterways: To clear, cleanse, alter, straighten, widen, fill
up, or close any waterway, drain, or sewer, or any watercourse in such
city when not declared by law to be navigable, and to assess the
expense thereof, in whole or in part, to the property specially
benefited.
(35) Sewerage: To adopt, provide for, establish, and maintain a
general system of sewerage, draining, or both, and the regulation
thereof; to provide funds by local assessments on the property
benefited for the purpose aforesaid and to determine the manner, terms,
and place of connection with main or central lines of pipes, sewers, or
drains established, and compel compliance with and conformity to such
general system of sewerage or drainage, or both, and the regulations of
said council thereto relating, by the infliction of suitable penalties
and forfeitures against persons and property, or either, for
nonconformity to, or failure to comply with the provisions of such
system and regulations or either.
(36) Buildings and parks: To provide for all public buildings,
public parks, or squares, necessary or proper for the use of the city.
(37) Franchises: To permit the use of the streets for railroad or
other public service purposes.
(38) Payment of judgments: To order paid any final judgment
against such city, but none of its lands or property of any kind or
nature, taxes, revenue, franchise, or rights, or interest, shall be
attached, levied upon, or sold in or under any process whatsoever.
(39) Weighing of fuel: To regulate the sale of coal and wood in
such city, and may appoint a measurer of wood and weigher of coal for
the city, and define his duties, and may prescribe his term of office,
and the fees he shall receive for his services: PROVIDED, That such
fees shall in all cases be paid by the parties requiring such service.
(40) Hospitals, etc.: To erect and establish hospitals and
pesthouses and to control and regulate the same.
(41) Waterworks: To provide for the erection, purchase, or
otherwise acquiring of waterworks within or without the corporate
limits of the city to supply such city and its inhabitants with water,
and to regulate and control the use and price of the water so supplied.
(42) City lights: To provide for lighting the streets and all
public places of the city and for furnishing the inhabitants of the
city with gas, electric, or other light, and for the ownership,
purchase or acquisition, construction, or maintenance of such works as
may be necessary or convenient therefor: PROVIDED, That no purchase of
any such water plant or light plant shall be made without first
submitting the question of such purchase to the electors of the city.
(43) Parks: To acquire by purchase or otherwise land for public
parks, within or without the limits of the city, and to improve the
same.
(44) Bridges: To construct and keep in repair bridges, and to
regulate the use thereof.
(45) Power of eminent domain: In the name of and for the use and
benefit of the city, to exercise the right of eminent domain, and to
condemn lands and property for the purposes of streets, alleys, parks,
public grounds, waterworks, or for any other municipal purpose and to
acquire by purchase or otherwise such lands and property as may be
deemed necessary for any of the corporate uses provided for by this
title, as the interests of the city may from time to time require.
(46) To provide for the assessment of taxes: To provide for the
assessment, levying, and collecting of taxes on real and personal
property for the corporate uses and purposes of the city and to provide
for the payment of the debts and expenses of the corporation.
(47) Local improvements: To provide for making local improvements,
and to levy and collect special assessments on the property benefited
thereby and for paying the same or any portion thereof; to determine
what work shall be done or improvements made, at the expense, in whole
or in part, of the adjoining, contiguous, or proximate property, and to
provide for the manner of making and collecting assessments therefor.
(48) Cemeteries: To regulate the burial of the dead and to
establish and regulate cemeteries, within or without the corporate
limits, and to acquire lands therefor by purchase or otherwise.
(49) Fire limits: To establish fire limits with proper regulations
and to make all needful regulations for the erection and maintenance of
buildings or other structures within the corporate limits as safety of
persons or property may require, and to cause all such buildings and
places as may from any cause be in a dangerous state to be put in a
safe condition; to regulate the manner in which stone, brick, and other
buildings, party walls, and partition fences shall be constructed and
maintained.
(50) Safety and sanitary measures: To require the owners of public
halls, theaters, hotels, and other buildings to provide suitable means
of exit and proper fire escapes; to provide for the cleaning and
purification of watercourses and canals and for the draining and
filling up of ponds on private property within its limits when the same
shall be offensive to the senses or dangerous to the health, and to
charge the expense thereof to the property specially benefited, and to
regulate and control and provide for the prevention and punishment of
the defilement or pollution of all streams running in or through its
corporate limits and a distance of five miles beyond its corporate
limits, and of any stream or lake from which the water supply of the
city is or may be taken and for a distance of five miles beyond its
source of supply, and to make all quarantine and other regulations as
may be necessary for the preservation of the public health and to
remove all persons afflicted with any contagious disease to some
suitable place to be provided for that purpose.
(51) To regulate liquor traffic: To regulate the selling or giving
away of intoxicating, spirituous, malt, vinous, mixed, or fermented
liquors as authorized by the general laws of the state.
(52) To establish streets on tidelands: To project or extend or
establish streets over and across any tidelands within the limits of
such city.
(53) To provide for the general welfare.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.27.370 and 2008 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council of said town shall have power:
(1) To pass ordinances not in conflict with the Constitution and
laws of this state, or of the United States;
(2) To purchase, lease or receive such real estate and personal
property as may be necessary or proper for municipal purposes, and to
control, dispose of and convey the same for the benefit of the town; to
acquire, own, and hold real estate for cemetery purposes either within
or without the corporate limits, to sell and dispose of such real
estate, to plat or replat such real estate into cemetery lots and to
sell and dispose of any and all lots therein, and to operate, improve
and maintain the same as a cemetery;
(3) To contract for supplying the town with water for municipal
purposes, or to acquire, construct, repair and manage pumps, aqueducts,
reservoirs, or other works necessary or proper for supplying water for
use of such town or its inhabitants, or for irrigating purposes
therein;
(4) To establish, build and repair bridges, to establish, lay out,
alter, widen, extend, keep open, improve, and repair streets,
sidewalks, alleys, squares and other public highways and places within
the town, and to drain, sprinkle and light the same; to remove all
obstructions therefrom; to establish the grades thereof; to grade,
pave, plank, macadamize, gravel and curb the same, in whole or in part,
and to construct gutters, culverts, sidewalks and crosswalks therein,
or on any part thereof; to cause to be planted, set out and cultivated
trees therein, and generally to manage and control all such highways
and places;
(5) To establish, construct and maintain drains and sewers, and
shall have power to compel all property owners on streets along which
sewers are constructed to make proper connections therewith, and to use
the same for proper purposes when such property is improved by the
erection thereon of a building or buildings; and in case the owners of
such improved property on such streets shall fail to make such
connections within the time fixed by such council, they may cause such
connections to be made, and to assess against the property in front of
which such connections are made the costs and expenses thereof;
(6) To provide fire engines and all other necessary or proper
apparatus for the prevention and extinguishment of fires;
(7) To impose and collect an annual license on every dog within the
limits of the town, to prohibit dogs running at large, and to provide
for the killing of all dogs found at large and not duly licensed;
(8) To levy and collect annually a property tax, for the payment of
current expenses and for the payment of indebtedness (if any
indebtedness exists) within the limits authorized by law;
(9) To license, for purposes of regulation and revenue, all and
every kind of business, authorized by law and transacted and carried on
in such town; and all shows, exhibitions and lawful games carried on
therein and within one mile of the corporate limits thereof; to fix the
rate of license tax upon the same, and to provide for the collection of
the same, by suit or otherwise; to regulate, restrain, or prohibit the
running at large of any and all domestic animals within the city
limits, or any part or parts thereof, and to regulate the keeping of
such animals within any part of the city; to establish, maintain and
regulate a common pound for estrays, and to appoint a poundkeeper, who
shall be paid out of the fines and fees imposed on, and collected from,
the owners of any impounded stock.
(a) A ((city)) town may not require a business to be licensed based
solely upon registration under or compliance with the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement.
(b) A town may not require a business to be licensed if the only
activity conducted within the town by the business is the delivery,
including delivery by common carrier and delivery by the business's own
vehicle, of tangible personal property sold by the business;
(10) To improve the rivers and streams flowing through such town or
adjoining the same; to widen, straighten and deepen the channels
thereof, and to remove obstructions therefrom; to prevent the pollution
of streams or water running through such town, and for this purpose
shall have jurisdiction for two miles in either direction; to improve
the waterfront of the town, and to construct and maintain embankments
and other works to protect such town from overflow;
(11) To erect and maintain buildings for municipal purposes;
(12) To grant franchises or permits to use and occupy the surface,
the overhead and the underground of streets, alleys and other public
ways, under such terms and conditions as it shall deem fit, for any and
all purposes, including but not being limited to the construction,
maintenance and operation of railroads, street railways, transportation
systems, water, gas and steam systems, telephone and telegraph systems,
electric lines, signal systems, surface, aerial and underground
tramways;
(13) To punish the keepers and inmates and lessors of houses of ill
fame, and keepers and lessors of gambling houses and rooms and other
places where gambling is carried on or permitted, gamblers and keepers
of gambling tables;
(14) To impose fines, penalties and forfeitures for any and all
violations of ordinances, and for any breach or violation of any
ordinance, to fix the penalty by fine or imprisonment, or both; but no
such fine shall exceed five thousand dollars, nor the term of
imprisonment exceed one year, except that the punishment for any
criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in
state law for the same crime; or to provide that violations of
ordinances constitute a civil violation subject to a monetary penalty,
but no act which is a state crime may be made a civil violation;
(15) To operate ambulance service which may serve the town and
surrounding rural areas and, in the discretion of the council, to make
a charge for such service;
(16) To make all such ordinances, bylaws, rules, regulations and
resolutions not inconsistent with the Constitution and laws of the
state of Washington, as may be deemed expedient to maintain the peace,
good government and welfare of the town and its trade, commerce and
manufacturers, and to do and perform any and all other acts and things
necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.102.050 and 2008 c 129 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city may not impose a business and occupation tax on a person
unless that person has nexus with the city. For the purposes of this
section, the term "nexus" means business activities conducted by a
person sufficient to subject that person to the taxing jurisdiction of
a city under the standards established for interstate commerce under
the commerce clause of the United States Constitution.
(2) Mere registration under or compliance with the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement does not constitute nexus for the purposes
of this section.
(3) A city may not impose a business and occupation tax on a person
if the only activity conducted within the city by the person is the
delivery, including delivery by common carrier and delivery by the
person's own vehicle, of tangible personal property sold by the person.

Sec. 5 RCW 35A.21.335 and 2008 c 129 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A code city may not require a business to be licensed based solely
upon registration under or compliance with the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement. A code city may not require a business to be
licensed if the only activity conducted within the code city by the
business is the delivery, including delivery by common carrier and
delivery by the business's own vehicle, of tangible personal property
sold by the business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, no
interest or penalties may be imposed on any taxpayer because of errors
in collecting or remitting the correct amount of local sales or use tax
arising out of changes in local sales and use tax sourcing rules
implemented under RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007
amendments to RCW 82.14.020 if the taxpayer demonstrates that it made
a good faith effort to comply with the sourcing rules.
(2) The relief from penalty and interest provided by subsection (1)
of this section does not apply with respect to transactions occurring
after December 31, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Impacted taxpayers may either:
(a) Use the services of a certified service provider at no cost to
themselves for tax reporting periods up to one year after July 1, 2010;
or
(b) Claim a credit against the tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1),
collected and otherwise required to be remitted by the taxpayer as a
seller and the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.220. The amount of the
credit is equal to the amount of costs incurred June 30, 2009, in order
to comply with the changes in the local sales and use tax sourcing
rules implemented under RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007
amendments to RCW 82.14.020.
(i) The total amount of credit claimed under this subsection (1)(b)
may not exceed one thousand dollars.
(ii) The credit may be claimed until it is used. No refunds may be
granted for the credit. The costs that may be used in the calculation
of the credit include goods and services purchased, and labor costs
incurred, for the purpose of complying with the local sales tax
sourcing rules.
(iii) The credit may only be claimed on tax returns for tax
reporting periods ending after June 30, 2009.
(2) The use of a certified service provider under subsection (1)(a)
of this section must begin before July 1, 2010.
(3) The credit under subsection (1)(b) of this section must first
be claimed before July 1, 2010. This subsection does not affect the
ability of a taxpayer to claim unused credit until it is used.
(4) For purposes of this section, "impacted taxpayer" means a
taxpayer that:
(a) Immediately before July 1, 2008, was registered with the
department and engaged in making sales of tangible personal property
that the taxpayer delivered to physical locations away from its place
of business; and
(b) During the calendar year of 2008:
(i) Had a physical presence in Washington;
(ii) Had gross income of the business less than three million
dollars, but equal to or more than five hundred thousand dollars;
(iii) Had at least five percent of its gross income from sales
subject to sales tax derived from sales of tangible personal property
delivered to physical locations away from its place of business; and
(iv) Had at least one percent of its gross income from sales
subject to sales tax derived from deliveries of tangible personal
property to destinations in local jurisdictions imposing sales tax
other than the one to which the taxpayer reported the most local sales
tax.
(5) Certified service providers agreeing to provide services to
impacted taxpayers under subsection (1)(a) of this section must be
compensated for those services by retaining as a fee an amount adopted
by rule by the department. The department may be guided by the
provisions for monetary allowances adopted by the governing board of
the agreement to determine the amount of the fee. The fee must be
reasonable and provide adequate incentive for certified service
providers to provide services to impacted taxpayers. The fee will be
funded solely from state sales taxes.
(6) No application is necessary for either the use of certified
service providers under subsection (1)(a) of this section or the tax
credit under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The taxpayer must keep
records necessary for the department to determine eligibility under
this section. The department may prescribe rules and procedures
regarding the administration of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.14.055 and 2003 c 168 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, a local sales and use tax change shall take effect (a) no
sooner than seventy-five days after the department receives notice of
the change and (b) only on the first day of January((, April,)) or
July((, or October)).
(2) In the case of a local sales and use tax that is a credit
against the state sales tax or use tax, a local sales and use tax
change shall take effect (a) no sooner than thirty days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day
of a month.
(3)(a) A local sales and use tax rate increase imposed on services
applies to the first billing period starting on or after the effective
date of the increase.
(b) A local sales and use tax rate decrease imposed on services
applies to bills rendered on or after the effective date of the
decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "local sales and use tax
change" means enactment or revision of local sales and use taxes under
this chapter or any other statute, including changes resulting from
referendum or annexation.

--- END ---