BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
Any retailer in the state may provide an opportunity for patrons to
make voluntary donations to the disabled veterans assistance account
created in section 2 of this act on Veterans' Day and any additional
days the retailer decides would be appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The disabled veterans assistance account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the
authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for
the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required to permit the expenditure of the funds.
(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated
contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds
generated by voluntary donations under section 1 of this act.
(3) All receipts from voluntary donations under section 1 of this
act must be deposited into the account.
(4) All moneys deposited into the account must be used by the
department for activities that benefit veterans including, but not
limited to, providing programs and services that assist veterans with
the procurement of durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing
equipment, emergency home or vehicle repair, emergency food or
emergency shelter, or service animals. The first priority for
assistance provided through the account must be given to veterans who
are experiencing a financial hardship and do not qualify for other
federal or state veterans programs and services. Funds from the
account may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the
department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same
meaning as in RCW 41.04.005 and 41.04.007, and also means an actively
serving member of the national guard or reserves, or is active duty
military personnel.

--- END ---