BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall issue a special license plate displaying a
symbol or artwork with the words, "In God We Trust." The special
license plate may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license
plates for vehicles required to display one or two vehicle license
plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon
terms and conditions established by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"In God We Trust license plates" means license plates issued under
section 1 of this act that display a symbol or artwork with the words,
"In God We Trust."

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 2005 c 426 s 3, 2005 c 225 s 3, 2005 c
224 s 3, 2005 c 220 s 3, 2005 c 216 s 3, 2005 c 177 s 3, 2005 c 85 s 3,
2005 c 71 s 3, 2005 c 53 s 3, 2005 c 48 s 3, 2005 c 44 s 3, and 2005 c
42 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by
it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
professional firefighters and paramedics license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the professional firefighters
and paramedics license plates. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the Washington State Council of Firefighters
benevolent fund established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a professional
firefighters and paramedics license plate shall, upon application, pay
a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the professional firefighters and paramedics
special license plate. Upon the determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Washington State Council of Firefighters benevolent fund
established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(8) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
November 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
"Helping Kids Speak" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate.
Upon the determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping
Kids Speak" account established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(9) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on November
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Helping Kids Speak"
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate. Upon the
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping Kids Speak" account
established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(10) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a "law
enforcement memorial" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(11) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "law enforcement
memorial" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(12)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a Washington's Wildlife collection license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the Washington's Wildlife
license plate collection. Upon determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the state wildlife account. Proceeds credited to the state wildlife
account from the sale of the Washington's Wildlife license plate
collection may be used only for the department of fish and wildlife's
game species management activities.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Washington's
Wildlife collection license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of
thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the Washington's Wildlife license plate
collection. Upon determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state
wildlife account. Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from
the sale of the Washington's Wildlife license plate collection may be
used only for the department of fish and wildlife's game species
management activities.
(13)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a Washington state parks and recreation commission special license
plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected
under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody
of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the
state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the Washington
state parks and recreation commission special license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state parks education and
enhancement account established in RCW 79A.05.059.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Washington
state parks and recreation commission special license plate shall, upon
application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the Washington state parks and
recreation commission special license plate. Upon determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the state parks education and enhancement
account established in RCW 79A.05.059.
(14)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Washington Lighthouses" license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Washington Lighthouses" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the lighthouse environmental
programs account established under RCW 46.16.30912.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Washington
Lighthouses" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Washington Lighthouses" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the lighthouse environmental
programs account established under RCW 46.16.30912.
(15)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Keep Kids Safe" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty-five dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with
a proper identifying report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Keep Kids Safe" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the children's trust fund
established under RCW 43.121.100.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Keep Kids
Safe" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Keep Kids Safe" license plate. Upon determination
by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the children's trust fund established
under RCW 43.121.100.
(16)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "we love our pets" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administrative
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "we love our pets" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the we love our pets account
established under RCW 46.16.30915.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "we love our
pets" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "we love our pets" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the we love our pets account
established under RCW 46.16.30915.
(17)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Gonzaga University alumni association" license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administrative and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the "Gonzaga University alumni
association" license plate. Upon determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Gonzaga University alumni association account established under
RCW 46.16.30917.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Gonzaga
University alumni association" license plate shall, upon application,
pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with
a proper identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the
state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account
until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for
the cost of implementing the "Gonzaga University alumni association"
license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the Gonzaga
University alumni association account established under RCW
46.16.30917.
(18) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to
be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of
a "Washington's National Park Fund" license plate shall pay an initial
fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Washington's National Park Fund" license
plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the
"Washington's National Park Fund" account established under RCW
46.16.30919.
(19) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or
after January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a
"Washington's National Park Fund" license plate shall, upon
application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the "Washington's National Park
Fund" license plate. Upon determination by the department that the
state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the "Washington's National Park Fund" account established under RCW
46.16.30919.
(20)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of an armed forces license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall retain an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the armed forces special license plate collection. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the veterans stewardship account
established under RCW 43.60A.140.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of an armed forces
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the
state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the armed forces
special license plate collection. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the veterans stewardship account established in
RCW 43.60A.140.
(21)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Ski & Ride Washington" license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Ski & Ride Washington" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Ski & Ride Washington"
account established under RCW 46.16.30923.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Ski & Ride
Washington" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Ski & Ride Washington" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Ski & Ride Washington"
account established under RCW 46.16.30923.
(22)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a Wild On Washington license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the Wild On Washington license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Wild On Washington license plates must be dedicated to the department
of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities defined in RCW
77.32.560(2).
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Wild On
Washington license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the Wild On Washington license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Wild On Washington license plates must be dedicated to the department
of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities defined in RCW
77.32.560(2).
(23)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of an Endangered Wildlife license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the Endangered Wildlife license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Endangered Wildlife license plates must be used only for the department
of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of an Endangered
Wildlife license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the Endangered Wildlife license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the state wildlife account.
Proceeds credited to the state wildlife account from the sale of the
Endangered Wildlife license plates must be used only for the department
of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities.
(24)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Share the Road" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Share the Road" license plate. Upon determination
by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the "Share the Road" account established
under RCW 46.16.30929.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Share the
Road" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Share the Road" license plate. Upon determination
by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the "Share the Road" account established
under RCW 46.16.30929.
(25)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2010, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of an "In God We Trust" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "In God We Trust" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the disabled veterans assistance
account established under section 4 of this act.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2011, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of an "In God We
Trust" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "In God We Trust" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the disabled veterans assistance
account established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The disabled veterans assistance account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the
authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for
the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required to permit the expenditure of the funds.
(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated
contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds
generated by the issuance of "In God We Trust" license plates under
chapter 46.16 RCW.
(3) All receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313(25) (a) and
(b) from the sale of "In God We Trust" license plates must be deposited
into the account.
(4) All moneys deposited into the account must be used by the
department for activities that benefit disabled veterans including, but
not limited to, providing programs and services that assist disabled
veterans with the procurement of durable medical equipment or mobility
enhancing equipment. The first priority for assistance provided
through the account must be given to disabled veterans that do not
qualify for other federal or state veterans programs and services.
Funds from the account may not be used to supplant existing funds
received by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "disabled veteran," as
provided in 38 U.S.C. Sec. 4211, means a veteran who is entitled to
compensation under laws administered by the United States secretary of
veterans affairs or a person who was discharged or released from active
duty because of a service-connected disability.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.316 and 2005 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates: (a) Under RCW 46.16.30901, 46.16.30903, 46.16.30905, section
1 of this act, or 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, or under RCW 46.16.305(2) or 46.16.324;
(b) approved by the special license plate review board under RCW
46.16.715 through 46.16.775; or (c) under RCW 46.16.601 sells, trades,
or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle upon which
the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he or she
shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to an
acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of ten dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---