BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.040 and 2001 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The real and personal property used by ((nonprofit)), and for
the purposes of, the following nonprofit organizations is exempt from
property taxation:
(a) Day care centers as defined pursuant to RCW 74.15.020;
(b) Free public libraries;
(c) Orphanages and orphan asylums;
(d) Homes for the sick or infirm;
(e) Hospitals for the sick; and
(f) Outpatient dialysis facilities((, which are used for the
purposes of such organizations shall be exempt from taxation:
PROVIDED, That the benefit of the exemption inures to the user)).
(2) The real and personal property leased to and used by a
hospital((,)) for hospital purposes is exempt from property taxation if
the hospital is established under chapter 36.62 RCW or is owned and
operated by a public hospital district established under chapter 70.44
RCW((, for hospital purposes is exempt from taxation. The benefit of
the exemption must inure to the user)).
(3) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805, and the benefit of the exemption must inure
to the user.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies both
prospectively and retroactively beginning with taxes levied for
collection in 2002 and thereafter.

--- END ---