BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.09.175 and 1937 c 72 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts entered into by districts for construction ((or
for)), services ((or)), materials, or maintenance may provide that
payments ((shall)) will be made in such monthly proportion of the
contract price, as the board shall determine thereon, as the work
progresses, or as the services ((or)), materials, or maintenance are
furnished, on monthly estimates of the value thereof((, approved by the
state director. Before the district shall enter into any contract, the
plans, specifications and form of contract therefor shall be approved
by the state director)).
(2) The district shall withhold five percent of all payments to be
made under subsection (1) of this section until the contract is
complete, as evidenced by releases issued by the district. This
subsection (2) does not apply to contracts for materials.

Sec. 2 RCW 86.09.178 and 1965 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Contracts for construction, or for labor or materials entering
into the construction of any improvement authorized by the district
shall be awarded at public bidding except as herein otherwise provided.
A notice calling for sealed proposals shall be published in such
newspaper or newspapers of general circulation as the board shall
designate for a period of not less than two weeks (three weekly issues)
prior to the day of the opening of the bids. Such proposals shall be
accompanied by a certified check for such amount as the board shall
decide upon, to guarantee a compliance with the bid and shall be opened
in public at the time and place designated in the notice. The contract
shall be awarded to the lowest and best responsible bidder: PROVIDED,
That the board shall have authority to reject any or all bids, in which
event they shall readvertise for bids and, when no satisfactory bid is
then received and with the written approval of the director, may
proceed to construct the works by force account.)) (1) Except as
provided under subsection (4) of this section, contracts for
construction or maintenance, or for labor or materials used in the
construction or maintenance of any improvement authorized by the
district, may only be awarded through a public bidding process that
complies with the following:
(a) Notices calling for sealed bid proposals must be published in
at least one newspaper of general circulation in the district. These
notices must be published at least once fourteen or more days before
the deadline for submitting bid proposals; and
(b) Bid proposals: (i) Must be in writing, filed at the location
specified in the notice, and opened and read in public by the governing
body or designee at a time and location also specified in the notice;
(ii) must be filed in the official records of the district and
available for public inspection; and (iii) must be accompanied by a bid
proposal deposit equaling five percent of the total cost of the
project. Bid proposal deposits may be in the form of cash, a certified
check, a cashier's check, or a surety bond.
(2) If the successful bidder fails to enter into a contract and
fails to furnish a satisfactory performance bond within time
specifications established by the district, the bid proposal deposit
will be forfeited to the district.
(3) The contract must be awarded to the lowest and best responsible
bidder, except that the governing body may reject any and all bids. If
the district rejects one or more bids, the district must submit a new
notice calling for sealed bid proposals that complies with subsection
(1)(a) of this section.
(4) If a satisfactory bid is not received under this section, the
district may complete the project by an agreed price or force account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 86.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under this section, district construction
and maintenance contracts require three or more formal bid proposals
when the total cost of the project is equal to or greater than fifty
thousand dollars. Formal bid proposals must be made in writing and
must be filed in the official records of the district. This subsection
(1) does not apply to projects that have a total cost of less than five
thousand dollars or to contract solicitations for which three bidders
are not available.
(2) This section does not restrict a district from: (a) Using
volunteer labor and equipment on improvements and providing
reimbursement for actual expenses; or (b) entering into an interlocal
agreement for district construction, maintenance, or other work with a
county, city, or other governmental entity.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.09.181 and 1965 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person((, except the state of Washington and the United
States,)) acting under the provisions of this chapter, to whom ((or to
which)) a contract ((may have)) of at least five thousand dollars has
been awarded by the district for construction ((purposes)),
maintenance, or ((for)) labor ((or materials entering therein when the
total amount to be paid therefor exceeds one thousand dollars,)) shall
enter into a bond to the state of Washington, with good and sufficient
sureties, ((to be approved and filed with the state director,)) for one
hundred percent of the contract price, conditioned for the faithful
performance of said contract and with ((such)) further conditions as
may be required by law.
(2) This section does not apply to district contracts awarded to
the United States, the state of Washington, or counties and cities
within the state of Washington.

Sec. 5 RCW 86.09.259 and 1985 c 396 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
A flood control district shall be managed by a board of directors
consisting of three members. The initial directors shall be appointed,
and the elected directors elected, as provided in chapter 85.38 RCW.
The directors shall elect a ((chairman)) chair and vice-chair from
their number ((and shall either)). The directors may elect ((one of))
a secretary from their number((, or appoint a voter of the district, as
secretary)) to hold office at ((its)) the board's pleasure and who
shall keep a record of ((its)) the board's proceedings.
In accordance with RCW 86.09.268, the directors may also appoint
and employ a secretary.

Sec. 6 RCW 86.09.268 and 1937 c 72 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall ((have the power and it shall be its duty to adopt
a seal of the district, to)):
(1) Manage and conduct the business affairs of the district, ((to))
including holding regular meetings at least once each year;
(2) Employ and appoint ((such)) agents, engineers, attorneys,
officers, and employees as may be necessary, and prescribe their
duties((, to));
(3) Establish reasonable ((bylaws,)) rules and regulations for the
government and management of affairs of the district((, and));
(4) Generally ((to)) perform any and all acts necessary to carry
out the purpose of the district organization; and
(5) Hold open meetings in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 86.09.271 and 1985 c 396 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of the directors and principal place of business of the
district shall be located, if possible, at some place within the
district to be designated by the board. If a place convenient and
suitable for conducting district business and public hearings required
by this chapter cannot be found within the district, the office may be
located in the county within which the major portion of district lands
is situated. ((The office and place of business cannot thereafter be
changed, except with the previous written consent of the county
legislative authority of the county within which the major portion of
the district is situated, and without passing a resolution to that
effect at a previous regular meeting of the board, entered in the
minutes thereof and without posting a notice of the change in a
conspicuous public place at or near the place of business which is to
be changed at least ten days prior thereto and by the previous posting
of a copy of the notice for the same length of time at or near the new
location of the office.))

Sec. 8 RCW 86.09.466 and 1985 c 396 s 75 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of the district on or before the first day of
((November)) December in each year shall estimate the amount of money
necessary to be raised for any and all district purposes during the
ensuing year based upon a budget ((furnished him by the district
board)) and submit the same to the county legislative authority of the
county within which the major portion of the district is situated for
its suggestions, approval and revision and upon the approval of the
budget by said county legislative authority, either as originally
submitted or as revised, the secretary shall prepare an assessment roll
with appropriate headings in which must be listed all the lands in each
assessment classification shown on the base assessment map.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 86.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Contiguous territory outside of a special district that
receives services from the district may be annexed into the district
using the following method:
(a) The governing body must adopt a resolution of its intent to
annex the territory. The resolution must: (i) Include a map and
description of the subject territory; (ii) indicate which service or
services the territory is receiving from the district; (iii) specify
the proposed system of assessment; and (iv) set a date and time for a
public hearing on the annexation proposal;
(b) The district must publish notice of the hearing in a newspaper
of general circulation in the district and must notify, by mail, all
property owners as determined by the records of the county assessor.
The notice required under this subsection (1)(b) must be published and
mailed at least twenty-one days, but not more than twenty-eight days,
before the public hearing. This subsection (1)(b) does not restrict or
prevent a district from publishing or mailing notices that are in
addition to the required notice;
(c) After the public hearing, which may be continued from time to
time, the governing body must decide whether to recommend the
annexation to the legislative authority of the county in which the
territory proposed for annexation is located. If the governing body
recommends the annexation, it must adopt a resolution of the
recommendation within forty-five days of its decision and forward a
copy of the resolution, together with a draft annexation ordinance, to
the applicable legislative authority;
(d) The county legislative authority, by resolution, must set a
date and time for a public hearing on the annexation proposal. The
date of the hearing must be within ninety days after the county
receives the recommendation resolution and draft annexation ordinance
from the special district. The county legislative authority must
provide notice of the hearing, by mail, to all property owners within
the proposed annexation area as determined by the records of the county
assessor. The notice must be mailed at least twenty-one days, but not
more than twenty-eight days, before the public hearing;
(e) After the public hearing, which may be continued from time to
time, the county legislative authority must decide whether to approve,
modify, or reject the annexation proposal. The legislative authority
may remove territory from the proposal, but it may not add territory
without holding an additional public meeting and providing meeting
notice to the property owners affected by the addition that conforms
with the notice requirements of (b) of this subsection; and
(f) If the county legislative authority approves the annexation
proposal in its original or a modified form, it must do so by
ordinance. Approved annexations are effective on the first day of the
following January.
(2) For the purposes of this section, territory bounded by a river,
lake, or other body of water is contiguous to a district that is also
bounded by the same river, lake, or other body of water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 86.09.274 (Board of directors -- Meetings -- Change of date)
and 1985 c 396 s 60 & 1937 c 72 s 92;
(2) RCW 86.09.277 (Board of directors -- Special meetings -- When
notice required -- Authorized business) and 1937 c 72 s 93; and
(3) RCW 86.09.280 (Board of directors -- Meetings and records
public -- Printing of bylaws and rules) and 1937 c 72 s 94.

--- END ---