BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
The basic education allocations generated under this chapter for
students enrolled in tribal schools in the state that are operated by
federally recognized Indian tribes shall be allocated by the
superintendent of public instruction to the serving tribe rather than
to the school district. A federally recognized Indian tribe operating
a tribal school may choose to continue to receive allocations through
a school district pursuant to an interlocal agreement with the
district.
Before any direct allocation of basic education moneys to a serving
tribe, the superintendent of public instruction shall enter into an
agreement with the serving tribe, which agreement shall assure
compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and be consistent
with the requirements imposed by the superintendent on school districts
with respect to school district contracts with entities that employ
staff to provide basic education instruction claimed by the school
district for state basic education funding.

--- END ---