BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that a
public water or sewer utility district be absolved of the
responsibility of paying for upgrades to or the removal or deactivation
of existing buried pipelines under public highways that have come under
control of the state, as long as the buried pipelines met applicable
standards as established at the time of installation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon the jurisdictional transfer of a public highway from city or
county control to state control, the state must assume all
responsibility with respect to the upgrade, deactivation, or removal of
existing water or sewer pipelines beneath the public highway, provided
that the pipelines met the applicable standards and requirements
established by the transferring jurisdiction at the time of
installation.

--- END ---