BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's combination of excellent wages, working
conditions, and services have attracted workers from other states and
countries to work in our agricultural, construction, retail,
restaurant, and hospitality industries. Many of these workers are
employed for a particular season, peak need, or project.
(2) There exists a controversy because some of these workers may
lack employment eligibility. Studies estimate that approximately two
hundred thousand workers currently working within our state possess
fraudulent identity and employment eligibility documents.
(3) This issue has caused considerable controversy over eligibility
for government services including, but not limited to, employment-related services such as unemployment insurance and workers'
compensation coverage.
(4) Federal laws and regulations require employers to view
documents that establish identity and employment eligibility after they
hire a worker, but the employer must accept the documents if they
appear genuine. The federal government is encouraging employers to
conduct background investigations or use other systems to verify the
identity of workers after hiring them, but these steps are not required
by federal law, take several weeks to accomplish, and are not feasible
for many employers, especially employers who hire workers for a
particular season, peak need, or project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature intends that our state work
proactively with the federal government to establish a program to
provide an adequate, legal, and stable workforce for employers in
Washington, working within existing programs in the short term and
advocating for necessary changes at the federal level in the long term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 2 through 7 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the employment security department.
(2) "Employer" means an employer in the agriculture, construction,
retail, restaurant, or hospitality industry.
(3) "Essential worker" means an alien who is issued a nonimmigrant
visa and admitted to the United States to perform seasonal, peak need,
or project-related labor for one or more employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) On behalf of the state, the department
shall petition the United States congress to create a new
classification of nonimmigrant visa.
(2) Aliens in the new classification shall be deemed essential
workers and admitted to the United States for three years to perform
labor for one or more employers. The new classification shall be
administered as a pilot program, which expires six years from its
effective date unless renewed by the United States congress.
(3) State workforce agencies are authorized to petition for
admission of aliens to the United States as essential workers.
Agencies that file petitions are required to administer essential
worker programs. Programs must include systems for recruitment and
referral of local workers, and if available positions are not filled
within three days by local workers, referral of essential workers to
employers.
(4) Aliens seeking admission to the United States as essential
workers are required to submit appropriate documentation and fees,
obtain valid machine-readable biometric identification cards from
appropriate consular officers, and successfully complete criminal
background checks. Essential workers are required to return to their
native countries for at least thirty consecutive days in each calendar
year. Essential workers who, at any time during the three-year period,
do not perform labor for forty-five consecutive days are considered
unlawfully present in the United States and subject to deportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The Washington state essential worker
pilot program is hereby established. As of the effective date of this
section, the department shall immediately begin work to establish the
parameters of the program in accordance with this section, and to
implement the program. On behalf of the state, the department also
shall petition the federal government to allow Washington to offer this
program until changes in federal law specified in section 4(2) of this
act are accomplished.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Begin an outreach effort to employers to assess the numbers of
seasonal, peak need, or project-related workers that are needed, and to
recruit them to participate in the program;
(b) Petition the federal government for the necessary waivers or
exemptions to obtain guest worker visas using existing programs;
(c) Establish relationships and meet with representatives of
foreign countries and states in foreign countries to facilitate
recruitment and provision of essential workers;
(d) Petition for admission of sufficient alien workers to meet the
need projected after outreach to employers;
(e) Utilizing the current state workforce recruiting systems, refer
local workers to an employer who petitions for these workers, and if
there are insufficient numbers of local workers, refer alien workers to
such an employer;
(f) Make a best faith effort to provide sufficient numbers of
workers to employers who request workers after June 1, 2010. The
department shall give first priority to employers who enroll in the
program and pay program costs as specified in section 6 of this act
before April 1, 2010;
(g) Report to the legislature by December 1st of each year on the
number of local workers and alien workers that were referred and hired,
and on the number of employers who requested workers but whose requests
were not satisfied; and
(h) Attempt, to as great a degree as possible, to refer essential
workers to employers in the following regions: The Columbia basin,
north central Washington, the tri-cities area, the Yakima valley, and
western Washington.
(3) Employers shall provide housing to essential workers while they
are employed. Employers may arrange rental housing or deduct a
reasonable amount from the compensation of the worker if housing is
provided, subject to federal requirements for different industry
nonimmigrant visa programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall determine the cost to
provide each essential worker. The department shall charge employers
who participate in the Washington state essential worker pilot program
the actual cost of the program, not to exceed five hundred dollars per
worker.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall offer training programs
for essential workers, with a goal of making these workers better able
to integrate themselves into the workforce, including but not limited
to basic English language and civics training. The department shall
work with employers and associations of employers who participate in
the program to develop needed training programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act expires December 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---