BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13A.020 and 1999 c 153 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever all of the territory of a district is included within
the corporate boundaries of a city, the city legislative body may
((adopt a resolution or ordinance to)) assume jurisdiction over all of
the district, subject to the process in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The owners of not less than ten percent of the territory of
the district may initiate the assumption by filing a petition for
assumption with the city clerk. The city clerk shall immediately serve
a copy of the petition upon the secretary of the district board of
commissioners. The petition must meet the requirements of RCW
35A.01.040, and must include an accurate legal description of the
district and a map of the district. The sufficiency of the petition
must be determined in accordance with RCW 35A.01.040. After receiving
a certificate of sufficiency from the county assessor pursuant to RCW
35A.01.040, the city clerk shall serve a copy of the certificate upon
the secretary of the district board of commissioners. Within thirty
days after the date of the certificate of sufficiency, the city council
shall determine by resolution whether to pursue further the assumption.
If the city council adopts a resolution to pursue further the
assumption, the city council and the district board of commissioners
shall select jointly, within thirty days after the date of the adoption
of the resolution, a consultant to prepare a feasibility study
regarding the assumption. If the city council and the district board
of commissioners fail to agree upon a consultant within the thirty-day
period, the city council shall select a representative from another
city, and the district board of commissioners shall select a
representative from another district. Within thirty days of selection
of both representatives, the representatives shall agree upon a
consultant. The scope of work for the feasibility study must include
all substantive and procedural topics or matters relating to the
assumption that are requested by either the city council or the
district board of commissioners, or both. The city council shall
approve a contract with the consultant for preparation of the
feasibility study, and shall pay for all costs and expenses of the
feasibility study, unless the district subsequently decides to pursue
the assumption, in which case the city and the district shall share
equally the costs and expenses of the feasibility study. Upon receipt
of the final feasibility study, the city shall serve a copy of such
study on the secretary of the district board of commissioners. Within
sixty days of receiving the final feasibility study, the city council
and the district board of commissioners each shall hold a public
hearing for purposes of discussing the proposed assumption and
receiving public comments on the proposed assumption. Notice for each
public hearing must be published in a local newspaper of general
circulation in the city or the district, as applicable, once each week
for two consecutive weeks prior to the public hearing, and must be
posted on the web site of the city or the district, as applicable, for
two consecutive weeks prior to the public hearing. After the public
hearings, the city council and the district board of commissioners
shall decide whether to pursue the assumption.
(b) If the city council and the district board of commissioners
both decide by resolution to pursue the assumption, the city council
and the district board of commissioners, through their designated
representatives, shall attempt to negotiate an agreement for the
assumption. The agreement must be consistent with this chapter. If
the city and the district representatives negotiate successfully an
assumption agreement, the city council shall approve the assumption
agreement by ordinance, and the district board of commissioners shall
approve the assumption agreement by resolution. The boundary review
board may not review and approve the assumption authorized by the
assumption agreement.
(c) The city council at any time may decide not to pursue the
assumption. If the city and the district are unable to agree upon the
terms and conditions of an assumption agreement within ninety days
after commencing negotiation, or if the city council desires to pursue
the assumption, the city may pursue further the assumption. The
boundary review board shall approve the assumption under chapter 36.93
RCW. If the boundary review board denies the assumption, the
assumption must be discontinued. If the boundary review board approves
the assumption, the city shall call for a special election in the
entire district under Title 29A RCW. If a majority of the qualified
electors of the entire district vote in favor of the assumption, it
must be approved. If the assumption is approved, the effective date is
January 1 of the next calendar year for an election held prior to June
1, or January 1 of the year after the next calendar year for an
election held after June 1.
(3) Upon the assumption, all real and personal property,
franchises, rights, assets, taxes levied but not collected for the
district for other than indebtedness, water, sewer, and drainage
facilities, and all other facilities and equipment of the district
shall become the property of the city subject to all financial,
statutory, or contractual obligations of the district for the security
or performance of which the property may have been pledged. The city,
in addition to its other powers, shall have the power to manage,
control, maintain, and operate the property, facilities and equipment
and to fix and collect service and other charges from owners and
occupants of properties so served by the city, subject, however, to any
outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, of the district payable
from taxes, assessments, or revenues of any kind or nature and to any
other contractual obligations of the district.
(((3))) (4) The city may by resolution or ordinance of its
legislative body, assume the obligation of paying such district
indebtedness and of levying and of collecting or causing to be
collected the district taxes, assessments, and utility rates and
charges of any kind or nature to pay and secure the payment of the
indebtedness, according to all of the terms, conditions and covenants
incident to the indebtedness, and shall assume and perform all other
outstanding contractual obligation of the district in accordance with
all of their terms, conditions, and covenants. An assumption shall not
be deemed to impair the obligation of any indebtedness or other
contractual obligation. During the period until the outstanding
indebtedness of the district has been discharged, the territory of the
district and the owners and occupants of property therein, shall
continue to be liable for its and their proportionate share of the
indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments levied within any
local improvement district or utility local improvement district
thereof. The city shall assume the obligation of causing the payment
of the district's indebtedness, collecting the district's taxes,
assessments, and charges, and observing and performing the other
district contractual obligations. The legislative body of the city
shall act as the officers of the district for the purpose of certifying
the amount of any property tax to be levied and collected therein, and
causing service and other charges and assessments to be collected from
the property or owners or occupants thereof, enforcing the collection
and performing all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the
district's contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same
means as if the territory of the district had not been included within
the boundaries of a city.
When a city assumes the obligation of paying the outstanding
indebtedness, and if property taxes or assessments have been levied and
service and other charges have accrued for this purpose but have not
been collected by the district prior to the assumption, the same when
collected shall belong and be paid to the city and be used by the city
so far as necessary for payment of the indebtedness of the district
existing and unpaid on the date the city assumes the indebtedness. Any
funds received by the city which have been collected for the purpose of
paying any bonded or other indebtedness of the district, shall be used
for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose.
Any outstanding indebtedness shall be paid as provided in the terms,
conditions, and covenants of the indebtedness. All funds of the
district on deposit with the county treasurer at the time of title
transfer shall be used by the city solely for the benefit of the
assumed utility and shall not be transferred to or used for the benefit
of the city's general fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13A.030 and 1999 c 153 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a portion of a district equal to at least sixty percent of
the area or sixty percent of the assessed valuation of the real
property lying within such district, is included within the corporate
boundaries of a city, the city may assume by ordinance the full and
complete management and control of that portion of the entire district
not included within another city, ((whereupon)) subject to the
provisions and process of RCW 35.13A.020 ((shall be operative)); or the
city may proceed ((directly under)) according to the provisions and
process of RCW 35.13A.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.13A.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
When electing under RCW 35.13A.030 or 35.13A.040 to proceed under
this section, the city may assume((, by ordinance,)) jurisdiction of
the district's responsibilities, property, facilities, and equipment
within the corporate limits of the city, subject to the provisions and
process of RCW 35.13A.020: PROVIDED, That the petition for assumption
is initiated by the owners of not less than ten percent of the
territory proposed for assumption. If on the effective date of such an
((ordinance)) assumption the territory of the district included within
the city contains any facilities serving or designed to serve any
portion of the district outside the corporate limits of the city or if
the territory lying within the district and outside the city contains
any facilities serving or designed to serve territory included within
the city (which facilities are hereafter in this section called the
"serving facilities"), the city or district shall for the economically
useful life of any such serving facilities make available sufficient
capacity therein to serve the sewage or water requirements of such
territory, to the extent that such facilities were designed to serve
such territory at a rate charged to the municipality being served which
is reasonable to all parties.
In the event a city proceeds under this section, the district may
elect upon a favorable vote of a majority of all voters within the
district voting upon such propositions to require the city to assume
responsibility for the operation and maintenance of the district's
property, facilities and equipment throughout the entire district and
to pay the city a charge for such operation and maintenance which is
reasonable under all of the circumstances.
A city acquiring property, facilities and equipment under the
provisions of this section shall acquire such property, facilities and
equipment, and fix and collect service and other charges from owners
and occupants of properties served by the city, subject, to any
contractual obligations of the district which relate to the property,
facilities, or equipment so acquired by the city or which are secured
by taxes, assessments or revenues from the territory of the district
included within the city. In such cases, the property included within
the city and the owners and occupants thereof shall continue to be
liable for payment of its and their proportionate share of any
outstanding district indebtedness. The district and its officers shall
continue to levy taxes and assessments on and to collect service and
other charges from such property, or owners or occupants thereof, to
enforce such collections, and to perform all other acts necessary to
insure performance of the district's contractual obligations in the
same manner and by the same means as if the territory of the district
had not been included within the boundaries of a city.

--- END ---