BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88D.010 and 2008 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By October 15th of each even-numbered year, the office of
financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring
of all capital budget projects proposed by the public four-year
institutions of higher education and submit the results of the scoring
process to the legislative fiscal committees, the higher education
coordinating board, and the four-year institutions((, except that, for
2008, the office of financial management shall complete the objective
analysis and scoring by November 1st)). Each project must be reviewed
and scored within one of the following categories, according to the
project's principal purpose. Each project may be scored in only one
category. The categories are:
(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth at
main and branch campuses, at existing or new university centers, or
through distance learning. Growth projects should provide significant
additional student capacity. Proposed projects must demonstrate that
they are based on solid enrollment demand projections, more
cost-effectively provide enrollment access than alternatives such as
university centers and distance learning, and make cost-effective use
of existing and proposed new space;
(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings ((or renovate
facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current
program requirements)). Facilities that cannot be economically
renovated are considered replacement projects. ((Renovation projects
should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an
isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should
cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and
restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful
life.)) New space may be programmed for the same or a different use
than the space being replaced or renovated and may include additions to
improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support
space;
(c) Projects that renovate facilities to restore building life and
upgrade space to meet current program requirements. Renovation
projects should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or
an isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should
cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and
restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful
life. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than
the space being renovated and may include additions to improve access
and enhance the relationship of program or support space;
(d) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;
(((d))) (e) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation
through expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation
of specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and
(((e))) (f) Other project categories as determined by the office of
financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal
committees.
(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
legislative fiscal committees ((and the joint legislative audit and
review committee)), shall establish a scoring system and process for
each four-year project category that is based on the framework used in
the community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff
from the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and the four-year institutions shall
provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and
process.
(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the
legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution
project proposals, and may also solicit participation by ((the joint
legislative audit and review committee and)) independent experts.
(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must,
at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends,
reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific
strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if
applicable, and impact on space utilization.
(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the
predesign, design, or construction funding phase.
(c) To the extent possible, the objective analysis and scoring
system of all capital budget projects shall occur within the context of
any and all performance agreements between the office of financial
management and the governing board of a public, four-year institution
of higher education that aligns goals, priorities, desired outcomes,
flexibility, institutional mission, accountability, and levels of
resources.
(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the
office of financial management shall take into consideration project
schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable
expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.
(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common
definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the
project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget
instructions((, except that, for the 2009-2011 budget development
cycle, this information must be distributed by July 1, 2008)). The
office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative
fiscal committees ((and the joint legislative audit and review
committee)), shall develop common definitions that four-year
institutions must use in developing their project proposals and lists
under this section.
(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed
by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:
(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial
management;
(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate
information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and
(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the higher
education coordinating board and the joint legislative audit and review
committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.
(7) By August 15th of each even-numbered year, ((beginning in
2008,)) each public four-year higher education institution shall
prepare and submit prioritized lists of the individual projects
proposed by the institution for the ensuing six-year period in each
category. ((On a pilot basis, the office of financial management shall
require one research university to prepare two separate prioritized
lists for each category, one for the main campus, and one covering all
of the institution's branch campuses. The office of financial
management shall report to the legislative fiscal committees by
December 1, 2009, on the effect of this pilot project on capital
project financing for all branch campuses.)) The lists must be
submitted to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may aggregate minor
works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking purposes.
Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the aggregated
proposal, and supporting documentation, including project descriptions
and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees.
(8) The office of financial management shall convene a group by
August 15th of each even-numbered year to rank projects in priority
order in a single list to be submitted to the legislature for the
ensuing biennium. The group shall consist of one representative of
the higher education coordinating board, two representatives of the
council of presidents, two representatives of the office of financial
management, and one representative of the Washington state economic
development commission. The council of presidents' representatives
must rotate every two years, with each four-year public baccalaureate
research institution representing the council of presidents once every
two biennia and each four-year public baccalaureate nonresearch
institution representing the council of presidents once every four
biennia. The Washington state economic development representative
shall be appointed by the governor and will change every two years.
The governor or a designee may participate in determining the
prioritized list.
(9) The priorities set by the group shall consider policies for the
state's higher education system to achieve growth and manage existing
assets in a responsible manner, biennial budget projections for capital
expenditures, and biennial budget projections for student full-time
equivalent growth.

--- END ---