BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that increasing the
number of retired physicians who provide volunteer health care services
is a cost-effective way to improve access to health care for many
citizens of this state. Physicians holding a retired active license
must currently meet many of the same requirements as physicians in
active practice, including at least fifty hours of continuing education
a year, despite the fact that retired active physicians may only
practice a maximum of ninety days a year, are limited to providing
primary care services, and are limited to providing such services only
in community clinics that are operated by public or private tax-exempt
corporations. This presents both financial and practical barriers for
retired physicians who wish to provide health care services on a
volunteer basis, barriers that are not as stringent in other states
that provide similar licenses for retired physicians. It is therefore
the intent of the legislature to ease some of these barriers in a
manner that does not adversely affect public safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.080 and 1996 c 191 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall pay
licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance with
administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A physician who resides and
practices in Washington and obtains or renews a retired active license
shall be exempt from licensing fees imposed under this section. The
commission may establish rules governing mandatory continuing education
requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of
licenses. The rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education
requirements may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the
completion of approved activities relating to professional liability
risk management. The number of hours of continuing education for a
physician holding a retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours
per year. The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an
applicant who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without
examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the
requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in
the practice of medicine.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.250 and 1991 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The disciplining authority may adopt rules pursuant to this section
authorizing a retired active license status. An individual
credentialed by a disciplining authority regulated in the state under
RCW 18.130.040, who is practicing only in emergent or intermittent
circumstances as defined by rule established by the disciplining
authority, may hold a retired active license at a reduced renewal fee
established by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 or, for a physician
regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who resides and practices in
Washington and holds a retired active license, at no renewal fee.
Except as provided in RCW 18.71.080, such a license shall meet the
continuing education or continued competency requirements, if any,
established by the disciplining authority for renewals, and is subject
to the provisions of this chapter. Individuals who have entered into
retired status agreements with the disciplinary authority in any
jurisdiction shall not qualify for a retired active license under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall consider amending its rules on retired
active physicians in a manner that improves access to health care
services for the citizens of this state without compromising public
safety. When considering whether to amend its rules, the commission
shall, at a minimum, consider the following:
(a) Whether physicians holding retired active licenses should be
allowed to provide health care services beyond primary care; and
(b) Whether physicians holding retired active licenses should be
allowed to provide health care services in settings beyond community
clinics operated by public or private tax-exempt corporations.
(2) The commission shall determine whether it will amend its rules
in the manner suggested by this section no later than November 15,
2009. If the commission determines that it will not amend its rules,
it shall provide a written explanation of its decision to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1,
2009.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.70.110 and 2007 c 259 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. Physicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who
reside and practice in Washington and obtain or renew a retired active
license are exempt from such fees. After June 30, 1995, municipal
corporations providing emergency medical care and transportation
services pursuant to chapter 18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees,
provided that such other emergency services shall only be charged for
their pro rata share of the cost of licensure and inspection, if
appropriate. The secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion
of the secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public
health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial
disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include up to an additional twenty-five dollars to
be transferred by the department to the University of Washington for
the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

--- END ---