BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.380 and 2005 c 340 s 2 and 2005 c 274 s 304 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW, the name
or address of an individual vehicle owner shall not be released by the
department, county auditor, or agency or firm authorized by the
department except under the following circumstances:
(a) The requesting party is a business entity that requests the
information for use in the course of business;
(b) The request is a written request that is signed by the person
requesting disclosure that contains the full legal name and address of
the requesting party, that specifies the purpose for which the
information will be used; and
(c) The requesting party enters into a disclosure agreement with
the department in which the party promises that the party will use the
information only for the purpose stated in the request for the
information; and that the party does not intend to use, or facilitate
the use of, the information for the purpose of making any unsolicited
business contact with a person named in the disclosed information. The
term "unsolicited business contact" means a contact that is intended to
result in, or promote, the sale of any goods or services to a person
named in the disclosed information. The term does not apply to
situations where the requesting party and such person have been
involved in a business transaction prior to the date of the disclosure
request and where the request is made in connection with the
transaction.
(2) Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded
on the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will
be disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from courts, law enforcement agencies, or government
entities with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority and only
for use in the normal course of conducting their business.
(3) The disclosing entity shall retain the request for disclosure
for three years.
(4) Whenever the disclosing entity grants a request for information
under this section by an attorney or private investigator, the
disclosing entity shall provide notice to the vehicle owner, to whom
the information applies, that the request has been granted. The notice
also shall contain the name and address of the requesting party. The
disclosing entity shall send the notice to the vehicle owner no earlier
than thirty days after granting the request.
(5) Any person who is furnished vehicle owner information under
this section shall be responsible for assuring that the information
furnished is not used for a purpose contrary to the agreement between
the person and the department.
(6) This section shall not apply to requests for information by
governmental entities or requests that may be granted under any other
provision of this title expressly authorizing the disclosure of the
names or addresses of vehicle owners.
(7) This section shall not apply to title history information under
RCW 19.118.170.

--- END ---