BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Conventional unleaded gasoline must be available for purchase
at all distribution terminals located in Washington for end-use in
marine and aviation applications.
(2) Unless a sufficient supply of conventional unleaded gasoline is
available for other applications, conventional unleaded gasoline must
be limited to end-use in marine and aviation applications.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.112.010 and 2007 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas that is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel in self-propelled motor vehicles.
(2) "Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to
propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or
reformulated gasoline. Alternative fuel includes, but is not limited
to, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural
gas, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels containing seventy percent
or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels that are derived from biomass,
hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel, nonhazardous motor fuel, or
electricity, excluding onboard electric generation.
(3) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty
acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration
requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal
environmental protection agency and standards established by the
American society of testing and materials.
(4) "Conventional unleaded gasoline" means gasoline with an octane
rating of not less than eighty-seven that has not been blended or
otherwise combined with ethanol or denatured alcohol.
(5) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and
diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec.
48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.
(((5))) (6) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(((6))) (7) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a
blend of ethanol and hydrocarbon of which the ethanol portion is
nominally seventy-five to eighty-five percent denatured fuel ethanol by
volume that complies with the most recent version of American society
of testing and materials specification D 5798.
(((7))) (8) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the
generation of power in an internal combustion engine used for the
propulsion of a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state, and any
biodiesel fuel. Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if
either (a) the base motor fuel meets the applicable standards before
the addition of the ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the
applicable standards after the addition of the ethanol.
(((8))) (9) "Nonhazardous motor fuel" means any fuel of a type
distributed for use in self-propelled motor vehicles that does not
contain a hazardous liquid as defined in RCW 19.122.020.

--- END ---