BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty
using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; ((and))
(11) Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and
monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in higher
education; and
(12) In close collaboration with the workforce training and
education coordinating board, identify high-cost critical programs as
defined in RCW 28B.76.020 and manage competitive processes for awarding
funds for those programs. Institutions of higher education as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016 and private independent institutions are eligible to
apply for funding and may submit proposals.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.76.020 and 1985 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board((; and)).
(2) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College.
(3) "High-cost critical program" means an undergraduate or graduate
certificate or degree program:
(a) In which the number of students per year prepared for
employment from in-state programs is substantially fewer than the
number of projected job openings per year in that field, either
statewide or in a substate region;
(b) In which the documented cost of instruction is significantly
higher than the median cost of instruction for other degree or
certificate programs offered at the same institution of higher
education;
(c) That prepares completers for professions with high job vacancy
rates that are not anticipated to be alleviated without additional
program capacity or by in-migration of educated workers from other
states; and
(d) That is widely acknowledged to provide high public value.

--- END ---