BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to facilitate health
care insurers to have open pharmacy networks. Insurers that contract
with pharmacies must offer arrangements that provide comparable terms
and conditions to all pharmacies that are willing to meet those terms
and conditions. Insurers may not impose upon a beneficiary a copay,
deductible, coinsurance, or prescription quantity limit that is not
imposed upon all beneficiaries in the plan. Pharmacy services are
known to be a necessary component in the overall health care system.
Therefore, the legislature intends to promote access to ensure the
citizens of Washington state can easily obtain their pharmacy services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Except for health plans under the health
care authority or the public employees' benefits board, every health
plan delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed by a health carrier on
and after January 1, 2010, that provides for payment of all or a
portion of prescription costs, or reimbursement of prescription costs,
must:
(1) Not limit the purchase of prescription medicines to specific
pharmacies;
(2) Not discriminate between different providers of pharmacy
services; and
(3) Not prohibit a qualified provider of pharmacy services from
becoming a provider under the policy if the applicant pharmacy
indicates a desire to be recognized as a provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act does not apply to:
(1) A provider of pharmacy services if that provider cannot or will
not meet all of the applicable terms and conditions of the policy
contract; or
(2) A health maintenance organization that provides pharmaceutical
services through pharmacists it employs at pharmacies it owns. A
health maintenance organization is exempt in geographic areas in which
it owns the pharmacy or pharmacies, but is not exempt in other
geographic areas in which the health maintenance organization does not
provide pharmacy services through its own pharmacy and employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A health carrier, as defined in this
chapter, who violates section 2 of this act or a rule adopted under
that section may be subject to a penalty of not less than one thousand
dollars nor more than fifty thousand dollars for each violation,
payable to the health services account.
(2) A person may bring action against a carrier to recover damages
suffered as the result of a violation of section 2 of this act or a
rule adopted under that section. Proof of a violation constitutes
prima facie evidence of damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 48.43 RCW.

--- END ---