BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.294 and 2007 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(2)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems, manufactured by that
person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the solar grade
silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the
solar grade silicon to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(3) Beginning October 1, 2009, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar
cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers
are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651 and
82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((b))) (c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light
directly into electricity without moving parts.
(((c))) (d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell
manufactured from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(((d))) (g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(((4))) (h) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating
substrate on which various semiconducting materials are deposited to
produce a photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the
production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to
gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product,
deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch
or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse
the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the
gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during
the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the
chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place.
For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the
meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under RCW 82.32.5351. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after December 1, 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under RCW 82.32.5351. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after December 1, 2006.

--- END ---