BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The state board for community and technical colleges shall receive
state operating funds for maintenance and operations on instructional
space financed through certificates of participation under chapter
39.94 RCW to the same extent state funding would be provided if the
space were financed using state bonds. This section applies to any
current or future facility financed by a certificate of participation
and for which the legislature has approved the financing contracts for
the facility per RCW 39.94.040.

--- END ---