BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The running start program has provided
economic savings to parents, students, and to the state by providing
the opportunity for high school students to earn college credit while
enrolled in high school. The state has also been helped to advance its
target for associate and baccalaureate degree completions and helped in
improving students' time-to-degree rates through running start. The
program's overall success has benefited students, parents, communities,
and the state's economic development, all while providing real monetary
savings. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to expand
participation in running start and secure ample support for the
continuation of this highly successful program.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.600.310 and 2005 c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in
courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A
student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high
school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs
offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the
school district in any required state or federal accountability
reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of
intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in
which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered
by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private
schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to
meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from
high school, or to master the essential academic learning requirements.
However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in
participating universities only if the board of directors of the
student's school district has decided to participate in the program.
Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with
school districts, may establish admission standards for these students.
If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil
for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education
shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district
within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course
and hours of enrollment for that pupil.
(b) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and
28B.15.041, running start students shall pay to the institution of
higher education all other mandatory fees as established by each
community and technical college. The institution of higher education
shall prorate the mandatory fees based on credit load.
(c) The institution of higher education shall make available fee
waivers for low-income students. Each institution shall establish a
written policy for the determination of low-income students before
offering the fee waiver. Acceptable documentation of low-income status
may include, but is not limited to, documentation that a student has
been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in the last five
years, or other criteria established in the institution's policy.
(2) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. ((The institution of higher education shall
not require the pupil to pay any other fees.)) The funds received by
the institution of higher education from the school district shall not
be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the
institution of higher education. A student enrolled under this
subsection shall ((not)) be counted for the purpose of ((determining
any)) meeting enrollment ((restrictions)) targets imposed by the state
on the institution of higher education.
(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
develop long-term funding proposals to support running start that may
include, but not be limited to, student tuition and performance
funding. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report its recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2010.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.370 and 1994 c 205 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any state institution of higher education may award postsecondary
credit for college level academic and vocational courses successfully
completed by a student while in high school and taken at an institution
of higher education. ((The state institution of higher education shall
not charge a fee for the award of the credits.))

--- END ---