BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of regents may enter into any number of contracts
with one or more persons, companies, or entities for the planning,
design, renovation, erection, remodeling, demolition, or construction
of university buildings and facilities, or improvements thereto, using
a small works roster process for projects with an estimated cost of up
to one million dollars, and a design-build process, design-bid-build
process, or general contractor-construction manager process for
projects with an estimated cost in excess of one million dollars. Such
contract or contracts shall be awarded after public notice and under
such requirements and procedures as shall be established by the board
of regents, to the person or persons able to perform on the most
advantageous terms. The requirements and procedures established by the
board of regents may include but are not limited to: (a) Setting the
dollar amount for self performance of work by the general contractor;
(b) setting the schedule for establishing the maximum allowable
construction cost; and (c) establishing the process for selection of
subcontractors. This authority shall apply only when the revenue
source for the cost of the planning, design, renovation, erection,
remodeling, demolition, or construction of the buildings and
facilities, or improvements thereto, does not include state-appropriated funds. The board of regents does not have the power to
enter into any contract that binds the board of regents to pay out any
sum of money in excess of the amount provided for said purpose. The
requirements of chapters 39.08, 39.12, and 60.28 RCW apply to work
completed under this authority. If the board of regents chooses to
exercise the authority granted under this chapter, no other statutory
bidding or procurement requirements apply, including those in chapter
39.10 RCW and RCW 39.04.155.
(2) Whenever the revenue source for a public works project does not
include state-appropriated funds, the University of Washington may,
before asking for bids, require from any person, firm, company, or
corporation, interested in bidding, answers to questions contained in
a standard form of questionnaire, including a complete statement of the
financial ability and experience of the person, firm, company, or
corporation and that of any proposed subcontractor. The completed
questionnaire shall be sworn to before a notary public or other person
authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds, and shall be submitted at
such time as the University of Washington may require. Whenever the
University of Washington is not satisfied with the sufficiency of the
answers contained in a completed questionnaire or whenever the
University of Washington determines that the person, firm, company,
corporation, or subcontractor does not meet all of the requirements in
this section, that person, firm, corporation, or subcontractor shall be
disqualified from bidding. In order to be qualified to bid, a person,
firm, corporation, or subcontractor shall have:
(a) Adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such
resources;
(b) The necessary experience, organization, and technical
qualifications to perform the proposed contract;
(c) The ability to comply with the required performance schedule
taking into consideration all of its existing business commitments;
(d) A satisfactory record of performance, integrity, judgment, and
skills; and
(e) Otherwise been qualified and eligible to receive an award under
applicable laws and rules.
(3) University of Washington may limit the total number of persons,
firms, corporations, or companies requested to submit proposals or bids
to a number that ensures that a sufficient number of competitive
proposals or bids are received without unnecessarily creating marketing
costs for otherwise qualified persons, firms, corporations, or
companies. The University of Washington, on a project-by-project
basis, shall determine the approved proposer or bidders list following
the prequalification process.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2011. By January 1, 2011, the
University of Washington must provide to the legislature a summary of
the projects performed under this section. The summary will include
the project cost, a description of the contracting method used, and the
contractors performing the work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of regents may enter into any number of contracts
with one or more persons, companies, or entities for the planning,
design, renovation, erection, remodeling, demolition, or construction
of university buildings and facilities, or improvements thereto, using
a small works roster process for projects with an estimated cost of up
to one million dollars, and a design-build process, design-bid-build
process, or general contractor-construction manager process for
projects with an estimated cost in excess of one million dollars. Such
contract or contracts shall be awarded after public notice and under
such requirements and procedures as shall be established by the board
of regents, to the person or persons able to perform on the most
advantageous terms. The requirements and procedures established by the
board of regents may include but are not limited to: (a) Setting the
dollar amount for self performance of work by the general contractor;
(b) setting the schedule for establishing the maximum allowable
construction cost; and (c) establishing the process for selection of
subcontractors. This authority shall apply only when the revenue
source for the cost of the planning, design, renovation, erection,
remodeling, demolition, or construction of the buildings and
facilities, or improvements thereto, does not include state-appropriated funds. The board of regents does not have the power to
enter into any contract that binds the board of regents to pay out any
sum of money in excess of the amount provided for said purpose. The
requirements of chapters 39.08, 39.12, and 60.28 RCW apply to work
completed under this authority. If the board of regents chooses to
exercise the authority granted under this chapter, no other statutory
bidding or procurement requirements apply, including those in chapter
39.10 RCW and RCW 39.04.155.
(2) Whenever the revenue source for a public works project does not
include state-appropriated funds, Washington State University may,
before asking for bids, require from any person, firm, company, or
corporation, interested in bidding, answers to questions contained in
a standard form of questionnaire, including a complete statement of the
financial ability and experience of the person, firm, company, or
corporation and that of any proposed subcontractor. The completed
questionnaire shall be sworn to before a notary public or other person
authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds, and shall be submitted at
such time as Washington State University may require. Whenever
Washington State University is not satisfied with the sufficiency of
the answers contained in a completed questionnaire or whenever
Washington State University determines that the person, firm, company,
corporation, or subcontractor does not meet all of the requirements in
this section, that person, firm, corporation, or subcontractor shall be
disqualified from bidding. In order to be qualified to bid, a person,
firm, corporation, or subcontractor shall have:
(a) Adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such
resources;
(b) The necessary experience, organization, and technical
qualifications to perform the proposed contract;
(c) The ability to comply with the required performance schedule
taking into consideration all of its existing business commitments;
(d) A satisfactory record of performance, integrity, judgment, and
skills; and
(e) Otherwise been qualified and eligible to receive an award under
applicable laws and rules.
(3) Washington State University may limit the total number of
persons, firms, corporations, or companies requested to submit
proposals or bids to a number that ensures that a sufficient number of
competitive proposals or bids are received without unnecessarily
creating marketing costs for otherwise qualified persons, firms,
corporations, or companies. Washington State University, on a project-by-project basis, shall determine the approved proposer or bidders list
following the prequalification process.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2011. By January 1, 2011, the
Washington State University must provide to the legislature a summary
of the projects performed under this section. The summary will include
the project cost, a description of the contracting method used, and the
contractors performing the work.

--- END ---