BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit state employees from attending
informational or educational meetings regarding legislative issues with
a legislator or other elected official. It is not a violation of this
chapter to hold such meetings in public facilities, including state-owned or leased buildings. This section is not intended to allow the
use of state facilities for a political campaign or for the promotion
of or opposition to a ballot proposition.

--- END ---