BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
A vulnerable adult who is being furnished Christian Science
treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner shall not
be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected or abused vulnerable
adult for the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---