BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his
or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a
rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a) Beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st
as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to
each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years
wages at a rate of not less than the amount established under (b) of
this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(5) ((The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage
for employees under the age of eighteen years.)) Every employer shall
pay his or her employees who are sixteen or seventeen years of age at
a rate not less than the federal minimum wage rate.
(6) Every employer shall pay his or her employees who are under
sixteen years of age at a rate not less than eighty-five percent of the
federal minimum wage rate.

--- END ---