BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the purpose of this chapter to
regulate all persons who purport to be able to detect deception or to
verify truth of statements through the use of instrumentation or
mechanical devices, including but not limited to lie detectors,
polygraphs, or similar or related devices and instruments, without
regard to the nomenclature. This chapter must be liberally construed
to regulate all such persons and instruments. A person who purports to
be able to detect deception or to verify truth of statements through
instrumentation is not exempt from the provisions of this chapter
because of the terminology used to describe the person, the instruments
or mechanical devices of the person, or the nature of the services of
the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing or
the director's designee.
(3) "Internship" means the study of polygraph examinations, and of
the administration of polygraph examinations, by a trainee under the
personal supervision and control of a polygraph examiner in accordance
with a course of study prescribed by the department at the commencement
of the course of study.
(4) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.
(5) "Polygraph examination" means a minimum of two charts
administered to any one subject, and each relevant question must be
asked a minimum of two times to constitute a polygraph examination.
(6) "Polygraph examiner" means a person who purports to be able to
detect deception or verify the truth of statements through the use of
instrumentation or of a mechanical device that records visually,
permanently, and simultaneously the cardiovascular pattern, the
respiratory pattern, and the galvanic skin response of the individual
being examined.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The requirements of this chapter do not
apply to:
(1) A person who uses a polygraph for the sole purpose of
conducting scientific, medical, or academic research or experiments.
Results of this research or experiments may only be used for academic,
medical, or scientific pursuits and may not be used for specific
employment, law enforcement, or public safety objectives; or
(2) Individuals who are employed by the United States government
while in the performance of their assigned duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An instrument used to test or question
individuals for the purpose of detecting deception or verifying truth
of statements must record visually, permanently, and simultaneously:
(a) A subject's cardiovascular pattern;
(b) A subject's respiratory pattern; and
(c) A subject's electrodermal response.
(2) Patterns of other physiological changes in addition to those
required in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section may also be
recorded. The use of any instrument or device to detect deception or
to verify truth of statements that does not meet these minimum
instrumentation requirements is prohibited and the operation or use of
the equipment is subject to penalties and may be enjoined in the manner
provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) It is a violation of this chapter for:
(a) A person, including a city, county, or state employee, to
perform the functions and duties of a polygraph examiner in this state
without being licensed in accordance with this chapter;
(b) A person to present or attempt to use the license of another as
his or her own license;
(c) A person to give false or forged evidence of any kind to the
director in obtaining a license;
(d) A person to falsely impersonate any other licensee; or
(e) A person to attempt to use an expired or revoked license.
(2) A person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No person other than a state-licensed
polygraph examiner may assume or use the title of polygraph examiner or
any title, designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression
of certification, licensure, or registration as a polygraph examiner by
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) An applicant must meet the following
requirements to obtain a polygraph examiner license:
(a) Be at least twenty-one years old;
(b) Be a citizen or resident alien of the United States;
(c) Not have demonstrated, in the preceding ten years, a course of
behavior that indicates a high degree of probability that the applicant
will be unlikely to perform the duties of a polygraph examiner in a
manner that would serve the interests of the public;
(d) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a polygraph
examiner and the director determines that the license should be
withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director
shall make his or her determination to withhold a license because of
previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment
rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;
(e) Submit a set of fingerprints;
(f) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application;
(g) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper
identification on a form prescribed by the director;
(h) Be a graduate of a polygraph examiners course approved by the
director;
(i) Have satisfactorily completed an internship of not less than
six months as required by the department;
(j) Have passed an examination that includes a review of applicable
state law concerning the polygraph, conducted by the department or
under its supervision, to determine his or her competency to obtain a
license to practice as a polygraph examiner;
(k) Certify that he or she will respond to judicial process served
on the director by courts of competent jurisdiction within the state
and provide the department with an up-to-date address; and
(l)(i) Have a four-year degree from a full four-year accredited
university or college recognized as such by the department;
(ii) Have completed two years of study, or its equivalent, at such
a university or college with two years of experience as an investigator
or detective with a municipal, county, state, or federal agency; or
(iii) Have graduated from an accredited high school and have at
least five years' experience as an investigator or detective with a
municipal, county, state, or federal agency.
(2) When the department refuses to issue a license based upon an
applicant's failure to meet the requirements of subsection (1)(c) of
this section, the department shall prepare a concise, specific written
statement of the facts supporting the department's conclusion that
there is a high degree of probability that the applicant will be
unlikely to perform required duties in a manner that would serve the
interests of the public. A copy of the statement must be provided to
the applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The director shall, with the advice and
approval of the polygraph examiner's advisory committee created in
section 23 of this act, adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW necessary to implement this chapter and chapter 18.235 RCW.
(2) The rules must include, but are not limited to:
(a) Prohibited areas of inquiry;
(b) Recordkeeping procedures; and
(c) Consent procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 On the effective date of this section, any
person who has actually been engaged in the occupation, business, or
profession of a polygraph examiner in the state for a period of at
least two years, and conducted at least two hundred polygraph
examinations, and who is using for that purpose the instrumentation
prescribed in section 3 of this act, must, upon application and proof
satisfactory to the director within ninety days after the effective
date of this section and payment of the required license fee, be issued
a polygraph examiner's license that is effective no longer than one
year from the date of issuance. However, the department may require
the applicant to submit satisfactory proof that he or she is so
engaged. The applicant must also satisfy the requirements of section
7(1) (a) through (g), (k), and (l) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 All polygraph examiners shall furnish proof
as the director may require that they have successfully completed a
total of thirty clock hours of instruction every two years in polygraph
examination courses approved by the director in order to renew their
licenses. Up to fifteen clock hours of instruction, beyond the thirty
hours of clock instruction required in the two-year period, may be
carried forward for credit in a subsequent two-year period. In order
to fulfill the requirements of this section, a polygraph examiner may
commence work on a course no more than thirty-six months before the
proof date for renewal. Examinations are not required to fulfill any
part of the education requirement in this section. This section
applies to renewal dates after January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Each nonresident applicant for an
original license or a renewal shall file with the department an
irrevocable statement of consent stating that actions against the
applicant may be filed in any appropriate court of any county or
municipality of the state in which the plaintiff resides or in which
some part of the transaction occurred out of which the alleged cause of
action arose and that process on such an action may be served on the
applicant by leaving two copies thereof with the director. The consent
statement must stipulate and agree that the service of process must be
taken and held to be valid and binding for all purposes. The director
shall send one copy of the service of process to the applicant at the
address shown on the records of the department by registered or
certified mail.
(2) Nonresident applicants must satisfy the requirements of section
7(1) (a) through (g), (k), and (l) of this act.
(3) Nothing in this chapter prevents a polygraph examination of a
person as part of a judicial proceeding by court order if the polygraph
examination is conducted by a nonresident examiner who establishes to
a court of competent jurisdiction his or her qualifications at the time
the order is requested. The court shall consider the basic
qualifications set forth in section 7 of this act in determining
whether or not to grant the order. In granting the order the remainder
of the requirements of this chapter may be waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 An applicant for licensure who is currently
licensed and in good standing under the laws of another state may
obtain a certificate or license as a Washington state licensed
polygraph examiner without being required to satisfy the examination
requirements of this chapter if: (1) The director determines that the
certification or licensure requirements are substantially similar to
those found in Washington state; and (2) that the other state has a
written reciprocal agreement to provide similar treatment to holders of
Washington state licenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Upon approval by the department, the
director shall issue an internship license to a trainee if the trainee
applies for a license and pays the required fee within ten days prior
to the commencement of his or her internship. The application must
contain such information as may be required by the department. A
temporary intern license may be issued by the director for not more
than six months upon payment of the necessary fee.
(2) An internship license is valid for a term of twelve months from
the date of issue. Upon good cause shown to the department, the
license may be extended or renewed for any term not to exceed twelve
months.
(3) Upon a showing of extenuating circumstances, the trainee may
petition the department for an additional extension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A license or duplicate license must be
prominently displayed at the place of business of the polygraph
examiner or at the place of internship. Each license must be signed by
the director and must be issued under the seal of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A licensed examiner must provide the
director notice in writing of any change of principal business location
within thirty days of the time the examiner changes the location. A
change of business location without notification to the director
automatically suspends the license issued under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) A polygraph examiner's license must be
issued for a term of one year and must, unless suspended and revoked,
be renewed annually as prescribed by the department.
(2) A polygraph examiner whose license has expired may at any time
within two years after the expiration thereof obtain a renewal license
without examination by making a renewal application therefor and
satisfying the requirements of section 7(1) (c) and (d) of this act.
(3) A person whose polygraph examiner's license has expired while
the person was employed by a federal agency or while the person was on
active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States or on
active duty as a member of the Washington national guard may obtain a
renewal license, without examination, upon application therefor within
two years after the date of the termination of such employment or
active duty and payment of the required fee for such a renewal. The
provisions of section 7(1) (c) and (d) of this act must also be
satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A person holding himself or herself out to
be a polygraph examiner may not maintain an action or counterclaim in
any court in this state with respect to any agreement or service for
which a license is required by this chapter, or to recover the agreed
price of any compensation under the agreement, or for the services for
which a license is required by this chapter without alleging and
proving that the person had a valid license at the time the agreement
was made or the services performed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may refuse to issue or may
suspend or revoke a license on any one or more of the following
grounds:
(1) Failing to inform a subject to be examined of the nature of the
polygraph examination;
(2) Failing to inform a subject to be examined that his or her
participation in the polygraph examination is voluntary;
(3) Willfully disregarding or violating this chapter or any rule
issued pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to,
willfully making a false report concerning an examination for polygraph
examination purposes;
(4) Having demonstrated unworthiness or incompetency to act as a
polygraph examiner; or
(5) Failing to inform the subject of the results of the polygraph
examination if so requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 An unlawful act or violation of any of the
provisions of this chapter on the part of any polygraph examiner or
trainee is not cause for revocation of the license of any other
polygraph examiner for whom the offending examiner or trainee may have
been employed, unless it appears to the satisfaction of the director
that the polygraph examiner-employer has willfully aided or abetted the
illegal actions or activities of the offending polygraph examiner or
trainee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Each polygraph examiner shall register with
the county clerk in the county in which the examiner maintains a
business address. The county clerk of each county shall maintain a
list of all polygraph examiners registered in the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Upon the revocation or suspension of any
license, the licensee shall surrender the license or licenses to the
director. Failure of a licensee to do so is a violation of this
chapter and upon conviction the licensee is subject to the penalties
set forth in this chapter. At any time after the suspension or
revocation of any license, the director shall restore the license to
the former licensee upon the written recommendations of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The polygraph examiner's advisory committee
is created.
(1) The polygraph examiner's advisory committee consists of five
members appointed by the director who shall advise the director
concerning the administration of this chapter. The committee must be
composed of a balance of private polygraph examiners, law enforcement
polygraph examiners, and a person who is not a polygraph examiner but
who works in the industry. The private and law enforcement polygraph
examiners of the initial committee must be polygraph examiners who
would qualify for licensing under this chapter. Their successors must
be polygraph examiners who are licensed under this chapter.
(2) The members of the polygraph examiner's advisory committee may
not serve more than five years consecutively. The terms of office must
be staggered.
(3) Members of the committee must be reimbursed for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This chapter may be known and cited as the
polygraph examiner's act.

Sec. 25 RCW 18.235.020 and 2008 c 119 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and
professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section.
This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed
under the chapters specified in this section.
(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to
the following businesses and professions:
(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;
(ii) Bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents under chapter
18.185 RCW;
(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter
19.105 RCW;
(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;
(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians under
chapter 18.16 RCW;
(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;
(vii) Driver training schools and instructors under chapter 46.82
RCW;
(viii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;
(ix) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;
(x) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;
(xi) Notaries public under chapter 42.44 RCW;
(xii) Polygraph examiners under chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 26 of this act);
(xiii) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;
(((xiii))) (xiv) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling
under chapter 67.08 RCW;
(((xiv))) (xv) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;
(((xv))) (xvi) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters
18.85 and 18.86 RCW;
(((xvi))) (xvii) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;
(((xvii))) (xviii) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;
(((xviii))) (xix) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under
chapter 64.36 RCW;
(((xix))) (xx) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60
RCW; and
(((xx))) (xxi) Home inspectors under chapter 18.280 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The state board of registration for architects established in
chapter 18.08 RCW;
(ii) The cemetery board established in chapter 68.05 RCW;
(iii) The Washington state collection agency board established in
chapter 19.16 RCW;
(iv) The state board of registration for professional engineers and
land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;
(v) The state board of funeral directors and embalmers established
in chapter 18.39 RCW;
(vi) The state board of registration for landscape architects
established in chapter 18.96 RCW; and
(vii) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter
18.220 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the
conditions and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters
specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's
compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the
disciplinary authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 1 through 24 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Sections 1 through 24 of this act take
effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 The director of licensing may take the
necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on January 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---