BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.185 and 2007 c 490 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the case of firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(4) (a),
(b), and (c) who are covered under Title 51 RCW and firefighters,
including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis
as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that
includes over fifty such firefighters, there shall exist a prima facie
presumption that: (a) Respiratory disease; (b) any heart problems,
experienced within seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes, or
toxic substances, or experienced within twenty-four hours of strenuous
physical exertion due to firefighting activities; (c) cancer; and (d)
infectious diseases are occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140.
This presumption of occupational disease may be rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence. Such evidence may include, but is not
limited to, use of tobacco products, physical fitness and weight,
lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from other employment or
nonemployment activities.
(2) The presumptions established in subsection (1) of this section
shall be extended to an applicable member following termination of
service for a period of three calendar months for each year of
requisite service, but may not extend more than sixty months following
the last date of employment.
(3) The presumption established in subsection (1)(c) of this
section shall only apply to any active or former firefighter who has
cancer that develops or manifests itself after the firefighter has
served at least ten years and who was given a qualifying medical
examination upon becoming a firefighter that showed no evidence of
cancer. The presumption within subsection (1)(c) of this section shall
only apply to prostate cancer diagnosed prior to the age of fifty,
primary brain cancer, malignant melanoma, leukemia, non-Hodgkin's
lymphoma, bladder cancer, ureter cancer, colorectal cancer, multiple
myeloma, testicular cancer, ((and)) kidney cancer, and esophageal
cancer.
(4) The presumption established in subsection (1)(d) of this
section shall be extended to any firefighter who has contracted any of
the following infectious diseases: Human immunodeficiency
virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, all strains of hepatitis,
meningococcal meningitis, ((or)) mycobacterium tuberculosis, or
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2003, this section does not apply to a
firefighter who develops a heart or lung condition and who is a regular
user of tobacco products or who has a history of tobacco use. The
department, using existing medical research, shall define in rule the
extent of tobacco use that shall exclude a firefighter from the
provisions of this section.
(6) For purposes of this section, "firefighting activities" means
fire suppression, fire prevention, emergency medical services, rescue
operations, hazardous materials response, aircraft rescue, and training
and other assigned duties related to emergency response.
(7)(a) When a determination involving the presumption established
in this section is appealed to the board of industrial insurance
appeals and the final decision allows the claim for benefits, the board
of industrial insurance appeals shall order that all reasonable costs
of the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the
firefighter or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.
(b) When a determination involving the presumption established in
this section is appealed to any court and the final decision allows the
claim for benefits, the court shall order that all reasonable costs of
the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the
firefighter or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.
(c) When reasonable costs of the appeal must be paid by the
department under this section in a state fund case, the costs shall be
paid from the accident fund and charged to the costs of the claim.

--- END ---