BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for a county supervised community
option if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the uniform controlled substances act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
a particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period in which the
court has jurisdiction for the current offense;
(f) The standard sentence range for the current offense is one year
or less and the offender would otherwise serve his or her sentence in
a county jail; and
(g) The offender has not received either a drug offender sentencing
alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or a county supervised community option
under this act more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the prosecutor. An offender may elect to
participate in a county supervised community option under terms set by
the court. If the sentencing court determines that the offender is
eligible for the option, the court may order an examination of the
offender. The examination shall, at a minimum, address the following
issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the option.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall continue the sentencing hearing for a period set by the court up
to one hundred eighty days and order the offender into treatment
pending sentencing.
(5) The county supervised community option shall include:
(a) A period of appropriate in-patient or out-patient substance
abuse treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services;
(b) Crime-related prohibitions, including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(c) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(d) A term of total confinement within the standard sentence range
for the current offense to be imposed upon failure to complete the
county supervised community option.
(6) If the court enters a disposition under this section, the court
may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the court's probation department or a court-referred
treatment program. The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars
per month during the postconviction period pending sentencing to offset
the cost of monitoring. In addition, the court may impose any of the
following conditions:
(a) Devoting time to a specific employment or training;
(b) Remaining within prescribed geographical boundaries and
notifying the court or the probation officer before any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(c) Reporting as directed to an officer of the court's probation
department;
(d) Paying all court-ordered legal financial obligations;
(e) Performing community restitution work;
(f) Staying out of areas designated by the court;
(g) Other conditions as the court may require, such as affirmative
conditions.
(7)(a) The court may bring any offender subject to this section
back into court at any time during the postconviction period pending
sentencing on its own initiative to evaluate the offender's progress in
treatment or to determine if any violations of the conditions of the
option have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the terms of the disposition or impose sanctions under (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The court may revoke the county supervised community option and
sentence the offender to a term of total confinement within the
standard range for the offender's current offense at any time during
the period of postconviction treatment if the offender violates the
conditions of the disposition or if the offender is failing to make
satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(8) If an offender subject to this section is found by the United
States attorney general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing
shall be held by the court unless waived by the offender, and if the
court finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order,
it may terminate the offender from the county supervised community
option and immediately sentence the offender to a term of total
confinement within the standard range for the offender's current
offense.
(9) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period
served in postconviction treatment pursuant to this section.
(10) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be paid, at the option of
the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice
treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2008 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. Except as provided in section 1 of this
act, the sentencing hearing shall be held within forty court days
following conviction. Upon the motion of either party for good cause
shown, or on its own motion, the court may extend the time period for
conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW, a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the offender has a
chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In
addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense.
The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence
investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the
defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the
crime, the court shall order the department to complete a presentence
report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
A criminal history summary relating to the defendant from the
prosecuting authority or from a state, federal, or foreign governmental
agency shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and validity of
the convictions listed therein. If the court is satisfied by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has a criminal
history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to exist.
All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all
risk assessment reports and presentence reports presented to the
sentencing court and all written findings of facts and conclusions of
law as to sentencing entered by the court shall be sent to the
department by the clerk of the court at the conclusion of the
sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender is
committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall
provide, without charge, certified copies of documents relating to
criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information related to mental
health services, as defined in RCW 71.05.445 and 71.34.345, a court may
take only those steps necessary during a sentencing hearing or any
hearing in which the department presents information related to mental
health services to the court. The steps may be taken on motion of the
defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or on the court's own motion. The
court may seal the portion of the record relating to information
relating to mental health services, exclude the public from the hearing
during presentation or discussion of information relating to mental
health services, or grant other relief to achieve the result intended
by this subsection, but nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prevent the subsequent release of information related to mental
health services as authorized by RCW 71.05.445, 71.34.345, or
72.09.585. Any person who otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing
pursuant to chapter 7.69 or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the
hearing solely because the department intends to disclose or discloses
information related to mental health services.

--- END ---