BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If authorized by the county legislative authority, in addition
to the surcharges authorized in RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, and
36.22.1791, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the county auditor shall charge an additional surcharge of up to twenty
dollars for each document recorded, which is in addition to any other
charge allowed by law. The county may retain up to five percent of
these funds collected solely for the collection, administration, and
local distribution of these funds. All of the remaining funds
generated by this surcharge must be retained by the county and
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county for any of the
purposes, and to effectuate any of the powers, for which housing
authorities are authorized under chapter 35.82 RCW.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

--- END ---