BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.150 and 2006 c 372 s 903 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Grand, petit, coroner's, and district court jurors shall
receive ((for each day's attendance)), besides mileage at the rate
determined under RCW 43.03.060, the following ((expense payments))
compensation:
(((1) Grand jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;
(2) Petit jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;
(3) Coroner's jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in
no case less than ten dollars;
(4) District court jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but
in no case less than ten dollars:
PROVIDED, That)) (a) For jury service before July 1, 2010, up to
twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for each day's
attendance;
(b) For jury service beginning July 1, 2010, and until July 1,
2011, up to sixty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for
the first day of attendance and up to sixty-five dollars but in no case
less than twenty dollars for each day thereafter;
(c) For jury service beginning July 1, 2011, and until July 1,
2012, up to sixty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for
the first day of attendance and up to sixty-five dollars but in no case
less than forty dollars for each day thereafter;
(d) For jury service beginning July 1, 2012, up to sixty-five
dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for the first day of
attendance and sixty-five dollars for each day thereafter. Beginning
on July 1, 2012, the administrative office of the courts shall annually
adjust the maximum amount for the first day of attendance and the
amount for subsequent days of attendance for inflation based on changes
in the consumer price index during the previous calendar year.
"Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics,
United States department of labor.
(2) The juror compensation rates in subsection (1) of this section
are subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated for
reimbursement by the state as provided in subsection (4) of this
section. If the funds are not appropriated, grand, petit, coroner's,
and district court jurors must receive, besides expense payments for
mileage at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060, up to twenty-five
dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for each day's attendance.
(3) The county is solely responsible for juror compensation for the
first day of attendance and for any juror expense payments including
mileage. The compensation paid to jurors for the first day of
attendance is determined by the county legislative authority and must
be uniformly applied within the county.
(4) Subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated
therefor, the state shall reimburse the county quarterly for juror
compensation required under this section for jury attendance after the
first day beginning July 1, 2010. The reimbursement must be based on
a rate of twenty dollars per day beginning July 1, 2010, until July 1,
2011, forty dollars per day beginning July 1, 2011, until July 1, 2012,
and sixty-five dollars per day as adjusted for inflation under
subsection (1)(d) of this section beginning July 1, 2012. To receive
reimbursement, the county must:
(a) Certify to the administrative office of the courts by the first
of January of each year for which reimbursement is requested that the
county has:
(i) Implemented a policy on juror service in which the period of
time a juror is required to be present at the court facility may not
exceed two days during any jury term, except to complete a trial to
which the juror was assigned; and
(ii) Complied with any requirements adopted by the board for
judicial administration for the management of juries and jurors;
(b) Have provided to the administrative office of the courts data,
for the most recent calendar year, specified by the board for judicial
administration for the calculation of juror yield and juror utilization
statistics; and
(c) Use forms prescribed by the administrative office of the courts
to request reimbursement.
(5) A person excused from jury service at his or her own request
shall be allowed not more than a per diem and such mileage, if any, as
to the court shall seem just and equitable under all circumstances((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(6) The state shall fully reimburse the county in which trial is
held for all jury fees and witness fees related to criminal cases which
result from incidents occurring within an adult or juvenile
correctional institution((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the expense
payments paid to jurors shall be determined by the county legislative
authority and shall be uniformly applied within the county.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, jurors participating in
pilot projects in superior, district, and municipal courts may receive
juror fees of up to sixty-two dollars for each day of attendance in
addition to mileage reimbursement at the rate determined under RCW
43.03.060)).

Sec. 2 RCW 3.50.135 and 1984 c 258 s 126 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all civil cases, the plaintiff or defendant may demand a
jury, which shall consist of six citizens of the state who shall be
impaneled and sworn as in cases before district courts, or the trial
may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That no jury trial
may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction.
(2) A party requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee which
shall be the same as that for a jury in district court. If more than
one party requests a jury, only one jury fee shall be collected by the
court. The fee shall be apportioned among the requesting parties.
(3) Each juror ((may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars for each day in attendance upon the
municipal court)) shall be compensated at the rates provided in RCW
2.36.150(1), and in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the rate
determined under RCW 43.03.060((: PROVIDED, That)).
(4) The juror compensation rates in subsection (3) of this section
are subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated for
reimbursement by the state as provided in subsection (5) of this
section. If the funds are not appropriated, jurors must receive,
besides expense payments for mileage at the rate determined under RCW
43.03.060, up to twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten
dollars for each day's attendance.
(5) The city is solely responsible for juror compensation for the
first day of attendance and for any juror expense payments including
mileage. Subject to the availability of funds specifically
appropriated therefor, the state shall reimburse the city quarterly for
any additional juror compensation required under this section for jury
attendance after June 30, 2010. The reimbursement must be based on the
same schedule of rates and the city is subject to the same requirements
imposed on counties in RCW 2.36.150(4). The compensation paid jurors
for the first day of attendance shall be determined by the legislative
authority of the city and shall be uniformly applied.
(6) Jury trials shall be allowed in all criminal cases unless
waived by the defendant.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.20.090 and 1987 c 202 s 195 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all civil cases and criminal cases where jurisdiction is
concurrent with district courts as provided in RCW 35.20.250, within
the jurisdiction of the municipal court, the plaintiff or defendant may
demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens of the state who
shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district courts, or the
trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That no jury
trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction.
(2) A defendant requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee
which shall be the same as that for a jury in district court. Where
there is more than one defendant in an action and one or more of them
requests a jury, only one jury fee shall be collected by the court.
(3) Each juror ((may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars for each day in attendance upon the
municipal court)) shall be compensated at the rates provided in RCW
2.36.150(1), and in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the rate
determined under RCW 43.03.060((: PROVIDED, That)).
(4) The juror compensation rates provided for in subsection (3) of
this section are subject to the availability of funds specifically
appropriated for reimbursement by the state as provided in subsection
(5) of this section. If the funds are not appropriated, grand, petit,
coroner's, and district court jurors must receive, besides expense
payments for mileage at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060, up to
twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for each day's
attendance.
(5) The city is solely responsible for juror compensation for the
first day of attendance and for any juror expense payments including
mileage. Subject to the availability of funds specifically
appropriated therefor, the state shall reimburse the city quarterly for
any additional juror compensation required under this section for jury
attendance after June 30, 2010. The reimbursement must be based on the
same schedule of rates and the city is subject to the same requirements
imposed on counties in RCW 2.36.150(4). The compensation paid jurors
for the first day of attendance shall be determined by the legislative
authority of the city and shall be uniformly applied.
(6) Trial by jury shall be allowed in criminal cases involving
violations of city ordinances commencing January 1, 1972, unless such
incorporated city affected by this chapter has made provision therefor
prior to January 1, 1972.

--- END ---