BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the importance of children's
relationships with their siblings is well recognized in law and
science. The bonds between siblings are often irreplaceable, leading
some experts to believe that sibling relationships can be longer
lasting and more influential than any other over a person's lifetime.
For children who have been removed from home due to abuse or neglect,
these bonds are often much stronger because siblings have learned early
the importance of depending on one another and cooperating in order to
cope with their common problems. The legislature further finds that
when children are in the foster care system they typically have some
degree of contact or visitation with their siblings even when they are
not living together. The legislature finds, however, that when one or
more of the siblings is adopted from foster care, these relationships
may be severed completely if an open adoption agreement fails to attend
to the needs of the siblings for continuing postadoption contact. The
legislature intends to promote a greater focus, in permanency planning
and adoption proceedings, on the interests of siblings separated by
adoptive placements and to encourage the inclusion in adoption
agreements of provisions to support ongoing postadoption contact
between siblings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
The court, in reviewing and approving an agreement under RCW
26.33.295 for the adoption of a child from foster care, shall encourage
the adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents, kinship
caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to seriously
consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and siblings of
the child adoptee of providing for and facilitating continuing
postadoption contact between siblings. To the extent feasible, and
when in the best interests of the child adoptee and siblings of the
child adoptee, contact between the siblings should be frequent and of
a similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption. If the
child adoptee or known siblings of the child adoptee are represented by
an attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or
in any other child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each
attorney and guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of
continuing contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of
severing contact.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.33.295 and 1990 c 285 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
parties to a proceeding under this chapter from entering into
agreements regarding communication with or contact between child
adoptees, adoptive parents, siblings of child adoptees, and a birth
parent or parents.
(2) Agreements regarding communication with or contact between
child adoptees, adoptive parents, siblings of child adoptees, and a
birth parent or parents shall not be legally enforceable unless the
terms of the agreement are set forth in a written court order entered
in accordance with the provisions of this section. The court shall not
enter a proposed order unless the terms of such order have been
approved in writing by the prospective adoptive parents, any birth
parent whose parental rights have not previously been terminated, and,
if the child ((is)) or siblings of the child are in the custody of the
department or a licensed child-placing agency, a representative of the
department or child-placing agency. If the child is represented by an
attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in
any other child-custody proceeding, the terms of the proposed order
also must be approved in writing by the child's representative. An
agreement under this section need not disclose the identity of the
parties to be legally enforceable. The court shall not enter a
proposed order unless the court finds that the communication or contact
((between)) with the child adoptee, ((the adoptive parents, and a birth
parent or parents)) as agreed upon and as set forth in the proposed
order, would be in the child adoptee's best interests.
(3) Failure to comply with the terms of an agreed order regarding
communication or contact that has been entered by the court pursuant to
this section shall not be grounds for setting aside an adoption decree
or revocation of a written consent to an adoption after that consent
has been approved by the court as provided in this chapter.
(4) An agreed order entered pursuant to this section may be
enforced by a civil action and the prevailing party in that action may
be awarded, as part of the costs of the action, a reasonable amount to
be fixed by the court as attorneys' fees. The court shall not modify
an agreed order under this section unless it finds that the
modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the child
adoptee, and that: (a) The modification is agreed to by the adoptive
parent and the birth parent or parents; or (b) exceptional
circumstances have arisen since the agreed order was entered that
justify modification of the order.
(5) This section does not require the department or other
supervising agency to agree to any specific provisions in an open
adoption agreement and does not create a new obligation for the
department to provide supervision or transportation for visits between
siblings separated by adoption from foster care.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.33.190 and 2007 c 387 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may at any time request an agency, the department,
an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court
employee to prepare a preplacement report. A certificate signed under
penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or
her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or
filed with each preplacement report and shall include a statement of
training or experience that qualifies the person preparing the report
to discuss relevant adoption issues. A person may have more than one
preplacement report prepared. All preplacement reports shall be filed
with the court in which the petition for adoption is filed.
(2) The preplacement report shall be a written document setting
forth all relevant information relating to the fitness of the person
requesting the report as an adoptive parent. The report shall be based
on a study which shall include an investigation of the home
environment, family life, health, facilities, and resources of the
person requesting the report. The report shall include a list of the
sources of information on which the report is based. The report shall
include a recommendation as to the fitness of the person requesting the
report to be an adoptive parent. The report shall also verify that the
following issues were discussed with the prospective adoptive parents:
(a) The concept of adoption as a lifelong developmental process and
commitment;
(b) The potential for the child to have feelings of identity
confusion and loss regarding separation from the birth parents;
(c) If applicable, the relevance of the child's relationship with
siblings and the potential benefit to the child of providing for a
continuing relationship and contact between the child and known
siblings;
(d) Disclosure of the fact of adoption to the child;
(((d))) (e) The child's possible questions about birth parents and
relatives; and
(((e))) (f) The relevance of the child's racial, ethnic, and
cultural heritage.
(3) All preplacement reports shall include a background check of
any conviction records, pending charges, or disciplinary board final
decisions of prospective adoptive parents. The background check shall
include an examination of state and national criminal identification
data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system including, but not limited to, a fingerprint-based background
check of national crime information databases for any person being
investigated. It shall also include a review of any child abuse and
neglect history of any adult living in the prospective adoptive
parents' home. The background check of the child abuse and neglect
history shall include a review of the child abuse and neglect
registries of all states in which the prospective adoptive parents or
any other adult living in the home have lived during the five years
preceding the date of the preplacement report.
(4) An agency, the department, or a court approved individual may
charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting the study
and preparing the preplacement report. The court may set a reasonable
fee for conducting the study and preparing the report when a court
employee has prepared the report. An agency, the department, a court
approved individual, or the court may reduce or waive the fee if the
financial condition of the person requesting the report so warrants.
An agency's, the department's, or court approved individual's, fee is
subject to review by the court upon request of the person requesting
the report.
(5) The person requesting the report shall designate to the agency,
the department, the court approved individual, or the court in writing
the county in which the preplacement report is to be filed. If the
person requesting the report has not filed a petition for adoption, the
report shall be indexed in the name of the person requesting the report
and a cause number shall be assigned. A fee shall not be charged for
filing the report. The applicable filing fee may be charged at the
time a petition governed by this chapter is filed. Any subsequent
preplacement reports shall be filed together with the original report.
(6) A copy of the completed preplacement report shall be delivered
to the person requesting the report.
(7) A person may request that a report not be completed. A
reasonable fee may be charged for the value of work done.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.34.136 and 2008 c 267 s 3 and 2008 c 152 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency
plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services,
including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW
13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process
continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is
dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to
return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written
permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen
days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not
in agreement with the supervising agency's proposed permanency plan
must be provided to the supervising agency, all other parties, and the
court at least seven days prior to the hearing.
The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department shall not discharge a child to an
independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age
unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(5),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the agency will take to promote existing appropriate
sibling relationships and/or facilitate placement together or contact
in accordance with the best interests of each child, and what actions
the agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the
plan shall include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be
offered to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents
must meet to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and
parental requirement.
(ii) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and
the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the
child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The agency shall encourage the
maximum parent and child and sibling contact possible, when it is in
the best interest of the child, including regular visitation and
participation by the parents in the care of the child while the child
is in placement. Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a
parent's failure to comply with court orders or services where the
health, safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of
the visitation. Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court
determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the
child's health, safety, or welfare. The court and the agency should
rely upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other
appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for
visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and
appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(iv) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where
appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the
department.
(v) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever
practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the
school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster
care.
(vi) The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall
provide all reasonable services that are available within the agency,
or within the community, or those services which the department has
existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(5), that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child
will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the
child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the
parents or provide services to the parents if the court orders a
termination petition be filed. However, reasonable efforts to ensure
visitation and contact between siblings shall be made unless there is
reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the child or siblings
would be jeopardized.
(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen
of the most recent twenty-two months, the court shall require the
department to file a petition seeking termination of parental rights in
accordance with RCW 13.34.145(3)(b)(vi). In cases where parental
rights have been terminated, the child is legally free for adoption,
and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency planning
goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months
following entry of the termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3). Whenever the
permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage the
prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents, kinship
caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to seriously
consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his or her
siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing postadoption
contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is feasible, and
when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and his or her
siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent and of a
similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption. If the
child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an attorney or
guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in any other
child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each attorney and
guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of continuing
contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of severing
contact. This section does not require the department of social and
health services or other supervising agency to agree to any specific
provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create a new
obligation for the department to provide supervision or transportation
for visits between siblings separated by adoption from foster care.
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

--- END ---