BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.270 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.
(1) "School district employee benefit plan" means the overall plan
used by the district for distributing fringe benefit subsidies to
employees, including the method of determining employee coverage and
the amount of employer contributions, as well as the characteristics of
benefit providers and the specific benefits or coverage offered. It
shall not include coverage offered to district employees for which
there is no contribution from public funds.
(2) "Fringe benefit" does not include liability coverage, old-age
survivors' insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation,
retirement benefits under the Washington state retirement system, or
payment for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210.
(3) "Basic benefits" are determined through local bargaining until
September 1, 2012, and are limited to medical, dental, vision, group
term life, and group long-term disability insurance coverage.
Beginning September 1, 2012, basic benefits are determined by the
public employees' benefits board and administered by the Washington
state health care authority.
(4) "Benefit providers" include insurers, third party claims
administrators, direct providers of employee fringe benefits, health
maintenance organizations, health care service contractors, and the
Washington state health care authority or any plan offered by the
authority.
(5) "Group term life insurance coverage" means term life insurance
coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time employees in a
bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group employees.
(6) "Group long-term disability insurance coverage" means long-term
disability insurance coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time
employees in a bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group
employees.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.275 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any contract for employee benefits executed after April 13,
1990, between a school district and a benefit provider or employee
bargaining unit is null and void unless it contains an agreement to
abide by state laws relating to school district employee benefits. The
term of the contract may not exceed one year. After September 1, 2012,
any contract for employee benefits between a school district and a
bargaining unit is null and void unless basic benefits are provided
through plans administered by the Washington state health care
authority.
(2) School districts shall ((annually)) submit to the Washington
state health care authority ((summary descriptions of all benefits
offered under the district's employee benefit plan.)) all information
deemed necessary by the health care authority for the administration of
the employee benefit plans provided to school district employees,
including all information requested between the effective date of this
section and September 1, 2012, requested for preparing for the
enrollment of school district employees in benefit plans administered
by the Washington state health care authority. Until September 1,
2012, the districts shall also submit data to the health care authority
specifying the total number of employees and, for each employee, types
of coverage or benefits received including numbers of covered
dependents, the number of eligible dependents, the amount of the
district's contribution, additional premium costs paid by the employee
through payroll deductions, and the age and sex of the employee and
each dependent. The plan descriptions and the data shall be submitted
in a format and according to a schedule established by the health care
authority.
(3) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by contract with
a school district under subsection (1) of this section shall agree to
make available to the school district the benefit plan descriptions
and, where available, the demographic information on plan subscribers
that the district is required to report to the Washington state health
care authority under this section.
(4) This section shall not apply to benefit plans offered in the
1989-90 school year.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.350 and 2001 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of any of the state's school districts
or educational service districts may make available liability, life,
health, health care, accident, disability and salary protection or
insurance or any one of, or a combination of the enumerated types of
insurance, or any other type of insurance or protection, for the
members of the boards of directors, the students, and employees of the
school district or educational service district, and their dependents.
Until September 1, 2012, such coverage may be provided by contracts
with private carriers, with the state health care authority after July
1, 1990, pursuant to the approval of the authority administrator, or
through self-insurance or self-funding pursuant to chapter 48.62 RCW,
or in any other manner authorized by law. Beginning September 1, 2012,
health insurance and other forms of insurance authorized under this
section shall be made available to employees only through plans
administered by the health care authority.
(2) Whenever funds are available for these purposes the board of
directors of the school district or educational service district may
contribute all or a part of the cost of such protection or insurance
for the employees of their respective school districts or educational
service districts and their dependents. The premiums on such liability
insurance shall be borne by the school district or educational service
district.
After October 1, 1990, school districts may not contribute to any
employee protection or insurance other than liability insurance unless
the district's employee benefit plan conforms to RCW 28A.400.275 and
28A.400.280.
(3) For school board members, educational service district board
members, and students, the premiums due on such protection or insurance
shall be borne by the assenting school board member, educational
service district board member, or student. The school district or
educational service district may contribute all or part of the costs,
including the premiums, of life, health, health care, accident or
disability insurance which shall be offered to all students
participating in interschool activities on the behalf of or as
representative of their school, school district, or educational service
district. The school district board of directors and the educational
service district board may require any student participating in
extracurricular interschool activities to, as a condition of
participation, document evidence of insurance or purchase insurance
that will provide adequate coverage, as determined by the school
district board of directors or the educational service district board,
for medical expenses incurred as a result of injury sustained while
participating in the extracurricular activity. In establishing such a
requirement, the district shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the premiums of such coverage as may be offered through the
school district or educational service district to students
participating in extracurricular activities, for those students whose
families, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty paying
the entire amount of such insurance premiums. The district board shall
adopt regulations for waiving or reducing the insurance coverage
requirements for low-income students in order to assure such students
are not prohibited from participating in extracurricular interschool
activities.
(4) All contracts for insurance or protection written to take
advantage of the provisions of this section shall provide that the
beneficiaries of such contracts may utilize on an equal participation
basis the services of those practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters
18.22, 18.25, 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.011 and 2008 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b)
employees of employee organizations representing state civil service
employees, at the option of each such employee organization, and,
effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; (c) employees of a school district, except that prior to
September 1, 2012, only if the authority agrees to provide any of the
school districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350; and (d) employees of a tribal government,
if the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the
approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by
contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and
(g).
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(15) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(16) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government; a county, municipality, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision; and a
tribal government covered by this chapter.
(17) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(18) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(20) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.021 and 2007 c 274 s 1 and 2007 c 114 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state and school district employees' insurance
benefits and retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits;
administer the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study
state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost
containment in these programs while ensuring access to quality health
care; implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and
techniques for efficient administration that have potential application
to all state-purchased health services; and administer grants that
further the mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for state and school
district employees and retired or disabled school employees as
specifically authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and in accordance with the
methods described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of
this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, or a
tribal government, including providing for the participation of those
employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of
essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of
commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) Until September 1, 2012, to publish and distribute to
nonparticipating school districts and educational service districts by
October 1st of each year a description of health care benefit plans
available through the authority and the estimated cost if school
districts and educational service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority; and
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.050 and 2007 c 114 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every: (a) Department, division, or separate agency of state
government; (b) county, municipal, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivisions; and (c) tribal governments
as are covered by this chapter, shall provide contributions to
insurance and health care plans for its employees and their dependents,
the content of such plans to be determined by the authority.
Contributions, paid by the county, the municipality, other political
subdivision, or a tribal government for their employees, shall include
an amount determined by the authority to pay such administrative
expenses of the authority as are necessary to administer the plans for
employees of those groups, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(2) If the authority at any time determines that the participation
of a county, municipal, other political subdivision, or a tribal
government covered under this chapter adversely impacts insurance rates
for state employees, the authority shall implement limitations on the
participation of additional county, municipal, other political
subdivisions, or a tribal government.
(3) The contributions of any: (a) Department, division, or
separate agency of the state government; (b) county, municipal, or
other political subdivisions; and (c) any tribal government as are
covered by this chapter, shall be set by the authority, subject to the
approval of the governor for availability of funds as specifically
appropriated by the legislature for that purpose. Insurance and health
care contributions for ferry employees shall be governed by RCW
47.64.270.
(4)(a) ((Beginning September 1, 2003, the authority shall collect
from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the composite rate charged to state
agencies, plus an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and
family size as would be charged to state employees, for groups of
district employees enrolled in authority plans as of January 1, 2003.
However, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the insurance benefit allocations provided
in section 504, chapter 518, Laws of 2005, plus any additional funding
provided by the legislature for school employee health benefits, plus
an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and family size as
would be charged to state employees, for groups of district employees
enrolled in authority plans as of July 1, 2005.
(b))) For all groups of district employees enrolling in authority
plans for the first time after September 1, 2003, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district an amount equal to the
composite rate charged to state agencies, plus an amount equal to the
employee premiums by plan and by family size as would be charged to
state employees, only if the authority determines that this method of
billing the districts will not result in a material difference between
revenues from districts and expenditures made by the authority on
behalf of districts and their employees.
(((c))) (b) If the authority determines at any time that the
conditions in (((b))) (a) of this subsection cannot be met, the
authority shall offer enrollment to additional groups of district
employees on a tiered rate structure until such time as the authority
determines there would be no material difference between revenues and
expenditures under a composite rate structure for all district
employees enrolled in authority plans.
(((d))) (c) The authority may charge districts a one-time set-up
fee for employee groups enrolling in authority plans for the first
time.
(((e))) (d) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "District" means school district and educational service
district; ((and))
(ii) "Tiered rates" means the amounts the authority must pay to
insuring entities by plan and by family size; and
(iii) "Participating district" means all school districts and
educational service districts beginning September 1, 2012.
(((f))) (e) Notwithstanding this subsection and RCW 41.05.065(3),
the authority may allow districts enrolled on a tiered rate structure
prior to September 1, 2002, to continue participation based on the same
rate structure and under the same conditions and eligibility criteria.
(5) The authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of
the employer contribution to the governor and the director of financial
management for inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the
legislature.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.05.065 and 2007 c 156 s 10 and 2007 c 114 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for all employees. In developing
these plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits;
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, employee eligibility criteria related to the number of hours
worked and the benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan and eligibility
criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service
payments or employee premium payments for benefits or the
administration of a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a
health savings account.
(3) The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and
conditions of employee and retired employee participation and coverage,
including establishment of eligibility criteria subject to the
requirements of RCW 41.05.066. ((The same terms and conditions of
participation and coverage, including eligibility criteria, shall apply
to state employees and to school district employees and educational
service district employees)) School districts and educational service
districts may contractually agree with the authority to benefits
eligibility criteria that differ from the criteria applicable to state
employees.
(4) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems. During the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the board may only authorize premium contributions for
an employee and the employee's dependents that are the same, regardless
of an employee's status as represented or nonrepresented by a
collective bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002. The board shall require participating school district and
educational service district employees to pay at least the same
employee premiums by plan and family size as state employees pay.
(5) The board shall develop a health savings account option for
employees that conform to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board
shall develop a high deductible health plan to be offered in
conjunction with a health savings account developed under subsection
(5) of this section.
(7) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(8) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that
desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and casualty
insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The board may
approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring entities
holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of Washington and
which the board determines to be in the best interests of employees and
the state. The board shall adopt rules setting forth criteria by which
it shall evaluate the plans.
(9) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board
shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance
plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such
programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and ((retired)) school employees as well as eligible
dependents which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents
of the employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the
employee or retiree. Employees of local governments, political
subdivisions, and tribal governments not otherwise enrolled in the
public employees' benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll
under terms and conditions established by the administrator, if it does
not jeopardize the financial viability of the public employees'
benefits board's long-term care offering. For the purposes of this
subsection, employees and retired employees include the employees and
retired employees of school districts and educational service
districts.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees ((and
retired school employees)) in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee((,)) or retired employee((, and retired school
employee)) are solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates
developed by the health care authority. The health care authority is
authorized to charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the
premium charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the
health care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees((, retired
school employees,)) and other interested parties determined to be
appropriate by the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees((,)) and
retired employees((, and retired school employees)) the option of
purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers
appointed by the long-term care insurer. The authority, in
consultation with the public employees' benefits board, shall establish
marketing procedures and may consider all premium components as a part
of the contract negotiations with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees((,)) and retired employees((, and
retired school employees)) designed to provide education on the
potential need for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care,
and the availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.

--- END ---