BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that well-prepared and
appropriately supported teachers and caregivers are essential to
improving the quality of early learning programs and enhancing the
nature of children's experiences in those programs. The legislature
also finds that professional development programs and supports are most
effective when they are easily accessed by workers; aligned with other
elements of quality; and articulated with degree-granting programs and
clearly defined career pathways. In addition, the legislature
acknowledges the potential for early learning professionals to support
effective and positive parenting, and the benefits of making
information about early learning and development accessible to the many
family, friends, and neighbors providing care for Washington's infants,
toddlers, and preschoolers. The legislature further finds that the
professional development consortium convened by the early learning
advisory council has begun the work necessary to build an integrated
system of preparation and ongoing professional development for the
state's early learning and school-age program workforce. The
legislature intends to promote the momentum of the consortium's work
and to request periodic updates from the consortium before receiving a
comprehensive report of progress and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In partnership with the department of
early learning, the professional development consortium convened by the
early learning advisory council in response to the early learning
partnership resolution between the department of early learning, thrive
by five Washington, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, shall develop recommendations for a statewide system of
preparation and continuing professional development for the early
learning and school-age program workforce. To develop its
recommendations, the consortium shall collaborate or consult with
existing work groups and similar discrete efforts underway in
Washington.
(2) The professional development consortium shall include
representatives from a wide array of organizations, including but not
limited to:
(a) The department of early learning;
(b) The Washington state department of health;
(c) Educational service districts and school districts;
(d) Unions representing child care providers;
(e) The state board for community and technical colleges;
(f) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(g) Washington Indian tribes;
(h) Thrive by five Washington;
(i) School's out Washington;
(j) The Washington association for the education of personnel in
early childhood programs;
(k) The Washington state association for head start and ECEAP;
(l) The Washington state child care resource and referral network;
(m) The Washington state association for the education of young
children;
(n) The Washington state family child care association;
(o) The Washington state parent teacher association;
(p) The department of early learning parent advisory committee; and
(q) The economic opportunity institute.
(3) The professional development consortium shall map current
professional development resources and strategies across the state to
identify gaps in the current system and make recommendations for
improving the coordination of existing resources and strategies; define
core competencies or core knowledge areas for early learning
professionals; and develop recommendations for a plan to implement a
statewide, comprehensive, and integrated pathway of preparation and
continuing professional development and support for the early learning
and school-age program workforce.
(4) Recommendations for the plan shall include but not be limited
to:
(a) Creation of a coherent system of professional development,
including delineation of core competencies for early learning and
school-age program staff, directors, and administrators;
(b) Requirements for articulation agreements between certificate
and credential programs, degree-granting programs, professional
development programs, and community-based training programs to enable
students to transition effectively between two and four-year
institutions of higher education and to apply approved training
programs toward credit-based learning; and
(c) Creation of a comprehensive, integrated registry designed to
capture information, including workforce and professional development
data, for all early learning and school-age programs that is easily
accessible, to the extent allowed by law, by early learning and school-age program professionals, directors, trainers, researchers, resource
and referral networks, and the department of early learning.
(5) The report from the professional development consortium shall
also include:
(a) An analysis of gaps in available professional development
programs and recommendations for programs to address the needs of early
learning and school-age providers who serve children with physical or
developmental disabilities, behavioral challenges, and other special
needs;
(b) A discussion of evidence-based incentives and supports for the
early learning and school-age program workforce to obtain additional
training and education;
(c) An analysis of evidence-based compensation policies that
encourage and reward completion of professional development programs;
and
(d) An exploration of strategies for providing professional
development opportunities in languages other than English, and
incorporation of these opportunities into the comprehensive pathway for
preparation and professional development.
(6) The department of early learning and the professional
development consortium shall report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by:
(a) September 15, 2009, and December 31, 2009, with a brief status
update of the consortium's work plan; and
(b) December 31, 2010, with final recommendations for a
comprehensive statewide integrated system of preparation and continuing
professional development for the early learning and school-age program
workforce.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---