BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that gathering quality
information about a child's knowledge, skills, and abilities when the
child enters kindergarten engages and empowers parents to assist in
their children's learning processes and supports educators in
developing meaningful and culturally responsive instruction for the
child. The legislature further finds that a uniform kindergarten
assessment process can provide valuable feedback to early learning
programs engaged in quality and culturally responsive improvement
efforts and will support cross-systems communication and promote
seamless transitions to kindergarten for children and families. The
legislature also finds that stakeholder involvement is an important
element of successful program development and implementation. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to direct the department of
early learning and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction in consultation with the early learning advisory council to
convene a work group to develop and field test a uniform statewide
kindergarten assessment process. The legislature finds that meeting
the needs of families, communities, and schools to work effectively for
children's connection and learning will ensure that schools prepare
children for the challenges of the twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction jointly and in collaboration with the early learning
advisory council, shall convene a work group to develop a statewide
kindergarten assessment process to be field tested and made available
to school districts. The work group shall include representatives from
school districts, early learning providers, parent organizations,
federally recognized tribes, and organizations or groups reflecting
cultural and linguistic diversity. The purposes of the assessment
process include:
(a) Providing parents and teachers with information about a child's
knowledge, skills, abilities, and supports that may be needed upon
entering kindergarten in order to inform instruction for the child;
(b) Facilitating culturally responsive communication with parents
about what children are learning, and engaging and empowering parents
to support their children's educational success; and
(c) Providing feedback to early learning programs to improve
transitions to kindergarten and the alignment between early learning
programs and kindergarten classrooms. The assessment shall not be used
to screen or preclude children from entering kindergarten if they are
otherwise eligible for enrollment.
(2) The kindergarten assessment process shall be uniform across the
state. In developing the kindergarten assessment process, the work
group shall strive to balance the need for an assessment process that
is:
(a) Developmentally appropriate, culturally and linguistically
relevant, and socioeconomically aware;
(b) Sufficiently flexible and adaptable to accommodate children
with disabilities and special needs;
(c) Cost-effective in a way that maximizes the benefit to students,
teachers, and parents and minimizes the use of resources that would
otherwise be available for instruction; and
(d) Designed to provide data and reporting using a single, easy-to-use, web-based platform.
(3) The work group shall provide a report to the department and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction that:
(a) Identifies the knowledge, skills, and abilities to be assessed;
(b) Determines the extent of desirable alignment with early
learning standards and benchmarks, including social and emotional
learning;
(c) Defines the assessment methodology and approaches to be
implemented for all children, including children from diverse cultures
and languages, children from different socioeconomic backgrounds, and
children with disabilities and special needs;
(d) Specifies data collection needs, tools, and procedures;
(e) Determines whether and how parents may opt out of the process
and forgo the assessment on behalf of a child;
(f) Identifies a training plan and implementation strategy for use
by school districts and schools with the involvement of parents;
(g) Recommends schools and districts representing culturally
diverse populations for the field test;
(h) Identifies effective strategies for facilitating communication
with and engagement of parents in their child's kindergarten assessment
process; and
(i) Identifies methods for providing feedback to early learning
programs to enable continuous quality improvement and to enhance the
alignment between early learning and kindergarten classrooms.
(4) The kindergarten assessment process shall be field-tested in
selected schools and districts representing culturally diverse
populations during the 2010-11 school year. During the field testing
phase more than one assessment process may be utilized, but for
purposes of statewide implementation, a single assessment process shall
be selected.
(5) The work group shall examine and assess the results of the
field test and make recommendations to the department and the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation
of the kindergarten assessment process.
(6) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide a report, including cost estimates and
whether the kindergarten assessment process is ready for statewide
voluntary implementation, to the governor and the legislature not later
than January 15, 2010.
(7) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Identify the statewide kindergarten assessment process;
(b) Make necessary materials and training available;
(c) Provide technical assistance, if requested; and
(d) Encourage all school districts to implement a uniform
kindergarten assessment process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
department of early learning jointly and in consultation with the early
learning advisory council shall convene a work group to develop a
statewide kindergarten assessment process to be field tested and made
available to school districts pursuant to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall encourage all school
districts to implement a uniform kindergarten assessment process
developed under section 2 of this act.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

--- END ---