BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state
must educate more people to higher levels to adapt to the economic and
social needs of the future. While our public colleges and universities
have realized great success in helping students achieve their dreams,
the legislature also recognizes that much more must be done to prepare
current and future students for a twenty-first century economy. To
raise the levels of skills and knowledge needed to sustain the state's
economic prosperity and competitive position in a global environment,
the public higher education system must reach out to every prospective
student and citizen in unprecedented ways, with unprecedented focus.
To reach out to these citizens, the state must dismantle the
barriers of geographic isolation, cost, and competing demands of work
and family life. The state must create a more nimble system of
learning that is student-centric, more welcoming of nontraditional and
underserved students, easier to access and use, and more tailored to
today's student needs and expectations.
Technology can play a key role in helping achieve this systemic
goal. While only a decade ago access to personal computers was widely
viewed a luxury, today computers, digital media, electronic
information, and content have changed the nature of how students learn
and instructors teach. This presents a vast, borderless opportunity to
extend the reach and impact of the state's public educational
institutions and educate more people to higher levels.
Each higher education institution and workforce program serves a
unique group of students and as such, has customized its own technology
solutions to meet its emerging needs. While local solutions may have
served institutions of higher education in the past, paying for and
operating multiple technology solutions, platforms, systems, models,
agreements, and operational functionality for common applications and
support services no longer serves students or the state.
Today's students access education differently. Rather than
enrolling in one institution of higher education, staying two to four
years and graduating, today's learners prefer a cafeteria approach;
they often enroll in and move among multiple institutions - sometimes
simultaneously. Rather than sitting in lecture halls taking notes,
they may listen to podcasts of a lecture while grocery shopping or hold
a virtual study group with classmates on a video chat room. They may
prefer hybrid courses where part of their time is spent in the
classroom and part is spent online. They prefer online access for
commodity administrative services such as financial aid, admissions,
transcript services, and more.
Institutions of higher education not only must rethink teaching and
learning in a digital-networked world, but also must tailor their
administrative and student services technologies to serve the mobile
student who requires dynamic, customized information online and in real
time. Because these relationships are changing so fast and so
fundamentally, it is incumbent on the higher education system to
transform its practices just as profoundly.
Therefore, the legislature intends to both study and implement its
findings regarding how the state's public institutions of higher
education can share core resources in instructional, including library,
resources, student services, and administrative information technology
resources, user help desk services, faculty professional development,
and more. The study will examine how public institutions of higher
education can pursue a strategy of implementing single, shared,
statewide commonly needed standards-based software, web hosting and
support service solutions that are cost-effective, easily integrated,
user-friendly, flexible, and constantly improving. The full range of
applications that serve students, faculty, and administration shall be
included. Expensive, proprietary, nonstandards-based customized
applications, databases and services, and other resources that do not
allow for the transparent sharing of information across institutions,
agencies, and educational levels, including K-12, are inconsistent with
the state's objective of educating more people to higher levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
All institutions of higher education are encouraged to use common
online learning technologies including, but not limited to, existing
learning management and web conferencing systems currently managed and
governed by the state board for community and technical colleges; and
share professional development materials and activities related to
effective use of these tools. The state board for community and
technical colleges may adjust existing vendor licenses to accommodate
and provide enterprise services for any interested institutions of
higher education. The common learning management system shall be
designed in a way that allows for easy sharing of courses, learning
objects, and other digital content among the institutions of higher
education. Institutions of higher education may begin migration to
these common systems immediately. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene representatives from each four-year
institution of higher education to develop a shared fee structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall convene a higher education technology transformation task force
to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, and quality of education
relative to the strategic and operational use of technology in public
education.
(2) The task force shall be composed of one member from each public
four-year institution of higher education; six members from the
community and technical colleges; two faculty members from four-year
institutions of higher education, at least one of whom is selected by
statewide bargaining representatives; two faculty members from
community or technical colleges, at least one of whom is selected by
statewide bargaining representatives; and one member each from the
state board for community and technical colleges; the higher education
coordinating board; the workforce training and education coordinating
board; the department of information services; and the council of
presidents. The task force shall select a chair from its membership.
(3) The task force shall prepare a report that includes a plan to
improve the efficiency, effectiveness, and quality of public higher
education relative to the strategic and operational use of technology
in higher education.
(4) In developing the plan, the institutions of higher education
and their partners, identified in this section, shall take the
following actions:
(a) Investigate similar efforts, strategies, programs, and options
in other states, of private providers of higher education in the state,
and global consortia related to:
(i) Online learning technologies including but not limited to:
Learning management, ePortfolio, web conferencing systems, and other
education applications;
(ii) Personalized online student services including but not limited
to: Recruitment, admissions, retention, advising, academic planning,
course catalogs, transfer, and financial aid management;
(iii) Integrated online administrative tools including but not
limited to: Student information management; financial management;
payroll; human resources; and data collection, reporting, and analysis;
(iv) Sharing library resources including but not limited to:
Copyrighted physical and e-books, and consolidated electronic journals
and research database licensing and other models;
(v) Methods and open licensing options for effectively sharing
digital content including but not limited to: Open courseware, open
textbooks, open journals, and open learning objects;
(vi) Methods for pooling, coordinating, and otherwise more
efficiently managing enrollments so colleges with extra enrollment
space in online courses can easily and efficiently make those spaces
available to students at other colleges, or to high school students
through existing dual-credit programs, without economic, governance, or
institutional penalty or disincentive from the provider or recipient
institution;
(vii) Methods for ensuring online courses meet agreed upon
instructional guidelines, policies, and quality, and methods for
sharing these best practices to improve traditional courses' quality;
(b) Develop a process and timeline for the implementation of a
statewide approach based on the investigation in (a) of this
subsection;
(c) Focus on statewide capability and standards that enable the
efficient use of common applications, web hosting services, user
support, staff training, and consolidated software licenses and open
educational resources;
(d) Identify the metrics that can be used to gauge success;
(e) Conduct a comprehensive audit of existing resources used by
public institutions of higher education or agencies including but not
limited to technology-related: Employees; infrastructure; application
licenses and costs; web hosting facilities and services; digital
content licenses; student, faculty, and administrative applications and
services; and the amounts and uses of technology fees charged to
students. The failure of the individual public institution of higher
education or agency to fully, accurately, and thoroughly account for
these resources and fees in detail shall expressly be stated in the
task force report;
(f) Recommend strategies and specific tactics to: (i) Reduce
duplication of applications, web hosting, and support services; (ii)
effectively and efficiently use technology to share costs, data, and
faculty professional development; (iii) improve the quality of
instruction; and (iv) increase student access, transfer capability, and
the quality of student, faculty, and administration services; and
(g) Recommend governance models, funding models, and accountability
measures to achieve these and related objectives.
(5) Subject to funds for this specific purpose, the higher
education coordinating board shall engage an independent expert to
conduct an independent technical analysis of the findings of the
comprehensive technology audits outlined in subsection (4)(e) of this
section.
(6) The public institutions of higher education and their partners
shall jointly report their findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010. A
preliminary report shall be delivered to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---