BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS--PURPOSE. The legislature finds
that:
(1) The construction, maintenance, and preservation of the streets
and the provision of street utility service in urban areas is essential
for the protection and convenience of users receiving the service.
Inadequate and poorly maintained streets and poor street utility
service adversely affect the health, safety, and welfare of the lives
and property of residents and the success of businesses located in
these areas. Harmful impacts include slowing traffic, decreased
vehicle fuel efficiency, and a consequent severe adverse impact on air
quality. Further adverse impacts are traffic congestion, vehicle
damage, increased accident frequency and more serious accidents, and
decreased access to needed services and businesses.
(2) Residents and businesses in areas with poorly maintained
streets and poor street utility service have slowed and decreased
access to service and delivery vehicle support, including decreased
access to public transportation and taxi service, the delivery of goods
and services, and slower fire, police, and emergency medical vehicle
services.
(3) Poor street utility service in urban areas accelerates
deterioration of private vehicles, increases traffic volumes, and
exacerbates peak flow traffic problems.
(4) The benefits for city residents and businesses in areas with
well-constructed and maintained streets and good street utility service
are the opposite of the burdens, and include improved air quality, fuel
efficiency, travel speed, travel safety, reduction of damage and
deterioration of vehicles, lower insurance rates, and better public
transportation, fire, police, and emergency medical vehicle access.
(5) Access to and use of the street system and street utility
service is necessary for the use of all developed real property.
(6) Construction, maintenance, repair, and preservation of the
streets and other street utility service in urban areas has
traditionally been funded by general taxes without regard to the
burdens placed upon streets by different classes of users or the
respective benefits derived by them.
(7) Objective means are available to assess pavement conditions to
identify distressed areas of the streets in cities.
(8) Objective measures are available to assess the relative burdens
placed upon streets and street utility service users in urban areas by
different classes of users and the respective benefits derived by them.
(9) Maintenance and preservation of streets and street utility
service in urban areas should be funded by rates charged to users of
the streets consistent with the burden placed on the streets by various
classes of users and the respective benefits derived by them as utility
supported users of the street system.
(10) A street utility is a more equitable and efficient means to
monitor, regulate, and maintain the streets and to provide street
utility service than general tax funding.
(11) Since 1980, vehicle registration has increased by sixty
percent and vehicle miles traveled on municipal streets have increased
far in excess of the rate of population growth.
(12) Pavement surfaces in urban areas are subjected to much heavier
use and have much higher maintenance needs than pavement in rural
areas. When pavement is not properly maintained, the pavement
deterioration process, amount of work to restore the pavement, and
costs of restoration all accelerate exponentially. This creates a
downward spiral of increasing pavement deterioration and higher costs
to remediate the problem.
(13) The institute of transportation engineers is an international
educational and scientific professional association. It has developed
reports, which fairly measure the relative benefits of streets to
different classes of property use. The institute of transportation
engineers reports provide a reasonable basis to apportion a part of the
costs of street utility service.
(14) A street utility created and governed by the legislative
authority of a city consistent with the requirements of this chapter
provides an appropriate and efficient means to monitor, regulate, and
maintain public streets.
(15) The preservation of streets through a utility service program
will directly serve and benefit those who pay street utility rates by
allocating street utility rates to those who place servicing burdens
within the street utility service area.
(16) The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the creation of a
street utility by cities to serve the residents and businesses in
utility areas through the preservation and maintenance of streets for
areas with an identified street utility service. Street utility rates
are determined in proportion to the levels of use of different classes
of residents and businesses who depend upon access to and use of the
street system and burdens placed upon the streets by different classes
of residential and business users.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "City" means an incorporated city or town.
(2) "Sound engineering principles" means principles or learning
reasonably accepted within the civil engineering or traffic engineering
profession, including the department of transportation extended method
in paving distress ratings, the department of transportation pavement
distress manual, the department of transportation local agency pavement
management guide, materials developed by the institute of
transportation engineers, including manuals or materials
differentiating types of property uses and correlating property use and
the expected number of annual automobile and pedestrian trips generated
by these uses, and other studies, manuals, or materials that are
reliable and based on sound engineering practice as may be developed by
professional engineering staff or consultants.
(3) "Street" means a city's public right-of-way within the outer
boundaries of areas used for pedestrian, bicycle, or motor vehicle
traffic. "Street" includes bridges, gutters, curbs, and sidewalks,
including those that have barrier-free design features and are
wheelchair and stroller accessible.
(4) "Street utility" means a municipal utility providing street
utility services in accordance with this chapter.
(5) "Street utility rates" means street utility user charges
authorized under this chapter for street utility services.
(6) "Street utility service" means actions by a city established
street utility to design, condemn, construct, own, manage, maintain,
operate, and preserve all or any described portion of its roads,
streets, sidewalks, and other transportation improvements as a separate
enterprise and facility. These improvements may include traffic
control devices, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, parking facilities, and
drainage facilities. Street utility activities may further be
identified by ordinance consistent with these purposes. Street utility
services may also include (a) repayment of revenue or general
obligation bonds repayable from charges listed in section 5 of this act
issued in accordance with chapter 35.41, 35.92, or 39.46 RCW, or (b)
other evidences of indebtedness issued to pay costs for which street
utility service revenues may be used.
(7) "Street utility service area" means an area in which street
utility services are provided and street utility rates are charged, as
established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 LEGISLATIVE AUTHORITY ACTION. Subject to
section 4 of this act, the legislative authority of a city may
establish a street utility to provide street utility service, with the
authority to own and operate the street utility. The legislative
authority of the city is the governing body of the street utility. The
legislative authority of the city may not assess a street utility user
rate outside its jurisdictional limits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FORMATION PROCESS. (1) The legislative
authority of a city shall conduct a public hearing prior to the
formation of a street utility. Notice of the hearing must include an
explanation of the proposal and the proposed street utility service
areas. The notice may include a description of the condition of the
pavement areas for the proposed street utility service area, summaries
of pertinent studies, field investigations, and pavement condition
scores, including areas classified, or at risk to be classified, for no
further maintenance without street utility support. The notice must
include a general proposed plan for street utility service to be
carried out with street utility rates, a summary of the proposed street
utility rates, a description of the proposed area or areas for utility
service, and any other pertinent information. The notice must be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation within the proposed street utility service area.
Alternatively, there may be one publication, combined with the
presentation of the notice information on a government cable television
channel at least ten times in the two-week period and prominently
posting the required information on a municipal web site.
(2) At the hearing, the city's legislative authority shall review
the proposal and consider comments from any interested party and may
modify the proposal in response to those comments, as well as any
information, opinion polls, or other material relevant to the question
presented. The hearing may be continued from time to time.
(3) Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the city's legislative
authority may adopt an ordinance creating a street utility service area
or areas, together with the street utility rates to support the
utility, which must be supported by an evidentiary record with findings
in accordance with this section and consistent with the findings and
purposes of this chapter.
(4)(a) The street utility ordinance must include:
(i) A finding that the creation of a street utility is in the
interest of the public health and safety as supported by findings from
the hearing and any other basis;
(ii) A finding that the street utility will allocate the burdens
placed on the streets by various classes of users and benefit the
various classes of users;
(iii) A description of the street utility service area and user
rate schedule consistent with section 5 of this act setting forth the
amounts to be charged to residential and business street users located
in the street utility service area; and
(iv) A provision that a street utility advisory committee may be
established to advise the city from time to time regarding the street
utility. If established, the street utility advisory committee must be
appointed by the mayor or mayor's designee and confirmed by the city's
legislative authority. Committee membership may not exceed seven
members, a majority of which must be city residents. Committee
membership may include paving contractors, civil engineers,
professional traffic engineering staff, and other persons with special
training or expertise relevant to the issues presented. Members must
serve without compensation, but approved committee expenses and staff
support must be provided by the city.
(b) The street utility ordinance may include a description or
summary of the condition of the pavement in the street utility service
area, based on field investigations, pavement condition scores, or
other information. The description or summary may include a proposed
timetable for street utility services, summary of the services, budget,
including projected revenues from street utility rates or other
sources, and any other factors deemed relevant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RATES. (1)(a) If a street utility is
established, street utility rates may be established by ordinance not
inconsistent with this section.
(b) Street utility rates only apply to residents and businesses
located in the street utility service area or areas. Rates may be
expressed as a designated dollar amount per trip generated, type of
household unit, or type of business. Rates may be collected no more
frequently than monthly and no less frequently than annually. Rates
set for users other than households may be expressed in equivalents of
household units or as specified by ordinance.
(2) In establishing street utility rates, the following factors may
be considered:
(a) A cost component for the street utility's ongoing base level
operations and variations in capacity access demands; and the estimated
number of vehicle trips generated by specific types of property
occupancies or uses. The correlation between property uses and the
estimated number of automobile trips from these uses may be considered.
The ordinance must consider the institute of transportation engineers
manual or other resources of comparable acceptance or reliability.
(b) User location; differences in costs of service to different
user classes; user proximity to arterial streets; differences in costs
or character of the service to users; times of use; number, type, and
weight of vehicles associated with household units or businesses;
differences in the cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of various parts of the street system, by capital
contributions made to the system including, but not limited to,
assessments, achievement of traffic reduction, and air quality
improvement goals; capital contributions made to the system including,
but not limited to, assessments; special assessments, such as limited
improvement districts, for streets and street-related improvements; and
any other matters that present a reasonable difference as a basis for
distinction. For undeveloped property, a trip rate or fee component
may not be assessed and only that base rate portion reasonably
attributed to the benefit received or burden created by the undeveloped
property on the services provided by the street utility may be charged.
Street utility rates must not include an exemption or credit for the
payment of any tax.
(c) Any other matters that present a reasonable difference as a
grounds for distinction of relative costs and benefits among classes of
users.
(3)(a) A city may reduce or exempt rates on residential properties
to the extent of their occupancy by low-income senior citizens and
other low-income citizens as provided in RCW 74.38.070, or to the
extent of their occupancy by the needy or infirm, as these terms are
defined by the city in the street utility ordinance.
(b) A city may reduce or exempt rates on other governmental
entities to the extent such governmental entities are providing for
streets, street-related improvements, and street utility services.
(4) If feasible, the ordinance must provide for mitigation for
incidental trips that are often combined with other trips, as compared
to destination trips that are associated with creating separate trip
burdens on the streets.
(5) The ordinance may provide for user rate reduction:
(a) Based on mitigation through impact fees or other mitigation
fees paid for the same improvements as the street authority; or
(b) If there is a showing of trip reduction, including reductions
for residential users participating in regular carpool or vanpool
arrangements or for commercial users offering carpool, vanpool, public
transit passes, or a trip reduction program approved under provisions
as established by ordinance.
(6) Street utility rates must be uniform for the same class of
persons receiving services provided or imposing burdens on a
transportation system. Street utility rates collected by a street
utility must not be established in excess of the amount authorized by
the ordinance. Street utility rates may not be collected from vacant
parcels not developed for occupancy or use.
(7) Street utility rates may supplement but may not duplicate or
replace transportation impact fees authorized under growth management
laws designed to pay for increasing the capacity of the street system
to accommodate the needs for new growth and development rather than
street maintenance or remediation of existing deficiencies in the
street system.
(8) A city may provide or contract to provide billing and
collection services of the street utility rates as a part of or
separate from other utility services provided. The ordinance may use
the connection or consumption of other utility services as a basis to
establish occupancy or use.
(9) Street utility rates may not be computed based on the ad
valorem value of the underlying real property or its improvements.
(10) The rates established under this section are not intended to
be regarded as tolls, but to the extent that the rates may be
determined to be tolls by a court of competent jurisdiction,
legislative approval is granted consistent with the requirements of
this chapter.
(11) Street utility rates established under this section do not
constitute taxes or fees as provided under RCW 82.02.050 through
82.02.090 or chapter 39.92 RCW. A street utility may be funded by
rates or any other lawful revenue source.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CITIZEN'S APPEAL BOARD. (1) The street
utility ordinance under section 5 of this act must include provision
for a user to appeal a rate or rate classification upon a showing that
the user does not generate equivalent trips, on the average, to other
parcels in the same rate class or another good cause. The appeal may
also request a review of whether the base rate is adequate to cover
ongoing base level operations and variations in capacity access demands
or other base rate items allocated to the base rate for a given class
of customers. Refunds on collected rates are not required for any
period before the time a written appeal is received under procedures
established by ordinance. A reasonable charge, not to exceed actual
cost of the appeal, may be required to be paid by an appealing
ratepayer.
(2) Ratepayer appeals must be considered by a three-member
citizen's appeal board appointed by the chief executive of the city
with the approval of the legislative authority. Members serve
staggered three-year terms. For the first terms, one member serves one
year, one member serves two years, and one member serves three years,
and thereafter, the terms are three years. Board members are not
subject to removal except for misfeasance or malfeasance in office.
Board members serve without compensation, except reasonable staff
support is provided for their administrative needs.
(3) The jurisdiction of the citizen's appeal board extends to
appeals about rate classifications or rates charged to an individual
user. Questions within the board's jurisdiction include whether a rate
or rate computation is consistent with state law and the authorizing
street utility ordinance. The board may also consider whether any
given class or classes of ratepayers are unfairly burdened with street
utility rates compared to another class or classes of ratepayers. A
class or classes of ratepayers shall not subsidize or support any other
class or classes of ratepayers and each class shall bear its own fair
pro rata share of street utility expenses.
(4) The board's jurisdiction does not extend to any other aspects
of street utility operation, enforcement of the street utility
ordinance, or any management or control of the city's streets. Appeals
from decisions of the board acting within its jurisdictional duties
must be directly made to the superior court. Additional provisions
that govern appeals under this section must be provided by ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RATE COLLECTION. (1) A street utility
ordinance may include provision of a penalty for rates sixty days past
due, but not to exceed one percent per month thereafter on the unpaid
balance. All unpaid street utility rates may be collected against the
owner, tenant, or occupant in any manner as provided by law, but for a
tenant or occupant, rates collected may not be outside the period of
tenancy or occupancy.
(2) As a supplemental remedy, a street utility ordinance may: (a)
Provide that any unpaid rates and applicable penalties are a lien
against the real property for which the street utility services were
provided, which amounts may be foreclosed in the manner of a lien for
labor and materials furnished on the subject premises. A lien may not
exceed twelve months of unpaid rates, plus any applicable penalties; or
(b) provide that unpaid street utility rates are a lien against the
property to which the rates are provided, which may be enforced in the
same manner as rates and charges for the use of systems of sewerage
under chapter 35.67 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 USE OF REVENUES. (1) All street utility
rate revenues must be deposited in a special fund or account dedicated
to permissible street utility service and must be used for those
purposes only.
(2) Permitted purposes include any identified street utility
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 DISSOLUTION. The legislative authority of
a city may dissolve a street utility by ordinance upon a finding that
the dissolution is in the public interest, but any unexpended funds
must be held in trust to be expended for only those permissible
purposes as provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 OTHER RESOURCES. A city electing to
establish a street utility under this chapter may use any other
resources for street utility service otherwise permitted by law,
consistent with any limitations on the service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 SCOPE. (1) This chapter or any action
taken under its authority does not diminish any other general or
specific municipal regulatory or funding powers otherwise permitted by
law.
(2) This chapter is not intended to create or enhance any duty upon
any city with respect to the maintenance and preservation of its
streets beyond that which now exists under the general law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 REPEALER. The following acts or parts of
acts are each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.80.040 (Street utility -- Establishment) and 1991 c 141 s
1;
(2) RCW 82.80.050 (Street utility -- Charges, credits) and 2006 c 301
s 5, 2000 c 103 s 21, & 1991 c 141 s 2; and
(3) RCW 82.80.060 (Use of other proceeds by utility) and 1991 c 141
s 3.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.80.070 and 2005 c 319 s 139 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local
option authority of RCW 82.80.010((,)) and 82.80.030((, and 82.80.050))
(hereafter called "local option transportation revenues") shall be used
for transportation purposes only, including but not limited to the
following: The operation and preservation of roads, streets, and other
transportation improvements; new construction, reconstruction, and
expansion of city streets, county roads, and state highways and other
transportation improvements; development and implementation of public
transportation and high capacity transit improvements and programs; and
planning, design, and acquisition of right-of-way and sites for such
transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on
the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as
that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.
(2) The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for
transportation uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land
use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for
metropolitan planning areas.
(3) Each local government with a population greater than eight
thousand that levies or expends local option transportation funds, is
also required to develop and adopt a specific transportation program
that contains the following elements:
(a) The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the
entire area or areas within which local option transportation revenues
will be levied and expended.
(b) The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan
for the geographic areas covered and shall identify the proposed
operation and construction of transportation improvements and services
in the designated plan area intended to be funded in whole or in part
by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the annual
costs applicable to the program.
(c) The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is
coordinated with applicable transportation plans for the region and for
adjacent jurisdictions.
(d) The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan,
updated annually, identifying the specific public and private sources
and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the program. The program
shall include a proposed schedule for construction of projects and
expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new
development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional
revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for
transportation improvements in the program.
(4) Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand
exercising the authority for local option transportation funds shall
periodically review and update their transportation program to ensure
that it is consistent with applicable local and regional transportation
and land use plans and within the means of estimated public and private
revenue available.
(5) In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation
facilities, improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local
option transportation revenues shall be identified in the
transportation program and expenditures shall be made based upon the
following criteria, which are stated in descending order of weight to
be attributed:
(a) First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;
(b) Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably
foreseeable congestion;
(c) Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;
(d) Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such
as from the state transportation improvement board, or by private
sector contributions, such as those from the local transportation act,
chapter 39.92 RCW; and
(e) Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government
determines is appropriate.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of
levying, receiving, and expending local option transportation revenues,
no local government agency use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan
any revenues currently being used for transportation purposes to
nontransportation purposes.
(7) Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal
agreements to jointly develop and adopt with other local governments
the transportation programs required by this section for the purpose of
accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.
(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option
transportation revenues for the amortization of local government
general obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes
consistent with the requirements of this section.
(9) Subsections (1) through (8) of this section do not apply to a
regional transportation investment district imposing a tax or fee under
the local option authority of this chapter. Proceeds collected under
the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a district
must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---