BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW under the medicaid in-home personal care program:
(a) For a family member of a client who provides care for the
client; or
(b) For a provider who resides with a client.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Client" means a person who has been deemed eligible by the
department to receive medicaid in-home personal care services.
(b) "Family member" shall be liberally construed to include, but
not be limited to, a parent, child, sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin,
grandparent, grandchild, grandniece, or grandnephew.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to enforce this section, to
include the termination of contracts for agencies which are found to be
in violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---