BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that decisions made by
governing boards of each respective institution greatly impact the
lives of students and that student participation in the decision-making
process can provide insight into the impacts of actions by trustees
that are not always measurable through reports and statistics.
Students are on campus every day using services and experiencing
aspects of the institution that board members may only see on paper,
providing a unique and valuable perspective that should not be
overlooked.
Students serving on governing boards of higher education have
proven effective in Washington and in over thirty other states. For
over ten years students at Washington's four-year institutions of
higher education have served as voting members on the board of
trustees, regents, and the higher education coordinating board,
providing greater depth in board deliberations and a well-educated
conduit for students to voice ideas and concerns.
The student perspective at community colleges also brings the board
closer to their community. Student populations at community colleges
are the most diverse of any institution of higher education in the
state. Being on campus and in class every day, students are exposed to
a more diverse group than any member of the board representing any one
group of the community.
Student positions on governing boards are also a valuable tool for
developing leadership through experiential learning. Student members
learn processes of institutional governance, become involved in campus
projects, analyze policy proposals, and participate in board
discussions and decision making.
It is the intent of the legislature to enhance community college
governance by fostering a more dynamic relationship between students
and institutions through the encouragement of student participation in
policy development and decision making at the district and state level.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.100 and 1991 c 238 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, except as provided in section 3 of this act,
who shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st
of the year in which appointed. In making such appointments the
governor shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and
representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities,
in the membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees
for districts containing technical colleges shall include at least one
member from business and one member from labor.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chairman
from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such
bylaws, rules and regulations as it deems necessary for its own
government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but
a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the
attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its
bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be
none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Boards of trustees for each college district, by majority vote,
may establish a sixth trustee that shall be filled by a student. The
governor shall select each student member from a list of candidates, of
at least three and not more than five, submitted by the associated
student governments or their equivalent of the college district. The
student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year,
beginning July 1st and ending June 30th, or until the student member's
successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student
member shall be a full-time student in good standing at a college
within the college district at the time of appointment.
(2) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

--- END ---