BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds: (1) The full
utilization of state salmonid hatcheries is vital to the recreational
and commercial fisheries and related economic development and
employment; and (2) effective measures are necessary to maintain all
hatchery operations that are consistent with conservation of wild
salmon populations and support sustainable fisheries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a program that utilizes public-private partnerships for the resumption or continued operation and
management of state-owned salmonid hatcheries now closed or scheduled
for closure during the 2009-2011 biennium. To implement the program,
the department shall accept and review applications to determine the
appropriateness of the private sector partners to manage and operate
selected salmonid hatcheries. The department shall accelerate the
application process relating to any hatchery currently in operation to
avoid cessation of ongoing salmon production.
(2)(a) When selecting private sector partners for approval, the
department shall develop and apply criteria identifying the
appropriateness of a potential partner. The criteria shall be subject
to the provisions of RCW 77.100.040 and must attempt to ensure that the
private sector partner has a long-range business plan, which may
include a special harvest of hatchery salmon to ensure the long-range
future solvency of the partnership.
(b) Partners under this section must:
(i) Be qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue
code;
(ii) Meet an equivalent level of organizational legitimacy; or
(iii) Be a federally recognized tribe.
(3) The department shall prioritize partnership applications that
provide for the maximum resumption or continuation of existing hatchery
production in a manner consistent with the mandate contained in RCW
77.04.012 to maintain the economic well-being and stability of the
fishing industry.
(4) The department shall maintain full authority and oversight of
the selected hatcheries. Partnership agreements entered into with
private sector partners under this section may not adversely affect
existing state laws, agency rules, hatchery management policy involving
species listed under the federal endangered species act, or any
applicable tribal hatchery management policy or recreational and
commercial harvest policy.
(5) All partnership agreements entered into under this section must
contain a provision that requires the private sector partner to hold
harmless the department and the state for any civil liability arising
from the private sector partner's participation in the agreement or
activities at the subject hatchery or hatcheries.

--- END ---