BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more alternative
sources of energy, such as wind and solar power, are being utilized in
Washington and these new sources require that additional power
generating capacity be secured in order to ensure that power can still
be delivered when these intermittent sources are not available. The
purpose of this act is to provide a mechanism for utilities to
demonstrate what sources of energy will be used when intermittent
alternative energy is not available.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.280.030 and 2006 c 195 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each electric utility must develop a plan consistent with this
section.
(1) Utilities with more than twenty-five thousand customers that
are not full requirements customers shall develop or update an
integrated resource plan by September 1, 2008. At a minimum, progress
reports reflecting changing conditions and the progress of the
integrated resource plan must be produced every two years thereafter.
An updated integrated resource plan must be developed at least every
four years subsequent to the 2008 integrated resource plan. The
integrated resource plan, at a minimum, must include:
(a) A range of forecasts, for at least the next ten years, of
projected customer demand which takes into account econometric data and
customer usage;
(b) An assessment of commercially available conservation and
efficiency resources. Such assessment may include, as appropriate,
high efficiency cogeneration, demand response and load management
programs, and currently employed and new policies and programs needed
to obtain the conservation and efficiency resources;
(c) An assessment of commercially available, utility scale
renewable and nonrenewable generating technologies;
(d) A comparative evaluation of renewable and nonrenewable
generating resources, including transmission and distribution delivery
costs, and conservation and efficiency resources using "lowest
reasonable cost" as a criterion;
(e) The integration of the demand forecasts and resource
evaluations into a long-range assessment describing the mix of supply
side generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources
that will meet current and projected needs at the lowest reasonable
cost and risk to the utility and its ratepayers; ((and))
(f) A short-term plan identifying the specific actions to be taken
by the utility consistent with the long-range integrated resource plan;
and
(g) An evaluation and short-term plan indicating what generating
resources will be used by the utility to stabilize intermittent
renewable resources such as wind and solar power.
(2) All other utilities may elect to develop a full integrated
resource plan as set forth in subsection (1) of this section or, at a
minimum, shall develop a resource plan that:
(a) Estimates loads for the next five and ten years;
(b) Enumerates the resources that will be maintained and/or
acquired to serve those loads; and
(c) Explains why the resources in (b) of this subsection were
chosen and, if the resources chosen are not renewable resources or
conservation and efficiency resources, why such a decision was made.
(3) An electric utility that is required to develop a resource plan
under this section must complete its initial plan by September 1, 2008.
(4) Resource plans developed under this section must be updated on
a regular basis, at a minimum on intervals of two years.
(5) Plans shall not be a basis to bring legal action against
electric utilities.
(6) Each electric utility shall publish its final plan either as
part of an annual report or as a separate document available to the
public. The report may be in an electronic form.

--- END ---