BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are many
homeless persons in our state that are in need of shelter and other
services that are not being provided by the state and local
governments. The legislature also finds that in many communities
churches play an important role in providing needed services to the
homeless, including the provision of shelter upon church property. By
providing such shelter, the religious institutions in our communities
perform a valuable public service that, for many, offers a temporary,
stop-gap solution to the larger social problem of increasing numbers of
homeless persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A church may host temporary encampments for the homeless on
property owned or controlled by the church whether within buildings
located on the property or elsewhere on the property outside of
buildings.
(2) A county may not enact an ordinance or regulation or take any
other action that:
(a) Unreasonably interferes with the decisions or actions of a
church regarding the location of housing or shelter for homeless
persons on property the church owns or controls;
(b) Unreasonably prohibits or attempts to regulate the housing of
homeless persons on church property based upon the property's proximity
to a school or day care center; or
(c) Requires a church to obtain insurance pertaining to the
liability of a municipality with respect to homeless persons housed on
church property or otherwise requires the church to indemnify the
municipality against such liability.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "church" means a building or
buildings and adjacent real property that is used as a place of worship
by a religious denomination and that is owned or controlled by the
denomination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A church may host temporary encampments for the homeless on
property owned or controlled by the church whether within buildings
located on the property or elsewhere on the property outside of
buildings.
(2) A city or town may not enact an ordinance or regulation or take
any other action that:
(a) Unreasonably interferes with the decisions or actions of a
church regarding the location of housing or shelter for homeless
persons on property the church owns or controls;
(b) Unreasonably prohibits or attempts to regulate the housing of
homeless persons on church property based upon the property's proximity
to a school or day care center; or
(c) Requires a church to obtain insurance pertaining to the
liability of a municipality with respect to homeless persons housed on
church property or otherwise requires the church to indemnify the
municipality against such liability.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "church" means a building or
buildings and adjacent real property that is used as a place of worship
by a religious denomination and that is owned or controlled by the
denomination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A church may host temporary encampments for the homeless on
property owned or controlled by the church whether within buildings
located on the property or elsewhere on the property outside of
buildings.
(2) A code city may not enact an ordinance or regulation or take
any other action that:
(a) Unreasonably interferes with the decisions or actions of a
church regarding the location of housing or shelter for homeless
persons on property the church owns or controls;
(b) Unreasonably prohibits or attempts to regulate the housing of
homeless persons on church property based upon the property's proximity
to a school or day care center; or
(c) Requires a church to obtain insurance pertaining to the
liability of a municipality with respect to homeless persons housed on
church property or otherwise requires the church to indemnify the
municipality against such liability.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "church" means a building or
buildings and adjacent real property that is used as a place of worship
by any religious group, congregation, or denomination and that is owned
or controlled by such group, congregation, or denomination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this act is intended to change
applicable law or be interpreted to prohibit a county, city, town, or
code city from applying zoning and land use regulations allowable under
established law to real property owned by a church, regardless of
whether the property owned by the church is used to provide shelter or
housing to homeless persons.

--- END ---