BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
marine container ports operate within a complex system of marine
terminal operations, truck and train transportation corridors, and
industrial services that together support a critical amount of our
state and national economy, including key parts of our state's
manufacturing and agricultural sectors, and directly create thousands
of high-wage jobs throughout our region.
(2) The legislature further finds that the container port services
are increasingly challenged by the conversion of industrial properties
to nonindustrial uses, leading to competing and incompatible uses that
can hinder port operations, restrict efficient movement of freight, and
limit the opportunity for improvements to existing port-related
facilities.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that local land
use decisions are made in consideration of the long-term and widespread
economic contribution of our international container ports and related
industrial lands and transportation systems, and to ensure that
container ports continue to function effectively alongside vibrant city
waterfronts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Comprehensive plans of cities that have a marine container port
with annual operating revenues in excess of sixty million dollars
within their jurisdiction must include a container port element.
(2) Comprehensive plans of cities that include all or part of a
port district with annual operating revenues in excess of twenty
million dollars may include a marine industrial port element. Prior to
adopting a marine industrial port element under this subsection (2),
the commission of the applicable port district must adopt a resolution
in support of the proposed element.
(3) Port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section must be developed collaboratively between the city and the
applicable port, and must establish policies and programs that:
(a) Define and protect the core areas of port and port-related
industrial uses within the city;
(b) Provide reasonably efficient access to the core area through
freight corridors within the city limits; and
(c) Identify and resolve key land use conflicts along the edge of
the core area, and minimize and mitigate, to the extent practicable,
incompatible uses along the edge of the core area.
(4) Port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section must be:
(a) Completed and approved by the city according to the schedule
specified in RCW 36.70A.130; and
(b) Consistent with the economic development, transportation, and
land use elements of the city's comprehensive plan, and consistent with
the city's capital facilities plan.
(5) In adopting port elements under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, cities and ports must: Ensure that there is consistency
between the port elements and the port comprehensive scheme required
under chapters 53.20 and 53.25 RCW; and retain sufficient planning
flexibility to secure emerging economic opportunities.
(6) In developing port elements under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, a city may utilize one or more of the following
approaches:
(a) Creation of a port overlay district that protects container
port uses;
(b) Use of industrial land banks;
(c) Use of buffers and transition zones between incompatible uses;
(d) Use of joint transportation funding agreements;
(e) Use of policies to encourage the retention of valuable
warehouse and storage facilities;
(f) Use of limitations on the location or size, or both, of
nonindustrial uses in the core area and surrounding areas; and
(g) Use of other approaches by agreement between the city and the
port.
(7) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must provide matching grant funds to cities meeting the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section to support development of the required
container port element.
(8) Any planned improvements identified in port elements adopted
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be transmitted by
the city to the transportation commission for inclusion in the
statewide transportation plan required under RCW 47.01.071.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06.140 and 2007 c 516 s 11 and 2007 c 512 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares the following transportation
facilities and services to be of statewide significance: Highways of
statewide significance as designated by the legislature under chapter
47.05 RCW, the interstate highway system, interregional state principal
arterials including ferry connections that serve statewide travel,
intercity passenger rail services, intercity high-speed ground
transportation, major passenger intermodal terminals excluding all
airport facilities and services, the freight railroad system, the
Columbia/Snake navigable river system, marine port facilities and
services that are related solely to marine activities affecting
international and interstate trade, key freight transportation
corridors serving these marine port facilities, and high capacity
transportation systems serving regions as defined in RCW 81.104.015.
The department, in cooperation with regional transportation planning
organizations, counties, cities, transit agencies, public ports,
private railroad operators, and private transportation providers, as
appropriate, shall plan for improvements to transportation facilities
and services of statewide significance in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan. Improvements to facilities and services of
statewide significance identified in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan, or to highways of statewide significance
designated by the legislature under chapter 47.05 RCW, are essential
state public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200.
(2) The department of transportation, in consultation with local
governments, shall set level of service standards for state highways
and state ferry routes of statewide significance. Although the
department shall consult with local governments when setting level of
service standards, the department retains authority to make final
decisions regarding level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes of statewide significance. In establishing level of
service standards for state highways and state ferry routes of
statewide significance, the department shall consider the necessary
balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of
people and goods and the needs of local communities using these
facilities. When setting the level of service standards under this
section for state ferry routes, the department may allow for a standard
that is adjustable for seasonality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---