BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the federal
fostering connections to success and increasing adoptions act of 2008
provides important new opportunities for the state to use federal
funding to promote permanency and positive outcomes for youth in foster
care and for those who age out of the foster care system.
(2) The legislature also finds that research regarding former
foster youth is generally sobering. Longitudinal research on the adult
functioning of former foster youth indicates a disproportionate
likelihood that youth aging out of foster care and those who spent
several years in care will experience poor outcomes in a variety of
areas, including limited human capital upon which to build economic
security; untreated mental or behavioral health problems; involvement
in the criminal justice and corrections systems; and early parenthood
combined with second-generation child welfare involvement. The
legislature further finds that research also demonstrates that access
to adequate and appropriate supports during the period of transition
from foster care to independence can have significant positive impacts
on adult functioning and can improve outcomes relating to educational
attainment and postsecondary enrollment; employment and earnings; and
reduced rates of teen pregnancies.
(3) The legislature intends to clarify existing authority for
foster care services beyond age eighteen and to establish authority for
future expansion of housing and other supports for youth aging out of
foster care and youth who achieved permanency in later adolescence.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.031 and 2008 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An investigation
is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not the
result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation
reveals that a crime against a child may have been committed, the
department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor placements of children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care
being provided is within the scope of the intent of the legislature as
defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010. The policy for monitoring
placements under this section shall require that children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and their caregivers receive a
private and individual face-to-face visit each month.
(a) The department shall conduct the monthly visits with children
and caregivers required under this section unless the child's placement
is being supervised under a contract between the department and a
private agency accredited by a national child welfare accrediting
entity, in which case the private agency shall, within existing
resources, conduct the monthly visits with the child and with the
child's caregiver according to the standards described in this
subsection and shall provide the department with a written report of
the visits within fifteen days of completing the visits.
(b) In cases where the monthly visits required under this
subsection are being conducted by a private agency, the department
shall conduct a face-to-face health and safety visit with the child at
least once every ninety days.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(((a))) Have authority to provide continued foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(((b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to
allow up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster
care or group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh
school academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support
and transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) A youth who remains eligible for such placement and services
pursuant to department rules may continue in foster care or group care
until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Eligibility
requirements shall include active enrollment in a posthigh school
academic or vocational program and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point
average.))
(11)(a) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, have
authority to provide continued foster care or group care to youth ages
eighteen to twenty-one years who are:
(i) Enrolled and participating in a postsecondary or vocational
educational program;
(ii) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote or
remove barriers to employment;
(iii) Engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month; or
(iv) Incapable of engaging on any of the activities described in
(a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection due to a medical condition that
is supported by regularly updated information.
(b) A youth who remains eligible for placement services or benefits
pursuant to department rules may continue to receive placement services
and benefits until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday.
(12) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, have
authority to provide adoption support benefits, or subsidized relative
guardianship benefits on behalf of youth ages eighteen to twenty-one
years who achieved permanency through adoption or a subsidized relative
guardianship at age sixteen or older and who are engaged in one of the
activities described in subsection (11) of this section.
(13) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(((12))) (14) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster
care services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the
custody of a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed
child-placing agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order,
or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be
subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of support
applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(((13))) (15) Within amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, provide preventive services to families with children that
prevent or shorten the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(((14))) (16) Have authority to provide independent living services
to youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of
age, and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been
in foster care.
(((15))) (17) Consult at least quarterly with foster parents,
including members of the foster parent association of Washington state,
for the purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the
department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.020 and 1999 c 267 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in Title 74 RCW, child welfare services shall be defined as
public social services including adoption services which strengthen,
supplement, or substitute for, parental care and supervision for the
purpose of:
(1) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of
problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect,
abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;
(2) Protecting and caring for dependent or neglected children;
(3) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and
assisting parents who are in conflict with their children with services
designed to resolve such conflicts;
(4) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the
strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;
(5) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in
foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or
facilities.
As used in this chapter((, child)) and except as specifically
provided in RCW 74.13.031 (10) and (11), "child" means a person less
than eighteen years of age.
The department's duty to provide services to homeless families with
children is set forth in RCW 43.20A.790 and in appropriations provided
by the legislature for implementation of the plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.031 and 2008 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An investigation
is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not the
result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation
reveals that a crime against a child may have been committed, the
department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor placements of children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care
being provided is within the scope of the intent of the legislature as
defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010. The policy for monitoring
placements under this section shall require that children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and their caregivers receive a
private and individual face-to-face visit each month.
(a) The department shall conduct the monthly visits with children
and caregivers required under this section unless the child's placement
is being supervised under a contract between the department and a
private agency accredited by a national child welfare accrediting
entity, in which case the private agency shall, within existing
resources, conduct the monthly visits with the child and with the
child's caregiver according to the standards described in this
subsection and shall provide the department with a written report of
the visits within fifteen days of completing the visits.
(b) In cases where the monthly visits required under this
subsection are being conducted by a private agency, the department
shall conduct a face-to-face health and safety visit with the child at
least once every ninety days.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(((a))) Have authority to provide continued foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(((b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to
allow up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster
care or group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh
school academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support
and transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii))) (11) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
have authority to provide continued foster care or group care and
necessary support and transition services to youth ages eighteen to
twenty-one years who are enrolled and participating in a posthigh
school academic or vocational program. A youth who remains eligible
for such placement and services pursuant to department rules may
continue in foster care or group care until the youth reaches his or
her twenty-first birthday. ((Eligibility requirements shall include
active enrollment in a posthigh school academic or vocational program
and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point average.
(11))) (12) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever
state or federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a
child, including a child with a developmental disability who is placed
as a result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(((12))) (13) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster
care services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the
custody of a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed
child-placing agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order,
or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be
subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of support
applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(((13))) (14) Within amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, provide preventive services to families with children that
prevent or shorten the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(((14))) (15) Have authority to provide independent living services
to youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of
age, and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been
in foster care.
(((15))) (16) Consult at least quarterly with foster parents,
including members of the foster parent association of Washington state,
for the purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the
department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to make subsidized relative guardianships,
as permitted under federal law, available to Washington families
through amending the state's dependency guardianship statute and
through the following implementation directives for a relative
guardianship program:
(1) Relative guardianships shall be a permissible permanency plan
under this chapter for a dependent child who is Title IV-E eligible and
for whom the prospective relative guardian has been the licensed foster
care provider for at least six consecutive months prior to the
guardianship being established;
(2) The department shall conduct routine and cost-efficient
outreach regarding the relative guardianship program through the
kinship care oversight committee, the area administrations on aging,
and appropriate community partners;
(3) Relative guardianship subsidy agreements shall be designed to
promote long-term permanency for the child and to support stability of
the guardianship. The child's best interests shall govern the issue of
whether and what kinds of supports will be available under the program;
and
(4) The subsidized relative guardianship program shall be
implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws, rules, and
regulations for the receipt and expenditure of federal funds for
subsidies to relative guardians.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.34.234 and 1994 c 288 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Establishment of a dependency guardianship under RCW 13.34.231
and 13.34.232 does not preclude the)) A dependency guardian ((from
receiving foster care payments)) who is a licensed foster parent at the
time the guardianship is established under RCW 13.34.231 and 13.34.232
and who has been the child's foster parent for a minimum of six
consecutive months preceding entry of the guardianship order is
eligible for a guardianship subsidy on behalf of the child. The
department may establish rules setting eligibility, application, and
program standards consistent with applicable federal guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act takes effect October
1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 4 of this act expires October 1,
2010.

--- END ---