BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.400 and 2002 c 354 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to other powers and duties specified in this
chapter, the director shall, by rule, prescribe the purpose and minimum
standards for training and career development programs and, in so
doing, regularly consult with and consider the needs of individual
agencies and employees.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties specified in this
chapter, the director shall:
(a) Provide for the evaluation of training and career development
programs and plans of agencies. The director shall report the results
of such evaluations to the agency which is the subject of the
evaluation;
(b) Provide training and career development programs which may be
conducted more efficiently and economically on an interagency basis;
(c) Promote interagency sharing of resources for training and
career development;
(d) Monitor and review the impact of training and career
development programs to ensure that the responsibilities of the state
to provide equal employment opportunities are diligently carried out;
(e) Set goals and develop performance plans and accountability
measures for state agency training plans and programs; and
(f) Encourage agencies to provide quality management assessment
examiners training, such as Washington state quality award examiner
training or an equivalent program, and report yearly to the government
management accountability and performance program of the numbers of
employees that have successfully completed the training.
(3) At an agency's request, the director may provide training and
career development programs for an agency's internal use which may be
conducted more efficiently and economically by the department of
personnel.

--- END ---