BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that due to the
number of jobs that pay wages that are inadequate to enable individuals
and families to afford suitable housing in their community, many
Washington state households are often forced to either choose
substandard or overcrowded housing or risk falling into homelessness.
The legislature finds that access to appropriate housing is critical to
the health and well-being of Washington's residents as well as to the
state's overall economic and social health stability. The legislature
furthermore finds that jobs in Washington state should pay wages that
enable households to afford decent housing and therefore be housing
self-sufficient.
(2) The legislature establishes a goal to increase the percentage
of households who are ultimately able to obtain and retain housing
without government subsidies or other public support by increasing the
percentage of jobs that pay wages that meet or exceed housing self-sufficiency income standards as determined by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall establish two housing self-sufficiency income
standards based upon the cost of housing, which includes mortgage or
rent payments and other associated housing expenses, such as utilities
other than telephone, for each county in the state. The housing self-sufficiency income standards must also consider other basic household
living expenses, such as transportation, food, and health care. The
housing self-sufficiency income standards must be based upon the costs
needed to support: (1) One adult individual; and (2) two adult
individuals and one preschool-aged child and one school-aged child.
These income standards must be translated into an equivalent hourly
wage rate assuming one full-year, full-time earner for the self-sufficiency income standards for each county. By December 31, 2009,
the department shall deliver to the appropriate committees of the
legislature the housing self-sufficiency income standards and a report
that details the number and percentage of individuals statewide and in
each county who earn less than the housing self-sufficiency income
standards, as well as the number and percentage of individuals
statewide and in each county who earn an amount equivalent to or more
than the housing self-sufficiency income standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
All eligible organizations receiving financing, including grants,
loans, or other financing support, to conduct affordable housing
activities from state housing-related funding sources, including the
Washington housing trust fund and housing or homeless-related
surcharges, including those in chapter 36.22 RCW, or from the
Washington state housing finance commission shall, as a condition of
the financing award, agree to pay all employees and contractors wages
of an amount equivalent to or greater than the housing self-sufficiency
income standards for their county. Such wages must be paid to these
employees and contractors beginning before or upon the receipt of the
financing for a period of no less than one year following the
completion of the affordable housing activity or until the termination
of employment or contract.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.22.179 and 2007 c 427 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an additional
surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for
each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The funds collected pursuant to this section are to be
distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee,
and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities
and towns to accomplish the purposes of ((this)) chapter 484, Laws of
2005, six percent of which may be used by the county for administrative
costs related to its homeless housing plan, and the remainder for
programs which directly accomplish the goals of the county's local
homeless housing plan, except that for each city in the county which
elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local
homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under
this section equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the
real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at
least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county
administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which
directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing
plan; of the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for
administrative costs for its homeless housing program.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for
administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including
the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan,
measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local
governments, ((and)) managing the homeless housing grant program, and
establishing and maintaining the housing self-sufficiency income
standards under section 2 of this act. The remaining eighty-seven and
one-half percent is to be used by the department to:
(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but
not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants
to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental
assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

--- END ---