BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is in the public interest to reasonably
accommodate employees with sensory disabilities in order to allow them
to enjoy equal benefits and privileges of employment as are experienced
by similarly situated employees without disabilities. Employees with
sensory disabilities are occasionally compelled to attend training
necessary to attain a new service animal. This training provides the
employee with skills and resources necessary to maintain and enhance
his or her job performance in the workplace, but may cause the employee
to miss work. It is in the public interest to provide allowances for
employees with sensory disabilities who must attend training necessary
to attain a new service animal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definition in this section applies
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
"Sensory disability" means a sensory condition that materially
limits, contributes to limiting, or, if not corrected or accommodated,
will probably result in limiting an individual's activities or
functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of personnel shall adopt
rules that authorize state agencies to provide allowances to employees
with sensory disabilities who must attend training necessary to attain
a new service animal. The employee's absence must be treated in the
same manner as that granted to employees who are absent to attend
training that supports or improves their job performance, except that
the employee shall not be eligible for reimbursement under RCW
43.03.050 or 43.03.060. The department of personnel shall adopt rules
as necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If the necessity to attend training for a
new service animal is foreseeable and the training will cause the
employee to miss work, the employee shall provide the employer with not
less than thirty days' notice, before the date the absence is to begin,
of the employee's impending absence. If the date of the training
requires the absence to begin in less than thirty days, the employee
shall provide notice as is practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An agency may require that a request to
attend service animal training be supported by a certification issued
by the relevant training organization. The employee must provide, in
a timely manner, a copy of the certification to the agency.
Certification provided under this section is sufficient if it states:
(1) The date on which the service animal training session is scheduled
to commence; and (2) the session's duration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---