BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.84.040 and 1997 c 271 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The driver of a vehicle approaching a totally or partially blind
pedestrian who is carrying a cane predominantly white in color (with or
without a red tip), a totally or partially blind or hearing impaired
pedestrian using a dog guide, ((or an otherwise physically disabled))
a person with physical disabilities using a service animal, or a person
with a disability using a wheelchair or a power wheelchair as defined
in RCW 46.04.415 shall take all necessary precautions to avoid injury
to such pedestrian or wheelchair user. Any driver who fails to take
such precaution shall be liable in damages for any injury caused such
pedestrian or wheelchair user. It shall be unlawful for the operator
of any vehicle to drive into or upon any crosswalk while there is on
such crosswalk((,)) such pedestrian((,)) or wheelchair user crossing or
attempting to cross the roadway, if such pedestrian or wheelchair user
is using a white cane, using a dog guide, ((or)) using a service
animal, or using a wheelchair or a power wheelchair as defined in RCW
46.04.415. The failure of any such pedestrian or wheelchair user so to
signal shall not deprive him or her of the right-of-way accorded him or
her by other laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---