BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.52.011 and 2007 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Principles of liability as defined in chapter 9A.08 RCW apply
to this chapter.
(2) ((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Abandons" means the knowing or reckless desertion of an animal
by its owner or the causing of the animal to be deserted by its owner,
in any place, without making provisions for the animal's adequate care.
(b) "Animal" means any nonhuman mammal, bird, reptile, or
amphibian.
(c) "Animal care and control agency" means any city or county
animal control agency or authority authorized to enforce city or county
municipal ordinances regulating the care, control, licensing, or
treatment of animals within the city or county, and any corporation
organized under RCW 16.52.020 that contracts with a city or county to
enforce the city or county ordinances governing animal care and
control.
(d) "Animal control officer" means any individual employed,
contracted, or appointed pursuant to RCW 16.52.025 by an animal care
and control agency or humane society to aid in the enforcement of
ordinances or laws regulating the care and control of animals. For
purposes of this chapter, the term "animal control officer" shall be
interpreted to include "humane officer" as defined in (f) of this
subsection and RCW 16.52.025.
(e) "Euthanasia" means the humane destruction of an animal
accomplished by a method that involves instantaneous unconsciousness
and immediate death, or by a method that causes painless loss of
consciousness, and death during the loss of consciousness.
(f) "Humane officer" means any individual employed, contracted, or
appointed by an animal care and control agency or humane society as
authorized under RCW 16.52.025.
(g) "Law enforcement agency" means a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020.
(h) "Necessary food" means the provision at suitable intervals of
wholesome foodstuff suitable for the animal's age and species and
sufficient to provide a reasonable level of nutrition for the animal.
(i) "Owner" means a person who has a right, claim, title, legal
share, or right of possession to an animal or a person having lawful
control, custody, or possession of an animal.
(j) "Person" means individuals, corporations, partnerships,
associations, or other legal entities, and agents of those entities.
(k) "Similar animals" includes:
(i) Livestock, including but not limited to horses, mules, donkeys,
cattle, bison, sheep, goats, swine, rabbits, llamas, alpacas, ratites,
poultry, waterfowl, game birds, and other species as designated under
RCW 16.36.005;
(ii) Small animals, including but not limited to dogs, cats,
ferrets, birds other than poultry, or other animals identified or
commonly recognized as family pets as described in WAC 16-54-160 and
16-54-170;
(iii) Wild and exotic animals and birds, including zoo animals,
including but not limited to animals listed in WAC 16-54-180 of the
species cervidae, giraffidae, bovidae, ovidae, capridae, suidae, old
world primate, gibbons, and lessor and greater apes except as otherwise
listed in RCW 16.36.005.
(l) "Substantial bodily harm" means substantial bodily harm as
defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.52.085 and 1994 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a law enforcement officer or animal control officer has
probable cause to believe that an owner of a domestic animal has
violated this chapter or owns or possesses an animal in violation of a
court of record's order under RCW 16.52.200(3) and no responsible
person can be found to assume the animal's care, the officer may
authorize, with a warrant, the removal of the animal to a suitable
place for feeding and care, or may place the animal under the custody
of an animal care and control agency. In determining what is a
suitable place, the officer shall consider the animal's needs,
including its size and behavioral characteristics. An officer may
remove an animal under this subsection without a warrant only if the
animal is in an immediate life-threatening condition.
(2) If a law enforcement officer or an animal control officer has
probable cause to believe a violation of this chapter has occurred, the
officer may authorize an examination of a domestic animal allegedly
neglected or abused in violation of this chapter by a veterinarian to
determine whether the level of neglect or abuse in violation of this
chapter is sufficient to require removal of the animal. This section
does not condone illegal entry onto private property.
(3) Any owner whose domestic animal is removed pursuant to this
chapter shall be given written notice of the circumstances of the
removal and notice of legal remedies available to the owner. The
notice shall be given by posting at the place of seizure, by delivery
to a person residing at the place of seizure, or by registered mail if
the owner is known. In making the decision to remove an animal
pursuant to this chapter, the officer shall make a good faith effort to
contact the animal's owner before removal.
(4) The agency having custody of the animal may euthanize the
animal or may find a responsible person to adopt the animal not less
than fifteen business days after the animal is taken into custody. A
custodial agency may euthanize severely injured, diseased, or suffering
animals at any time. An owner may prevent the animal's destruction or
adoption by: (a) Petitioning the district court of the county where
the animal was seized for the animal's immediate return subject to
court-imposed conditions, or (b) posting a bond or security in an
amount sufficient to provide for the animal's care for a minimum of
thirty days from the seizure date. If the custodial agency still has
custody of the animal when the bond or security expires, the animal
shall become the agency's property unless the court orders an
alternative disposition. If a court order prevents the agency from
assuming ownership and the agency continues to care for the animal, the
court shall order the owner to renew a bond or security for the
agency's continuing costs for the animal's care. When a court of
competent jurisdiction has prohibited the owner from owning or
possessing animals under RCW 16.52.200(3), the agency having custody of
the animal may assume ownership upon seizure and the owner may not
prevent the animal's destruction or adoption by petitioning the court
or posting a bond.
(5) If no criminal case is filed within fourteen business days of
the animal's removal, the owner may petition the district court of the
county where the animal was removed for the animal's return. The
petition shall be filed with the court, with copies served to the law
enforcement or animal care and control agency responsible for removing
the animal and to the prosecuting attorney. If the court grants the
petition, the agency which seized the animal must deliver the animal to
the owner at no cost to the owner. If a criminal action is filed after
the petition is filed but before the animal is returned, the petition
shall be joined with the criminal matter.
(6) In a motion or petition for the animal's return before a trial,
the burden is on the owner to prove by a preponderance of the evidence
that the animal will not suffer future neglect or abuse and is not in
need of being restored to health.
(7) Any authorized person treating or attempting to restore an
animal to health under this chapter shall not be civilly or criminally
liable for such action.

Sec. 3 RCW 16.52.200 and 2003 c 53 s 113 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sentence imposed for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
violation of this chapter may be deferred or suspended in accordance
with RCW 3.66.067 and 3.66.068, however the probationary period shall
be two years.
(2) In case of multiple misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
convictions, the sentences shall be consecutive, however the
probationary period shall remain two years.
(3) In addition to the penalties imposed by the court, the court
shall order the forfeiture of all animals held by law enforcement or
animal care and control authorities under the provisions of this
chapter if any one of the animals involved dies as a result of a
violation of this chapter or if the defendant has a prior conviction
under this chapter. If any animal dies or endures substantial pain or
undue suffering as a result of a violation of this chapter, the court
shall prohibit the convicted person from owning, possessing, harboring,
or residing with similar animals. This prohibition is permanent unless
and until the right is restored by a court of competent jurisdiction.
The court may also permanently prohibit the convicted person from
owning, possessing, harboring, or residing with nonsimilar animals
where there is a likelihood of abuse or neglect to nonsimilar animals.
In ((other cases)) circumstances not amounting to death, substantial
pain, or undue suffering the court ((may)) shall enter an order
requiring the ((owner)) convicted person to forfeit the animal if the
court deems the animal's treatment to have been either severe ((and))
or likely to reoccur, or both. If forfeiture is ordered and a
convicted person is not permanently prohibited from owning, possessing,
harboring, or residing with similar animals, the ((owner)) convicted
person shall be prohibited from owning ((or caring for)), possessing,
harboring, or residing with any similar animals for a period of two
years. ((The court may delay its decision on forfeiture under this
subsection until the end of the probationary period.))
(4) In addition to fines and court costs, the defendant, only if
convicted or in agreement, shall be liable for reasonable costs
incurred pursuant to this chapter by law enforcement agencies, animal
care and control agencies, or authorized private or public entities
involved with the care of the animals. Reasonable costs include
expenses of the investigation, and the animal's care, euthanization, or
adoption.
(5) If convicted, the defendant shall also pay a civil penalty of
one thousand dollars to the county to prevent cruelty to animals.
These funds shall be used to prosecute offenses under this chapter and
to care for forfeited animals pending trial.
(6) As a condition of the sentence imposed under this chapter or
RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078, the court may also order the defendant
to participate in an available animal cruelty prevention or education
program or obtain available psychological counseling to treat mental
health problems contributing to the violation's commission. The
defendant shall bear the costs of the program or treatment.

--- END ---