BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.190
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a budget
request for residential education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funding
appropriated by the legislature for residential education to the school
districts and educational service districts that are required to
conduct a program under this chapter and under RCW 13.04.145.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.190
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, for those school districts
or educational service districts that provide instruction to students
in state detention facilities under RCW 28A.190.010 or in county
juvenile detention facilities under RCW 13.04.145, each such district's
allocations attributable to those facilities must be based on
enrollment that is the greater of the current school year's enrollment
or ninety percent of the previous school year's enrollment.

--- END ---