BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a school district under this section
may designate by resolution an employee of the district or some other
person having experience in financial or fiscal matters to act as the
district treasurer, including an employee of another school district or
an educational service district through an interlocal agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW. A district treasurer designated under this section
shall act with the same powers as provided by law for a county
treasurer acting as ex officio treasurer of a school district. A
district treasurer shall be bonded in an amount and under the terms and
conditions that the board of directors finds will protect the district
against loss, but for not less than twenty-five thousand dollars.
(2) A school district that designates its own treasurer under this
section may by resolution adopt a policy for the payment of claims or
other obligations of the school district, which are payable out of
solvent funds, electing to pay such obligations by warrant or by check.
However, when the applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is
ordered, a warrant shall be issued. When checks are to be used, the
school district shall designate the qualified public depositary where
checks are to be drawn and the officers authorized or required to sign
checks. Wherever a reference is made to warrants in this title, the
term includes checks where authorized by this section.
(3) When deposits and disbursements are made in accordance with
this section and RCW 28A.510.270, a district treasurer shall not be
liable for a loss resulting from the failure or default of any public
depositary without fault or neglect on his or her part or the part of
his or her assistants or clerks. When funds are invested in accordance
with this section and RCW 28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320 in investments
that are legal investments for public funds, a district treasurer shall
not be liable for a loss in the value of any such investment made by
the district treasurer.
(4) The board of directors of a school district that designates its
own treasurer under this section may by resolution adopt a policy
providing for protection and indemnification of: (a) The employee
designated as the district treasurer; or (b) the employee of an
educational service district or other public agency designated as a
district treasurer or as an external investment advisor or manager.
(5) This section applies only to boards of directors of school
districts with an annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment of ten thousand or more and located in a county with a
population of one million or more.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.320.300 and 1999 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any common school district board of directors is empowered to
direct and authorize, and to delegate authority to an employee,
officer, or agent of the common school district or the educational
service district to direct and authorize, the district treasurer or the
county treasurer to invest funds described in RCW 28A.320.310 and
28A.320.320 and funds from state and federal sources as are then or
thereafter received by the educational service district, and such funds
from county sources as are then or thereafter received by the county
treasurer, for distribution to the common school districts. Funds from
state, county and federal sources which are so invested may be invested
only for the period the funds are not required for the immediate
necessities of the common school district as determined by the school
district board of directors or its delegatee, and shall be invested
((in)) on behalf of the common school district pursuant to the terms of
RCW 28A.320.310, 28A.320.320, 36.29.020, 36.29.022, or 36.29.024 as the
nature of the funds shall dictate. A grant of authority by a common
school district pursuant to this section shall be by resolution of the
board of directors and shall specify the duration and extent of the
authority so granted. Any authority delegated to an educational
service district pursuant to this section may be redelegated pursuant
to RCW 28A.310.220.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.320.310 and 1999 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of directors of any school district of the state of
Washington which now has, or hereafter shall have, funds in the capital
projects fund of the district ((in the office of the county treasurer))
which in the judgment of said board are not required for the immediate
necessities of the district, may invest and reinvest all, or any part,
of such funds pursuant to RCW 35.39.030, 36.29.020, 36.29.022,
36.29.024, 39.59.020, 39.59.030, ((and)) 43.84.080, and 43.250.040:
PROVIDED, That nothing herein authorized, or the type and character of
the securities thus specified, shall have in itself the effect of
delaying any program of building for which said funds shall have been
authorized. Said funds and said securities and the profit and interest
thereon, and the proceeds thereof, shall be held by the county
treasurer or the district treasurer to the credit and benefit of the
capital projects fund of the district ((in the county treasurer's
office)).

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.320.320 and 1999 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county treasurer, or the trustee, guardian, or any other
custodian of any school fund, when authorized to do so by the board of
directors of any school district, or the district treasurer shall
invest or reinvest any school funds of such district in investment
securities pursuant to RCW 36.29.020 and 36.29.022. The county
treasurer or the district treasurer shall have the power to select the
particular investment in which said funds may be invested. A school
district may by interlocal agreement carry out the powers granted under
chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (this act). The district treasurer may
delegate by contract or interlocal agreement to a private sector or
other external advisor or manager the discretionary authority to
purchase or otherwise acquire, sell, or otherwise dispose of or manage
investments on behalf of the district, in a manner consistent with
applicable statutes and subject to an investment policy approved by the
board of directors of the district. All earnings and income from such
investments shall inure to the benefit of any school fund designated by
the board of directors of the school district which such board may
lawfully designate: PROVIDED, That any interest or earnings being
credited to a fund different from that which earned the interest or
earnings shall only be expended for instructional supplies, equipment
or capital outlay purposes. This section shall apply to all funds
which may be lawfully so invested or reinvested which in the judgment
of the school board are not required for the immediate necessities of
the district.
Unless the board of directors has designated a district treasurer,
five percent of the interest or earnings, with an annual minimum of ten
dollars or annual maximum of fifty dollars, on any transactions
authorized by each resolution of the board of school directors shall be
paid as an investment service fee to the office of county treasurer
when the interest or earnings becomes available to the school district
or an amount as determined pursuant to RCW 36.29.022 and 36.29.024.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.510.270 and 1991 c 245 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the county
treasurer of each county of this state shall be ex officio treasurer of
the several school districts of their respective counties((, and,)).
Except as otherwise provided by law, it shall be the duty of each
county treasurer:
(((1))) (a) To receive and hold all moneys belonging to such school
districts, and to pay them only for legally authorized obligations of
the district.
(((2))) (b) To prepare and submit to each school district
superintendent in the county a written report of the state of the
finances of such district on the first day of each month, which report
shall be submitted not later than the seventh business day of the
month, which report shall contain the balance on hand the first of the
preceding month, the funds paid in, warrants paid with interest
thereon, if any, the number of warrants issued and not paid, and the
balance on hand.
(((3))) (c) The treasurer of each county shall submit a statement
of all canceled warrants of districts to the respective school district
superintendents. The canceled warrants of each district shall be
preserved separately and shall at all times be open to inspection by
the school district superintendent or by any authorized accountant of
such district.
(2) A district treasurer designated under section 1 of this act
shall perform the duties of a county treasurer under this section on
behalf of the school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of an educational service district may
designate by resolution an employee of the educational service district
or some other person having experience in financial or fiscal matters
to act as the educational service district treasurer. At the request
of a school district authorized pursuant to section 1(5) of this act,
the board of directors of an educational service district may designate
an employee of the educational service district, or some other person
having experience in financial matters, to serve as the district
treasurer on behalf of one or more school districts with the authority
to carry out all or an identified portion of the duties of district
treasurer as authorized under section 1 of this act. An educational
service district treasurer, or district treasurer designated under this
section, shall act with the same powers as provided by law for a county
treasurer acting as ex officio treasurer of an educational service
district or a school district. An educational service district
treasurer or district treasurer shall be bonded in an amount and under
the terms and conditions that the board finds will protect the
educational service district or school district against loss, but for
not less than twenty-five thousand dollars.
(2) An educational service district that designates its own
treasurer or designates a district treasurer under this section may by
resolution adopt a policy for the payment of claims or other
obligations of the educational service district, which are payable out
of solvent funds, electing to pay such obligations by warrant or by
check. However, when the applicable fund is not solvent at the time
payment is ordered, a warrant shall be issued. When checks are to be
used, the educational service district shall designate the qualified
public depository where checks are to be drawn and the officers
authorized or required to sign checks. Wherever a reference is made to
warrants in this title, the term includes checks where authorized by
this section.
(3) When deposits and disbursements are made in accordance with
this section and RCW 28A.510.270, an educational service district
treasurer or district treasurer shall not be liable for a loss
resulting from the failure or default of any public depository without
fault or neglect on his or her part or the part of his or her
assistants or clerks. When funds are invested in accordance with this
section and RCW 28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320 in investments that are
legal investments for public funds, an educational service district
treasurer or district treasurer shall not be liable for a loss in the
value of any such investment made by an educational service district
treasurer or district treasurer.
(4) The board of directors of an educational service district that
designates its own treasurer, or designates a district treasurer under
this section, may by resolution adopt a policy providing for protection
and indemnification of: (a) The employee of the educational service
district designated as the educational service district treasurer or
the district treasurer; or (b) the employee of another public agency
designated as the educational service district treasurer or the
district treasurer.
(5) The county treasurer when authorized to do so by the board of
directors of an educational service district, the educational service
district treasurer, or district treasurer shall invest or reinvest any
funds of the educational service district or the school district as
applicable, in investment securities pursuant to RCW 36.29.020 and
36.29.022. The county treasurer, the educational service district
treasurer, or district treasurer shall have the power to select the
particular investment in which the funds may be invested. An
educational service district may, by interlocal agreement, carry out
the powers granted under chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (this act). The
educational service district treasurer or district treasurer may
delegate by contract or interlocal agreement to a private sector or
other external advisor or manager the discretionary authority to
purchase or otherwise acquire, sell, or otherwise dispose of or manage
investments on behalf of the educational service district or the school
district, in a manner consistent with applicable statutes and subject
to an investment policy approved by the board of directors of the
educational service district or the school district, as applicable.
The educational service district treasurer or district treasurer may,
at the direction of a school district, act as the school district's
external investment advisor or manager and undertake the duties set
forth in RCW 28A.320.320.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.310.370 and 1983 c 56 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall examine and revise
the biennial budget request of each educational service district and
shall fix the amount to be requested in state funds for the educational
service district system from the legislature. Once funds have been
appropriated by the legislature, the superintendent of public
instruction shall fix the annual budget of each educational service
district and shall allocate quarterly the state's portion from funds
appropriated for that purpose to the educational service district
treasurer, or the county treasurer of the headquarters county of the
educational service district for deposit to the credit of the
educational service district general expense fund.
In each educational service district, there shall be an educational
service district general expense fund into which there shall be
deposited such moneys as are allocated by the superintendent of public
instruction under provisions of this chapter and other funds of the
educational service district, and such moneys shall be expended
according to the method used by first or second-class school districts,
whichever is deemed most feasible by the educational service district
board. No vouchers for warrants other than moneys being distributed to
the school districts shall be approved for expenditures not budgeted by
the educational service district board.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.310.410 and 1990 c 33 s 289 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the county treasurer
of the county in which the headquarters office of the educational
service district is located shall serve as the ex officio treasurer of
the district. Except when operating under the terms of an interlocal
agreement, the county treasurer or educational service district
treasurer shall keep all funds and moneys of the district separate and
apart from all other funds and moneys in the treasurer's custody and
shall disburse such moneys only upon proper order of the educational
service district board or superintendent.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.160.130 and 1991 c 114 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a fund on deposit with each county treasurer
for each school district of the county or the district treasurer, which
shall be known as the transportation vehicle fund. Money to be
deposited into the transportation vehicle fund shall include, but is
not limited to, the following:
(a) The balance of accounts held in the general fund of each school
district for the purchase of approved transportation equipment and for
major transportation equipment repairs under RCW 28A.150.280. The
amount transferred shall be the balance of the account as of September
1, 1982;
(b) Reimbursement payments provided for in RCW 28A.160.200 except
those provided under RCW 28A.160.200(((4)))(3) that are necessary for
contracted payments to private carriers;
(c) Earnings from transportation vehicle fund investments as
authorized in RCW 28A.320.300; and
(d) The district's share of the proceeds from the sale of
transportation vehicles, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) Funds in the transportation vehicle fund may be used for the
following purposes:
(a) Purchase of pupil transportation vehicles pursuant to RCW
28A.160.200 and 28A.150.280;
(b) Payment of conditional sales contracts as authorized in RCW
28A.335.200 or payment of obligations authorized in RCW 28A.530.080,
entered into or issued for the purpose of pupil transportation
vehicles;
(c) Major repairs to pupil transportation vehicles.
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules which
shall establish the standards, conditions, and procedures governing the
establishment and use of the transportation vehicle fund. The rules
shall not permit the transfer of funds from the transportation vehicle
fund to any other fund of the district.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.220.040 and 2000 c 115 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds
appropriated for traffic safety education.
(a) The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil
reimbursement amount for the traffic safety education course to be
funded by the state. Each school district offering an approved
standard traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed or granted
an amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public
instruction as may be appropriated.
(b) The state superintendent may provide per-pupil reimbursements
to school districts only where all the traffic educators have satisfied
the continuing education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(4).
(2) The board of directors of any school district or combination of
school districts may establish a traffic safety education fee, which
fee when imposed shall be required to be paid by any duly enrolled
student in any such school district prior to or while enrolled in a
traffic safety education course. Traffic safety education fees
collected by a school district shall be deposited with the county
treasurer or district treasurer to the credit of such school district,
to be used to pay costs of the traffic safety education course.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.320.080 and 1995 c 77 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by
law, shall:
(1) Provide for the expenditure of a reasonable amount for suitable
commencement exercises;
(2) In addition to providing free instruction in lip reading for
children disabled by defective hearing, make arrangements for free
instruction in lip reading to adults disabled by defective hearing
whenever in its judgment such instruction appears to be in the best
interests of the school district and adults concerned;
(3) Join with boards of directors of other school districts or an
educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), or both
such school districts and educational service district in buying
supplies, equipment and services by establishing and maintaining a
joint purchasing agency, or otherwise, when deemed for the best
interests of the district, any joint agency formed hereunder being
herewith authorized and empowered to issue interest bearing warrants in
payment of any obligation owed: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That those agencies
issuing interest bearing warrants shall assign accounts receivable in
an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding interest bearing
warrants to the county treasurer or district treasurer issuing such
interest bearing warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the joint purchasing
agency shall consider the request of any one or more private schools
requesting the agency to jointly buy supplies, equipment, and services
including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and,
after considering such request, may cooperate with and jointly make
purchases with private schools of supplies, equipment, and services,
including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, so long
as such private schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the
costs or provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of
the costs involved in such purchases;
(4) Consider the request of any one or more private schools
requesting the board to jointly buy supplies, equipment and services
including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and,
after considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing
services: PROVIDED, That such private schools pay in advance their
proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover
their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; and
(5) Prepare budgets as provided for in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.323.100 and 1994 c 301 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon receipt of the aforesaid certificate, it shall be the duty of
the county legislative authority of each county to levy on all taxable
property of that part of the joint school district which lies within
the county a tax sufficient to raise the amount necessary to meet the
county's proportionate share of the estimated expenditures of the joint
district, as shown by the certificate of the educational service
district superintendent of the district to which the joint school
district belongs. Such taxes shall be levied and collected in the same
manner as other taxes are levied and collected, and the proceeds
thereof shall be forwarded monthly by the treasurer of each county,
other than the county to which the joint district belongs, to the
treasurer of the county to which such district belongs and shall be
placed to the credit of said district. The treasurer of the county to
which a joint school district belongs is hereby declared to be the
treasurer of such district, except as provided in section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.325.030 and 2000 c 157 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) There is hereby created a fund on deposit with each district
treasurer or county treasurer for each school district of the county
having an associated student body as defined in RCW 28A.325.020. Such
fund shall be known as the associated student body program fund. Rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW
28A.325.020 shall require separate accounting for each associated
student body's transactions in the school district's associated student
body program fund.
(b) All moneys generated through the programs and activities of any
associated student body shall be deposited in the associated student
body program fund. Such funds may be invested for the sole benefit of
the associated student body program fund in items enumerated in RCW
28A.320.320 and the county treasurer may assess a fee as provided
therein. Disbursements from such fund shall be under the control and
supervision, and with the approval, of the board of directors of the
school district, and shall be by warrant as provided in chapter 28A.350
RCW: PROVIDED, That in no case shall such warrants be issued in an
amount greater than the funds on deposit with the ((county)) treasurer
in the associated student body program fund. To facilitate the payment
of obligations, an imprest bank account or accounts may be created and
replenished from the associated student body program fund.
(c) The associated student body program fund shall be budgeted by
the associated student body, subject to approval by the board of
directors of the school district. All disbursements from the
associated student body program fund or any imprest bank account
established thereunder shall have the prior approval of the appropriate
governing body representing the associated student body.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 43.09.210, it shall not be
mandatory that expenditures from the district's general fund in support
of associated student body programs and activities be reimbursed by
payments from the associated student body program fund.
(2) Subject to applicable school board policies, student groups may
conduct fund-raising activities, including but not limited to
soliciting donations, in their private capacities for the purpose of
generating nonassociated student body fund moneys. The school board
policy shall include provisions to ensure appropriate accountability
for these funds. Nonassociated student body program fund moneys
generated and received by students for private purposes to use for
scholarship, student exchange, and/or charitable purposes shall be held
in trust in one or more separate accounts within an associated student
body program fund and be disbursed for such purposes as the student
group conducting the fund-raising activity shall determine: PROVIDED,
That the school district shall either withhold an amount from such
moneys as will pay the district for its direct costs in providing the
service or otherwise be compensated for its cost for such service.
Nonassociated student body program fund moneys shall not be deemed
public moneys under section 7, Article VIII of the state Constitution.
Notice shall be given identifying the intended use of the proceeds.
The notice shall also state that the proceeds are nonassociated student
body funds to be held in trust by the school district exclusively for
the intended purpose. "Charitable purpose" under this section does not
include any activity related to assisting a campaign for election of a
person to an office or for the promotion or opposition to a ballot
proposition.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.330.080 and 1990 c 33 s 346 are each amended to
read as follows:
Moneys of such school districts shall be paid out only upon orders
for warrants signed by the president, or a majority of the board of
directors and countersigned by the secretary: PROVIDED, That when, in
the judgment of the board of directors, the orders for warrants issued
by the district monthly shall have reached such numbers that the
signing of each warrant by the president personally imposes too great
a task on the president, the board of directors, after auditing all
payrolls and bills as provided by RCW 28A.330.090, may authorize the
issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer or district
treasurer, to be signed by the president, authorizing said treasurer to
pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name and amount, and
the funds on which said warrants shall be drawn; thereupon the
secretary of said board shall be authorized to draw and sign said
orders for warrants.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.350.010 and 1990 c 33 s 373 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the county auditor
shall register in the auditor's own office, and present to the
treasurer for registration in the office of the county treasurer, all
warrants of first-class districts, and all warrants of second-class
districts electing to draw and issue their own warrants under RCW
28A.330.230 received from school district superintendents or district
secretaries before delivery of the same to claimants.

Sec. 16 RCW 28A.350.050 and 1973 c 72 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
No warrant shall be drawn and issued or registered by the county
auditor or district treasurer for the payment of any teacher who is not
qualified within the meaning of the law of this state.

Sec. 17 RCW 28A.410.060 and 2008 c 107 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The fee for any certificate, or any renewal thereof, issued by the
authority of the state of Washington, and authorizing the holder to
teach or perform other professional duties in the public schools of the
state shall be not less than one dollar or such reasonable fee therefor
as the Washington professional educator standards board by rule shall
deem necessary therefor. The fee must accompany the application and
cannot be refunded unless the application is withdrawn before it is
finally considered. The educational service district superintendent,
or other official authorized to receive such fee, shall within thirty
days transmit the same to the district treasurer or treasurer of the
county in which the office of the educational service district
superintendent is located, to be by him or her placed to the credit of
said school district or educational service district: PROVIDED, That
if any school district collecting fees for the certification of
professional staff does not hold a professional training institute
separate from the educational service district then all such moneys
shall be placed to the credit of the educational service district.
Such fees shall be used solely for the purpose of precertification
professional preparation, program evaluation, professional in-service
training programs, and provision of certification services by
educational service districts, in accordance with rules of the
Washington professional educator standards board herein authorized.

Sec. 18 RCW 28A.530.030 and 1984 c 186 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the bonds have been sold, the county treasurer or district
treasurer shall place the money derived from such sale to the credit of
the capital projects fund of the district, and such fund is hereby
created.

Sec. 19 RCW 28A.530.050 and 1990 c 33 s 479 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every holder of any of the bonds so issued as a bearer bond as
provided in this chapter, within ten days after the owner becomes the
owner or holder thereof, shall notify the district treasurer or county
treasurer of the county in which such bonds are issued of his or her
ownership, together with his or her full name and post office address,
and the ((county)) treasurer ((of said county)) shall deposit in the
post office, properly stamped and addressed to each owner of any such
bonds subject to redemption or payment, a notice in like form, stating
the time and place of the redemption of such bonds and the number of
the bonds to be redeemed, and in case any owners of bonds shall fail to
notify the treasurer of their ownership as aforesaid, then a notice
mailed to the last holder of such bonds shall be deemed sufficient, and
any and all such notices so mailed as aforesaid shall be deemed to be
personal notice to the holders of such bonds, and at the expiration of
the time therein named shall have the force to suspend the interest
upon any such bonds.

Sec. 20 RCW 28A.535.060 and 1990 c 33 s 483 are each amended to
read as follows:
If bonds issued under this chapter are not sold as herein provided,
the owners of unpaid warrants drawn on the county treasurer or district
treasurer by such district for an indebtedness existing at the time of
the adoption of the resolution mentioned in RCW 28A.535.020, may
exchange said warrants at the face value thereof and accrued interest
thereon for bonds issued under this chapter, at not less than par value
and accrued interest of such bonds at the time of the exchange; such
exchange to be made under such regulations as may be provided by the
board of directors of such district.

--- END ---