BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.16.500 and 1997 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Agencies, departments, taxing districts, political
subdivisions of the state, counties, and cities may retain, by written
contract, collection agencies licensed under this chapter for the
purpose of collecting public debts owed by any person, including any
restitution that is being collected on behalf of a crime victim.
(b) Any governmental entity as described in (a) of this subsection
using a collection agency may add a reasonable fee, payable by the
debtor, to the outstanding debt for the collection agency fee incurred
or to be incurred. The amount to be paid for collection services shall
be left to the agreement of the governmental entity and its collection
agency or agencies, but a contingent fee of up to fifty percent of the
first one hundred thousand dollars of the unpaid debt per account and
up to thirty-five percent of the unpaid debt over one hundred thousand
dollars per account is reasonable, and a minimum fee of the full amount
of the debt up to one hundred dollars per account is reasonable. Any
fee agreement entered into by a governmental entity is presumptively
reasonable.
(2) No debt may be assigned to a collection agency unless:
(a) There has been an attempt to advise the debtor (i) of the
existence of the debt and (ii) that the debt may be assigned to a
collection agency for collection if the debt is not paid((, and));
(b) At least thirty days have elapsed from the time notice was
attempted; and
(c) The governmental entity establishes in contract with the
collection agency that the collection agency may not report the debt to
a consumer reporting agency.
(3) Collection agencies assigned debts under this section shall
have only those remedies and powers which would be available to them as
assignees of private creditors.
(4) For purposes of this section, the term debt shall include fines
and other debts, including the fee required under subsection (1)(b) of
this section.

--- END ---