BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a statewide student assessment
system should improve and inform classroom instruction, support
accountability, and provide useful information to all levels of the
educational system, including students, parents, teachers, schools,
school districts, and the state. The legislature intends to redesign
the current statewide system, in accordance with the recommendations of
the Washington assessment of student learning legislative work group,
to:
(a) Include multiple assessment formats, including both formative
and summative, as necessary to provide information to help improve
instruction and inform accountability;
(b) Enable collection of data that allows both statewide and
nationwide comparisons of student learning and achievement; and
(c) Be balanced so that the information used to make significant
decisions that affect school accountability or student educational
progress includes many data points and does not rely on solely the
results of a single assessment.
(2) The legislature further finds that one component of the
assessment system should be instructionally supportive formative
assessments. The key design elements or characteristics of an
instructionally supportive assessment must:
(a) Be aligned to state standards in areas that are being assessed;
(b) Measure student growth and competency at multiple points
throughout the year in a manner that allows instructors to monitor
student progress and have the necessary trend data with which to
improve instruction;
(c) Provide rapid feedback;
(d) Link student growth with instructional elements in order to
gauge the effectiveness of educators and curricula;
(e) Provide tests that are appropriate to the skill level of the
student;
(f) Support instruction for students of all abilities, including
highly capable students and students with learning disabilities;
(g) Be culturally, linguistically, and cognitively relevant,
appropriate, and understandable to each student taking the assessment;
(h) Inform parents and draw parents into greater participation of
the student's study plan;
(i) Provide a way to analyze the assessment results relative to
characteristics of the student such as, but not limited to, English
language learners, gender, ethnicity, poverty, age, and disabilities;
(j) Strive to be computer-based and adaptive; and
(k) Engage students in their learning.
(3) The legislature further finds that a second component of the
assessment system should be a state-administered summative achievement
assessment that can be used as a check on the educational system in
order to guide state expectations for the instruction of children and
satisfy legislative demands for accountability. The key design
elements or characteristics of the state administered achievement
assessment must:
(a) Be aligned to state standards in areas that are being assessed;
(b) Maintain and increase academic rigor;
(c) Measure student learning growth over years; and
(d) Strengthen curriculum.
(4) The legislature further finds that a third component of the
assessment system should include classroom-based assessments, which may
be formative, summative, or both. Depending on their use, classroom-based assessments should have the same design elements and
characteristics described in this section for formative and summative
assessments.
(5) The legislature further finds that to sustain a strong and
viable assessment system, preservice and ongoing training should be
provided for teachers and administrators on the effective use of
different types of assessments.
(6) The legislature further finds that as the statewide data system
is developed, data should be collected for all state-required statewide
assessments to be used for accountability and to monitor overall
student achievement.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the state board of education, shall begin design and development of an
overall assessment system that meets the principles and characteristics
described in this section. Beginning December 1, 2009, and annually
thereafter, the superintendent and state board shall jointly report to
the legislature regarding the assessment system, including a cost
analysis of any changes and costs to expand availability and use of
instructionally supportive formative assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(1) Revise the number of open-ended questions and extended
responses in the statewide achievement assessment in grades three
through eight and ten to reduce the cost and time of administering the
assessment while retaining validity and reliability of the assessment
and retaining assessment of critical thinking skills. By December 1,
2009, the superintendent shall report to the legislature regarding the
changes, including a cost analysis of the changes;
(2) Revisit the alternative assessments, the appeals process,
including considering authorizing local school districts to determine
the outcome of an appeal by a student to demonstrate that he or she has
the level of understanding of a content area assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning necessary to meet the state standard but
was unable to demonstrate that understanding on the assessment or an
alternative assessment, and the Washington alternative assessment
system portfolios for students with the most significant cognitive
disabilities. By December 1, 2009, the superintendent shall make
recommendations to the legislature for improvements;
(3) Beginning in the 2010-11 school year, encourage college and
career readiness by arranging for a fee waiver for eligible students
who want to take the PSAT, at no cost to the student. Students are
eligible if they have obtained a certificate of academic achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) As part of the duties of the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.130 to promote achievement of the
student goals and under RCW 28A.230.090 to establish high school
graduation requirements, the board shall:
(a) Examine the extent that the essential academic learning
requirements in all subjects align with college and career readiness
requirements; and
(b) Examine and justify how the board's draft high school
graduation credit framework called Core 24 aligns with the current
essential academic learning requirements.
(2) By December 1, 2009, the board shall make a report to the
legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading((,)) and writing((, and
mathematics)) content areas of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning or an objective alternative assessment shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. After a determination is made by
the state board of education that the high school Washington assessment
of student learning in the content areas of mathematics and science is
sufficiently reliable and valid, with the exception of students
satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, students must also meet
the state standards on the mathematics and science content areas of the
Washington assessment of student learning or an objective alternative
assessment in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education may make a separate determination for the
mathematics and the science content areas of the assessment. The
determination by the state board of education must be adopted by rule
by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating class to
which the graduation requirement under subsection (2) of this section
applies. In making the determination, the state board of education
shall obtain information and conclusions from recognized, independent,
national assessment experts and other objective sources of expertise as
the board deems necessary.
(4) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in
one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic
achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content
area up to four times at no cost to the student. If the student
successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment
then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the objective
alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully
meets the state standards for that content area if the student has
taken the Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If
the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(((4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.))
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the ((scholastic assessment test ())SAT(())) or the
((American college test ())ACT(())) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the ((preliminary scholastic assessment test ())PSAT(()))
may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section
for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard
for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of
education shall identify the score students must achieve on the
mathematics portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in
that content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) ((By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and
senate education committees shall obtain information and conclusions
from recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12))) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (((12))) (11).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2008 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The superintendent shall
develop end-of-course assessments in algebra I, geometry, integrated
mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II((. The superintendent
shall make the algebra I and integrated mathematics I end-of-course
assessments available to school districts on an optional basis in the
2009-10 school year. The end-of-course assessments in algebra I,
geometry, integrated mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II)) and
the assessments shall be implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school
year.
(2) ((For the graduating class of 2013 and for purposes of the
certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, results from
the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course
assessment or results from the integrated mathematics I end-of-course
assessment plus the integrated mathematics II end-of-course assessment
may be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standard on
the mathematics content area of the high school Washington assessment
of student learning.
(3))) Beginning with the ((graduating class of 2014 and for
purposes of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061,)) 2010-11 school year the mathematics content area of the
Washington assessment of student learning shall be assessed using
either the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course assessment or the integrated mathematics I end-of-course
assessment plus the integrated mathematics II end-of-course assessment.
All of the objective alternative assessments available to students
under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065 shall be available to any student
who has taken the sequence of end-of-course assessments once but does
not meet the state mathematics standard on the sequence of end-of-course assessments.
(((4))) (3) By December 1, 2009, the superintendent of public
instruction and the state board of education shall jointly recommend to
the governor and legislature whether the high school science assessment
should continue to be a comprehensive assessment or be changed to one
or more science end-of-course assessments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall report at least
annually or more often if necessary to keep the education committees of
the legislature informed on each step of the development and
implementation process under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2007 c 354 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and ((through
no later than the graduating class of 2012,)) until the state board of
education makes the validity and reliability determination for the
mathematics end-of-course assessments and the science assessment under
section 4 of this act, in order to graduate from high school students
((may graduate from high school without earning a certificate of
academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement)) shall
be required to successfully earn two additional mathematics credits or
career and technical course equivalent, including courses offered at
skill centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to
increase the student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or
exceeding the mathematics standards assessed on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning and continue to take the
appropriate mathematics assessment at least once annually until
graduation if they:
(((a))) (1) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on
the high school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved
objective alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed
for eligible special education students;
(((b))) (2) Have successfully met the state standard in the other
content areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or
28A.155.045; and
(((c))) (3) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements((; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
additional high school mathematics credit or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics assessment at
least once annually until graduation; and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two additional mathematics credits or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the
student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
mathematics standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment
of student learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics
assessment at least once annually until graduation.
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of this section with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply. The
state board of education's authority under this section does not alter
the requirement that any change in performance standards for the tenth
grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3) This section expires August 31, 2013)).

--- END ---