BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as the
Washington state defense of marriage act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that marriage has been defined throughout
time as the union of a husband and wife, and that this union is
fundamental and universal. Marriage provides the foundation of a
harmonious family life and is the basic building block of a society.
The development, productivity, and happiness of our children and new
generations to come are bound inextricably to the family unit. As a
result, marriage bears a significant and essential relationship to the
well-being, health, and enduring strength of society as a whole.
The legislature further finds it is a compelling interest of the
state of Washington to reaffirm its historical commitment to the
institution of marriage as a union between one man and one woman as
husband and wife and to protect that institution. In order to secure
and preserve the benefits of marriage for our generation and for future
generations, only the union between a man and a woman shall constitute
a legally recognizable and valid marital relationship with only spouses
entitled to all the benefits of legal marriage under state law.
The legislature further finds that same-sex partnerships are not
the legal equivalent of lawful marriage and that same-sex partners
should not be treated by state law the same as or similarly to legally
married spouses. Giving persons in domestic partnerships all or
substantially all the legal incidents of lawful marriage under state
law not only denigrates the historical understanding of the institution
of traditional marriage as being between a man and a woman, but also
creates the legal equivalent of the marital union itself without using
the term "marriage" and subjects the state of Washington to potential
litigation by same-sex partners demanding that the courts impose same-sex marriage.
The legislature notes with serious concerns that the California
supreme court recently imposed same-sex marriage in that state by
finding that the failure to designate the official relationship of
same-sex couples in domestic partnerships as "marriage" violated the
California constitution. In doing so, the California supreme court
noted that under that state's comprehensive domestic partnership
legislation a same-sex couple could enter into a legal relationship
that afforded the couple virtually all of the same substantive legal
benefits and privileges, and imposed upon the couple virtually all of
the same legal obligations and duties, that California law afforded to
and imposed upon a married couple. The court then held that the
California constitution prohibited the state from establishing a
statutory scheme in which both opposite-sex and same-sex couples are
granted the right to enter into an officially recognized family
relationship that affords all of the significant legal rights and
obligations traditionally associated under state law with the
institution of marriage, but under which the union of an opposite-sex
couple is officially designated a "marriage" whereas the union of a
same-sex couple is officially designated a "domestic partnership."
Therefore, the legislature intends by this act to repeal, nullify, or
void all provisions, applications, or effects of domestic partnerships
as established in chapter 6, Laws of 2008 and chapter 156, Laws of
2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriages in the following cases are prohibited:
(a) When either party thereto has a wife or husband living at the
time of such marriage;
(b) When the husband and wife are nearer of kin to each other than
second cousins, whether of the whole or half blood computing by the
rules of the civil law; or
(c) When the parties are persons other than a male and a female.
(2) It is unlawful for any man to marry his father's sister,
mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's daughter, daughter's daughter,
brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is unlawful for any woman
to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son, brother, son's
son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son.
(3) A marriage between two persons that is recognized as valid in
another jurisdiction is valid in this state only if the marriage is not
prohibited or made unlawful under subsection (1)(a), (1)(c), or (2) of
this section.
(4)(a) The uniting of two persons into some form of nonmarital
domestic relationship, including any civil union, domestic partnership,
reciprocal beneficiary, or other similar relationship, is not legally
recognizable or valid in this state.
(b) A person united in some form of nonmarital domestic
relationship, including any civil union, domestic partnership,
reciprocal beneficiary, or other similar relationship, shall not
qualify for, or receive, any spousal, familial, or marital right,
benefit, privilege, advantage, attribute, incident, immunity, or
entitlement, or otherwise, or any equivalent thereof, that is paid for,
directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, with state funds.
(c) The state does not create or recognize a legal status for
persons united in some form of nonmarital domestic relationship,
including any civil union, domestic partnership, reciprocal
beneficiary, or other similar relationship, that intends to or does
approximate the design, qualities, significance, or effect of marriage,
or extends or confers the legal incidents thereof, including any
spousal, familial, or marital right, benefit, privilege, advantage,
attribute, incident, immunity, or entitlement, or otherwise, or any
equivalent thereof, that is authorized or recognized by law, or is paid
for, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, with state funds.
(d) Nothing in this section prevents or shall be construed as
preventing private parties from contracting between and among
themselves for any right, benefit, privilege, advantage, attribute,
incident, immunity, or entitlement, or any equivalent thereof, that is
not otherwise expressly prohibited by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A state registered domestic partnership that
has been created prior to the effective date of this act is hereby
declared null and void and of no legal effect. Any references in state
law regarding state registered domestic partnership or state registered
domestic partner are hereby declared null and void and of no legal
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The code reviser shall note wherever state
registered domestic partnership or state registered domestic partner is
used or referred to in state law that the underlying statutes creating
state registered domestic partnerships have been repealed. The code
reviser shall prepare legislation for the next session following the
2009 regular session that removes all statutory references to state
registered domestic partnerships or state registered domestic partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 26.60.010 (Legislative findings) and 2007 c 156 s 1;
(2) RCW 26.60.020 (Definitions) and 2007 c 156 s 2;
(3) RCW 26.60.030 (Requirements) and 2007 c 156 s 4;
(4) RCW 26.60.040 (Registration -- Records -- Fees) and 2007 c 156 s 5;
(5) RCW 26.60.050 (Termination -- Records -- Fees) and 2008 c 6 s 1002
& 2007 c 156 s 6;
(6) RCW 26.60.060 (Domestic partnerships created by subdivisions of
the state) and 2007 c 156 s 7;
(7) RCW 26.60.070 (Patient visitation) and 2007 c 156 s 8; and
(8) RCW 43.07.400 (Domestic partnership registry -- Forms -- Rules) and
2007 c 156 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---