BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.62.010 and 2007 c 485 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
qualified employment positions at the specific facility will be at
least ((fifteen)) ten percent greater in the four consecutive full
calendar quarters after the calendar quarter during which the first
qualified employment position is filled than the applicant's average
qualified employment positions at the same facility in the four
consecutive full calendar quarters immediately preceding the calendar
quarter during which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(5) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "First qualified employment position" means the first qualified
employment position filled for which a credit under this chapter is
sought.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8)(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the eligible business project during four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also
includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "full time" means a normal
work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(c) Once a permanent, full-time employee has been employed, a
position does not cease to be a qualified employment position solely
due to periods in which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the four-quarter period; and
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement permanent, full-time employee for the
position.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(11) "Seasonal employee" means an employee of a seasonal employer
who works on a seasonal basis. For the purposes of this subsection and
subsection (12) of this section, "seasonal basis" means a continuous
employment period of less than twelve consecutive months.
(12) "Seasonal employer" means a person who regularly hires more
than fifty percent of its employees to work on a seasonal basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.62.045 and 2007 c 485 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section "eligible area" also means a
designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.31C.020.
(2) An eligible business project located within an eligible area as
defined in this section qualifies for a credit under this chapter for
those employees who at the time of hire are residents of the community
empowerment zone in which the project is located, if the ((fifteen
percent threshold)) employment increase required under RCW
82.62.010(4)(a) is met. As used in this subsection, "resident" means
the person makes his or her home in the community empowerment zone. A
mailing address alone is insufficient to establish that a person is a
resident for the purposes of this section.
(3) All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this
chapter apply to applicants eligible under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.62.050 and 2007 c 485 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall submit a report to the department by the
last day of the month immediately following the end of the four
consecutive full calendar quarter period for which a credit under this
chapter is earned. The report shall contain information, as required
by the department, from which the department may determine whether the
recipient is meeting the requirements of this chapter. If the
recipient fails to submit a report or submits an inadequate report, the
department may declare the amount of taxes for which a credit has been
used to be immediately assessed and payable. The recipient must keep
records, such as payroll records showing the date of hire and
employment security reports, to verify eligibility under this section.
(2) If, on the basis of a report under this section or other
information, the department finds that a ((business project)) recipient
is not eligible for tax credit under this chapter for reasons other
than failure to ((create the required number of)) increase the
recipient's average qualified employment positions as required in RCW
82.62.010(4)(a), the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used
for the project shall be immediately due.
(3) If, on the basis of a report under this section or other
information, the department finds that a ((business project)) recipient
has failed to ((create the specified number of)) increase the
recipient's average qualified employment positions as required in RCW
82.62.010(4)(a), the department shall assess interest, but not
penalties, on the credited taxes for which a credit has been used for
the project. The interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes, shall be assessed retroactively to the date of
the tax credit, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has
been used are repaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies with respect to
applications for credit under chapter 82.62 RCW received by the
department of revenue on or after January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---