BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.160 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.170 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The members of the state parks and recreation commission and
such of its employees as the commission may designate shall be vested
with police powers to enforce the laws of this state.
(2) An applicant for a park ranger position must be a citizen of
the United States of America who can read and write the English
language. All park rangers hired after the effective date of this
section must successfully complete the basic law enforcement academy
course, known as the basic course, sponsored by the criminal justice
training commission, or the basic law enforcement equivalency
certification, known as the equivalency course, provided by the
criminal justice training commission. The criminal justice training
commission may charge the state parks and recreation commission for the
costs of providing this training.
(3) Park rangers are limited authority peace officers. Nothing in
this section or RCW 10.93.020 confers membership to such officers in
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system under chapter 41.26 RCW.

--- END ---