BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.470 and 1987 c 330 s 726 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The term)) "Air conditioning equipment," as used or referred
to in this section ((shall)), means mechanical vapor compression
refrigeration equipment which is used to cool the driver's or passenger
compartment of any motor vehicle.
(2) Such equipment shall be manufactured, installed, and maintained
with due regard for the safety of the occupants of the vehicle and the
public and shall not contain any refrigerant which is toxic to persons
or which is flammable, unless the refrigerant is included in the list
published by the United States environmental protection agency, as it
exists on the effective date of this section, as a safe alternative
motor vehicle air conditioning substitute for chlorofluorocarbon-12
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7671k(c).
(3) The state patrol may adopt and enforce safety requirements,
regulations, and specifications consistent with the requirements of
this section applicable to such equipment which shall correlate with
and, so far as possible, conform to the current recommended practice or
standard applicable to such equipment approved by the society of
automotive engineers.
(4) No person shall have for sale, offer for sale, sell, or equip
any motor vehicle with any such equipment unless it complies with the
requirements of this section.
(5) No person shall operate on any highway any motor vehicle
equipped with any air conditioning equipment unless said equipment
complies with the requirements of this section.

--- END ---