BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public health is
a core function of state government. The local health jurisdictions in
Washington state's decentralized public health system depend on a
combination of federal, state, and local funding. This funding system
can make public health funding unstable on the local level and can
adversely affect the public health services available to the citizens
of the state. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to help
provide local health jurisdictions with a more stable dedicated funding
system. The legislature further intends that local health
jurisdictions receiving state funds be held accountable for the use of
those funds based on the minimum standards of public health protection
in the state's public health improvement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every local health jurisdiction in the state shall
substantially comply with the minimum standards for public health
protection established under RCW 43.70.520 as a precondition to
receiving state funding from:
(a) Appropriations to the department for distribution to local
health jurisdictions under RCW 43.70.512, 43.70.514, 43.70.516, and
43.70.518;
(b) Appropriations to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for distribution to local health jurisdictions;
and
(c) Local capacity development funds administered by the
department.
(2) The secretary shall establish a review process for determining
whether a local health jurisdiction is in substantial compliance with
the minimum standards for public health protection established under
RCW 43.70.520.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
secretary shall use the process established in subsection (2) of this
section to review each local health jurisdiction in the state at least
once every two years.
(4)(a) If the secretary finds that a local health jurisdiction is
not in substantial compliance with the minimum standards for public
health protection, he or she shall notify the local health jurisdiction
in writing.
(b) A local health jurisdiction receiving written notice under this
subsection shall submit a plan of correction within sixty days. The
plan of correction must explain the measures that the jurisdiction will
undertake to achieve substantial compliance with the standards within
one hundred eighty days.
(c) If the secretary determines that the plan of correction is
likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial compliance within one
hundred eighty days, he or she shall provide technical assistance to
the jurisdiction to help it to successfully complete the plan of
correction. If the secretary determines that the plan of correction is
not likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial compliance within
one hundred eighty days, he or she shall reject the plan of correction
and allow the jurisdiction to revise and resubmit the plan within
fifteen days. If the secretary finds that the revised plan of
correction is not likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial
compliance within one hundred eighty days, or if the jurisdiction does
not resubmit a revised plan within fifteen days, he or she shall take
action under subsection (5) of this section.
(d) The secretary shall review a local health jurisdiction with an
approved plan of correction one hundred eighty days after the approved
plan's submission. If the secretary finds that the jurisdiction
remains out of substantial compliance after the review required by this
subsection (4)(d), he or she shall take action under subsection (5) of
this section.
(5)(a) When the secretary finds, under subsection (4)(c) or (d) of
this section, that a local health jurisdiction is out of substantial
compliance with the minimum standards for public health protection
established under RCW 43.70.520, the secretary shall:
(i) Suspend any distributions made to the local health jurisdiction
under RCW 43.70.512, 43.70.514, 43.70.516, and 43.70.518;
(ii) Suspend any local capacity development funds due to the local
health jurisdiction; and
(iii) Notify the department of community, trade, and economic
development that the local health jurisdiction is out of compliance.
Upon notification under this subsection (5)(a)(iii), the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall suspend any
distributions due to the jurisdiction until the secretary sends notice
that the jurisdiction is back in substantial compliance.
(b) The secretary shall review, using the process established under
subsection (1) of this section, a jurisdiction subject to suspension
under (a) of this subsection no sooner than one hundred eighty days
after funding was suspended. If the secretary finds that the
jurisdiction remains out of substantial compliance, the secretary shall
continue the suspension and review the jurisdiction at intervals of at
least one hundred eighty days until the secretary finds that the
jurisdiction is in substantial compliance. Once the secretary finds
that the jurisdiction is in substantial compliance after a review under
this subsection, he or she shall immediately resume the distributions
suspended under this subsection. Once the suspension has been lifted
the department and the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall distribute any moneys the jurisdiction should have
received during the period of suspension.
(6) The secretary may exempt a local health jurisdiction from the
review process required by this section if the jurisdiction is
accredited by an organization whose accreditation standards meet or
exceed the minimum standards for public health protection established
under RCW 43.70.520.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By November 1, 2009, each local health
jurisdiction shall submit a report to the department of health
indicating whether the jurisdiction is in compliance with each of the
minimum standards for public health protection established under RCW
43.70.520.
(2) The department of health shall forward the reports to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than December 1, 2009.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2010.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.70.512 and 2007 c 259 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Protecting the public's health across the state is a
fundamental responsibility of the state. With any new state funding of
the public health system as appropriated for the purposes of ((sections
60 through 65 of this act)) this section and RCW 43.70.514, 43.70.516,
and 43.70.518, the state expects that measurable benefits will be
realized to the health of the residents of Washington. A transparent
process that shows the impact of increased public health spending on
performance measures related to the ((health outcomes in subsection (2)
of this section)) minimum standards for public health protection
established under RCW 43.70.520 is of great value to the state and its
residents. In addition, a well-funded public health system is expected
to become a more integral part of the state's emergency preparedness
system.
(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the
purposes of ((sections 60 through 65 of this act)) this section and RCW
43.70.514, 43.70.516, and 43.70.518, distributions to local health
jurisdictions shall be used for core public health functions of
statewide significance and shall deliver the following outcomes:
(a) Create a disease response system capable of responding at all
times;
(b) Stop the increase in, and reduce, sexually transmitted disease
rates;
(c) Reduce vaccine preventable diseases;
(d) Build capacity to quickly contain disease outbreaks;
(e) Decrease childhood and adult obesity and types I and II
diabetes rates, and resulting kidney failure and dialysis;
(f) Increase childhood immunization rates;
(g) Improve birth outcomes and decrease child abuse;
(h) Reduce animal-to-human disease rates; and
(i) Monitor and protect drinking water across jurisdictional
boundaries.
(3) Benchmarks for these outcomes shall be drawn from the national
healthy people 2010 goals, other reliable data sets, and any subsequent
national goals.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.70.514 and 2007 c 259 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout ((sections 60
through 65 of this act)) this section and RCW 43.70.512, 43.70.516, and
43.70.518 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Core public health functions of statewide significance" or
"public health functions" means health services that:
(a) Address: Communicable disease prevention and response;
preparation for, and response to, public health emergencies caused by
pandemic disease, earthquake, flood, or terrorism; prevention and
management of chronic diseases and disabilities; promotion of healthy
families and the development of children; assessment of local health
conditions, risks, and trends, and evaluation of the effectiveness of
intervention efforts; and environmental health concerns;
(b) Promote uniformity in the public health activities conducted by
all local health jurisdictions in the public health system, increase
the overall strength of the public health system, or apply to broad
public health efforts; and
(c) If left neglected or inadequately addressed, are reasonably
likely to have a significant adverse impact on counties beyond the
borders of the local health jurisdiction.
(2) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.70.516 and 2007 c 259 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department shall accomplish the tasks included in
subsection (2) of this section by utilizing the expertise of varied
interests, as provided in this subsection.
(a) In addition to the perspectives of local health jurisdictions,
the state board of health, the Washington health foundation, and
department staff that are currently engaged in development of the
public health services improvement plan under RCW 43.70.520, the
secretary shall actively engage:
(i) Individuals or entities with expertise in the development of
performance measures, accountability and systems management, such as
the University of Washington school of public health and community
medicine, and experts in the development of evidence-based medical
guidelines or public health practice guidelines; and
(ii) Individuals or entities who will be impacted by performance
measures developed under this section and have relevant expertise, such
as community clinics, public health nurses, large employers, tribal
health providers, family planning providers, and physicians.
(b) In developing the performance measures, consideration shall be
given to levels of performance necessary to promote uniformity in core
public health functions of statewide significance among all local
health jurisdictions, best scientific evidence, national standards of
performance, and innovations in public health practice. The
performance measures shall be developed to meet the goals and outcomes
in RCW 43.70.512. The office of the state auditor shall provide advice
and consultation to the committee to assist in the development of
effective performance measures and health status indicators.
(c) On or before November 1, 2007, the experts assembled under this
section shall provide recommendations to the secretary related to the
activities and services that qualify as core public health functions of
statewide significance and performance measures. The secretary shall
provide written justification for any departure from the
recommendations.
(2))) By January 1, 2008, the department shall((:
(a))) adopt a prioritized list of activities and services performed
by local health jurisdictions that qualify as core public health
functions of statewide significance as defined in RCW 43.70.514((; and
(b) Adopt appropriate performance measures with the intent of
improving health status indicators applicable to the core public health
functions of statewide significance that local health jurisdictions
must provide)).
(((3))) (2) The secretary may revise the list of activities ((and
the performance measures)) in future years as appropriate. Prior to
modifying ((either)) the list ((or the performance measures)), the
secretary must provide a written explanation of the rationale for such
changes.
(((4))) (3) The department and the local health jurisdictions shall
abide by the prioritized list of activities and services ((and the
performance measures developed pursuant to this section)).
(((5))) (4) The department, in consultation with representatives of
county governments, shall provide local jurisdictions with financial
incentives to encourage and increase local investments in core public
health functions. ((The local jurisdictions shall not supplant
existing local funding with such state-incented resources.))

Sec. 7 RCW 43.70.518 and 2007 c 259 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning November 15, ((2009)) 2010, the department shall report
to the legislature and the governor annually on the distribution of
funds to local health jurisdictions under ((sections 60 through 65 of
this act)) this section and RCW 43.70.512, 43.70.514, and 43.70.516 and
the use of those funds. The ((initial)) reports must discuss the
((performance measures adopted by the secretary and any impact the
funding in chapter 259, Laws of 2007 has had on local health
jurisdiction performance and health status indicators. Future reports
shall evaluate)) impact the funds have had on local health
jurisdictions' ability to meet the minimum standards for public health
protection established under RCW 43.70.520 as well as trends in
performance over time and the effects of expenditures on performance
over time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 43.70.522 (Public health performance
measures -- Assessing the use of funds -- Secretary's duties) and 2007 c
259 s 65 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2011.

--- END ---