BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that peer mentoring
provides tangible and long-lasting opportunities for all students,
especially for low-income students, students of color, and first
generation students. These benefits include improved student
achievement and planning for success in postsecondary education. The
legislature further finds that mentoring increases the self-worth of
both mentees and mentors, while cultivating opportunities to improve
communication skills and develop and enhance leadership and other
critical transferable skills. Furthermore, the legislature finds that
mentorship provides a valuable opportunity to increase student interest
in career opportunities in the counseling and teaching professions, and
thus intends to support those efforts to the maximum extent possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Western Washington University shall create and implement a
pilot mentoring program to inspire academic success and introduce
elementary students to educational opportunities. In addition to
establishing a pilot project on its own campus, the university, in
close collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, shall jointly identify a community or technical college to
participate in the pilot program. The community or technical college
selected shall demonstrate active partnerships with interested common
schools, local businesses, and community organizations. Western
Washington University and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall identify the community or technical college by August 1,
2009.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall work
in close collaboration with Western Washington University to identify
a community or technical college to participate in the pilot mentoring
program.
(3) Within overall appropriations for the state work study program,
the higher education coordinating board shall award grants to eligible
institutions participating in the mentoring pilot project. Grants
shall be awarded according to other procedures established by the board
for award of grants under this chapter.
(4) The goals of the pilot project are to:
(a) Encourage at-risk elementary school students to complete high
school and attend college, boosting the percentage of Washington
students who continue onto college;
(b) Provide positive role models for at-risk students and allow
college students the opportunity to perform community service;
(c) Strengthen relationships between the community, the university,
and area youth;
(d) Introduce at-risk students to college and provide them an
opportunity to experience their public colleges and universities;
(e) Increase the number of youth who view going to college as both
necessary and achievable; and
(f) Develop a model that is scalable statewide.
(5) Within existing resources, the pilot institutions shall:
(a) Recruit college students interested in serving as mentors to
elementary school students;
(b) Identify local elementary schools with demonstrated need for a
mentoring program;
(c) Develop a curriculum used for training college mentors. The
college may grant college-level credit to students who complete the
course;
(d) Develop any necessary contracts or interagency agreements to
facilitate program implementation;
(e) Provide ongoing support and oversight of the program;
(f) Solicit grants, awards, and gifts from individuals, businesses,
agencies, and foundations;
(g) Provide community outreach and publicity for the program;
(h) Develop appropriate outcome measures and evaluate the program
at regular intervals;
(i) Together with the state board for community and technical
colleges and in close collaboration with other community and
institutional partners, submit to the legislature:
(i) A preliminary progress report by December 1, 2010, that
includes a review of preliminary findings from the pilot project,
recommendations regarding the resources necessary to expand the model
statewide, and a process and timeline for statewide implementation; and
(ii) A final report, updating the findings from the preliminary
report, by December 1, 2011.

--- END ---