BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.452 and 2003 c 167 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and wine license to be issued to a
private club for sale of beer, strong beer, and wine for on-premises
consumption.
(2) Beer, strong beer, and wine sold by the licensee may be on tap
or by open bottles or cans.
(3) The fee for the private club beer and wine license is one
hundred eighty dollars per year.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the private club beer and
wine license that allows the holder of a private club beer and wine
license to sell bottled wine for off-premises consumption ((wine vinted
and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive
to the license holder selling the wine)). Spirits, strong beer, and
beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section.
The annual fee for the endorsement under this section is one hundred
twenty dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.170 and 2008 c 41 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed
under this section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic
winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of
its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington
retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common
carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own
production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply
with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or
retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain
a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine
of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been
approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the number of
warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed one.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, and sell wine of
its own production at retail, provided that: (a) Each additional
location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the
total number of additional locations does not exceed two; (c) a winery
may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (d)
any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premise consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server
permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery
license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations
operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot
connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee,
the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location
jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery
licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The
winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the
winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to
sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application
shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing
all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for
any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.010 and 2008 c 94 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall
have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail
business, unless the retail business is owned by a corporation in which
a manufacturer or importer has no direct stock ownership and there are
no interlocking officers and directors, the retail license is held by
a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by a
manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property as a hotel, alcoholic
beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board
reviews the ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved
entities and determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of
control or undue influence over the operation or the retail licensee;
nor shall any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative has any interest unless title to that property is owned
by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no direct stock ownership
and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the retail license
is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by
the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, no manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative shall advance moneys or moneys' worth to a licensed
person under an arrangement, nor shall such licensed person receive,
under an arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth. "Person"
as used in this section only shall not include those state or federally
chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and loan
associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks, or
institutional investors which are not controlled directly or indirectly
by a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized representative
as long as the bank, savings and loan association, or institutional
investor does not influence or attempt to influence the purchasing
practices of the retailer with respect to alcoholic beverages. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, no manufacturer, importer,
distributor, or authorized representative shall be eligible to receive
or hold a retail license under this title, nor shall such manufacturer,
importer, distributor, or authorized representative sell at retail any
liquor as herein defined. A corporation granted an exemption under
this subsection may use debt instruments issued in connection with
financing construction or operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and at one additional off-site retail only
location and nothing in this section shall prohibit a domestic winery
from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the
purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the winery premises. Such
beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject to the taxes imposed
by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting and bonding
requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the board pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by the
brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine
distributor. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a microbrewery
holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.320 from
holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the beer
and/or wine restaurant license. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
a licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own production
under RCW 66.24.145.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and
endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license. This section does not prohibit a brewery or microbrewery
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license or a beer and/or
wine license under chapter 66.24 RCW operated on the premises of the
brewery or microbrewery from holding a second retail only license at a
location separate from the premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits retail licensees with a
caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from
operating on a domestic winery premises.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits an organization qualifying
under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the purpose of constructing and
operating a facility to promote Washington wines from holding retail
licenses on the facility property or leasing all or any portion of such
facility property to a retail licensee on the facility property if the
members of the board of directors or officers of the board for the
organization include officers, directors, owners, or employees of a
licensed domestic winery. Financing for the construction of the
facility must include both public and private money.
(f) Nothing in this section prohibits a bona fide charitable
nonprofit society or association registered under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code, or a local wine industry association
registered under section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code as it
exists on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(g)(i) Nothing in this section prohibits domestic wineries and
retailers licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local wine industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, domestic wineries, and
their products.
(ii) Nothing in this section prohibits: (A) Domestic wineries,
domestic breweries, microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders
licensed under this chapter from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and (B)
retailers licensed under this chapter from listing on their internet
web sites information related to domestic wineries, domestic breweries,
microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders whose products
those retailers sell or promote, including direct links to the domestic
wineries', domestic breweries', microbreweries', and certificate of
approval holders' web sites.
(h) Nothing in this section prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder licensed under RCW 66.24.206(1)(a) for or on behalf
of a licensed retail business when the personal services are (i)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (ii) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring at the premises of a retailer holding a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or beer
restaurant license, ((or)) a specialty wine shop license, a special
occasion license, or a private club license; bottle signings; and other
similar informational or educational activities. A domestic winery or
certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform any such
personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a domestic
winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any personal
service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail licensee.
Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be
borne, directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer, importer, or
distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits domestic wineries and
retail licensees from identifying the wineries on private labels
authorized under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, ((and)) 66.24.450,
66.24.360, and 66.24.371.
(i) Until July 1, 2007, nothing in this section prohibits a
nonprofit statewide organization of microbreweries formed for the
purpose of promoting Washington's craft beer industry as a trade
association registered as a 501(c) with the internal revenue service
from holding a special occasion license to conduct up to six beer
festivals.
(j) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a manufacturer,
importer, or distributor from entering into an arrangement with any
holder of a sports/entertainment facility license or an affiliated
business for brand advertising at the licensed facility or promoting
events held at the sports entertainment facility as authorized under
RCW 66.24.570.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsections (1)(g) and (h) and
(3)(a) of this section in accordance with the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(5) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not
violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.371 and 2003 c 167 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding ((less than five and one-half))
four gallons or more of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or
wine specialty shop license is one hundred dollars for each store. The
sale of any container holding four gallons or more must comply with RCW
66.28.200 and 66.28.220.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.28.200 and 2007 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine restaurant or a tavern
license in combination with an off-premises beer and wine retailer's
license ((or)), licensees holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license with an endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.400(4), and
licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license with an
endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.371(1) may sell malt liquor in kegs
or other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid.
Under a special endorsement from the board, a grocery store licensee
may sell malt liquor in containers no larger than five and one-half
gallons. The sale of any container holding four gallons or more must
comply with the provisions of this section and RCW 66.28.210 through
66.28.240.
(2) Any person who sells or offers for sale the contents of kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor, or
leases kegs or other containers that will hold four gallons of malt
liquor, to consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW shall
do the following for any transaction involving the container:
(a) Require the purchaser of the malt liquor to sign a declaration
and receipt for the keg or other container or beverage in substantially
the form provided in RCW 66.28.220;
(b) Require the purchaser to provide one piece of identification
pursuant to RCW 66.16.040;
(c) Require the purchaser to sign a sworn statement, under penalty
of perjury, that:
(i) The purchaser is of legal age to purchase, possess, or use malt
liquor;
(ii) The purchaser will not allow any person under the age of
twenty-one years to consume the beverage except as provided by RCW
66.44.270;
(iii) The purchaser will not remove, obliterate, or allow to be
removed or obliterated, the identification required under RCW 66.28.220
to be affixed to the container;
(d) Require the purchaser to state the particular address where the
malt liquor will be consumed, or the particular address where the keg
or other container will be physically located; and
(e) Require the purchaser to maintain a copy of the declaration and
receipt next to or adjacent to the keg or other container, in no event
a distance greater than five feet, and visible without a physical
barrier from the keg, during the time that the keg or other container
is in the purchaser's possession or control.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.28.220 and 2007 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules requiring retail licensees to affix
appropriate identification on all containers of four gallons or more of
malt liquor for the purpose of tracing the purchasers of such
containers. The rules may provide for identification to be done on a
statewide basis or on the basis of smaller geographical areas.
(2) The board shall develop and make available forms for the
declaration and receipt required by RCW 66.28.200. The board may
charge spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees with an endorsement
issued under RCW 66.24.400(4), beer and/or wine retailer's licensees
designated as beer and/or wine specialty shop licensees with an
endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.371(1), and grocery store licensees
for the costs of providing the forms and that money collected for the
forms shall be deposited into the liquor revolving fund for use by the
board, without further appropriation, to continue to administer the
cost of the keg registration program.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor to
consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW if the kegs or
containers are not identified in compliance with rules adopted by the
board.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.28.040 and 2008 c 94 s 6 and 2008 c 41 s 12 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor shall, within the state of Washington, give to
any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.010
shall prevent a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210,
and in the case of spirituous liquor, any product used for samples must
be purchased at retail from the board; nothing in this section shall
prevent the furnishing of samples of liquor to the board for the
purpose of negotiating the sale of liquor to the state liquor control
board; nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor
for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
shall prevent a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distillery
from furnishing spirits without a charge, to a nonprofit charitable
corporation or association exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3)
or (6) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
or (6)) for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to
such exemption; nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic
brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the
brewery premises; nothing in this section shall prevent donations of
wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section shall
prevent a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the
winery premises; and nothing in this section shall prevent a craft
distillery from serving spirits without charge, on the distillery
premises subject to RCW 66.24.145.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.28.180 and 2006 c 302 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewery license, a microbrewery
license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a
domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine
distributor's license within the state of Washington to modify any
prices without prior notification to and approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2) Beer and wine distributor price posting.
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall file with the board at its
office in Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which
any and all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine
distributor shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall
set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by such beer and/or wine distributor;
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that
is below acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the
board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by
the board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state
market for a period of at least six months, and upon the further
condition that the distributor who posts such a close-out price shall
not restock the item for a period of one year following the first
effective date of such close-out price.
(f) The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all price
postings filed as required by this section constitute investigative
information and shall not be subject to disclosure, pursuant to RCW
42.56.240(1).
(h) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of
a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(i) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(ii) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. When a domestic winery, brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping
endorsement is acting as a distributor of its own production, a
licensed retailer may contract with a common carrier to obtain the
product directly from the domestic winery, brewery, microbrewery, or
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping endorsement. A
distributor's prices to retail licensees shall be the same at both such
places of delivery.
(3) Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and
memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic winery
offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state shall file with the
board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written contract and a
memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery may
have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda
shall contain a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all
items and all terms of sale, including all regular and special
discounts; all advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and all commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances. Whenever changed or modified, such revised
contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be filed with the board as
provided for by rule. The provisions of this section also apply to
certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer
and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine
distributors. Wine may be transferred from one licensed location to
another licensed location so long as both locations are under common
ownership. A licensed site may transfer up to a total of twenty cases
of wine per calendar year.
Each price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished
by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth
all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for
sale by such licensed brewery or winery; all additional information
required may be filed as a supplement to the price schedule forms.
(b) Prices filed by a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or certificate of approval holder shall be uniform prices to
all distributors or retailers on a statewide basis less bona fide
allowances for freight differentials. Quantity discounts are
prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below
acquisition/production cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not apply to
sales of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who sells beer or
wine to another beer or wine importer or to a beer or wine distributor,
or to a beer or wine distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer
or wine distributor. However, the board is empowered to review
periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage
of acquisition/production cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to
modify such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage
shall be not less than ten percent.
(c) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, certificate
of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine distributor
may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons whatsoever in
this state until copies of such written contracts or memoranda of such
oral agreements are on file with the board.
(d) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price for such package or container as shown in the schedule of
prices filed by the domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder and then in effect, according to rules
adopted by the board.
(e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or
memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all prices,
contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section constitute
investigative information and shall not be subject to disclosure,
pursuant to RCW 42.56.240(1).

Sec. 9 RCW 15.89.070 and 2007 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission
through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which
beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the
commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an
exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66
RCW and rules adopted by the liquor control board under which such
events may be conducted;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter;
(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of
the commission and not for any individual producer;
(17) ((Until July 1, 2009,)) Receive such gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to
the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of checks, credit or
debit cards, prepaid accounts, electronic funds transfers, and other
similar methods as approved by the board, as cash payments for purposes
of this title. Electronic fund transfers must be: (1) Voluntary; (2)
conducted pursuant to a prior written agreement of the parties that
includes a provision that the purchase be initiated by an irrevocable
invoice or sale order before the time of delivery; (3) initiated by the
retailer, manufacturer, importer, or distributor no later than the
first business day following delivery; and (4) completed as promptly as
is reasonably practical, and in no event, later than five business days
following delivery.

--- END ---