BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
public's interest that submerged hazards in water are marked thereby
reducing the risks of injury and death to persons and damage to
property. Most public agencies are currently not marking hazards on
the water because of the associated risks of liability for doing so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
No public agency or its employees or agents may be liable for any
civil damages as a result of any act or omission on the part of any
person pertaining to the placement, nonplacement, movement, or removal
of warning aids that mark hazards in public waters. This section
applies only to agencies that use navigational aids on federal waters
if they comply with the permitting process established in the United
States coast guard's private aids to navigation in 33 C.F.R. Part 66.
This section applies only to agencies that use navigational aids on
nonfederal waters if they meet the design standards established in the
United States coast guard's private aids to navigation in 33 C.F.R.
Part 66 and rules adopted under RCW 79A.60.500. This section does not
apply to any act or omission which constitutes willful or wanton
misconduct by a public agency or its employees or agents.

--- END ---