BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The term "employment" shall not include services performed by an
interpreter or translator under a written contract with a language
service provider for a specific engagement when the interpreter or
translator performs no other duties for the language service provider
and is not regularly and continuously employed by the language service
provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is not a "worker" for the purposes of this title, with
respect to his or her activities performed as an interpreter or
translator under a written contract with a language service provider
when the interpreter or translator performs no other duties for the
language service provider and is not regularly and continuously
employed by the language service provider.

--- END ---