BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to construction projects paid for in whole
or in part by the equivalent of public funds.
(2) For purposes of this section, "paid for in whole or in part by
the equivalent of public funds" means:
(a) Tax deferrals, exemptions, credits, or any other form of tax
incentive established by the state or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws, and intended to promote
economic development;
(b) Loans provided to a private entity by the state or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its law, or other
assistance provided in connection with the bonding authority of the
state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by
its laws that allows a private entity to obtain lower interest rates
for financing of a construction project;
(c) Sales or transfers of public land or property to a private
entity for less than fair market value by the state or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws; or
(d) Long-term leases of public land or property to a private entity
for less than fair market value by the state or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws.
(3)(a) This section does not apply to construction contracts
awarded before January 1, 2011.
(b) This section applies to construction contracts awarded on or
after January 1, 2011, for all construction projects estimated to cost
three million dollars or more and paid for in whole or in part by the
equivalent of public funds.
(c) This section applies to construction contracts awarded on or
after January 1, 2012, for all construction projects estimated to cost
two million dollars or more and paid for in whole or in part by the
equivalent of public funds.
(d) This section applies to construction contracts awarded on or
after January 1, 2013, for all construction projects estimated to cost
one million dollars or more and paid for in whole or in part by the
equivalent of public funds.
(4) This section only applies to construction projects that would
not have been covered by this chapter before the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---