BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.030 and 2003 c 386 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application deadline for a commercial license or permit
established in this chapter is December 31st of the calendar year for
which the license or permit is sought. ((The department shall accept
no license or permit applications after December 31st of the calendar
year for which the license or permit is sought.))
(2) Any application received after the application deadline must be
assessed a late fee that is to be collected in addition to the
prescribed fees for the license or permit. Late fees under this
section must be assessed according to the following schedule:
(a) One hundred twenty-five dollars for an application received one
to thirty days after the application deadline;
(b) Two hundred fifty dollars for an application received thirty-one to sixty days after the application deadline; and
(c) Five hundred dollars for an application received sixty-one or
more days after the application deadline.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department
may not waive late fee assessments.
(4)(a) Except for license or permit renewal applications received
by the department during the 2008 calendar year and except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, the department may not renew a license or
permit under this chapter if the application is received later than one
year after the application deadline established in this section.
(b) An applicant who is denied renewal of a permit or license under
this chapter for submitting an application after the application
deadline may submit a written request for an administrative hearing to
the department within thirty days of the date of the department's
denial. The department, upon consideration of the appeal, may grant
renewal. If the department grants renewal, it shall assess the
applicable late fee pursuant to this section.
(5) The application deadline and late fees in this section ((does))
do not apply to a license or permit that has not been renewed because
of the death or incapacity of the license or permit holder. The
license or permit holder's surviving spouse, estate, estate
beneficiary, attorney-in-fact, or guardian must be given an additional
one hundred eighty days to renew the license or permit. If renewed
within one hundred eighty days, the late fees provided in this section
do not apply.
(6) All late fees collected by the department under this section
must be distributed in the manner prescribed for the license or permit
fees associated with the underlying license.

--- END ---