BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.122.020 and 2007 c 142 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bar hole" means a hole made in the soil or pavement with a bar
for the specific purpose of testing the subsurface atmosphere with a
combustible gas indicator.
(2) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(((2))) (3) "Damage" includes the substantial weakening of
structural or lateral support of an underground facility, penetration,
impairment, or destruction of any underground protective coating,
housing, or other protective device, or the severance, partial or
complete, of any underground facility to the extent that the project
owner or the affected utility owner determines that repairs are
required.
(((3))) (4) "Emergency" means any condition constituting a clear
and present danger to life or property, or a customer service outage.
(((4))) (5) "Excavation" means any operation in which earth, rock,
or other material on or below the ground is moved or otherwise
displaced by any means, except ((the tilling of soil less than twelve
inches in depth for agricultural purposes, or road and ditch
maintenance that does not change the original road grade or ditch
flowline)):
(a) The tilling of soil less than twelve inches in depth for
agricultural purposes;
(b) Road and ditch maintenance that does not change the original
road grade or ditch flowline;
(c) For bar holes created by hand-operated equipment during
emergency leak investigations; or
(d) For bar holes less than twelve inches in depth.
(((5))) (6) "Excavation confirmation code" means a code or ticket
issued by the one-number locator service for the site where an
excavation is planned. The code must be accompanied by the date and
time it was issued.
(((6))) (7) "Excavator" means any person who engages directly in
excavation.
(((7))) (8) "Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or toxic or
corrosive gas.
(((8))) (9) "Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum
products, or anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R.
Part 195 as in effect on March 1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide. The
utilities and transportation commission may by rule incorporate by
reference other substances designated as hazardous by the secretary of
transportation.
(((9))) (10) "Identified facility" means any underground facility
which is indicated in the project plans as being located within the
area of proposed excavation.
(((10))) (11) "Identified but unlocatable underground facility"
means an underground facility which has been identified but cannot be
located with reasonable accuracy.
(((11))) (12) "Locatable underground facility" means an underground
facility which can be field-marked with reasonable accuracy.
(((12))) (13) "Marking" means the use of stakes, paint, or other
clearly identifiable materials to show the field location of
underground facilities, in accordance with the current color code
standard of the American public works association. Markings shall
include identification letters indicating the specific type of the
underground facility.
(((13))) (14) "Notice" or "notify" means contact in person or by
telephone or other electronic methods that results in the receipt of a
valid excavation confirmation code.
(((14))) (15) "One-number locator service" means a service through
which a person can notify utilities and request field-marking of
underground facilities.
(((15))) (16) "Operator" means the individual conducting the
excavation.
(((16))) (17) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise
holder, association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any
subdivision or instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents,
or legal representatives.
(((17))) (18) "Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all or parts of
a pipeline facility through which hazardous liquid or gas moves in
transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, valves, and
other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units, fabricated
assemblies associated with pumping or compressor units, metering and
delivery stations and fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout
tanks. "Pipeline" or "pipeline system" does not include process or
transfer pipelines.
(((18))) (19) "Pipeline company" means a person or entity
constructing, owning, or operating a pipeline for transporting
hazardous liquid or gas. A pipeline company does not include: (a)
Distribution systems owned and operated under franchise for the sale,
delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation
contractors or other contractors that contract with a pipeline company.
(((19))) (20) "Reasonable accuracy" means location within twenty-four inches of the outside dimensions of both sides of an underground
facility.
(((20))) (21) "Service lateral" means only that portion of an
individual customer service line that is owned or operated by the owner
of the underground facility.
(22) "Transfer pipeline" means a buried or aboveground pipeline
used to carry hazardous liquid between a tank vessel or transmission
pipeline and the first valve inside secondary containment at the
facility provided that any discharge on the facility side of that first
valve will not directly impact waters of the state. A transfer
pipeline includes valves, and other appurtenances connected to the
pipeline, pumping units, and fabricated assemblies associated with
pumping units. A transfer pipeline does not include process pipelines,
pipelines carrying ballast or bilge water, transmission pipelines, or
tank vessel or storage tanks.
(((21))) (23) "Transmission pipeline" means a pipeline that
transports hazardous liquid or gas within a storage field, or
transports hazardous liquid or gas from an interstate pipeline or
storage facility to a distribution main or a large volume hazardous
liquid or gas user, or operates at a hoop stress of twenty percent or
more of the specified minimum yield strength.
(((22))) (24) "Underground facility" means any item buried or
placed below ground for use in connection with the storage or
conveyance of water, sewage, electronic, telephonic or telegraphic
communications, cablevision, electric energy, petroleum products, gas,
gaseous vapors, hazardous liquids, or other substances and including
but not limited to pipes, sewers, service laterals, conduits, cables,
valves, lines, wires, manholes, attachments, and those parts of poles
or anchors below ground. This definition does not include pipelines as
defined in subsection (((17))) (18) of this section, but does include
distribution systems owned and operated under franchise for the sale,
delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.122.030 and 2000 c 191 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before commencing any excavation, excluding agriculture tilling
less than twelve inches in depth, the excavator shall provide notice of
the scheduled commencement of excavation to all owners of underground
facilities through a one-number locator service.
(2) All owners of underground facilities within a one-number
locator service area shall subscribe to the service. One-number
locator service rates for cable television companies will be based on
the amount of their underground facilities. An underground facility
owner who is required to subscribe to the one-number locator service
and fails to do so is liable for all damages to the owner's underground
facilities and for any other damages that occur after proper notice of
a scheduled excavation through the one-number locator service. Nothing
under this subsection may be construed to require a person who owns
underground facilities at the person's residence, farm, or place of
business to subscribe to the one-number locator service.
(3) If no one-number locator service is available, notice shall be
provided individually to those owners of underground facilities known
to or suspected of having underground facilities within the area of
proposed excavation. The notice shall be communicated to the owners of
underground facilities not less than two business days or more than ten
business days before the scheduled date for commencement of excavation,
unless otherwise agreed by the parties.
(((3))) (4) Upon receipt of the notice provided for in this
section, the owner of the underground facility shall provide the
excavator with reasonably accurate information as to its locatable
underground facilities by surface-marking the location of the
facilities. If there are identified but unlocatable underground
facilities, the owner of such facilities shall provide the excavator
with the best available information as to their locations. The owner
of the underground facility providing the information shall respond no
later than two business days after the receipt of the notice or before
the excavation time, at the option of the owner, unless otherwise
agreed by the parties. Excavators shall not excavate until all known
facilities have been marked. Once marked by the owner of the
underground facility, the excavator is responsible for maintaining the
markings. Excavators shall have the right to receive compensation from
the owner of the underground facility for costs incurred if the owner
of the underground facility does not locate its facilities in
accordance with this section.
(((4))) (5) The owner of the underground facility shall have the
right to receive compensation for costs incurred in responding to
excavation notices given less than two business days prior to the
excavation from the excavator.
(((5) An owner of underground facilities is not required to
indicate the presence of existing service laterals or appurtenances if
the presence of existing service laterals or appurtenances on the site
of the construction project can be determined from the presence of
other visible facilities, such as buildings, manholes, or meter and
junction boxes on or adjacent to the construction site.))
(6) Emergency excavations are exempt from the time requirements for
notification provided in this section. For emergency bar holing twelve
or more inches in depth, reasonable measures will be taken to eliminate
electrical arc hazards.
(7) If the excavator, while performing the contract, discovers
underground facilities which are not identified, the excavator shall
cease excavating in the vicinity of the facility and immediately notify
the owner or operator of such facilities, or the one-number locator
service.

--- END ---