BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.116.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 142 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are:
(1) To provide for the establishment of critical water supply
service areas related to water utility planning and development;
(2) To provide for the development of minimum planning and design
standards for critical water supply service areas to ((insure)) ensure
that water systems developed in these areas are consistent with
regional needs relating to the provision of a safe and reliable
drinking water supply;
(3) To provide that coordinated water system plans and resulting
individual water system plans are consistent with the requirements of
comprehensive plans or development regulations adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW, or other applicable land use plans, or development
regulations adopted by a city, town, or county determined by the
secretary to be reasonably related to the provision of a safe and
reliable drinking water supply pursuant to the secretary's authority
under RCW 43.20.050 and consistent with rules adopted by the department
under RCW 43.20.260;
(4) To assist in the orderly and efficient administration of state
financial assistance programs for public water systems; ((and
(4))) (5) To assist public water systems to meet reasonable
standards of quality, quantity and pressure; and
(6) To coordinate the administration of this chapter in a manner
consistent with RCW 43.20.260 and implementing rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.116.030 and 1991 c 3 s 366 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise((, the following terms
when used in this chapter shall be defined as follows:)).
(1) "Coordinated water system plan" means a plan for public water
systems within a critical water supply service area which identifies
the present and future drinking water needs of the systems and sets
forth means for meeting those needs in the most efficient manner
possible. Such a plan shall include provisions for subsequently
updating the plan. In areas where more than one water system exists,
a coordinated plan may consist of either: (a) A new plan developed for
the area following its designation as a critical water supply service
area; or (b) a compilation of compatible water system plans existing at
the time of such designation and containing such supplementary
provisions as are necessary to satisfy the requirements of this
chapter. Any such coordinated plan must include provisions regarding:
Future service area designations; assessment of the feasibility of
shared source, transmission, and storage facilities; emergency inter-ties; design standards; water use efficiencies; and other concerns
determined by the secretary to be reasonably related to the
construction and operation of the water ((system)) facilities and the
provision of a safe, reliable drinking water supply pursuant to the
secretary's authority under RCW 43.20.050 and consistent with rules
adopted by the department under RCW 43.20.260.
(2) "Critical water supply service area" means a geographical area
which is characterized by a proliferation of small, inadequate water
systems, or by water supply problems which threaten the present or
future water quality or reliability of service in such a manner that
efficient and orderly development may best be achieved through
coordinated planning by the water utilities in the area.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Future service area" means a specific area a public water
system plans to provide water service that fall outside the boundaries
of a purveyor's retail service area described within a water system
plan, but within the area claimed for water service in a written
agreement between purveyors under RCW 70.116.050.
(5) "Public water system" means any system providing water intended
for, or used for, human consumption or other domestic uses. It
includes, but is not limited to, the source, treatment for purifying
purposes only, storage, transmission, pumping, and distribution
facilities where water is furnished to any community, or number of
individuals, or is made available to the public for human consumption
or domestic use, but excluding water systems serving one single family
residence. However, systems existing on September 21, 1977, which are
owner operated and serve less than ten single family residences or
which serve only one industrial plant shall be excluded from this
definition and the provisions of this chapter.
(((4))) (6) "Purveyor" means any agency or subdivision of the state
or any municipal corporation, firm, company, mutual or cooperative
association, institution, partnership, or person or any other entity,
that owns or operates for wholesale or retail service a public water
system. It also means the authorized agents of any such entities.
(((5))) (7) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
health or the secretary's authorized representative.
(((6))) (8) "Service area" means a specific geographical area
serviced or for which service is planned by a purveyor.
(9) "Water resource plans" or "resource plans" means plans that
have been developed and adopted by units of local, regional, and state
governments under chapter 90.44, 90.48, or 90.82 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.116.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 142 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary and the appropriate local planning agencies
and purveyors((,)) shall study geographical areas where drinking water
supply problems related to uncoordinated planning, inadequate water
quality, or unreliable service appear to exist. If the local planning
agencies and purveyors agree by majority vote that the results of the
study clearly indicate that such water supply problems do exist, the
secretary or the county legislative authority shall designate the area
involved as being a critical water supply service area, consult with
the appropriate local planning agencies and purveyors, and appoint a
committee of not less than three representatives therefrom solely for
the purpose of establishing the proposed external boundaries of the
critical water supply service area. The committee shall include a
representative from each purveyor serving more than fifty customers,
the county legislative authority, county planning agency, and health
agencies. Such proposed boundaries shall be established within six
months of the appointment of the committee.
(b) During the six month period following the establishment of the
proposed external boundaries of the critical water supply services
areas, the county legislative authority shall conduct public hearings
on the proposed boundaries and shall modify or ratify the proposed
boundaries in accordance with the findings of the public hearings. The
boundaries shall reflect the existing land usage, and permitted
densities in county plans, ordinances, ((and/or)) and growth policies
determined by the secretary to be reasonably related to the provision
of a safe and reliable drinking water supply and consistent with rules
adopted by the department under RCW 43.20.260. If the proposed
boundaries are not modified during the six month period, the proposed
boundaries shall be automatically ratified and be the critical water
supply service area.
(c) After establishment of the external boundaries of the critical
water supply service area, no new public water systems may be approved
within the boundary area unless an existing water purveyor is unable
to provide water service.
(2) At the time a critical water supply service area is established
or amended, the external boundaries for such area shall not include any
fractional part of a purveyor's existing contiguous service area.
(3) The external boundaries of the critical water supply service
area may be amended in accordance with procedures prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section for the establishment of the critical
water supply service areas when such amendment is necessary to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.116.050 and 1995 c 376 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each purveyor within the boundaries of a critical water supply
service area shall develop a water system plan ((for)) that identifies
the purveyor's retail service area in accordance with RCW 43.20.260 and
its future service area if such a plan has not already been developed:
PROVIDED, That nonmunicipally owned public water systems are exempt
from the planning requirements of this chapter, except for the
establishment of service area boundaries if they have no plans for
water service beyond their existing service area: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That if the county legislative authority permits a change in
development that will increase the demand for water service of such a
system beyond the existing system's ability to provide minimum water
service, the purveyor shall develop a water system plan in accordance
with this section. The establishment of future service area boundaries
shall be in accordance with RCW 70.116.070.
(2) After the boundaries of a critical water supply service area
have been established pursuant to RCW 70.116.040, the committee
established in RCW 70.116.040 shall participate in the development of
a coordinated water system plan for the designated area. Such a plan
shall incorporate all water system plans developed pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section. The plan shall provide for maximum
integration and coordination of public water system facilities
consistent with the protection and enhancement of the public health and
well-being. Decisions of the committee shall be by majority vote of
those ((present at meetings of the committee)) purveyors located within
the boundaries of the proposed critical water supply service area.
(3) Those portions of a critical water supply service area not yet
served by a public water system shall have a coordinated water system
plan developed by existing purveyors based upon permitted densities in
county plans, ordinances, and/or growth policies that are determined by
the secretary to be reasonably related to the provision of a safe and
reliable drinking water supply and consistent with rules adopted by the
department under RCW 43.20.260, for a minimum of five years beyond the
date of establishment of the boundaries of the critical water supply
service area.
(4) To ((insure)) ensure that the plan incorporates the proper
designs to protect public health, the secretary shall adopt
((regulations)) rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW concerning the
scope and content of coordinated water system plans, and shall ensure,
as minimum requirements, that such plans:
(a) Are reviewed by the appropriate local governmental agency to
((insure)) ensure that the plan is not inconsistent with the ((land use
plans,)) shoreline master programs((, and/or)) and the requirements of
land use plans and developmental policies, which the secretary has
determined are reasonably related to the provision of a safe and
reliable drinking water supply and consistent with rules adopted by the
department under RCW 43.20.260 of the general purpose local government
or governments whose jurisdiction the water system plan affects.
Except as specifically provided in this section, the authority of a
local government in relation to other statutory and regulatory
authority is neither expanded or reduced by this chapter.
(b) Recognize all water resource plans, water quality plans, and
water pollution control plans which have been prepared under chapter
90.44, 90.48, or 90.82 RCW and adopted by units of local, regional, and
state government.
(c) Incorporate the fire protection standards developed pursuant to
RCW 70.116.080.
(d) Identify the future service area boundaries of the public water
system or systems included in the plan within the critical water supply
service area.
(e) Identify feasible emergency inter-ties between adjacent
purveyors.
(f) Include satellite system management requirements consistent
with RCW 70.116.134.
(g) Include policies and procedures that generally address failing
water systems for which counties may become responsible under RCW
43.70.195.
(5) If a "water general plan" for a critical water supply service
area or portion thereof has been prepared pursuant to chapter 36.94 RCW
and such a plan meets the requirements of subsections (1) and (4) of
this section, such a plan shall constitute the coordinated water system
plan for the applicable geographical area.
(6) The committee established in RCW 70.116.040 may develop and
utilize a mechanism for addressing disputes that arise in the
development of the coordinated water system plan.
(7) Prior to the submission of a coordinated water system plan to
the secretary for approval pursuant to RCW 70.116.060, the legislative
authorities of the counties in which the critical water supply service
area is located shall hold a public hearing thereon and shall determine
the plan's consistency with subsection (4) of this section. If within
sixty days of receipt of the plan, the legislative authorities find any
segment of a proposed service area of a purveyor's plan or any segment
of the coordinated water system plan to be inconsistent with ((any
current land use plans,)) shoreline master programs((, and/or)) or
requirements of current land use plans and developmental policies of
the general purpose local government or governments whose jurisdiction
the water system plan affects that the secretary has determined to be
reasonably related to the provision of a safe and reliable drinking
water supply and consistent with rules adopted by the department under
RCW 43.20.260, the secretary shall ((not)) approve only that portion of
the plan that is consistent until the inconsistency is resolved between
the local government and the purveyor. If no comments have been
received from the legislative authorities within sixty days of receipt
of the plan, the secretary may consider the plan for approval.
(8) Any county legislative authority may adopt an abbreviated plan
for the provision of drinking water supplies within its boundaries that
includes provisions for service area boundaries, minimum design
criteria, and review process. The elements of the abbreviated plan
shall conform to the criteria established by the department under
subsection (4) of this section, the purposes expressed in RCW
70.116.020, and shall otherwise be consistent with other applicable
provisions of adopted land use and resource plans determined by the
secretary to be reasonably related to the provision of a safe and
reliable drinking water supply and consistent with rules adopted by the
department under RCW 43.20.260. The county legislative authority may,
in lieu of the committee required under RCW 70.116.040, and the
procedures authorized in this section, utilize an advisory committee
that is representative of the water utilities and local governments
within its jurisdiction to assist in the preparation of the abbreviated
plan, which may be adopted by resolution and submitted to the secretary
for approval. However, the scope of the adopted plan must be prepared
in a manner that is consistent with the purposes expressed in RCW
70.116.020. Purveyors within the boundaries covered by the abbreviated
plan need not develop a water system plan, except to the extent
required by the secretary or state board of health under other
authority. Any abbreviated plan adopted by a county legislative
authority pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the same
provisions contained in RCW 70.116.060 for coordinated water system
plans that are approved by the secretary.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.116.060 and 1995 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A coordinated water system plan shall be submitted to the
secretary for design approval within two years of the establishment of
the boundaries of a critical water supply service area.
(2) The secretary shall review the coordinated water system plan
and, to the extent the plan is consistent with the purposes and
requirements of this chapter ((and regulations)), rules adopted
((hereunder)) under this chapter, and pursuant to RCW 43.20.260, shall
approve the plan, provided that the secretary shall not approve those
portions of a coordinated water system plan that fail to meet the
requirements for future service area boundaries until any boundary
dispute is resolved as set forth in RCW 70.116.070.
(3) Following the approval of a coordinated water system plan by
the secretary:
(a) All purveyors constructing or proposing to construct public
water system facilities within the area covered by the plan shall
comply with the plan.
(b) No other purveyor shall establish a public water system within
the area covered by the plan, unless the local legislative authority
determines that existing purveyors are unable to provide the service in
a timely and reasonable manner, pursuant to guidelines developed by the
secretary. An existing purveyor is unable to provide the service in a
timely manner if the water cannot be provided to an applicant for water
within one hundred twenty days unless specified otherwise by the local
legislative authority. If such a determination is made, the local
legislative authority shall require the new public water system to be
constructed in accordance with the construction standards and
specifications embodied in the coordinated water system plan approved
for the area. The service area boundaries in the coordinated plan for
the affected utilities shall be revised to reflect the decision of the
local legislative authority.
(4) The secretary may deny proposals to establish or to expand any
public water system within a critical water supply service area for
which there is not an approved coordinated water system plan at any
time after two years of the establishment of the critical water supply
service area: PROVIDED, That service connections shall not be
considered expansions.
(5) The affected legislative authorities may develop and utilize a
mechanism for addressing disputes that arise in the implementation of
the coordinated water system plan after the plan has been approved by
the secretary.
(6) After adoption of the initial coordinated water system plan,
the local legislative authority or the secretary may determine that the
plan should be updated or revised. The legislative authority may
initiate an update at any time, but the secretary may initiate an
update no more frequently than once every five years. The update may
encompass all or a portion of the plan((, with the scope of the update
to be determined by the secretary and the legislative authority)) as
determined by the secretary and the legislative authority. However,
the purpose of the update must be to address the provision of a safe
and reliable drinking water supply and must otherwise be consistent
with the purposes expressed in RCW 70.116.020 and rules adopted by the
department under RCW 43.20.260. The process for the update shall be
the one prescribed in RCW 70.116.050.
(7) The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not
apply in any county for which a coordinated water system plan has not
been approved under subsection (2) of this section.
(8) If the secretary initiates an update or revision of a
coordinated water system plan, the state shall pay for the cost of
updating or revising the plan.
(9) If a county initiates an update or revision of a coordinated
water system plan, the county shall pay for the cost of updating or
revising the plan.

--- END ---