BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied under RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to any
landless Washington state federally recognized Indian tribe in respect
to sales for tribal administration or tribal programs. For purposes of
this section, "landless" means that the tribe does not have either a
reservation or land in the state held in trust by the United States for
the benefit of the tribe.
(2) The exemption under subsection (1) of this section is in the
form of a refund.
(a) A seller must collect the tax imposed under this chapter and
any applicable local sales taxes imposed under chapter 82.14 RCW, RCW
81.104.170, or other provision of law on sales subject to the
exemption.
(b) For a refund of exempted taxes paid as required under (a) of
this subsection, a buyer must apply to the department according to the
form, manner, and frequency prescribed by the department.
(c) The department must refund directly to the buyer the total
amount of state and local sales taxes paid as required under (a) of
this subsection from the state portion of taxes collected under this
chapter. The department, in its sole discretion, may make refunds
under this section on a quarterly or more frequent basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to use
by any landless Washington state federally recognized Indian tribe for
tribal administration or tribal programs. For purposes of this
section, "landless" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an exemption
under this section must be claimed on a return as required in RCW
82.32.045. To claim the exemption, taxpayers must report the amount of
exempted use taxes that would otherwise have been due under this
chapter, chapter 82.14 RCW, RCW 81.104.170, or other provision of law.
(b) Taxpayers need not report under (a) of this subsection with
respect to sales exempted under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.050 and 2005 c 336 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under
RCW 82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and
35.57 RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440,
regional transportation investment districts, and transportation
benefit districts under chapter 36.73 RCW shall contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury.
(b) The amount of local use tax liability that is subject to the
exemption in and is reported to the department under section 2 of this
act must be deposited in the local sales and use tax account from the
state portion of taxes collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "local use tax" means a tax
imposed by a local taxing authority under this chapter, RCW 81.104.170,
or other provision of law.
(2) Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be spent only
for distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities,
public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas,
regional transportation investment districts, and transportation
benefit districts imposing a sales and use tax.
(3) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall,
insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be
applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Counties,
cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and
regional transportation investment districts may not conduct
independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under the
streamlined sales tax agreement.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation
investment districts, and transportation benefit districts monthly.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.060 and 2005 c 336 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall ((make distribution))
distribute from the local sales and use tax account to the counties,
cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and
transportation benefit districts:
(i) The amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing authority,
less the deduction provided for in RCW 82.14.050; and
(ii) The amount, if any, deposited on behalf of each taxing
authority as provided in RCW 82.14.050(1)(b).
(b) The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
section without appropriation.
(2) In the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales
and use tax at a rate in excess of the applicable limits contained
herein, such ordinance or resolution shall not be considered void in
toto, but only with respect to that portion of the rate which is in
excess of the applicable limits contained herein.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---