BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
serve as the lead agency in a coordinated approach with school
districts, institutions of higher education, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, local and national nonprofit
organizations, and the business community to create an adequate supply
of well-qualified mathematics and science teachers for Washington's
public schools. In fulfilling this role, the board shall:
(a) Work with institutions of higher education, including community
colleges, to build stronger connections and partnerships with school
districts and to craft innovative teacher preparation programs,
particularly in rural areas;
(b) Work with in-state and national organizations to identify
barriers and craft solutions to improved recruitment, hiring,
preparation, and retention of mathematics and science teachers;
(c) Expand information to students and counselors, from middle
school through college, about teacher preparation options and
opportunities;
(d) Seek private and federal support for innovations and
initiatives; and
(e) Set goals, collect and analyze data, and monitor progress
toward achieving the goals.
(2) Strategies overseen and coordinated by the board to achieve the
objectives of this section include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Building pipelines to mathematics and science teaching,
beginning in middle school and through college using the recruiting
Washington teachers program under RCW 28A.415.370, the pipeline for
paraeducators conditional scholarship program under RCW 28A.660.042,
and the Washington teach initiative under section 3 of this act;
(b) Streamlining teacher preparation and improving the geographic
distribution of mathematics and science teachers through the retooling
to teach mathematics and science conditional scholarship program under
RCW 28A.660.045, alternative route to teacher certification programs
under RCW 28A.660.040, community college teacher preparation options
under section 4 of this act, and rural recruitment collaboratives under
section 6 of this act;
(c) Shifting and building capacity in public four-year institutions
of higher education to prepare mathematics and science teachers through
their participation in alternative route programs and the institutional
priority initiatives and incentives under section 3 of this act; and
(d) Attracting individuals to careers in mathematics and science
teaching, including through the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program under chapter 28B.102 RCW and the
mathematics and science midcareer incentive under section 7 of this
act.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2008 c 176 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to
establish policies and requirements for the preparation and
certification of educators that provide standards for competency in
professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a
foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help
students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and
learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW
28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional
development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator
standards board shall:
(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs
of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator
certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational
staff associate certification, which shall permit a qualified community
college to be approved to offer the mathematics and science teacher
preparation options under section 4 of this act;
(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the
character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance
to and graduation from any educator preparation program including
teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate
preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education
of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator
certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff
associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other
states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs
and certification, including teacher certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards;
(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator
preparation programs;
(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at
least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings
and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and school specialized personnel;
(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be
issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 28A.410.010;
(7) Hear and determine educator certification appeals as provided
by RCW 28A.410.100;
(8) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the
state for purposes related to the duties of the board, including
private and federal funds to support initiatives under section 1 of
this act;
(9) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the
effective and efficient implementation of this chapter;
(10) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs and
their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends and
needs, and other data deemed relevant by the board;
(11) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public
instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator
evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation
and suspension of licensure;
(12) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year, a joint
report with the state board of education to the legislative education
committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction.
The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the
obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the
work of achieving the goals set out in RCW 28A.150.210;
(13) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for basic
skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain residency
certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240;
(14) By January 2010, set performance standards and develop, pilot,
and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level
certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the
development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes
in professional certification program components such as the
culminating seminar; ((and))
(15) Serve as the lead agency in a coordinated approach to create
an adequate supply of well-qualified mathematics and science teachers
under section 1 of this act; and
(16) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each public four-year institution of higher education with a
teacher preparation program approved by the professional educator
standards board to offer a residency teaching certificate and subject
area endorsements in middle level mathematics or science, or secondary
mathematics or science, including any of the branch campuses under RCW
28B.45.014, is subject to this section.
(2) Each institution under this section shall develop and implement
a Washington teach initiative for recruitment and development of
mathematics and science teachers from within the student population of
the institution and among high school students in partnering school
districts. Each institution shall submit the proposed plan and
strategies for its Washington teach initiative to the professional
educator standards board by October 30, 2009, and thereafter shall
submit a progress report to the board each October 30th until 2014.
The plan must include:
(a) Evidence of a commitment by the institution to make development
of mathematics and science teachers an institutional priority;
(b) Collaboration between institutional leadership, the college of
education, and the mathematics and science departments of the college
of arts and sciences;
(c) Targeted outreach, student advising, and recruitment efforts;
(d) Streamlined course requirements to enable students to obtain
both a mathematics or science major and residency certification within
four years of study;
(e) Opportunities for classroom experiences early in the students'
academic careers;
(f) Increased collaboration and partnership with school districts,
including districts outside the immediate geographic vicinity of the
institution; and
(g) Measurable goals and objectives, including the shift in
enrollment required under the institutional priority initiative under
subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Each institution under this section shall partner with one or
more school districts in providing one or more of the alternative route
programs under RCW 28A.660.040 using routes two, three, or four to
offer candidates a postbaccalaureate residency teaching certificate in
middle level mathematics or science or secondary mathematics or
science. Each institution shall seek partner school districts in
underserved areas of the state. Each institution and district partner
or partners shall submit a partnership proposal under RCW 28A.660.020
to the professional educator standards board no later than January 15,
2010, and if approved, shall commence operation of the program no later
than September 1, 2010, unless the professional educator standards
board authorizes an extension. A significant factor in review and
approval by the board shall be the quality of the institution's
partnership with local school districts.
(4) Effective with the 2010-11 academic year, each institution
under this section shall reduce admittance and enrollment of students
seeking residency teacher certification with an endorsement in
elementary education as part of an institutional priority initiative
and shall demonstrably increase enrollment capacity for students
seeking residency teacher certification with an endorsement in middle
level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or science. An
institution that can document a reduction in admittance and enrollment
of elementary education candidates and an increase in capacity and
enrollment of mathematics or science candidates between 2006 and 2010
may be exempted by the board from this subsection (3) but is encouraged
to continue to increase capacity in mathematics and science.
(5) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and beginning in
the 2010-11 academic year, the higher education coordinating board may
award an institution under this section an enrollment incentive
allocation to support the initiatives under this section for each
enrolled student seeking residency teacher certification with an
endorsement in middle level mathematics or science, or secondary
mathematics or science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A community college may submit an application to the
professional educator standards board for approval to offer courses
that teachers may use to demonstrate required competencies for
endorsement in middle level mathematics or science, or secondary
mathematics or science.
(2)(a) The college board shall select up to three community
colleges willing to partner with one or more local school districts in
providing one or more of the alternative route programs under RCW
28A.660.040 using routes two, three, or four to offer candidates a
postbaccalaureate residency teaching certificate in middle level
mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or science. To the
maximum extent possible, the colleges selected shall be geographically
dispersed to enhance access in underserved areas of the state.
(b) The college board and the professional educator standards board
shall provide technical assistance to the colleges and their school
district partners in developing and submitting a partnership proposal
under RCW 28A.660.020.
(3)(a) The college board shall select up to three community
colleges to develop and offer a program of study leading to a
baccalaureate degree with a residency teaching certificate in middle
level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or science. To
the maximum extent possible, the colleges selected shall be
geographically dispersed to enhance access in underserved areas of the
state. The college board and the professional educator standards board
shall provide technical assistance to the colleges in developing and
submitting the program for approval.
(b) A college selected under this subsection (3) may develop the
curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to a
baccalaureate degree. However, programs developed under this
subsection (3) are subject to approval by the college board under RCW
28B.50.090, the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.76.230, and the professional educator standards board under RCW
28A.410.210 before the college may enroll students in upper division
courses or apply courses offered toward required competencies for
teacher certification or endorsement. The boards shall coordinate
their review and approval processes to expedite approval.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.50.020 and 2005 c 258 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the dramatically
increasing number of students requiring high standards of education
either as a part of the continuing higher education program or for
occupational education and training, or for adult basic skills and
literacy education, by creating a new, independent system of community
and technical colleges which will:
(1) Offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her
academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her
economic means;
(2) Ensure that each college district shall offer thoroughly
comprehensive educational, training and service programs to meet the
needs of both the communities and students served by combining high
standards of excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and
practical courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded;
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services. However, college
districts containing only technical colleges shall maintain programs
solely for occupational education, basic skills, and literacy purposes,
and, for as long as a need exists, may continue those programs,
activities, and services offered by the technical colleges during the
twelve-month period preceding September 1, 1991;
(3) Provide for basic skills and literacy education, and
occupational education and technical training at technical colleges in
order to prepare students for careers in a competitive workforce;
(4) Provide or coordinate related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices at community and technical colleges;
(5) Provide administration by state and local boards which will
avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities or programs; and which will
encourage efficiency in operation and creativity and imagination in
education, training and service to meet the needs of the community and
students;
(6) Allow for the growth, improvement, flexibility and modification
of the community colleges and their education, training and service
programs as future needs occur; and
(7) Establish firmly that, except on a pilot basis as provided
under RCW 28B.50.810 and section 4 of this act, community colleges are,
for purposes of academic training, two year institutions, and are an
independent, unique, and vital section of our state's higher education
system, separate from both the common school system and other
institutions of higher learning, and never to be considered for
conversion into four-year liberal arts colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, at least two
educational service districts serving large numbers of small and rural
school districts shall develop and operate rural recruitment
collaboratives to assist districts in recruiting, hiring, and retaining
mathematics and science teachers. The collaboratives shall provide
data analysis and needs assessment, help districts develop partnerships
with teacher preparation programs, provide assistance with seeking
private and federal grants and using existing funds in innovative ways,
and examine recruitment and hiring practices and suggest ways to reduce
competition and barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2009-10 school year, the calculation of years
of service for purposes of the statewide salary allocation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.410 for teachers who have an endorsement and are in
an instructional assignment in middle level mathematics or science, or
secondary mathematics or science, may include experience in nonschool
positions in an occupation requiring a mathematics, science, or
engineering degree as provided in this section. The calculation shall
be that one year of service in a nonschool position counts as one year
of service for purposes of RCW 28A.150.410, up to a limit of five years
of nonschool service, and only if the individual has ten or more years
of total experience in nonschool positions requiring a mathematics,
science, or engineering degree.
(2) Nonschool years of service included in calculations under this
section shall not be applied to service credit totals for purposes of
any retirement benefit under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any
other state retirement system benefits.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement the mathematics and science midcareer
incentive under this section and shall consult with the workforce
training and education coordinating board regarding occupations
requiring a mathematics, engineering, or science degree.

--- END ---