BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to provide the
opportunity for the restoration and redevelopment of unfinished nuclear
power project sites for the purpose of creating carbonless energy parks
for the generation of electricity.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.300 and 2000 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to unfinished nuclear power projects.
If a certificate holder stops construction of a nuclear energy facility
before completion, terminates the project or otherwise resolves not to
complete construction, never introduces or stores fuel for the energy
facility on the site, and never operates the energy facility as
designed to produce energy, the certificate holder may contract,
establish interlocal agreements, or use other formal means to effect
the transfer of site restoration responsibilities, which may include
economic development activities, to any political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state composed of elected officials or subsidiary
of the certificate holder. The contracts, interlocal agreements, or
other formal means of cooperation may include, but are not limited to
provisions effecting the transfer or conveyance of interests in the
site and energy facilities from the certificate holder to other
political subdivisions of the state or subsidiary of the certificate
holder, including costs of maintenance and security, capital
improvements, and demolition and salvage of the unused energy
facilities and infrastructure.
(2) If a certificate holder transfers all or a portion of the site
to a political subdivision or subdivisions of the state composed of
elected officials or subsidiary of the certificate holder and located
in the same county as the site, the council shall amend the site
certification agreement to release those portions of the site that it
finds are no longer intended for the development of an energy facility.
Immediately upon release of all or a portion of the site pursuant
to this section, all responsibilities for maintaining the public
welfare for portions of the site transferred, including but not limited
to health and safety, are transferred to the political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state or subsidiary of the certificate holder. For
sites located on federal land, all responsibilities for maintaining the
public welfare for all of the site, including but not limited to health
and safety, must be transferred to the political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state or subsidiary of the certificate holder
irrespective of whether all or a portion of the site is released.
(3) If a certificate holder requests a modification of the site for
the purpose of creating a carbonless energy park, the council must
amend the site certification agreement to release those portions of the
site for use as a carbonless energy park. For all or a portion of
sites that have been released after January 1, 2009, the following
condition applies: The department of ecology must continue any
authorization under the site certification agreement for the use of
water at an energy park in good standing and bearing the same date as
the issuance of the site certification agreement for an amount of water
up to thirty cubic feet per second as requested by, and for use by, the
recipient of all or a portion of the site. The certificate holder
shall assign such authorization to the recipient of such site.
(4) The legislature finds that for all or a portion of sites that
have been transferred to a political subdivision or subdivisions of the
state prior to September 1, 1999, ensuring water for site restoration
including economic development, completed pursuant to this section can
best be accomplished by a transfer of existing surface water rights,
and that such a transfer is best accomplished administratively through
procedures set forth in existing statutes and rules. However, if a
transfer of water rights is not possible, the department of ecology
shall, within six months of the transfer of the site or portion thereof
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, create a trust water right
under chapter 90.42 RCW containing between ten and twenty cubic feet
per second for the benefit of the appropriate political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state. The trust water right shall be used in
fulfilling site restoration responsibilities, including economic
development. The trust water right shall be from existing valid water
rights within the basin where the site is located.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Political subdivision or subdivisions of the state" means a
city, town, county, public utility district, port district, or joint
operating agency;
(b) "Carbonless energy park" means an unfinished site for a nuclear
power project that is located east of the crest of the Cascade
mountains and is partially or wholly developed to generate electricity
with a production capacity of not less than 10 megawatts; and
(c) "Subsidiary of the certificate holder" means any project,
business unit, or affiliate of the legal entity that is a party to a
site certification agreement authorized under chapter 80.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment that is used to generate electricity in
carbonless energy parks, or to sales of, or charges made for, labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment, but only if the purchaser provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) "Carbonless energy park" is defined as provided in RCW
80.50.300.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used to generate electricity in carbonless
energy parks.
(2) "Carbonless energy park" is defined as provided in RCW
80.50.300.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---