BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a research base of educator preparation
best practices;
(2) Develop and coordinate initiatives for educator preparation in
high-demand fields as well as outreach and recruitment initiatives for
underrepresented populations;
(3) Provide program improvement technical assistance to providers
of educator preparation programs;
(4) Assure educator preparation program compliance; and
(5) Prepare and maintain a cohesive educator development policy
framework.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.200 and 2005 c 497 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board is
created, consisting of ((twenty)) twelve members to be appointed by the
governor to four-year terms and the superintendent of public
instruction. On August 1, 2009, the board shall be reduced to twelve
members by ending the terms of the appointed members with the least
amount of time remaining in their terms.
(b) ((As the four-year terms of the first appointees expire or))
Vacancies ((to)) on the board ((occur for the first time,)) shall be
filled by appointment or reappointment by the governor ((shall appoint
or reappoint the members of the board to one-year to four-year
staggered terms. Once the one-year to three-year terms expire, all
subsequent terms shall be for)) to terms of four years((, with the
terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms shall be
staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of members
representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously)).
(c) No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two
consecutive full four-year terms.
(d) The governor shall ((annually)) biennially appoint the chair of
the board ((from among the teachers and principals on the board)). No
board member may serve as chair for more than ((two)) four consecutive
years.
(2) ((Seven of the members shall be public school teachers, one
shall be a private school teacher, three shall represent higher
education educator preparation programs, four shall be school
administrators, two shall be educational staff associates, one shall be
a classified employee who assists in public school student instruction,
one shall be a parent, and one shall be a member of the public.
(3) Public school teachers appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of teaching experience in a
Washington public school;
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching
position; and
(c) Include one teacher currently teaching at the elementary school
level, one at the middle school level, one at the high school level,
and one vocationally certificated.
(4) Private school teachers appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of teaching experience in a
Washington approved private school; and
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching
position in an approved private school.
(5) Appointees from higher education educator preparation programs
must include two representatives from institutions of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and one representative from an institution
of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.07.020(4).
(6) School administrators appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of administrative experience in a
Washington public school district;
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in a school
administrator position; and
(c) Include two public school principals, one Washington approved
private school principal, and one superintendent.
(7) Educational staff associates appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of educational staff associate
experience in a Washington public school district; and
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in an
educational staff associate position.
(8) Public school classified employees appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of experience in assisting in the
instruction of students in a Washington public school; and
(b) Be currently employed in a position that requires the employee
to assist in the instruction of students.
(9) Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of at least one public school teacher. In
making the public school teacher appointments, the governor shall
select one nominee from each list provided by each caucus. The
governor shall appoint the remaining members of the board from a list
of qualified nominees submitted to the governor by organizations
representative of the constituencies of the board, from applications
from other qualified individuals, or from both nominees and applicants.
(10) All appointments to the board made by the governor shall be
subject to confirmation by the senate.
(11) The governor shall appoint the members of the initial board no
later than June 1, 2000.
(12) In appointing board members, the governor shall consider the
diversity of the population of the state.
(13))) A majority of the members of the board shall have classroom
experience. Membership on the board shall include individuals having
one or more of the following:
(a) Experience in one or more of the education roles for which
state preparation program approval is required and certificates issued;
(b) Experience providing or leading a state-approved teacher or
educator preparation program;
(c) Experience providing mentoring and coaching to education
professionals or others; and
(d) Education-related community experience.
(3) In appointing board members, the governor shall consider the
individual's commitment to quality education and the ongoing
improvement of instruction, experiences in the public schools,
involvement in developing quality teaching preparation and support
programs, and vision for the most effective yet practical system of
assuring teaching quality. The governor shall also consider the
diversity of the population of the state.
(4) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred
in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((14))) (5) The governor may remove a member of the board for
neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or
for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130
RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary of
state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the
statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.
(((15) If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint
a replacement member from the nominees as specified in subsection (9)
of this section to fill the remainder of the unexpired term. When
filling a vacancy of a member nominated by a major caucus of the
legislature, the governor shall select the new member from a list of at
least one name submitted by the same caucus that provided the list from
which the retiring member was appointed.
(16))) (6) Members of the board shall hire an executive director
and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes only.
(7) Members of the board may create informal advisory groups as
needed to inform the board's work.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.100 and 2005 c 497 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any teacher whose certificate to teach has been questioned under
RCW 28A.410.090 shall have a right to be heard by the issuing authority
before his or her certificate is revoked. ((Any teacher whose
certificate to teach has been revoked shall have a right of appeal to
the Washington professional educator standards board if notice of
appeal is given by written affidavit to the board within thirty days
after the certificate is revoked.
An appeal to the Washington professional educator standards board
within the time specified shall operate as a stay of revocation
proceedings until the next regular or special meeting of said board and
until the board's decision has been rendered.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2008 c 176 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to
establish policies and requirements for the preparation and
certification of educators that provide standards for competency in
professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a
foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help
students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and
learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW
28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional
development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator
standards board shall:
(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs
of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator
certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational
staff associate certification;
(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the
character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance
to and graduation from any educator preparation program including
teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate
preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education
of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator
certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff
associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other
states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs
and certification, including teacher certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards;
(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator
preparation programs;
(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at
least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings
and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and school specialized personnel;
(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be
issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 28A.410.010;
(7) ((Hear and determine educator certification appeals as provided
by RCW 28A.410.100;
(8))) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the
state for purposes related to the duties of the board;
(((9))) (8) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary
for the effective and efficient implementation of this chapter;
(((10))) (9) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs
and their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends
and needs, and other data deemed relevant by the board;
(((11))) (10) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of
public instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator
evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation
and suspension of licensure;
(((12))) (11) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year,
a joint report with the state board of education to the legislative
education committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public
instruction. The report shall address the progress the boards have
made and the obstacles they have encountered, individually and
collectively, in the work of achieving the goals set out in RCW
28A.150.210;
(((13))) (12) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system
for basic skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain
residency certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through
28A.410.240;
(((14))) (13) By January 2010, set performance standards and
develop, pilot, and implement a uniform and externally administered
professional-level certification assessment based on demonstrated
teaching skill. In the development of this assessment, consideration
shall be given to changes in professional certification program
components such as the culminating seminar; and
(((15))) (14) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter
42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect August 1,
2009.

--- END ---