BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.290 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.290 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) When the ((board of county commissioners)) legislative
authority of any county deems it essential to the public interest for
flood prevention purposes ((it)), the county may remove drifts, jams,
logs, debris, ((gravel,)) earth, stone or bars forming obstructions to
the stream, or other material from the beds, channels, and banks of
watercourses in any manner deemed expedient((, including the deposit
thereof)).
(b) The legislative authority of any county may remove gravel from
streams or other watercourses when the gravel removal is deemed by the
county legislative authority to be beneficial in reducing the impact of
potential flooding. Prior to removing gravel, the county legislative
authority must first contact the department of fish and wildlife for a
suggestion of when gravel removal would have the minimum impact on
aquatic life. Except in an emergency situation, the actual removal of
gravel should occur as close as possible to the dates provided by the
department of fish and wildlife.
(2) The authority to remove materials from streams or under
watercourses under this chapter includes the authority to deposit the
removed materials on bars not forming obstructions to the stream, or on
subsidiary or high water channels of ((such)) the watercourses.
(3) The legislative authority of a county may only exercise the
authority granted under this section to remove gravel from streams or
other watercourses if the area of the county from which the gravel is
to be removed is not within the jurisdiction of an active diking
district organized under chapter 85.05 RCW or an active flood control
district organized under chapter 86.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 86.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A flood control district created under this chapter may, when
it is deemed by the board of directors of the flood control district to
be beneficial in reducing the impact of potential flooding, remove
gravel from a stream or other watercourse, or portion of a stream or
other watercourse, located within the flood control district.
(2) Prior to exercising the authority granted by this section, the
board of directors of the flood control district must first contact the
department of fish and wildlife for a suggestion of when gravel removal
would have the minimum impact on aquatic life. Except in an emergency
situation, the actual removal of gravel should occur as close as
possible to the dates provided by the department of fish and wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 85.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any diking districts created under this chapter may, when it is
deemed by the board of commissioners of the diking district to be
beneficial in reducing the impact of potential flooding, remove gravel
from a stream or other watercourse, or portion of a stream or other
watercourse, located within the diking district.
(2) Prior to exercising the authority granted by this section, the
board of commissioners of the diking district must first contact the
department of fish and wildlife for a suggestion of when gravel removal
would have the minimum impact on aquatic life. Except in an emergency
situation, the actual removal of gravel should occur as close as
possible to the dates provided by the department of fish and wildlife.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.140.110 and 2005 c 155 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a public agency removes gravel, rock, sand, silt, or other
material directly, or under a public contract, from any state-owned
aquatic lands ((is removed by any public agency or under public
contract)) for channel ((or)) improvement, harbor improvement, flood
impact reduction, or flood control, the use of the material may be
authorized by the department for a public purpose on:
(a) Land owned or leased by the state or any municipality, county,
or public corporation((. However, when no public land site is
available for deposit of the material, its deposit on)); or
(b) Private land, with the landowner's permission ((is authorized
and may be designated by the department to be for a public purpose)),
if there is no public land available for deposit of the material.
(2) Prior to removal and use of material under this section, the
state agency, municipality, county, or public corporation contemplating
or arranging the removal or use shall first obtain written permission
from the department, except for flood control districts removing gravel
under section 2 of this act, diking districts removing gravel under
section 3 of this act, and county legislative authorities removing
gravel under RCW 36.32.290. These public entities are not required to
obtain permission from the department to remove or use gravel from
streams or other watercourses for flood control or flood impact
reduction purposes and are only required to notify the department of
their intent to do so.
(3) No payment of royalty shall be required for the gravel, rock,
sand, silt, or other material used for ((the)) a public purpose under
this section, but a charge will be made if the material is subsequently
sold or used for some other purpose. ((Further,))
(4) The department may authorize the public agency or private
landowner to dispose of the material removed under this section without
charge when necessary to implement disposal of material.
(5) No charge shall be required for any use of the material
obtained under the provisions of this chapter when used solely on an
authorized site.
(6) No charge shall be required for any removal or use of the
material obtained under the provisions of this chapter if the material
is used for public purposes by local governments, including flood
control districts removing gravel under section 2 of this act, diking
districts removing gravel under section 3 of this act, and county
legislative authorities removing gravel under RCW 36.32.290. Public
purposes include, but are not limited to, flood control, flood impact
reduction, and the construction and maintenance of roads, dikes, and
levies.
(7) The department may not prohibit, penalize, or condition a flood
control district operating under section 2 of this act, a diking
district operating under section 3 of this act, or a county legislative
authority operating under RCW 36.32.290 when removing gravel from
streams or other watercourses for flood control or flood impact
reduction purposes.
(8) Nothing in this section shall repeal or modify the provisions
of RCW ((77.55.100)) 77.55.021 or eliminate the necessity of obtaining
a permit for the removal from other state or federal agencies as
otherwise required by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may not prohibit, penalize, or condition a flood
control district operating under section 2 of this act, a diking
district operating under section 3 of this act, or a county legislative
authority operating under RCW 36.32.290 when removing gravel from
streams or other watercourses for flood control or flood impact
reduction purposes. However, the department shall, when requested by
a flood control district, diking district, or county, provide a range
of suggested dates when gravel removal will have the minimum impact to
aquatic life.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.55.271 and 1997 c 424 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall not require mitigation for:
(a) Sediment dredging or capping actions that result in a cleaner
aquatic environment and equal or better habitat functions and values,
if the actions are taken under a state or federal cleanup action; or
(b) Gravel removal by a flood control district operating under
section 2 of this act, a diking district operating under section 3 of
this act, or a county legislative authority operating under RCW
36.32.290.
(2) This chapter shall not be construed to require habitat
mitigation for navigation and maintenance dredging of existing channels
and berthing areas.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.55.021 and 2008 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, 77.55.051, and 77.55.041
and subsection (13) of this section, in the event that any person or
government agency desires to undertake a hydraulic project, the person
or government agency shall, before commencing work thereon, secure the
approval of the department in the form of a permit as to the adequacy
of the means proposed for the protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; and
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter.
(3)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (8), (10), and
(12) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon
receipt of a complete application to grant or deny approval of a
permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(4) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be
appealable to the department or the board as specified in RCW 77.55.301
within thirty days of the notice of decision.
(5)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(6) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. The modification becomes
effective unless appealed to the department or the board as specified
in RCW 77.55.301 within thirty days from the notice of the proposed
modification. For hydraulic projects that divert water for
agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the
hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the department to show that changed
conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life.
(7) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to changed
conditions. The request must be processed within forty-five calendar
days of receipt of the written request. A decision by the department
may be appealed to the board within thirty days of the notice of the
decision. For hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(8)(a) The department, the county legislative authority, or the
governor may declare and continue an emergency. If the county
legislative authority declares an emergency under this subsection, it
shall immediately notify the department. A declared state of emergency
by the governor under RCW 43.06.010 shall constitute a declaration
under this subsection.
(b) The department, through its authorized representatives, shall
issue immediately, upon request, oral approval for a stream crossing,
or work to remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore
streambanks, protect fish life, or protect property threatened by the
stream or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of
obtaining a written permit prior to commencing work. Conditions of the
emergency oral permit must be established by the department and reduced
to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided for in this
chapter.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(9) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(10) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(11)(a) For any property, except for property located on a marine
shoreline, that has experienced at least two consecutive years of
flooding or erosion that has damaged or has threatened to damage a
major structure, water supply system, septic system, or access to any
road or highway, the county legislative authority may determine that a
chronic danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify
the department, in writing, when it determines that a chronic danger
exists. In cases of chronic danger, the department shall issue a
permit, upon request, for work necessary to abate the chronic danger by
removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring
banks, restoring road or highway access, protecting fish resources, or
protecting property. Permit requests must be made and processed in
accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(b) Any projects proposed to address a chronic danger identified
under (a) of this subsection that satisfies the project description
identified in RCW 77.55.181(1)(a)(ii) are not subject to the provisions
of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. However,
the project is subject to the review process established in RCW
77.55.181(3) as if it were a fish habitat improvement project.
(12) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(13) This section does not apply to a flood control district
removing gravel under section 2 of this act, a diking district removing
gravel under section 3 of this act, or a county legislative authority
removing gravel under RCW 36.32.290.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may not prohibit, condition, penalize, or require
mitigation of a flood control district operating under section 2 of
this act, a diking district operating under section 3 of this act, or
a county legislative authority operating under RCW 36.32.290 when
removing gravel from streams or other watercourses for flood control or
flood impact reduction purposes.

--- END ---