BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for contributions paid under chapter 50.24 RCW in rate years
2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, and 2008 on wages paid for services performed
by an officer of a corporation under RCW 23B.08.400 who: (a) May be
exempted from coverage as specified in RCW 50.04.165(1)(b); or (b) is
not eligible for unemployment benefits, even if wages are not being
paid, as specified in RCW 50.04.310(3)(a).
(2) Credit under this section may be claimed against taxes due
under this chapter for any tax reporting period by the person claiming
credit under this section. The credit may not exceed the tax otherwise
due under this chapter for the tax reporting period. Unused credit may
be carried over and used in subsequent tax reporting periods. No
refunds are granted for credits under this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---