BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.010 and 2007 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other
entity who or which, in the pursuit of an independent business
undertakes to, or offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct,
alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, develop, move, wreck, or
demolish any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other
structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate
or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or
other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures
or works in connection therewith, the installation or repair of roofing
or siding, performing tree removal services, or cabinet or similar
installation; or, who, to do similar work upon his or her own property,
employs members of more than one trade upon a single job or project or
under a single building permit except as otherwise provided in this
chapter. "Contractor" also includes a consultant acting as a general
contractor. (("Contractor" also includes any person, firm,
corporation, or other entity covered by this subsection, whether or not
registered as required under this chapter or who are otherwise required
to be registered or licensed by law, who offer to sell their property
without occupying or using the structures, projects, developments, or
improvements for more than one year from the date the structure,
project, development, or improvement was substantially completed or
abandoned.))
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "Filing" means delivery of a document that is required to be
filed with an agency to a place designated by the agency.
(5) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than one building trade or craft
upon a single job or project or under a single building permit. A
general contractor also includes one who superintends, or consults on,
in whole or in part, work falling within the definition of a
contractor.
(6) "Notice of infraction" means a form used by the department to
notify contractors that an infraction under this chapter has been filed
against them.
(7) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(8) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(9) "Registration suspension" means either an automatic suspension
as provided in this chapter, or a written notice from the department
that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter and that the
contractor's registration has been suspended for a specified time, or
until the contractor shows evidence of compliance with this chapter.
(10) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons
owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(11) "Service," except as otherwise provided in RCW 18.27.225 and
18.27.370, means posting in the United States mail, properly addressed,
postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or personal service.
Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the United States mail to
the last known address provided to the department.
(12) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do
not fall within the definition of "general contractor". A specialty
contractor may only subcontract work that is incidental to the
specialty contractor's work.
(13) "Substantial completion" means the same as "substantial
completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.
(14) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, corporation,
or other entity doing work as a contractor without being registered in
compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes
contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or suspended.
"Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who has
maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account required
by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty or fewer
days.
(15) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment or final tax
warrant that has not been satisfied either through payment, court
approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW
19.72.070.
(16) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city,
town, or county of a contractor registration card that is current on
its face, checking the department's contractor registration database,
or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.090 and 2007 c 436 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) An authorized representative of the United States government,
the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county,
township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal
or political corporation or subdivision of this state;
(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of
their office;
(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the
utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance,
or development work incidental to their own business;
(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the
discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing,
abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any
surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an
owner or lessee;
(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of
merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a
structure under the common law of fixtures;
(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of
personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a
mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under
chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on
within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the
legal jurisdiction of the federal government;
(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment
without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of,
the work of the contractor;
(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or
more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and
materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such
work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or
inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only
a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same
or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is
made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the
purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises
or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to
the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is
qualified to engage in the business of contractor;
(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction
and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted
irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying,
agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or
to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire
prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by
a registered contractor;
(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered
contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of
the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered
contractors((. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not
apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the
purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for
less than twelve months));
(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether
occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her
personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not ((but this
exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of
a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling,
demolishing, or leasing the property));
(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work
in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own
employees to do such work;
(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting
solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified
under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under
the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political
subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the
boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is
operating within the scope of his or her certification;
(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as
an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole
compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole
compensation;
(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as
required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to
perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;
(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who
subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively
registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the
installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that
were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or
manufacturer;
(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license
under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified journeyman
electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, or an
electrical trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to
perform plumbing work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately
appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or
other small household utilization equipment that requires limited
electric power and limited waste and/or water connections. An
electrical trainee must be supervised by a certified electrician while
performing plumbing work.

--- END ---