BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185.070 and 2005 c 518 s 1802 and 2005 c 219 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which funds from the housing trust
fund or other legislative appropriations are available for use by the
department for the housing assistance program, the department shall
announce to all known interested parties, and through major media
throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days' duration. This announcement shall be made as often as the
director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The
department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the
department. Administrative costs paid out of the housing trust fund
may not exceed five percent of annual revenues available for
distribution to housing trust fund projects. In awarding funds under
this chapter, the department shall provide for a geographic
distribution on a statewide basis.
(2) The department shall give first priority to applications for
projects and activities which utilize existing privately owned housing
stock including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit
public development authorities and public housing authorities as
created in chapter 35.82 RCW. As used in this subsection, privately
owned housing stock includes housing that is acquired by a federal
agency through a default on the mortgage by the private owner. Such
projects and activities shall be evaluated under subsection (3) of this
section. Second priority shall be given to activities and projects
which utilize existing publicly owned housing stock. All projects and
activities shall be evaluated by some or all of the criteria under
subsection (3) of this section, and similar projects and activities
shall be evaluated under the same criteria.
(3) The department shall give preference for applications based on
some or all of the criteria under this subsection, and similar projects
and activities shall be evaluated under the same criteria:
(a) The degree of leveraging of other funds that will occur;
(b) The degree of commitment from programs to provide necessary
habilitation and support services for projects focusing on special
needs populations;
(c) Recipient contributions to total project costs, including
allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and
trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;
(d) Local government project contributions in the form of
infrastructure improvements, and others;
(e) Projects that encourage ownership, management, and other
project-related responsibility opportunities;
(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the
original target group or income level for a period of at least twenty-five years;
(g) The applicant has the demonstrated ability, stability and
resources to implement the project;
(h) Projects which demonstrate serving the greatest need;
(i) Projects that provide housing for persons and families with the
lowest incomes;
(j) Projects serving special needs populations which are under
statutory mandate to develop community housing;
(k) Project location and access to employment centers in the region
or area;
(l) Projects that provide employment and training opportunities for
disadvantaged youth under a youthbuild or youthbuild-type program as
defined in RCW 50.72.020; ((and))
(m) Project location and access to available public transportation
services; and
(n) A life-cycle cost analysis.
(4) The department shall only approve applications for projects for
mentally ill persons that are consistent with a regional support
network six-year capital and operating plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
On or before December 1st of each year, the department shall
prepare a report to the legislature and the office of financial
management compiling the reports submitted under section 4 of this act.
For funds collected under RCW 43.185.050 and allocated to entities
other than counties, this report must also include, but is not limited
to:
(1) A description of the process used to allocate funds;
(2) A list of projects receiving funds including, but not limited
to, housing vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(3) The criteria used to allocate funds.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.180.080 and 1997 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to other powers and duties specified in this
chapter, the commission may:
(((1))) (a) Establish in resolutions relating to any issuance of
bonds, or in any financing documents relating to such issuance, such
standards and requirements applicable to the purchase of mortgages and
mortgage loans or the making of loans to mortgage lenders as the
commission deems necessary or desirable, including but not limited to:
(((a))) (i) The time within which mortgage lenders must make
commitments and disbursements for mortgages or mortgage loans;
(((b))) (ii) The location and other characteristics of single-family housing or multifamily housing to be financed by mortgages and
mortgage loans;
(((c))) (iii) The terms and conditions of mortgages and mortgage
loans to be acquired;
(((d))) (iv) The amounts and types of insurance coverage required
on mortgages, mortgage loans, and bonds;
(((e))) (v) The representations and warranties of mortgage lenders
confirming compliance with such standards and requirements;
(((f))) (vi) Restrictions as to interest rate and other terms of
mortgages or mortgage loans or the return realized therefrom by
mortgage lenders;
(((g))) (vii) The type and amount of collateral security to be
provided to assure repayment of any loans from the commission and to
assure repayment of bonds; and
(((h))) (viii) Any other matters related to the purchase of
mortgages or mortgage loans or the making of loans to lending
institutions as shall be deemed relevant by the commission;
(((2))) (b) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(((3))) (c) Make and execute contracts and all other instruments
necessary or convenient for the exercise of its purposes or powers,
including but not limited to contracts or agreements for the
origination, servicing, and administration of mortgages or mortgage
loans, and the borrowing of money;
(((4))) (d) Procure such insurance, including but not limited to
insurance:
(((a))) (i) Against any loss in connection with its property and
other assets, including but not limited to mortgages or mortgage loans,
in such amounts and from such insurers as the commission deems
desirable((,)); and
(((b))) (ii) To indemnify members of the commission for acts done
in the course of their duties;
(((5))) (e) Provide for the investment of any funds, including
funds held in reserve, not required for immediate disbursement, and
provide for the selection of investments;
(((6))) (f) Fix, revise, and collect fees and charges in connection
with the investigation and financing of housing or in connection with
assignments, contracts, purchases of mortgages or mortgage loans, or
any other actions permitted under this chapter or by the commission;
and receive grants and contributions;
(((7))) (g) Make such expenditures as are appropriate for paying
the administrative costs of the commission and for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter. These expenditures may be made only from
funds consisting of the commission's receipts from fees and charges,
grants and contributions, the proceeds of bonds issued by the
commission, and other revenues; these expenditures shall not be made
from funds of the state of Washington;
(((8))) (h) Establish such special funds, and controls on deposits
to and disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the
implementation of this chapter;
(((9))) (i) Conduct such investigations and feasibility studies as
it deems appropriate;
(((10))) (j) Proceed with foreclosure actions or accept deeds in
lieu of foreclosure together with the assignments of leases and rentals
incidental thereto. Any properties acquired by the commission through
such actions shall be sold as soon as practicable through persons
licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW or at public auction, or by transfer
to a public agency. In preparation for the disposition of the
properties, the commission may own, lease, clear, construct,
reconstruct, rehabilitate, repair, maintain, manage, operate, assign,
or encumber the properties;
(((11))) (k) Take assignments of leases and rentals;
(((12))) (l) Subject to any provisions of the commission's
contracts with the holders of obligations of the commission, consent to
any modification with respect to rate of interest, time, and payment of
any installment of principal or interest or any other term of any
contract, mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, contract,
or agreement of any kind;
(((13))) (m) Subject to provisions of the commission's contracts
with the holders of bonds, permit the reduction of rental or carrying
charges to persons unable to pay the regular rent or schedule of
charges if, by reason of other income of the commission or by reason of
payment by any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United
States or of this state, the reduction can be made without jeopardizing
the economic stability of the housing being financed;
(((14))) (n) Sell, at public or private sale, with or without
public bidding, any mortgage, mortgage loan, or other instrument or
asset held by the commission;
(((15))) (o) Employ, contract with, or engage engineers,
architects, attorneys, financial advisors, bond underwriters, mortgage
lenders, mortgage administrators, housing construction or financing
experts, other technical or professional assistants, and such other
personnel as are necessary. The commission may delegate to the
appropriate persons the power to execute legal instruments on its
behalf;
(((16))) (p) Receive contributions or grants from any source unless
otherwise prohibited;
(((17))) (q) Impose covenants running with the land in order to
satisfy and enforce the requirements of applicable state and federal
law and commission policy with respect to housing or other facilities
financed by the commission or assisted by federal, state, or local
programs administered by the commission, by executing and recording
regulatory agreements or other covenants between the commission and the
person or entity to be bound. These regulatory agreements and
covenants shall run with the land and be enforceable by the commission
or its successors or assigns against the person or entity making the
regulatory agreement or covenants or its successors or assigns, even
though there may be no privity of estate or privity of contract between
the commission or its successors or assigns and the person or entity
against whom enforcement is sought. The term of any such covenant
shall be set forth in the recorded agreement containing the covenant.
This subsection shall apply to regulatory agreements and covenants
previously entered into by the commission as well as regulatory
agreements and covenants entered into by the commission on or after
July 27, 1997;
(((18))) (r) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent
with the purposes of this chapter; or
(((19))) (s) Exercise any other power reasonably required to
implement the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The commission shall include a life-cycle cost analysis in its
process for evaluating proposals for awarding funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The auditor shall distribute and report on funds collected under
RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, and 36.22.1791 in the following manner:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, the county auditor shall include a
life-cycle cost analysis in the process for evaluating proposals for
awarding funds.
(2) On or before September 30th of each year, the county auditor
shall submit a report describing the distribution of all unreported
funds collected in previous fiscal years, beginning July 1, 2002, to
the department of community, trade, and economic development. The
report must include, but is not limited to:
(a) A description of the process used to allocate funds;
(b) The criteria used to allocate funds;
(c) A list of projects receiving funds including, but not limited
to, housing vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(d) The amount awarded to each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---