BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.334.010 and 2005 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created ((a department of state government)) an office
to be known as the ((department)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation within the state parks and recreation commission. The
((department)) office is vested with all powers and duties transferred
to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be
authorized by law.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) (("Department")) "Commission" means the state parks and
recreation commission.
(b) "Director" means the director of the state parks and recreation
commission.
(c) "Office" means the ((department)) office of archaeology and
historic preservation.
(((b) "Director")) (d) "Preservation officer" means the ((director
of the department of archaeology and historic preservation)) state
historic preservation officer as provided for in RCW 43.334.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.334.020 and 2005 c 333 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The executive head and appointing authority of the department is
the director.)) The ((director)) governor shall ((serve as)) appoint
the state historic preservation officer((, and)) subject to the
approval of the commission. The preservation officer shall report
directly to the commission. The preservation officer shall have a
background in program administration, an active involvement in historic
preservation, and a knowledge of the national, state, and local
preservation programs as they affect the state of Washington. ((The
director shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, and serves at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall
be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not
in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the
next meeting of the senate.))

Sec. 3 RCW 43.334.060 and 2005 c 333 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The preservation officer shall supervise the operations of the
office of archaeology and historic preservation.
(2) Any power or duty vested in or transferred to the ((director))
preservation officer by law or executive order may be delegated by the
((director to the deputy director or)) preservation officer to any
other assistant or subordinate; but the ((director)) preservation
officer is responsible for the official acts of the officers and
employees of the ((department)) office.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.334.070 and 2005 c 333 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director)) preservation officer may appoint advisory
committees or councils as required by any federal legislation as a
condition to the receipt of federal funds by the ((department)) office.
The ((director)) preservation officer may also appoint statewide
committees or councils on those subject matters as are or come within
the ((department's)) office's responsibilities. The statewide
committees and councils shall have representation from both major
political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation.
The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal
law or as the ((director)) preservation officer may determine. The
members of the committees or councils shall hold office as follows:
One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two years; and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original terms,
subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the case of
a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder
of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may
serve more than two consecutive terms.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.334.075 and 2008 c 275 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((director)) preservation officer shall appoint a state
physical anthropologist. At a minimum, the state physical
anthropologist must have a doctorate in either archaeology or
anthropology and have experience in forensic osteology or other
relevant aspects of physical anthropology and must have at least one
year of experience in laboratory reconstruction and analysis. A
medical degree with archaeological experience in addition to the
experience required may substitute for a doctorate in archaeology or
anthropology.
(2) The state physical anthropologist has the primary
responsibility of investigating, preserving, and, when necessary,
removing and reinterring discoveries of nonforensic skeletal human
remains. The state physical anthropologist is available to any local
governments or any federally recognized tribal government within the
boundaries of Washington to assist in determining whether discovered
skeletal human remains are forensic or nonforensic.
(3) The ((director)) preservation officer shall hire staff as
necessary to support the state physical anthropologist to meet the
objectives of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "forensic remains" are those
that come under the jurisdiction of the coroner pursuant to RCW
68.50.010.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.334.077 and 2008 c 275 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The skeletal human remains assistance account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All appropriations provided by the
legislature for this purpose as well as any reimbursement for services
provided pursuant to chapter 275, Laws of 2008 must be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently
discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such
remains when necessary. Only the ((director or the director's))
preservation officer or preservation officer's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.334.080 and 2005 c 333 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
In furtherance of the policy of the state to cooperate with the
federal government in all of the programs under the jurisdiction of the
((department)) office, rules as may become necessary to entitle the
state to participate in federal funds may be adopted, unless expressly
prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization carried out under the
terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to state receipt of federal funds. Any section or
provision of law dealing with the ((department)) office that may be
susceptible to more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor
of the construction most likely to comply with federal laws entitling
this state to receive federal funds for the various programs of the
((department)) office. If any law dealing with the ((department))
office is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a
prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state,
or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part is
declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

Sec. 8 RCW 27.34.020 and 2007 c 333 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Advisory council" means the advisory council on historic
preservation.
(2) (("Department")) "Office" means the ((department)) office of
archaeology and historic preservation.
(3) "Director" means the director of the ((department of
archaeology and historic preservation)) state parks and recreation
commission.
(4) "Federal act" means the national historic preservation act of
1966 (Public Law 89-655; 80 Stat. 915).
(5) "Heritage barn" means any large agricultural outbuilding used
to house animals, crops, or farm equipment, that is over fifty years
old and has been determined by the ((department)) office to: (a) Be
eligible for listing on the Washington heritage register or the
national register of historic places; or (b) have been listed on a
local historic register and approved by the advisory council. In
addition to barns, "heritage barn" includes agricultural resources such
as milk houses, sheds, silos, or other outbuildings, that are
historically associated with the working life of the farm or ranch, if
these outbuildings are on the same property as a heritage barn.
(6) (("Heritage council" means the Washington state heritage
council.
(7))) "Historic preservation" includes the protection,
rehabilitation, restoration, identification, scientific excavation, and
reconstruction of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects
significant in American and Washington state history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture.
(((8))) (7) "Preservation officer" means the state historic
preservation officer as provided for in RCW 43.334.020.
(((9))) (8) "Project" means programs leading to the preservation
for public benefit of historical properties, whether by state and local
governments or other public bodies, or private organizations or
individuals, including the acquisition of title or interests in, and
the development of, any district, site, building, structure, or object
that is significant in American and Washington state history,
architecture, archaeology, or culture, and property used in connection
therewith, or for its development.
(((10))) (9) "State historical agencies" means the state historical
societies and the ((department)) office.
(((11))) (10) "State historical societies" means the Washington
state historical society and the eastern Washington state historical
society.
(((12))) (11) "Cultural resource management plan" means a
comprehensive plan which identifies and organizes information on the
state of Washington's historic, archaeological, and architectural
resources into a set of management criteria, and which is to be used
for producing reliable decisions, recommendations, and advice relative
to the identification, evaluation, and protection of these resources.

Sec. 9 RCW 27.34.220 and 1997 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director or the director's)) preservation officer or the
preservation officer's designee is authorized:
(1) To promulgate and maintain the Washington heritage register of
districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in
American or Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, and
culture, and to prepare comprehensive statewide historic surveys and
plans and research and evaluation of surveyed resources for the
preparation of nominations to the Washington heritage register and the
national register of historic places, in accordance with criteria
approved by the advisory council established under RCW 27.34.250.
Nominations to the national register of historic places shall comply
with any standards and regulations promulgated by the United States
secretary of the interior for the preservation, acquisition, and
development of such properties. Nominations to the Washington heritage
register shall comply with rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) To establish a program of matching grants-in-aid to public
agencies, public or private organizations, or individuals for projects
having as their purpose the preservation for public benefit of
properties that are significant in American or Washington state
history, architecture, archaeology, and culture.
(3) To promote historic preservation efforts throughout the state,
including private efforts and those of city, county, and state
agencies.
(4) To enhance the effectiveness of the state preservation program
through the initiation of legislation, the use of varied funding
sources, the creation of special purpose programs, and contact with
state, county, and city officials, civic groups, and professionals.
(5) To spend funds, subject to legislative appropriation and the
availability of funds, where necessary to assist the Indian tribes of
Washington state in removing prehistoric human remains for scientific
examination and reburial, if the human remains have been unearthed
inadvertently or through vandalism and if no other public agency is
legally responsible for their preservation.
(6) To consult with the governor and the legislature on issues
relating to the conservation of the man-made environment and their
impact on the well-being of the state and its citizens.
(7) To charge fees for professional and clerical services provided
by the office.
(8) To adopt such rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as
are necessary to carry out RCW 27.34.200 through 27.34.280.

Sec. 10 RCW 27.34.230 and 2005 c 333 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the state parks and recreation commission or the
director's designee shall:
(1) Receive, administer, and disburse such gifts, grants, and
endowments from private sources as may be made in trust or otherwise
for the purposes of RCW 27.34.200 ((through)) and 27.34.220 or the
federal act; and
(2) Develop and implement a cultural resource management plan.

Sec. 11 RCW 27.34.240 and 1986 c 266 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The amounts made available for grants to the public agencies,
public or private organizations, or individuals for projects for each
fiscal year shall be apportioned among program applicants by the
director or the director's designee, with the advice of the
preservation officer, in accordance with needs as contained in
statewide archaeology and historic preservation plans developed by the
((department)) office.

Sec. 12 RCW 27.34.270 and 1997 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The advisory council shall:
(1) Advise the governor and the ((department)) office on matters
relating to historic preservation; recommend measures to coordinate
activities of state and local agencies, private institutions, and
individuals relating to historic preservation; and advise on the
dissemination of information pertaining to such activities; and
(2) Review and recommend nominations for the national register of
historic places to the preservation officer ((and the director)).

Sec. 13 RCW 27.34.280 and 1986 c 266 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department)) office shall provide administrative and
financial services to the advisory council on historic preservation
((and to the Washington state heritage council)).

Sec. 14 RCW 27.34.330 and 2006 c 371 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state historical society shall establish a
competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and
evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific projects may
be made to the society by local governments, public development
authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and other
entities, as determined by the society. The society, with the advice
of leaders in the heritage field, including but not limited to
representatives from the office of the secretary of state, the eastern
Washington state historical society, and the ((department)) office of
archaeology and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a
prioritized list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the
legislature in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list
shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended
state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the
project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. The
prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings
and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three percent
of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total
project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired
solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The
((department)) office shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a
specific list of projects. In contracts for grants authorized under
this section, the society shall include provisions requiring that
capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

Sec. 15 RCW 27.34.415 and 2008 c 275 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((department)) office of archaeology and historic preservation
shall develop and maintain a centralized database and geographic
information systems spatial layer of all known cemeteries and known
sites of burials of human remains in Washington state. The information
in the database is subject to public disclosure, except as provided in
RCW 42.56.300; exempt information is available by confidentiality
agreement to federal, state, and local agencies for purposes of
environmental review, and to tribes in order to participate in
environmental review, protect their ancestors, and perpetuate their
cultures.
Information provided to state and local agencies under this section
is subject to public disclosure, except as provided in RCW 42.56.300.

Sec. 16 RCW 27.44.055 and 2008 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who discovers skeletal human remains must notify the
coroner and local law enforcement in the most expeditious manner
possible. Any person knowing of the existence of human remains and not
having good reason to believe that the coroner and local law
enforcement has notice thereof and who fails to give notice thereof is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Any person engaged in ground disturbing activity and who
encounters or discovers skeletal human remains in or on the ground
shall:
(a) Immediately cease any activity which may cause further
disturbance;
(b) Make a reasonable effort to protect the area from further
disturbance;
(c) Report the presence and location of the remains to the coroner
and local law enforcement in the most expeditious manner possible; and
(d) Be held harmless from criminal and civil liability arising
under the provisions of this section provided the following criteria
are met:
(i) The finding of the remains was based on inadvertent discovery;
(ii) The requirements of the subsection are otherwise met; and
(iii) The person is otherwise in compliance with applicable law.
(3) The coroner must make a determination whether the skeletal
human remains are forensic or nonforensic within five business days of
receiving notification of a finding of such remains provided that there
is sufficient evidence to make such a determination within that time
period. The coroner will retain jurisdiction over forensic remains.
(a) Upon determination that the remains are nonforensic, the
coroner must notify the ((department)) office of archaeology and
historic preservation within two business days. The ((department))
office will have jurisdiction over such remains until provenance of the
remains is established. A determination that remains are nonforensic
does not create a presumption of removal or nonremoval.
(b) Upon receiving notice from a coroner of a finding of
nonforensic skeletal human remains, the ((department)) office must
notify the appropriate local cemeteries, and all affected Indian tribes
via certified mail to the head of the appropriate tribal government,
and contact the appropriate tribal cultural resources staff within two
business days of the finding. The determination of what are
appropriate local cemeteries to be notified is at the discretion of the
((department)) office. A notification to tribes of a finding of
nonforensic skeletal human remains does not create a presumption that
the remains are Indian.
(c) The state physical anthropologist must make an initial
determination of whether nonforensic skeletal human remains are Indian
or non-Indian to the extent possible based on the remains within two
business days of notification of a finding of such nonforensic remains.
If the remains are determined to be Indian, the ((department)) office
must notify all affected Indian tribes via certified mail to the head
of the appropriate tribal government within two business days and
contact the appropriate tribal cultural resources staff.
(d) The affected tribes have five business days to respond via
telephone or writing to the ((department)) office as to their interest
in the remains.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Affected tribes" are:
(i) Those federally recognized tribes with usual and accustomed
areas in the jurisdiction where the remains were found;
(ii) Those federally recognized tribes that submit to the
((department)) office maps that reflect the tribe's geographical area
of cultural affiliation; and
(iii) Other tribes with historical and cultural affiliation in the
jurisdiction where the remains were found.
(b) "Forensic remains" are those that come under the jurisdiction
of the coroner pursuant to RCW 68.50.010.
(c) "Inadvertent discovery" has the same meaning as used in RCW
27.44.040.
(5) Nothing in this section constitutes, advocates, or otherwise
grants, confers, or implies federal or state recognition of those
tribes that are not federally recognized pursuant to 25 C.F.R. part 83,
procedures for establishing that an American Indian group exists as an
Indian tribe.

Sec. 17 RCW 41.06.095 and 2005 c 333 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter
does not apply in the ((department)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation to the ((director, the director's personal secretary, the
deputy director, all division directors and assistant directors,))
preservation officer and one confidential secretary ((for each of these
officers)).

Sec. 18 RCW 43.17.010 and 2007 c 341 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the
department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions,
(16) ((the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17)))
the department of early learning, and (((18))) (17) the Puget Sound
partnership, which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement,
and administration of such laws, and invested with such powers and
required to perform such duties, as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.17.020 and 2007 c 341 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, (16) ((the director of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17))) the
director of early learning, and (((18))) (17) the executive director of
the Puget Sound partnership.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 20 RCW 68.50.645 and 2008 c 275 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the duty of every person who knows of the existence and
location of skeletal human remains to notify the coroner and local law
enforcement in the most expeditious manner possible, unless such person
has good reason to believe that such notice has already been given.
Any person knowing of the existence of skeletal human remains and not
having good reason to believe that the coroner and local law
enforcement has notice thereof and who fails to give notice to the
coroner and local law enforcement, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Any person engaged in ground disturbing activity and who
encounters or discovers skeletal human remains in or on the ground
shall:
(a) Immediately cease any activity which may cause further
disturbance;
(b) Make a reasonable effort to protect the area from further
disturbance;
(c) Report the presence and location of the remains to the coroner
and local law enforcement in the most expeditious manner possible; and
(d) Be held harmless from criminal and civil liability arising
under the provisions of this section provided the following criteria
are met:
(i) The finding of the remains was based on inadvertent discovery;
(ii) The requirements of the subsection are otherwise met; and
(iii) The person is otherwise in compliance with applicable law.
(3) The coroner must make a determination of whether the skeletal
human remains are forensic or nonforensic within five business days of
receiving notification of a finding of such human remains provided that
there is sufficient evidence to make such a determination within that
time period. The coroner will retain jurisdiction over forensic
remains.
(a) Upon determination that the remains are nonforensic, the
coroner must notify the ((department)) office of archaeology and
historic preservation within two business days. The ((department))
office will have jurisdiction over such remains until provenance of the
remains is established. A determination that remains are nonforensic
does not create a presumption of removal or nonremoval.
(b) Upon receiving notice from a coroner of a finding of
nonforensic skeletal human remains, the ((department)) office must
notify the appropriate local cemeteries, and all affected Indian tribes
via certified mail to the head of the appropriate tribal government,
and contact the appropriate tribal cultural resources staff within two
business days of the finding. The determination of what are
appropriate local cemeteries to be notified is at the discretion of the
((department)) office. A notification to tribes of a finding of such
nonforensic skeletal human remains does not create a presumption that
the remains are Indian.
(c) The state physical anthropologist must make an initial
determination of whether nonforensic skeletal human remains are Indian
or non-Indian to the extent possible based on the remains within two
business days of notification of a finding of nonforensic remains. If
the remains are determined to be Indian, the ((department)) office must
notify all affected Indian tribes via certified mail to the head of the
appropriate tribal government within two business days and contact the
appropriate tribal cultural resources staff.
(d) The affected tribes have five business days to respond via
telephone or writing to the ((department)) office as to their interest
in the remains.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Affected tribes" are:
(i) Those federally recognized tribes with usual and accustomed
areas in the jurisdiction where the remains were found;
(ii) Those federally recognized tribes that submit to the
((department)) office maps that reflect the tribe's geographical area
of cultural affiliation; and
(iii) Other tribes with historical and cultural affiliation in the
jurisdiction where the remains were found.
(b) "Forensic remains" are those that come under the jurisdiction
of the coroner pursuant to RCW 68.50.010.
(c) "Inadvertent discovery" has the same meaning as used in RCW
27.44.040.
(5) Nothing in this section constitutes, advocates, or otherwise
grants, confers, or implies federal or state recognition of those
tribes that are not federally recognized pursuant to 25 C.F.R. part 83,
procedures for establishing that an American Indian group exists as an
Indian tribe.

Sec. 21 RCW 68.60.030 and 2005 c 365 s 150 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The ((archaeological and historical division of the
department of community, trade, and economic development)) office of
archaeology and historic preservation may grant by nontransferable
certificate authority to maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery
upon application made by a preservation organization which has been
incorporated for the purpose of restoring, maintaining, and protecting
an abandoned cemetery. Such authority shall be limited to the care,
maintenance, restoration, protection, and historical preservation of
the abandoned cemetery, and shall not include authority to make
burials. In order to activate a historical cemetery for burials, an
applicant must apply for a certificate of authority to operate a
cemetery from the state cemetery board.
(b) Those preservation and maintenance corporations that are
granted authority to maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery shall
be entitled to hold and possess burial records, maps, and other
historical documents as may exist. Maintenance and preservation
corporations that are granted authority to maintain and protect an
abandoned cemetery shall not be liable to those claiming burial rights,
ancestral ownership, or to any other person or organization alleging to
have control by any form of conveyance not previously recorded at the
county auditor's office within the county in which the abandoned
cemetery exists. Such organizations shall not be liable for any
reasonable alterations made during restoration work on memorials,
roadways, walkways, features, plantings, or any other detail of the
abandoned cemetery.
(c) Should the maintenance and preservation corporation be
dissolved, the ((archaeological and historical division of the
department of community, trade, and economic development)) office of
archaeology and historic preservation shall revoke the certificate of
authority.
(d) Maintenance and preservation corporations that are granted
authority to maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery may establish
care funds.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the
((department of community, trade, and economic development)) office of
archaeology and historic preservation may, in its sole discretion,
authorize any Washington nonprofit corporation that is not expressly
incorporated for the purpose of restoring, maintaining, and protecting
an abandoned cemetery, to restore, maintain, and protect one or more
abandoned cemeteries. The authorization may include the right of
access to any burial records, maps, and other historical documents, but
shall not include the right to be the permanent custodian of original
records, maps, or documents. This authorization shall be granted by a
nontransferable certificate of authority. Any nonprofit corporation
authorized and acting under this subsection is immune from liability to
the same extent as if it were a preservation organization holding a
certificate of authority under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The ((department of community, trade, and economic
development)) office of archaeology and historic preservation shall
establish standards and guidelines for granting certificates of
authority under subsections (1) and (2) of this section to assure that
any restoration, maintenance, and protection activities authorized
under this subsection are conducted and supervised in an appropriate
manner.

Sec. 22 RCW 68.60.055 and 2008 c 275 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who discovers skeletal human remains shall notify
the coroner and local law enforcement in the most expeditious manner
possible. Any person knowing of the existence of skeletal human
remains and not having good reason to believe that the coroner and
local law enforcement has notice thereof and who fails to give notice
thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Any person engaged in ground disturbing activity and who
encounters or discovers skeletal human remains in or on the ground
shall:
(a) Immediately cease any activity which may cause further
disturbance;
(b) Make a reasonable effort to protect the area from further
disturbance;
(c) Report the presence and location of the remains to the coroner
and local law enforcement in the most expeditious manner possible; and
(d) Be held harmless from criminal and civil liability arising
under the provisions of this section provided the following criteria
are met:
(i) The finding of the remains was based on inadvertent discovery;
(ii) The requirements of the subsection are otherwise met; and
(iii) The person is otherwise in compliance with applicable law.
(3) The coroner must make a determination whether the skeletal
human remains are forensic or nonforensic within five business days of
receiving notification of a finding of such remains provided that there
is sufficient evidence to make such a determination within that time
period. The coroner will retain jurisdiction over forensic remains.
(a) Upon determination that the remains are nonforensic, the
coroner must notify the ((department)) office of archaeology and
historic preservation within two business days. The ((department))
office will have jurisdiction over such remains until provenance of the
remains is established. A determination that remains are nonforensic
does not create a presumption of removal or nonremoval.
(b) Upon receiving notice from a coroner of a finding of
nonforensic skeletal human remains, the ((department)) office must
notify the appropriate local cemeteries, and all affected Indian tribes
via certified mail to the head of the appropriate tribal government,
and contact the appropriate tribal cultural resources staff within two
business days of the finding. The determination of what are
appropriate local cemeteries to be notified is at the discretion of the
((department)) office. A notification to tribes of a finding of such
nonforensic skeletal human remains does not create a presumption that
the remains are Indian.
(c) The state physical anthropologist must make an initial
determination of whether nonforensic skeletal human remains are Indian
or non-Indian to the extent possible based on the remains within two
business days of notification of a finding of such nonforensic remains.
If the remains are determined to be Indian, the ((department)) office
must notify all affected Indian tribes via certified mail to the head
of the appropriate tribal government within two business days and
contact the appropriate tribal cultural resources staff.
(d) The affected tribes have five business days to respond via
telephone or writing to the ((department)) office as to their interest
in the remains.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Affected tribes" are:
(i) Those federally recognized tribes with usual and accustomed
areas in the jurisdiction where the remains were found;
(ii) Those federally recognized tribes that submit to the
((department)) office maps that reflect the tribe's geographical area
of cultural affiliation; and
(iii) Other tribes with historical and cultural affiliation in the
jurisdiction where the remains were found.
(b) "Forensic remains" are those that come under the jurisdiction
of the coroner pursuant to RCW 68.50.010.
(c) "Inadvertent discovery" has the same meaning as used in RCW
27.44.040.
(5) Nothing in this section constitutes, advocates, or otherwise
grants, confers, or implies federal or state recognition of those
tribes that are not federally recognized pursuant to 25 C.F.R. part 83,
procedures for establishing that an American Indian group exists as an
Indian tribe.

Sec. 23 RCW 90.48.366 and 2007 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, in consultation with the departments of fish and
wildlife and natural resources, and the parks and recreation
commission, shall adopt rules establishing a compensation schedule for
the discharge of oil in violation of this chapter and chapter 90.56
RCW. The amount of compensation assessed under this schedule shall be
no less than one dollar per gallon of oil spilled and no greater than
one hundred dollars per gallon of oil spilled. The compensation
schedule shall reflect adequate compensation for unquantifiable damages
or for damages not quantifiable at reasonable cost for any adverse
environmental, recreational, aesthetic, or other effects caused by the
spill and shall take into account:
(1) Characteristics of any oil spilled, such as toxicity,
dispersibility, solubility, and persistence, that may affect the
severity of the effects on the receiving environment, living organisms,
and recreational and aesthetic resources;
(2) The sensitivity of the affected area as determined by such
factors as: (a) The location of the spill; (b) habitat and living
resource sensitivity; (c) seasonal distribution or sensitivity of
living resources; (d) areas of recreational use or aesthetic
importance; (e) the proximity of the spill to important habitats for
birds, aquatic mammals, fish, or to species listed as threatened or
endangered under state or federal law; (f) significant archaeological
resources as determined by the ((department)) office of archaeology and
historic preservation; and (g) other areas of special ecological or
recreational importance, as determined by the department; and
(3) Actions taken by the party who spilled oil or any party liable
for the spill that: (a) Demonstrate a recognition and affirmative
acceptance of responsibility for the spill, such as the immediate
removal of oil and the amount of oil removed from the environment; or
(b) enhance or impede the detection of the spill, the determination of
the quantity of oil spilled, or the extent of damage, including the
unauthorized removal of evidence such as injured fish or wildlife.

Sec. 24 RCW 90.48.368 and 2007 c 347 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules establishing a formal process
for preassessment screening of damages resulting from spills to the
waters of the state causing the death of, or injury to, fish, animals,
vegetation, or other resources of the state. The rules shall specify
the conditions under which the department shall convene a preassessment
screening committee. The preassessment screening process shall occur
concurrently with reconnaissance activities. The committee shall use
information obtained from reconnaissance activities as well as any
other relevant resource and resource use information. For each
incident, the committee shall determine whether a damage assessment
investigation should be conducted, or, whether the compensation
schedule authorized under RCW 90.48.366 and 90.48.367 should be used to
assess damages. The committee may accept restoration or enhancement
projects or studies proposed by the liable parties in lieu of some or
all of: (a) The compensation schedule authorized under RCW 90.48.366
and 90.48.367; or (b) the claims from damage assessment studies
authorized under RCW 90.48.142.
(2) A preassessment screening committee may consist of
representatives of the departments of ecology, ((archaeology and
historic preservation,)) fish and wildlife, health, and natural
resources, the office of archaeology and historic preservation and the
parks and recreation commission, as well as other federal, state, and
local agencies, and tribal and local governments whose presence would
enhance the reconnaissance or damage assessment aspects of spill
response. The department shall chair the committee and determine which
representatives will be needed on a spill-by-spill basis.
(3) The committee shall consider the following factors when
determining whether a damage assessment study authorized under RCW
90.48.367 should be conducted: (a) Whether evidence from
reconnaissance investigations suggests that injury has occurred or is
likely to occur to publicly owned resources; (b) the potential loss in
services provided by resources injured or likely to be injured and the
expected value of the potential loss; (c) whether a restoration project
to return lost services is technically feasible; (d) the accuracy of
damage quantification methods that could be used and the anticipated
cost-effectiveness of applying each method; (e) the extent to which
likely injury to resources can be verified with available
quantification methods; and (f) whether the injury, once quantified,
can be translated into monetary values with sufficient precision or
accuracy.
(4) When a resource damage assessment is required for an oil spill
in the waters of the state, as defined in RCW 90.56.010, the state
trustee agency responsible for the resource and habitat damaged shall
conduct the damage assessment and pursue all appropriate remedies with
the responsible party.
(5) Oil spill damage assessment studies authorized under RCW
90.48.367 may only be conducted if the committee, after considering the
factors enumerated in subsection (3) of this section, determines that
the damages to be investigated are quantifiable at a reasonable cost
and that proposed assessment studies are clearly linked to
quantification of the damages incurred.
(6) As new information becomes available, the committee may
reevaluate the scope of damage assessment using the factors listed in
subsection (3) of this section and may reduce or expand the scope of
damage assessment as appropriate.
(7) The preassessment screening process shall provide for the
ongoing involvement of persons who may be liable for damages resulting
from an oil spill. The department may negotiate with a potentially
liable party to perform restoration and enhancement projects or studies
which may substitute for all or part of the compensation authorized
under RCW 90.48.366 and 90.48.367 or the damage assessment studies
authorized under RCW 90.48.367.
(8) For the purposes of this section and RCW 90.48.367, the cost of
a damage assessment shall be considered "reasonable" when the
anticipated cost of the damage assessment is expected to be less than
the anticipated damage that may have occurred or may occur.

Sec. 25 RCW 27.53.020 and 2005 c 333 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The discovery, identification, excavation, and study of the state's
archaeological resources, the providing of information on
archaeological sites for their nomination to the state and national
registers of historic places, the maintaining of a complete inventory
of archaeological sites and collections, and the providing of
information to state, federal, and private construction agencies
regarding the possible impact of construction activities on the state's
archaeological resources, are proper public functions; and the
((department)) office of archaeology and historic preservation, created
under the authority of chapter 43.334 RCW, is hereby designated as an
appropriate ((agency)) office to carry out these functions. The
((director)) preservation officer shall provide guidelines for the
selection of depositories designated by the state for archaeological
resources. The legislature directs that there shall be full
cooperation amongst the ((department)) office and other agencies of the
state.

Sec. 26 RCW 27.53.030 and 2008 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of man's past
through material remains.
(2) "Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the
physical evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture including
material remains of past human life including monuments, symbols,
tools, facilities, and technological by-products.
(3) "Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in
Washington, including but not limited to, submerged and submersible
lands and the bed of the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that
contains archaeological objects.
(4) (("Department")) "Office" means the ((department)) office of
archaeology and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(5) (("Director" means the director of the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(6))) "Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through
written documents in their own or other languages. As applied to
underwater archaeological resources, the term historic shall include
only those properties which are listed in or eligible for listing in
the Washington State Register of Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the
National Register of Historic Places as defined in the National
Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(((7))) (6) "Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are
unknown through contemporaneous written documents in any language.
(7) "Preservation officer" means the state historical preservation
officer as provided for in RCW 43.334.020.
(8) "Professional archaeologist" means a person with qualifications
meeting the federal secretary of the interior's standards for a
professional archaeologist. Archaeologists not meeting this standard
may be conditionally employed by working under the supervision of a
professional archaeologist for a period of four years provided the
employee is pursuing qualifications necessary to meet the federal
secretary of the interior's standards for a professional archaeologist.
During this four-year period, the professional archaeologist is
responsible for all findings. The four-year period is not subject to
renewal.
(9) "Amateur society" means any organization composed primarily of
persons who are not professional archaeologists, whose primary interest
is in the archaeological resources of the state, and which has been
certified in writing by two professional archaeologists.
(10) "Historic archaeological resources" means those properties
which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington State
Register of Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the National Register of
Historic Places as defined in the National Historic Preservation Act of
1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(11) "Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.

Sec. 27 RCW 27.53.060 and 2002 c 211 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the private and public lands of this state it shall be
unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or any agency or
institution of the state or a political subdivision thereof to
knowingly remove, alter, dig into, or excavate by use of any
mechanical, hydraulic, or other means, or to damage, deface, or destroy
any historic or prehistoric archaeological resource or site, or remove
any archaeological object from such site, except for Indian graves or
cairns, or any glyptic or painted record of any tribe or peoples, or
historic graves as defined in chapter 68.05 RCW, disturbances of which
shall be a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, without
having obtained a written permit from the ((director)) preservation
officer for such activities.
(2) The ((director)) preservation officer must obtain the consent
of the private or public property owner or agency responsible for the
management thereof, prior to issuance of the permit. The property
owner or agency responsible for the management of such land may
condition its consent on the execution of a separate agreement, lease,
or other real property conveyance with the applicant as may be
necessary to carry out the legal rights or duties of the public
property landowner or agency.
(3) The ((director)) preservation officer, in consultation with the
affected tribes, shall develop guidelines for the issuance and
processing of permits.
(4) Such written permit and any agreement or lease or other
conveyance required by any public property owner or agency responsible
for management of such land shall be physically present while any such
activity is being conducted.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the removal
of artifacts found exposed on the surface of the ground which are not
historic archaeological resources or sites.
(6) When determining whether to grant or condition a permit, the
((director)) preservation officer may give great weight to the final
record of previous civil or criminal penalties against either the
applicant, the parties responsible for conducting the work, or the
parties responsible for carrying out the terms and conditions of the
permit, either under this chapter or under comparable federal laws. If
the ((director)) preservation officer denies a permit, the applicant
may request a hearing as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW. When the
state parks and recreation commission requests a hearing under this
subsection, an administrative law judge assigned by the office of
administrative hearings shall conduct the hearing. The decision of the
administrative law judge is the final agency order.

Sec. 28 RCW 27.53.070 and 2005 c 333 s 21 and 2005 c 274 s 243
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the declared intention of the legislature that field
investigations on privately owned lands should be discouraged except in
accordance with both the provisions and spirit of this chapter and
persons having knowledge of the location of archaeological sites or
resources are encouraged to communicate such information to the
((department)) office. Such information shall not constitute a public
record which requires disclosure pursuant to the exception authorized
in chapter 42.56 RCW to avoid site depredation.

Sec. 29 RCW 27.53.080 and 2005 c 333 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Qualified or professional archaeologists, in performance of
their duties, may enter upon public lands of the state of Washington
and its political subdivisions after first notifying the entity
responsible for managing those public lands, at such times and in such
manner as not to interfere with the normal management thereof, for the
purposes of doing archaeological resource location and evaluation
studies, including site sampling activities. The results of such
studies shall be provided to the state agency or political subdivision
responsible for such lands and the ((department)) office and are
confidential unless the ((director)) preservation officer, in writing,
declares otherwise. Scientific excavations are to be carried out only
after appropriate agreement has been made between a professional
archaeologist or an institution of higher education and the agency or
political subdivision responsible for such lands. A copy of such
agreement shall be filed with the ((department)) office.
(2) Amateur societies may engage in such activities by submitting
and having approved by the responsible agency or political subdivision
a written proposal detailing the scope and duration of the activity.
Before approval, a proposal from an amateur society shall be submitted
to the ((department)) office for review and recommendation. The
approving agency or political subdivision shall impose conditions on
the scope and duration of the proposed activity necessary to protect
the archaeological resources and ensure compliance with applicable
federal, state, and local laws. The findings and results of activities
authorized under this section shall be made known to the approving
agency or political subdivision approving the activities and to the
((department)) office.

Sec. 30 RCW 27.53.090 and 1986 c 266 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of
this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of continued
violation of any provision of this chapter shall constitute a distinct
and separate offense. Offenses shall be reported to the appropriate
law enforcement agency or to the ((director)) preservation officer.

Sec. 31 RCW 27.53.095 and 2005 c 333 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons found to have violated this chapter, either by a
knowing and willful failure to obtain a permit where required under RCW
27.53.060 or by a knowing and willful failure to comply with the
provisions of a permit issued by the ((director)) preservation officer
where required under RCW 27.53.060, in addition to other remedies as
provided for by law, may be subject to one or more of the following:
(a) Reasonable investigative costs incurred by a mutually agreed
upon independent professional archaeologist investigating the alleged
violation;
(b) Reasonable site restoration costs; and
(c) Civil penalties, as determined by the ((director)) preservation
officer, in an amount of not more than five thousand dollars per
violation.
(2) Any person incurring the penalty may file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding and may pursue subsequent review as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW and applicable rules of the ((department))
commission. When the state parks and recreation commission requests an
adjudicative proceeding under this subsection, an administrative law
judge assigned by the office of administrative hearings shall conduct
the hearing. The decision of the administrative law judge is the final
agency order.
(3) Any penalty imposed by final order following an adjudicative
proceeding becomes due and payable upon service of the final order.
(4) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the
((department)) commission in the superior court of Thurston county or
of any county in which the violator may do business to collect any
penalty imposed under this chapter and to enforce subsection (5) of
this section.
(5) Any and all artifacts in possession of a violator shall become
the property of the state until proper identification of artifact
ownership may be determined by the ((director)) preservation officer.
(6) Penalties overturned on appeal entitle the appealing party to
fees and other expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, as
provided in RCW 4.84.350.

Sec. 32 RCW 27.53.100 and 1988 c 124 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons, firms, corporations, institutions, or agencies which
discover a previously unreported historic archaeological resource on
state-owned aquatic lands and report the site or location of such
resource to the ((department)) office shall have a right of first
refusal to future salvage permits granted for the recovery of that
resource, subject to the provisions of RCW 27.53.110. Such right of
first refusal shall exist for five years from the date of the report.
Should another person, firm, corporation, institution, or agency apply
for a permit to salvage that resource, the reporting entity shall have
sixty days to submit its own permit application and exercise its first
refusal right, or the right shall be extinguished.

Sec. 33 RCW 27.53.110 and 1988 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director)) preservation officer is hereby authorized to enter
into contracts with ((other)) state agencies or institutions and with
qualified private institutions, persons, firms, or corporations for the
discovery and salvage of state-owned historic archaeological resources.
Such contracts shall include but are not limited to the following terms
and conditions:
(1) Historic shipwrecks:
(a) The contract shall provide for fair compensation to a salvor.
"Fair compensation" means an amount not less than ninety percent of the
appraised value of the objects recovered following successful
completion of the contract.
(b) The salvor may retain objects with a value of up to ninety
percent of the appraised value of the total objects recovered, or cash,
or a combination of objects and cash. In no event may the total of
objects and cash exceed ninety percent of the total appraised value of
the objects recovered. A salvor shall not be entitled to further
compensation from any state sources.
(c) The contract shall provide that the state will be given first
choice of which objects it may wish to retain for display purposes for
the people of the state from among all the objects recovered. The
state may retain objects with a value of up to ten percent of the
appraised value of the total objects recovered. If the state chooses
not to retain recovered objects with a value of up to ten percent of
the appraised value, the state shall be entitled to receive its share
in cash or a combination of recovered objects and cash so long as the
state's total share does not exceed ten percent of the appraised value
of the objects recovered.
(d) The contract shall provide that both the state and the salvor
shall have the right to select a single appraiser or joint appraisers.
(e) The contract shall also provide that title to the objects shall
pass to the salvor when the permit is issued. However, should the
salvor fail to fully perform under the terms of the contract, title to
all objects recovered shall revert to the state.
(2) Historic aircraft:
(a) The contract shall provide that historic aircraft belonging to
the state of Washington may only be recovered if the purpose of that
salvage operation is to recover the aircraft for a museum, historical
society, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity.
(b) Title to the aircraft may only be passed by the state to one of
the entities listed in (a) of this subsection.
(c) Compensation to the salvor shall only be derived from the sale
or exchange of the aircraft to one of the entities listed in (a) of
this subsection or such other compensation as one of the entities
listed in (a) of this subsection and the salvor may arrange. The
salvor shall not have a claim to compensation from state funds.
(3) Other historic archaeological resources: The ((director))
preservation officer, in his or her discretion, may negotiate the terms
of such contracts.

Sec. 34 RCW 27.53.120 and 1988 c 124 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The salvor shall agree to mitigate any archaeological damage which
occurs during the salvage operation. The ((department)) office shall
have access to all property recovered from historic archaeological
sites for purposes of scholarly research and photographic documentation
for a period to be agreed upon by the parties following completion of
the salvage operation. The ((department)) office shall also have the
right to publish scientific papers concerning the results of all
research conducted as project mitigation.
The ((director)) preservation officer has the right to refuse to
issue a permit for salvaging an historic archaeological resource if
that resource would be destroyed beyond mitigation by the proposed
salvage operation. Any agency, institution, person, firm, or
corporation which has been denied a permit because the resource would
be destroyed beyond mitigation by their method of salvage shall have a
right of first refusal for that permit at a future date should
technology be found which would make salvage possible without
destroying the resource. Such right of first refusal shall be in
effect for sixty days after the ((director)) preservation officer has
determined that salvage can be accomplished by a subsequent applicant
without destroying the resource.
No person, firm, or corporation may conduct such salvage or
recovery operation herein described without first obtaining such
contract.

Sec. 35 RCW 27.53.130 and 1995 c 399 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department)) office shall publish annually and update as
necessary a list of those areas where permits are required to protect
historic archaeological sites on aquatic lands.

Sec. 36 RCW 27.53.140 and 1995 c 399 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department)) state parks and recreation commission in
consultation with the preservation officer shall have such rule-making
authority as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 37 RCW 79A.05.075 and 1999 c 249 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
No provision of law relating to the commission shall prevent the
commission from delegating to the director such powers and duties of
the commission as they may deem proper, except that the commission may
not delegate supervision of the state historic preservation officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 (1) The department of archaeology and
historic preservation is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and
functions are hereby transferred to the office of archaeology and
historic preservation within the state parks and recreation commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
archaeology and historic preservation shall be delivered to the custody
of the state parks and recreation commission. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the department of archaeology and historic preservation shall be
made available to the state parks and recreation commission for use by
the office of archaeology and historic preservation. All funds,
credits, or other assets held by the department of archaeology and
historic preservation shall be assigned to the state parks and
recreation commission for use by the office of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of archaeology and
historic preservation shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the state parks and recreation commission.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of archaeology and historic
preservation are transferred to the jurisdiction of the state parks and
recreation commission. All employees classified under chapter 41.06
RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the state parks and
recreation commission to perform their usual duties upon the same terms
as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may
be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules
governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
archaeology and historic preservation shall be continued and acted upon
by the state parks and recreation commission. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the state parks and recreation commission.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of archaeology and historic preservation shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.334.030 (Director powers and duties) and 2005 c 333 s 3;
(2) RCW 43.334.040 (Departmental divisions) and 2005 c 333 s 4;
(3) RCW 43.334.050 (Deputy director--Department personnel director-Assistant directors) and 2005 c 333 s 5; and
(4) RCW 43.334.900 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions) and
2005 c 333 s 12.

--- END ---