BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.54.020 and 2007 c 445 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Utilization and management of the waters of the state shall be
guided by the following general declaration of fundamentals:
(1) Uses of water for domestic, stock watering, industrial,
commercial, agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production,
mining, fish and wildlife maintenance and enhancement, recreational,
and thermal power production purposes, and preservation of
environmental and aesthetic values, and all other uses compatible with
the enjoyment of the public waters of the state, are declared to be
beneficial.
(2) Allocation of waters among potential uses and users shall be
based generally on the securing of the maximum net benefits for the
people of the state. Maximum net benefits shall constitute total
benefits less costs including opportunities lost.
(3) The quality of the natural environment shall be protected and,
where possible, enhanced as follows:
(a) Perennial rivers and streams of the state shall be retained
with base flows, in an amount equal to the ninety percent exceedance
curve, necessary to provide for preservation of wildlife, fish, scenic,
aesthetic and other environmental values, and navigational values, and
which do not preclude the diversion of water for the production of
agricultural products. Lakes and ponds shall be retained substantially
in their natural condition. Withdrawals of water which would conflict
therewith shall be authorized only in those situations where it is
clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will be
served.
(b) Waters of the state shall be of high quality. Regardless of
the quality of the waters of the state, all wastes and other materials
and substances proposed for entry into said waters shall be provided
with all known, available, and reasonable methods of treatment prior to
entry. Notwithstanding that standards of quality established for the
waters of the state would not be violated, wastes and other materials
and substances shall not be allowed to enter such waters which will
reduce the existing quality thereof, except in those situations where
it is clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will
be served. Technology-based effluent limitations or standards for
discharges for municipal water treatment plants located on the
Chehalis, Columbia, Cowlitz, Lewis, or Skagit river shall be adjusted
to reflect credit for substances removed from the plant intake water
if:
(i) The municipality demonstrates that the intake water is drawn
from the same body of water into which the discharge is made; and
(ii) The municipality demonstrates that no violation of receiving
water quality standards or appreciable environmental degradation will
result.
(4) The development of multipurpose water storage facilities shall
be a high priority for programs of water allocation, planning,
management, and efficiency. The department, other state agencies, and
local governments((, and planning units formed under section 107 or 108
of this act)) shall evaluate the potential for the development of new
storage projects and the benefits and effects of storage in reducing
damage to stream banks and property, increasing the use of land,
providing water for municipal, industrial, agricultural, power
generation, and other beneficial uses, and improving stream flow
regimes for fisheries and other instream uses.
(5) Adequate and safe supplies of water shall be preserved and
protected in potable condition to satisfy human domestic needs.
(6) Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred
over single-purpose structures. Due regard shall be given to means and
methods for protection of fishery resources in the planning for and
construction of water impoundment structures and other artificial
obstructions.
(7) Federal, state, and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall be encouraged to carry
out practices of conservation as they relate to the use of the waters
of the state. In addition to traditional development approaches,
improved water use efficiency, conservation, and use of reclaimed water
shall be emphasized in the management of the state's water resources
and in some cases will be a potential new source of water with which to
meet future needs throughout the state. Use of reclaimed water shall
be encouraged through state and local planning and programs with
incentives for state financial assistance recognizing programs and
plans that encourage the use of conservation and reclaimed water use,
and state agencies shall continue to review and reduce regulatory
barriers and streamline permitting for the use of reclaimed water where
appropriate.
(8) Development of water supply systems, whether publicly or
privately owned, which provide water to the public generally in
regional areas within the state shall be encouraged. Development of
water supply systems for multiple domestic use which will not serve the
public generally shall be discouraged where water supplies are
available from water systems serving the public.
(9) Full recognition shall be given in the administration of water
allocation and use programs to the natural interrelationships of
surface and groundwaters.
(10) Expressions of the public interest will be sought at all
stages of water planning and allocation discussions.
(11) Water management programs, including but not limited to, water
quality, flood control, drainage, erosion control and storm runoff are
deemed to be in the public interest.

--- END ---