BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.95.030 and 1993 c 479 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder
shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release
or parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section
shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any
judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its
successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of
confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any
sort of good-time calculation. The department of social and health
services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such
prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
(2) If, pursuant to a special sentencing proceeding held under RCW
10.95.050, the trier of fact finds that there are not sufficient
mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the sentence shall be
death. In no case, however, shall a person be sentenced to death if
the person was mentally retarded at the time the crime was committed,
under the definition of mental retardation set forth in (a) of this
subsection. A diagnosis of mental retardation shall be documented by
a licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the
court, who is an expert in the diagnosis and evaluation of mental
retardation. The defense must establish mental retardation by a
preponderance of the evidence and the court must make a finding as to
the existence of mental retardation.
(a) "Mentally retarded" means the individual has: (i)
Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning; (ii)
existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; and (iii)
both significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning and
deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the developmental
period.
(b) "General intellectual functioning" means the results obtained
by assessment with one or more of the individually administered general
intelligence tests developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual
functioning.
(c) "Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning"
means intelligence quotient seventy or below.
(d) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with
which individuals meet the standards of personal independence and
social responsibility expected for his or her age.
(e) "Developmental period" means the period of time between
conception and the eighteenth birthday.
(3)(a) After the effective date of this act, a person who was under
fifteen years of age at the time the crime was committed may not be
sentenced to life without the possibility of release or parole.
(b) In any case where a person was sentenced to life without the
possibility of release or parole before the effective date of this act
and the person was under fifteen at the time the crime was committed,
the person shall be granted a resentencing hearing. The prosecuting
attorney for the county in which the person was sentenced shall, and
the person may, make a motion for relief from the sentence to the
original sentencing court. The sentencing court shall grant the motion
if it finds that the person was sentenced to life without the
possibility of release or parole and was under the age of fifteen at
the time the crime was committed. The court shall immediately set an
expedited date for resentencing. At resentencing, the court shall
sentence the person within the standard range established in RCW
9.94A.510 for offense seriousness level XV unless the court determines
that a departure from the guidelines is appropriate pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.537 and 2007 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any time prior to trial or entry of the guilty plea if
substantial rights of the defendant are not prejudiced, the state may
give notice that it is seeking a sentence above the standard sentencing
range. The notice shall state aggravating circumstances upon which the
requested sentence will be based.
(2) In any case where an exceptional sentence above the standard
range was imposed and where a new sentencing hearing is required, the
superior court may impanel a jury to consider any alleged aggravating
circumstances listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3), that were relied upon by the
superior court in imposing the previous sentence, at the new sentencing
hearing.
(3) The facts supporting aggravating circumstances shall be proved
to a jury beyond a reasonable doubt. The jury's verdict on the
aggravating factor must be unanimous, and by special interrogatory. If
a jury is waived, proof shall be to the court beyond a reasonable
doubt, unless the defendant stipulates to the aggravating facts.
(4) Evidence regarding any facts supporting aggravating
circumstances under RCW 9.94A.535(3) (a) through (y) shall be presented
to the jury during the trial of the alleged crime, unless the jury has
been impaneled solely for resentencing, or unless the state alleges the
aggravating circumstances listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3) (e)(iv), (h)(i),
(o), or (t). If one of these aggravating circumstances is alleged, the
trial court may conduct a separate proceeding if the evidence
supporting the aggravating fact is not part of the res geste of the
charged crime, if the evidence is not otherwise admissible in trial of
the charged crime, and if the court finds that the probative value of
the evidence to the aggravated fact is substantially outweighed by its
prejudicial effect on the jury's ability to determine guilt or
innocence for the underlying crime.
(5) If the superior court conducts a separate proceeding to
determine the existence of aggravating circumstances listed in RCW
9.94A.535(3) (e)(iv), (h)(i), (o), or (t), the proceeding shall
immediately follow the trial on the underlying conviction, if possible.
If any person who served on the jury is unable to continue, the court
shall substitute an alternate juror.
(6) If the jury finds, unanimously and beyond a reasonable doubt,
one or more of the facts alleged by the state in support of an
aggravated sentence, the court may sentence the offender pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.535 to a term of confinement up to the maximum allowed under
RCW 9A.20.021 for the underlying conviction if it finds, considering
the purposes of this chapter, that the facts found are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence, except that no
individual under fifteen years of age at the time the offense was
committed may be sentenced to life without the possibility of release
or parole.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.20.021 and 2003 c 288 s 7 and 2003 c 53 s 63 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Felony. Unless a different maximum sentence for a classified
felony is specifically established by a statute of this state, no
person convicted of a classified felony shall be punished by
confinement or fine exceeding the following:
(a) For a class A felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for a term of life imprisonment, or by a fine in an amount
fixed by the court of fifty thousand dollars, or by both such
confinement and fine, except that no individual under fifteen years of
age at the time the offense was committed may be sentenced to life
without the possibility of release or parole;
(b) For a class B felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for a term of ten years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by
the court of twenty thousand dollars, or by both such confinement and
fine;
(c) For a class C felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for five years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the
court of ten thousand dollars, or by both such confinement and fine.
(2) Gross misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a gross
misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment
in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more
than one year, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more
than five thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(3) Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor defined
in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail
for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ninety days, or
by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than one thousand
dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(4) This section applies to only those crimes committed on or after
July 1, 1984.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.95.020 and 2003 c 53 s 96 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is guilty of aggravated first degree murder, a class A
felony, if he or she commits first degree murder as defined by RCW
9A.32.030(1)(a), as now or hereafter amended, was age fifteen or older
at the time the murder was committed, and one or more of the following
aggravating circumstances exist:
(1) The victim was a law enforcement officer, corrections officer,
or firefighter who was performing his or her official duties at the
time of the act resulting in death and the victim was known or
reasonably should have been known by the person to be such at the time
of the killing;
(2) At the time of the act resulting in the death, the person was
serving a term of imprisonment, had escaped, or was on authorized or
unauthorized leave in or from a state facility or program for the
incarceration or treatment of persons adjudicated guilty of crimes;
(3) At the time of the act resulting in death, the person was in
custody in a county or county-city jail as a consequence of having been
adjudicated guilty of a felony;
(4) The person committed the murder pursuant to an agreement that
he or she would receive money or any other thing of value for
committing the murder;
(5) The person solicited another person to commit the murder and
had paid or had agreed to pay money or any other thing of value for
committing the murder;
(6) The person committed the murder to obtain or maintain his or
her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of an
organization, association, or identifiable group;
(7) The murder was committed during the course of or as a result of
a shooting where the discharge of the firearm, as defined in RCW
9.41.010, is either from a motor vehicle or from the immediate area of
a motor vehicle that was used to transport the shooter or the firearm,
or both, to the scene of the discharge;
(8) The victim was:
(a) A judge; juror or former juror; prospective, current, or former
witness in an adjudicative proceeding; prosecuting attorney; deputy
prosecuting attorney; defense attorney; a member of the indeterminate
sentence review board; or a probation or parole officer; and
(b) The murder was related to the exercise of official duties
performed or to be performed by the victim;
(9) The person committed the murder to conceal the commission of a
crime or to protect or conceal the identity of any person committing a
crime, including, but specifically not limited to, any attempt to avoid
prosecution as a persistent offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(10) There was more than one victim and the murders were part of a
common scheme or plan or the result of a single act of the person;
(11) The murder was committed in the course of, in furtherance of,
or in immediate flight from one of the following crimes:
(a) Robbery in the first or second degree;
(b) Rape in the first or second degree;
(c) Burglary in the first or second degree or residential burglary;
(d) Kidnapping in the first degree; or
(e) Arson in the first degree;
(12) The victim was regularly employed or self-employed as a
newsreporter and the murder was committed to obstruct or hinder the
investigative, research, or reporting activities of the victim;
(13) At the time the person committed the murder, there existed a
court order, issued in this or any other state, which prohibited the
person from either contacting the victim, molesting the victim, or
disturbing the peace of the victim, and the person had knowledge of the
existence of that order;
(14) At the time the person committed the murder, the person and
the victim were "family or household members" as that term is defined
in RCW 10.99.020(((1))) (3), and the person had previously engaged in
a pattern or practice of three or more of the following crimes
committed upon the victim within a five-year period, regardless of
whether a conviction resulted:
(a) Harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020; or
(b) Any criminal assault.

--- END ---