BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state patrol may accept any and all donations,
bequests, gifts, conveyances, devices, and grants conditional or
otherwise; or money, property, service, or other things of value which
may be received from the United States or any agency thereof, any
governmental agency, institution, person, firm, or corporation, public
and private, to be held, used, or applied for the purpose of fulfilling
its mission.

--- END ---