BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.630 and 2007 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, all treatment records
shall remain confidential and may be released only to the persons
designated in this section, or to other persons designated in an
informed written consent of the patient.
(2) Treatment records of a person may be released without informed
written consent in the following circumstances:
(a) To a person, organization, or agency as necessary for
management or financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation.
Information obtained under this subsection shall remain confidential
and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other
identifying information about the person whose records are being
released.
(b) To the department, the director of regional support networks,
or a qualified staff member designated by the director only when
necessary to be used for billing or collection purposes. The
information shall remain confidential.
(c) For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.
(d) Pursuant to lawful order of a court.
(e) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director
of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility. The information shall remain confidential.
(f) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons
employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in
supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to
perform their duties.
(g) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for
mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse
of persons who are under the supervision of the department.
(h) To a licensed physician who has determined that the life or
health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the
information contained in the treatment records could be injurious to
the patient's health. Disclosure shall be limited to the portions of
the records necessary to meet the medical emergency.
(i) To a licensed health care professional who is providing or
anticipates providing health care to a person with both medical and
behavioral health care needs, for the purpose of coordinating care and
treatment of that person. The information released must be necessary
for provision or coordination of care. Psychotherapy notes, as defined
in 45 C.F.R. 164.501, may not be released without authorization of the
person who is the subject of the request for release of information.
(j) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily
committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from
one treatment facility to another. The release of records under this
subsection shall be limited to the treatment records required by law,
a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary.
The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem,
the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and
recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's
complete treatment record.
(((j))) (k) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 71.05.390(7), to
a correctional facility or a corrections officer who is responsible for
the supervision of a person who is receiving inpatient or outpatient
evaluation or treatment. Except as provided in RCW 71.05.445 and
71.34.345, release of records under this section is limited to:
(i) An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision
plan.
(ii) The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all
somatic treatments, at the termination of any treatment provided as
part of the supervision plan.
(iii) When a person is returned from a treatment facility to a
correctional facility, the information provided under (((j))) (k)(iv)
of this subsection.
(iv) Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in
the person's treatment plan or the level or kind of supervision as
determined by resource management services. In cases involving a
person transferred back to a correctional facility, disclosure shall be
made to clinical staff only.
(((k))) (l) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without
modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(((l))) (m) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency
or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose
of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental
disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services
may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county
of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient
was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and
place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of
a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's
appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional
information shall notify the patient's resource management services in
writing of the request and of the resource management services' right
to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the
guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain
the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not
obtain the additional information.
(((m))) (n) For purposes of coordinating health care, the
department may release without informed written consent of the patient,
information acquired for billing and collection purposes as described
in (b) of this subsection to all current treating providers of the
patient with prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for
the patient within the last twelve months. The department shall notify
the patient that billing and collection information has been released
to named providers, and provide the substance of the information
released and the dates of such release. The department shall not
release counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and
alcohol treatment information without a signed written release from the
client.
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department
may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with
federal law and regulations.

--- END ---