BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
procurement practices of the Washington state ferry system frequently
involve extensive in-house design efforts, often supported by extensive
outside consulting services. The legislature notes that this practice
has extended to the design and procurement of ferries, terminal
facilities, and some operating and management support systems involving
information technologies. The legislature further notes that these
procurement practices have, in several cases, resulted in the
expenditure of many millions of dollars without resulting in successful
deliveries to the ferry system. The legislature further finds that
industry has abandoned these kinds of in-house practices in favor of
design-build procurement strategies for major capital acquisitions and
commercial, off-the-shelf procurement strategies for ancillary systems
that rely on rapidly evolving technologies. Finally, the legislature
finds that a severe economic and budgetary crisis imposes an imperative
to adopt immediately new and much more economical procurement
practices. Therefore, the legislature intends to restructure the
duties of the Washington state ferries to reflect best procurement
practices in the marine industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state ferries shall:
(1) Immediately cease all in-house design and construction activity
and all associated consulting contracting. With the prior concurrence
of the legislature, the secretary of transportation may, on a case-by-case basis, authorize any individual procurement programs that are in
progress, as of the effective date of this section, to proceed to their
earliest practicable conclusion;
(2) Continue an in-house ferry maintenance engineering effort by
staff tasked to manage routine and emergent ferry maintenance work
performed by on-board crews, the intermediate-level staff at the Eagle
Harbor facility, and by contract to depot-level, commercial ship repair
vendors. Service life extension projects by which older ferry vessels
receive a comprehensive refit are specifically excluded from this in-house maintenance provision. These complex modernization projects must
be authorized by the legislature and managed through the design-build
process;
(3) Immediately develop and rapidly implement a revised procurement
method as described in section 3 of this act;
(4) Immediately reorganize itself and associated department offices
to comport with the revised procurement strategies. The department
shall propose to the legislature by December 1, 2009, a revised
organization and staffing plan that must include the following
features:
(a) A sole focus by Washington state ferries headquarters on the
management and maintenance of the existing ferry system;
(b) The relocation of the ferry maintenance engineering staff to
and functional integration with the Eagle Harbor maintenance
organization; and
(c) The establishment within department headquarters of a very
small staff charged with coordinating ferry system requirements and
procurements within the state's overall transportation investments
management process and in accordance with the design-build and
commercial, off-the-shelf strategies established in section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall propose a procedure and implementing
legislation for the use of design-build and commercial, off-the-shelf
procurement strategies to the legislature by December 1, 2009. To
assure that the proposal reflects current industry best practices, the
department shall convene a marine commercial procurement strategies
advisory group comprising of: Representatives of the marine
architecture, shipbuilding, and information technology industries;
members of the general public drawn from ferry system riders and ferry-using local industries; and experts drawn from other department design-build programs.
(2) The procedure proposed to implement the commercial procurement
strategy under this section must:
(a) Be consistent with current maritime industry and high
technology industry best procurement practices;
(b) Be consistent with current industry and regulatory safety and
construction standards. For ferry vessels, these standards must be
current American bureau of shipbuilding and United States coast guard
standards and other environmental regulations;
(c) Provide, for ferry vessel and terminal procurements and major
modernizations, a design-build-to-target-price procedure for developing
ferry system procurement requirements, setting a target price, and
soliciting competitive bids;
(d) Provide a commercial, off-the-shelf process for the procurement
of operating and management support systems other than ferry vessels or
terminals;
(e) Avoid the inclusion of government-furnished equipment
provisions in procurement solicitations unless the secretary of
transportation, with the governor's concurrence, specifically
authorizes that bidding invitation feature;
(f) Specify an owner's representative or construction manager form
of contract management with the construction manager to be included in
the proposal development process and that the construction manager
coordinate all construction oversight and inspection using American
bureau of shipbuilding standards and United States coast guard
inspection procedures;
(g) Use a best value evaluation process of submitted bids;
(h) Provide for the appropriate reimbursement of the reasonable
engineering and proposal development costs incurred by qualified,
performing, but nonwinning bidders; and
(i) Allow full legislative oversight.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.030 and 2008 c 122 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.29 or 47.46 RCW:
(a) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department of transportation shall have full ((charge of))
responsibility for the planning, analysis, and construction of all toll
bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state
ferries, and the operation and maintenance thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon.
(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and design of
all toll facilities. The department may conduct the planning,
analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to support the
legislature's consideration of toll authorization.
(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection
systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent
practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The
department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll
facilities within the state, including those authorized by local
authorities.
(e) Except as provided in ((this)) (f) and (g) of this subsection,
the department shall proceed with the construction of such toll bridges
and other facilities and the approaches thereto by contract in the
manner of state highway construction immediately upon there being made
available funds for such work and shall prosecute such work to
completion as rapidly as practicable.
(f) The department shall use the design-build-to-target-price
procedure developed in section 3 of this act for all ferry vessel and
terminal preservation and construction projects, except when the
project is minor and under ten million dollars in scope. The
department shall use the commercial, off-the-shelf procurement
procedures developed in section 3 of this act for all other
procurements that are more than one hundred thousand dollars.
(g) The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for any
amount without bid under (((e))) (g)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation
determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not
practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to
make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance
evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award,
a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal
request for proposals solicitation shall include a functional
description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be known and cited as the ferry
procurement modernization act of 2009.

--- END ---