BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that for more than
one hundred fifty years the capitol of the state and its capitol
campus, the seat of state government, has been located in one city.
That city, and the core of its downtown area, has been host to the
millions of state citizens that have visited the state capital, lived
in the city during its sixty legislatures, and has housed many of the
state's office buildings and workers. The legislature also finds that
it is in the state's interest to help insure that the core of its host
city is maintained as a vibrant and desirable capitol location and that
the city can and does provide adequate parking, temporary and permanent
housing, transportation, markets, arts, tourism, and dining
opportunities for the city's citizens and workers, including state
employees, tourists, and visitors to the state capitol and its host
city.
(2) The legislature further finds that while the state has made
periodic payments to the city for fire service coverage of the capitol
campus and the approximately forty percent of the core city that is
owned or used by state government, no payment or revenue sharing in
lieu of the lost tax base has been regularly provided to compensate the
capital city for its lost revenue. In recognition of this oversight,
it is the intent of the legislature to create a capital city district
to share revenue generated in the core city and on the capitol campus.
The city must use these revenues to provide capital investment
amenities that will enhance the core city and capitol campus area for
the citizens of the city as well as for all visitors to our beautiful
capitol campus and its grounds and buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city in which the state capitol is located may designate by
ordinance one capital city district that includes the capitol campus,
along with the core downtown retail and service areas and traffic
corridors that are most impacted by the location of the capitol campus
and state buildings adjacent to the capitol campus.
(2) The district may levy a sales and use tax of 0.9 percent, which
must be a credit against the state's portion of the sales and use tax.
Upon recognition of the district by a majority vote of the capitol
committee created in RCW 43.34.010, this levy must be levied and
collected within the district. The levy may not:
(a) Become effective prior to July 1, 2011; or
(b) Be collected for more than twenty-five years after the date
that it is first imposed.
(3) The revenues generated from the levy may be utilized by the
city only for capital improvements within the designated boundaries of
the district. The capital improvements may include, but are not
limited to, the acquisition and enhancement of public spaces and
transportation corridors, signage and tourism enhancements, parking
structures, district beautification, public walkways, waterfront
access, lighting, and safety amenities.
(4) As of July, 2013, the city must provide the capitol committee,
created in RCW 43.34.010, with an annual accounting of: The use of the
funds; the amount of funds pledged to match the district funds, by the
city or other parties, for projects paid for in part from the levy; and
a proposed capital city district development plan for the ensuing year
wherein it is the intent of the city to use the levy moneys.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "City" means the city in which the capital city district is
located;
(b) "District" means a "capital city district" created in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) "Levy" means a sales and use tax authorized in subsection (2)
of this section.

--- END ---