BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent events,
including the 2007 floods closing Interstate 5, devastating our
citizens in southwestern Washington and costing extreme economic loss
due to the Interstate 5 closure, and the winter storms of early 2007,
impacting nineteen of our thirty-nine counties, have demonstrated the
need for a coordinated, comprehensive all-hazards disaster planning
effort. Washington ranks fifteenth in the nation for federally
declared disasters with fourteen disasters in the last ten years.
Washington state's topography, geography, location, and disaster
history place the state at particular risk from both natural disasters
and human-caused disasters. The economic impact from just the 2007
disasters alone is estimated at over five hundred million dollars. In
response, Washington state and its local governments have implemented
all-hazards emergency management and disaster response plans. However,
recent studies have revealed the lack of a secure funding source
impedes our ability statewide from fully integrating and coordinating
comprehensive disaster preparedness planning. Local programs suffer
disparities in funding and expertise, leaving troublesome gaps in a
well-coordinated statewide all-hazards emergency management system.
Recognizing that all disasters are local disasters, the legislature
therefore intends to strengthen state and local emergency response,
mitigation, preparation, and coordination by establishing a stable
source of funding. The funding will be dedicated to the development
and coordination of state and local government emergency management
programs to a recognized baseline standard. The baseline will be
determined by a gap analysis of state and local emergency management
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The emergency management, preparedness, and
assistance account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
the surcharge authorized by section 3 of this act shall be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only as
provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In order to provide funds for emergency
management programs, an annual surcharge of one and one-third percent
per policy is imposed on every homeowner's, mobile homeowner's,
manufactured homeowner's, tenant homeowner's, and condominium unit
owner's insurance policy, and commercial fire, commercial multiple
peril, and business owner's property insurance policy, issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this section. The
policyholder shall pay the surcharge to the insurer. The insurer shall
collect the surcharge and remit it to the department of revenue, which
will collect, administer, audit, and enforce the surcharge under
chapter 82.32 RCW. The office of the insurance commissioner shall
provide to the department of revenue the information needed by the
department of revenue to collect the surcharge. The surcharge is not
to be considered premiums of the insurer and is not subject to premium
taxes, however, nonpayment of the surcharge by the insured may be a
valid reason for cancellation of the policy. The surcharge imposed on
policyholders under this section is not subject to retaliatory tax
provisions. All proceeds of the surcharge shall be deposited in the
emergency management, preparedness, and assistance account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The Washington military department shall
administer the emergency management, preparedness, and assistance
account and shall establish rules for its administration in
consultation with the emergency management council and the Washington
state emergency management association. The department shall:
(a) Use not more than twenty percent of the funds appropriated from
the emergency management, preparedness, and assistance account for the
department's administration of this section and to fund the assessment
required by section 5 of this act, and to fund state agency programs
and other activities established by the rules required by this section
that will strengthen emergency response, mitigation, preparation, and
coordination related to the baseline assessment in section 5 of this
act;
(b) Allocate at least sixty percent of the funds appropriated from
the emergency management, preparedness, and assistance account for
local and tribal governments' activities established by the rules
required by this section that will strengthen emergency response,
mitigation, preparation, and coordination;
(i) Projects funded under this section shall include, but need not
be limited to, projects that will promote neighborhood level public
education on disaster preparedness.
(ii) Grant funding may also be used as seed money to establish a
dedicated, full-time emergency management director in every county that
does not have such a director as of the effective date of this section.
Grant funding may not be used to hire uniformed personnel to perform
routine law enforcement patrol or fire service duties.
(iii) The department shall establish criteria, procedures, and a
distribution strategy for allocation of funds by rule in consultation
with the emergency management council and the Washington state
emergency management association;
(c) Allocate at least ten percent of the funds appropriated from
the emergency management, preparedness, and assistance account for a
competitive grant program to improve local and regional programs and
coordination. The department shall establish criteria and procedures
for competitive allocation of these funds by rule in consultation with
the emergency management council and the Washington state emergency
management association. At a minimum, the rules shall:
(i) Establish preferential funding for projects and exercises
addressing needs and recommendations identified by the department in
the assessment conducted under section 5 of this act;
(ii) Specify match requirements; and
(iii) Include requirements that, at a minimum, a local emergency
management agency have: A comprehensive emergency management plan or
be a member of a joint local organization for emergency management;
(d) Allocate at least ten percent of the funds appropriated from
the emergency management, preparedness, and assistance account for a
response and recovery contingency fund. Moneys from the contingency
fund may be released by the Washington state military department to
support:
(i) State or local matching requirements imposed as a condition of
receiving federal disaster relief assistance;
(ii) Extraordinary state or local response and recovery costs when
no federal disaster declaration has been made.
(2) Any funds appropriated under this section but not expended
during the designated performance period revert to the response and
recovery contingency fund described in subsection (1)(d) of this
section.
(3) No more than three percent of any award granted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used for administrative
purposes.
(4) Distribution of funds will begin January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The emergency management council shall
accomplish a baseline assessment of all emergency management programs
that receive federal emergency management performance grant funds
within six months after the effective date of this section. Beginning
biennially thereafter, the emergency management council shall conduct
in conjunction with the department, a strategic assessment of the
baseline required standards as defined by rules adopted by the
department in consultation with the emergency management council and
the Washington state emergency management association, and issue a
report on, the ability of state, local, and tribal emergency management
organizations to effectively provide for all phases of comprehensive
emergency management. The assessment shall:
(1) Evaluate state, local, and tribal emergency management
capabilities and needs;
(2) Evaluate the ability of state, local, and tribal emergency
management organizations to provide emergency management mitigation,
preparedness, response, and recovery;
(3) Evaluate the effectiveness of the emergency management
structure at the state, local, and tribal levels;
(4) Evaluate the coordination between state, local, and tribal
governments and private industries or organizations that provide basic
human safety and health needs including water, food, shelter, and
medical care;
(5) Provide findings and make recommendations that increase the
ability of state, local, and tribal emergency management organizations
to meet current and future risks; and
(6) Detail where and for what purpose funds under section 4(1)(b)
of this act have been distributed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study and review the performance of programs
implemented under this act. The committee shall examine at least the
following factors: The number and type of joint exercises conducted
under section 4 of this act; the number of programs receiving grant
money and the status of those programs; the coordination of
comprehensive emergency management plans between state and local
jurisdictions; the number of training programs administered; the number
of comprehensive emergency management or safety plans created using
funds distributed under section 4 of this act; and the number of
emergency preparedness officials created and trained with funds
distributed under this act. The committee shall provide a final report
on this review by December 2012. Funds from the emergency management,
preparedness, and assistance account may be provided to the committee
for the purposes of conducting the study.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.18.170 and 2007 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Premium" as used in this code means all sums charged, received, or
deposited as consideration for an insurance contract or the continuance
thereof. "Premium" does not include ((a regulatory)) the annual
surcharge imposed ((by RCW 48.02.190, except as otherwise provided in
this)) under section 3 of this act. Any assessment, or any
"membership," "policy," "survey," "inspection," "service" or similar
fee or charge made by the insurer in consideration for an insurance
contract is deemed part of the premium.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.18.180 and 2008 c 217 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The premium stated in the policy shall be inclusive of all
fees, charges, premiums, or other consideration charged for the
insurance or for the procurement thereof.
(2) No insurer or its officer, employee, appointed insurance
producer, or other representative shall charge or receive any fee,
compensation, or consideration for insurance which is not included in
the premium specified in the policy.
(3) Each violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) A fee paid to an insurance producer by an insured as provided
in RCW 48.17.270; or
(b) ((A regulatory)) The annual surcharge imposed ((by RCW
48.02.190)) under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 38.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 4 through 6 and 8 of this act take
effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---