BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that agricultural
workers are challenged not only in finding full-time, year-round work,
but also face difficulties in upgrading their agricultural skills. The
legislature also finds that the agricultural industry's demand for
skilled workers far outnumbers the current supply. In addition, the
legislature finds that despite recent advances in the safety of
agricultural production, additional training of agricultural workers
should assist the agricultural sector in ongoing efforts to reduce
occupational injuries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall administer the community
agricultural worker safety grant program, to be implemented by the
501(c)(3) nonprofit opportunities industrialization center of
Washington. As grant recipient, the center shall work with the
agricultural industry to provide practical, hands-on training for the
state's agricultural workers in tractor and farm machinery skills and
safety, pesticide training, adult basic skills, civics, English as a
second language, commercial drivers' licensing, and other related
topics. The grant recipient may receive up to two hundred fifty
thousand dollars per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---