BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.411 and 2006 c 271 s 1 and 2006 c 73 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Decision not to prosecute.
STANDARD: A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even
though technically sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in
situations where prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or would result in
decreased respect for the law.
GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:
Examples
The following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could
satisfy the standard.
(a) Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly
contrary to the intent of the legislature in enacting the particular
statute.
(b) Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the statute in question is antiquated in that:
(i) It has not been enforced for many years; and
(ii) Most members of society act as if it were no longer in
existence; and
(iii) It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's
society; and
(iv) The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the
legislature.
This reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases
because the law in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to
enforce.
(c) De Minimis Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where
no public interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.
(d) Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to
charge because the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a
lengthy period of confinement; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iii) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(e) Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to
decline to charge because the accused is facing a pending prosecution
in the same or another county; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;
(iii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iv) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(f) High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to
decline to charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the
burden on, prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the
importance of prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should
be limited to minor cases and should not be relied upon in serious
cases.
(g) Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline
charges because the motives of the complainant are improper and
prosecution would serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying
purpose of the law in question or would result in decreased respect for
the law.
(h) Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity
is to be given to an accused in order to prosecute another where the
accused's information or testimony will reasonably lead to the
conviction of others who are responsible for more serious criminal
conduct or who represent a greater danger to the public interest.
(i) Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the victim requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case
involves the following crimes or situations:
(i) Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no
injury;
(ii) Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no
major loss was suffered;
(iii) Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.
Care should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely
made and is not the product of threats or pressure by the accused.
The presence of these factors may also justify the decision to
dismiss a prosecution which has been commenced.
Notification
The prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical,
and the law enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.
(2) Decision to prosecute.
(a) STANDARD:
Crimes against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible
evidence exists, which, when considered with the most plausible,
reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised under the evidence,
would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective fact-finder.
With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050,
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.089, and
9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be
provided pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.
Crimes against property/other crimes will be filed if the
admissible evidence is of such convincing force as to make it probable
that a reasonable and objective fact-finder would convict after hearing
all the admissible evidence and the most plausible defense that could
be raised.
See table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES AGAINST PERSONS
Aggravated Murder
1st Degree Murder
2nd Degree Murder
1st Degree Manslaughter
2nd Degree Manslaughter
1st Degree Kidnapping
2nd Degree Kidnapping
1st Degree Assault
2nd Degree Assault
3rd Degree Assault
1st Degree Assault of a Child
2nd Degree Assault of a Child
3rd Degree Assault of a Child
1st Degree Rape
2nd Degree Rape
3rd Degree Rape
1st Degree Rape of a Child
2nd Degree Rape of a Child
3rd Degree Rape of a Child
1st Degree Robbery
2nd Degree Robbery
1st Degree Arson
1st Degree Burglary
Residential Burglary
1st Degree Identity Theft
2nd Degree Identity Theft
1st Degree Extortion
2nd Degree Extortion
Indecent Liberties
Incest
Vehicular Homicide
Vehicular Assault
1st Degree Child Molestation
2nd Degree Child Molestation
3rd Degree Child Molestation
1st Degree Promoting Prostitution
Intimidating a Juror
Communication with a Minor
Intimidating a Witness
Intimidating a Public Servant
Bomb Threat (if against person)
Unlawful Imprisonment
Promoting a Suicide Attempt
Riot (if against person)
Stalking
Custodial Assault
Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050,
26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)
Counterfeiting (if a violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))
Felony Driving a Motor Vehicle While Under the Influence of
Intoxicating Liquor or Any Drug (RCW 46.61.502(6))
Felony Physical Control of a Motor Vehicle While Under the
Influence of Intoxicating Liquor or Any Drug (RCW 46.61.504(6))

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES
2nd Degree Arson
1st Degree Escape
2nd Degree Escape
2nd Degree Burglary
1st Degree Theft
2nd Degree Theft
1st Degree Perjury
2nd Degree Perjury
1st Degree Introducing Contraband
2nd Degree Introducing Contraband
1st Degree Possession of Stolen Property
2nd Degree Possession of Stolen Property
Bribery
Bribing a Witness
Bribe received by a Witness
Bomb Threat (if against property)
1st Degree Malicious Mischief
2nd Degree Malicious Mischief
1st Degree Reckless Burning
Taking a Motor Vehicle without Authorization
Forgery
2nd Degree Promoting Prostitution
Tampering with a Witness
Trading in Public Office
Trading in Special Influence
Receiving/Granting Unlawful Compensation
Bigamy
Eluding a Pursuing Police Vehicle
Willful Failure to Return from Furlough
Escape from Community Custody
Riot (if against property)
1st Degree Theft of Livestock
2nd Degree Theft of Livestock

ALL OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES
Selection of Charges/Degree of Charge
(i) The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe
the nature of defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only
if they are necessary to ensure that the charges:
(A) Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at
trial; or
(B) Will result in restitution to all victims.
(ii) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:
(A) Charging a higher degree;
(B) Charging additional counts.
This standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those
crimes which demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's
criminal conduct, but to decline to charge crimes which are not
necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do not merge as a matter
of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct, do not all
have to be charged.

(b) GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:
(i) Police Investigation
A prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies
to conduct the necessary factual investigation which must precede the
decision to prosecute. The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a
thorough factual investigation has been conducted before a decision to
prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the investigation should
include the following:
(A) The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the
obtaining of written statements whenever possible;
(B) The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and
(C) The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements,
of the suspect's version of the events.
If the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney
should insist upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute
is made, and specify what the investigation needs to include.
(ii) Exceptions
In certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing
of a criminal complaint before the investigation is complete if:
(A) Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and
(B) The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to
flee if not apprehended; or
(C) The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the
investigation of the crime.
In the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the
prosecuting attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement
agency involved to complete the investigation in a timely manner. If
the subsequent investigation does not produce sufficient evidence to
meet the normal charging standard, the complaint should be dismissed.
(iii) Investigation Techniques
The prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory
techniques that were used in the case investigation including:
(A) Polygraph testing;
(B) Hypnosis;
(C) Electronic surveillance;
(D) Use of informants.
(iv) Pre-Filing Discussions with Defendant
Discussions with the defendant or his/her representative regarding
the selection or disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing
of charges, and potential agreements can be reached.
(v) Pre-Filing Discussions with Victim(s)
Discussions with the victim(s) or victims' representatives
regarding the selection or disposition of charges may occur before the
filing of charges. The discussions may be considered by the prosecutor
in charging and disposition decisions, and should be considered before
reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding these decisions.

--- END ---