BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Transportation infrastructure improvement zone" or
"improvement zone" means the geographic zone from which taxes are to be
appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "City" means a city with a population of more than five hundred
fifty thousand persons.
(4) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a city.
(5) "Public improvements" means infrastructure improvements that
relate to the removal of a viaduct damaged by an earthquake and the
construction of a new tunnel as its replacement. Public improvements
also include:
(a) Water and sewer system improvements; and
(b) Storm water and drainage management systems.
(6) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of public
improvements; and (d) financing public improvements, including interest
during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes,
insurance, principal and interest costs on indebtedness issued to
finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for
indebtedness.
(7) "State equivalency payments" means the equivalent amount of
state property taxes derived within the improvement zone.
(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means all tax revenues derived from
state and local sales taxes, state and local business and occupation
taxes, state and local public utility taxes, local regular property
taxes, state and local real estate excise taxes, and state and local
leasehold excise taxes within the improvement zone from all taxing
districts included within the improvement zone. "Tax allocation
revenues" also includes state equivalency payments and state and local
sales taxes from the initial construction of any new development in the
improvement zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A city must finance public improvements
using transportation infrastructure improvement zone financing subject
to the following conditions:
(1) The city adopts an ordinance designating an improvement zone
within its boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed
to be financed in whole or in part with the use of transportation tax
allocation revenues.
(2) The boundaries of an improvement zone may not change once the
improvement zone is established by ordinance.
(3) The ordinance must specify the initial date tax allocation
revenues will be distributed to the city to fund public improvement
costs.
(4) Tax allocation revenues distributed to the city to fund public
improvement costs must cease twenty-five years from the date described
in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The boundaries of the improvement zone may only include
territory around the location where a viaduct damaged by earthquake is
razed. As part of this determination, the city may include an estimate
of the increase in tax allocation revenues upon completion of the
construction of the public improvements and any associated private
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating
the improvement zone, a city must hold a public hearing on the proposed
financing of the public improvement in whole or in part with
improvement zone financing.
(a) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed improvement zone
at least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed improvement zone.
(b) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of
the costs of the public improvements to be borne by tax allocation
revenues, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the public
improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed improvement zone,
and estimate the period during which the improvement zone financing is
contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held by either the
governing body of the city, or a committee of the governing body that
includes at least a majority of the whole governing body.
(2) In order to create an improvement zone, a city must adopt an
ordinance establishing the improvement zone that:
(a) Describes the public improvements;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the improvement zone;
(c) Estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion
of these costs to be financed by transportation tax allocation
revenues;
(d) Estimates the time during which tax allocation revenues are to
be used to finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by improvement zone
financing;
(e) Provides the date when the use of improvement zone tax
allocation revenues will commence; and
(f) Provides a schedule for when development rights above the
location where a viaduct damaged by earthquake is razed will be
available for purchase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A city that adopts an ordinance creating
an improvement zone under this chapter must, within ninety days of
adopting the ordinance:
(a) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the improvement zone that describes the public improvement,
describes the boundaries of the improvement zone, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and
(b) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer, the county assessor, the department of revenue, and the
governing body of each taxing authority within which the improvement
zone is located.
(2) Any challenge to the formation must be brought within sixty
days of the later of the date of its formation or July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A city that adopts an ordinance creating an
improvement zone under this chapter must sell development rights in the
area where a viaduct damaged by earthquake is razed. All proceeds from
the sale of development rights shall be deposited in the special fund
or funds described under section 7 of this act and must be used to
defease bonds for public improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The city must use all tax allocation
revenues for the razing of a viaduct damaged by an earthquake and the
construction of a new tunnel as its replacement and related public
improvements. Tax allocation revenues shall be deposited in a special
fund or funds described under section 7 of this act or other segregated
account of the city to be used exclusively for the funding of public
improvements. By December 31st of each year, the state treasurer must
transfer from the state general fund to the city the amount of the
state equivalency payment for that year. By December 31st of each
year, the county treasurer must transfer to the appropriate fund or
funds of the city the amount of any local property taxes levied for
collection in that year within the improvement zone. On a quarterly
basis, the state treasurer must transfer tax allocation revenues
derived from state and local sales taxes, state business and occupation
taxes, state and local real estate excise taxes, and state and local
leasehold excise taxes to the city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A city must issue revenue bonds to fund
public improvements, or portions of public improvements, that are
located within an improvement zone and that it is authorized to provide
or operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the legislative
authority of the city must create or have created a special fund or
funds from which, along with any reserves created pursuant to RCW
39.44.140, the principal and interest on these revenue bonds must
exclusively be payable. The legislative authority of the city may
obligate the city to set aside and pay into the special fund or funds
a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of the tax allocation revenues
obtained within the improvement zone. This amount or proportion is a
lien and charge against these revenues, subject only to operating and
maintenance expenses. The city must have due regard for the cost of
operation and maintenance of the public improvements that are funded by
the revenue bonds, and shall not set aside into the special fund or
funds a greater amount or proportion of the revenues that in its
judgment will be available over and above the cost of maintenance and
operation and the amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue
previously pledged. The city may also provide that revenue bonds
payable out of the same source or sources of revenue may later be
issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being issued and sold.
(2) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section are not an
indebtedness of the city issuing the bonds, and the interest and
principal on the bonds must only be payable from the revenues lawfully
pledged to meet the principal and interest requirements and any
reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The owner or bearer of a
revenue bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section
shall not have any claim against the city arising from the bond or
coupon except for payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet
the principal and interest requirements and any reserves created
pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The substance of the limitations included
in this subsection must be plainly printed, written, or engraved on
each bond issued pursuant to this section.
(3) Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of twenty-five years
may not be issued. The legislative authority of the city must by
resolution determine for each revenue bond issue the amount, date,
form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable
interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights,
registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable
provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of existing
revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any
coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as
revenue bonds are issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The tax allocation revenues and state
equivalency payments constitute part of the state contribution to the
replacement of a viaduct damaged by earthquake. The state contribution
to this project must not exceed two billion four hundred million
dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on
the construction of a tunnel must be transferred to a city that creates
a transportation infrastructure improvement zone. The city must
deposit any revenues received under this section into the special fund
or funds described in section 7 of this act and must be used to reduce
project costs

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---