BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.04.280 and 2007 c 516 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this
section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by
the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30,
2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement
of these policy goals:
(((a) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(b) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(c) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(d) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; and
(e) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.))
(a) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(b) Congestion relief: To reduce traffic congestion and improve
vehicle travel times for transportation customers using the following
measures:
(i) Traffic congestion on urban state highways must be
significantly reduced and be no worse than the national mean;
(ii) Hours of delay per driver must be significantly reduced and no
worse than the national mean;
(c) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems using the
following measures:
(i) Interstate highways, state routes, or statewide principal
arterials must not be in poor condition;
(ii) Bridges must not be structurally deficient, and safety
retrofits must be performed on those state bridges at the highest
seismic risk levels; and
(d) Environmental stewardship: To ensure that transportation
investments protect the environment.
(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation
agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for
establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance
measures.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
financial management establish objectives and performance measures for
the department of transportation and other state agencies with
transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system
performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses
toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1)
of this section. The office of financial management shall submit
initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
the 2008 legislative session. The office of financial management shall
submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter.
(5) This section does not create a private right of action.

--- END ---