BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that Washington's current three-tier
system, where the functions of manufacturing, distributing, and
retailing are distinct and the financial relationships and business
transactions between entities in these tiers are regulated, is a
valuable system for the distribution of beer and wine. The legislature
further recognizes that the historical total prohibition on ownership
of an interest in one tier by a person with an ownership interest in
another tier, as well as the historical restriction on financial
incentives and business relationships between tiers, is unduly
restrictive. The legislature finds the modifications contained in this
act are appropriate, because the modifications do not impermissibly
interfere with the goals of orderly marketing of alcohol in the state,
encouraging moderation in consumption of alcohol by the citizens of the
state, protecting the public interest and advancing public safety by
preventing the use and consumption of alcohol by minors and other
abusive consumption, and promoting the efficient collection of taxes by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 through
8 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse impact on public health and safety" means that an
existing or proposed practice or occurrence has resulted or is more
likely than not to result in alcohol being made significantly more
attractive or available to minors than would otherwise be the case or
has resulted or is more likely than not to result in overconsumption,
consumption by minors, or other harmful or abusive forms of
consumption.
(2) "Affiliate" means any one of two or more persons if one of
those persons has actual or legal control, directly or indirectly,
whether by stock ownership or otherwise, of the other person or persons
and any one of two or more persons subject to common control, actual or
legal, directly or indirectly, whether by stock ownership or otherwise.
(3) "Industry member" means a licensed manufacturer, producer,
supplier, importer, wholesaler, distributor, authorized representative,
certificate of approval holder, warehouse, and any affiliates,
subsidiaries, officers, directors, partners, agents, employees, and
representatives of any industry member. "Industry member" does not
include the board or any of the board's employees.
(4) "Person" means any individual, partnership, joint stock
company, business trust, association, corporation, or other form of
business enterprise, including a receiver, trustee, or liquidating
agent and includes any officer or employee of a retailer or industry
member.
(5) "Retailer" means the holder of a license issued by the board to
allow for the sale of alcoholic beverages to consumers for consumption
on or off premises and any of the retailer's agents, officers,
directors, shareholders, partners, or employees. "Retailer" does not
include the board or any of the board's employees.
(6) "Undue influence" means one retailer or industry member
directly or indirectly influencing the purchasing, marketing, or sales
decisions of another retailer or industry member by any agreement
written or unwritten or any other business practices or arrangements
such as but not limited to the following:
(a) Any form of coercion between industry members and retailers or
between retailers and industry members through acts or threats of
physical or economic harm, including threat of loss of supply or threat
of curtailment of purchase;
(b) A retailer on an involuntary basis purchasing less than it
would have of another industry member's product;
(c) Purchases made by a retailer or industry member as a
prerequisite for purchase of other items;
(d) A retailer purchasing a specific or minimum quantity or type of
a product or products from an industry member;
(e) An industry member requiring a retailer to take and dispose of
a certain product type or quota of the industry member's products;
(f) A retailer having a continuing obligation to purchase or
otherwise promote or display an industry member's product;
(g) An industry member having a continuing obligation to sell a
product to a retailer;
(h) A retailer having a commitment not to terminate its
relationship with an industry member with respect to purchase of the
industry member's products or an industry member having a commitment
not to terminate its relationship with a retailer with respect to the
sale of a particular product or products;
(i) An industry member being involved in the day-to-day operations
of a retailer or a retailer being involved in the day-to-day operations
of an industry member in a manner that violates the provisions of this
section;
(j) Discriminatory pricing practices as prohibited by law or other
practices that are discriminatory in that product is not offered to all
retailers in the local market on the same terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any prohibitions and restrictions contained in
this title, it shall be lawful for an industry member or affiliate to
have a direct or indirect financial interest in another industry member
or a retailer, and for a retailer or affiliate to have a direct or
indirect financial interest in an industry member unless such interest
has resulted or is more likely than not to result in undue influence
over the retailer or the industry member or has resulted or is more
likely than not to result in an adverse impact on public health and
safety. The structure of any such financial interest must be
consistent with subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section and except as
provided in section 4 of this act:
(a) An industry member in whose name a license or certificate of
approval has been issued pursuant to this title may wholly own or hold
a financial interest in a separate legal entity licensed pursuant to
RCW 66.24.320 through 66.24.570, but may not have such a license issued
in its name; and
(b) A retailer in whose name a license has been issued pursuant to
this title may wholly own or hold a financial interest in a separate
legal entity licensed or holding a certificate of approval pursuant to
RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.206, 66.24.240, 66.24.244, 66.24.270(2),
66.24.200, or 66.24.250, but may not have such a license or certificate
of approval issued in its name; and
(c) A supplier in whose name a license or certificate of approval
has been issued pursuant to this title may wholly own or hold a
financial interest in a separate legal entity licensed as a distributor
or importer under this title, but such supplier may not have a license
as a distributor or importer issued in its own name; and
(d) A distributor or importer in whose name a license has been
issued pursuant to this title may wholly own or hold a financial
interest in a separate legal entity licensed or holding a certificate
of approval as a supplier under this title, but such distributor or
importer may not have a license or certificate of approval as a
supplier issued in its own name.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in section 3 of this act shall prohibit:
(1) A licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from being licensed
as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and at one additional
off-site retail only location.
(2) A domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to
reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted
by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is
not produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a
licensed beer or wine distributor.
(3) A microbrewery holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license
under RCW 66.24.320 from holding the same privileges and endorsements
attached to the beer and/or wine restaurant license.
(4) A licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own
production under RCW 66.24.145.
(5) A licensed distiller, domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or
domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
liquor at a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property
on which the primary manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller,
domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on
contiguous property owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic
brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted
by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and
endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license.
(7) A brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter 66.24
RCW operated on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from
holding a second retail only license at a location separate from the
premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(8) Retail licensees with a caterer's endorsement issued under RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from operating on a domestic winery premises.
(9) An organization qualifying under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the
purpose of constructing and operating a facility to promote Washington
wines from holding retail licenses on the facility property or leasing
all or any portion of such facility property to a retail licensee on
the facility property if the members of the board of directors or
officers of the board for the organization include officers, directors,
owners, or employees of a licensed domestic winery. Financing for the
construction of the facility must include both public and private
money.
(10) A bona fide charitable nonprofit society or association
registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, or a local wine industry association registered under
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code as
it existed on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(11) A person licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or
66.24.244 from exercising the privileges of distributing and selling at
retail such person's own production or from exercising any other right
or privilege that attaches to such license.
(12) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW
66.24.206 from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of
their own product or from shipping their own product directly to
consumers as authorized by RCW 66.20.360.
(13) A person holding a wine shipper's permit pursuant to RCW
66.20.375 from shipping their own product directly to consumers.
(14) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW
66.24.270(2) from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of
their own product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Any industry member or retailer or any other person seeking a
determination by the board as to whether a proposed or existing
financial interest has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
an adverse impact on public health and safety may file a complaint or
request for determination with the board. Upon receipt of a request or
complaint the board may conduct such investigation as it deems
appropriate in the circumstances. If the investigation reveals the
financial interest has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
an adverse impact on public health and safety the board may issue an
administrative violation notice or a notice of intent to deny the
license to the industry member, to the retailer, or both. If the
financial interest was acquired through a transaction that has already
been consummated when the board issues its administrative violation
notice, the board shall have the authority to require that the
transaction be rescinded or otherwise undone. The recipient of the
administrative notice of violation or notice of intent to deny the
license may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 7 of this act, no industry member
shall advance and no retailer shall receive moneys or moneys' worth
under an agreement written or unwritten or by means of any other
business practice or arrangement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Nothing in section 6 of this act prohibits an industry
member from providing retailers branded promotional items which are of
nominal value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are
not limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils,
coasters, menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses,
bottles or can openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts,
hats, visors, and other similar items. Branded promotional items:
(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a
manner consistent with its license;
(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member
only;
(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and
their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or
their employees to retail customers; and
(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.
(b) An industry member is not obligated to provide any such branded
promotional items, and a retailer may not require an industry member to
provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any
alcohol to the retailer.
(c) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of
this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is
otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may
file a complaint with the board. Upon receipt of a complaint the board
may conduct such investigation as it deems appropriate in the
circumstances. If the investigation reveals the provision of branded
promotional items has resulted in or is more likely than not to result
in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result
in an adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise
inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the board may issue an
administrative violation notice to the industry member, to the
retailer, or both. The recipient of the administrative violation
notice may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in section 6 of this act prohibits an industry member
from providing to a special occasion licensee and a special occasion
licensee from receiving services for:
(a) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;
or
(b) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer
or wine tasting exhibition or judging event.
(3) Nothing in section 6 of this act prohibits industry members
from performing, and retailers from accepting the service of building,
rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories; rotating
and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products;
providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of
their own brands; and performing such similar business services
consistent with board rules, or personal services as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in section 6 of this act prohibits:
(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and
(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information
related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or
promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or
(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and
their products.
(5) Nothing in section 6 of this act prohibits the performance of
personal services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or
certificate of approval holder to retailers when the personal services
are (a) conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform,
educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the
manufacturer's products. The performance of personal services may
include participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other
similar informational or educational activities at the premises of a
retailer holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine
and/or beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a
special occasion license, or a private club license. A domestic winery
or certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform any such
personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a domestic
winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any personal
service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail licensee.
Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be
borne, directly or indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of
approval holder or any distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits
wineries, certificate of approval holders, and retail licensees from
identifying the producers on private labels authorized under RCW
66.24.400, 66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(6) Nothing in section 6 of this act prohibits an industry member
from entering into an arrangement with any holder of a sports
entertainment facility license or an affiliated business for brand
advertising at the licensed facility or promoting events held at the
sports entertainment facility as authorized under RCW 66.24.570.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
All industry members and retailers shall keep and maintain the
following records on their premises for a three-year period:
(1) Records of all items, services, and moneys' worth furnished to
and received by a retailer and of all items, services, and moneys'
worth provided to a retailer and purchased by a retailer at fair market
value; and
(2) Records of all industry member financial ownership or interests
in a retailer and of all retailer financial ownership interests in an
industry member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall adopt rules as are deemed necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.28.180 and 2006 c 302 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
((It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewery license, a microbrewery
license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a
domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine
distributor's license within the state of Washington to modify any
prices without prior notification to and approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2))) (1) Beer and wine distributors ((price posting)).
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall ((file with the board at
its office in Olympia)) maintain at its liquor licensed location a
price ((posting)) list showing the wholesale prices at which any and
all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine distributor
shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price ((posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and)) list
shall set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or wine
offered for sale by such beer and/or wine distributor; and
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price ((posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect)) list, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be ((posted
that is)) below acquisition cost ((plus ten percent of acquisition
cost. However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it
may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost
as a minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of
the board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent)).
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be ((accepted by
the board)) allowed if the item to be discontinued has been listed ((on
the state market)) for a period of at least six months, and upon the
further condition that the distributor who ((posts)) offers such a
close-out price shall not restock the item for a period of one year
following the first effective date of such close-out price.
(f) ((The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all price
postings filed as required by this section constitute investigative
information and shall not be subject to disclosure, pursuant to RCW
42.56.240(1).
(h))) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by
the distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
((posted)) listed prices to any annual or special occasion retail
licensee upon presentation to the distributor or employee at the time
of purchase of a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(((i))) (g) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(((ii))) (h) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall
be delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. When a domestic winery, brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping
endorsement is acting as a distributor of its own production, a
licensed retailer may contract with a common carrier to obtain the
product directly from the domestic winery, brewery, microbrewery, or
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping endorsement. A
distributor's prices to retail licensees shall be the same at both such
places of delivery.
(((3))) (2) Beer and wine suppliers' ((price filings,))
contracts((,)) and memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, ((and)) domestic winery,
certificate of approval holder, and beer and/or wine importer offering
beer and/or wine for sale within the state and any beer and/or wine
distributor who sells to other beer and/or wine distributors shall
((file with the board at its office in Olympia)) maintain at its liquor
licensed location a price list and a copy of every written contract and
a memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery may
have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda
shall contain ((a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all
items and all terms of sale, including all regular and special
discounts;)):
(i) All advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and
(ii) All commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances.
(b) Whenever changed or modified, such revised contracts or
memoranda shall ((forthwith)) also be ((filed with the board as
provided for by rule. The provisions of this section also apply to
certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer
and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine
distributors)) maintained at its liquor licensed location.
(c) Each price ((schedule shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and)) list
shall set forth all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or
wine offered for sale by such licensed brewery or winery((; all
additional information required may be filed as a supplement to the
price schedule forms)).
(((b))) (d) Prices ((filed by)) of a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder shall
be uniform prices to all distributors or retailers on a statewide basis
less bona fide allowances for freight differentials. Quantity
discounts are prohibited. No price shall be ((filed that is)) below
acquisition/production cost ((plus ten percent of that cost, except
that acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not
apply to sales of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who
sells beer or wine to another beer or wine importer or to a beer or
wine distributor, or to a beer or wine distributor who sells beer or
wine to another beer or wine distributor. However, the board is
empowered to review periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the
amount of the percentage of acquisition/production cost as a minimum
mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the board,
except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent)).
(((c) No)) (e) A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
certificate of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine
distributor ((may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons
whatsoever in this state until copies of such written contracts or
memoranda of such oral agreements are on file with the board)) acting
as a supplier to another distributor must file a distributor
appointment with the board.
(((d))) (f) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price list for such package or container as shown in the ((schedule
of prices filed by)) price list of the domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder and then in effect,
according to rules adopted by the board.
(((e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract,
or memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be
in violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt
the orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all prices,
contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section constitute
investigative information and shall not be subject to disclosure,
pursuant to RCW 42.56.240(1).))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 66.28.010 (Manufacturers, importers,
distributors, and authorized representatives barred from interest in
retail business or location -- Advances prohibited -- "Financial interest"
defined -- Exceptions) and 2008 c 94 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---