BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Recognizing the paramount importance of
sustaining the highest levels of ferry system safety, the legislature
finds that a rigorous, open incident and accident investigation policy
is essential to the safe and reliable operation of the Washington state
ferry system. Drawing on information provided in response to previous
legislative direction, and noting recent accident/incident history, the
legislature finds an urgent need to upgrade Washington state ferries'
accident/incident investigation policies and procedures.
(2) After fully considering proposed upgraded accident/incident
investigation policies and procedures, it is the intent of the
legislature to enact the policies into law and to publish that law and
procedures as a manual for Washington state ferries' accident/incident
investigations. Until that time, the Washington state ferry system is
enjoined to exercise particular diligence to assure that any incident
or accident investigations are conducted within the spirit of the
guidelines of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
As a priority task, the Washington state ferries is directed to
propose a comprehensive incident and accident investigation policy and
appropriate procedures, and to provide the proposal to the legislature
by November 1, 2009, using existing resources and staff expertise. In
addition to consulting with ferry system unions and the United States
coast guard, the Washington state ferries is encouraged to solicit
independent outside expertise on incident and accident investigation
best practices as they may be found in other organizations with a
similar concern for marine safety. The policy must contain, at a
minimum:
(1) The definition of an incident and an accident and the type of
investigation that is required by both types of events;
(2) The process for appointing an investigating officer or officers
and a description of the authorities and responsibilities of the
investigating officer or officers. The investigating officer or
officers must:
(a) Have the appropriate training and experience as determined by
the policy;
(b) Not have been involved in the incident or accident so as to
avoid any conflict of interest;
(c) Have full access to all persons, records, and relevant
organizations that may have information about or may have contributed
to, directly or indirectly, the incident or accident under
investigation, in compliance with any affected employee's or employees'
respective collective bargaining agreement and state laws and rules
regarding public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW;
(d) Be provided with, if requested by the investigating officer or
officers, appropriate outside technical expertise; and
(e) Be provided with staff and legal support by the Washington
state ferries as may be appropriate to the type of investigation;
(3) The process of working with the affected employee or employees
in accordance with the employee's or employees' respective collective
bargaining agreement and the appropriate union officials, within
protocols afforded to all public employees;
(4) The process by which the United States coast guard is kept
informed of, interacts with, and reviews the investigation;
(5) The process for review, approval, and implementation of any
approved recommendations within the department; and
(6) The process for keeping the public informed of the
investigation and its outcomes, in compliance with any affected
employee's or employees' respective collective bargaining agreement and
state laws and rules regarding public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW.

--- END ---