BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.120 and 2007 c 329 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a district may
impose a fee or charge on the construction or reconstruction of
commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other commercial
or industrial building or building space or appurtenance, or on the
development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of land
for commercial purposes, only if done in accordance with chapter 39.92
RCW.
(2) Any fee or charge imposed under this section shall be used
exclusively for transportation improvements constructed ((by)) within
a district and constructed by a district or any other agency or entity.
The fees or charges imposed must be reasonably necessary as a result of
the impact of development, construction, or classification or
reclassification of land on identified transportation needs.
(3) If a county or city within the district area is levying a fee
or charge for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be
credited against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the
district.

--- END ---