BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that under the federal
clean water act, and the department of ecology's delegation of
authority to implement the federal clean water act as provided in RCW
90.48.260, certain cities in Washington should not be required to be
covered under the national pollutant discharge elimination system
municipal separate storm sewer systems (MS4) permit program. Certain
cities within Washington have unique soils and topography that makes
storm water management in those areas extraordinarily challenging.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that these cities be
exempt from the national pollutant discharge elimination system
municipal separate storm sewer systems permit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities with a population between twenty-four thousand five hundred
and twenty-five thousand, as reported in the 2000 census, and located
in a county with a population between forty thousand five hundred and
forty-one thousand five hundred, as reported in the 2000 census, east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains are exempt from the requirement
to obtain a national pollutant discharge elimination system municipal
separate storm sewer systems (MS4) permit, as provided in RCW
90.48.260.

--- END ---