BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) States, including Washington, benefit
from the immigration of persons from other nations and other states.
These immigrants bring not just skills and talents, but also new
perspectives and knowledge that enhance innovation and economic
vitality;
(2) The twenty-first century economy is both global, across
national borders, and dispersed, within national borders. Being global
means that the companies and workers who succeed, by enjoying better
incomes and higher standards of living, will be those integrated into
the global market;
(3) Being dispersed within national and state markets means
globalization is no longer something that concerns only businesses and
consumers in large cities. Companies and workers in smaller
communities have just as much to gain or lose from globalization as
their counterparts in larger cities;
(4) Companies that trade, whether by exporting, importing, or both,
need to think about global markets. But even companies and workers who
see themselves as domestic economic players will be increasingly
impacted by global economic changes and will need to understand the
complexities and opportunities of a global marketplace;
(5) Decisions regarding foreign direct investments in developed
countries like the United States depend not just on proximity to
markets and skilled labor, but also on the cultural climate and
openness of a community. Foreign investors are attracted to
communities that are outwardly oriented and have regular contact with
other cultures. The "sister city" concept is one manifestation of that
global perspective; and
(6) Another manifestation of a global perspective is the presence
of programs that serve the global outreach needs of a community's
citizens and that acknowledge the interests of their international
partners, including students, business representatives, and tourists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The college board shall recognize and support existing and emerging
global affairs centers established at community colleges. The mission
of a global affairs center is to foster global awareness, engagement,
and partnerships that serve the needs of its students as well as the
greater surrounding community. The goal is to create a central hub to
bring together the college community, government agencies, businesses,
and nonprofit organizations. When fully operational, a global affairs
center will operate a host of programs through activities that may
include, but are not limited to:
(1) Community programs. Community programs engage students,
faculty, and staff as well as members of the local community through
lectures, symposiums, and group discussions. The goal is to organize
activities on topical issues in ways that highlight local as well as
international perspectives and consequences. Community programs create
opportunities for further partnerships between the college and members
of the off-campus community.
(2) Referral services. A global affairs center serves as a first
point of contact for businesses and other organizations that need
reference points and referrals in order to take advantage of global
opportunities.
(3) Internship opportunities. A global affairs center assists
students to find internship opportunities with government, business,
and nonprofit organizations in the area with an international focus in
their work.
(4) International trade, development, and multicultural projects.
A global affairs center seeks to work with local organizations to
advance international initiatives on trade and development, such as the
United Nations initiative on sustainable development, in ways that
strengthen intercultural education and understanding.
(5) Learning programs. A global affairs center partners with
national learning programs that encourage discussion, understanding,
and action on current foreign policy issues.
(6) Support for ongoing programs. A global affairs center supports
related ongoing programs at the community college, such as
international studies, global pathways, study abroad, and
student/faculty exchange agreements with foreign colleges and schools.

--- END ---