BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
passenger vehicles, if the purchaser trades in a passenger vehicle that
is more than fifteen years old and the vehicle to be traded in is not
compliant with United States environmental protection agency tier II
emission standards. The exemption is only for the first two thousand
dollars of tax paid on the purchase price.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "passenger vehicle" has the
same meaning as "passenger car" provided in RCW 46.04.382.
(3) The exemption is available only if:
(a) The passenger vehicle to be traded in has been licensed and
registered for the twenty-four-month period immediately preceding the
sale and is in satisfactory operating condition; and
(b) The new vehicle purchased has a United States environmental
protection agency highway gasoline mileage rating of at least thirty
miles per gallon.
(4) Any trade-in property acquired from a person claiming the
exemption in this section must be destroyed.
(5) The total amount that may be taken by all purchasers as an
exemption under this section and section 2 of this act is twenty-five
million dollars per year. If the department determines that at least
twenty-two million dollars has been taken as an exemption under this
section and section 2 of this act, the department shall notify motor
vehicle dealers, in a writing sent by certified mail, that requires
dealers not to provide the exemption to motor vehicle purchasers
beginning two weeks from the date the letter is postmarked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of passenger vehicles if the purchaser trades in a passenger
vehicle to a motor vehicle dealer that is more than fifteen years old
and the vehicle to be traded in is not compliant with United States
environmental protection agency tier II emission standards. The
exemption is only for the first two thousand dollars of tax paid on the
purchase price.
(2) "Passenger vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in section
1 of this act.
(3) The exemption is available only if:
(a) The passenger vehicle to be traded in has been licensed and
registered for the twenty-four-month period immediately preceding the
sale and is in satisfactory operating condition; and
(b) The new vehicle purchased has a United States environmental
protection agency highway gasoline mileage rating of at least thirty
miles per gallon.
(4) Any trade-in property acquired from a person claiming the
exemption in this section must be destroyed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the clean
air and automobile incentive program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---