BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, there is
levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) ((Beginning July 1, 2003)) Except as provided in subsection (8)
of this section, there is levied and collected an additional tax of
three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of
a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed
under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account
created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsections (3) and (8) of this section, "motor
vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not
include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW
46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection shall be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.
(8) Until January 1, 2010, the total combined tax rate on the
retail sale of a new motor vehicle in this state is equal to three and
one-quarter percent of the selling price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for
fifty percent of the amount paid by a motor vehicle dealer licensed
under chapter 46.70 RCW or a dealer licensed by any other state. The
credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
reporting period.
(2) The credit earned in one reporting period may be carried over
to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent reporting period.
However, credit may not be carried over for more than twelve months
from the ending date of the reporting period in which the credit was
earned.
(3) No credit may be earned under this section on or after January
1, 2010.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2011.

--- END ---