BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.53.030 and 2008 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of man's past
through material remains.
(2) "Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the
physical evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture including
material remains of past human life including monuments, symbols,
tools, facilities, and technological by-products.
(3) "Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in
Washington, including but not limited to, submerged and submersible
lands and the bed of the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that
contains archaeological objects.
(4) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology
and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(6) "Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through
written documents in their own or other languages. As applied to
underwater archaeological resources, the term historic shall include
only those properties which are listed in or eligible for listing in
the Washington State Register of Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the
National Register of Historic Places as defined in the National
Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(7) "Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are unknown
through contemporaneous written documents in any language.
(8) "Professional archaeologist" means a person ((with
qualifications meeting the federal secretary of the interior's
standards for a professional archaeologist. Archaeologists not meeting
this standard may be conditionally employed by working under the
supervision of a professional archaeologist for a period of four years
provided the employee is pursuing qualifications necessary to meet the
federal secretary of the interior's standards for a professional
archaeologist. During this four-year period, the professional
archaeologist is responsible for all findings. The four-year period is
not subject to renewal)) who has met the educational, training, and
experience requirements of the register of professional archaeologists.
(9) "Amateur society" means any organization composed primarily of
persons who are not professional archaeologists, whose primary interest
is in the archaeological resources of the state, and which has been
certified in writing by two professional archaeologists.
(10) "Historic archaeological resources" means those properties
which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington State
Register of Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the National Register of
Historic Places as defined in the National Historic Preservation Act of
1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.

--- END ---