BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that solicitation on
the internet by or on behalf of a convicted felon who is incarcerated
regarding donations of money, the sale of any good, or the seeking of
inmate pen pals may expose unsuspecting persons to the risk of
potential harm and may induce them to take actions resulting in actual
harm or loss to their person or property. The legislature intends to
protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public by requiring
notice of the incarcerated status of a convicted felon in any
solicitation posted on the internet by or on behalf of the incarcerated
felon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any solicitation posted, with or without
the knowledge or direction of the incarcerated person, on the internet
by or on behalf of a convicted felon who is incarcerated regarding any
donation of money or other thing of value to or for the benefit of him
or her, the sale of any good or service provided by or for the benefit
of him or her, or the seeking of any pen pal or other correspondence
partner for him or her must include notice of the incarcerated status
of the felon.
(2) The notice must contain, at a minimum, the incarcerated
person's name under which he or she was convicted and the name being
used by or on behalf of him or her for purposes of the solicitation,
the crimes for which he or she was convicted and incarcerated, the full
term for which he or she was sentenced, and the earliest date at which
he or she may be released.
(3) The notice must be in a font that is in boldface and is larger
than the text of the solicitation, include the phrase "WARNING:
INCARCERATED FELON OFFENDER," be set off by means of a box, blank
space, or comparable visual device, and be located directly above the
solicitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Before any law enforcement officer may cite
or arrest a person for a violation of section 2 of this act, the
officer must warn the person that his or her conduct is in violation of
this chapter, provide the person a copy of this chapter, and warn the
person that a second violation will result in the imposition of civil
or criminal sanctions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A violation of section 2 of this act is
a class 2 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120 (a maximum monetary
penalty of one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments).
(2) A second violation of section 2 of this act is a class 1 civil
infraction under RCW 7.80.120 (a maximum monetary penalty of two
hundred twenty-five dollars, not including statutory assessments).
(3) A person who commits a third violation of section 2 of this act
is guilty of a misdemeanor (a fine of not more than one thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than ninety
days, or by both such fine and imprisonment).
(4) A person who commits a fourth or subsequent violation of
section 2 of this act is guilty of a gross misdemeanor (a fine of not
more than five thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in a county jail
for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

--- END ---