BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.28A.090 and 2006 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to establish a process for
issuing firearms certificates to residents of Washington who are
qualified retired law enforcement officers for the purpose of
satisfying the certification requirements contained in the federal law
enforcement officers safety act of 2004 (118 Stat. 865; 18 U.S.C. Sec.
926B and 926C).
(2)(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall develop a firearms certificate form to be used by local law
enforcement agencies when issuing firearms certificates to retired law
enforcement officers under this section.
(b) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
develop an annual qualification certificate form to be used by retired
law enforcement officers as proof that the officer has completed the
annual qualification requirement under subsection (5) of this section.
(3) A retired law enforcement officer who is a resident of
Washington may apply for a firearms certificate with a local law
enforcement agency. The local law enforcement agency may issue the
firearms certificate to a retired law enforcement officer if the
officer:
(a) Has been qualified or otherwise found to meet the standards
established by the criminal justice training commission for firearms
qualifications for active law enforcement officers in the state; and
(b) Has undergone the same background check as required under RCW
9.41.070 and is not ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040
or 9.41.045.
(4) The qualification required under (([subsection])) subsection
(3)(a) of this section may be performed by the local law enforcement
agency or by an individual or entity certified to provide firearms
training.
(5) ((The firearms certificate is valid for a period of one year.))
In addition to the firearms certificate, a retired law enforcement
officer must also carry an annual qualification certificate that the
officer has been qualified or otherwise found to have met the standards
established by the criminal justice training commission for firearms
qualifications for active law enforcement officers in the state not
less than one year before the date the officer is carrying a firearm.
(6) An applicant for the firearms certificate shall pay a fee of
thirty-six dollars, plus additional charges imposed by the federal
bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. The fee
shall be distributed in the same manner as the fee for a concealed
pistol license under RCW 9.41.070. The retired law enforcement officer
is also responsible for paying the costs of the firearms qualification
required under (([subsection])) subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "local law enforcement
agencies" means the chief of police of a city or town or his or her
designee; and the county sheriff or his or her designee.
(8) The firearms certificate is valid for a period of five years.
(9) The annual qualification certificate is valid for a period of
one year.

--- END ---