BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state is projected to experience substantial population and
employment growth in the next two decades and this growth will require
substantial new housing, places of employment, community facilities,
and supporting local, subregional, and regional infrastructure;
(2) In most areas of the state projected to accommodate substantial
growth, there are inadequate community facilities and infrastructure to
facilitate and support such growth. In addition, there is inadequate
public financing and public financing mechanisms available to provide
the needed community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure;
(3) A more flexible type of financing mechanism known as a
community facilities district should be available to counties, cities,
and towns so that needed community facilities and local, subregional,
and regional infrastructure can be provided; and
(4) This act is intended to facilitate voluntary landowner
financing of community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure by authorizing the creation of community facilities
districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community facilities commission" or "commission" means the
governing body of a community facilities district.
(2) "Community facilities district" or "district" means a municipal
corporation, an independent taxing authority within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a taxing district
within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution
that has been created by a vote of the people under this title to
implement a community facilities district.
(3) "Petition" means a voluntary landowner request for formation of
a community facilities district and a request to submit their land to
the taxes and benefit charges authorized under this title consistent
with the requirements provided in section 202 of this act. Petition
also means any amended petition filed consistent with the requirements
provided in section 202 of this act.

PART II
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT FORMATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Community facilities districts are
authorized to be established as provided in this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 For the purpose of the formation of a
community facilities district, a petition must be filed with the
county, city, or town in which the district is located. The petition
must be executed by all persons having an ownership interest of record
in the lands within the proposed district including a certification of
their desire to voluntarily submit their land located within the
district to the taxes and benefit charges authorized under this title,
designating the boundaries of the proposed district, by metes and
bounds, or by describing the lands to be included in the proposed
district by United States townships, ranges, and legal subdivisions,
setting forth the object, plan, and financing for the creation of the
proposed district and must allege that the establishment of the
proposed district will be conducive to the public safety, welfare, and
convenience, and will be a benefit to the property included in the
proposed district. The petition must be accompanied by an obligation
signed by two or more petitioners, agreeing to pay the cost of the
formation processes required by this title. Any petition may, from
time to time, be amended so long as it is executed by all persons
having an ownership interest of record in the lands within the district
or proposed district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A public hearing on the petition must be
held by the legislative authority of the county, city, or town in which
the proposed district is located not less than twenty nor more than
forty days from the date of receipt of the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Notice of the public hearing must be
published for three consecutive weeks in the official paper of the
applicable county, city, or town prior to the date set for the hearing
and must be posted for not less than fifteen days prior to the date of
the hearing in each of three public places within the boundaries of the
proposed district. The notices must contain the time, date, and place
of the public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 At the time and place of the hearing set
for the petition, the applicable legislative authority must consider
the petition and must receive evidence as it deems material in favor of
or opposed to the formation of the district or to the inclusion or
exclusion of any lands. No lands outside of the boundaries of the
proposed district described in the petition may be included within the
district without a written petition meeting the requirements as
provided in section 202 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 The legislative authority for the county,
city, or town in which the proposed district is located has the
authority to consider the petition and, if it finds that the lands or
any portion of the lands described in the petition, and any lands added
thereto by petition of those interested, will be benefited and that the
formation of the district will be conducive to the public safety,
welfare, and convenience, it must make a finding by resolution;
otherwise it must deny the petition. If the legislative authority
approves the petition, said approval must be consistent with the terms
and conditions of the petition and must designate the name and number
of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 Any person or entity having a substantial
interest and feeling aggrieved by any finding, determination, or
resolution of the legislative authority in the proceedings for the
organization of a community facilities district under this title may
appeal within five days after the action of the legislative authority,
to the superior court of the county, in the same manner as provided by
law for appeals from the orders and determinations of the applicable
legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 After the expiration of five days from the
approval of the resolution of the legislative authority declaring the
district to be organized, and the filing of the certified copies of the
resolution, the creation of the district is complete and its legal
existence cannot thereafter be questioned by any person by reason of a
defect in the proceedings for the organization of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 Upon expiration of the appeal period
provided for under section 207 of this act or, upon judicial resolution
of an appeal upholding and confirming the formation of the district,
the election officials of the county, city, or town in which the
district is located must hold an election for the initial community
facilities commissioners in accordance with the general election laws
of the state. The commission must always be composed of the following
three members (1) the largest landowner within the district, (2) a
voter residing within the district, and (3) an elected official from
the legislative authority of the county, city, or town approving the
formation of the district. This election must be held at the next
general election date according to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, which
occurs after the date of the action by the legislative authority
approving the petition. The largest landowner in the district must
automatically be added to the ballot and only requires one vote to be
approved as a commissioner. With respect to position number two, any
voter residing within the district may add their name to the ballot.
With respect to position number three, the appropriate legislative
authority must nominate one or more of its members for candidacy. The
legislative authority must declare the candidates receiving the highest
number of votes to be the initial community facilities commissioners of
the district. The term of office for each commissioner is six years.

PART III
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT COMMISSION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The affairs of the district must be
managed by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The polling places for the election of the
community facilities district commissioners may be located inside or
outside the boundaries of the district and the election may not be held
to be irregular or void on that account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Before beginning the duties of office,
each community facilities commissioner must take and subscribe the
official oath for the faithful discharge of the duties of office as
required by RCW 29A.04.133, which oath must be filed in the office of
the auditor of the county in which all, or the largest portion of, the
district is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 All meetings of the commission must be
conducted in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW and a majority
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. All records of
the commission must be open to inspection in accordance with chapter
42.56 RCW. The commission has the power and duty to adopt a seal of
the district, to manage and conduct the business affairs of the
district, to make and execute all necessary contracts, to employ any
necessary services, and to adopt reasonable rules to govern the
district and to perform its functions, and generally to perform all
acts as may be necessary to carry out the objects of the creation of
the district.

PART IV
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS POWERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Community facilities districts created
under this title are political subdivisions of the state and are held
to be municipal corporations within the laws and Constitution of the
state of Washington. A community facilities district constitutes a
body corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter
be specifically conferred by law. Notwithstanding any and all of the
powers of the district granted by the laws and Constitution of the
state and by this title, all actions of the district must be consistent
with the terms and conditions of the petition or amended petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Community facilities districts have full
authority to carry out their purposes and to that end may acquire,
purchase, hold, lease, manage, occupy, construct, and sell real and
personal property, facilities, or any interest therein, to enter into
and to perform any and all necessary contracts, to appoint and employ
the necessary officers, agents, and employees, to sue and be sued, to
levy and enforce the collection of taxes, assessments, and benefit
charges in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in this
title against the lands within the district for district revenues, and
to do any and all lawful acts required and expedient to carry out the
purpose of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Any community facilities district
organized under this title may:
(1) Lease, acquire, own, maintain, operate, construct, and provide
community facilities apparatus and all other necessary or proper
facilities, machinery, and equipment for community facilities
operations and projects;
(2) Lease, acquire, own, maintain, construct, and operate real
property, improvements, and fixtures for housing, repairing, and
maintaining the apparatus, facilities, machinery, and equipment
described in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Contract with any governmental entity under chapter 39.34 RCW
or private person or entity to consolidate, provide, or cooperate for
community facilities operations and projects. In so contracting, the
district or governmental entity is deemed for all purposes to be acting
within its governmental capacity; and
(4) Perform acts consistent with this title and not otherwise
prohibited by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Community facilities districts may execute
executory conditional sales contracts, installment promissory notes
secured by a deed of trust, or mortgages with a governmental entity or
a private party for the purchase or sale of any real or personal
property, or property rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 (1) Consistent with the terms and
conditions set forth in a petition filed under this title, a community
facilities district may finance through the use of taxes, assessments,
and benefit charges, as provided in this title, the cost of purchase,
construction, expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of any facility
with an estimated life of five years or longer or may finance planning
and design work that is directly related to the purchase, construction,
expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of any facility.
(2) A community facilities district may finance facilities
including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Facilities listed in RCW 35.43.040 to the extent not specified
in this section;
(b) Sanitary sewage systems, including collection, transport,
storage, treatment, dispersal, effluent use, and discharge;
(c) Drainage and flood control systems, including collection,
transport, diversion, storage, detention, retention, dispersal, use,
and discharge;
(d) Water systems for domestic, industrial, irrigation, municipal,
or community facilities purposes, including production, collection,
storage, treatment, transport, delivery, connection, and dispersal;
(e) Highways, streets, roadways, and parking facilities, including
all areas for vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(f) Areas for pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle, or other nonmotor
vehicle use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(g) Pedestrian malls, parks, recreational facilities, and open-space facilities for the use of members of the public for
entertainment, assembly, and recreation;
(h) Landscaping, including earthworks, structures, lakes, and other
water features, plants, trees, and related water delivery systems;
(i) Public buildings, public safety facilities, and community
facilities;
(j) Natural gas transmission and distribution facilities,
facilities for the transmission or distribution of electrical energy,
and communication facilities including, but not limited to, telephone
and internet lines and cables and wireless systems;
(k) Lighting systems;
(l) Traffic control systems and devices, including signals,
controls, markings, and signage;
(m) Systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways,
tramways, buses, or any other means of mass transportation facilities,
including passenger, terminal, station parking, and related facilities
and areas for passenger and vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress,
and parking;
(n) Library, educational, and cultural facilities; and
(o) Facilities similar to those listed in this section.
(3) This chapter does not authorize a district to finance general
government operations and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 The district many construct, finance, or
invest in community facilities in any place, inside or outside the
boundaries of the district, where the facility provides benefit to the
district and the properties within the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 The commission of the district has the
authority to contract indebtedness and to refund the same for any
general district purpose, including expenses of maintenance, operation,
and administration, and the acquisition and construction of facilities,
and evidence the same by the issuance and sale of general obligation
and/or revenue bonds of the district payable at such time or times not
longer than twenty years from the issuing date of the bonds. The bonds
must be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW and other
applicable law. Notwithstanding any other limitation provided by law,
such bonds may be issued together with any outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness up to the amounts allowed
under the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 Community facilities districts are
authorized to incur general indebtedness for capital purposes and to
issue general obligation bonds not to exceed an amount, together with
any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, up to the limits
provided under the state Constitution, and to provide for the
retirement thereof by excess property tax levies and benefit charges
authorized under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 To carry out the purposes for which
community facilities districts are created, the commission of a
district may levy each year, in addition to the other levies and
charges authorized under this title, for the payment of the principal
and interest of any outstanding general obligation bonds, an ad valorem
tax on all taxable property located in the district consistent with the
terms of a petition filed under this title, other applicable
requirements of this title, and the limits imposed under the state
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 A community facilities district may accept
and receive on behalf of the district any money or property donated,
devised, or bequeathed to the district, and may carry out the terms of
the donation, devise, or bequest, if within the powers granted by law
to community facilities districts. In the absence of such terms, a
community facilities district may expend or use the money or property
for district purposes as determined by the commission.

PART V
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS FINANCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 It is the duty of the county treasurer in
which the community facilities district created under this title is
located to receive and disburse district revenues, to collect taxes,
benefit charges, and assessments authorized and levied under this
title, and to credit district revenues to the proper fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 The county treasurer's office must
maintain the following funds for each community facilities district:
(1) Expense fund; (2) reserve fund; (3) general obligation bond fund;
(4) revenue bond fund; and (5) other funds as the commission of the
district may establish. Taxes levied for administrative, operative,
and maintenance purposes, for the purchase of machinery and equipment,
for the finance and construction of facilities, and for the purchase of
real property, when collected, and proceeds from the sale of general
obligation and revenue bonds must be placed by the county treasurer in
the proper fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 At the time of making general tax levies
the district must make the required levies for district purposes
against the real and personal property in the district consistent with
the terms and conditions of the petition. The tax levies are a part of
the general tax roll and must be collected as a part of the general
taxes against the property in the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, money received for the account of the district
on warrants issued must be paid against the proper funds of the
district. The warrants must be issued on vouchers approved and signed
by a majority of the commissioners and by the district secretary.
(2) The community facilities commissioners, after auditing all
payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one general
certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the secretary of
the commission, authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the
warrants specified by date, number, name, and amount, and the
accounting funds on which the warrants must be drawn; thereupon the
district secretary may issue the warrants specified in the general
certificate.
(3) The county treasurer may also pay general obligation bonds
and/or revenue bonds and the accrued interest thereon in accordance
with their terms from the appropriate fund when interest or principal
payments become due. The county treasurer must report in writing
monthly to the secretary of the district the amount of money held by
the county in each fund and the amounts of receipts and disbursements
for each fund during the preceding month.

PART VI
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS BENEFIT CHARGES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 (1) Consistent with the terms and
conditions of a petition filed under this title the community
facilities commission may by resolution, for community facilities
district purposes authorized by law, fix and impose a benefit charge on
personal property, real property, and improvements to real property
which are located within the community facilities district on the date
specified and which have or will receive the benefits provided by the
community facilities district, to be paid by the owners of the
properties.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the facilities and
services afforded by the district. It is acceptable to apportion the
benefit charge to the values of the properties as found by the county
assessor or assessors modified generally in the proportion that
community facilities' operations and projects provide benefits to real
property within the district. Any other method that reasonably
apportions the benefit charges to the actual benefits resulting from
the improved value of real properties within the district due to
community facilities' operations and projects may be specified in the
resolution and are subject to contest on the ground of unreasonable or
capricious action or action in excess of the measurable benefits to the
property resulting from services afforded by the district.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the district, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 The resolution establishing benefit
charges must specify, by legal geographical areas or other specific
designations, the charge to apply to each property by location, type,
or other designation, or other information that is necessary to the
proper computation of the benefit charge to be charged to each property
owner subject to the resolution. The secretary of the district must
determine and identify the personal properties, real property, and
improvements to real property which are subject to a benefit charge in
each community facilities district and must furnish and deliver to the
county treasurer of that county a listing of the properties with
information describing the location, legal description, and address of
the person to whom the statement of benefit charges is to be mailed,
the name of the owner, and the value of the property and improvements,
together with the benefit charge to apply to each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Each community facilities district must
contract, prior to the imposition of a benefit charge, for the
administration and collection of the benefit charge by each county
treasurer, who must deduct a percent, as provided by contract to
reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county assessor and
county treasurer in the administration of the resolution and this
chapter. The county treasurer must make distributions each year, as
the charges are collected, in the amount of the benefit charges imposed
on behalf of each district, less the deduction provided for in the
contract.

PART VII
IMPACT FEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.02
RCW to read as follows:
A community facilities district may not be required to pay an
impact fee under the provisions of RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090.

PART VIII
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 Sections 101 through 603 of this act
constitute a new title in the Revised Code of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 Parts I through VI of this act constitute
new chapters in the new title created under section 801 of this act and
are to be codified as new chapters in the new title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---