BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature commends the state board
of health for its commitment to making schools safe and to ensuring
healthy learning environments for all children. While the legislature
is also committed to the health and safety of Washington's school
children, it recognizes that it cannot practically implement the state
board of health's proposed school environmental health and safety rules
without an extended phase-in period in light of other budget
constraints.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
Before implementation of the school environmental health and safety
rules, the state board of health shall present the rules and a final
cost estimate to the legislature, and the legislature shall formally
approve the implementation of the rules through the omnibus
appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution. The
legislature may incrementally phase-in appropriations to support the
school environmental health and safety rules until full implementation
can be achieved.

--- END ---