BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that nearly half of
all recipients in the state's temporary assistance for needy families
program return to the program more than once, seeking financial
assistance. The legislature also finds that the inability of those
recipients to attain a living wage job and to exit the program
permanently remains a concern. The legislature finds that ample
evidence demonstrates the connection between educational attainment and
increased earnings over time. The legislature also finds that policies
to encourage more recipients in the temporary assistance for needy
families program to pursue the educational and training opportunities
available to them can move more recipients into living wage jobs so
they can exit public financial assistance programs permanently.
Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the WorkFirst program to
develop appropriate strategies to increase participation in educational
and training programs available to recipients in order to promote
higher rates of postprogram employment in living wage jobs and to
reduce the rate of reentry into the program.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2006 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for
((moving the recipient immediately into)) maximizing the recipient's
success at meeting the employment goal; (b) considers WorkFirst
educational and training programs from which the recipient could
benefit; (c) contains the obligation of the recipient to ((become and
remain employed)) participate in the program by complying with the
plan; (((c))) (d) moves the recipient into ((whatever employment the
recipient is capable of handling)) full-time WorkFirst activities as
quickly as possible; and (((d))) (e) describes the services available
to the recipient either during or after WorkFirst to enable the
recipient to obtain and keep employment and to advance in the workplace
and increase the recipient's wage earning potential over time.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated.
(4) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(5) In implementing this section, the department shall assign the
highest priority to the most employable clients, including adults in
two-parent families and parents in single-parent families that include
older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in work
activities.
(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.
(7) Assessments conducted under this section shall include a
consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging in
financial literacy activities. The department shall consider the
options for financial literacy activities available in the community,
including information and resources available through the financial
literacy public-private partnership created under RCW 28A.300.450. The
department may authorize up to ten hours of financial literacy
activities as a core activity or an optional activity under WorkFirst.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall continue to implement WorkFirst program
improvements that are designed to achieve progress against outcome
measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job
retention and wage progression shall be reported quarterly to
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for
families who leave assistance, measured after twelve months, twenty-four months, and thirty-six months. The department shall also report
the percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance
for needy families after twelve months, twenty-four months, and thirty-six months. The department shall make every effort to maximize
vocational training, as allowed by federal and state requirements.

--- END ---