BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any minor of ordinary intelligence and awareness sufficient for
him or her generally to comprehend the need for, the nature of, and the
significant risks ordinarily inherent in any contemplated hospital,
medical, or dental treatment or procedure is competent to consent
thereto on his or her own behalf, and any health care provider shall
rely upon such consent if given pursuant to the terms of RCW 7.70.060.
In determining whether a minor is competent to give consent to
hospital, medical, or dental treatment or procedures, a health care
provider may consider the minor's age, maturity, training, and
experience, and the control or absence of the minor's parents.
(2) Before a minor may consent on his or her own behalf for a
nonemergency surgical procedure, the health care provider must ensure
that one additional health care provider explains the need for, nature
of, and significant risks ordinarily inherent in the treatment. Once
the minor has received explanations from two health care providers, the
minor may give or withhold consent, subject to subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) A health care provider or medical facility is not liable for
the examination and treatment of a minor under this section except for
the provider's or the facility's own acts of negligence or intentional
misconduct.
(4) Consent to hospital, medical, dental, and surgical treatment
under this section is not subject to disaffirmance by a health care
provider because the person giving consent is a minor.

--- END ---