BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all state
agencies including all state departments, boards, councils,
commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as a
nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art
may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half
of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to
provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including
conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts
commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the
purpose of this section building shall not include highway construction
sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.
(2) For construction commencing during the 2009-2011 biennium, one
hundred percent of moneys appropriated for the original construction of
any transportation-related building may be used for the original
construction. Any savings resulting from appropriations in this
subsection must be credited to the motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---