BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) A small number of persons with developmental disabilities
commit crimes, are held in jail, are tried for their offenses, and are
sentenced to serve time in our correctional system;
(b) Persons with developmental disabilities are often confused with
persons with mental illness. These populations are different and must
be understood as distinct groups, with different reasonable
accommodation needs; and
(c) A developmental disability often stems from a mix of causes and
many persons with developmental disabilities have cognitive impairments
that require reasonable accommodations to assure they understand what
is happening to them and what is expected of them when they encounter
the criminal justice system.
(2) The legislature intends to ensure that persons with
developmental disabilities are identified early in the confinement
process, that staff in local correctional facilities are trained in how
to best support persons with developmental disabilities during
confinement, and that persons with developmental disabilities remain
safe when confined in a correctional facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Within state and federal funds
appropriated or otherwise available for this purpose, the developmental
disabilities council and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall jointly develop a simple screening tool, a model
policy for the use of the screening tool, and a cost-effective means to
provide concise training to local correctional facility staff on the
use of the tool and how to accommodate the needs of persons with
developmental disabilities during their confinement. This work shall
be completed by July 1, 2010, in consultation with the department of
social and health services, the department of corrections, disability
rights Washington, consumer advocates, and other interested
organizations.
(2) On or before January 1, 2011, local correctional facilities
shall provide the training developed under subsection (1) of this
section, and shall begin use of the screening tool to identify persons
likely to have a developmental disability at the time of booking or
risk classification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The work group consisting of the
developmental disabilities council, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the department of social and health services, disability
rights Washington, consumer advocates, and other interested
organizations, shall develop recommendations to the legislature related
to:
(1) Expeditiously reviewing and determining eligibility for
developmental disabilities services provided through the department of
social and health services prior to a person's release from
confinement;
(2) The appropriate role of the department of social and health
services in providing consultation and technical assistance to local
correctional facilities in their efforts to provide reasonable
accommodations for persons with developmental disabilities who are
confined in their facility;
(3) Increasing the appropriate use of the authority granted the
courts under current sentencing reform act provisions, chapter 9.94A
RCW, to order alternatives to confinement prior to trial or following
conviction in cases with a sentence of twelve months or less;
(4) The establishment of new options under the sentencing reform
act to divert persons with developmental disabilities from the criminal
justice system while maintaining public safety; and
(5) The feasibility of developing and adopting law enforcement
training for responding to persons with developmental disabilities that
is analogous to the crisis intervention training currently provided to
law enforcement officers for responding to alleged criminal behavior by
persons with mental illness.
(6) The work group shall report its recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 71A RCW.

--- END ---