BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.370.020 and 2007 c 259 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office shall serve as a coordinating body for public and
private efforts to improve quality in health care, promote cost-effectiveness in health care, and plan health facility and health
service availability. In addition, the office shall facilitate access
to health care data collected by public and private organizations as
needed to conduct its planning responsibilities.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Conduct strategic health planning activities related to the
preparation of the strategy, as specified in this chapter;
(b) Develop a computerized system for accessing, analyzing, and
disseminating data relevant to strategic health planning
responsibilities. The office may contract with an organization to
create the computerized system capable of meeting the needs of the
office;
(c) ((Maintain access to deidentified data collected and stored by
any public and private organizations as necessary to support its
planning responsibilities, including state purchased health care
program data, hospital discharge data, and private efforts to collect
utilization and claims-related data. The office is authorized to enter
into any data sharing agreements and contractual arrangements necessary
to obtain data or to distribute data. Among the sources of
deidentified data that the office may access are any databases
established pursuant to the recommendations of the health information
infrastructure advisory board established by chapter 261, Laws of 2005.
The office may store limited data sets as necessary to support its
activities. Unless specifically authorized, the office shall not
collect data directly from the records of health care providers and
health care facilities, but shall make use of databases that have
already collected such information)) Have access to the information
submitted as part of the health professional licensing application and
renewal process, excluding social security number and background check
information, whether the license is issued by the secretary of the
department of health or a board or commission. The office shall also
have access to information submitted to the department of health as
part of the medical or health facility licensing process. Access to
and use of all data shall be in accordance with state and federal
confidentiality laws and ethical guidelines, and the office shall
maintain the same degree of confidentiality as the department of
health. For professional licensing information provided to the office,
the department of health shall replace any social security number with
an alternative identifier capable of linking all licensing records of
an individual; and
(d) Conduct research and analysis or arrange for research and
analysis projects to be conducted by public or private organizations to
further the purposes of the strategy.
(3) The office shall establish a technical advisory committee to
assist in the development of the strategy. Members of the committee
shall include health economists, health planners, representatives of
government and nongovernment health care purchasers, representatives of
state agencies that use or regulate entities with an interest in health
planning, representatives of acute care facilities, representatives of
long-term care facilities, representatives of community-based long-term
care providers, representatives of health care providers, a
representative of one or more federally recognized Indian tribes, and
representatives of health care consumers. The committee shall include
members with experience in the provision of health services to rural
communities.

--- END ---