BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The autopsy of a child under three years of age shall be performed
in a facility designed for the performance of autopsies that is fully
accredited by the national association of medical examiners and may not
be performed in a funeral home.

Sec. 2 RCW 68.50.104 and 2001 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The cost of autopsy shall be borne by the county in which the
autopsy is performed, except when requested by the department of labor
and industries, in which case, the department shall bear the cost of
such autopsy.
(2) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, when the county
bears the cost of an autopsy, it shall be reimbursed from the death
investigations account, established by RCW 43.79.445, as follows:
(a) Up to forty percent of the cost of contracting for the services
of a pathologist to perform an autopsy;
(b) Up to twenty-five percent of the salary of pathologists who are
primarily engaged in performing autopsies and are (i) county coroners
or county medical examiners, or (ii) employees of a county coroner or
county medical examiner; and
(c) When the county bears the cost of an autopsy of a child under
the age of three whose death was sudden and unexplained, the county
shall be reimbursed for the expenses of the autopsy when the death
scene investigation and the autopsy have been conducted under RCW
43.103.100 (4) and (5), and the autopsy has been done at a facility
designed for the performance of autopsies that is, on or after July 1,
2010, fully accredited by the national association of medical examiners
and not in a funeral home. If the county that performed the death
investigation is different than the county that performed the autopsy,
the reimbursement shall be shared equally by both counties.
Payments from the account shall be made pursuant to biennial
appropriation: PROVIDED, That no county may reduce funds appropriated
for this purpose below 1983 budgeted levels.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.103.040 and 1995 c 398 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall consist of twelve members who shall be selected
as follows: One county coroner; one county prosecutor; one county
prosecutor who also serves as ex officio county coroner; one county
medical examiner; one county sheriff; one chief of police; the chief of
the state patrol; two members of a county legislative authority; one
pathologist who is currently in private practice; and two members of a
city legislative authority.
The governor shall appoint members to the council from among the
nominees submitted for each position as follows: The Washington
association of county officials shall submit two nominees each for the
coroner position and the medical examiner position; the Washington
state association of counties shall submit two nominees each for the
two county legislative authority positions; the association of
Washington cities shall submit two nominees each for the two city
legislative authority positions; the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys shall submit two nominees each for the county
prosecutor-ex officio county coroner and for the county prosecutor
position; the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall submit two nominees each for the county sheriff position and the
chief of police position; and the Washington association of
pathologists shall submit two nominees for the private pathologist
position.
When appointing members to the council who represent cities or
counties, the governor shall ensure, whenever practicable, that cities
and counties that have higher numbers of death investigations have a
proportionally higher number of positions on the council as compared to
cities and counties that have lower numbers of death investigations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2010.

--- END ---