BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that children needing
out-of-home placement in dependency and termination proceedings are
often best served when they are placed with relatives or other suitable
persons with whom they have a positive relationship. The legislature
further finds that state and federal law recognizes the potential
benefit to children of being placed with appropriate relatives and
other suitable persons. The legislature also finds that in order to
best support the child and reduce the likelihood of multiple
placements, the search for potential placements for a child should be
prompt, efficient, comprehensive, and conducted at the earliest
indication the child has been, or is likely to be, removed from home by
court order. The legislature intends to increase the efficiency and
expedite the search process for relatives and other suitable persons
who may be placement options for a child by directing the department of
social and health services to enter into a performance contract with a
service provider in one demonstration region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall contract in one demonstration region for
a relative search service provider, with the goal of earlier
identification of more persons who can be appropriate and stable
placement options for children in dependency or termination
proceedings. The department shall select the region with the lowest
rate of relative placements as of the effective date of this act. The
terms of the performance contract shall:
(a) Specify that the search process shall seek to identify
relatives, as described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) and other suitable
persons as described in RCW 13.34.130(1)(b) at the earliest indication
the child is or will be in need of an out-of-home placement;
(b) Describe the methods to be used by the department and the
contractor for gathering preliminary information about the child, the
family, and significant relationships, including a process for
gathering and documenting preliminary information from the parents and
the child, unless by virtue of age or disability, the child is unable
to communicate such information;
(c) Include processes and timelines for the contractor to provide
the names of all persons identified during the search process, whether
successfully contacted or not, as possible placement options for a
child;
(d) Describe how the contractor shall make the initial contact with
a potential placement resource, as well as how the information from the
initial contact will be transmitted to the department for further
review and a final determination of whether the potential placement
resource meets minimum criteria for a child's out-of-home placement
under chapter 13.34 RCW, and whether the department will seek court
approval for such placement based on the child's best interests;
(e) Describe the performance outcomes to be measured under the
contract, the majority of which must directly relate to earlier
identification of appropriate and stable placement options for children
needing out-of-home care in dependency or termination proceedings; and
(f) Include any other elements necessary to comply with state or
federal laws or to assure that performance under the contract is
aligned with other elements of child protection and child welfare
practices, including state and agency policies for the health, safety,
and well-being of children.
(2) The department may incorporate the contract required under this
section with another performance contract if doing so is likely to
result in improved administrative efficiencies or improved outcomes for
children.
(3) The department shall brief the governor and the legislature by
September 1, 2010, regarding performance under the contract and
recommend whether and how the same or similar approach to the search
for relatives and other suitable persons should be expanded to other
regions of the state.

--- END ---