BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide more effective and efficient access to facilities and services
that primarily serve clients with special transportation needs. The
legislature recognizes that an important step in improving access is
strengthening the link between facility siting determinations and
decisions regarding transportation services provided to those
facilities. It is the intent of the legislature to establish a
coordinated effort, and to develop guidelines for both private and
public entities, which results in improved access to medical, social,
and human services facilities for persons with special transportation
needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2010, the agency council on coordinated
transportation must appoint a work group, chaired by the office of
financial management, to develop criteria and guidelines described
under section 3 of this act to ensure better coordination between the
siting of state funded facilities, whether funded in part or in full,
which employ or provide services to a high proportion of persons with
special transportation needs, and access to those facilities by patrons
of special needs transportation providers. For purposes of this
section and section 3 of this act, "special needs transportation
providers" includes public transportation agencies, private for-profit
entities, private nonprofit entities, and civic and community-based
organizations.
(2) Membership of the work group includes, but is not limited to,
one or more representatives from:
(a) The departments of social and health services, health, general
administration, employment security, transportation, and community,
trade, and economic development;
(b) The office of financial management;
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(d) Public transit agencies;
(e) Medicaid nonemergency medical transportation brokers;
(f) Patrons of special needs transportation;
(g) Appropriate care facility associations;
(h) Counties and cities;
(i) Regional transportation planning organizations; and
(j) The agency council on coordinated transportation.
(3) The work group must also consult with other persons who
directly provide services to special needs transportation patrons,
including drivers of special needs transportation vehicles and personal
attendants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In developing criteria and guidelines described under section
2 of this act, the work group established in section 2 of this act must
consider, at minimum:
(a) Transportation for persons with special needs as an element of
facility predesign and modified predesign phases, as described under
chapters 43.88 and 43.82 RCW, including whether this element should be
included in the life-cycle cost analysis of such facilities;
(b) The dependence of certain client populations and staff on
special needs transportation services to access the facilities;
(c) How the costs and convenience of transportation services for
facility users is or should be taken into account when facilities are:
(i) Established, contracted for, or are otherwise acquired or
located; and
(ii) Closed or divested;
(d) Existing and planned public and private transportation options
that provide service to such facilities;
(e) Transportation options that compensate for a lack of public
transportation to facilities, and costs related to those options;
(f) Cost reduction strategies that address facilities sited outside
of a public transit agency's service area;
(g) The impact of statutory parking requirements for housing that
primarily serves persons with special transportation needs on facility
siting decisions;
(h) The feasibility of allowing providers of special needs
transportation services an opportunity to comment on the siting of such
facilities in advance of siting determinations; and
(i) When applicable, the available transportation resources that
are part of the programs or services provided by a facility's occupant,
lessee, or contracting party.
(2) The work group must also identify, to the greatest extent
possible, improvements to medical, social, and human services
facilities that primarily serve persons with special transportation
needs that would enhance accessibility to transportation services.
Improvements may include, but are not limited to, accessible path of
travel improvements.
(3) By December 1, 2010, the work group must submit a report to the
agency council on coordinated transportation, the governor, and
appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of its
efforts. The submission must be made electronically. Appropriate
committees of the legislature include the transportation and human
services committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the
senate ways and means committee, and the capital budget and ways and
means committees of the house of representatives. The report must
explain the criteria and guidelines developed by the work group, and
must include specific recommendations to improve access to facilities
for persons with special transportation needs.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.06B.040 and 2007 c 421 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency council on coordinated transportation shall review
and recommend certification of local plans developed by regional
transportation planning organizations based on meeting federal
requirements. Each regional transportation planning organization must
submit to the council an updated plan that includes the elements,
consistent with federal planning requirements, identified by the
council beginning on July 1, 2007, and every four years thereafter. As
part of the updated plan and subject to the legislature's adoption of
recommendations described in section 2 of this act, beginning on July
1, 2011, the submission must include an element on the coordination
between transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs and existing and new locations of facilities serving persons with
those special transportation needs.
(2) Each regional transportation planning organization must submit
to the council every two years a prioritized regional human service and
transportation project list.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.80.023 and 2007 c 421 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall have the
following duties:
(1) Prepare and periodically update a transportation strategy for
the region. The strategy shall address alternative transportation
modes and transportation demand management measures in regional
corridors and shall recommend preferred transportation policies to
implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy shall serve as a
guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.
(2) Prepare a regional transportation plan as set forth in RCW
47.80.030 that is consistent with county-wide planning policies if such
have been adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, with county, city,
and town comprehensive plans, and state transportation plans.
(3) Certify by December 31, 1996, that the transportation elements
of comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns within
the region reflect the guidelines and principles developed pursuant to
RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted regional transportation
plan, and, where appropriate, conform with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070.
(4) Where appropriate, certify that county-wide planning policies
adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the adopted regional transportation
plan are consistent.
(5) Develop, in cooperation with the department of transportation,
operators of public transportation services and local governments
within the region, a six-year regional transportation improvement
program which proposes regionally significant transportation projects
and programs and transportation demand management measures. The
regional transportation improvement program shall be based on the
programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures of
regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121,
respectively. The program shall include a priority list of projects
and programs, project segments and programs, transportation demand
management measures, and a specific financial plan that demonstrates
how the transportation improvement program can be funded. The program
shall be updated at least every two years for the ensuing six-year
period.
(6) Designate a lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of
the regional transportation plan and carry out the other
responsibilities of the organization. The lead planning agency may be
a regional organization, a component county, city, or town agency, or
the appropriate Washington state department of transportation district
office.
(7) Review level of service methodologies used by cities and
counties planning under chapter 36.70A RCW to promote a consistent
regional evaluation of transportation facilities and corridors.
(8) Work with cities, counties, transit agencies, the department of
transportation, and others to develop level of service standards or
alternative transportation performance measures.
(9) Submit to the agency council on coordinated transportation, as
provided in chapter 47.06B RCW, beginning on July 1, 2007, and every
four years thereafter, an updated plan that includes the elements
identified by the council. As part of the updated plan and subject to
the legislature's adoption of recommendations described in section 2 of
this act, the submission must include an element on the coordination
between transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs and existing and new locations of facilities serving regional
human services and other persons with special transportation needs.
This element must take into account a review and comment process for
transit agencies and other special needs transportation providers, on
proposed locations for those facilities. While developing this
element, the regional transportation planning organization must consult
with community access managers as established in section 10, chapter .
. ., Laws of 2009 (H-1531/09), transit agencies and other special
transportation needs providers within the region, the appropriate local
coordinating councils established in section 6, chapter . . ., Laws of
2009 (H-1531/09), and others, as appropriate. Each regional
transportation planning organization must submit to the council every
two years a prioritized regional human service and transportation
project list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act takes effect if
chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (H-1531/09) is enacted into law.

--- END ---