BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.850 and 2008 c 122 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless these powers are otherwise delegated by the legislature,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for the state.
The tolling authority shall:
(a) Set toll rates, establish appropriate exemptions, if any, and
make adjustments as conditions warrant on eligible toll facilities;
(b) Review toll collection policies, toll operations policies, and
toll revenue expenditures on the eligible toll facilities and report
annually on this review to the legislature.
(2) The tolling authority, in determining toll rates, shall
consider the policy guidelines established in RCW 47.56.830.
(3) Unless otherwise directed by the legislature, in setting and
periodically adjusting toll rates, the tolling authority must ensure
that toll rates will generate revenue sufficient to:
(a) Meet the operating costs of the eligible toll facilities,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, administration, and toll
enforcement by public law enforcement;
(b) Meet obligations for the repayment of debt and interest on the
eligible toll facilities, and any other associated financing costs
including, but not limited to, required reserves, minimum debt coverage
or other appropriate contingency funding, and insurance; and
(c) Meet any other obligations of the tolling authority to provide
its proportionate share of funding contributions for any projects or
operations of the eligible toll facilities.
(4) The established toll rates may include variable pricing, and
should be set to optimize system performance, recognizing necessary
trade-offs to generate revenue for the purposes specified in subsection
(3) of this section. Tolls may vary for type of vehicle, time of day,
traffic conditions, or other factors designed to improve performance of
the system.
(5) Motorcycles, as defined in RCW 46.04.330, including motorcycles
with trailers in tow, must be charged a toll rate of no more than fifty
percent of the toll rate charged to passenger cars, as defined in RCW
46.04.382.

--- END ---