BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.053 and 2007 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056,
and 84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts,
when authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the
manner and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article
VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for
such taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in
the case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies
for maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities,
which includes the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2)(f), in the year in
which the first annual levy is made.
(b) School districts may expend no more than three percent of the
proceeds from a levy or that portion of a levy to support the
construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities that is
expressly authorized for the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2)(f) on the
costs of training or other authorized salary costs. The limitations of
this subsection (1)(b) shall apply only to a school district of the
first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of
four hundred thousand people or more.
(2) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance
and operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no
further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of
the district for that period may be authorized. For the purpose of
applying the limitation of this subsection, a two-year through six-year
levy to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
school facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for maintenance
and operation support of a school district.
(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by
the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication
in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections,
at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (this act) are not
intended to alter or affect existing collective bargaining agreements.
Chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (this act) applies to all collective
bargaining agreements ratified after the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---