BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.240 and 2006 c 326 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The vehicle license number plates shall be attached conspicuously
at the front and rear of each vehicle for which the same are issued and
in such a manner that they can be plainly seen and read at all times.
However, if only one license number plate is legally issued for any
vehicle such plate shall be conspicuously attached to the rear of such
vehicle. Each vehicle license number plate shall be placed or hung in
a horizontal position at a distance of not more than four feet from the
ground and shall be kept clean so as to be plainly seen and read at all
times. In cases where the body construction of the vehicle is such
that compliance with this section is ((impossible)) impractical,
permission to deviate therefrom may be granted by the state patrol. It
shall be unlawful to display upon the front or rear of any vehicle,
vehicle license number plate or plates other than those furnished by
the director for such vehicle or to display upon any vehicle any
vehicle license number plate or plates which have been in any manner
changed, altered, disfigured or have become illegible. License plate
frames may be used on vehicle license number plates only if the frames
do not obscure license tabs or identifying letters or numbers on the
plates and the plates can be plainly seen and read at all times. It is
unlawful to use any holders, frames, or any materials that in any
manner change, alter, or make the vehicle license number plates
illegible. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any vehicle
unless there shall be displayed thereon valid vehicle license number
plates attached as herein provided.

--- END ---