BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the primary goal
of providing student financial assistance is to assure that students
succeed in school, graduate, and find employment. Public subsidy of
educational costs is intended not only to provide private benefit, but
also to serve the public interest by elevating Washington citizens to
education completion and career placement. The state's investment in
student aid falls short if the goal of career placement is not reached.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to provide per
student incentives to institutions of higher education to increase the
number of financial aid recipients who graduate and achieve career
placement, preferably in high-demand jobs. Institutions that
efficiently produce highly skilled graduates, ready for work in high-demand occupations, should be awarded additional resources to assist in
meeting state goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Eligibility for the state need grant shall be reduced to
include students with family incomes at or below fifty percent of the
state median family income, adjusted for family size.
(2) Within overall appropriations for the state need grant and in
addition to other procedures established by the board for award of
grants under this chapter, the maximum award amount is provided for
persons whose family income is at or below fifty percent of the
Washington state median family income, adjusted for family size. The
award shall be prorated if the credit load is less than full time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Institutions of higher education that participate in the state
need grant program are eligible for institutional incentive grants for
tracking and improving student achievement.
(2) The board, in partnership with business, labor, the state board
for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and
education coordinating board, shall:
(a) Identify high-demand occupations, which are occupations where
data show that employer demand for workers exceeds the supply of
qualified job applicants throughout the state or in a specific region,
and where training capacity is underutilized;
(b) Identify each high-demand occupation by corresponding north
American industry classification system (NAICS) or standard industrial
classification (SIC) codes; and
(c) Distribute the list of high-demand occupations to all
institutions participating in the state need grant program by January
1, 2010, and every even-numbered year thereafter. The board shall
update the list of high-demand occupations every even-numbered year, in
cooperation with the entities named in this subsection.
(3)(a) Each institution and the state board for community and
technical colleges on behalf of each of its colleges, shall report to
the board by December 15, 2010, and annually thereafter, the number of
graduates placed in the high-demand occupations, as identified by the
board in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) Each institution and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall enter into any necessary data-sharing
agreements to facilitate the reporting in (a) of this subsection.
(c) Placements in high-demand fields shall be reported as follows:
(i) Placement data for students graduating in the 2008-09 academic
year shall be reported to the board by December 15, 2010, and annually
thereafter for a three-year period;
(ii) Placement data for graduates in subsequent academic years
shall be reported using the same reporting deadlines as were specified
for graduates of the 2008-09 academic year, adjusting the reporting
deadlines back one year. Reporting of placement data for students
graduating during the 2009-10 academic year are due December 15, 2011,
and yearly thereafter through December 15, 2013.
(d) Each institution that reports high-demand placement data before
the deadline shall receive an incentive award for each student placed
in a high-demand occupation during the reporting period. Each graduate
placed in a high-demand occupation may be counted only once during the
three-year reporting period for purposes of receiving the incentive
award. The award amount shall be determined and distributed by the
board on an annual basis.
(4) Each institution and the state board for community and
technical colleges on behalf of each of its colleges, shall report to
the board by December 15, 2010, and annually thereafter, the number of
completions in the following categories:
(a) Degrees and certificates awarded;
(b) Degrees and certificates awarded in high-demand areas, as
determined by each institution and the state board for community and
technical colleges in close collaboration with the higher education
coordinating board; and
(c) Degrees awarded within one hundred twenty-five percent of
required credits for a single major.
(5) Each institution that reports completion data before the
deadline shall receive an incentive grant for each student completion.
Institutions may not report more than one completion per student. The
award amount shall be determined and distributed by the board on an
annual basis.
(6) Job placement and completion data shall be reported only for
students who have received a state need grant, including students who
no longer receive state need grants at the time of graduation, but
previously did.
(7) The board shall adopt necessary rules governing program
creation and implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---