BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.170 and 2007 c 522 s 953 and 2007 c 241 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) ((twenty-two)) thirty-six cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011;
and (e) ((twenty-three)) thirty-seven and one-half cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter, less proper
deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW
46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the department of natural resources for planning and
designing consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed
recreation sites, and for planning recreation opportunities on
department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest.
This appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.10.170 and 2003 c 361 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
department shall determine the amount of moneys paid to it as motor
vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel. Such determination
shall use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the average yearly fuel
usage per snowmobile, the number of registered snowmobiles during the
calendar year under determination, and a fuel tax rate of: (1)
Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003,
through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (3) twenty-one cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009;
(4) ((twenty-two)) thirty-six cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5) ((twenty-three))
thirty-seven and one-half cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2003 c 361 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed
to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing, after taking
into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits
to the marine fuel tax refund account and the costs of carrying out the
provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state treasurer to
transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing a
motor vehicle fuel tax rate of: (1) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2007; (3) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (4) ((twenty-two)) thirty-six cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011;
and (5) ((twenty-three)) thirty-seven and one-half cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter, to the
recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor vehicle
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---