BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the sale and use
of adult entertainment materials and services result in increased costs
to the state through the provision of increased governmental services,
including human services and criminal justice services. It is the
legislature's intention that the activities that result in these
increased services bear more of the costs of these services. The
legislature intends to dedicate the revenues from a tax on the sale and
use of adult entertainment materials and services to crime victims'
compensation, with an emphasis towards providing services, support, or
therapy to those children who are victims of sexual abuse.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) In addition to any tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section there is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale of adult entertainment materials and services equal to
eighteen and one-half percent of the selling price.
(5) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(((5))) (6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the
taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated
to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW
43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection shall be
deposited in the performance audits of government account created in
RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.010 and 2007 c 6 s 1302 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1)(a) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services
defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or
rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No
deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the
following: (i) The seller's cost of the property sold; (ii) the cost
of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs
of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and
any other expense of the seller; (iii) charges by the seller for any
services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and
installation charges; (iv) delivery charges; and (v) installation
charges.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe;
(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services,
if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed
directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration
received by the seller from a third party if:
(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other
than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a
price reduction or discount on the sale;
(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or
discount through to the purchaser;
(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is
fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the
item to the purchaser; and
(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:
(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other
documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount
where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized,
distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that
the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon,
certificate, or documentation is presented;
(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a
member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or
discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any
patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or
(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party
price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or
on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the
purchaser;
(2)(a) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean:
(i) The state and its departments and institutions when making
sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or
(ii) A professional employer organization when a covered employee
coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer
agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that
is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the
client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be
the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax
imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(9) "Adult entertainment materials and services" means those
entertainment materials and services that are primarily oriented to an
interest in sex, including but not limited to magazines, photographs,
motion pictures, videotapes, videodiscs, cable television services,
telephone services, audiotapes, computer programs, and paraphernalia.
"Adult entertainment materials and services" does not include (a) books
or magazines that contain no photographs or other graphics; or (b)
motion pictures, videotapes, videodiscs, or cable television services
that do not contain any explicit sex of the type that would be rated
"X" using the standards existing on January 1, 2009, of the motion
picture association of America, inc. Any motion picture, videotape,
videodisc, cable television service, or other visual medium that
contains any explicit sex of the type that would be rated "X" using
these standards is considered to be primarily oriented to an interest
in sex. Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, adult
entertainment services are a sale at retail for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
All revenues collected on sales and use of adult entertainment
materials and services under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW must be
deposited in the general fund to be used solely for the general
assistance-unemployable program.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.010 and 2006 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010((.));
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct
pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the
service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase
price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the
service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(4) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used shall
be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling
price at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality
and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(5) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" ((shall)) have their
ordinary meaning, and ((shall)) mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state;
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
((and))
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state; and
(d) With respect to an adult entertainment service which affords a
benefit or is otherwise capable of use within this state, the use
within this state of the service, regardless of the place of
performance;
(6) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(7)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (7),
"retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property or
adult entertainment services at retail and every person required to
collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter.
(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer
organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under
the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities
that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended
warranty, or a sale of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) that is subject to the tax imposed by this
chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer
organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible for
collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (9), the use of the property
((shall be)) is deemed to be by such consumer. In addition, "consumer"
includes any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any adult
entertainment service other than for resale in the regular course of
business. Resale of a service means a separately stated charge to
another person for the service by a person who has paid or is obligated
to pay an identical charge to one who has originally rendered the
identical service.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.020 and 2005 c 514 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) levied and ((there shall be)) collected
from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of
using within this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible
personal property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift,
repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by
the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person
engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); (b) any
prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but
excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of
charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or
both; or (c) any extended warranty.
(2) This tax ((shall apply)) applies to the use of every extended
warranty, service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or
(3)(a) and 82.08.010, and the use of every article of tangible personal
property, including property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and
including byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as
hereinafter provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar
articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within this
state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), purchased at
retail or acquired by lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the
use by, the present user or his bailor or donor has already been
subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the
tax has been paid by the present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or service of
the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect
of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended
warranty, or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters. If the
sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor
has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this
chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her
bailor or donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by
bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as
determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at
time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08
RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use; or in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment,
if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor
for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was
prior to June 9, 1961, the tax imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used, value of the extended warranty used, or
value of the service used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rates in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020, except in the case
of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax
shall be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied
by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.12.035 and 2007 c 6 s 1203 are each amended to read
as follows:
A credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter
upon the use of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
services taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) or defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.08.010, in the state of Washington in the
amount that the present user thereof or his or her bailor or donor has
paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such property, extended
warranty, or service to any other state, possession, territory, or
commonwealth of the United States, any political subdivision thereof,
the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or political
subdivision thereof, prior to the use of such property, extended
warranty, or service in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---