BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced diagnostic imaging services" means magnetic resonance
imaging services, computed tomography services, positron emission
tomography services, cardiac nuclear medicine services, and similar new
imaging services.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Payor" means public purchasers and carriers licensed under
chapters 48.21, 48.41, 48.44, 48.46, and 48.62 RCW.
(4) "Public purchaser" means the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the department of labor and
industries, the authority, and the Washington state health insurance
pool.
(5) "State purchased health care" has the same meaning as in RCW
41.05.011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Consistent with the authority granted
in RCW 41.05.013, the authority shall convene a work group to analyze
and identify evidence-based best practice guidelines or protocols
applicable to advanced diagnostic imaging services and any decision
support tools available to implement the guidelines or protocols.
(2) The administrator of the authority shall appoint work group
members, including at least:
(a) One member of the authority's health technology clinical
committee;
(b) One representative of the Washington state medical association;
(c) One representative of the Washington state radiological
society;
(d) One representative of the Puget Sound health alliance;
(e) One representative of the Washington health care forum;
(f) One representative of the Washington state hospital
association;
(g) One representative of health carriers as defined in chapter
48.43 RCW; and
(h) One representative of each public purchaser.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) No later than July 1, 2009, identify evidence-based best
practice guidelines or protocols and decision support tools applicable
to advanced diagnostic imaging services to be implemented by all state
purchased health care programs, except for state purchased health care
services that are purchased from or through health carriers as defined
in RCW 48.43.005. When identifying the guidelines or protocols, the
work group may consult with organizations such as the Minnesota
institute for clinical systems improvement; and
(b) Explore the feasibility of using the guidelines or protocols
for state purchased health care services that are purchased from or
through health carriers and all payors in the state by January 1, 2011,
for the reimbursement of advanced diagnostic imaging services.
(4) The work group may solicit such federal or private funds and
in-kind contributions as may be necessary to complete its work in a
timely fashion. However, no member of the work group shall be
compensated for his or her service.
(5) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than July 1, 2009.
(6) The work group shall cease to exist on July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No later than September 1, 2009, all state
purchased health care programs shall, except for state purchased health
care services that are purchased from or through health carriers as
defined in RCW 48.43.005, implement evidence-based best practice
guidelines or protocols applicable to advanced diagnostic imaging
services, and the decision support tools to implement the guidelines or
protocols, identified under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any current or future time frames,
procedures, rules, regulations, or guidance regarding accreditation
requirements for advanced diagnostic imaging services established in,
or promulgated pursuant to, section 135(a) of the medicare improvements
for patients and providers act of 2008, shall also be applicable to any
person or entity in this state not already subject to its provisions
that receives payment for the furnishing of the technical component of
advanced diagnostic imaging services as defined under that act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---