BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that extensive
research conducted by the Washington state institute for public policy
demonstrates the potential for appreciable savings in the state's child
welfare budget by deploying a core set of evidence-based and promising
programs designed to strengthen families and prevent children from
entering the foster care system and reducing the length of stay for
children who do enter the system. The legislature further finds that
achieving improved outcomes for child safety and long-term family
strength and well-being requires renewed thinking and a greater
emphasis on evidence-based and promising prevention and intervention
services, earlier positive engagement with parents and children, more
timely permanency outcomes, and more effective partnerships with
communities and private partners. The legislature also finds that the
goal of achieving lasting change in the state's child welfare system
requires building and sustaining the serving capacity of evidence-based
and promising programs through the reinvestment of savings from reduced
foster care caseloads. The legislature further finds that
implementation of these reforms should be approached through
collaborative analysis and planning that includes the relevant state
agencies, community partners, and other stakeholders. The legislature
intends to direct the development of a plan for the first phase of
implementation to begin January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The children's administration within the department of social
and health services shall collaborate with community partners and
stakeholders in two demonstration regions to jointly develop a plan for
implementation of a core set of performance-based contracts to provide
an array of evidence-based and promising prevention and intervention
services for families who are at risk for an out-of-home placement or
have a child in out-of-home care, and for children who are awaiting
adoption. The implementation plan must describe: (a) What services
should be delivered under the contracts in order to assure providers
have the flexibility to provide adequate, appropriate, and relevant
evidence-based and promising services to individual families; (b) what
outcome measures will be used to evaluate the effectiveness of
performance under the contracts; (c) how families will be referred to
contracted providers, including the protocols for continued
communication or coordination between providers and the children's
administration in order to assure child safety and well-being and to
promote the family's engagement; and (d) the optimum balance of shared
responsibility for child protection and child welfare between the state
and community-based providers, including a description of the core
functions to be performed by each. In selecting the demonstration
regions, the children's administration shall consider the capacity for
regionwide delivery of an array of evidence-based and promising
prevention and early intervention services to children and families,
paying particular attention to the research developed by the Washington
state institute for public policy; the willingness and ability of the
community and stakeholders to collaborate in development of a plan by
the reporting date; and whether the region includes any existing
multidisciplinary or multisystem work groups engaged in performance
improvement or reform efforts. The children's administration shall
report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 30, 2009, with a plan to begin implementation
January 1, 2010. Not later than December 1, 2010, the children's
administration shall provide the governor and the legislature with a
status update and recommendations for continued progress.
(2) The department of social and health services, the office of
financial management, and the caseload forecast council shall develop
a proposal for submission to the legislature for the reinvestment of
savings from reduced foster care caseloads in the demonstration regions
into evidence-based prevention and intervention programs designed to
prevent the need for or reduce the duration of foster care placements
in the demonstration regions. The proposal shall be submitted to the
legislature and the governor by November 30, 2009, and shall include
sufficient detail regarding accounting, budgeting, and allocation or
other procedures for legislative consideration and approval.

--- END ---