BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that parents are a
child's first and most important teachers. Infants and toddlers, in
particular, are significantly impacted by their earliest experiences at
home with parents. The legislature also finds there is ample research
demonstrating that evidence-based home visitation programs are highly
effective early interventions for children born to families with risk
factors linked to poor child outcomes. Well-coordinated delivery of
high-quality home visitation programs can produce multiple benefits for
children, families, and communities. The legislature finds further
that multidisciplinary research on early child development documents
the high returns that investments in early childhood programs can pay
in terms of subsequent educational attainment and in lower rates of
social problems, such as teenage pregnancy, welfare dependency, and
criminal activity. The legislature finds that sustaining the
investments in evidence-based early learning home visitation programs
can produce measurable and long-term economic benefits to the state by
overcoming the cognitive, emotional, and resource limitations that
often characterize the environments of disadvantaged children during
their first several years of life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that compelling scientific research continues
to reveal that:
(1) The years from birth to three are most critical in building the
social, emotional, and cognitive developmental foundations of a young
child. Research into the brain development of very young children
proves that children are born learning. The quality of baby's earliest
social interactions with parents is paramount in the child's continuing
development across all domains.
(2) Research also demonstrates that infants and young children
exposed to chronic environmental stress in families with few protective
factors develop significantly fewer of the neural brain connections
essential for the child's later learning. The farther behind children
are in their social, emotional, physical, and cognitive development,
the more unlikely it is they will be able to catch up when they enter
preschool or kindergarten.
(3) A significant number of Washington's children ages birth to
five years are in homes where two or more of the following risk factors
are present, creating a greater likelihood of the child's failure in
school and beyond: Poverty; single parent, teen parent, or no parent;
no parent employed full time or year-round; both parents with a
disability; and mother without a high school diploma.
(4) Longitudinal research and rigorous studies demonstrate that
children and parents receiving high-quality, evidence-based home
visitation services exhibit better birth outcomes; enhanced parent-child interactions; more efficient use of appropriate health care
services; enhanced child development including improved school
readiness, and early detection of developmental delays; reduced
dependence on public assistance; higher rates of high school
graduation, completion of postsecondary training, and job retention;
and reduced frequency and severity of child maltreatment.
The legislature intends to promote the delivery of voluntary
evidence-based and research-based home visitation services to families
as an early intervention strategy to alleviate the adverse effects on
infant and child development resulting from family stresses due to
poverty, single parenthood, parental unemployment or underemployment,
parental disability, or parental lack of a high school diploma.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within available funds, the department, jointly with the early
learning private-public partnership, shall fund evidence-based and
research-based home visitation programs for high-risk families to
improve parenting skills and awareness about children's early
development and its impact on long-term outcomes for children. Early
learning home visitation programs must be voluntary; designed to
address the needs of families and assist parents in the very earliest
stages of their child's development; and structured to alleviate the
effect on child development of risk factors such as poverty, single or
teen parenthood, parental unemployment or underemployment, parental
disability, or parental lack of a high school diploma.
(2) The department, jointly with the private-public partnership,
shall report biennially to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature beginning December 1, 2010, regarding the outcomes
for high-risk families with young children.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and section 2 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site randomized controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for
the population.
(b) "Home visitation" means providing services in the permanent or
temporary residence, or in other familiar surroundings, of the family
receiving such services.
(c) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.121.170 (Home visitation programs -- Findings -- Intent) and
2007 c 466 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.121.175 (Home visitation programs -- Definitions) and 2007
c 466 s 2; and
(3) RCW 43.121.180 (Home visitation programs -- Funding -- Home
visitation services coordination or consolidation plan -- Report) and
2008 c 152 s 6 & 2007 c 466 s 3.

--- END ---