BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, at a time when
state and local resources to support public schools are strained by a
difficult economic situation in the state and nation, it is necessary
to relieve school districts from some of the administrative and
regulatory burdens that have been placed upon them. Rules to protect
the state's children and provide them with a safe and positive learning
environment are very important, but not all rules are equally important
or cost-effective. Some require significant time and effort from
school district staff, and their relative value in supporting the
primary purpose of public education is uncertain. Some rules and
administrative requirements should be removed, and others should be
suspended to determine whether they are necessary for school districts
to accomplish their mission.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.09.460 and 2005 c 385 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each biennium the legislature shall appropriate such sums as
may be necessary, not to exceed an amount equal to two one-hundredths
of one percent of the total general fund state appropriation in that
biennium's omnibus operating appropriations act for purposes of the
performance review, performance audits, and activities of the board
authorized by this chapter.
(2) The board and the state auditor shall submit recommended
budgets for their responsibilities under RCW 43.09.430 through
43.09.455 to the auditor, who shall then prepare a consolidated budget
request, in the form of request legislation, to assist in determining
the funding under subsection (1) of this section. From the funds
appropriated by the legislature to the auditor for the responsibilities
under RCW 43.09.430 through 43.09.455, the auditor shall reimburse
school districts and educational service districts for the documented
costs of complying with a performance audit.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.20.050 and 2007 c 343 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall provide a forum for the
development of public health policy in Washington state. It is
authorized to recommend to the secretary means for obtaining
appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties
of the department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and
explore ways to improve the health status of the citizenry.
(a) At least every five years, the state board shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on public health issues.
(b) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the state board shall prepare the state public
health report that outlines the health priorities of the ensuing
biennium. The report shall:
(i) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(ii) Be developed with the assistance of local health departments;
(iii) Be based on the best available information collected and
reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 and recommendations from the
council;
(iv) Be developed with the input of state health care agencies. At
least the following directors of state agencies shall provide timely
recommendations to the state board on suggested health priorities for
the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social and health services, the
health care authority administrator, the insurance commissioner, the
superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor and
industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;
(v) Be used by state health care agency administrators in preparing
proposed agency budgets and executive request legislation;
(vi) Be submitted by the state board to the governor by January 1st
of each even-numbered year for adoption by the governor. The governor,
no later than March 1st of that year, shall approve, modify, or
disapprove the state public health report.
(c) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(2) In order to protect public health, the state board of health
shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to assure safe and reliable public
drinking water and to protect the public health. Such rules shall
establish requirements regarding:
(i) The design and construction of public water system facilities,
including proper sizing of pipes and storage for the number and type of
customers;
(ii) Drinking water quality standards, monitoring requirements, and
laboratory certification requirements;
(iii) Public water system management and reporting requirements;
(iv) Public water system planning and emergency response
requirements;
(v) Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;
(vi) Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but
inadequate public water systems; and
(vii) Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source
and supply, of water for bottled water plants.
(b) Adopt rules and standards for prevention, control, and
abatement of health hazards and nuisances related to the disposal of
wastes, solid and liquid, including but not limited to sewage, garbage,
refuse, and other environmental contaminants; adopt standards and
procedures governing the design, construction, and operation of sewage,
garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(c) Adopt rules controlling public health related to environmental
conditions including but not limited to heating, lighting, ventilation,
sanitary facilities, cleanliness and space in all types of public
facilities including but not limited to food service establishments,
schools, institutions, recreational facilities and transient
accommodations and in places of work;
(d) Adopt rules for the imposition and use of isolation and
quarantine;
(e) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and
noninfectious diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and
rules governing the receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased
persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and may best be
controlled by universal rule; and
(f) Adopt rules for accessing existing databases for the purposes
of performing health related research.
(3) The state board shall adopt rules for the design, construction,
installation, operation, and maintenance of those on-site sewage
systems with design flows of less than three thousand five hundred
gallons per day.
(4) The state board may delegate any of its rule-adopting authority
to the secretary and rescind such delegated authority.
(5) All local boards of health, health authorities and officials,
officers of state institutions, police officers, sheriffs, constables,
and all other officers and employees of the state, or any county, city,
or township thereof, shall enforce all rules adopted by the state board
of health. In the event of failure or refusal on the part of any
member of such boards or any other official or person mentioned in this
section to so act, he or she shall be subject to a fine of not less
than fifty dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than one
hundred dollars upon second conviction.
(6) The state board may advise the secretary on health policy
issues pertaining to the department of health and the state.
(7) After the effective date of this section, the state board may
not adopt rules under subsection (2)(c) of this section that pertain to
the environmental health and safety of school facilities without prior
authorization from the legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.650.015 and 2006 c 263 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, to the extent funds
are appropriated, shall develop and implement a Washington state K-12
education technology plan. The technology plan shall be updated on at
least a biennial basis, shall be developed to coordinate and expand the
use of education technology in the common schools of the state. The
plan shall be consistent with applicable provisions of chapter 43.105
RCW. The plan, at a minimum, shall address:
(a) The provision of technical assistance to schools and school
districts for the planning, implementation, and training of staff in
the use of technology in curricular and administrative functions;
(b) The continued development of a network to connect school
districts, institutions of higher learning, and other sources of online
information; and
(c) Methods to equitably increase the use of education technology
by students and school personnel throughout the state.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an
educational technology advisory committee to assist in the development
and implementation of the technology plan in subsection (1) of this
section. The committee shall include, but is not limited to, persons
representing: The department of information services, educational
service districts, school directors, school administrators, school
principals, teachers, classified staff, higher education faculty,
parents, students, business, labor, scientists and mathematicians, the
higher education coordinating board, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, and the state library.
(3) The plan adopted and implemented under this section may not
impose on school districts any requirements that are not specifically
required by federal law or regulation, including requirements to
maintain eligibility for the federal schools and libraries program of
the universal service fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2006 c 113 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools
assessments or other strategies to assure that students have an
opportunity to learn the essential academic learning requirements in
social studies, the arts, and health and fitness. Social studies
includes history, geography, civics, economics, and social studies
skills. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
annually submit an implementation verification report to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
require students in the fourth or fifth ((grades [grade])) grade, the
seventh or eighth ((grades [grade])) grade, and the eleventh or twelfth
((grades [grade])) grade to each complete at least one classroom-based
assessment in civics. The civics assessment may be selected from a
list of classroom-based assessments approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the 2008-09
school year, school districts shall annually submit implementation
verification reports to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based assessments in
civics.
(3) This section is suspended until September 1, 2011.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the scholastic assessment test (SAT) or the American
college test (ACT) may be used as an objective alternative assessment
under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded
the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education shall identify the scores students must
achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the
state standard in the relevant content area on the Washington
assessment of student learning. The state board of education shall
identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After the first scores
are established, the state board may increase but not decrease the
scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the preliminary scholastic assessment test (PSAT) may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for
demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard for
the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the score students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in that
content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(13) Subsection (12) of this section is suspended until September
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 5 and 6 of this act expire
September 1, 2011.

--- END ---