BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state parks
and recreation commission administers important public park lands that
are both economically and aesthetically important to Washington. The
legislature further finds that in times of economic hardship, park
lands should be maintained for Washington's citizens and visitors.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to implement
programs that will allow park lands to remain open and accessible to
all citizens and visitors through times of economic hardship.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.085 and 1974 ex.s. c 151 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall ((determine the fair market value for
television station leases based upon independent appraisals and
existing leases for television stations shall be extended at said fair
market rental for at least one period of not more than twenty years:
PROVIDED, That the rates in said leases shall be renegotiated at five
year intervals: PROVIDED FURTHER, That said stations shall permit the
attachment of antennae of publicly operated broadcast and microwave
stations where electronically practical to combine the towers:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) review and determine the fair market value for
all existing leases for telecommunications services facilities based
upon independent appraisals and existing leases for telecommunications
services facilities. These leases must be extended at the fair market
rental for at least one period of not more than twenty years. Leases
must be renegotiated every five years.
(2) Telecommunications services facilities must permit the
attachment of antennae of publicly operated broadcast and microwave
stations to combine the towers if technically feasible and in
compliance with applicable safety standards.
(3) Notwithstanding any term to the contrary in any lease, this
section ((shall)) does not preclude the commission from prescribing new
and reasonable lease terms relating to the modification, placement, or
design of facilities operated by or for a ((station)) telecommunication
service, and any extension of a lease granted under this section
((shall be)) is subject to this ((proviso: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
notwithstanding any other provision of law the director in his
discretion may waive any requirement that any environmental impact
statement or environmental assessment be submitted as to any lease
negotiated and signed between January 1, 1974 and December 31, 1974))
subsection.
(4) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Facilities" means all of the plant, equipment, fixtures,
appurtenances, antennas, and other facilities necessary to furnish and
deliver telecommunications services and cable television services,
including but not limited to poles with crossarms, poles without
crossarms, wires, lines, conduits, cables, communication and signal
lines and equipment, braces, guys, anchors, vaults, and all
attachments, appurtenances, and appliances necessary or incidental to
the distribution and use of telecommunications services and cable
television services.
(b) "Telecommunications service" means the transmission of
information by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other
similar means for hire, sale, or resale to the general public. For the
purpose of this subsection, "information" means knowledge or
intelligence represented by any form of writing, signs, signals,
pictures, sounds, or any other symbols.

--- END ---