BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that education is the
single most important investment a state can make to ensure that it
remains globally competitive. The legislature, Washington citizens,
education leaders and practitioners, and students must take collective
responsibility to ensure that all qualified citizens have the
opportunity to succeed in a world-class, learner-focused, seamless
education. The legislature further finds that lifelong learning is a
fundamental value of a civil society, the state of Washington, and the
primary family of its students.
The legislature also finds that early investment in a student can
make the difference in the student's aspiration and commitment.
Research indicates that students form attitudes about going to college
as early as elementary school. If policymakers want to increase
participation in the state's apprenticeship programs, colleges, and
universities, outreach efforts must begin early and occur often.
Saving for college is one way a student's family and extended
community can ensure that financial obstacles will not prevent a child
from realizing the dream of going to college. A modest financial
investment by the state of Washington to initiate a college savings
plan will contribute to the success of students in achieving their
educational aspirations and will benefit the state's goal of educating
more students to higher levels of education.
Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage families to begin
saving for college by paying the enrollment fee for a GET account for
each child born in Washington and supplementing that account with
additional GET units over the child's educational career. This action
plants the seed, early on, that going to college is possible,
regardless of socio-economic status. It also plants the seed that
saving for college is important and provides an easy way to begin
saving.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for college program is established. Subject to
funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the higher education
coordinating board shall pay the fifty-dollar enrollment fee to open a
GET account on behalf of every child born in Washington state after the
effective date of this section. In carrying out this duty, the board
shall:
(a) Develop and implement a process for establishing the accounts
and account beneficiaries;
(b) Establish rules for implementing the program;
(c) Provide information to hospitals, clinics, physicians and nurse
practitioners, birthing centers, community organizations, school
districts, and public institutions of higher education regarding the
program, the state's offer to pay the enrollment fee to open an
account, the one unit minimum purchase requirement, and the program
benefits and limitations;
(d) Accept grants and donations from private sources to match state
funds appropriated for the GET ready for college program.
(2) Parents or guardians of children born in Washington state after
the effective date of this section who open a GET account and purchase
one GET unit shall have deposited into that account an additional GET
unit upon the child reaching five educational milestones. The higher
education coordinating board shall purchase GET units to be owned and
held in trust by the board and distribute units to individual,
personally owned accounts upon the child achieving the following:
(a) Entry into kindergarten;
(b) Completion of the fourth grade statewide academic assessments
for reading, writing, and mathematics. The child does not need to meet
the state standard to receive the GET unit;
(c) Completion of the fifth grade;
(d) Completion of the eighth grade; and
(e) Completion of the high school statewide academic assessment.
The child does not need to meet the state standard to receive the GET
unit.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
enter into any necessary data-sharing agreements with the higher
education coordinating board to facilitate implementation of this
section.
(4) The higher education coordinating board shall develop necessary
forms, policies, and procedures to provide parents or guardians the
ability to voluntarily waive any privacy rights to facilitate the
exchange of personal information between the common schools and the
higher education coordinating board for implementation of this section.
(5) The GET ready for college account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. The board shall deposit into the account all
money received for the GET ready for college program from
appropriations and private sources. Only the executive director of the
board or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. Expenditures from the account, not to exceed five
percent, may be used by the board to carry out the provisions of this
section. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---