BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.190
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts within which residential habilitation centers,
as defined in RCW 71A.20.020, are located are eligible for residential
habilitation center impact assistance as provided in this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
residential habilitation center impact assistance for actual costs
associated with educational services provided to students who are
residents of the centers to the extent that those costs exceed funding
otherwise provided to serve these students. Impact assistance awards
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction must be made
upon application by the school district and subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Impact assistance is only available for actual costs associated
with educational services provided to students who are residents of a
residential habilitation center, as defined in RCW 71A.20.020, located
within the district;
(b) The district must convincingly demonstrate that these actual
costs were legitimate expenditures associated with educational services
and that they exceed the total of allocations made pursuant to RCW
28A.190.040, other state allocations and grants, federal allocations
and grants including medicaid, and private grants, bequests, and gifts
made for the purpose of maintaining and operating the program of
education for these students; and
(c) Differences in program costs attributable to district
philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a
legitimate basis for impact assistance awards.
(2) Nothing in this section shall change the duties and authority
of the department of social and health services relative to funding for
residential education programs as established in RCW 28A.190.040 and
28A.190.050.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the impact assistance
award process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules,
the superintendent shall consult with the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.190
RCW to read as follows:
No later than twenty-four hours after it becomes known to the
department of social and health services that a person between the ages
of three and twenty-one will be placed into a residential habilitation
center, as defined in RCW 71A.20.020, the department shall provide
notice of the placement to the superintendent of the school district in
which the residential habilitation center is located. The department
of social and health services and the school district shall cooperate
and collaborate as partners in order to facilitate, to the maximum
extent possible, the smooth transition of educational services and
assure that the school district is able to provide the educational
services needed by a student placed in a residential habilitation
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---