BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.50A.020 and 1993 c 329 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The water pollution control revolving fund is hereby
established in the state treasury. Moneys in this fund may be spent
only after legislative appropriation. Moneys in the fund may be spent
only in a manner consistent with this chapter.
(2) The water pollution control revolving fund shall consist of:
(a) All capitalization grants provided by the federal government
under the federal water quality act of 1987;
(b) Any moneys provided by the federal government for water
pollution control facilities and related activities to achieve federal
water pollution requirements;
(c) All state matching funds appropriated or authorized by the
legislature;
(((c))) (d) Any other revenues derived from gifts or bequests
pledged to the state for the purpose of providing financial assistance
for water pollution control projects;
(((d))) (e) All repayments of moneys borrowed from the fund;
(((e))) (f) All interest payments made by borrowers from the fund;
(((f))) (g) Any other fee or charge levied in conjunction with
administration of the fund; and
(((g))) (h) Any new funds as a result of leveraging.
(3) The state treasurer may invest and reinvest moneys in the water
pollution control revolving fund in the manner provided by law. All
earnings from such investment and reinvestment shall be credited to the
water pollution control revolving fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.50A.030 and 2007 c 341 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall use the moneys in the water pollution control
revolving fund to provide financial assistance, as provided in the
water quality act of 1987 and ((as provided in)) RCW 90.50A.040, and
pursuant to other federal requirements for achieving state and federal
water pollution control for protection of the state's waters:
(1) To make loans, on the condition that:
(a) Such loans are made at or below market interest rates,
including interest free loans, at terms not to exceed twenty years;
(b) Annual principal and interest payments will commence not later
than one year after completion of any project and all loans will be
fully amortized not later then twenty years after project completion;
(c) The recipient of a loan will establish a dedicated source of
revenue for repayment of loans; and
(d) The fund will be credited with all payments of principal and
interest on all loans.
(2) Loans and grants may be made for the following purposes:
(a) To public bodies for the construction or replacement of water
pollution control facilities as defined in section 212 of the federal
water quality act of 1987;
(b) For the implementation of a management program established
under section 319 of the federal water quality act of 1987 relating to
the management of nonpoint sources of pollution, subject to the
requirements of that act; and
(c) For development and implementation of a conservation and
management plan under section 320 of the federal water quality act of
1987 relating to the national estuary program, subject to the
requirements of that act.
(3) The department may not use the moneys in the water pollution
control revolving fund for grants, forgiveness of principal, and
negative interest unless approved by congress. Uses of grants,
forgiveness of principal, and negative interest include but are not
limited to the following purposes:
(a) To public bodies for the construction or replacement of water
pollution control facilities as defined in section 212 of the federal
water quality act of 1987;
(b) For the implementation of a management program established
under section 319 of the federal water quality act of 1987 relating to
the management of nonpoint sources of pollution, subject to the
requirements of that act;
(c) For development and implementation of a conservation and
management plan under section 320 of the federal water quality act of
1987 relating to the national estuary program, subject to the
requirements of that act;
(d) For storm water projects; and
(e) For combined sewer overflow projects.
(4) If grants, forgiveness of principal, and negative interest are
approved by congress, the department shall accept applications for
moneys provided from the federal government pursuant to the federal
authority.
(5) The department may also use the moneys in the fund for the
following purposes:
(a) To buy or refinance the water pollution control facilities'
debt obligations of public bodies at or below market rates, if such
debt was incurred after March 7, 1985;
(b) To guarantee, or purchase insurance for, public body
obligations for water pollution control facility construction or
replacement or activities if the guarantee or insurance would improve
credit market access or reduce interest rates, or to provide loans to
a public body for this purpose;
(c) As a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal
and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the state
if the proceeds of the sale of such bonds will be deposited in the
fund;
(d) To earn interest on fund accounts; and
(e) To pay the expenses of the department in administering the
water pollution control revolving fund according to administrative
reserves authorized by federal and state law.
(((4))) (6) The department shall present a biennial progress report
on the use of moneys from the account to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The report shall consist of a list of each recipient,
project description, and amount of the grant, loan, or both.
(((5) The department may not use the moneys in the water pollution
control revolving fund for grants.))
(7) When prioritizing project applications for loans, grants,
forgiveness of principal, and negative interest for water pollution
control facilities, the department shall consider the following:
(a) The protection and improvement of water quality and public
health;
(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they must finance water
pollution control facilities without state assistance;
(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance
orders, including projects with a history of noncompliance;
(d) Readiness of the project to proceed with planning, design, or
construction;
(e) The cost-effectiveness of the project based on an analysis of
alternatives, including regionalization;
(f) Whether the entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound
partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010;
(g) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(h) Effective one calendar year following the development and
statewide availability of model evergreen community management plans
and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the project is sponsored
by an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(i) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the
applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or
city in which the applicant public body is located, has established
programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean
water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility
named in the application for state assistance; and
(j) The recommendations of the Puget Sound partnership, created in
RCW 90.71.210, and any other board, council, commission, or group
established by the legislature or a state agency to study water
pollution control issues in the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.50A.040 and 2007 c 341 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
Moneys deposited in the water pollution control revolving fund
shall be administered by the department. In administering the fund,
the department shall:
(1) Consistent with RCW 90.50A.030 and 90.50A.080, allocate funds
for loans, grants, forgiveness of principal, and negative interest in
accordance with the annual project priority list in accordance with
section 212 of the federal water pollution control act as amended in
1987, ((and)) allocate funds under sections 319 and 320 according to
the provisions of that act, and allocate funds for separate competitive
programs relating to storm water systems, sewer systems, and septic
systems prioritized on a worst case first need basis;
(2) Use accounting, audit, and fiscal procedures that conform to
generally accepted government accounting standards;
(3) Prepare any reports required by the federal government as a
condition to awarding federal capitalization grants;
(4) Adopt by rule any procedures or standards necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter;
(5) Enter into agreements with the federal environmental protection
agency;
(6) Cooperate with local, substate regional, and interstate
entities regarding state assessment reports and state management
programs related to the nonpoint source management programs as noted in
section 319(c) of the federal water pollution control act amendments of
1987 and estuary programs developed under section 320 of that act;
(7) Comply with provisions of the water quality act of 1987; and
(8) After January 1, 2010, not provide funding for projects
designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound that are in conflict
with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under
RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.50A RCW
to read as follows:
Any public body receiving grants, forgiveness of principal, and
negative interest from the fund shall:
(1) Appear on the annual project priority list to be identified for
funding under section 212 of the federal water pollution control act
amendments of 1987 or be eligible under sections 319 and 320 of that
act;
(2) Submit an application to the department;
(3) Establish and maintain a dedicated source of revenue or other
acceptable source of revenue for the repayment of the loan; and
(4) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department it has
sufficient legal authority to incur the debt for which it is applying.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.50A.060 and 1988 c 284 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a public body defaults on loan payments due to the fund, the
state may withhold any amounts otherwise due to the public body and
direct that such funds be applied to the indebtedness and deposited
into the account.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.48.110 and 2007 c 343 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under subsection (2) of this section, all engineering
reports, plans, and specifications for the construction of new sewerage
systems, sewage treatment or disposal plants or systems, or for
improvements or extensions to existing sewerage systems or sewage
treatment or disposal plants, and the proposed method of future
operation and maintenance of said facility or facilities, shall be
submitted to and be approved by the department, before construction
thereof may begin. No approval shall be given until the department is
satisfied that said plans and specifications and the methods of
operation and maintenance submitted are adequate to protect the quality
of the state's waters as provided for in this chapter.
(a) The department shall require, through the development of rules,
that plans established in this subsection (1) include the following
elements:
(i) Reviews and updates of sewer plans on a six-year cycle,
including asset management and financial planning;
(ii) An equitable sewer user charge system for residential,
commercial, and industrial users to cover all financial obligation of
the planned sewer utility;
(iii) Connection fees for new connections to a sewer system that
reflect a fair share cost of infrastructure from which new connections
will benefit;
(iv) A capital wastewater facilities reserve fund dedicated to
paying for wastewater infrastructure and equipment replacement; and
(v) A sewer use ordinance that restricts certain connections and
wastes to protect a local government's investment and enhance the
wastewater treatment's process stability and effluent quality. The
ordinance must, at least:
(A) Require new sewers and connections to be properly designed and
constructed;
(B) Require a provision with a timeline and proximity in which
existing and future residences must connect to the sewer system;
(C) Prohibit inflow sources into the sewer system; and
(D) Prohibit introduction of toxic or hazardous wastes into the
sewer system in an amount or concentration that endangers the public's
safety or the physical integrity of the system which may cause
violations of the national pollutant discharge elimination system
permit or state waste discharge permit.
(b) Approval under this chapter is not required for large on-site
sewage systems permitted by the department of health under chapter
70.118B RCW or for on-site sewage systems regulated by local health
jurisdictions under rules of the state board of health.
(2) To promote efficiency in service delivery and intergovernmental
cooperation in protecting the quality of the state's waters, the
department may delegate the authority for review and approval of
engineering reports, plans, and specifications for the construction of
new sewerage systems, sewage treatment or disposal plants or systems,
or for improvements or extensions to existing sewerage system or sewage
treatment or disposal plants, and the proposed method of future
operations and maintenance of said facility or facilities and
industrial pretreatment systems, to local units of government
requesting such delegation and meeting criteria established by the
department.
(3) For any new or revised general sewer plan submitted for review
under this section, the department shall review and either approve,
conditionally approve, reject, or request amendments within ninety days
of the receipt of the submission of the plan. The department may
extend this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by up to an
additional ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately review
the general sewer plan. For rejections of plans or extensions of the
timeline, the department shall provide in writing to the local
government entity the reason for such action. In addition, the
governing body of the local government entity and the department may
mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines contained in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---