BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
Washington basic health plan plays a critical and valuable role in
providing coverage for necessary basic health care services in an
appropriate setting to working persons and others who lack coverage.
The program has assisted hundreds of thousands of families in their
search for affordable health care since its establishment in 1989,
demonstrated that low-income, uninsured families are willing to pay for
their own health care coverage to the extent of their ability to pay,
and proven that health care providers are willing to enter into a
successful and productive public-private partnership to offer coverage.
(2) The legislature further finds that during an economic
recession, access to coverage through the basic health plan becomes
even more critical. The basic health plan serves as a safety net for
the people of Washington state. Persons who lose their job often also
lose their employer-sponsored health insurance, leaving them uninsured
as they search for new employment opportunities. The basic health plan
should help fill this gap in coverage, enabling unemployed workers to
maintain their health and avoid the risk of financial hardship related
to unpaid medical bills as they search for new employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.020 and 2007 c 259 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Economic recovery enrollee" means individual workers and their
immediate family members who become involuntarily unemployed on or
after September 1, 2008, and are unemployed at the time of application,
or who are receiving unemployment compensation benefits under chapter
50.20 RCW. Meeting the eligibility criteria as an economic recovery
enrollee shall not preclude an individual from being treated as a
subsidized enrollee if he or she meets the definition of subsidized
enrollee under this section.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(((4))) (5) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means
individual workers and their qualified family members who lose their
jobs due to the effects of international trade and are eligible for
certain trade adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for
benefits under the alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or
are people who receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty
corporation and are at least fifty-five years old.
(((5))) (6) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health
care organization, including health care providers, insurers, health
care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(((6))) (7) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children:
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan;
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; and
(vi) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan;
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv)
and (vi) of this subsection and who is a foster parent licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the time of
enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the
federal department of health and human services; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv) and (vi) of this subsection and
whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than two
hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the
federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services.
(((7))) (8) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an
individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who
is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(((8))) (9) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of
periodic payment the administrator makes to a managed health care
system on behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost
to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the
amount determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under
RCW 70.47.060(2).
(((9))) (10) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an
individual, their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the
plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized
enrollee, a nonsubsidized enrollee, an economic recovery enrollee, or
a health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee.
(((10))) (11) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care
system, that is based upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized,
economic recovery, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees in
the plan and in that system.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.030 and 2004 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this
program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account and
may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the account
shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan.
During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.
(2) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees, economic recovery enrollees, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees shall be deposited into
the account. Funds in the account shall be used exclusively for the
purposes of this chapter, including payments to participating managed
health care systems on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees, economic
recovery enrollees, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees
in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(3) The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none
of the funds in the separate accounts created in this section or that
any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are
commingled in any way, except that the administrator may combine funds
designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative
account.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47.060 and 2007 c 259 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized ((and)), nonsubsidized,
economic recovery, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (((11))) (10) of this section and to the share of the cost
of the plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as
employees pursuant to subsection (((12))) (11) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees under RCW 70.47.020(((6))) (7)(b). Premiums due
for foster parents with gross family income up to two hundred percent
of the federal poverty level shall be set at the minimum premium amount
charged to enrollees with income below sixty-five percent of the
federal poverty level. Premiums due for foster parents with gross
family income between two hundred percent and three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
month.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(d) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(e) To determine periodic premiums due the administrator from
economic recovery enrollees. Premiums due from economic recovery
enrollees must be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed
health care system provider to the state for the plan, plus the
administrative cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the
premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. If federal or private funds become
available to subsidize the premiums due from economic recovery
enrollees, the subsidies shall be applied to reduce the enrollee's
premium obligation under this subsection.
(f) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. A financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of
an economic recovery enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator. The administrator
shall establish a mechanism for receiving premium payments from the
United States internal revenue service for health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees.
(((f))) (g) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier
providing coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on
January 1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in
enrollee cost-sharing requirements.
(3) ((To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4))) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government
reduces or terminates premium payments on their behalf through the
United States internal revenue service.
(((5))) (4) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing due a managed health care system from subsidized,
nonsubsidized, economic recovery, and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees. The structure shall discourage inappropriate
enrollee utilization of health care services, and may utilize
copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall
not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.
(((6))) (5) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for
subsidies so as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for
such purposes. Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger
of such an overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment
until the administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a
closure does not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees
who receive a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue
service as long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax
credit program.
(((7))) (6) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized
enrollees, as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided
to persons who qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as
defined by the administrator.
(((8))) (7) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the
delivery of services and availability of the plan to residents of the
state, subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(((9))) (8) To solicit and accept applications from managed health
care systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible
basic health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(((10))) (9) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of
subsidized, nonsubsidized, economic recovery, and health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan
operating account, keep records of enrollee status, and authorize
periodic payments to managed health care systems on the basis of the
number of enrollees participating in the respective managed health care
systems.
(((11))) (10) To accept applications from individuals residing in
areas served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, economic recovery, or health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees, to give priority to members of the
Washington national guard and reserves who served in Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle, and their
spouses and dependents, for enrollment in the Washington basic health
plan, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees
as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a
reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any
enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding
scale premiums. Funds received by a family as part of participation in
the adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward a family's
current gross family income for the purposes of this chapter. When an
enrollee fails to report income or income changes accurately, the
administrator shall have the authority either to bill the enrollee for
the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to
two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the
enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt
rules to define the appropriate application of these sanctions and the
processes to implement the sanctions provided in this subsection,
within available resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any
enrollee whose current gross family income exceeds twice the federal
poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a recipient of
medical assistance or medical care services under chapter 74.09 RCW.
If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or
requirements that are applicable to such individuals before they will
be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(((12))) (11) To accept applications from business owners on behalf
of themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(((13))) (12) To determine the rate to be paid to each
participating managed health care system in return for the provision of
covered basic health care services to enrollees in the system.
Although the schedule of covered basic health care services will be the
same or actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates
negotiated with participating managed health care systems may vary
among the systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems,
the administrator shall consider the characteristics of the populations
served by the respective systems, economic circumstances of the local
area, the need to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust
account, and other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(((14))) (13) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to require
periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information
for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating
managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of
this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health
care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed
health care systems and to the plan. The administrator shall
coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state agencies,
such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.
(((15))) (14) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state.
(((16))) (15) To develop a program of proven preventive health
measures and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent with this chapter.
(((17))) (16) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance for rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of
color.
(((18))) (17) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(((19))) (18) To administer the premium discounts provided under
RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the
Washington state health insurance pool.
(((20))) (19) To give priority in enrollment to persons who
disenrolled from the program in order to enroll in medicaid, and
subsequently became ineligible for medicaid coverage.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.47.100 and 2004 c 192 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A managed health care system participating in the plan shall do
so by contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly or by
contract with other health care providers, covered basic health care
services to each enrollee covered by its contract with the
administrator as long as payments from the administrator on behalf of
the enrollee are current. A participating managed health care system
may offer, without additional cost, health care benefits or services
not included in the schedule of covered services under the plan. A
participating managed health care system shall not give preference in
enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional health care benefits
or services. Managed health care systems participating in the plan
shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The
administrator may receive and act upon complaints from enrollees
regarding failure to provide covered services or efforts to obtain
payment, other than authorized copayments, for covered services
directly from enrollees, but nothing in this chapter empowers the
administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW or any other
professional or facility licensing statute.
(2) The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for
enrollees to transfer their enrollments among participating managed
health care systems serving their respective areas. The administrator
shall establish a period of at least twenty days in a given year when
this opportunity is afforded enrollees, and in those areas served by
more than one participating managed health care system the
administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform period for such
opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any
time upon a showing of good cause for the transfer.
(3) Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the
administrator shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the
reasonable cost of providing the schedule of basic health care
services, expressed in terms of upper and lower limits, and recognizing
variations in the cost of providing the services through the various
systems and in different areas of the state. In determining the
reasonable cost under this subsection, the administrator shall pool the
claims experience of subsidized, health coverage tax credit eligible,
and economic recovery enrollees.
(4) In negotiating with managed health care systems for
participation in the plan, the administrator shall adopt a uniform
procedure that includes at least the following:
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals,
including standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
financial integrity of the responding systems; and responsiveness to
the unmet health care needs of the local communities or populations
that may be served;
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and
may negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any
proposals;
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to
provide the covered services within a local area; and
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a
history of providing quality health care services to low-income
persons.
(5) The administrator may contract with a managed health care
system to provide covered basic health care services to subsidized
enrollees, nonsubsidized enrollees, economic recovery enrollees, health
coverage tax credit eligible enrollees, or any combination thereof;
except that, in order to contract to provide covered basic health care
services to subsidized enrollees, a managed health care system also
must contract to provide such care to economic recovery and health
coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(6) The administrator may establish procedures and policies to
further negotiate and contract with managed health care systems
following completion of the request for proposal process in subsection
(4) of this section, upon a determination by the administrator that it
is necessary to provide access, as defined in the request for proposal
documents, to covered basic health care services for enrollees.
(7)(a) The administrator shall implement a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees,
as provided under RCW 41.05.140, if one of the following conditions is
met:
(i) The authority determines that no managed health care system
other than the authority is willing and able to provide access, as
defined in the request for proposal documents, to covered basic health
care services for all subsidized enrollees in an area; or
(ii) The authority determines that no other managed health care
system is willing to provide access, as defined in the request for
proposal documents, for one hundred thirty-three percent of the
statewide benchmark price or less, and the authority is able to offer
such coverage at a price that is less than the lowest price at which
any other managed health care system is willing to provide such access
in an area.
(b) The authority shall initiate steps to provide the coverage
described in (a) of this subsection within ninety days of making its
determination that the conditions for providing a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance have been met.
(c) The administrator may not implement a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance in an area unless the
administrator has received a certification from a member of the
American academy of actuaries that the funding available in the basic
health plan self-insurance reserve account is sufficient for the self-funded or self-insured risk assumed, or expected to be assumed, by the
administrator.

--- END ---