BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Within existing resources, the higher
education coordinating board shall convene an advisory committee on
tuition policy. The committee shall include one member from each of
the public baccalaureate institutions, one member from a community
college, one member from a technical college, one student attending a
baccalaureate institution, one student attending a community or
technical college, two faculty members, as well as one member each from
the higher education coordinating board, state board for community and
technical colleges, and the council of presidents.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate. At least one member must be
a member of the senate committee on higher education and workforce
development.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives. At least one member must be a member of the house of
representatives committee on higher education.
(2) The committee shall be guided by the legislature's desire to
develop rational policies as the basis for long-term planning and
development of higher education in Washington. Any recommendations
made by the committee must support implementation of the strategic
master plan for higher education. The committee shall avail itself of
available video conferencing and teleconferencing technology to
minimize travel expenses. The committee is responsible for:
(a) Investigating tuition fee policies in other states including
average tuition levels for resident undergraduate students; an analysis
of the impact of various policies on citizen access, equity, and
participation rates; the impact of student debt upon graduation;
impacts on quality; and links with student financial assistance;
(b) Investigating other models for determining tuition including,
but not limited to, differential tuition fees based on program of study
or per credit;
(c) Investigating models that encourage collaboration and
coordination among institutions of higher education and that facilitate
coenrollment among multiple institutions, including enrollment in
online learning courses;
(d) Making recommendations on how to set tuition levels in amounts
and in a manner that supports the substantive higher education policy
objectives of the state as articulated in the strategic master plan for
higher education.
(3) The advisory committee shall report its findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---