BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the economy
of the state of Washington requires a well-prepared workforce. To meet
the need, more Washington students need to be prepared for
postsecondary education and training. Further, the personal enrichment
and success of Washington citizens increasingly relies on their ability
to use the state's postsecondary education and training system. To
accomplish those ends, the legislature desires to increase the number
of students who begin earning college credits while still in high
school.
(2) The legislature further finds that dual credit programs
introduce students to college-level work, provide a jump start on
getting a college degree, and, perhaps most importantly, show students
that they can succeed in college. Dual credit programs also provide
another avenue of student financial aid, since many programs are
offered for little or no cost to students.
(3) The legislature also finds that students must be provided a
choice when selecting a dual credit program that is right for them.
Options should be available for the student who wants to learn on a
college campus and the student who wants to stay at the high school and
take college-level courses. Options must also be available for the
hands-on learner who seeks to complete an apprenticeship program.
(4) The legislature intends to blur the line between high school
and college by articulating a vision to dramatically increase
participation in dual credit programs. It is for this reason that the
legislature should call on all education stakeholders to come together
to coordinate resources, track outcomes, and improve program
availability.
(5) The legislature further intends to provide high schools,
colleges, and universities with a set of tools for growing and
coordinating dual credit programs. Institutions should be given some
flexibility in determining the best methods to secure long-term, ample
financial support for these programs, while students should be given
some help in offsetting instructional costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the higher
education coordinating board, and the public baccalaureate
institutions, shall report by September 1, 2010, and annually
thereafter to the education and higher education committees of the
legislature regarding participation in dual credit programs. The
report shall include:
(a) Data about student participation rates and academic performance
including but not limited to running start, college in the high school,
tech prep, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and running
start for the trades;
(b) Data on the total unduplicated head count of students enrolled
in at least one dual credit program course; and
(c) The percentage of students who enrolled in at least one dual
credit program as percent of all students enrolled in grades nine
through twelve.
(2) Data on student participation shall be disaggregated by race,
ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating
board, and the public baccalaureate institutions shall jointly develop
and each adopt rules governing the college in the high school program.
The association of Washington school principals shall be consulted
during the rules development. The rules shall be written to encourage
the maximum use of the program and may not narrow or limit the
enrollment options.
(2) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by
a local contract between the district and the institution of higher
education, in compliance with the guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions.
(3) The college in the high school program must include the
provisions in this subsection.
(a) The high school and institution of higher education together
shall define the criteria for student eligibility. The institution of
higher education may charge tuition fees to participating students.
(b) School districts shall report no student for more than one
full-time equivalent including college in the high school courses.
(c) The funds received by the institution of higher education may
not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the
institution of higher education.
(d) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section
must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately
from other enrollment information and may not be included in official
enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any
enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary
determinations.
(e) A school district must grant high school credit to a student
enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the
course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the
school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to
award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing
before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied
toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence
of successful completion of each program course shall be included in
the student's secondary school records and transcript.
(f) An institution of higher education must grant college credit to
a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully
completes the course. The college credit shall be applied toward
general education requirements or major requirements. If no comparable
course is offered by the college, the institution of higher education
at which the teacher of the program course is employed shall determine
how many credits to award for the course and whether the course
fulfills general education or major requirements. Evidence of
successful completion of each program course must be included in the
student's college transcript.
(g) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible
to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may participate in the college
in the high school program.
(h) Participating school districts must provide general information
about the college in the high school program to all students in grades
ten, eleven, and twelve and to the parents and guardians of those
students.
(i) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher
education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program
courses.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning in RCW
28B.10.016 and also includes a public tribal college located in
Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and
universities or another accrediting association recognized by the
United States department of education.
(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high
school under the college in the high school program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction and the higher education
coordinating board shall develop advising guidelines to assure that
students and parents understand that college credits earned in high
school dual credit programs may impact eligibility for financial aid.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.290 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and
annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and
guardians' enrollment options for their children.
(2) Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be
distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the
information booklet available for public inspection at each school in
the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.
(3) The booklet shall include:
(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities,
including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040,
28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250,
((28A.175.090,)) 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school
cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160.
(b) Information about the running start ((- community college or
vocational-technical institute)) choice program under RCW 28A.600.300
through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400; and
(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program
under RCW 28A.230.090.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.600.160 and 1998 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using
educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will
continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to
meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students
shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice.
Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the school
shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the
opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the
career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities
available through the selected educational pathway shall be provided
with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway
provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways
that retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible
to graduate, and may not require students who transfer between pathways
to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student is
eligible to graduate. Educational pathways may include, but are not
limited to, programs such as ((work-based)) worksite learning,
((school-to-work transition)) internships, tech prep, ((vocational-))
career and technical education, running start, college in the high
school, running start for the trades, and preparation for technical
college, community college, or university education.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.600.300 and 2005 c 207 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The program established in this section through RCW 28A.600.400
shall be known as the running start program.
(2) For the purposes of RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400,
"participating institution of higher education" or "institution of
higher education" means:
(((1))) (a) A community or technical college as defined in RCW
28B.50.030;
(((2))) (b) A public tribal college located in Washington and
accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and universities or
another accrediting association recognized by the United States
department of education; and
(((3))) (c) Central Washington University, Eastern Washington
University, Washington State University, and The Evergreen State
College, if the institution's governing board decides to participate in
the program in RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.600.310 and 2005 c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in
courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A
student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high
school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs
offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the
school district in any required state or federal accountability
reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of
intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in
which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered
by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private
schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to
meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from
high school, or to master the essential academic learning requirements.
However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in
participating universities only if the board of directors of the
student's school district has decided to participate in the program.
Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with
school districts, may establish admission standards for these students.
If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil
for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education
shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district
within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course
and hours of enrollment for that pupil.
(2) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and
28B.15.041, running start students shall pay to the community or
technical college all other mandatory fees as established by each
community or technical college. The community or technical college
shall prorate the mandatory fees based on credit load. State
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College
shall not require the pupil to pay any fees.
(3) The community or technical college must make available fee
waivers for low-income students. Each college must establish a written
policy for the determination of low-income students before offering the
fee waiver. A student shall be considered low income and eligible for
a fee waiver upon proof that the student is currently qualified to
receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited to, documentation
that a student has been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price
lunches in the last five years, or other criteria established in the
institution's policy.
(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. ((The institution of higher education shall
not require the pupil to pay any other fees.)) The funds received by
the institution of higher education from the school district shall not
be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the
institution of higher education. A student enrolled under this
subsection shall ((not)) be counted for the purpose of ((determining
any)) meeting enrollment ((restrictions)) targets imposed by the state
on the institution of higher education, however, enrollments under this
section shall not be counted for purposes of funding under chapter
28B.10 RCW and shall not displace any students currently enrolled.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
develop long-term funding proposals to support running start that may
include, but not be limited to, student tuition and performance
funding. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report its recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2010.

--- END ---