BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
protect residents of this state from catastrophic health costs and
ensure access to meaningful preventive health care. The program
established by this chapter provides care to all residents of this
state not enrolled in both parts A and B of medicare, veterans'
benefits, TRICARE, CHAMPUS, FEHBP, or other federal or state government
programs, or who are confined or reside in a government-operated
institution.
The legislature finds that such a program will help ensure the
financial security of all residents of this state by providing broad
pooling of catastrophic health care costs.
The legislature finds that lack of preventive and catastrophic
coverage can adversely affect the health of residents of Washington.
The legislature further finds that a significant percentage of the
population of this state does not have reasonably available insurance
or other coverage for the costs of necessary preventive and
catastrophic health care. This lack of health care is detrimental to
the health of individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare,
and results in substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial
health care, often at the expense of health care providers, health care
facilities, and all purchasers of health care, including the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Allowed charges" means those expenses incurred by covered
persons for medically necessary expenses based on the terms and
conditions of the program, as defined by the board.
(2) "Authority" means the state health care authority established
in chapter 41.05 RCW.
(3) "Board" means the guaranteed health benefits board created in
section 7 of this act.
(4) "Carrier" or "participating carrier" means a disability
insurance company regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health
care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, and a health
maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020. Carrier also
includes any self-funded program that may be created by the authority
under this chapter and any entity that offers to participate in the
program even if that entity is not otherwise subject to regulation
under Title 48 RCW.
(5) "CHAMPUS" means the civilian health and medical program of the
uniformed services.
(6) "Code" means the internal revenue code, as codified in Title 26
U.S.C., as amended.
(7) "Commissioner" means the Washington state insurance
commissioner or the commissioner's designee.
(8) "Competitive bid process" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified carriers and
culminating in a selection based on criteria that may include such
factors as the carrier's fees or costs, ability, capacity, experience,
reputation, responsiveness to time limitations, responsiveness to
solicitation requirements, quality of previous performance, or
compliance with statutes and rules relating to contracts or services.
(9) "Coverage year" means a calendar year, unless the authority
adopts a different twelve-month period.
(10) "Creditable coverage" means the period an individual was
covered under a group or individual health plan or insurance in another
state or through an otherwise excluded plan of health care coverage
that provided benefits similar to or more comprehensive than those
offered by the program for at least three months without a break in
coverage of more than sixty-three days.
(11) "Employee" includes common law employees and leased employees
of an employer.
(12) "Employer" or "business entity" means any business having
employees that are permanent residents of this state who are subject to
medicare tax. Employer includes all of the following forms of
business: Partnerships, subchapter "c" and "s" corporations, nonprofit
organizations, governmental entities, limited liability corporations or
partnerships, and sole proprietorships.
(13) "FEHBP" means the federal employees health benefits program.
(14) "Medical assistance" or "medicaid" means coverage under Title
XIX of the federal social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq., as
amended) and chapter 74.09 RCW.
(15) "Medicare" means coverage under Title XVIII of the social
security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).
(16) "Permanent residence" means the place where a person lives
with the intent to make it a fixed and permanent home. For purposes of
this chapter, it has the same meaning as "domicile."
(17) "Permanent resident" means a person who permanently resides in
Washington. Persons with homes in more than one state are considered
permanent residents of this state if they intend to make Washington
their permanent home and reside in this state for at least six months
each year. A person is not a permanent resident if he or she remains
away from this state for more than six consecutive months and does not
intend to make Washington his or her permanent home.
(18) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed prior to the effective date of coverage.
(19) "Program" means the guaranteed health benefit program created
in this chapter.
(20) "Resident" means a person living in a particular locality in
the state of Washington. Confinement of a person in a nursing home,
hospital, or other institution by itself is not sufficient to qualify
a person as a resident.
(21) "Routine coverage" means coverage for incurred health care
costs, other than the preventive services offered by the program, up to
the annual threshold.
(22) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services or the secretary's designee.
(23) "Wellness program" or "wellness activity" means a bona fide,
explicit program of an activity, such as but not limited to smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, or nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The guaranteed health benefit program is
created.
(1) On the effective date of this section, and except as set forth
in this section, every person who has permanently resided in Washington
state for at least six months, and all children born in this state on
or after the effective date of this section who live with an eligible
resident parent or legal guardian, are enrolled in the program.
(2)(a) Persons moving to this state after the effective date of
this section who provide satisfactory evidence of permanent residency
in this state to the authority must be enrolled into the program.
(b) Any person moving to this state after the effective date of
this section who cannot provide evidence of creditable coverage is
eligible for the program, upon satisfactory evidence of permanent
residency, after six months of permanent residency. However, no
preexisting condition will be covered until the person has permanently
resided in Washington for twelve months.
(3) Persons not eligible for the program include persons who are:
(a) Enrolled in both parts A and B of medicare;
(b) Enrolled in federal government programs such as but not limited
to medicare, veterans' administration benefits, TRICARE, CHAMPUS, and
FEHBP;
(c) Eligible for entitlement programs, such as medicaid, identified
as providing substantially similar or more comprehensive coverage by
the board, after consultation with the secretary, governed by chapter
74.09 RCW or chapters 388-500 through 388-561 WAC; or
(d) Confined or reside in a government-operated institution.
(4) The board shall consider whether to allow participation
waivers. For example, the board may allow employers with self-funded
health care programs to waive participation in the program for that
employer's employees, and the terms of any such waiver.
(5) Persons who disenroll from federal health care programs or who
cease to reside in a government-operated institution must be registered
with a participating carrier based on rules adopted by the authority.
(6) Each person must be covered as an individual.
(7) Coverage continues in force as long as the person permanently
resides in this state.
(8) Participating carriers shall accept every eligible person
immediately upon receipt of a completed registration form, subject to
reasonable verification of eligibility, as established by the authority
by rule.
(9) The authority shall adopt standards for implementing this
section by rule, including evidence of permanent residency and
creditable coverage and procedures for registering with participating
carriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in this section, all
participating carriers must accept any eligible person that registers
for coverage with the carrier as long as the person resides in the area
in which the carrier is contracted to offer coverage.
(2) If a person chooses a different carrier during an open
enrollment period for the following coverage year, the prior carrier
must cooperate with the new carrier and the eligible person during
transition of coverage.
(3) Upon request of a covered person during an open enrollment
period, a participating carrier must continue coverage for a covered
person:
(a) Unless the covered person commits a fraud against the program
or the carrier;
(b) Unless the covered person no longer resides in the
participating carrier's contracted area;
(c) Unless the covered person is no longer eligible to participate
in the program, such as if the person establishes permanent residency
in another state; or
(d) For other conditions as the authority may adopt by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) With respect to coverage for persons
eligible for the program on the effective date of this section and who
become eligible thereafter, there is no limitation or exclusion of
benefits relating to a preexisting condition because the condition was
present or expected before the date of eligibility for coverage,
whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was
recommended or received before that date.
(2) Benefits for persons moving to Washington after the effective
date of this section may not be excluded or limited for any preexisting
condition that occurred more than twelve months prior to the date the
person first establishes permanent residency in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The program shall be funded as directed by
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The guaranteed health benefits board is
established to govern the program as set forth in this section.
(1) The governor shall appoint nine members to the board who shall
represent: The general public; health care providers, including health
care facilities; carriers; business, both large and small business
entities; and labor. The administrator of the authority is the chair
of the board.
(2)(a) The original members of the board must be appointed for
intervals of one to three years. Thereafter, all board members serve
a term of three years.
(b) Appointed members of the board are eligible for reappointment.
(c) Board members serve without compensation, except that they may
be reimbursed for travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(d) The board shall adopt a plan of operation, bylaws, and other
governing documents as may be necessary to ensure the fair, reasonable,
and equitable operation of the board.
(e) Meetings of the board are subject to the open public meetings
act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The board shall determine the schedule of
benefits for the program and establish a schedule of allowed charges
for any self-funded arrangement, including a list of expenses that are
covered or excluded under the program.
(1) Scheduled benefits for preventive care must include annual
examinations, cancer screenings, immunizations, and other benefits the
board determines to cover, taking into account recommendations of the
United States preventive services task force. Based on an evaluation
of efficacy and cost, the board shall periodically consider the
suitability of adding one or more annual preventive dental care visits.
(2) Catastrophic coverage must include coverage for medically
necessary care after a covered person incurs allowed charges, as
determined by the board, in excess of ten thousand dollars during a
coverage year.
(a) The board shall annually consider the desirability and
necessity of increasing the catastrophic benefits trigger point based
on inflation or other factors.
(b) The authority shall adopt any increase in the catastrophic
benefits trigger point by rule at the direction of the board.
(3) Mandated benefits, services, included providers, and patient
bill of rights protections. The schedule of benefits adopted by the
board must include all mandated benefits and mandated offerings in
force as of the effective date of this section, as well as all state
statutes and rules regarding patient rights and carrier contracting
with categories of providers, including the state's grievance and
appeals requirements and a person's right to request an independent
review of medical necessity decisions made by a carrier, as provided in
RCW 43.70.235, 48.43.500 through 48.43.535, 48.43.545, 48.43.550,
70.02.045, 70.02.110, and 70.02.900.
(4) Participation of persons eligible for substantially similar or
more comprehensive state-funded programs governed by chapter 74.09 RCW
or chapters 388-500 through 388-561 WAC must be jointly reviewed by the
administrator and the secretary. Persons eligible for such programs
may not receive duplicate coverage and benefits must be coordinated
among state or federal payers and the program.
(5) The board may establish criteria and procedures for a self-funded employer to waive participation in the program, in whole or in
part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The board may negotiate with Indian
tribes for inclusion in the program of any or all of the following:
(a) Tribal members employed on tribal lands by tribal-owned and
operated employers;
(b) Tribal members employed by nontribal employers on and off
tribal lands; or
(c) Nontribal employers employing tribal members on and off tribal
lands.
(2) The board shall consider or authorize the authority or a
contracted entity to consider the desirability, costs, and feasibility
of developing a component or subpart of the program that is compatible
with a health savings account, health reimbursement account, or other
similar federally tax-qualified health care plan. If the board
determines that such a program component or subpart is desirable, cost-effective, feasible, and consistent with the goals of the program, the
board shall direct the authority to implement the board's conclusions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Expenses allowed for purposes of
determining eligibility for catastrophic benefits must fall within the
allowable incurred expense schedule established by the board, must not
be otherwise excluded from coverage, must have been incurred by and for
the enrollee claiming the expense, must have been incurred during the
plan year for which the expense is presented, must fall within any
limits set by the board for medical expenses, and must be primarily for
a medical purpose.
(2) The board shall establish criteria for the authority's use in
determining eligibility of incurred medical expenses.
(a) The board may adopt a schedule of allowable incurred expenses
to determine eligibility based on section 213(d) of the federal
internal revenue code, or any other generally recognized, appropriate
criteria.
(b) The board shall instruct the authority to adopt by rule any
appropriate exceptions to qualifying expenses determined by the board
to be necessary or appropriate. For example, exclusions or exceptions
to allowable incurred expenses may include, but need not be limited to
the following: Over-the-counter drugs, fertility treatments, or
cosmetic procedures (except those necessary to ameliorate a deformity
arising from a congenital abnormality or personal injury from accident
or trauma or disfiguring disease).
(c) Evidence of any expense incurred must be capable of
corroboration by an independent third party and must include all of the
following: A description of the service or product, the date of the
service or sale, and the amount of the expense. For example, such
evidence of an expense could be a receipt or billing from the provider
or seller.
(3) For purposes of this section, "medical care" or "medical
purpose" means costs that were incurred by the enrollee for the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease, or
for the purpose of affecting any structure or function of the body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The authority shall administer, supervise,
and manage the program.
(1) The authority shall adopt administrative cost savings plans and
incentives designed to reduce the administrative burdens of carriers,
providers, and the program.
(2) The authority shall adopt rules for contracting with
participating carriers that:
(a) Rewards health outcomes rather than simply paying for
particular procedures;
(b) Pays for health care that reflects patient preference and is of
proven value; and
(c) Calls for the use of evidence-based standards of care where
available.
(3) The authority may appoint such technical or advisory committees
as are deemed necessary or desirable by the board or the authority.
Members shall serve without compensation for their services but may be
reimbursed for their travel expenses, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(4) The authority may adopt rules to administer the program,
including but not limited to rules that establish procedures for
appeals of eligibility decisions, establish appeals procedures for
enforcement actions and other purposes the authority determines are
necessary for the efficient and effective administration of the
program, and ensure that all covered persons receive quality health
care and that all covered services are medically necessary and
efficacious, cost-effective, and reasonable in relation to the services
delivered.
(5) The authority may appoint a medical director and other staff
the authority determines are necessary or appropriate to fulfill the
responsibilities and duties necessary for the administration of the
program.
(6)(a) The authority may contract with private entities or enter
into interagency agreements with public agencies to provide technical
or professional assistance or assist in the administration of the
program.
(b) Any such contractor is prohibited from releasing, publishing,
or otherwise using any information made available to it under its
contractual responsibility without specific permission of the
authority.
(7) The authority may apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts,
and other payments, including property and service, from any
governmental or other public or private entity or person and may make
arrangements for the use of these receipts, including the undertaking
of special studies and other projects relating to health care costs or
access to health care.
(8) The authority shall develop and implement a plan to publicize
the existence of the program and maintain public awareness of the
program and shall publicize open enrollment options for eligible
persons.
(9) The authority shall review all publications of carriers related
to the program for compliance with applicable state and federal
requirements.
(10) The authority shall periodically report to the board on all
operations of the program, prepare an annual budget, and manage the
administrative expenses of the program.
(11) The board shall report to the legislature on all operations of
the program every two years, in odd-numbered years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 By July 1, 2010, or at a later date as the
board may determine, the authority shall establish a program for
accepting enrollment registration forms for receipt of services from
participating carriers, with the intent that the first coverage year
begin January 1, 2011, or at a later date as the board may determine.
(1) Eligible persons must register with the same participating
carrier for guaranteed health coverage and routine coverage.
(2) Eligible persons who do not register with a carrier before the
first day of a coverage year must be assigned to a participating
carrier through a rotational system to be established and managed by
the authority.
(3) Registration with a participating carrier must be for the
entire coverage year except as may be established by the authority by
rule.
(4) Parents or legal guardians may register their dependents.
(5) Students attending school in another state may continue program
coverage under rules adopted by the authority.
(6) Eligibility for the program ceases the first day of the month
following establishment of permanent residency in another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Benefits must be provided by carriers
selected by the authority after completion of a competitive bid process
through one or more contracts with carriers.
(1)(a) The authority shall issue a request for proposals, including
standards regarding the quality of services to be provided; financial
integrity of the responding carriers; and responsiveness to the unmet
health care needs of the local communities or populations that may be
served;
(b) The authority shall review responsive proposals and may
negotiate with bidders to the extent necessary to refine any proposals;
and
(c) The authority may contract with one or more carriers to provide
the covered services within a local area.
(2) All participating contracted carriers must be in good standing
with the office of insurance commissioner.
(3) The rates charged by carriers must be negotiated by the
authority and approved by the board. Rates may not change more
frequently than annually.
(4) Payment to participating contracted carriers must be by a
capitated arrangement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 In order to ensure availability of program
coverage throughout the entire state and choice for program enrollees,
one or more self-funded arrangements may be offered in areas of the
state if the authority determines that fewer than two options for
enrollment will be available to eligible enrollees in any coverage
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Rates for program benefits shall be based
on actuarially sound rating principles. Rates paid to participating
carriers, including any self-funded arrangement, must be risk adjusted
annually based on experience during the most recent prior year for
which statistics related to rates and risk are available and applied to
the rates charged by a participating carrier for the next succeeding
coverage year.
(1) Every carrier that participates in the program must submit to
the authority, or to a third party at the direction of the authority,
all information deemed necessary for risk assessment and adjustment
calculations, including demographic and claims data.
(2) Carriers that do not participate in the program in later years
shall provide all necessary data to the authority, or to a third party
at the direction of the authority, for the carrier's years of
participation in the program.
(3) The authority shall implement a self-administered method of
providing coverage to enrollees if the authority determines that no
carrier is willing and able to provide access to covered services for
all enrollees in an area of the state.
(4) All claims data related to the program are the property of the
state.
(5) The authority shall adopt rules to establish and manage risk
adjustment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The authority shall conduct an annual
open enrollment period for the program of no fewer than thirty days
each twelve-month period during which any person may choose to change
participating carriers for the following coverage year.
(2) The authority shall establish by rule standards by which a
person may change participating carriers at times other than during the
annual open enrollment period.
(a) A person may not be registered with more than one participating
carrier at the same time.
(b) When changing carriers, there must be no overlap and no gap in
an enrollee's coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 It is the express intent of this chapter
that the program be secondary to all amounts paid or payable through
any worker's compensation coverage, automobile medical payment, or
liability insurance whether provided on the basis of fault or nonfault,
and by any hospital or medical benefits paid or payable under or
provided pursuant to any federal law or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Participating carriers shall file reports
with the authority in a format, manner, and time designated by the
authority by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The insurance commissioner has authority
over the solvency of participating carriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The privacy protections of chapters 48.43
and 70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act (45 C.F.R. 160 et seq.) apply to all contracts
issued to participating carriers and all actions of the board, the
authority, the commissioner, and the secretary of the department of
social and health services.

Sec. 21 RCW 48.14.020 and 2008 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to other provisions of this chapter, each authorized
insurer except title insurers shall on or before the first day of March
of each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's
office a tax on premiums. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, such tax shall be in the amount of two percent of all
premiums, excluding amounts returned to or the amount of reductions in
premiums allowed to holders of industrial life policies for payment of
premiums directly to an office of the insurer, collected or received by
the insurer during the preceding calendar year other than ocean marine
and foreign trade insurances, after deducting premiums paid to
policyholders as returned premiums, upon risks or property resident,
situated, or to be performed in this state. For the purposes of this
section the consideration received by an insurer for the granting of an
annuity shall not be deemed to be a premium. Moneys paid as the result
of contracts issued to participating carriers for the purpose of
providing health care coverage under the program created in chapter
70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 40 of this act) will be
treated as premiums.
(2) In the case of insurers which require the payment by their
policyholders at the inception of their policies of the entire premium
thereon in the form of premiums or premium deposits which are the same
in amount, based on the character of the risks, regardless of the
length of term for which such policies are written, such tax shall be
in the amount of two percent of the gross amount of such premiums and
premium deposits upon policies on risks resident, located, or to be
performed in this state, in force as of the thirty-first day of
December next preceding, less the unused or unabsorbed portion of such
premiums and premium deposits computed at the average rate thereof
actually paid or credited to policyholders or applied in part payment
of any renewal premiums or premium deposits on one-year policies
expiring during such year.
(3) Each authorized insurer shall with respect to all ocean marine
and foreign trade insurance contracts written within this state during
the preceding calendar year, on or before the first day of March of
each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office
a tax of ninety-five one-hundredths of one percent on its gross
underwriting profit. Such gross underwriting profit shall be
ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e., gross premiums
less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on such ocean
marine and foreign trade insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e.,
gross losses paid less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded)
during such calendar year under such contracts. In the case of
insurers issuing participating contracts, such gross underwriting
profit shall not include, for computation of the tax prescribed by this
subsection, the amounts refunded, or paid as participation dividends,
by such insurers to the holders of such contracts.
(4) The state does hereby preempt the field of imposing excise or
privilege taxes upon insurers or their appointed insurance producers,
other than title insurers, and no county, city, town or other municipal
subdivision shall have the right to impose any such taxes upon such
insurers or these insurance producers.
(5) If an authorized insurer collects or receives any such premiums
or moneys for coverage under contracts issued on behalf of the program
created under chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 40
of this act) on account of policies in force in this state which were
originally issued by another insurer and which other insurer is not
authorized to transact insurance in this state on its own account, such
collecting insurer shall be liable for and shall pay the tax on such
premiums.

Sec. 22 RCW 48.14.0201 and 2005 c 405 s 1, 2005 c 223 s 6, and
2005 c 7 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(2) Each taxpayer shall pay a tax on or before the first day of
March of each year to the state treasurer through the insurance
commissioner's office. The tax shall be equal to the total amount of
all premiums and prepayments for health care services received by the
taxpayer during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of
two percent. For the purposes of this section, moneys paid as the
result of contracts issued to these taxpayers for the purpose of
providing health care coverage under the program created in chapter
70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 40 in this act) will be
treated as premiums.
(3) Taxpayers shall prepay their tax obligations under this
section. The minimum amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of
the taxpayer's tax obligation for the preceding calendar year
recomputed using the rate in effect for the current year. For the
prepayment of taxes due during the first calendar year, the minimum
amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of the taxpayer's tax
obligation that would have been due had the tax been in effect during
the previous calendar year. The tax prepayments shall be paid to the
state treasurer through the commissioner's office by the due dates and
in the following amounts:
(a) On or before June 15, forty-five percent;
(b) On or before September 15, twenty-five percent;
(c) On or before December 15, twenty-five percent.
(4) For good cause demonstrated in writing, the commissioner may
approve an amount smaller than the preceding calendar year's tax
obligation as recomputed for calculating the health maintenance
organization's, health care service contractor's, self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement's, or certified health plan's prepayment
obligations for the current tax year.
(5) Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the
general fund through March 31, 1996, and in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900 after March 31, 1996.
(6) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to:
(a) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the United States or any
instrumentality thereof as prepayments for health care services
provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the federal social security
act.
(b) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the state of Washington
as prepayments for health care services provided under:
(i) The medical care services program as provided in RCW 74.09.035;
(ii) The Washington basic health plan on behalf of subsidized
enrollees as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW; or
(iii) The medicaid program on behalf of elderly or disabled clients
as provided in chapter 74.09 RCW when these prepayments are received
prior to July 1, 2009, and are associated with a managed care contract
program that has been implemented on a voluntary demonstration or pilot
project basis.
(c) Amounts received by any health care service contractor, as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, as prepayments for health care services
included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW
18.32.020.
(d) Participant contributions to self-funded multiple employer
welfare arrangements that are not taxable in this state.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2000, the state does hereby preempt the
field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon taxpayers and no
county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision shall have the right
to impose any such taxes upon such taxpayers. This subsection shall be
limited to premiums and payments for health benefit plans offered by
health care service contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW, health
maintenance organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW, ((and)) self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010,
and any moneys received for coverage under contracts issued on behalf
of the program created in chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 40 of this act). The preemption authorized by this subsection
shall not impair the ability of a county, city, town, or other
municipal subdivision to impose excise or privilege taxes upon the
health care services directly delivered by the employees of a health
maintenance organization under chapter 48.46 RCW.
(8)(a) The taxes imposed by this section apply to a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement only in the event that they are
not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974,
as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing state premium taxes on
these arrangements. Once the legality of the taxes has been
determined, the multiple employer welfare arrangement certified by the
insurance commissioner must begin payment of these taxes.
(b) If there has not been a final determination of the legality of
these taxes, then beginning on the earlier of (i) the date the fourth
multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the
insurance commissioner, or (ii) April 1, 2006, the arrangement shall
deposit the taxes imposed by this section into an interest bearing
escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final
determination that the taxes are not preempted by the employee
retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001
et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account shall be
transferred to the state treasurer.
(9) The effect of transferring contracts for health care services
from one taxpayer to another taxpayer is to transfer the tax prepayment
obligation with respect to the contracts.
(10) On or before June 1st of each year, the commissioner shall
notify each taxpayer required to make prepayments in that year of the
amount of each prepayment and shall provide remittance forms to be used
by the taxpayer. However, a taxpayer's responsibility to make
prepayments is not affected by failure of the commissioner to send, or
the taxpayer to receive, the notice or forms.

Sec. 23 RCW 48.02.190 and 2008 c 328 s 6003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state, every health care service contractor, as defined in RCW
48.44.010, every health maintenance organization, as defined in RCW
48.46.020, or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as
defined in RCW 48.125.010, registered to do business in this state.
"Class one" organizations shall consist of all insurers as defined in
RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall consist of all
organizations registered under provisions of chapters 48.44 and 48.46
RCW. "Class three" organizations shall consist of self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(b)(i) "Receipts" means (A) net direct premiums consisting of
direct gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance
written or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021((, and));
(B) prepayments to health care service contractors, as defined in RCW
48.44.010, health maintenance organizations, as defined in RCW
48.46.020, or participant contributions to self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements, as defined in RCW 48.125.010, less
experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments returned to
subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken; and (C) any money
received for coverage under contracts issued on behalf of the program
created in chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 40 of
this act).
(ii) Participant contributions, under chapter 48.125 RCW, used to
determine the receipts in this state under this section shall be
determined in the same manner as premiums taxable in this state are
determined under RCW 48.14.090.
(c) "Regulatory surcharge" means the fees imposed by this section.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations as a
regulatory surcharge. Each class of organization shall contribute a
sufficient amount to the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to
pay the reasonable costs, including overhead, of regulating that class
of organization.
(3) The regulatory surcharge shall be calculated separately for
each class of organization. The regulatory surcharge collected from
each organization shall be that portion of the cost of operating the
insurance commissioner's office, for that class of organization, for
the ensuing fiscal year that is represented by the organization's
portion of the receipts collected or received by all organizations
within that class on business in this state during the previous
calendar year. However, the regulatory surcharge must not exceed one-eighth of one percent of receipts and the minimum regulatory surcharge
shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1st,
calculate and bill each organization for the amount of the regulatory
surcharge. The regulatory surcharge shall be due and payable no later
than June 15th of each year. However, if the necessary financial
records are not available or if the amount of the legislative
appropriation is not determined in time to carry out such calculations
and bill such regulatory surcharge within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the regulatory surcharge factors for the prior
year as the basis for the regulatory surcharge and, if necessary, the
commissioner may impose supplemental fees to fully and properly charge
the organizations. Any organization failing to pay the regulatory
surcharges by June 30th shall pay the same penalties as the penalties
for failure to pay taxes when due under RCW 48.14.060. The regulatory
surcharge required by this section is in addition to all other taxes
and fees now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future regulatory surcharges. During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the Washington state
heritage center account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in
the account.
(7)(a) Each insurer may annually collect regulatory surcharges
remitted in preceding years by means of a policyholder surcharge on
premiums charged for all kinds of insurance. The recoupment shall be
at a uniform rate reasonably calculated to collect the regulatory
surcharge remitted by the insurer.
(b) If an insurer fails to collect the entire amount of the
recoupment in the first year under this section, it may repeat the
recoupment procedure provided for in this subsection (7) in succeeding
years until the regulatory surcharge is fully collected or a de minimis
amount remains uncollected. Any such de minimis amount may be
collected as provided in (d) of this subsection.
(c) The amount and nature of any recoupment shall be separately
stated on either a billing or policy declaration sent to an insured.
The amount of the recoupment must not be considered a premium for any
purpose, including the premium tax or agents' commissions.
(d) An insurer may elect not to collect the regulatory surcharge
from its insured. In such a case, the insurer may recoup the
regulatory surcharge through its rates, if the following requirements
are met:
(i) The insurer remits the amount of surcharge not collected by
election under this subsection; and
(ii) The surcharge is not considered a premium for any purpose,
including the premium tax or agents' commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 The legislature recognizes that every
individual possesses a fundamental right to exercise his or her
religious beliefs and conscience. The legislature further recognizes
that in developing public policy, conflicting religious and moral
beliefs must be respected. The state also recognizes the right of
individuals enrolled in the program to receive the full range of
services covered under the program. Therefore:
(1) No person may be required by law or contract to participate in
the provision of or payment for a specific service if the person
objects to doing so for reason of conscience or religion.
(2) The authority shall establish a mechanism to recognize the
right to exercise conscience while ensuring enrollees have timely
access to services and ensuring prompt payment to service providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) All persons appointed by participating
carriers to assist in the choosing of and registering with a carrier,
other than persons providing only ministerial duties and employees of
any agency of the state, must be appropriately licensed by the
commissioner as producers and must comply with the requirements of
chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2) When an eligible person is assisted in choosing and registering
with a participating carrier by a licensed producer, the carrier chosen
by the enrollee must pay the producer a commission.
(a) The amount of the commission must be set forth in a rule
adopted by the authority.
(b) When establishing the amount of the commission, the authority
must consider the rates of commission paid to producers by carriers for
health plans other than this program.
(c) Preference in commission rates may be given to producers who
assist with enrollment of eligible persons who reside in rural or
underserved areas of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Employers must make information developed
by the authority about the program and open enrollment available to
their employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) The guaranteed benefit program trust
account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the deposit of reserves, dividends, and refunds must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for payment of premiums to participating carriers, to establish
and maintain appropriate reserves or rate stabilization funds, and for
operating expenses of the program.
(a) Expenditures from the account must be disbursed by the state
treasurer by warrants on vouchers authorized by the authority.
(b) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after allocation.
(2) The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(3) The authority must keep full and adequate records and accounts
of the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of the program
created under this chapter.
(4) The state investment board shall act as the investor for the
funds and, except as provided in RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, one
hundred percent of all earnings from these investments must accrue
directly to the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) The guaranteed benefit program reserve
trust account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from reserves established for self-funded benefits, if any,
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
only be used for the establishment of appropriate reserves, payment of
benefits for eligible enrollees, and operating expenses of any self-funded program. Only the authority may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The account is subject to the examination requirements of
chapter 48.03 RCW as if the program were a domestic insurer. In
conducting this examination, the commissioner is authorized to
determine the adequacy of the reserves established for the program.
(3) The authority shall file periodic statements of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any self-funded option
established under the program established under this section in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner. A copy of the annual
statement must be filed with the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president of the senate within four months
after the end of the coverage year.

Sec. 29 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008
c 128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the guaranteed benefit program reserve trust account,
the guaranteed benefit program trust account, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account,
the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional
transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The state auditor shall examine the records
of the program every second year, or more frequently upon request of
the board, and may recommend methods of accounting and the rendering of
periodic reports of projects undertaken by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following information is exempt from disclosure under this
chapter:
(a) Records obtained by or on file with any carrier or the
authority containing information concerning the medical history or
treatment of any person, a person's financial information, and a
person's social security number;
(b) Actuarial formula, statistics, and assumptions submitted in
support of or in response to a request for proposals as part of a
competitive bid or submitted to or at the request of the authority; and
(c) Actuarial formulas, statistics, cost and utilization data, or
other proprietary information submitted upon request of the authority
may be withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to
preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair competition.
(2) When soliciting proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts
for goods or services related to the program, the authority, upon
written request of the bidder, shall exempt from public inspection and
copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information
contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's unique
methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium
rates to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services shall seek all necessary waivers or
amendments needed for full implementation of the program and shall seek
to obtain federal reimbursements for all eligible persons who enroll in
the program.
(2) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall report to the governor, the legislature, the commissioner, and
the authority on the status of federal reimbursement and requests for
waivers or amendments. This includes any waiver requested or granted
by the federal department of health and human services under section
1115 of the social security act or such other waivers or amendments as
the secretary may determine are necessary.
(3) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall consult with the board and other interested parties prior to
submission of waivers and amendments to the federal department of
health and human services.
(4) Rules adopted under the authority of this chapter must meet
federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of
federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 (1) The commissioner shall study and report
on whether to retain, eliminate, or change the Washington state health
insurance pool, created in chapter 48.41 RCW, after full implementation
of this program. The final report must be submitted to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of a year
that is no later than two years after the first registration occurs.
(2) The report must consider the following:
(a) The economic impact to the pool of implementing the program;
(b) The potential impact to residents of eliminating or changing
the pool;
(c) Alternatives for coverage for existing members of the pool and
persons who might require access to the pool for coverage to supplement
the program if the pool were eliminated;
(d) The potential for cost savings to the state, residents,
providers, and facilities, and carriers by eliminating or changing the
pool;
(e) Alternative approaches to changing or winding down the pool;
and
(f) Any other factors the commissioner determines are relevant to
the question of whether the Washington state health insurance pool
should be retained, eliminated, or changed.
(3) In preparation of the report, the commissioner shall consult
with relevant parties, such as but not limited to the board and the
authority, the state office of financial management, the Washington
state health insurance pool board, carriers, providers (including
facilities), consumers, business, and labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 The authority shall report to the governor
and to the legislature on the effects of the program no later than
December 1st of a year that is no later than five years after full
implementation of the program and every odd-numbered year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 The commissioner, the authority, and the
secretary of the department of social and health services may adopt
such rules as are necessary or desirable to implement this act.

Sec. 37 RCW 70.47.020 and 2007 c 259 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children:
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan;
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed ((two)) three hundred percent of the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services; and
(vi) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan; and
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv)
and (vi) of this subsection and who is a foster parent licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the time of
enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the
federal department of health and human services((; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv) and (vi) of this subsection and
whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than two
hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the
federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services)).
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their
employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as
consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee, a
nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollee.
(10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 This chapter may be known and cited as the
guaranteed health benefit program act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Sections 1 through 20, 24 through 28, 30,
32 through 36, 38, and 39 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---