BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares:
On June 23, 1972, President Richard Nixon signed into law Title IX
of the Education Amendments of 1972 to the 1964 Civil Rights Act. This
landmark legislation provides that: "No person in the United States
shall, on the basis of sex, be excluded from participation in, be
denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination under any
education program or activity receiving Federal financial
assistance...." Title IX has expanded opportunities for males as well
as females in educational programs and activities, including ensuring
access to athletic opportunities for girls and women in educational
institutions and to male and female staff to coaching and athletics
administrative positions in educational institutions. The dramatic
increases in participation rates at both the high school and college
levels since Title IX was passed show that when doors are opened to
women and girls, they will participate.
Further, ensuring equality in the state of Washington, the
legislature passed an amendment to the state Constitution, ratified by
the voters in November 1972, providing "Equality of rights and
responsibilities under the law shall not be denied or abridged on
account of sex." In 1975, Washington continued to be at the forefront
of this issue by adopting legislation that established our own
statutory version of the federal Title IX law that prohibited
"inequality in the educational opportunities afforded women and girls
at all levels of the public schools in Washington state."
Athletic opportunities provide innumerable benefits to
participants, including greater academic success, better physical and
psychological health, responsible social behaviors, and enhanced
interpersonal skills. Athletic scholarships make it possible for some
young people to attend college. The Washington state legislature,
recognizing the importance of full participation in athletics, has
passed numerous bills directed at achieving equity and eliminating
discrimination in intercollegiate athletics in the state's institutions
of higher education.
Despite advances in educational settings and efforts by some local
agencies to expand opportunities in community athletics programs,
discrimination still exists that limits these opportunities. It is the
intent of the legislature to expand and support equal participation in
athletics programs, and provide all sports programs equal access to
facilities administered by cities, towns, counties, metropolitan park
districts, park and recreation service areas, or park and recreation
districts.
Nothing in this act is intended to affect the holding in the
Washington state supreme court's ruling in Darrin v. Gould, 85 Wn.2d
859, 540 P.2d 882 (1975) and its progeny that held it is not acceptable
to discriminate in contact sports on the basis of sex.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No city, town, county, or district may
discriminate against any person on the basis of sex in the operation,
conduct, or administration of community athletics programs for youth or
adults. Cities, towns, counties, districts, and public school
districts shall not authorize or grant permits or other permission to
third parties for community athletics programs if the third party's
program discriminates against any person on the basis of sex.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Community athletics program" means any athletic program that
is organized for the purposes of training for and engaging in athletic
activity and competition and that is in any way operated, conducted,
administered, or supported by a city, town, county, district, or public
school district other than those offered by the school and created
solely for the students by the school.
(b) "District" means any metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, or park and recreation district.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section
that participants shall be accorded opportunities for participation in
community athletics programs on an equal basis, both in quality and
scope, regardless of the sex of the athletes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A task force shall be established in October 2011 of interested
stakeholders to compile and review the results of the reports as
required under section 9 of this act and look for common themes to the
types of complaints that are made statewide. The governor shall
appoint members of the task force and must include, at a minimum,
representatives from cities, towns, counties, park and recreation
districts, gender equity support groups, and third-party community
athletics programs that contract to use municipal facilities and
resources. Each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives and the senate may submit names to the governor for
consideration. Based on this review, the task force shall make
recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2012, on whether
additional compliance monitoring of community athletic programs by the
state is necessary to accomplish the intent of section 9 of this act,
including whether there is a need for mandatory reporting guidelines.
(2) If it is determined that additional compliance monitoring in
the form of reporting is necessary, the task force shall make
recommendations regarding the specifics of such reporting requirements.
(3) Administrative costs for the task force, including per diem,
travel expenses, staff time, or material production, will not be
supported by public funds but may be supported by private funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of sections 2 and 9 of this act
apply to programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of sections 2 and 9 of this act
apply to programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of sections 2 and 9 of this act
apply to programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of sections 2 and 9 of this act
apply to programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.69 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of sections 2 and 9 of this act
apply to programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) In civil actions brought under this
section or under other applicable antidiscrimination laws alleging
discrimination in community youth athletics programs, courts shall
consider the following factors, among others, in determining whether
discrimination exists:
(a) Whether the selection of community athletic programs offered
effectively accommodate the athletic interests and abilities of members
of both sexes;
(b) The provision of moneys, equipment, supplies, and facilities;
(c) Assignment and compensation of coaches and game officials;
(d) Scheduling;
(e) Access to lands and areas accessed through permitting, leasing,
or other land use arrangements, or otherwise accessed; and
(f) Publicity.
(2) A court may find that a violation of a single factor listed in
subsection (1)(b) through (f) of this section constitutes unlawful
discrimination if the resulting harms are so substantial as to deny
equal participation opportunities in community athletics programs to
athletes of one sex. This standard of compliance is taken from federal
law.
(3) In making the determination of whether discrimination exists
under subsection (1)(a) of this section, a court shall assess whether
the community athletics program has effectively accommodated the
athletic interests and abilities of both males and females in any one
of the following ways:
(a) By showing that the community athletics program opportunities
for both males and females are provided in numbers substantially
proportionate to their respective numbers in the community;
(b) Where the members of one sex have been and continue to be
underrepresented in community athletics programs, by showing a history
and continuing practice of program expansion and allocation of
resources that are demonstrably responsive to the developing interests
and abilities of the members of that sex;
(c) Where the members of one sex are underrepresented in community
athletics programs, by demonstrating that the interests and abilities
of the members of that sex have been fully and effectively accommodated
by the present program and allocation of resources.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2018, a community athletics program may no
longer rely on subsection (3)(b) of this section to show that it has
accommodated the athletic interests and abilities of both sexes.
(5)(a) A city, town, county, district, or public school district
that permits or leases its facilities and resources to third parties
for usage for community athletics programs shall not authorize such
permit or lease unless the third-party contractor is in compliance with
this section and agrees to demonstrate compliance by filing an annual
report as established in this subsection. Reports shall be submitted
to the Washington state human rights commission, and notice that the
report has been received shall be sent by the human rights commission
to the appropriate city, town, county, district, or public school
district. Each report shall cover the time period beginning on
September 1st of the previous year and ending on August 30th of the
year in which the report is due. Separate reports must be made for
male and female teams. The city, town, county, district, or public
school district may set additional reporting requirements at its
discretion.
(b) If, after reviewing the annual report, the city, town, county,
district, or public school district determines that the third-party
contractor has failed to comply with this section, the contractor shall
be required to prepare and submit a corrective plan and timeline for
full implementation prior to receiving any future permits or leases.
(i) If the city, town, county, district, or public school district
determines that the corrective plan prepared adequately addresses and
provides for future compliance with this section, the plan and
implementation timeline shall be approved and future permits or leases
may be issued under the stipulation that the corrective plan shall be
implemented according to the timeline provided.
(ii) If a complaint is filed pursuant to subsection (7) of this
section within one year following the date of the approval of the
corrective plan, the city, town, county, district, or public school
district shall determine whether the third-party contractor has
implemented the corrective plan or has demonstrated significant efforts
towards implementation according to the established timeline. If the
third-party contractor has not implemented the corrective plan or has
not made significant efforts towards implementation, the permit shall
be revoked for one year or until the third-party contractor
demonstrates an affirmative effort towards compliance with this section
and with implementation of the corrective plan.
(6) Each city, town, county, or district operating a community
athletics program or issuing permission to a third party for the
operation of such program on its facilities shall designate at least
one employee to coordinate its efforts to comply with and carry out its
responsibilities under this section, including the investigation of any
written complaints alleging noncompliance with this section. The
employee designated under this subsection may be the same person
designated to issue permits to third-party contractors. For a public
school district issuing permission to a third party, the employee
responsible for addressing the compliance monitoring requirements
established under the authority of RCW 28A.640.030 shall be responsible
for the provisions established under subsection (5) of this section.
The city, town, county, or district operating a community athletics
program shall annually make an effort to notify its users of the name,
office address, and office telephone number of the employee or
employees appointed pursuant to this subsection, and of the rights
entitled to them under this act. Such notification shall be published
on the appropriate city, town, county, or district web site.
(7) Each city, town, county, or district operating a community
athletics program or issuing permission to a third party for the
operation of such program on its facilities shall adopt and publish
grievance procedures that establish the process by which complaints are
filed and the procedures, including an estimated timeline, that will be
used to ensure a prompt and equitable resolution of complaints. The
grievance procedures must allow, at a minimum, complaints to be brought
by a parent or guardian on behalf of her or his minor child who is a
participant in a community athletics program, alleging any action that
would be a violation of this section. The grievance procedures must
be, at a minimum, published in existing publications of the city, town,
county, or district and must be posted conspicuously wherever permits
are issued under section 2 or 9 of this act. Public school districts
issuing permission to a third party for the operation of a community
athletics program on its facilities shall also follow the provisions of
this subsection but may modify and use existing school district
policies and procedures to the extent that is possible.
(8) Each city, town, county, or district operating a community
athletics program or issuing permission to a third party for the
operation of such program on its facilities shall submit annual reports
to the Washington state human rights commission regarding its
compliance with this section. Public school districts issuing
permission to a third party for the operation of a community athletics
program on its facilities shall also submit annual reports as required
by this subsection.
(9) This section shall not be construed to invalidate any existing
consent decree or any other settlement agreement entered into by a
city, town, county, or district to address equity in athletic programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 and 9 of this act are each added
to chapter 49.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---