BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Major public facilities, public works, and
capital projects with significant public funding generally seek to
accrue broad benefits for the people of Washington. At times, however,
the needs and concerns of a stakeholder community that is required to
bear a disproportionate burden of the broad public benefit by absorbing
deleterious impacts are overlooked or inadequately addressed. These
impacts may include dislocation, displacement, and the overall
disintegration of an identifiable, existing community and its
historical and cultural character.
The legislature finds that preserving and restoring the character,
history, and cultural values of a community that is, has been, or may
be disproportionately affected by major public facilities, public
works, and capital projects with significant public funding are
important public policy goals that can be achieved through the creation
of community preservation and development authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.167 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Community preservation and development authorities may be
created to restore or enhance the health, safety, and economic well-being of communities adversely impacted by the construction or ongoing
operation of multiple major public facilities, public works, and
capital projects with significant public funding.
(2) Community preservation and development authorities have the
following purposes:
(a) Revitalizing, enhancing, and preserving the unique character of
impacted communities;
(b) Mitigating the adverse effects of multiple major public
facilities projects, public works projects, or capital projects with
significant public funding, or secure community transition facilities
as defined in RCW 71.09.020(14);
(c) Restoring a local area's sense of community;
(d) Reducing the displacement of community members and businesses;
(e) Stimulating the community's economic vitality;
(f) Enhancing public service provisions;
(g) Improving the standard of living of community members;
(h) Preserving historic buildings or areas by returning them to
economically productive uses that are compatible with, or beneficial
to, their historic character; and
(i) Raising the visibility and consequences of public policy
decisions and actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.167 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community" means a group of people who: (a) Currently or
historically share a distinct cultural identity or local history; and
(b) reside or work in the geographic area of an established or proposed
authority.
(2) "Community preservation and development authority" or
"authority" means an authority established under this chapter.
(3) "Constituency" means the general membership of the community
preservation and development authority. Membership shall be open to
all persons eighteen years of age and over who are residents, property
owners, employees, or business persons within the geographic boundaries
of an established or proposed authority.
(4) "Director" means a member of the board of directors of an
authority.
(5) "Impacted community" means a community that has been or may be
adversely impacted by the construction of, or ongoing operation of,
multiple major public facilities, public works, and capital projects
with significant public funding.
(6) "Major public facilities project, public works project, or
capital project with significant public funding" means any capital
project whose total cost exceeds ten million dollars. On July 1, 2011,
and on July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, the capital
project cost threshold shall be adjusted by the capital project cost
adjustment factor for inflation established by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.167.010 and 2007 c 501 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The residents, property owners, employees, or business owners
of an impacted community may propose formation of a community
preservation and development authority. The proposal to form ((a
community preservation and development)) an authority must be presented
in writing to the appropriate legislative committees in ((both)) the
house of representatives and the senate. The proposal must contain
proposed general geographic boundaries that will be used to define the
community for the purposes of the authority. Proposals presented after
January 1, 2008, must identify in its proposal one or more stable
revenue sources that (a) have a nexus with the multiple publicly funded
facilities that have adversely impacted the community, and (b) can be
used to support future operating or capital projects that will be
identified in the strategic plan required under RCW 43.167.030.
(2) Formation of the community preservation and development
authority is subject to legislative authorization by statute. Prior to
authorizing the formation of an authority, the legislature must find
that (a) the area within the proposal's geographic boundaries meets the
definition of "impacted community" contained in section ((2(4))) 3 of
this act and (b) those persons that have brought forth the proposal are
members of the community as defined in section ((2(1))) 3 of this act
and, if the authority were approved, would meet the definition of
constituency contained in section ((2(3))) 3 of this act. For
proposals brought after January 1, 2008, the legislature must also find
that the community has identified one or more stable revenue sources as
required in subsection (1) of this section. The legislature may then
act to authorize the establishment of the ((community preservation and
development)) authority in law.
(3) The affairs of a community preservation and development
authority shall be managed by a board of directors, consisting of the
following members:
(a) Two members who own, operate, or represent businesses within
the community;
(b) Two members who reside in the community;
(c) Two members who are involved in providing nonprofit community
or social services within the community;
(((c))) (d) Two members who are involved in the arts and
entertainment within the community;
(((d))) (e) Two members with knowledge of the community's culture
and history; and
(((e))) (f) One member who is involved in a nonprofit or public
planning organization that directly serves the impacted community.
(4) No member of the board shall hold office for more than four
years. Board positions shall be numbered one through ((nine)) eleven,
and the terms staggered shall be as follows:
(a) Board members elected to positions one through five shall serve
two-year terms, and if reelected, may serve no more than one additional
two-year term.
(b) Board members initially elected to positions six through
((nine)) eleven shall serve a three-year term only.
(c) Board members elected to positions six through ((nine)) eleven
after the initial three-year term shall serve two-year terms, and if
reelected, may serve no more than one additional two-year term.
(5) ((With respect to an authority's)) The initial board of
directors((: The state legislative delegation)) of an authority shall
be established through the election process established in this
subsection. Two or more members of the legislative delegation from the
legislative district within which the authority is located, and those
proposing formation of the authority, shall jointly establish a
committee to develop a list of candidates to stand for election
((once)) after the authority has received legislative approval as
((established)) provided in subsection (2) of this section. ((For the
purpose of developing the list and identifying those persons who meet
the criteria in subsection (3)(a) through (e) of this section,
community shall mean the proposed geographic boundaries as set out in
the proposal.)) The ((board of)) initial directors shall be elected by
the constituency during a meeting convened for that purpose by two or
more members of the ((state)) applicable legislative delegation.
(6) ((With respect to subsequent elections of an authority's board
of directors:)) Subsequent directors shall be determined through the
election process established in this subsection. A list of candidates
shall be developed by the authority's existing ((board of)) directors
and the election shall be held during the annual local town hall
meeting as required in RCW 43.167.030.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.167.020 and 2007 c 501 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A community preservation and development authority shall have
the power to:
(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or
private entities; ((and
(b) Exercise such additional powers as may be authorized by law))
(b) Employ and appoint such agents, attorneys, officers, and
employees as may be necessary to implement the purposes and duties of
an authority;
(c) Contract and enter into partnerships with individuals,
associations, corporations, and local, state, and federal governments;
(d) Buy, own, lease, and sell real and personal property;
(e) Hold in trust, improve, and develop land;
(f) Invest, deposit, and reinvest its funds;
(g) Incur debt in furtherance of its mission;
(h) Lend its funds, property, credit, or services for corporate
purposes; and
(i) Exercise additional powers as may be authorized by law.
(2) A community preservation and development authority ((shall
have)) has no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or
special assessments.
(3) A community preservation and development authority that accepts
public funds under subsection (1)(a) of this section:
(a) Is subject in all respects to Article VIII, section 5 or 7, as
appropriate, of the state Constitution, and to RCW 42.17.128; and
(b) May not use the funds to support or oppose a candidate, ballot
proposition, political party, or political committee.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.167.030 and 2007 c 501 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A community preservation and development authority shall have the
duty to:
(1) Establish specific geographic boundaries for the authority
within its bylaws based on the general geographic boundaries
established in the proposal submitted and approved by the legislature;
(2) Solicit input from members of its community and develop a
strategic preservation and development plan to restore and promote the
health, safety, and economic well-being of the impacted community and
to restore and preserve its cultural and historical identity;
(3) Include within the strategic plan a prioritized list of
projects identified and supported by the community, including capital
or operating components that address one or more of the purposes under
section ((1(3))) 2(2) of this act;
(4) Establish funding mechanisms to support projects and programs
identified in the strategic plan including but not limited to grants
and loans;
(5) Use gifts, grants, loans, and other aid from public or private
entities to carry out projects identified in the strategic plan
including, but not limited to, those that: (a) Enhance public safety;
(b) reduce community blight; (c) provide ongoing mitigation of the
adverse effects of multiple publicly funded projects on the impacted
community; and (d) address other purposes consistent with section 2 of
this act; and
(6) Demonstrate ongoing accountability for its actions by:
(a) Reporting to the appropriate committees of the legislature, one
year after formation and every biennium thereafter, on the authority's
strategic plan, activities, accomplishments, and any recommendations
for statutory changes;
(b) Reporting any changes in the authority's geographic boundaries
to the appropriate committees of the legislature when the legislature
next convenes in regular session;
(c) Convening a local town hall meeting with its constituency on an
annual basis to: (i) Report its activities and accomplishments from
the previous year; (ii) present and receive input from members of the
impacted community regarding its proposed strategic plan and activities
for the upcoming year; and (iii) hold board member elections as
necessary; and
(d) Maintaining books and records as appropriate for the conduct of
its affairs.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.167.050 and 2007 c 501 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to making siting, design, and construction decisions for
future major public facilities, public works projects, or capital
projects with significant public funding, state and local government
agencies ((may)) must:
(1) Communicate and consult fully with the community preservation
and development authority and impacted community, including assessing
the compatibility of the proposed project with the strategic plan
adopted by the authority; and
(2) Make reasonable efforts to ensure that negative, cumulative
effects of multiple projects upon the impacted community are minimized.

--- END ---