BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A light and power business that is a qualifying utility is
allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter in an amount
equal to the taxes paid by it or any other person under RCW 82.08.020
or 82.12.020 on machinery and equipment used directly in generating
electricity from an eligible renewable resource that is used as the
principal source of power, and sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment. One-quarter of the amount of credit earned under this
section may be claimed against taxes due for the fiscal year in which
the eligible renewable resource, in respect to which the credit was
earned, becomes operational. The remaining credit may be claimed
against taxes due under this chapter for the subsequent three years in
an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of credit for each
successive fiscal year. Unused credit may not be carried forward and
claimed against liability incurred under this chapter in subsequent
fiscal years.
(2) The credit under this section may not exceed the tax that was
paid under RCW 82.08.020 and 82.12.020 on the machinery, equipment,
labor, and services. Credit under this section may not be claimed for
sales and use taxes imposed by any local government under the authority
of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW, or any other provision of law.
(3) The credit under this section is available only if the
renewable resource on which taxes were paid under RCW 82.08.020 and
82.12.020 is owned or operated by the qualifying utility or the
electrical energy produced by the resource is contractually obligated
to the qualifying utility at the time the credit is claimed under this
subsection.
(4) Credit under this section may only be claimed on returns filed
electronically using the department's online tax filing service. No
application is required to claim the credit.
(5) The amount of credit claimed under this section in any
reporting period may not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under
this chapter for the reporting period. No refunds may be granted for
unused credits.
(6) Credit may not be earned for tax liability incurred under RCW
82.08.020 and 82.12.020 before the effective date of this section.
(7) Qualified utilities claiming the credit under this section must
keep records necessary to verify eligibility for the credit and the
amount of credit the utility is entitled to. For qualified utilities
claiming credit based on state sales and use taxes paid by another
person, such records must include copies of invoices, contracts, and
other documents detailing the amount of sales and use taxes paid by the
other person on machinery and equipment used directly in generating
electricity from an eligible renewable resource and any labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(8) The following definitions apply to this section, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Qualifying utility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.285.030.
(b) "Eligible renewable resource" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.285.030.
(c) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity from an eligible renewable resource.
(d) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(e) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity from an eligible renewable resource if it provides any part
of the process that captures the energy, converts that energy to
electricity, or stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems.
(9) This section expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
On the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year,
the department must advise the state treasurer of the amount of credit
claimed under section 1 of this act during the preceding calendar
quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and September,
respectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---