BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that although the
United States has long exemplified democratic practice to the rest of
the world, we ought not to neglect it at home. Two-thirds of our
nation's twelfth graders scored below proficient on the last national
civics assessment, and fewer than ten percent could list two ways that
a democracy benefits from citizen participation. A healthy democracy
depends on the participation of citizens. But participation is learned
behavior, and in recent years civic learning has been pushed aside.
Preparation for citizenship is as important as preparation for college
and a career, and should take its place as a requirement for receiving
a high school diploma.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2006 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to
declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education,
gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to
be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board. The
state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students
enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical
education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a
certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The
purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these
programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic
achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or
credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.
((The board shall reports [report] its findings and recommendations for
additional flexibility in graduation requirements, if necessary, to the
legislature by December 1, 2007.))
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If, after the effective date of this section, the state board
of education increases the number of course credits in social studies
that are required for high school graduation under RCW 28A.230.090, the
board shall also require that at least one-half credit of that
requirement be coursework in civics.
(2) The content of the civics requirement must include, but not be
limited to:
(a) Federal, state, and local government organization and
procedures;
(b) Rights and responsibilities of citizens addressed in the
Washington state and United States Constitutions;
(c) Current issues addressed at each level of government; and
(d) Electoral issues, including elections, ballot measures,
initiatives, and referenda.

--- END ---