BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that community service
is an important and vital civic responsibility. Particularly during
times of economic hardship, volunteerism can help alleviate the unmet
needs of citizens and communities. The legislature further finds that
fostering community service in state employees will not only help
communities, but also will build skills, provide experiences and
opportunities, and further educate the state workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An agency head shall permit an employee to use up to twenty-four hours of sick leave per year to perform volunteer services as
provided in this subsection.
(b) Volunteer service may be performed at a school that the
employee's child attends or at a nonsectarian organization exempt from
tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code.
(c) The employee may use up to four hours per month of sick leave,
with a total of up to twenty-four hours per year, to perform volunteer
service under this section.
(d) An employee may take time off work as sick leave under this
section equivalent to the time the employee spends performing volunteer
service at a time other than the employee's normal shift.
(e) Sick leave hours used under this section may not be included in
the number of hours worked per week for purposes of determining any
overtime hours worked.
(f) In order to avoid using sick leave, an employee may make up
time other than during the employee's normal shift to offset volunteer
service performed under this section.
(2)(a) An employee requesting to use sick leave under this section
shall submit a request as provided under subsection (6) of this section
to the employee's agency head, or the agency head's designee,
specifying the name of the school or organization and the nature of the
volunteer services to be performed.
(b) The employee's agency must receive verification from a person
at the school or organization where the employee volunteered that the
employee performed the volunteer service.
(c) All records of sick leave used for the purpose authorized in
this section shall be maintained in the employee's personnel file.
(3) To qualify to use sick leave in accordance with subsection (1)
of this section, an employee must retain one hundred seventy-six hours
of sick leave.
(4) An employee of an institution of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who
does not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an
accrued sick leave balance of more than twenty-two days may request
using sick leave to perform volunteer services in accordance with this
section. In no event may such an employee be permitted to use sick
leave as provided for in this section if it would result in his or her
sick leave account going below twenty-two days. Under this subsection,
"sick leave" also includes leave accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(2)
or 28A.310.240(1) with compensation for illness, injury, and
emergencies.
(5) An employee may not used sick leave to perform volunteer
service that is required under a court order.
(6) Within available funds, the department of personnel shall adopt
rules to implement this section, including developing a process to
request approval to use sick leave for the purposes of this section and
to obtain verification from a person at the school or organization that
the employee volunteered as stated. For the purpose of verifying the
volunteer service of an employee, electronic communication received
directly from the school or organization that the employee volunteered
as stated is an acceptable form of verification.
(7)(a) The definitions in RCW 41.04.655 apply to this section.
(b) As used in this section, "sick leave" means leave granted to an
employee for the purpose of absence from work with pay in the event of
illness or injury, or both.

--- END ---