BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the energy
independence act, chapter 19.285 RCW, requires certain electric
utilities to pursue the development of eligible renewable resources.
The legislature finds that electric utilities are required to employ a
least-cost strategy when planning to serve load growth. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish a methodology available to
electric utilities for pursuing above market resources by allowing
electric utilities and renewable energy investors to recover these
resource costs and a reasonable return on that investment in an
equitable manner from all ratepayer classes with the exemption of low-income customers and intensive industries. It is also the intent of
the legislature to establish a cap on the permissible costs for these
resources and establish a methodology for reviewing these caps on a
biennial basis.
Further, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage the rapid
and sustainable development of renewable energy by the adoption of
renewable energy payments for the following purposes:
(1) Placing Washington at the forefront of North America's
renewable energy revolution;
(2) Stimulating the development of new technologies and industry in
Washington;
(3) Reducing the volatility of future electricity prices;
(4) Reducing the long-term costs of electricity;
(5) Protecting Washington's citizens from air pollution;
(6) Protecting Washington's climate from global warming;
(7) Protecting Washington's natural resources;
(8) Opening electricity generation from renewable resources to all
citizens regardless of their tax status;
(9) Providing an equitable opportunity for all citizens to help
meet the state's renewable energy targets; and
(10) Simplifying the awarding of contracts for the generation of
electricity with renewable energy resources and by doing so increasing
the transparency and equity of the electricity generation system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carbon content multiplier" means a decimal value derived from
the carbon content of the energy used in production or manufacture of
the solar energy systems modules. The carbon content multiplier is the
ratio of carbon fuel generated electricity using carbon-free
electricity in the nation or state of the manufacturer's energy mix
inventory as calculated by the United States energy information
administration.
(2) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(3) "Commissioning" means the first time a renewable energy plant
is put into operation, following establishment of operational readiness
or an efficiency upgrade. An efficiency upgrade must equal at least
fifty percent of the investment costs required to build a completely
new renewable energy plant including all building structures and
installations technically required for its operation.
(4) "Electric utility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
19.29A.010.
(5) "Energy intensive industry" means a manufacturing or refining
business that produces a product and more than fifty percent of the
product's production costs are expenses for electricity.
(6) "Grid system" means all the interconnected facilities used for
the transmission and distribution of electricity for general supply.
(7) "Renewable energy payment" means the rate paid in dollars per
kilowatt-hour of generation delivered to the grid system.
(8) "Renewable energy plant" means any independent facility
producing kilowatts from renewable energy sources, including thermal
kilowatts used for commercial, industrial, or residential water heating
from renewable energy sources. Multiple renewable energy plants
generating electricity from equivalent renewable energy sources, if
constructed within the application of this chapter and directly
attached to building structures and commonly used installations
technically required for operation, are considered as one renewable
energy plant. This includes inverters, access ways, and grid system
connections, as well as measuring, administrative, and control
facilities that are not technically required for such operation.
(9) "Renewable energy plant capacity" means the effective
electrical capacity that a renewable energy plant of no more than five
megawatts may technically produce without time restrictions during
regular operation irrespective of short-term deviations. When the
relevant renewable energy plant capacity is determined to calculate
renewable energy payments, the standby capacity may not be considered.
(10) "Renewable energy plant operator" means anyone who, regardless
of ownership, uses the renewable energy plant for the purpose of
generating electricity from renewable energy sources.
(11) "Renewable energy sources" means: (a) Hydropower; (b) wind
energy; (c) solar radiation; (d) geothermal energy; (e) energy from
biomass including biogas, landfill gas, and sewage treatment plant gas;
(f) wave power; (g) tidal power; and (h) geothermal electricity and the
biodegradable fraction of municipal and industrial waste that qualifies
as a small power production facility under the federal energy
regulatory commission rules, 18 CFR part 292, subpart B, as in effect
on January 1, 1997.
(12) "Renewable energy trust account" means the account created in
section 10 of this act that is to be used exclusively to reimburse
utilities for renewable energy payments made to customers under this
chapter.
(13) "Renewable recovery rates" means the investment cost plus
operating cost divided by the expected production over the service life
of the renewable energy source equals the compensation per kilowatt
hour.
(14) "Small wind turbine" means any wind turbine with a rotor swept
area of no more than one thousand square feet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An electric utility shall connect a
renewable energy plant to its distribution system within thirty days
for a renewable energy plant with plant capacity under twenty-five
kilowatts, and within sixty days for a renewable energy plant with
plant capacity greater than twenty-five kilowatts and fewer than one
hundred kilowatts. These renewable energy plants are connected upon
the terms and condition set by the commission but in no case may it
take more than one hundred twenty days after receipt of a request for
connection to occur.
(2) The commission shall establish standards for the
interconnection of renewable energy plants with the grid system. The
standards must be consistent with generally accepted industry practices
and guidelines to ensure the reliability of electric service to all
customers and the safety of customers, the grid system operator's
employees, and the public.
(3) Every kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by the renewable
energy plant counts toward the electric utility's annual renewable
resource requirements under RCW 19.285.040.
(4) An electric utility shall prepare, publish, and apply
transparent, objective, and nondiscriminatory rules for connecting
renewable energy plants to the grid system, including grid system
reinforcement and costs, the sharing of grid system costs between all
producers benefiting from them, and allocating grid system capacity.
(5) An electric utility shall provide to an eligible renewable
energy plant operator a comprehensive and detailed estimate of the
costs associated with connection of the renewable energy plant to the
grid system.
(6) The costs associated with the interconnection of renewable
energy plants, including both direct interconnection costs,
distribution system enhancements, and electric utility compliance
costs, are recoverable as part of the nonbypassable surcharge under
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The commission shall approve a standard
contract to be used in all power purchase agreements under this
chapter.
(2) The contract must include the price paid for each kilowatt-hour
generated, the duration of the contract, and any adjustments of the
price for inflation.
(3) For renewable energy plants with a plant capacity under one
hundred kilowatts, the commission shall approve simplified standard
contracts written in simple, clear language.
(4) Contracts under this chapter are transferable.
(5) No contract for renewable energy plants larger than five
megawatts are allowed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An electric utility shall enter into
power purchase agreements to acquire all of the electricity generated
by renewable energy plants located in the state for a term of not less
than twenty years from the date of commissioning.
(2) An electric utility shall pay the renewable energy payments as
provided in the table in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) The renewable energy payment rates provided in the table in
subsection (7) of this section must be indexed to one hundred percent
of inflation until such time as amended by the legislature, based upon
input from the commission as informed by the Washington State
University energy extension as provided in subsection (6) of this
section.
(4) From the date of commissioning of a renewable energy plant,
inflation adjusted renewable energy payment rates provided in the table
in subsection (7) of this section must be indexed to sixty percent of
inflation.
(5) The renewable energy payments paid for electricity generated by
small wind turbines must be based on the cost of generation plus a
reasonable profit, based on kilowatt-hours per square meters per year
of rotor swept area as described in this subsection (5).
(a) Renewable energy payments for all wind generation from year one
through five are described as the base wind renewable energy payment as
provided in the table in subsection (7) of this section.
(b) Renewable energy payments for years six through twenty must be
based on the average specific yield in kilowatt-hours per square meter
of rotor swept area per year that is either under one thousand
kilowatt-hours per square meter per year or over one thousand kilowatt-hours per square meter per year, based on measured performance of the
system.
(c) Measured performance is the average of the sum of the first
five years of production in kilowatt-hours, less the year of maximum
and the year of minimum production, divided by the rotor swept area in
square meters.
(d) Small wind turbines with measured performance under one
thousand kilowatt-hours per square meters per year must be paid the
base wind renewable energy payment for years six through twenty.
(e) Small wind turbines with measured performance over one thousand
kilowatt-hours per square meters per year must be paid the high wind
renewable energy payment for years six through twenty.
(6) The Washington State University energy extension shall
calculate and publish annually a table of state and national carbon
content multipliers for use by electric utilities in establishing
renewable recovery rates for any renewable energy plant the electric
utilities contract for power from or construct.
(7)

Renewable energy cost recovery rates

Years Rate

Wind

Land based 1 through 5 0.125

Base wind (<1,000
kWhr/m2/yr) 6 through
20 0.125

High wind (>1,000 kWhr
/m2/yr) 6 through
20 0.08

Off shore

Base wind (<1,000 kWhr
/m2/yr) 6 through
20 0.125

High wind (>1,000 kWhr
/m2/yr) 6 through
20 0.08

Small wind 20 0.2

Solar

<30 kW 20 0.40

30 kW to 100 kW 20 0.36

100 kW to 1,000 kW 20 0.30

1,000 kW to 5 MW 20 0.26

Solar thermal 10 .08

Façade cladding 20 0.40

Hydro/current/wave

<500 kW 20 0.10

500 kW to 5 MW 20 0.08

Biomass/biogas

<500 kW 20 0.14

500 kW to 5 MW 20 0.12

Geothermal electric

<500kW 20 0.12

500 kW to 5 MW 20 0.1

The values in this table are to be multiplied by the appropriate
carbon content multiplier based on place of manufacture of technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission shall assess a renewable
energy rate recovery fee equal to one percent of the monthly bill per
meter. The renewable energy rate recovery fee is a nonbypassable
surcharge payable by every customer of an electric utility. All
customer classes must pay the surcharge.
(2) The commission shall adjust the surcharge at a level sufficient
to pay the costs of electricity purchased under this chapter and any
interconnection costs authorized under this chapter. Revenues must be
placed in the renewable energy trust account.
(3) The commission may adjust or remove the surcharge for energy
intensive industries that buy electricity in Washington if an energy
intensive industry can prove hardship. In evaluating hardship, the
commission shall consider the financial impacts of the surcharge on the
competitiveness of an energy intensive industry and weigh similar
provisions in other jurisdictions in North America and worldwide,
maintaining the competitive position of an energy intensive industry.
(4) The commission may adjust or remove the surcharge for low-income customers of the electric utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter is intended to
reduce, impede, or conflict with the provisions of chapter 19.285 RCW
or RCW 82.16.090 through 82.16.140. It is the intent of the
legislature that this chapter operate in parallel with the energy
conservation and renewable energy requirements of chapter 19.285 RCW
and RCW 82.16.090 through 82.16.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Renewable energy plant operators, qualifying
owners that own all or part of a renewable energy plant, and an
electric utility shall, upon request, provide the commission with any
information that may be relevant to the commission performing its
duties under this chapter, including but not limited to assessment of
project development costs, equipment costs, electricity production
costs, interconnection costs, automatic rate adjustments, compliance
costs, renewable energy plant capacity installed, and electricity
generated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) In 2010 and 2011, and every four years
thereafter, the commission shall review implementation of this chapter
for compliance with the intent of this chapter.
(2) The commission shall report to the governor and the legislature
the following:
(a) The number of new renewable energy plants in this state and the
environmental effects of the addition of those generators;
(b) The robustness of the program in delivering the renewable
energy generation required under Washington's renewable portfolio
standard and other renewable energy objectives;
(c) Recommendations for changes to this chapter, if any, that may
be necessary; and
(d) Actions taken by the commission to implement this chapter and
to use the renewable energy payments in this chapter to achieve
Washington's renewable energy objectives and renewable portfolio
standards. In revising allowable renewable energy payment amounts, the
commission shall consider inflation, changes in technology, and the
increased or decreased costs of renewable energy generation. The
commission must ensure that the renewable energy payments are
sufficient to pay for the costs of generation plus a reasonable profit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The renewable energy trust account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
renewable energy rate recovery fee imposed under section 6 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the reimbursement of utilities for renewable energy
payments made to customers under this chapter. Only the commission may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---