BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.97 RCW
to read as follows:
Local community safe house programs that serve as a refuge for
children under sixteen years of age shall require fingerprinting and
national criminal history background checks on any person wanting to
use his or her residence as a safe house. Any person wanting to use
his or her residence as a safe house must reside in the house while a
child under sixteen years of age is residing there as a refuge.
(1) Any person over the age of twelve residing in the applicant's
residence shall provide fingerprints for the national criminal history
background check. Children under sixteen years of age seeking refuge
in a safe house shall not be considered a resident of the safe house
for purposes of providing fingerprints for the national criminal
history background check.
(2) In addition to any national criminal history background checks,
the state patrol shall furnish any other files found in the Washington
state crime information center and any local or statewide transcript of
convictions records pertaining to any person for whom the state patrol
or federal bureau of investigation has a record upon the written
request of a local community safe house program. All national criminal
history background checks shall be conducted using fingerprints
submitted to the United States department of justice federal bureau of
investigation.
(3) No fee shall be charged to a local community safe house program
for any state or federal records requested in subsection (2) of this
section. The state patrol shall be responsible for any costs incurred
due to providing a national criminal history background check, a
Washington state crime information center record, and any local or
statewide transcript of convictions records to a local community safe
house program.
(4) State and local governments shall be immune from any civil
liability in actions arising under this section.

--- END ---