BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a number of
different programs have been created over the past two decades to
provide temporary residential care and stabilization services to youth
who are at risk, in need of services, or in crisis. Although these
various programs share a common goal of keeping youth safe in temporary
care while their needs are assessed, the restrictive program criteria
relating to funding, length of stay, and youth characteristics in these
programs often function as barriers to efficiently and effectively
serving youth in their communities. The legislature finds further that
the practice of linking individual residential care beds to restrictive
and inflexible criteria results in youth being underserved or not
served at all even when a residential care bed or services are readily
available in the community. The legislature intends to promote a more
efficient use of community-based residential care beds and other
stabilization services in order to increase the ability of providers to
proactively serve youth who are at risk, in need of services, or in
crisis, by keeping them safely off the streets while their needs are
adequately assessed and an appropriate service plan is developed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, through contracts with
community providers, crisis stabilization and assessment centers in
each region to deliver residential stabilization services to
adolescents who are at risk, in need of services, or in crisis. The
crisis stabilization and assessment centers may deliver services
pursuant to a license issued by the secretary under RCW 74.15.220,
74.15.230, or 74.13.032. Contracts shall utilize a block-grant model
with a single provider or a consortium of providers who shall
coordinate the delivery of services under the contract. The contracts
shall specify a core set of outcome-based performance measures related
to adolescent well-being, including, but not limited to, stabilized
functioning sufficient to support return home or to former placement;
completion of appropriate assessments; and development of service plans
to be implemented after residence at a crisis stabilization and
assessment center.
The outcomes by which contract performance must be measured shall
be identified through collaboration with licensed providers and in
consultation with partners for our children and the children's mental
health evidence-based practice institute at the University of
Washington. The contracts for crisis stabilization and assessment
center services shall be flexible enough to allow providers to:
(a) Maximize the use of available bed space in order to provide
youth with safe and temporary residential care;
(b) Serve individual youth by selecting from an array of research-based interventions and best practices for assessing the youth's safety
and health needs and engaging the youth in the development of a
stabilization and transition plan; and
(c) Coordinate service delivery and use of bed space, including
colocation of facilities licensed under RCW 74.15.220, 74.15.230, and
74.13.032, in order to service youth according to their needs. The
maximum length of stay in a crisis stabilization and assessment center
is ninety days, unless the youth is eligible to continue receiving
services under RCW 74.15.230.
(2) Residential and other services under this section may be
provided to youth meeting one or more of the following criteria:
(a) A street youth as defined in RCW 74.15.020, or a youth who,
without such services, will continue to participate in increasingly
risky behavior;
(b) A youth who self-refers for services; and
(c) A youth who is an "at-risk youth" or a "child in need of
services" as defined in RCW 13.32A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.0321 (Crisis residential centers--Limit on reimbursement or compensation) and 1995 c 312 s 61 are each
repealed.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.032 and 1998 c 296 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, by contracts with private or
public vendors, regional crisis residential centers with semi-secure
facilities. These facilities shall be structured group care facilities
licensed under rules adopted by the department and shall have, on site,
an average of at least four adult staff members and in no event less
than three adult staff members to every eight children. A minimum of
two on-site staff members is permitted whenever five or fewer children
are residing at the center.
(2) Within available funds appropriated for this purpose, the
department shall establish, by contracts with private or public vendors
pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of this act, regional crisis residential
centers with secure facilities. These facilities shall be facilities
licensed under rules adopted by the department. These centers may also
include semi-secure facilities and to such extent shall be subject to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department shall, in addition to the facilities established
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, establish additional
crisis residential centers pursuant to contract with licensed private
group care facilities.
(4) The staff at the facilities established under this section
shall be trained so that they may effectively counsel juveniles
admitted to the centers, provide treatment, supervision, and structure
to the juveniles that recognize the need for support and the varying
circumstances that cause children to leave their families, and carry
out the responsibilities stated in RCW 13.32A.090. The
responsibilities stated in RCW 13.32A.090 may, in any of the centers,
be carried out by the department.
(5) The secure facilities located within crisis residential centers
shall be operated to conform with the definition in RCW 13.32A.030.
The facilities shall have an average of no less than one adult staff
member to every ten children. The staffing ratio shall continue to
ensure the safety of the children.
(6) If a secure crisis residential center is located in or adjacent
to a secure juvenile detention facility, the center shall be operated
in a manner that prevents in-person contact between the residents of
the center and the persons held in such facility.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.033 and 2000 c 162 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a resident of a center becomes by his or her behavior
disruptive to the facility's program, such resident may be immediately
removed to a separate area within the facility and counseled on an
individual basis until such time as the child regains his or her
composure. The department may set rules and regulations establishing
additional procedures for dealing with severely disruptive children on
the premises.
(2) When the juvenile resides in this facility, all services deemed
necessary to the juvenile's reentry to normal family life shall be made
available to the juvenile as required by chapter 13.32A RCW. In
assessing the child and providing these services, the facility staff
shall:
(a) Interview the juvenile as soon as possible;
(b) Contact the juvenile's parents and arrange for a counseling
interview with the juvenile and his or her parents as soon as possible;
(c) Conduct counseling interviews with the juvenile and his or her
parents, to the end that resolution of the child/parent conflict is
attained and the child is returned home as soon as possible;
(d) Provide additional crisis counseling as needed, to the end that
placement of the child in the crisis residential center will be
required for the shortest time possible, but not to exceed five
consecutive days; and
(e) Convene, when appropriate, a multidisciplinary team.
(3) Based on the assessments done under subsection (2) of this
section the facility staff may refer any child who, as the result of a
mental or emotional disorder, or intoxication by alcohol or other
drugs, is suicidal, seriously assaultive, or seriously destructive
toward others, or otherwise similarly evidences an immediate need for
emergency medical evaluation and possible care, for evaluation pursuant
to chapter 71.34 RCW, to a mental health professional pursuant to
chapter 71.05 RCW, or to a chemical dependency specialist pursuant to
chapter 70.96A RCW whenever such action is deemed appropriate and
consistent with law.
(4) A juvenile taking unauthorized leave from a facility shall be
apprehended and returned to it by law enforcement officers or other
persons designated as having this authority as provided in RCW
13.32A.050. ((If returned to the facility after having taken
unauthorized leave for a period of more than twenty-four hours a
juvenile shall be supervised by such a facility for a period, pursuant
to this chapter, which, unless where otherwise provided, may not exceed
five consecutive days on the premises. Costs of housing juveniles
admitted to crisis residential centers shall be assumed by the
department for a period not to exceed five consecutive days.))

Sec. 6 RCW 74.13.034 and 2000 c 162 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child taken into custody and taken to a crisis residential
center established pursuant to RCW 74.13.032 may, if the center is
unable to provide appropriate treatment, supervision, and structure to
the child, be taken at department expense to another crisis residential
center, the nearest regional secure crisis residential center, or a
secure facility with which it is collocated under RCW 74.13.032.
((Placement in both locations shall not exceed five consecutive days
from the point of intake as provided in RCW 13.32A.130.))
(2) A child taken into custody and taken to a crisis residential
center established by this chapter may be placed physically by the
department or the department's designee and, at departmental expense
and approval, in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by the
county in which the center is located for a maximum of forty-eight
hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if the child has
taken unauthorized leave from the center and the person in charge of
the center determines that the center cannot provide supervision and
structure adequate to ensure that the child will not again take
unauthorized leave. Juveniles placed in such a facility pursuant to
this section may not, to the extent possible, come in contact with
alleged or convicted juvenile or adult offenders.
(3) Any child placed in secure detention pursuant to this section
shall, during the period of confinement, be provided with appropriate
treatment by the department or the department's designee, which shall
include the services defined in RCW 74.13.033(2). If the child placed
in secure detention is not returned home or if an alternative living
arrangement agreeable to the parent and the child is not made within
twenty-four hours after the child's admission, the child shall be taken
at the department's expense to a crisis residential center.
((Placement in the crisis residential center or centers plus placement
in juvenile detention shall not exceed five consecutive days from the
point of intake as provided in RCW 13.32A.130.))
(4) Juvenile detention facilities used pursuant to this section
shall first be certified by the department to ensure that juveniles
placed in the facility pursuant to this section are provided with
living conditions suitable to the well-being of the child. Where space
is available, juvenile courts, when certified by the department to do
so, shall provide secure placement for juveniles pursuant to this
section, at department expense.

Sec. 7 RCW 13.32A.130 and 2000 c 162 s 13 and 2000 c 123 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A child admitted to a secure facility shall remain in the
facility for at least twenty-four hours after admission ((but for not
more than five consecutive days. If the child admitted under this
section is transferred between secure and semi-secure facilities, the
aggregate length of time spent in all such centers or facilities may
not exceed five consecutive days per admission)).
(2)(a)(i) The facility administrator shall determine within twenty-four hours after a child's admission to a secure facility whether the
child is likely to remain in a semi-secure facility and may transfer
the child to a semi-secure facility or release the child to the
department. The determination shall be based on: (A) The need for
continued assessment, protection, and treatment of the child in a
secure facility; and (B) the likelihood the child would remain at a
semi-secure facility until his or her parents can take the child home
or a petition can be filed under this title.
(ii) In making the determination the administrator shall consider
the following information if known: (A) The child's age and maturity;
(B) the child's condition upon arrival at the center; (C) the
circumstances that led to the child's being taken to the center; (D)
whether the child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare
of the child or any other person; (E) the child's history of running
away; and (F) the child's willingness to cooperate in the assessment.
(b) If the administrator of a secure facility determines the child
is unlikely to remain in a semi-secure facility, the administrator
shall keep the child in the secure facility pursuant to this chapter
and in order to provide for space for the child may transfer another
child who has been in the facility for at least seventy-two hours to a
semi-secure facility. The administrator shall only make a transfer of
a child after determining that the child who may be transferred is
likely to remain at the semi-secure facility.
(c) A crisis residential center administrator is authorized to
transfer a child to a crisis residential center in the area where the
child's parents reside or where the child's lawfully prescribed
residence is located.
(d) An administrator may transfer a child from a semi-secure
facility to a secure facility whenever he or she reasonably believes
that the child is likely to leave the semi-secure facility and not
return and after full consideration of all factors in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection.
(3) If no parent is available or willing to remove the child during
the first seventy-two hours following admission, the department shall
consider the filing of a petition under RCW 13.32A.140.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, the parents may remove the child at any time during the five-
day period unless the staff of the crisis residential center has
reasonable cause to believe that the child is absent from the home
because he or she is abused or neglected or if allegations of abuse or
neglect have been made against the parents. The department or any
agency legally charged with the supervision of a child may remove a
child from a crisis residential center at any time after the first
twenty-four-hour period after admission has elapsed and only after full
consideration by all parties of the factors in subsection (2)(a) of
this section.
(5) Crisis residential center staff shall make reasonable efforts
to protect the child and achieve a reconciliation of the family. If a
reconciliation and voluntary return of the child has not been achieved
within forty-eight hours from the time of admission, and if the
administrator of the center does not consider it likely that
reconciliation will be achieved within ((the five-day period, then)) a
reasonable time period or without further intervention, the
administrator shall inform the parent and child of: (a) The
availability of counseling services; (b) the right to file a child in
need of services petition for an out-of-home placement, the right of a
parent to file an at-risk youth petition, and the right of the parent
and child to obtain assistance in filing the petition; (c) the right to
request the facility administrator or his or her designee to form a
multidisciplinary team; (d) the right to request a review of any out-of-home placement; (e) the right to request a mental health or chemical
dependency evaluation by a county-designated professional or a private
treatment facility; and (f) the right to request treatment in a program
to address the child's at-risk behavior under RCW 13.32A.197.
(6) At no time shall information regarding a parent's or child's
rights be withheld. The department shall develop and distribute to all
law enforcement agencies and to each crisis residential center
administrator a written statement delineating the services and rights.
The administrator of the facility or his or her designee shall provide
every resident and parent with a copy of the statement.
(7) A crisis residential center and any person employed at the
center acting in good faith in carrying out the provisions of this
section are immune from criminal or civil liability for such actions.

--- END ---