BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.033 and 1987 c 104 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A proposed division of land, as defined in RCW 58.17.020, shall
be considered under the subdivision or short subdivision ordinance, and
zoning or other land use control ordinances, in effect on the land at
the time a fully completed application for preliminary plat approval of
the subdivision, or short plat approval of the short subdivision, has
been submitted to the appropriate county, city, or town official.
(2) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be
defined by local ordinance.
(3) The limitations imposed by this section shall not restrict
conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.
(4) A short subdivision shall be governed by the terms of approval
of the short subdivision under RCW 58.17.060. For a period of ten
thousand years after short subdivision approval according to RCW
58.17.060, the statutes, ordinances, and regulations in effect at the
time of short subdivision approval shall govern the short subdivision,
unless the legislative body finds that a change in conditions creates
a serious threat to the public health or safety in the short
subdivision or in the vicinity of the short subdivision.

--- END ---