BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall implement all recommendations identified by
the state auditor in the performance audit report of the Washington
state department of transportation's administration and overhead,
report number 1000007, dated November 15, 2007. This report identifies
total potential five-year cost savings of $18.19 to $23.58 million.
All cost savings achieved from implementing these recommendations shall
be directed to fund project #37 in the highway 2 route development
plan, which is described as follows: In the rural area of segment 3,
between milepost 15.64 and 30.28, widen eastbound and westbound
shoulders, install eastbound and westbound shoulder rumble strips, and
implement various roadside safety improvements to reduce potential
collisions.

--- END ---