BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The 2008 legislature commissioned five
studies of the differences in academic achievement and educational
outcomes among various subgroups of students. These persistent and
troubling differences are commonly referred to as the achievement gap.
The commissioned studies drew from research, best practices, and the
personal, professional, and cultural experiences of the many
individuals who participated in them. The study recommendations are
numerous and varied, encompassing short-term and long-term strategies
for systemic change. In order to continue the work of the studies,
maintain a sense of urgency, and monitor progress toward the goal of
equitable educational opportunities and outcomes for all children, the
legislature intends to establish an ongoing achievement gap oversight
and accountability committee within the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.
(2) The legislature further finds that there is a critical and
urgent need for a new model of innovation in public education that
confronts and solves the staggering problem of persistent inequity in
educational outcomes for students from different demographic groups.
The model will offer intensive, rigorous, and supportive learning that
is extremely culturally competent and that prepares these students for
careers in science, technology, engineering, and math.
(3) This model, to be called innovation academies, will provide a
new kind of educational opportunity for students in demographic groups
that are currently overrepresented in measures such as school
disciplinary sanctions, failure to meet state academic standards,
failure to graduate, enrolled in special education, enrolled in
underperforming schools, and who are underrepresented in advanced
placement courses, honors programs, college preparatory classes, and
college enrollment and completion.
(4) Innovation academies will be located in communities where there
are the largest concentrations of students who face the economic and
cultural barriers that place them in these underachieving demographic
groups.
(5) They will integrate the full array of evidence-based practices
that have been shown to reduce demographic disparities in achievement,
and to increase graduation rates, participation in advanced placement,
and college enrollment and completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The achievement gap oversight and accountability committee
is established within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, composed of at least eighteen members each appointed for
two-year terms as follows:
(i) Three members appointed by the commission on African-American
affairs;
(ii) Three members representing African immigrants appointed by the
commission on African-American affairs;
(iii) Three members appointed by the commission on Hispanic
affairs;
(iv) Three representatives of federally recognized tribes whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of Washington
state, appointed by the federally recognized tribes;
(v) Three members representing Asian Americans appointed by the
commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; and
(vi) Three members representing Pacific Islander Americans
appointed by the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction may appoint up to five
additional members, also for two-year terms, one of whom shall
represent an institution of higher education. The members of the
committee shall select the chair of the committee for a one-year term.
There is no limitation on the number of terms a member may serve if
reappointed.
(c) The committee may create temporary subcommittees to examine
particular topics in greater depth.
(d) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but
must be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(e) The center for the improvement of student learning shall
provide staff support for the committee within existing resources.
(2) The purpose of the achievement gap oversight and accountability
committee is to oversee and assure timely and complete implementation
of the recommendations from the achievement gap reports commissioned by
the legislature in 2008. To that end, the committee shall advise the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and the state board of education on effective measures
to close the achievement gap, to foster public accountability for
achieving excellence and equity in public education, and to promote a
greater sense of urgency and priority for doing so. The committee has
the following responsibilities:
(a) Establish or adopt key indicators and benchmarks to measure
progress in closing the achievement gap, in collaboration with the
education research and data center and expanding on the indicators and
benchmarks identified in the achievement gap reports, and advise the
office of the superintendent of public instruction on the data
collection and analysis necessary to track the indicators;
(b) Recommend current programs and resources that should be
redirected to narrow the gap;
(c) Provide strategies on how to improve communication and
coordination among programs aimed at narrowing the achievement gap;
(d) Recommend to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the professional educator standards board effective
professional development programs and practices that increase cultural
competence, family and community engagement, and instruction for
struggling students, including English language learners;
(e) Advise the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the professional educator standards board, and the state board of
education on effective methods of recruiting and retaining diverse
teachers and school administrators;
(f) Collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the state board of education on making closing the
achievement gap a central goal of all school improvement programs and
plans;
(g) Continuously review available research and evaluations of
programs to identify practices and initiatives that are making a
difference in closing the achievement gap;
(h) Explore and recommend exemplary school models that have shown
success in closing the achievement gap, such as innovation academies
focused on science, technology, engineering, and mathematics; and
(i) Submit an annual update and progress report to the education
committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall design and create a phased-in implementation
plan for up to three innovation academies intended to be implemented
beginning in the 2011-12 school year, in areas with high concentrations
of students who statistically lag behind in achievement.
(2) An innovation academy is a school that provides all of the
following programs or activities:
(a) Preparation of students for careers in science, technology,
engineering, and math;
(b) Early outreach to parents to help them provide birth-to-three
stimulation and early learning for infants and toddlers as well as
early learning programs for children that begin at age three, in
coordination with existing birth-to-three programs;
(c) Parent involvement and training to build high expectations and
planning for postsecondary education;
(d) Rigorous curriculum for grades K-12 that includes advanced
placement programs and dual enrollment options to encourage and allow
students to earn college credits while still enrolled in high school;
(e) Instructional strategies that address multiple learning styles
and cultural contexts;
(f) Highly qualified teachers, which means teachers who have a
mastery of content knowledge and pedagogy and who participate in
professional learning communities to improve their practice and
cultural competence;
(g) Technology to assist in learning, data, and analysis as well as
effective school management;
(h) Transition assistance to ensure that all students leave high
school prepared for college-level work without remediation;
(i) Partnerships with local businesses that will provide career
exploration, mentoring, technology, and other support as well as
professional development for teachers; and
(j) Integration of best practices and exemplary programs, including
MESA, AVID, navigation 101, the building bridges dropout prevention and
intervention program, the act six leadership and scholarship program,
and the college success foundation, that are designed to increase
postsecondary opportunities in science and math as well as knowledge of
emerging industries.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a plan
for implementation and funding of the initial innovation academies to
the governor and the legislature by September 1, 2009.

--- END ---