BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds compelling
evidence from five commissioned studies that additional progress must
be made to address the achievement gap. The studies also contain
specific recommendations for action by the legislature, colleges of
education, school leadership, teachers, and communities. These
recommendations are data-driven and drawn from education research, as
well as the personal, professional, and cultural experience of those
who contributed to the studies.
(2) Therefore, following the priority recommendations from the
achievement gap studies, the legislature intends to:
(a) Create an ongoing advisory committee to provide a forum for
continued focus and priority on eliminating the achievement gap;
(b) Include in the basic education goal the responsibility for the
school system to be responsive to the distinct learning needs of
students from all races, cultures, and income levels;
(c) Provide resources to schools with large numbers of
disadvantaged students to support parent and community involvement and
outreach efforts;
(d) Require school improvement plans to include specific strategies
to address the achievement gap;
(e) Require that teachers have opportunities to increase their
multicultural understanding throughout their careers;
(f) Create local alternative routes to teacher certification for
paraeducators and individuals in the communities surrounding schools
and school districts that are struggling to address the achievement
gap;
(g) Initiate a planning process for creating innovative millennium
schools on a pilot basis;
(h) Reexamine the study recommendations regarding data and
accountability and identify ways for the education data accountability
system to address these needs; and
(i) Combine the study findings and recommendations into a best
practices manual to be distributed to school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The achievement gap advisory
committee is established within the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, composed of at least fifteen members each appointed
for two-year terms as follows:
(i) Three members appointed by the commission on African-American
affairs;
(ii) Three members appointed by the commission on Hispanic affairs;
(iii) Three members appointed by the governor's office of Indian
affairs;
(iv) Three members representing Asian Americans appointed by the
commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; and
(v) Three members representing Pacific Islander Americans appointed
by the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction may appoint up to five
additional members, also for two-year terms. The members of the
committee shall select the chair of the committee for a one-year term.
There is no limitation on the number of terms a member may serve if
reappointed.
(c) The committee may create temporary subcommittees to examine
particular topics in greater depth.
(d) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but
must be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide staff support for the committee.
(2) The purpose of the achievement gap advisory committee is to
advise the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, and the state board of education on effective
measures to close the achievement gap, to foster public accountability
for achieving excellence and equity in public education, and to promote
a greater sense of urgency and priority for doing so. The committee
has the following responsibilities:
(a) Establish key indicators and benchmarks to measure progress in
closing the achievement gap, and advise the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the data collection and
analysis necessary to track the indicators;
(b) Identify current programs and resources that have the potential
to narrow the gap and make recommendations for their effective
utilization;
(c) Offer advice on how to improve communication and coordination
among programs aimed at narrowing the achievement gap;
(d) Advise the office of the superintendent of public instruction
and the professional educator standards board on effective professional
development programs and practices that increase cultural competence,
family and community engagement, and instruction for struggling
students;
(e) Advise the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the professional educator standards board, and the state board of
education on effective methods of recruiting and retaining diverse
teachers and school administrators; and
(f) Advise the office of the superintendent of public instruction
and the state board of education on making closing the achievement gap
a central goal of all school improvement programs and plans.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.210 and 2007 c 400 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The goal of the basic education act for the schools of the state of
Washington set forth in this chapter shall be to provide students with
the opportunity to become responsible and respectful global citizens,
to contribute to their economic well-being and that of their families
and communities, to explore and understand different perspectives, and
to enjoy productive and satisfying lives. Additionally, the state of
Washington intends to provide for ((a)) an excellent and equitable
public school system that adequately identifies and is responsive to
the distinct learning needs of students from every race, culture, and
income level, and is able to evolve and adapt in order to better focus
on strengthening the educational achievement of all students((,
which)). This includes high expectations for all students and
((gives)) provides all students the opportunity to achieve personal and
academic success. To these ends, the goals of each school district,
with the involvement of parents and community members, shall be to
provide opportunities for every student to develop the knowledge and
skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate
successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of
audiences;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history, including
different cultures and participation in representative government;
geography; arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
different experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and
solve problems; and
(4) Understand the importance of work and finance and how
performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future career and
educational opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to funds appropriated for this
purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate to
each school district ten dollars per full-time equivalent student
enrolled in a school in the district where more than forty percent of
the students enrolled in the school were eligible for free and reduced
price lunch during the prior school year. Each school district
receiving an allocation under this section shall distribute the funds
directly to the school that generates the funds.
(2) Schools shall use the funds under this section to support
parent and community involvement and outreach efforts, including such
items as additional notices and communication to parents, translations,
translators, parent and community meetings, school events within the
community, and parent and community outreach facilitators. Schools and
school districts are encouraged to consult with the office of the
education ombudsman in developing plans for parent and community
involvement and outreach.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education shall by rule require each school
district to include in the school improvement plans of the district
specific actions that will be taken to close the achievement gap across
various subgroups of students.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2008 c 176 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to
establish policies and requirements for the preparation and
certification of educators that provide standards for competency in
professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a
foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help
students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and
learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW
28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional
development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator
standards board shall:
(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs
of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator
certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational
staff associate certification;
(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the
character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance
to and graduation from any educator preparation program including
teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate
preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education
of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator
certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff
associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other
states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs
and certification, including teacher certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards;
(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator
preparation programs;
(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at
least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings
and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and school specialized personnel;
(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be
issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 28A.410.010;
(7) Hear and determine educator certification appeals as provided
by RCW 28A.410.100;
(8) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the
state for purposes related to the duties of the board;
(9) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the
effective and efficient implementation of this chapter;
(10) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs and
their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends and
needs, and other data deemed relevant by the board;
(11) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public
instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator
evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation
and suspension of licensure;
(12) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year, a joint
report with the state board of education to the legislative education
committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction.
The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the
obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the
work of achieving the goals set out in RCW 28A.150.210;
(13) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for basic
skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain residency
certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240;
(14) By January 2010, set performance standards and develop, pilot,
and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level
certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the
development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes
in professional certification program components such as the
culminating seminar; ((and))
(15) In consultation with the advisory committee under section 2 of
this act, establish competencies for all levels of educator
certification that address knowledge, skills, and performance in
multicultural understanding. For the purposes of this section and
section 7 of this act, "multicultural understanding" includes knowledge
of student cultural histories and contexts, as well as family norms and
values in different cultures; knowledge and skills in accessing
community resources and community and parent outreach; and skills in
adapting instruction to students' experiences and identifying cultural
contexts for individual students;
(16) Establish a minimum number of continuing education credits or
clock hours for purposes of continuing educator certification,
including for teachers, school administrators, and educational staff
associates, that must be designed to increase the multicultural
understanding of the educator; and
(17) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.415.023 and 2005 c 497 s 209 and 2005 c 393 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Credits earned by certificated instructional staff after
September 1, 1995, shall be eligible for application to the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee only if the course content:
(a) Is consistent with a school-based plan for mastery of student
learning goals as referenced in RCW 28A.655.110, the annual school
performance report, for the school in which the individual is assigned;
(b) Pertains to the individual's current assignment or expected
assignment for the subsequent school year;
(c) Is necessary to obtain an endorsement as prescribed by the
Washington professional educator standards board;
(d) Is specifically required to obtain advanced levels of
certification;
(e) Is included in a college or university degree program that
pertains to the individual's current assignment, or potential future
assignment, as a certified instructional staff; ((or))
(f) Addresses research-based assessment and instructional
strategies for students with dyslexia, dysgraphia, and language
disabilities when addressing learning goal one under RCW 28A.150.210,
as applicable and appropriate for individual certificated instructional
staff; or
(g) Is designed to increase the multicultural understanding of the
certificated instructional staff.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "credits" mean college quarter
hour credits and equivalent credits for approved in-service, approved
continuing education, or approved internship hours computed in
accordance with RCW 28A.415.020.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules and
standards consistent with the limits established by this section for
certificated instructional staff.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.660.010 and 2004 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a statewide partnership grant program
to provide new high-quality alternative routes to residency teacher
certification. To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific
purpose, funds provided under this partnership grant program shall be
used solely for school districts, or consortia of school districts, to
partner with state-approved higher education teacher preparation
programs to provide one or more of four alternative route programs in
RCW 28A.660.040, with routes one, two, and three aimed at recruiting
candidates to teaching in subject matter shortage areas and areas with
shortages due to geographic location. Districts, or consortia of
districts, may also include their educational service districts in
their partnership grant program.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall provide
assistance to school districts where data indicates significant
achievement gaps among subgroups of students and for large numbers of
those students. The purpose of the assistance is to develop
partnership grant programs between the districts and teacher
preparation programs to provide one or more of the four alternative
route programs under RCW 28A.660.040 and recruit paraeducators and
other individuals in the local community to become certified as
teachers. To the maximum extent possible, the board shall coordinate
the recruiting Washington teachers program under RCW 28A.415.370 with
the alternative route programs under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1)(a) The legislature finds that there is
a critical and urgent need for a new model of innovation in public
education that confronts and solves the staggering problem of
persistent inequity in educational outcomes for students from different
demographic groups.
(b) This model, to be called millennium schools, will provide a new
kind of educational opportunity for students in demographic groups that
are currently over represented in measures such as school disciplinary
sanctions, failure to meet state academic standards, failure to
graduate, enrolled in special education, enrolled in underperforming
schools, and who are underrepresented in advanced placement courses,
honors programs, and college preparatory classes, college enrollment
and completion.
(c) Millennium schools will be located in communities, with
particular emphasis on urban areas, where there are the largest
concentrations of students who face the economic and cultural barriers
that place them in these underachieving demographic groups.
(d) The new model will offer intensive, rigorous, and supportive
learning that is extremely culturally competent and that prepares these
students for careers in science, technology, engineering, and math. It
will integrate the full array of evidence-based practices that have
been shown to reduce demographic disparities in achievement, increase
graduation rates, participation in advanced placement, and college
enrollment and completion.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall award a one-time
planning grant to design and create a phased-in implementation plan for
up to three millennium schools. The schools must be implemented on a
pilot basis beginning in the 2011-12 school year in areas with high
concentrations of students who statistically lag in achievement.
(3) A "millennium school" is a school that provides all of the
following programs or activities:
(a) Preparation of students for careers in science, technology,
engineering, and math;
(b) Integration of best practices;
(c) Early outreach to parents to help them provide birth-to-three
stimulation and early learning for infants and toddlers as well as
early learning programs for children that begin at age three;
(d) Parent involvement to build high expectations and planning for
postsecondary education;
(e) Rigorous curriculum for grades kindergarten through twelve to
include advanced placement programs and dual enrollment options to
encourage and allow students to earn college credits while still
enrolled in high school;
(f) Instructional strategies that address multiple learning styles
and cultural contexts;
(g) Highly qualified teachers;
(h) Technology to assist in learning, data tracking, and analysis
as well as school management;
(i) Transition assistance to ensure that all students leave high
school prepared for college-level work without remediation;
(j) Partnerships with local businesses that will provide career
exploration, mentoring, technology, and other support as well as
professional development for teachers; and
(k) After school enrichment programs, to include programs such as
mathematics engineering science achievement, to increase skills in
science and mathematics as well as knowledge of emerging industries.
(4) The recipients of the grant under this section shall report to
the governor, the legislature, and the office of superintendent of
public instruction on their progress and plans for implementation of
millennium schools by September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(1) Examine the findings and recommendations of the 2008
achievement gap studies regarding student data and identify ways to
incorporate the recommendations into the comprehensive data and
research system and other data collection initiatives; and
(2) Combine the findings and recommendations from each of the
studies into a best practices manual to be distributed to school
districts and made available on the office web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2, 4, and 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.300 RCW.

--- END ---