BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
critical and urgent need for a new model of innovation in public
education that confronts and solves the staggering problem of
persistent inequity in educational outcomes for students from different
demographic groups.
(2) This model, to be called millennium schools, will provide a new
kind of educational opportunity for students in demographic groups that
are currently overrepresented in measures such as school disciplinary
sanctions, failure to meet state academic standards, failure to
graduate, enrolled in special education, enrolled in underperforming
schools, and who are underrepresented in advanced placement courses,
honors programs, college preparatory classes, and college enrollment
and completion.
(3) Millennium schools will be located in communities, with
particular emphasis on urban areas, where there are the largest
concentrations of students who face the economic and cultural barriers
that place them in these underachieving demographic groups.
(4) The new model will offer intensive, rigorous, and supportive
learning that is extremely culturally competent and that prepares these
students for careers in science, technology, engineering, and math. It
will integrate the full array of evidence-based practices that have
been shown to reduce demographic disparities in achievement, and to
increase graduation rates, participation in advanced placement, and
college enrollment and completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall award a one-time
planning grant to design and create a phased-in implementation plan for
up to three millennium schools. The schools shall be implemented on a
pilot basis beginning in the 2011-12 school year, in areas with high
concentrations of students who statistically lag behind in achievement.
(2) A millennium school is a school that provides all of the
following programs or activities:
(a) Preparation of students for careers in science, technology,
engineering, and math;
(b) Integration of best practices;
(c) Early outreach to parents to help them provide birth-to-three
stimulation and early learning for infants and toddlers as well as
early learning programs for children that begin at age three;
(d) Parent involvement to build high expectations and planning for
postsecondary education;
(e) Rigorous curriculum for grades K-12 that includes advanced
placement programs and dual enrollment options to encourage and allow
students to earn college credits while still enrolled in high school;
(f) Instructional strategies that address multiple learning styles
and cultural contexts;
(g) Highly qualified teachers;
(h) Technology to assist in learning, data tracking, and analysis
as well as school management;
(i) Transition assistance to ensure that all students leave high
school prepared for college-level work without remediation;
(j) Partnerships with local businesses that will provide career
exploration, mentoring, technology, and other support as well as
professional development for teachers; and
(k) After school enrichment programs, including programs such as
MESA, to increase science and math skills as well as knowledge of
emerging industries.
(3) The recipient of the grant under this section shall report to
the governor, the legislature, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction by September 1, 2010, on its progress and plans for
implementation of millennium schools.

--- END ---