BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) There are hazardous waste facilities in this state located on
sites listed on the United States environmental protection agency's
national priority list, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605, due to
releases of hazardous substances, or on the same contiguous property
containing these sites. Some hazardous waste management units at these
facilities are in significant noncompliance with the requirements of
this act and pose special dangers to human health and the environment.
Cleanup of these hazardous substances will require a substantial
commitment of time, money, and effort. Sites and facilities with
releases of hazardous substances on the United States environmental
protection agency's national priority list are the most serious of
hazardous substance release sites in the state.
(2) Disposing of additional hazardous waste to hazardous waste
management units located at facilities within these sites or on the
same contiguous property containing such sites, where releases have yet
to be cleaned up and while hazardous waste management units located at
the facility remain in significant noncompliance with this act, is
likely to: Slow the cleanup; use capacity for disposal that may be
needed for cleanup and disposal of wastes from the site or property;
add to the cumulative impacts from the site; increase the amount of
cleanup required; or adversely affect the efforts to bring the facility
into compliance with the requirements of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the policy of the state to ensure cleanup and compliance at
facilities with large releases of hazardous substances, and where a
hazardous waste management unit or units located on the same property
or site are in significant noncompliance with this act, before
permitting the disposal of more hazardous waste that is not generated
from the cleanup of the same site, facility, or property.
It is the further policy of the state to ensure prompt cleanup of
releases of hazardous waste and hazardous waste constituents, ensure
timely development of treatment and disposal capacity for hazardous
wastes currently stored in tank systems and awaiting disposal, and
ensure compliance by hazardous waste facilities with all requirements
of this act and the implementing rules of the Washington Administrative
Code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The restriction on the disposal of hazardous waste in this
section is limited to hazardous waste that Washington state has
received authorization to regulate from the United States under the
state's approved hazardous waste management program under 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 6926, as amended, or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6939c, as amended.
(2) The department may not permit disposal of hazardous waste at a
facility located on a site named by the United States environmental
protection agency as a national priority list site pursuant to the
federal comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and
liability act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605, or that is on the same contiguous
property as such a site, where:
(a) A hazardous waste management unit at such a facility is in
significant noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter; and
(b) The hazardous waste is not generated from cleanup, corrective,
or remedial action under this chapter, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605, or chapter
70.105D RCW at the facility or other facilities or sites located on the
same contiguous property or that was released from these facilities or
sites.
(3) The department may adopt rules to define what constitutes
significant noncompliance for purposes of this section or to otherwise
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This act does not in any way affect or modify the
enforceability of any order issued by the department or compliance
schedules (otherwise known as milestones) under the Hanford federal
facility agreement and consent order, also known as the tri-party
agreement, in effect on the effective date of this section.
(2) Rules adopted by the department to implement this chapter that
provide for exemptions or exclusions from hazardous or dangerous waste
permitting including, but not limited to, exemptions for small
quantities of dangerous wastes, materials used in manufacturing, lab
samples, and special wastes remain fully applicable and available to
any qualifying permit applicant under this act.
(3) Section 3 of this act does not apply to currently permitted
disposal of hazardous waste contained in sealed structures such as
naval reactor vessels, which the department has determined under the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, will not pose a
significant risk of release to the environment over extended time
periods, as long as the receiving hazardous waste management unit
remains in significant compliance with the requirements of this chapter
and relevant permits.
(4) The department may grant an annual waiver from the provisions
of section 3 of this act for disposal of de minimis quantities of
hazardous waste. The waiver applies only if the department determines
that the:
(a) Specific hazardous waste or hazardous waste constituent
proposed to be disposed of is within the scope of wastes fully
considered in permitting and in any impact statement or threshold
determination issued or adopted under the state environmental policy
act, chapter 43.21C RCW, for the facility or unit;
(b) Unit that will receive the waste is in compliance with the
conditions of any applicable permit, compliance order, or agreement and
the requirements of this chapter; and
(c) Disposal will not adversely affect the availability of disposal
capacity for cleanup or remediation of releases, compliance, and
corrective action at the site or have any other adverse effect upon
remediation and corrective action. The department shall adopt rules
determining: (i) What is a de minimis quantity of wastes for purposes
of this subsection, with a presumption that such a quantity does not
exceed an annual volume to be determined by the department; and (ii)
the criteria and procedures, including public notice and comment, for
obtaining an annual waiver of the prohibition in section 3 of this act.
Criteria for annual waivers may include, but are not limited to:
Whether disposal of the waste stream benefits research on environmental
cleanup or treatment of hazardous wastes or national security; impacts
to health and groundwater from future projected releases; whether any
other facilities are available for disposal; and potential for
significant impacts at any point in the cycle of treatment, storage, or
disposal.
(5) This act is intended to operate within the existing regulatory
scope of this chapter and, consistent with RCW 70.105.109, to regulate
hazardous wastes to the extent not preempted by federal law.
(6) This act does not limit the department's authority to develop
and implement facility-specific permit terms and conditions as
necessary to protect human health and the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---