BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board may develop criteria and provide oversight
and policy guidance for an entrepreneurial program known as
"Washington's economic gardening." The purpose of the program is to
facilitate and coordinate a network of public and private resources to
provide assistance, training, and mentoring to small and medium-sized
businesses in Washington. The program may be newly developed or be
part of an existing program.
(2) A community college board of trustees may choose to host and/or
participate in a Washington's economic gardening program. Each such
community college program shall be governed by a board of directors,
with membership as follows:
(a) Representatives of small and medium-sized businesses, including
their business associations, networks, or consortia, which
representatives must comprise a majority of the board of directors;
(b) At least one member representing the community college board of
trustees;
(c) At least one member representing labor unions or labor
councils;
(d) A representative of the state board for community and technical
colleges; and
(e) A representative of the workforce training and education
coordinating board.
(3) In furtherance of a community college's Washington's economic
gardening program:
(a) The community college board of trustees shall:
(i) Serve as the convening organization to organize the program and
provide for selection of a board of directors; and
(ii) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated, or made
available under (b) of this subsection, for this specific purpose,
provide administrative support for the program;
(b) With approval from the college board and the community college
board of trustees, the board of directors may set fees to be charged
for program services, make and execute contracts with any individual,
corporation, association, public agency, or any other entity, and
employ all other legal instruments necessary or convenient for the
performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and functions
under the program; and
(c) The college board may accept, use, and expend or dispose of
fees and contributions of money, services, or property from federal,
state, or local governments, private businesses, foundations, or other
sources for purposes consistent with this section. All such moneys
received by the college board for the program must be deposited in an
account at a depository approved by the state treasurer. Only the
college board or a duly authorized representative thereof may authorize
expenditures for this account. The account is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditure of moneys in the account.
(4) A Washington's economic gardening program may:
(a) Develop policies, plans, and programs for any or all of the
following:
(i) Assisting small and medium-sized Washington businesses to find
appropriate resources for improving business management, product
development, marketing and sales, strategic planning, and business
financing;
(ii) Developing training programs and career pathways that target
innovative industries or technology fields; and
(iii) Developing entrepreneurial training, for new and expanding
small and medium-sized businesses, that may include but is not limited
to classroom instruction, counseling and mentoring, and marketing
laboratories on-site through the community college or off-site through
community partnerships;
(b) Collaborate with state and local governments, institutions of
higher education, business organizations, economic development
organizations, and organizations such as the Washington manufacturing
services to integrate entrepreneurial resources for small and medium-sized businesses; and
(c) Serve as an information clearinghouse for small and medium-sized businesses regarding opportunities available under the
Washington's economic gardening program and other similar programs.
(5) The college board must submit a progress report on the
Washington's economic gardening program to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

--- END ---