BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that substantial
progress has been made toward achieving the equally important goals set
in 2007 that all children in Washington state have health care coverage
by 2010 and that child health outcomes improve. The legislature also
finds that continued steps are necessary to reach the goals that all
children in Washington state shall have access to the health services
they need to be healthy and ready to learn and that key measures of
child health outcomes will show year by year improvement. The
legislature further finds that reaching these goals is integral to the
state's ability to weather the current economic crisis. The recent
reauthorization of the federal children's health insurance program
provides additional opportunities for the state to reach these goals.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.470 and 2007 c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through
the apple health for kids program authorized in this section, the
department shall provide affordable health care coverage to children
under the age of nineteen who reside in Washington state and whose
family income at the time of enrollment is not greater than ((two
hundred fifty)) three hundred percent of the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services((, and effective January 1,
2009, and only to the extent that funds are specifically appropriated
therefor, to children whose family income is not greater than three
hundred percent of the federal poverty level)). In administering the
program, the department shall take such actions as may be necessary to
ensure the receipt of federal financial participation under the medical
assistance program, as codified at Title XIX of the federal social
security act, the state children's health insurance program, as
codified at Title XXI of the federal social security act, and any other
federal funding sources that are now available or may become available
in the future. The department and the caseload forecast council shall
estimate the anticipated caseload and costs of the program established
in this section.
(2) The department shall accept applications for enrollment for
children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility
based on current family income. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. The
application and annual renewal processes shall be designed to minimize
administrative barriers for applicants and enrolled clients, and to
minimize gaps in eligibility for families who are eligible for
coverage. The department shall take the opportunity provided in the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act to
implement express lane eligibility for children's health coverage not
later than July 1, 2010. If a change in family income results in a
change in program eligibility, the department shall transfer the family
members to the appropriate programs and notify the family with respect
to any change in premium obligation, without a break in eligibility.
The department shall use the same eligibility redetermination and
appeals procedures as those provided for children on medical assistance
programs. The department shall manage its outreach, application, and
renewal procedures with the goal of achieving year by year improvements
in enrollment, enrollment rates, renewals, and renewal rates. The
department shall modify its eligibility renewal procedures to lower the
percentage of children failing to annually renew. ((The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on its
progress in this regard by December 2007.)) The department shall use an
eligibility card for the program established under this section that
clearly identifies the bearer, by text and by logo, as a participant in
the apple health for kids program.
(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for
families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of
the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to children under this section shall be the same as that
provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW
74.09.520.
(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under
this section shall be through contracts with managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522 ((except when utilization patterns
suggest that fee-for-service purchasing could produce equally effective
and cost-efficient care)). However, the department shall make every
effort within available resources to purchase health care coverage for
uninsured children whose families have access to dependent coverage
through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source when it is
cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent
with requirements of Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social
security act. ((To the extent allowable under federal law,)) The
department shall require families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a condition of participating in the program
established under ((chapter 5, Laws of 2007)) this section, when it is
cost-effective for the state to do so. Families who enroll in
available employer-sponsored coverage under ((chapter 5, Laws of 2007))
this section shall be accounted for separately in the annual report
required by RCW 74.09.053.
(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the
department shall develop and implement a schedule of premiums for
children's health care coverage due to the department from families
with income greater than two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. For families with income greater than two hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level, the premiums shall be established in
consultation with the senate majority and minority leaders and the
speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. Premiums
shall be set at a reasonable level that does not pose a barrier to
enrollment. The amount of the premium shall be based upon family
income and shall not exceed the premium limitations in Title XXI of the
federal social security act. Premiums shall not be imposed on children
in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as articulated in RCW 74.09.055.
(b) Beginning January 1, ((2009)) 2010, the department shall offer
families whose income is greater than three hundred percent of the
federal poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care coverage
for their children through the programs administered under this section
without ((a)) an explicit premium subsidy from the state. The design
of the health benefit package offered to these children may differ with
respect to cost-sharing and other appropriate elements from that
provided to children under subsection (3) of this section. The amount
paid by the family shall be in an amount equal to the rate paid by the
state to the managed health care system for coverage of the child,
including any associated and administrative costs to the state of
providing coverage for the child.
(6) The department shall undertake and continue a proactive,
targeted outreach and education effort with the goal of enrolling
children in health coverage and improving the health literacy of youth
and parents. The department shall collaborate with the department of
health, local public health jurisdictions, the office of (([the])) the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
health educators, health care providers, health carriers, and parents
in the design and development of this effort. The outreach and
education effort shall include the following components:
(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of
coverage, including media campaigns;
(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based
outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based
outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to
be covered;
(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from
the free and reduced-price lunch program, the department of early
learning child care subsidy program, the department of health's women,
infants, and children program, and the early childhood education and
assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but not
enrolled in coverage;
(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government
entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families
apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the
populations least likely to be covered. The department shall provide
informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify
any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;
(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform
parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of
health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services,
including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed
under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency
services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and
immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to
department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing
chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good
nutrition and physical activity;
(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon
clear, cost-effective outcome measures that are included in contracts
with entities that undertake components of the outreach and education
effort;
(g) A feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system, and to develop data linkages with
the office of (([the])) the superintendent of public instruction for
free and reduced-price lunch enrollment information and the department
of early learning for child care subsidy program enrollment
information. The department shall submit a feasibility study on the
implementation of the requirements in this subsection to the governor
and legislature by July 2008.
(7) The department shall take action to increase the number of
primary care physicians providing dental disease preventive services
including oral health screenings, risk assessment, family education,
the application of fluoride varnish, and referral to a dentist as
needed.
(8) The department shall monitor the rates of substitution between
private-sector health care coverage and the coverage provided under
this section and shall report to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2010.
(9) The secretary shall designate an apple health for kids program
director as the person with primary responsibility to work within the
department, across state agencies, and with the community to
successfully implement the apple health for kids program. This
position shall report directly to the secretary.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.480 and 2007 c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with the department of health,
health carriers, local public health jurisdictions, children's health
care providers including pediatricians, family practitioners, and
pediatric subspecialists, parents, and other purchasers, shall
((identify explicit performance measures that indicate that a child has
an established and effective medical home, such as)) establish a
concise set of explicit performance measures that can indicate whether
children enrolled in the program are receiving health care through an
established and effective medical home, and whether the overall health
of enrolled children is improving. Such indicators may include, but
are not limited to:
(a) Childhood immunization rates;
(b) Well child care utilization rates, including the use of
validated, structured developmental assessment tools that include
behavioral and oral health screening;
(c) Care management for children with chronic illnesses;
(d) Emergency room utilization; ((and))
(e) Preventive oral health service utilization; and
(f) Children's mental health status. In defining these measures
the department shall be guided by the measures provided in RCW
71.36.025.
Performance measures and targets for each performance measure must
be ((reported to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2007)) established and monitored each
biennium, with a goal of achieving measurable, improved health outcomes
for the children of Washington state each biennium.
(2) Beginning in calendar year 2009, targeted provider rate
increases shall be linked to quality improvement measures established
under this section. The department, in conjunction with those groups
identified in subsection (1) of this section, shall develop parameters
for determining criteria for increased payment, alternative payment
methodologies, or other incentives for those practices and health plans
that incorporate evidence-based practice and improve and achieve
sustained improvement with respect to the measures ((in both fee for
service and managed care)).
(3) The department shall provide an annual report to the governor
and the legislature related to provider performance on these measures,
beginning in September 2010 for 2007 through 2009 and ((annually))
biennially thereafter. The department shall provide a report on its
program towards developing this biennial reporting system to the
legislature and the governor by September 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the apple
health for kids act.

--- END ---