BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington has made significant investments in watershed-based
activities, including the establishment of water resource inventory
area (WRIA) planning units and lead agencies, lead entities, and
regional salmon recovery organizations across the state. Washington
watersheds have developed subbasin plans under the Northwest power and
conservation council and national oceanic and atmospheric
administration-approved regional salmon recovery plans that include
locally prioritized salmon recovery projects;
(2) The governor's salmon recovery office was established to
support the development and implementation of regional salmon recovery
plans, to assist local governments in obtaining federal assurances, and
to issue a biennial state of salmon report;
(3) The salmon recovery funding board provides grants for salmon
recovery and the forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health works to provide greater coordination on monitoring.
Administrative support for the board and the forum are provided by the
recreation and conservation office;
(4) Lead entity funding to support infrastructure and capacity
needs is provided through the recreation and conservation office, which
contracts with the department of fish and wildlife to implement the
program. Funding for WRIA planning units and lead agencies to develop
and implement watershed-based plans under RCW 90.82.040 is provided by
the department of ecology; and
(5) Currently, state watershed and salmon recovery-based programs
are split among several state agencies or offices. Efficient
implementation of these efforts will be enhanced by promoting
consolidation and integration of their activities and programs. In
addition, consolidation of reporting benefits the public and decision
makers regarding watershed health, which includes salmon recovery. It
is also the intent of the legislature, in cooperation with local and
regional officials, and respecting the ability of local citizens and
officials to organize in ways best suited to address local needs, to
encourage the development of incentives that consolidate existing
processes and promote more effective implementation of salmon recovery
plans and watershed planning and implementation.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.030 and 2007 c 444 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((governor's salmon recovery)) office ((is created within
the office of the governor to)) shall coordinate state strategy to
allow for salmon recovery to healthy sustainable population levels with
productive commercial and recreational fisheries. ((The)) A primary
purpose of the office is to coordinate and assist in the development,
implementation, and revision of regional salmon recovery plans as an
integral part of a statewide strategy developed consistent with the
guiding principles and procedures under RCW 77.85.150.
(2) The ((governor's salmon recovery)) office is also responsible
for maintaining the statewide salmon recovery strategy to reflect
applicable provisions of regional recovery plans, habitat protection
and restoration plans, water quality plans, and other private, local,
regional, state agency and federal plans, projects, and activities that
contribute to salmon recovery.
(3) The ((governor's salmon recovery office shall also gather
regional recovery plans from regional recovery organizations and submit
the plans to the federal fish services for adoption as federal recovery
plans. The governor's salmon recovery)) office shall also work with
regional salmon recovery organizations on salmon recovery issues in
order to ensure a coordinated and consistent statewide approach to
salmon recovery((. The governor's salmon recovery office)) and shall
work with federal agencies to accomplish implementation of federal
commitments in the recovery plans.
(4) The ((governor's salmon recovery)) office may also:
(a) Assist state agencies, local governments, landowners, and other
interested parties in obtaining federal assurances that plans,
programs, or activities are consistent with fish recovery under the
federal endangered species act;
(b) Act as liaison to local governments, the state congressional
delegation, the United States congress, federally recognized tribes,
and the federal executive branch agencies for issues related to the
state's salmon recovery plans;
(c) Provide periodic reports pursuant to RCW 77.85.020 (as
recodified by this act);
(d) Provide, as appropriate, technical and administrative support
to ((the independent)) science panels ((or other science-related
panels)) on issues pertaining to salmon recovery;
(e) In cooperation with the regional recovery organizations,
prepare a timeline and implementation plan that, together with a
schedule and recommended budget, identifies specific actions in
regional recovery plans for state agency actions and assistance
necessary to implement local and regional recovery plans; and
(f) As necessary, provide recommendations to the legislature that
would further the success of salmon recovery, including recommendations
for state agency actions in the succeeding biennium and state financial
and technical assistance for projects and activities to be undertaken
in local and regional salmon recovery plans. The recommendations may
include:
(i) The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs and
activities; and
(ii) The need for state funding assistance to recovery activities
and projects.
(5) ((This section expires June 30, 2015.)) The office shall
administer all grant programs that support the functions of lead
entities under RCW 77.85.050, in addition to the administration of
funding for support of regional salmon recovery organizations under RCW
77.85.110.
(6) By December 1, 2009, the office, in consultation with the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, regional
fisheries enhancement groups, lead entities, planning units and lead
agencies, and regional salmon recovery organizations shall provide an
assessment to the governor on additional coordination and incentive
opportunities with lead entities, regional salmon recovery
organizations, lead agencies, and WRIA planning units, and shall
include any additional coordination and incentive opportunities for
those organizations that exist and operate within a shared watershed
boundary or portions of a shared watershed boundary.
(7) By December 1, 2009, the office and the office of regulatory
assistance, working in coordination with the departments of ecology and
fish and wildlife, must identify and recommend one pilot project
outside of Puget Sound that will effectively integrate salmon recovery
and watershed planning missions and objectives. The pilot project's
purpose is to demonstrate ways to achieve efficient permitting
processes to implement projects identified in local or regional salmon
recovery or WRIA-based watershed plans.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.020 and 2007 c 444 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(( No later than January 31, 2009, and every odd-numbered year
until and including 2015, the governor's salmon recovery office shall
submit a biennial state of the salmon report to the legislature and the
governor regarding the implementation of the state's salmon recovery
strategy. The report must include the following:
(a) A summary of habitat projects including but not limited to:
(i) A summary of accomplishments in removing barriers to salmon
passage and an identification of existing barriers;
(ii) A summary of salmon restoration efforts undertaken in the past
two years;
(iii) A summary of the role which private volunteer initiatives
contribute in salmon habitat restoration efforts; and
(iv) A summary of efforts taken to protect salmon habitat;
(b) A summary of harvest and hatchery management activities
affecting salmon recovery;
(c) A summary of the number and types of violations of existing
laws pertaining to salmon. The summary may include information about
the types of sanctions imposed for these violations.
(2) The report may include the following:
(a) A description of the amount of in-kind financial contributions,
including volunteer, private, state, federal, tribal, as available, and
local government funds directly spent on salmon recovery in response to
endangered species act listings; and
(b) Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new habitat
created pursuant to chapter 246, Laws of 1998.
(3) The report shall summarize the monitoring data coordinated by
the forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health. The
summary may include but is not limited to data and analysis related to:
(a) Measures of progress in fish recovery;
(b) Measures of factors limiting recovery as well as trends in such
factors; and
(c) The status of implementation of projects and activities.
(4))) Beginning December 2010, the office shall produce a biennial
report on the statewide status of salmon recovery and watershed health,
summarize projects and programs funded by the salmon recovery funding
board, and summarize progress as measured by high-level indicators and
state agency compliance with applicable protocols established by the
forum for monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health. The report
must be a consolidation of the current reporting activities, including
the salmon recovery funding board and the forum on monitoring salmon
recovery and watershed health, on the status of salmon recovery and
watershed health in Washington state, in accordance with RCW
77.85.250(8) (as recodified by this act). The report shall also
include a high-level status report on watershed planning efforts under
chapter 90.82 RCW as summarized by the department of ecology and on
salmon recovery and watershed planning as summarized by the Puget Sound
partnership. The report's introduction must include a list of high-level questions related to the status of watershed health and salmon
recovery to help decision makers and the public respond to salmon
recovery and watershed health management needs.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife, the department of ecology,
the department of natural resources, the state conservation commission,
and the forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health shall
provide to the ((governor's salmon recovery)) office information
requested by the office necessary to prepare the ((state of the salmon
report and other reports produced by the office)) consolidated report
on salmon recovery and watershed health.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.85.250 and 2007 c 444 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that pursuant to chapter 298, Laws of
2001, and acting upon recommendations of the state's independent
science panel, the monitoring oversight committee developed
recommendations for a comprehensive statewide strategy for monitoring
watershed health, with a focus upon salmon recovery, entitled The
Washington Comprehensive Monitoring Strategy and Action Plan for
Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery. The legislature further finds
that funding to begin implementing the strategy and action plan was
provided in the 2003-2005 biennial budget, and that executive order 04-03 was issued to coordinate state agency implementation activities. It
is therefore the purpose of this section to adopt the strategy and
action plan and to provide guidance to ensure that the coordination
activities directed by executive order 04-03 are effectively carried
out.
(2))) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
is created to implement the Washington Comprehensive Monitoring
Strategy and Action Plan for Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery. The
governor shall appoint a person with experience and expertise in
natural resources and environmental quality monitoring to chair the
forum. The chair shall serve four-year terms and may serve successive
terms. The forum shall include representatives of the following state
agencies and regional entities that have responsibilities related to
monitoring of salmon recovery and watershed health:
(a) Department of ecology;
(b) Salmon recovery funding board;
(c) ((Salmon recovery office;
(d))) Department of fish and wildlife;
(((e))) (d) Department of natural resources;
(((f))) (e) Puget Sound ((action team, or a successor state
agency)) partnership;
(((g))) (f) Conservation commission;
(((h))) (g) Department of agriculture;
(((i))) (h) Department of transportation; and
(((j))) (i) Each of the regional salmon recovery organizations.
(((3))) (2) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall provide a multiagency venue for coordinating technical and
policy issues and actions related to monitoring salmon recovery and
watershed health.
(((4))) (3) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall recommend a set of ((measures)) high-level indicators for
use by the ((governor's salmon recovery)) office in the state of the
salmon report to convey results and progress on salmon recovery and
watershed health in ways that are easily understood by the general
public.
(((5))) (4) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall invite the participation of federal, tribal, regional, and
local agencies and entities that carry out salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring, and work toward coordination and
standardization of measures used.
(((6))) (5) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall periodically report to the governor and the appropriate
standing committees of the senate and house of representatives on the
forum's activities and recommendations for improving monitoring
programs by state agencies((, coordinating with the governor's salmon
recovery office biennial report as required by RCW 77.85.020)).
(((7))) (6) The forum shall review pilot monitoring programs
including those that integrate (a) data collection, management, and
access; and (b) information regarding habitat projects and project
management.
(((8))) (7) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall review and make recommendations to the office of financial
management and the appropriate legislative committees on agency budget
requests related to monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health.
These recommendations must be made no later than September 15th of each
year. The goal of this review is to prioritize and integrate budget
requests across agencies.
(((9))) (8)(a) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and
watershed health shall adopt general high-level indicators for salmon
recovery and watershed health in Washington by December 1, 2009. By
July 1, 2010, the forum shall also adopt the protocols for monitoring
these high-level indicators that will enable state conducted or state-funded monitoring efforts to be capable of reporting results that will
ensure reporting consistency and agency compliance under the
consolidated reporting requirement of this section. The forum on
monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health shall indicate how the
general high-level indicators are consistent with, and complement, the
more detailed regional and local metrics used to measure watershed
health and salmon recovery.
(b) High-level indicators shall inform a nontechnical summary of
key metrics that indicate the state of salmon recovery and provide an
index of watershed health in Washington.
(9) This section expires June 30, ((2015)) 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) By December 1, 2009, the department of
ecology must provide recommendations to the legislature on grant
programs related to restoration and protection of water quality and for
increases, augmentation, or conservation of water quantity supplies
that may be more effectively and efficiently funded through the salmon
recovery funding board. The recommendations should include ways to
integrate salmon recovery data into reporting of watershed health.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2009.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.85.140 and 2007 c 241 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Habitat project lists shall be submitted to the salmon recovery
funding board for funding at least once a year on a schedule
established by the board. The board shall provide the legislature with
a list of the proposed projects and a list of the projects funded by
October 1st of each year for informational purposes. Project sponsors
who complete salmon habitat projects approved for funding from habitat
project lists and have met grant application deadlines will be paid by
the salmon recovery funding board within thirty days of project
completion.
(2) The recreation and conservation office shall track all funds
allocated for salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities on
behalf of the board, including both funds allocated by the board and
funds allocated by other state or federal agencies for salmon recovery
or water quality improvement.
(((3) Beginning in December 2000, the board shall provide a
biennial report to the governor and the legislature on salmon recovery
expenditures. This report shall be coordinated with the state of the
salmon report required under RCW 77.85.020.))

Sec. 7 RCW 77.85.005 and 2005 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that repeated attempts to improve salmonid
fish runs throughout the state of Washington have failed to avert
listings of salmon and steelhead runs as threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).
These listings threaten the sport, commercial, and tribal fishing
industries as well as the economic well-being and vitality of vast
areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature to begin
activities required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as
possible, although the legislature understands that successful recovery
efforts may not be realized for many years because of the life cycle of
salmon and the complex array of natural and human-caused problems they
face.
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the citizens of
the state of Washington for the state to retain primary responsibility
for managing the natural resources of the state, rather than abdicate
those responsibilities to the federal government, and that the state
may best accomplish this objective by integrating local and regional
recovery activities into a statewide strategy that can make the most
effective use of provisions of federal laws allowing for a state lead
in salmon recovery, delivered through implementation activities
consistent with regional and watershed recovery plans. The legislature
also finds that a statewide salmon recovery strategy must be developed
and implemented through an active public involvement process in order
to ensure public participation in, and support for, salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that there is a substantial link between the
provisions of the federal endangered species act and the federal clean
water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.). The legislature further finds
that habitat restoration is a vital component of salmon recovery
efforts. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
specifically address salmon habitat restoration in a coordinated manner
and to develop a structure that allows for the coordinated delivery of
federal, state, and local assistance to communities for habitat
projects that will assist in the recovery and enhancement of salmon
stocks. A strong watershed-based locally implemented plan is essential
for local, regional, and statewide salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that credible scientific review and
oversight is essential for any salmon recovery effort to be successful.
The legislature further finds that it is important to monitor the
overall health of the salmon resource to determine if recovery efforts
are providing expected returns. It is important to monitor salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities to determine their
effectiveness in order to secure federal acceptance of the state's
approach to salmon recovery. Adaptive management cannot exist without
monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes that a
coordinated and integrated monitoring system should be developed and
implemented.
The legislature therefore finds that a coordinated framework for
responding to the salmon crisis is needed immediately. To that end,
((the salmon recovery office should be created within the governor's
office to provide overall coordination of the state's response;)) an
independent science panel is needed to provide scientific review and
oversight; a coordinated state funding process should be established
through a salmon recovery funding board; the appropriate local or
tribal government should provide local leadership in identifying and
sequencing habitat projects to be funded by state agencies; habitat
projects should be implemented without delay; and a strong locally
based effort to restore salmon habitat should be established by
providing a framework to allow citizen volunteers to work effectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this act is intended to amend
chapter 90.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 77.85.020, 77.85.030, and 77.85.250 are
each recodified as sections in chapter 79A.25 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 77.85.100 (Work group -- Evaluation of
mitigation alternatives) and 2000 c 107 s 100 & 1998 c 246 s 16 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---