BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.790 and 1993 c 407 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 74.09.760 through 74.09.820 and
74.09.510:
(1) "At-risk eligible person" means an eligible person determined
by the department to need special assistance in applying for and
obtaining maternity care, including pregnant women who are substance
abusers, pregnant and parenting adolescents, pregnant minority women,
and other eligible persons who need special assistance in gaining
access to the maternity care system.
(2) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having the authority to participate
in the maternity care access program or its designee. Two or more
county authorities may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the
requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Eligible person" means a woman in need of maternity care or
a child, who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to this
chapter or the prenatal care program administered by the department.
(5) "Maternity care services" means inpatient and outpatient
medical care, case management, and support services necessary during
prenatal, delivery, and postpartum periods.
(6) "Support services" means, at least, public health nursing
assessment and follow-up, health and childbirth education,
psychological assessment and counseling, outreach services, nutritional
assessment and counseling, needed vitamin and nonprescriptive drugs,
transportation, and family planning services((, and child care)).
Support services may include alcohol and substance abuse treatment for
pregnant women who are addicted or at risk of being addicted to alcohol
or drugs, and child care, to the extent funds are made available for
((that purpose)) either of those purposes.
(7) "Family planning services" means planning the number of one's
children by use of contraceptive techniques.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.800 and 1993 c 407 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, consistent with the state budget act, develop
a maternity care access program designed to ensure healthy birth
outcomes as follows:
(1) Provide maternity care services to low-income pregnant women
and health care services to children in poverty to the maximum extent
allowable under the medical assistance program, Title XIX of the
federal social security act;
(2) Provide maternity care services to low-income women who are not
eligible to receive such services under the medical assistance program,
Title XIX of the federal social security act;
(3) By January 1, 1990, have the following procedures in place to
improve access to maternity care services and eligibility
determinations for pregnant women applying for maternity care services
under the medical assistance program, Title XIX of the federal social
security act:
(a) Use of a shortened and simplified application form;
(b) Outstationing department staff to make eligibility
determinations;
(c) Establishing local plans at the county and regional level,
coordinated by the department; and
(d) Conducting an interview for the purpose of determining medical
assistance eligibility within five working days of the date of an
application by a pregnant woman and making an eligibility determination
within fifteen working days of the date of application by a pregnant
woman;
(4) Establish a maternity care case management system that shall
assist at-risk eligible persons with obtaining medical assistance
benefits and receiving maternity care services, including
transportation ((and child care)) services;
(5) Within available resources, establish appropriate reimbursement
levels for maternity care providers;
(6) Implement a broad-based public education program that stresses
the importance of obtaining maternity care early during pregnancy;
(7) Refer persons eligible for maternity care services under the
program established by this section to persons, agencies, or
organizations with maternity care service practices that primarily
emphasize healthy birth outcomes;
(8) Provide family planning services including information about
the synthetic progestin capsule implant form of contraception, for
twelve months immediately following a pregnancy to women who were
eligible for medical assistance under the maternity care access program
during that pregnancy or who were eligible only for emergency labor and
delivery services during that pregnancy; and
(9) Within available resources, provide family planning services to
women who meet the financial eligibility requirements for services
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

--- END ---