BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In keeping with the gambling policy
statement in RCW 9.46.010, the legislature intends to insure that each
local jurisdiction has the authority to ban house-banked social card
games within its jurisdiction, allow house-banked social card games
within its jurisdiction, or limit the number of existing house-banked
social card games within its jurisdiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.295 and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any license to engage in any of the gambling activities
authorized by this chapter ((as now exists or as hereafter amended,))
and issued under the authority thereof shall be legal authority to
engage in the gambling activities for which issued throughout the
incorporated and unincorporated area of any county, except that a city
or town located therein with respect to that city or town, or a county
with respect to all areas within that county except for such cities or
towns, may:
(a) Absolutely prohibit((, but may not change the scope of
license,)) any or all of the gambling activities for which the license
was issued;
(b) Within its jurisdiction, limit the number of house-banked
social card game licenses to those locations licensed on the effective
date of this act.
(2) If a prohibition or limitation relating to house-banked social
card game licenses is repealed, the prohibition or limitation cannot be
reinstated for at least five years.
(3) This section does not authorize any city, town, or county to
adopt or enforce any ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act
changing or purporting to change the scope of a license issued under
this chapter.
(4) A city or town with a prohibition or limitation on house-banked
social card game licenses that annexes an area that is within a
jurisdiction that permits house-banked social card games may not impose
its prohibition or limitation upon these house-banked social card game
licenses for at least three years after annexation. The three-year
period under this subsection applies only to those house-banked social
card game licenses that are licensed locations on the date of
annexation.
(5)(a) A city, town, or county that has adopted an ordinance,
resolution, or other legislative act under subsection (1) of this
section must file a copy of the ordinance, resolution, or other
legislative act with the commission. The commission must adopt rules
that allow the city, town, or county to electronically file the
ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act with the commission.
(b) A licensee must inform and verify to commission staff that it
is permitted to conduct house-banked social card games in its chosen
location when it applies or reapplies for a license. A verification
under this subsection may consist of a letter certifying that the
licensee may operate at the chosen location. The commission may adopt
rules about the verification required.
(6) The commission, its members, and staff are absolutely immune
from any legal action relating to a decision of the commission: To
issue, renew, or not issue a license based on the provisions of this
section; or that is based on the commission's interpretation of this
section or any local ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act
enacted or amended under this section. No court, board, agency,
entity, or tribunal of any kind has jurisdiction to join the commission
as a party to any such legal action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---