BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that forest biomass is
an abundant and renewable byproduct of Washington's forest land
management. Forest biomass can be utilized to generate clean renewable
energy.
In some Washington forests, residual forest biomass is burned on
site or left to decompose. The lack of forest products markets in some
areas means that standing forest biomass removed for forest health and
wildfire risk reduction treatments must occur at substantial cost.
Utilizing forest biomass to generate energy can reduce the greenhouse
gases emitted by decomposing or burning forest biomass.
The legislature further finds that the emerging forest biomass
energy economy is challenged by: Not having a reliable supply of
predictably priced forest biomass feedstock; shipping and processing
costs; insufficient forest biomass processing infrastructure; and
feedstock demand.
The legislature finds that making use of the state's forest biomass
resources for energy production may generate new revenues or increase
asset values of state lands and state forest lands, protect forest land
of all ownerships from severe forest health problems, stimulate
Washington's economy, create green jobs, and reduce Washington's
dependence on foreign oil.
It is the intent of the legislature to support forest biomass
demonstration projects that employ promising processing technologies.
The demonstration projects must emphasize public and private forest
biomass feedstocks that are generated as byproducts of current forest
practices. The project must reveal ways to overcome the current
impediments to the developing forest biomass energy economy, and ways
to realize ecologically sustainable outcomes from that development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department may develop and implement
forest biomass energy demonstration projects, one east of the crest of
the Cascade mountains and one west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains. The demonstration projects must be designed to reveal the
utility of Washington's public and private forest biomass feedstocks,
create green jobs, generate renewable energy, generate revenues or
improve asset values for beneficiaries of state lands and state forest
lands, improve forest health, reduce pollution, and restore ecological
function.
(2) To develop and implement the forest biomass energy
demonstration projects, the department may form forest biomass energy
partnerships or cooperatives.
(3) The forest biomass energy partnerships or cooperatives are
encouraged to be public-private partnerships focused on convening the
entities necessary to grow, harvest, process, transport, and utilize
forest biomass to generate renewable energy. Particular focus must be
given to recruiting and employing emerging technologies that can
locally process forest biomass feedstock to create local green jobs and
reduce transportation costs.
(4) The forest biomass energy partnerships or cooperatives may
include, but are not limited to: Entrepreneurs or organizations
developing and operating emerging technology to process forest biomass;
industrial electricity producers; contractors capable of providing the
local labor needed to collect, process, and transport forest biomass
feedstocks; tribes; federal land management agencies; county, city, and
other local governments; the department of community, trade, and
economic development; state trust land managers; an organization
dedicated to protecting and strengthening the jobs, rights, and working
conditions of Washington's working families; accredited research
institution representatives; an industrial timber land manager; a small
forest landowner; and a not-for-profit conservation organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 2010, the department shall
provide a progress report to the legislature regarding its efforts to
develop, implement, and evaluate forest biomass energy demonstration
projects and any other department initiatives related to forest
biomass. The report may include an evaluation of:
(1) The status of the department's abilities to secure funding,
partners, and other resources for the forest biomass energy
demonstration projects;
(2) The status of the biomass energy demonstration projects
resulting from the department's efforts;
(3) The status and, if applicable, additional needs of forest
landowners within the demonstration project areas for estimating
sustainable forest biomass yields and availability;
(4) Forest biomass feedstock supply and forest biomass market
demand barriers, and how they can best be overcome including actions by
the legislature and United States congress; and
(5) Sustainability measures that may be instituted by the state to
ensure that an increasing demand for forest biomass feedstocks does not
impair public resources or the ecological conditions of forests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 For the purposes of implementing this act,
the department may seek grants or financing from the federal
government, industry, or philanthropists.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.06.150 and 2004 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner of public lands is designated as the state of
Washington's lead for all forest health issues.
(2) The commissioner of public lands shall strive to promote
communications between the state and the federal government regarding
forest land management decisions that potentially affect the health of
forests in Washington and will allow the state to have an influence on
the management of federally owned land in Washington. Such government-to-government cooperation is vital if the condition of the state's
public and private forest lands are to be protected. These activities
may include, when deemed by the commissioner to be in the best interest
of the state:
(a) Representing the state's interest before all appropriate local,
state, and federal agencies;
(b) Assuming the lead state role for developing formal comments on
federal forest management plans that may have an impact on the health
of forests in Washington; ((and))
(c) Pursuing in an expedited manner any available and appropriate
cooperative agreements, including cooperating agency status
designation, with the United States forest service and the United
States bureau of land management that allow for meaningful
participation in any federal land management plans that could affect
the department's strategic plan for healthy forests and effective fire
prevention and suppression, including the pursuit of any options
available for giving effect to the cooperative philosophy contained
within the national environmental policy act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
4331); and
(d) Pursuing agreements with federal agencies in the service of
forest biomass energy partnerships and cooperatives authorized under
sections 2 through 4 of this act.
(3) The commissioner of public lands shall report to the chairs of
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature every year on
progress under this section, including the identification, if deemed
appropriate by the commissioner, of any needed statutory changes,
policy issues, or funding needs.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.30.020 and 1965 c 8 s 43.30.020 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For the purpose of this chapter, except where a different
interpretation is required by the context:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of natural resources((;)).
(2) "Board" means the board of natural resources((;)).
(3) "Administrator" means the administrator of the department of
natural resources((;)).
(4) "Supervisor" means the supervisor of natural resources((;)).
(5) "Agency" and "state agency" means any branch, department, or
unit of the state government, however designated or constituted((;)).
(6) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(7) "Forest biomass" means the byproducts of: Current forest
practices prescribed or permitted under chapter 76.09 RCW; current
forest protection treatments prescribed or permitted under chapter
76.04 RCW; or the byproducts of forest health treatments prescribed or
permitted under chapter 76.06 RCW. "Forest biomass" does not include
wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as:
Creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old
growth forests, except wood removed for forest health treatments under
chapter 76.06 RCW; wood required by chapter 76.04 RCW for large woody
debris recruitment; or municipal solid waste.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.30 RCW under the subchapter heading "duties and
powers--forested lands."

--- END ---