BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharges authorized in RCW 36.22.178,
36.22.179, and 36.22.1791, and except as provided in subsection (6) of
this section, the county auditor shall charge an additional surcharge
of twelve dollars for each document recorded, which is in addition to
any other charge allowed by law.
(2) The auditor shall remit one hundred percent of the funds to the
state treasurer for deposit in the affordable housing for all account
created in RCW 43.185C.190. The department of community, trade, and
economic development may use the funds for the following purposes:
(a) Administer and implement the programs established in RCW
43.63A.305, 43.63A.645, and chapters 43.185, 43.185A, and 43.185C RCW;
(b) Provide affordable housing and shelter for low-income and
homeless persons including, but not limited to: Grants to operate,
repair, and staff shelters; grants to operate transitional housing;
partial payments for rental assistance; consolidated emergency
assistance; overnight youth shelters; independent youth housing and
emergency shelter assistance; community housing for persons with mental
illness; and mobile home relocation;
(c) Fund the homeless families service fund created under RCW
43.330.167; and
(d) Provide grants to housing authorities organized under chapter
35.82 RCW.
(3) Beginning in 2012, each local governmental entity receiving a
total of three hundred thousand dollars or more during the previous
calendar year from any combination of the funding sources listed in
subsection (4) of this section shall apply to the Washington state
quality award program for an independent assessment of its quality
management, accountability, and performance system, at least once every
three years.
(4) The funding sources necessitating a Washington state quality
award program assessment are as follows:
(a) The surcharge authorized under this section;
(b) The affordable housing for all surcharge authorized under RCW
36.22.178;
(c) The homeless housing and assistance surcharges authorized under
RCW 36.22.179 and 36.22.1791;
(d) State housing-related funding sources; and
(e) Any other surcharge authorized under chapter 36.22 or 43.185C
RCW to fund homelessness programs or other housing programs.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "local governmental entity"
means a county, city, code city, town, or housing authority.
(6) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.185C.190 and 2007 c 427 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The affordable housing for all account is created in the state
treasury, subject to appropriation. The state's portion of the
surcharges established in RCW 36.22.178 and section 1 of this act shall
be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may only be
used for affordable housing programs.

--- END ---