BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When setting fees for the licensure of midwives under chapter
18.50 RCW, the secretary shall consider the number of midwives in the
profession and the benefit costs of midwifery to the consumers of this
state. The fee for the issuance, renewal, or reissuance of a license
for a midwife under chapter 18.50 RCW may not exceed twenty percent of
the costs of the midwifery licensing program or four hundred fifty
dollars per year, whichever is less.
(2) The secretary may not use the fees assessed to any other
profession to defray the costs of the midwifery licensing program that
exceed the fees collected from licensed midwives.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, it shall be the policy
of the state of Washington that the cost of each professional,
occupational, or business licensing program be fully borne by the
members of that profession, occupation, or business. The secretary
shall from time to time establish the amount of all application fees,
license fees, registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal
fees, and any other fee associated with licensing or regulation of
professions, occupations, or businesses administered by the department.
In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the fees for each program
at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that program
and the cost of regulating licensed volunteer medical workers in
accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as provided in: (1) RCW
18.79.202 until June 30, 2013, and (2) section 1 of this act. All such
fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with
the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---