BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) The deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and
technology advancements enhance economic development and public safety
for the state's communities, and offers improved health care, access to
consumer and legal services, increased educational and civic
participation opportunities, and a better quality of life for the
state's residents.
(2) Improvements in the deployment and adoption of high-speed
internet services and the strategic inclusion of technology
advancements and technology education are critical to ensuring that
Washington remains competitive and continues to provide a skilled
workforce, attract businesses, and stimulate job growth.
(3) The state must encourage and support strategic partnerships of
public, private, nonprofit, and community-based sectors in the
continued growth and development of high-speed internet services and
information technology for state residents and businesses. This
includes ensuring digital inclusion in internet access, computer
literacy, and information content, so that all Washingtonians are able
to obtain and utilize broadband fully, regardless of location, economic
status, literacy level, age, disability, size of business, or business
entity structure.
(4) In light of the importance of broadband deployment and adoption
to the economy, health, safety, and welfare of the people of
Washington, it is essential that the legislature authorize a broadband
programs management structure and an advisory council capable of
developing and ensuring the implementation of statewide broadband
strategies.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.32.010 and 2008 c 262 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The community technology opportunity program is created to support
the efforts of community technology programs throughout the state. The
community technology opportunity program must be administered by the
((Washington State University extension, in consultation with the))
department of information services. The ((Washington State University
extension)) department may contract for services in order to carry out
the ((extension's)) department's obligations under this section.
(1) In implementing the community technology opportunity program
the administrator must, to the extent funds are appropriated for this
purpose:
(a) Provide organizational and capacity building support to
community technology programs throughout the state, and identify and
facilitate the availability of other public and private sources of
funds to enhance the purposes of the program and the work of community
technology programs. No more than fifteen percent of funds received by
the administrator for the program may be expended on these functions;
(b) Establish a competitive grant program and provide grants to
community technology programs to provide training and skill-building
opportunities; access to hardware and software; internet connectivity;
assistance in the adoption of information and communication
technologies in low-income and underserved areas of the state; and
development of locally relevant content and delivery of vital services
through technology.
(2) Grant applicants must:
(a) Provide evidence that the applicant is a nonprofit entity or a
public entity that is working in partnership with a nonprofit entity;
(b) Define the geographic area or population to be served;
(c) Include in the application the results of a needs assessment
addressing, in the geographic area or among the population to be
served: The impact of inadequacies in technology access or knowledge,
barriers faced, and services needed;
(d) Explain in detail the strategy for addressing the needs
identified and an implementation plan including objectives, tasks, and
benchmarks for the applicant and the role that other organizations will
play in assisting the applicant's efforts;
(e) Provide evidence of matching funds and resources, which are
equivalent to at least one-quarter of the grant amount committed to the
applicant's strategy;
(f) Provide evidence that funds applied for, if received, will be
used to provide effective delivery of community technology services in
alignment with the goals of this program and to increase the
applicant's level of effort beyond the current level; and
(g) Comply with such other requirements as the administrator
establishes.
(3) The administrator may use no more than ten percent of funds
received for the community technology opportunity program to cover
administrative expenses.
(4) The administrator must establish expected program outcomes for
each grant recipient and must require grant recipients to provide an
annual accounting of program outcomes.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.32.020 and 2008 c 262 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the community technology opportunity
program administrator designated by the ((Washington State University
extension)) department.
(2) "Community technology programs" means ((a program, including a
digital inclusion program, engaged in diffusing information and
communications technology in local communities, particularly in
underserved areas. These programs may include, but are not limited to,
programs that provide education and skill-building opportunities,
hardware and software, internet connectivity, and development of
locally relevant content and delivery of vital services through
technology)) programs that are engaged in diffusing information and
communications technology in local communities, particularly in
unserved and underserved areas of the state. These programs may
include, but are not limited to, programs that provide education and
skill-building opportunities, hardware and software, internet
connectivity, development of locally relevant content, and delivery of
vital services through technology. Community technology programs are
usually provided by nonprofit or public agencies in public community
settings, including youth and community centers, small business and
workforce training centers, mutual assistance associations and
settlement houses, low-income housing units, libraries, or schools
opened for community programs.
(3) "Department" means the department of information services.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.32.030 and 2008 c 262 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington community technology opportunity account is
established in the state treasury. Donated funds from private and
public sources may be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the operation of the community
technology opportunity program as provided in RCW 28B.32.010 (as
recodified by this act). Only the administrator or the administrator's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies with a minimum download
speed greater than or equal to seven hundred sixty-eight kilobits per
second and an upload speed greater than two hundred kilobits per
second.
(2) "Council" means the advisory council on digital inclusion
created in section 9 of this act.
(3) "Department" means the department of information services.
(4) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(5) "Underserved areas" means areas in which high-speed internet
download speeds are less than seven hundred sixty-eight kilobits per
second and upload speeds are less than two hundred kilobits per second.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The authority for overseeing broadband
adoption and deployment efforts in the state is vested in the
department of information services. The department may apply for and
oversee implementation of federally funded or mandated broadband
programs and may adopt rules to administer the programs. These
programs may include but are not limited to the following:
(1) Contracting for and purchasing a completed map of privately
controlled, leased, or owned broadband infrastructure. The map may
include, but is not limited to, adoption information, availability
information, types of technology used, the physical location of
broadband infrastructure, and available speed tiers for high-speed
internet;
(2) Tracking residential, nonprofit organization and business
adoption of computers, high-speed internet, and related information
technology;
(3) Working with communities to identify barriers to the adoption
of broadband service and related information technology services by
individuals, nonprofit organizations, and businesses;
(4) Identifying broadband demand opportunities in communities by
working cooperatively with local organizations, government agencies,
and businesses;
(5) Creating, implementing, and administering programs to improve
computer ownership, technology literacy, and high-speed internet access
for populations not currently served or underserved in the state. This
may include programs to provide low-income families, community-based
nonprofit organizations, nonprofit entities, and public entities that
work in partnership with nonprofit entities to provide increased access
to computers and broadband, with reduced cost internet access;
(6) Administering the community technology opportunity program
under chapter 28B.32 RCW (as recodified by this act); and
(7) Creating additional programs to spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the state, which may include, but is not
limited to:
(a) Applying for and receiving funding in the form of grants or
donations which may be deposited into the Washington community
technology opportunity account created in RCW 28B.32.030 (as recodified
by this act);
(b) Establishing technology literacy and digital inclusion programs
and establishing low-cost hardware and software purchasing programs;
(c) Developing last-mile technology loan programs targeting small
businesses or businesses located in unserved and underserved areas; and
(d) Including community technology organizations in state hardware
and software purchasing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "telecommunications company"
has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.04.010.
(2) A telecommunications company shall be allowed a credit against
taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to fifty percent of
contributions made in any fiscal year directly to the Washington
community technology opportunity account created in RCW 28B.32.030 (as
recodified by this act). The credit shall be taken in a form and
manner as required by the department. The telecommunications company
must make the contribution before claiming a credit authorized under
this section. The credit under this section shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year per telecommunications
company. The credit may not exceed the tax that would otherwise be due
under this chapter. Refunds shall not be granted in the place of
credits.
(3) Except as provided under subsection (4) of this section, a tax
credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another
year.
(4) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by a telecommunications company in any calendar year may be
carried over and claimed against the tax liability for the next
succeeding calendar year. Any credit remaining unused in the next
succeeding calendar year may be carried forward and claimed against the
tax liability for the second succeeding calendar year; and any credit
not used in that second succeeding calendar year may be carried over
and claimed against the tax liability for the third succeeding calendar
year, but may not be carried over for any calendar year thereafter.
(5) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed under this section during any calendar
year to exceed five hundred thousand dollars. The department shall
provide written notice to any telecommunications company that has
claimed tax credits in excess of the five hundred thousand dollar
limitation in this subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of
tax due and provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the
date of such a notice. The department shall not assess penalties and
interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the
initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in
the notice, or any extension thereof.
(6) To claim a credit under this section, a telecommunications
company must electronically file with the department all returns,
forms, and any other information required by the department, in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. Any
return, form, or information required to be filed in an electronic
format under this section is not filed until received by the department
in an electronic format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the
same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(7) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The
telecommunications company must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section.
(8) The department may not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2009.
(9) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
Taxes collected under RCW 82.29A.030 from a telecommunications
company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, as a result of the company's
leasehold interest in publicly owned property must be deposited in the
Washington community technology opportunity account established in RCW
28B.32.030 (as recodified by this act) and used to fund the community
technology opportunity program under chapter 28B.32 RCW (as recodified
by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department shall reconvene the high-speed internet work group previously established by chapter 262, Laws
of 2008. The work group is renamed the advisory council on digital
inclusion, and is an advisory group to the department. The council
must include, but is not limited to, volunteer representatives from
community technology organizations, telecommunications providers,
higher education institutions, K-12 education institutions, public
health institutions, public housing entities, and governmental
entities that are engaged in community technology activities.
(2) The council shall prepare a report by January 15th of each year
and submit it to the department, the governor, and the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report must contain:
(a) An analysis of how support from public and private sector
partnerships, the philanthropic community, and other not-for-profit
organizations in the community, along with strong relationships with
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and higher education institutions, could
establish a variety of high-speed internet access alternatives for
citizens;
(b) Proposed strategies for continued broadband deployment and
adoption efforts, as well as further development of advanced
telecommunications applications;
(c) Recommendations on methods for maximizing the state's research
and development capacity at universities and in the private sector for
developing advanced telecommunications applications;
(d) An identification of regulatory barriers that hinder the
advancement of technology entrepreneurship in the state and
recommendations on incentives to stimulate the demand for and
development of these applications and services; and
(e) An evaluation of programs designed to advance digital literacy
and computer access that are made available by the federal government,
local agencies, telecommunications providers, and business and
charitable entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1, 5, 6, 9, and 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 28B.32.010, 28B.32.020, 28B.32.030,
28B.32.900, and 28B.32.901 are reach recodified as a new chapter in
Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 43.105.350 (Request for information
from providers -- Limitation) and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---