BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(a) The deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and
information technology has resulted in enhanced economic development
and public safety for the state's communities, improved health care and
educational opportunities, stimulated business and job growth,
increased the amount of valuable information available to residents,
businesses, and institutions, and served to provide a better quality of
life for the state's residents.
(b) Continued progress in the deployment and adoption of
affordable, reliable high-speed internet services and other advanced
telecommunications services will benefit all citizens and businesses
within the state.
(2) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to conduct a
statewide assessment of the availability, location, service levels, and
other characteristics of high-speed internet services and other
advanced telecommunications services in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of information services((;)).
(2) "Board" means the information services board((;)).
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee((;)).
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately((;)).
(5) "Director" means the director of the department((;)).
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing((;)).
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network((;)).
(8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means((;)).
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video((;)).
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions((;)).
(11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems((;)).
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment((;)).
(13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications
investments((;)).
(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications((;)).
(15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license((;)).
(16) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330
RCW((;)).
(17) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800((;)).
(18) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW
43.105.810((;)).
(19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820((;)).
(20) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board((;)).
(21) "Bandwidth" means the transmission capacity of an electronic
communications device or system.
(22) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high-capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies with a minimum download
speed greater than or equal to seven hundred sixty-eight kilobits per
second and an upload speed greater than two hundred kilobits per
second.
(23) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(24) "High-speed internet strategy work group" means the group
convened by the department as authorized by chapter 262, Laws of 2008.
(25) "Public entity" includes, but is not limited to, the
following: State departments and agencies; public schools and school
districts; public universities; counties, cities, and municipalities in
the state; and state and local police agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall, based upon the final recommendations of the
high-speed internet work group, accomplish the following objectives:
(1) Create and regularly update a detailed, geographic information
system map of the high-speed internet services and other relevant
telecommunications and information technology services owned or leased
by public entities in the state. The map must, at a minimum, detail
the following criteria:
(a) The physical location of all high-speed internet infrastructure
owned or leased by public entities;
(b) The type of delivery technology used;
(c) Either the service or infrastructure provider, or both;
(d) The existence of unused conduits;
(e) The amount of bandwidth capacity available in the presently
deployed high-speed internet infrastructure;
(f) The average amount of bandwidth capacity utilized;
(g) The extent to which the high-speed internet infrastructure is
active or inactive; and
(h) The x,y coordinates of available infrastructure;
(2) Contract with a nongovernmental, third-party mapping entity
that will work collaboratively with telecommunications providers and
internet service providers to assess, create, and regularly update a
geographic information system map of the privately owned high-speed
internet infrastructure in the state. The department must purchase
aggregated map data owned by private entities in accordance with the
requirements in this section and must provide instructions to the
third-party mapping entity that any proprietary and competitively
sensitive private data must be maintained in a confidential manner by
the entity. The map must, at a minimum, detail the following criteria:
(a) To the extent possible, the physical location of all high-speed
internet infrastructure owned or leased by private entities;
(b) The type of delivery technology used;
(c) Either the service provider or the infrastructure provider, or
both;
(d) To the extent possible, the existence of unused conduits;
(e) The amount of bandwidth capacity available in the presently
deployed high-speed internet infrastructure;
(f) The average amount of bandwidth capacity utilized;
(g) The extent to which the high-speed internet infrastructure is
active or inactive;
(h) Specific download and upload speeds as reported in the
provider's most recent report to the federal communications commission;
(i) Specific adoption levels as reported in the provider's most
recent report to the federal communications commission; and
(j) Provide detail at the census tract level or at the level
specified by the federal communications commission, whichever is more
comprehensive;
(3) Combine the geographic information system map of high-speed
internet infrastructure owned by public entities with the geographic
information system map of high-speed internet infrastructure owned by
private entities to create and regularly update a statewide inventory
of all high-speed internet infrastructure in the state. The combined
map of both public and privately owned or leased high-speed internet
service must:
(a) Aggregate the information from subsections (1) and (2) of this
section;
(b) Be made available in interactive form, online, to the general
public;
(c) Be able to pan, zoom, and identify available specific high-speed internet service types and levels;
(d) Be able to display specific adoption rates by delivery
technology and service levels;
(e) Meet other criteria as determined by the department, subject to
available funding;
(4) Make available to the public quarterly reports on the
department's progress in developing the geographic information system
map;
(5) Use the aggregated geographic information system map of all
high-speed internet infrastructure in the state, both public and
privately owned or leased, to identify and regularly update the
geographic gaps in high-speed internet service, including an assessment
of the population demographic located in each of those geographic gaps;
(6) Track statewide residential and business adoption of high-speed
internet, computers, and related information technology, including an
identification of barriers to adoption;
(7) Spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the
state, which may include, but is not limited to:
(a) Receiving funding in the form of grants or donations from
private or public entities; and
(b) Applying for and receiving funding from the federal government.
(i) The department is the single eligible entity in the state to
receive a grant under the federal broadband data improvement act, P.L.
110-385.
(ii) Funding received by the department under the federal broadband
data improvement act, P.L. 110-385, must be used in accordance with the
requirements of that act and, subject to those requirements, may be
distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities
in the state to achieve the purposes of that act; and
(8) Contingent upon available funding, the department may update
the geographic information system map of high-speed internet
infrastructure to include detail at the census block level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The broadband development and deployment account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from state, federal, or
private sources for the purposes of accomplishing this act must be
deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purposes of this act. Only the director of the department
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as indicated in section 3(6)(b)(i) of this act, nothing in
this chapter may be construed to limit the ability of any municipality,
county, other unit of local government, or any nongovernmental
organization to apply for and receive funds or technical assistance to
undertake projects that address the level of high-speed internet access
available to businesses and residents or any similar high-speed
internet deployment project in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of information services, in
coordination with the department of community, trade, and economic
development and the utilities and transportation commission, shall
reconvene the high-speed internet work group previously established by
chapter 262, Laws of 2008. The work group shall prepare a report that
identifies the geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment
of advanced telecommunications infrastructure in the state, a cost-study estimate for serving the geographic areas identified, and a
proposed build-out schedule to residential homes and small businesses
in the areas identified. To the greatest extent possible, the report
should be based upon the information identified in the geographic
system maps developed under the requirements of this act. The report
must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
September 1, 2009, and must also include, at a minimum, an
identification of the geographic areas of greatest priority for
deployment for:
(1) Wireless voice service in unserved areas;
(2) Advanced wireless broadband, defined as a wireless service
delivering data to the end user transmitted at a speed of at least
three megabits per second downstream and at least one megabit per
second upstream over an end-to-end internet protocol wireless network,
in underserved areas;
(3) Basic broadband service, defined as a service delivering data
to the end user transmitted at a speed of at least five megabits per
second downstream and at least one megabit per second upstream, in
unserved areas; and
(4) Advanced broadband service, defined as a service delivering
data to the end user transmitted at a speed of at least forty-five
megabits per second downstream and at least fifteen megabits per second
upstream in underserved areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If funding for the purpose of accomplishing
this act is not provided either through federal or private sources by
June 30, 2011, this act is null and void. The office of financial
management must provide the code reviser's office with written notice
by June 30, 2011, concerning the status of funds referenced in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The code reviser's office is directed to put
the defined terms in RCW 43.105.020 in alphabetical order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 43.105.350 (Request for information
from providers -- Limitation) and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---