BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a portion of a district equal to at least fifty-one
percent of the area, or fifty-one percent of the assessed valuation of
the real property lying within such district, is included within the
corporate boundaries of a city located in a county with more than one
million five hundred thousand residents, the city may assume by
ordinance the full and complete management and control of that portion
of the entire district not included within another city, whereupon the
provisions of RCW 35.13A.020 shall be operative.

--- END ---