BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that counties
and cities, the general purpose local governments that are closest to
the people, are charged with providing numerous and diverse services to
their residents. In providing these services, counties and cities must
respond to legislative and citizen directives, and a changing, and
often challenging, financial landscape.
(2) The legislature recognizes that population growth and the
enactment and maturation of the growth management act has resulted in
many governance changes throughout the state, as annexations and
incorporations have expanded existing cities and created new
incorporated areas. These actions have been consistent with growth
management act principles that call for growth to be thoughtfully and
deliberately directed to urban areas and areas characterized by urban
growth. These actions have also been consistent with pronouncements of
the act specifying that, in general, cities are the most appropriate
providers of urban governmental services, the services and facilities
that are historically and typically provided in cities.
(3) Recognizing the governance efficiencies that will result from
the annexation of urban and urbanizing areas in the state's largest
counties, the principles of fairness that will take root as rural
residents cease to bear the costs of providing urban governmental
services in unincorporated urban and urbanizing areas, and the
unprecedented financial pressures that local governments face, the
legislature intends to establish new annexation mechanisms and related
fiscal provisions that apply in counties with more than one million
five hundred thousand residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city or town in a county planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 that has more than one million five hundred
thousand residents may resolve to annex territory to the city or town
if:
(a) The area subject to annexation is within the same county and
urban growth area as the city or town; and
(b) At least fifty-one percent of the boundaries of the area
subject to annexation are contiguous to the city or town.
(2) The resolution must describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing in the area as nearly as
may be, and set a date for a public hearing on the resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing must be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks before the date of the
hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city or town and one or more newspapers of general circulation within
the area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered
contiguous to a city or town that is also bounded by the same river,
lake, or other body of water. For purposes of determining contiguity
percentages under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the following
shall not be considered: The boundaries of areas proposed for
annexation that are coterminous with urban growth area boundaries; and
the boundaries of areas proposed for annexation that are coterminous
with a city or town that is not proposing annexation under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The annexation ordinance provided for in section 2 of this act is
subject to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the
filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not
less than fifty percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation must be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice of the election must be
given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election must be conducted
as provided in the general election law. The annexation must be deemed
approved by the voters unless two-thirds of the votes cast on the
proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from, but excluding the
date of, passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed must
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city in a county planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 that has more than one million five hundred thousand
residents may resolve to annex territory to the city if:
(a) The area subject to annexation is within the same county and
urban growth area as the city; and
(b) At least fifty-one percent of the boundaries of the area
subject to annexation are contiguous to the city.
(2) The resolution must describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing in the area as nearly as
may be, and set a date for a public hearing on the resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing must be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks before the date of the
hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area
to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered
contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or
other body of water. For purposes of determining contiguity
percentages under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the following
shall not be considered: The boundaries of areas proposed for
annexation that are coterminous with urban growth area boundaries; and
the boundaries of areas proposed for annexation that are coterminous
with a city or town that is not proposing annexation under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The annexation ordinance provided for in section 4 of this act is
subject to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the
filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not
less than fifty percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation must be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice of the election must be
given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election must be conducted
as provided in the general election law. The annexation must be deemed
approved by the voters unless two-thirds of the votes cast on the
proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from, but excluding the
date of, passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed must
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The method of annexation provided for in sections 2 and 3 of this
act is an alternative method and is in addition to other methods of
annexation authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The method of annexation provided for in sections 4 and 5 of this
act is an alternative method and is in addition to other methods of
annexation authorized under this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.13.130 and 1990 c 33 s 566 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a city or
town may be made in writing addressed to and filed with the legislative
body of the municipality to which annexation is desired. Except where
all the property sought to be annexed is property of a school district,
and the school directors thereof file the petition for annexation as in
RCW 28A.335.110 authorized, or as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, the petition must be signed by the owners of not less than
seventy-five percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is petitioned:
PROVIDED, That in cities and towns with populations greater than one
hundred sixty thousand located east of the Cascade mountains, the owner
of tax exempt property may sign an annexation petition and have the tax
exempt property annexed into the city or town, but the value of the tax
exempt property shall not be used in calculating the sufficiency of the
required property owner signatures unless only tax exempt property is
proposed to be annexed into the city or town.
(2) The petition shall set forth a description of the property
according to government legal subdivisions or legal plats which is in
compliance with RCW 35.02.170, and shall be accompanied by a plat which
outlines the boundaries of the property sought to be annexed.
(3) If the legislative body has required the assumption of all or
of any portion of city or town indebtedness by the area annexed, and/or
the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed, these
facts, together with a quotation of the minute entry of such
requirement or requirements shall be set forth in the petition.
(4) A petition for annexation under this section in a county with
more than one million five hundred thousand residents must be signed by
the owners of not less than fifty-one percent in value, according to
the assessed valuation for general taxation of the property for which
annexation is petitioned.

Sec. 9 RCW 35A.14.120 and 1989 c 351 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Proceedings for initiating annexation of unincorporated
territory to a charter code city or noncharter code city may be
commenced by the filing of a petition of property owners of the
territory proposed to be annexed, in the following manner. This method
of annexation shall be alternative to other methods provided in this
chapter. Prior to the circulation of a petition for annexation, the
initiating party or parties, who shall be the owners of not less than
ten percent in value, according to the assessed valuation for general
taxation of the property for which annexation is sought, shall notify
the legislative body of the code city in writing of their intention to
commence annexation proceedings.
(2) The legislative body shall set a date, not later than sixty
days after the filing of the request, for a meeting with the initiating
parties to determine whether the code city will accept, reject, or
geographically modify the proposed annexation, whether it shall require
the simultaneous adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, if such a
proposal has been prepared and filed for the area to be annexed as
provided for in RCW 35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340, and whether it shall
require the assumption of all or of any portion of existing city
indebtedness by the area to be annexed. If the legislative body
requires the assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness and/or
the adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, it shall record this
action in its minutes and the petition for annexation shall be so drawn
as to clearly indicate these facts. Approval by the legislative body
shall be a condition precedent to circulation of the petition. There
shall be no appeal from the decision of the legislative body.
(3) A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a code city
may be filed with the legislative body of the municipality to which
annexation is desired. ((It)) Except as provided otherwise by this
section, the petition for annexation must be signed by the owners, as
defined by RCW 35A.01.040(9) (a) through (d), of not less than sixty
percent in value, according to the assessed valuation for general
taxation of the property for which annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED,
That a petition for annexation of an area having at least eighty
percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous with a portion of the
boundaries of the code city, not including that portion of the boundary
of the area proposed to be annexed that is coterminous with a portion
of the boundary between two counties in this state, need be signed by
only the owners of not less than fifty percent in value according to
the assessed valuation for general taxation of the property for which
the annexation is petitioned. Such petition shall set forth a
description of the property according to government legal subdivisions
or legal plats and shall be accompanied by a map which outlines the
boundaries of the property sought to be annexed.
(4) If the legislative body has required the assumption of all or
any portion of city indebtedness by the area annexed or the adoption of
a proposed zoning regulation, these facts, together with a quotation of
the minute entry of such requirement, or requirements, shall also be
set forth in the petition.
(5) A petition for annexation under this section in a county with
more than one million five hundred thousand residents must be signed by
the owners of not less than fifty-one percent in value, according to
the assessed valuation for general taxation of the property for which
annexation is petitioned.

--- END ---