BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I. SHORT TITLE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 SHORT TITLE. This act may be known and
cited as the "Comprehensive Health Options, Incentives, and Consumer
Empowerment Act" or "CHOICE Act."

PART II. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature
finds that:
(1) Health care costs are expected to grow by 9.6 percent in 2009,
after experiencing a projected 9.9 percent growth in 2008. As health
care costs continue to rise, employers, families, and individuals are
looking for solutions that will restore the affordability of health
care premiums and increase access to desired coverage.
(2) Recommendation number eight of the 2006 governor's blue ribbon
commission on health care costs and access recommended giving
individuals and families more choice in selecting the private insurance
plans that work for them, but this recommendation has yet to be acted
upon by the legislature.
(3) Although only twelve percent of the state's uninsured
population are those employed by a company that does not offer health
insurance, as costs continue to rise, employers with few choices for
providing low-cost coverage may soon be forced to drop coverage due to
cost, adding to the ranks of uninsured persons in Washington.
(4) Young adults comprise nearly forty-four percent of the
uninsured population, yet they are also in the lowest range of their
earning potential. More affordable health care coverage is necessary
to ensure that these individuals are able to purchase the basic
coverage they need.
(5) More than a quarter of all uninsured individuals work for
employers that offer insurance coverage, but the individual is either
ineligible to participate in coverage sponsored by his or her employer
or cannot afford the cost-sharing requirements necessary to participate
in the employer's health plan.
(6) Perpetual changes in the health insurance market over the past
fifteen years have created uncertainty and an overly burdensome
regulatory environment for insurers, driving many from Washington and
discouraging others from joining the market. This lack of insurer
competition in Washington artificially inflates health care premium
rates and stifles the innovation necessary to address consumer needs.
(7) Empowering consumers with information regarding the cost and
quality of health care services will return control of health care
decisions to consumers who are in the best position to make decisions
regarding the care they need or desire.
(8) The state should provide a safety net to assist low-income
individuals who are unable to access or purchase coverage on their own.

PART III. INCREASING THE AVAILABILITY OF AFFORDABLE COVERAGE
Sec. 301 RCW 48.05.010 and 1961 c 194 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A "domestic" insurer is one formed under the laws of this
state.
(2) A "foreign" insurer is one formed under the laws of the United
States, of a state or territory of the United States other than this
state, or of the District of Columbia.
(3) A "foreign health insurer" is one formed under the laws of the
United States, of a state or territory of the United States other than
this state, or of the District of Columbia, that provides health
benefit coverage as described in RCW 48.21.010 or 48.43.005(19).
(4) An "alien" insurer is one formed under the laws of a nation
other than the United States.
(((4))) (5) For the purposes of this code, "United States," when
used to signify place, means only the states of the United States, the
government of Puerto Rico and the District of Columbia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 48.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A foreign health insurer may apply for a certificate of
authority to offer and provide health benefit plans to residents in
this state, using a form prescribed by the commissioner. Upon
application, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to
the foreign health insurer unless the commissioner determines that the
insurer:
(a) Will not provide health insurance services in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Is in a hazardous financial condition, as determined by an
examination by the commissioner conducted in accordance with the
financial analysis handbook of the national association of insurance
commissioners; or
(c) Has not adopted procedures to ensure compliance with all
applicable federal and state laws governing the confidentiality of its
records with respect to providers and covered persons.
(2) Prior to the issuance of a certificate of authority, a foreign
health insurer must file with the commissioner a certificate from the
public official having supervision over the insurer in its domiciliary
state to the effect that a deposit in equal or greater amount is held
in public custody in such state for the protection of all its
policyholders, or of all of its policyholders and obligees within the
United States, in amount and kind, subject to RCW 48.14.040, the same
as is required of a like domestic insurer transacting like kinds of
insurance. The commissioner may require the foreign health insurer to
annually file such a certificate.
(3) A certificate of authority issued pursuant to this section
shall be valid for three years from the date of issuance by the
commissioner.
(4) The commissioner shall establish by rule:
(a) Procedures for a foreign health insurer to renew a certificate
of authority, pursuant to and consistent with the provisions of this
chapter; and
(b) A certificate of authority application and renewal fees, the
amount of which shall be no greater than is reasonably necessary to
enable the office to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(5) The coverage provided by a foreign health insurer is subject to
the provisions of RCW 48.43.022, 48.43.500 through 48.43.535,
48.43.545, and 48.43.550.
(a) Persons appointed or authorized to solicit applications for
enrollment must comply with chapter 48.17 RCW.
(b) Foreign health insurers must comply with RCW 48.14.0201.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 48.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner may deny, revoke, or suspend, after notice and
opportunity to be heard, a certificate of authority issued to a foreign
health carrier pursuant to this chapter for a violation of the
provisions of this chapter, including any finding by the commissioner
that a foreign health carrier is no longer in compliance with any of
the conditions for issuance of a certificate of authority set forth in
section 302(1) of this act, or the rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter. The commissioner shall provide for an appropriate and timely
right of appeal for the foreign health carrier whose certificate is
denied, revoked, or suspended.
(2) The commissioner shall establish grievance and independent
claims review procedures with respect to claims by a health care
provider or a covered person with which a foreign health insurer shall
comply as a condition of issuing policies in this state.
(3)(a) The commissioner shall establish fair marketing standards
for marketing materials used by foreign health insurers to market
individual health benefits plans to residents in this state.
(b) The commissioner shall establish fair marketing standards for
marketing materials used by foreign health insurers to market small
employer health benefits plans to small employers in this state.
(4) The procedures and standards established under subsections (2)
and (3) of this section shall be applied on a nondiscriminatory basis
so as not to place greater responsibilities on foreign health insurers
than the responsibilities placed on other health carriers doing
business in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 48.05
RCW to read as follows:
A domestic carrier authorized to do business in this state may
apply to the commissioner for an exemption from the provisions of this
title and any rules promulgated under those provisions, that would
allow the domestic carrier to offer health care plans that are
comparable in plan design to health care plans offered by foreign
health insurers under this chapter. Upon a domestic carrier's
application, the commissioner shall make an order exempting the
domestic carrier from those provisions and rules in order to allow the
domestic carrier to offer a health care plan or plans that are
comparable in design to health care plans offered by foreign health
insurers under this chapter. Any health care plan offer by a domestic
carrier under an exemption under this section shall be subject to the
requirements that apply to health care plans offered by foreign health
insurers under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 48.05
RCW to read as follows:
The office shall adopt rules to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter, provided, however, that the rules shall not:
(1) Directly or indirectly require a foreign health insurer to,
directly or indirectly, modify coverage or benefit requirements, or
restrict underwriting requirements or premium ratings, in any way that
conflicts with the carrier's domiciliary state's laws or rules;
(2) Provide for requirements that are more stringent than those
applicable to carriers that are licensed by the commissioner to provide
health benefits plans in this state; or
(3) Require any individual health benefits plan or small employer
health benefits plan issued by the foreign health insurer to be
countersigned by an insurance agent or broker residing in this state.

Sec. 306 RCW 48.43.041 and 2000 c 79 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All individual health benefit plans, other than catastrophic
health plans((, offered or renewed on or after October 1, 2000)) and
plans for young adults described in subsection (3) of this section,
shall include benefits described in this section. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require a carrier to offer an individual
health benefit plan.
(a) Maternity services that include, with no enrollee cost-sharing
requirements beyond those generally applicable cost-sharing
requirements: Diagnosis of pregnancy; prenatal care; delivery; care
for complications of pregnancy; physician services; hospital services;
operating or other special procedure rooms; radiology and laboratory
services; appropriate medications; anesthesia; and services required
under RCW 48.43.115; and
(b) Prescription drug benefits with at least a two thousand dollar
benefit payable by the carrier annually.
(2) If a carrier offers a health benefit plan that is not a
catastrophic health plan to groups, and it chooses to offer a health
benefit plan to individuals, it must offer at least one health benefit
plan to individuals that is not a catastrophic health plan.
(3) Carriers may design and offer a separate health plan targeted
at young adults between nineteen and thirty-four years of age. The
plan may include the benefits required under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section but is not required to include these benefits. The health
plan designed for young adults is exempt from the requirements of RCW
48.43.045(1), 48.43.515(5), 48.44.327, 48.20.392, 48.46.277, 48.43.043,
48.20.580, 48.21.241, 48.44.341, and 48.46.291. Carriers who choose to
exclude maternity services from a young adult plan offered under this
section must allow enrollees who become pregnant to transfer to another
health benefit plan with similar cost-sharing provisions that provides
coverage for maternity services, once pregnancy is confirmed by a
licensed provider. Carriers shall allow the transfer to occur without
applying a preexisting condition waiting period or other limitation or
penalty including, but not limited to, satisfying a new deductible or
stop-loss requirement.

Sec. 307 RCW 48.44.022 and 2006 c 100 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.44.021,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health care service contractor shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health care service contractor shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.44.021, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023. Carriers
may treat young adults and products developed specifically for them
consistent with RCW 48.43.041(3) as a single-banded experience pool for
purposes of establishing rates. The rates established for this age
group are not subject to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.44.023 "health benefit
plan," "small employer," "adjusted community rates," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 308 RCW 48.46.064 and 2006 c 100 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.46.063,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.46.063, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066. Carriers
may treat young adults and products developed specifically for them
consistent with RCW 48.43.041(3) as a single-banded experience pool for
purposes of establishing rates. The rates established for this age
group are not subject to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.46.066, "health benefit
plan," "adjusted community rate," "small employer," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 309 RCW 48.20.029 and 2006 c 100 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals who purchase
the plan as a member of a purchasing pool:
(a) Consisting of five hundred or more individuals affiliated with
a particular industry;
(b) To whom care management services are provided as a benefit of
pool membership; and
(c) Which allows contributions from more than one employer to be
used towards the purchase of an individual's health benefit plan;
shall be calculated using the adjusted community rating method that
spreads financial risk across the entire purchasing pool of which the
individual is a member. All such rates shall conform to the following:
(i) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(A) Geographic area;
(B) Family size;
(C) Age;
(D) Tenure discounts; and
(E) Wellness activities.
(ii) The adjustment for age in (c)(i)(C) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(iii) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer, and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates are subject to the requirements of this subsection.
(iv) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(v) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(vi) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(A) Changes to the family composition;
(B) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual;
or
(C) Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit
plan.
(vii) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(viii) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health
plan of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.21.045. Carriers
may treat young adults and products developed specifically for them
consistent with RCW 48.43.041(3) as a single-banded experience pool for
purposes of establishing rates. The rates established for this age
group are not subject to subsection (1)(c)(iv) of this section.
(3) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "adjusted
community rates," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in
RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 A new section is added to chapter 48.43
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the insurance commissioner shall make available
educational and outreach materials targeted to young adults aged
nineteen to thirty-four, as funding becomes available. Education and
outreach efforts shall focus on educating young consumers on the
importance and value of health insurance, including educational
materials, public service messages, and other outreach activities. The
commissioner is authorized to fund these activities with grants,
donations, in-kind contributions, or other funding that may be
available.

PART IV. ALLOWING CONSUMERS TO PURCHASE PLANS FROM INSURERS
LICENSED OR CERTIFIED OUTSIDE WASHINGTON
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) Beginning January 1, 2010, the office
of the insurance commissioner shall allow the sale and acceptance of
health insurance plans from insurers licensed or certified in a state
other than Washington, in accordance with the following:
(a) The insurer offers the same individual or group health benefit
plan in its domiciliary state and is in compliance with all applicable
laws, regulations, and other requirements within the domiciliary state;
(b) The insurer is in good standing with the insurance regulator of
the insurer's domiciliary state; and
(c) The regulator in the domiciliary state certifies that in the
regulator's judgment the insurer has reserves sufficient to support
claim demands from anticipated additional enrollment and that the
carrier has met the national association of insurance commissioners'
solvency standards.
(2) An insurer licensed or certified outside of Washington that is
contacted to provide coverage to an individual or small employer in
Washington and is interested in providing health care coverage under
this section shall notify the office of the insurance commissioner of
its intent to provide such coverage. Within thirty days of notifying
the commissioner of the insurer's intent to provide such coverage, the
insurer shall provide the commissioner with documentation confirming
compliance with subsection (1) of this section. Unless both parties
otherwise agree, the commissioner shall have thirty days to review the
information provided by the insurer and may only disallow the provision
of coverage if the insurer fails to meet one of the criteria identified
in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 When contacted by a Washington resident
regarding a health benefit plan, an insurer licensed or certified
outside of Washington shall provide written disclosure of the
differences between the covered health benefits the selected benefit
plan contains and those required in Washington health benefit plans.
Each written application for participation in a benefit plan offered by
an insurer not licensed or certified in Washington shall include
disclosure language that clearly identifies which, if any, coverage
mandates required under Washington law are not contained in the
selected policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The office of the insurance commissioner
may adopt rules to specify the format insurers must use to submit the
information required in sections 401 and 402 of this act. The
commissioner may not develop any rule that:
(1) Either directly or indirectly requires an insurer licensed or
certified outside of Washington to modify coverage or benefit
requirements including, but not limited to, mandated benefits, provider
network, or provider reimbursement requirements, or restricts
underwriting requirements or premium ratings, in any way that conflicts
with the insurer's domiciliary state's laws, rules, or regulations;
(2) Provides for regulatory requirements that are more stringent
than those applicable to insurers that are licensed in the state of
Washington; or
(3) Requires any individual health benefit plan or small employer
health benefit plan issued by an insurer licensed or certified outside
of Washington to be countersigned by an agent or broker residing in
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 All complaints against an insurer licensed
or certified outside of Washington shall be submitted to the office of
the insurance commissioner. The office of the insurance commissioner
shall either act in accordance with an existing reciprocity agreement
between the domiciliary state in which the insurer is licensed to
resolve the complaint or, in circumstances in which no reciprocity
agreement exists with the domiciliary state, work directly with the
insurance regulator of that state to resolve the complaint.

PART V. ENCOURAGING ALTERNATIVES TO THE BASIC HEALTH PLAN
Sec. 501 RCW 70.47.060 and 2007 c 259 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees under RCW 70.47.020(6)(b). Premiums due for
foster parents with gross family income up to two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall be set at the minimum premium amount
charged to enrollees with income below sixty-five percent of the
federal poverty level. Premiums due for foster parents with gross
family income between two hundred percent and three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
month.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(d) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(e) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(f) Beginning July 1, 2009, the administrator shall identify basic
health plan enrollees that have access to employer-sponsored coverage
and prepare for the transition of those enrollees to the employer-sponsored plans during the next available open enrollment period of the
employer-sponsored plan. The administrator may provide an amount
equivalent to the subsidy otherwise available through the basic health
plan to the employer to pay for any cost-sharing requirements
prohibiting the enrollee's participation in the employer-sponsored
plan.
(g) Beginning July 1, 2009, the administrator shall offer premium
subsidies equivalent to the subsidy otherwise available through the
basic health plan to any basic health plan enrollee interested in
moving to the individual insurance market, provided the premium cost
for the individual plan selected does not exceed that of the premium
paid for coverage in the basic health plan.
(h) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.
(7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to give priority to members of the Washington national guard
and reserves who served in Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Iraqi
Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle, and their spouses and dependents,
for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan, to establish
appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be
necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
premiums. Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100
through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward a family's current gross
family income for the purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails
to report income or income changes accurately, the administrator shall
have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid
by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent
of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to
implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available
resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose
current gross family income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or,
subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or
medical care services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of
enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good cause, the
administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that are
applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll
in the plan.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(14) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(15) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(16) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(17) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(18) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(19) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.
(20) To give priority in enrollment to persons who disenrolled from
the program in order to enroll in medicaid, and subsequently became
ineligible for medicaid coverage.

PART VI. TRANSPARENCY OF HEALTH CARE COSTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 70.41
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All hospitals licensed pursuant to this chapter and ambulatory
surgical centers licensed pursuant to chapter 70.230 RCW shall report
annually to the Washington state department of health the charge
information for that hospital's all patient refined diagnosis-related
groups for which that hospital had at least ten cases during the twelve
months preceding the report. The charge information for this section
shall include the number of discharges; average length of stay; average
charge; median charge; demographic information; payer mix; charges paid
and not paid by medicare, medicaid, other government programs,
individuals, and private insurance; and uncompensated care.
(2) To the extent possible, the department of health shall use
existing information received from hospitals to fulfill this
requirement. The department may promulgate rules pursuant to this
section to standardize the reporting of the required charge information
from hospitals. The rules must include:
(a) The method for hospitals to report charges; and
(b) Standards that provide for the validity and comparability of
charge reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 70.41
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2009, the department of health shall report the
information gathered under section 601 of this act to the public at no
cost through its web site. The charge information posted on the web
site must include disclaimers of factors such as case severity ratings
and individual patient variations, which may affect actual charges to
a patient for services rendered. The web site posting shall organize
the information provided to include comparisons of hospital-specific
data to hospital statewide data. The web site posting must be made
available by June 1, 2010, and must be updated at least annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to chapter 70.02
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any licensed health care facility or any practitioner of the
healing arts, including a physician, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist,
chiropractor, physical therapist, respiratory care practitioner,
occupational therapist, or psychologist, shall post in a conspicuous
place the following invitation to discuss fees or charges: SHOULD ANY
PATIENT WISH TO DISCUSS FEES OR CHARGES, YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO ASK
ABOUT THEM. For the purposes of this section, conspicuous place is an
openly visible location in a waiting room, reception area, admission
room, or other area where the patient can readily observe the posting.
If the health care provider does not have an area suitable for posting,
the provider shall furnish the same information in writing to each
patient.
(2) If a patient requests information about fees and charges from
a health care provider or a health care facility, then the health care
provider or health care facility must provide the information requested
and may refer the patient to his or her insurer for information about
his or her insurance coverage and personal responsibility for payment
under a specific insurance plan.
(3) Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall be
grounds for disciplinary action on behalf of the appropriate licensing
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 70.01
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All fees and charges for health care services and procedures
shall be disclosed by a health care provider licensed under Title 18
RCW or facility licensed under Title 70 RCW, upon request of a patient.
(2) Providers may, after disclosing charges and fees to a patient,
refer the patient to the patient's insurer for specific information on
the insurer's negotiated charges and fees for services and procedures,
and any cost-sharing responsibilities required of the patient.

PART VII.
IMPROVING EMPLOYEE WELLNESS
Sec. 701 RCW 48.21.045 and 2008 c 143 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more comprehensive benefits than those included in the product
offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit
plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.244, 48.21.250,
48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs. Up to a twenty percent variance may be
allowed for small employers that develop and implement a wellness
program or activities that directly improve employee wellness.
Employers shall document program activities with the carrier and may
after three years of implementation, request a reduction in premiums
based on improved employee health and wellness. While carriers may
review the employer's claim history when making a determination
regarding whether the employer's wellness program has improved employee
health, the carrier may not use maternity or prevention services claims
to deny the employer's request. Carriers must consider issues such as
improved productivity or a reduction in absenteeism due to illness if
submitted by the employer for consideration. Interested employers may
also work with the carrier to develop a wellness program and a means to
track improved employee health.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 702 RCW 48.44.023 and 2008 c 143 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and 48.44.460.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs. Up to a twenty percent variance may be
allowed for small employers that develop and implement a wellness
program or activities that directly improve employee wellness.
Employers shall document program activities with the carrier and may
after three years of implementation, request a reduction in premiums
based on improved employee health and wellness. While carriers may
review the employer's claim history when making a determination
regarding whether the employer's wellness program has improved employee
health, the carrier may not use maternity or prevention services claims
to deny the employer's request. Carriers must consider issues such as
improved productivity or a reduction in absenteeism due to illness if
submitted by the employer for consideration. Interested employers may
also work with the carrier to develop a wellness program and a means to
track improved employee health.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 70.14
RCW to read as follows:
Any group or individual that seeks a new or modified health
insurance mandate shall submit a proposal to the health technology
clinical committee established under RCW 70.14.090 no later than June
30th of each year. The health technology clinical committee shall
review all requests for new or modified health insurance mandates and
report its findings and recommendations to the legislature during the
next regular legislative session.
The clinical committee shall annually review one existing health
coverage mandate and report its findings to the legislature, including
recommendations as to whether the mandate should remain a part of
mandatory health coverage.

PART VIII.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 Part headings and captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---