BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.350 and 2001 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The board of directors of any of the state's school
districts or educational service districts may make available
liability, life, health, health care, accident, disability and salary
protection or insurance or any one of, or a combination of the
enumerated types of insurance, or any other type of insurance or
protection, for the members of the boards of directors, the students,
and employees of the school district or educational service district,
and their dependents. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
such coverage may be provided by contracts with private carriers, with
the state health care authority after July 1, 1990, pursuant to the
approval of the authority administrator, or through self-insurance or
self-funding pursuant to chapter 48.62 RCW, or in any other manner
authorized by law.
(b) After January 1, 2010, a school district or educational service
district shall purchase employee health insurance coverage through the
state health care authority, except that the coverage may be purchased
through other parties if required by any collective bargaining
agreement signed before the effective date of this section. Upon the
expiration of such a collective bargaining agreement, the school
district or educational service district shall purchase coverage
through the state health care authority.
(2) Whenever funds are available for these purposes the board of
directors of the school district or educational service district may
contribute all or a part of the cost of such protection or insurance
for the employees of their respective school districts or educational
service districts and their dependents. The premiums on such liability
insurance shall be borne by the school district or educational service
district.
After October 1, 1990, school districts may not contribute to any
employee protection or insurance other than liability insurance unless
the district's employee benefit plan conforms to RCW 28A.400.275 and
28A.400.280.
(3) For school board members, educational service district board
members, and students, the premiums due on such protection or insurance
shall be borne by the assenting school board member, educational
service district board member, or student. The school district or
educational service district may contribute all or part of the costs,
including the premiums, of life, health, health care, accident or
disability insurance which shall be offered to all students
participating in interschool activities on the behalf of or as
representative of their school, school district, or educational service
district. The school district board of directors and the educational
service district board may require any student participating in
extracurricular interschool activities to, as a condition of
participation, document evidence of insurance or purchase insurance
that will provide adequate coverage, as determined by the school
district board of directors or the educational service district board,
for medical expenses incurred as a result of injury sustained while
participating in the extracurricular activity. In establishing such a
requirement, the district shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the premiums of such coverage as may be offered through the
school district or educational service district to students
participating in extracurricular activities, for those students whose
families, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty paying
the entire amount of such insurance premiums. The district board shall
adopt regulations for waiving or reducing the insurance coverage
requirements for low-income students in order to assure such students
are not prohibited from participating in extracurricular interschool
activities.
(4) All contracts for insurance or protection written to take
advantage of the provisions of this section shall provide that the
beneficiaries of such contracts may utilize on an equal participation
basis the services of those practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters
18.22, 18.25, 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2008 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b)
employees of employee organizations representing state civil service
employees, at the option of each such employee organization, and,
effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; (c) employees of a school district ((if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by
contract with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350)) or
educational service district, except for employees belonging to an
employee group enrolled in health insurance coverage not provided by
the state health care authority under RCW 28A.400.350(1)(b); and (d)
employees of a tribal government, if the governing body of the tribal
government seeks and receives the approval of the authority to provide
any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and (g).
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(15) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(16) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government; a county, municipality, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision; and a
tribal government covered by this chapter.
(17) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(18) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(20) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.022 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority is hereby designated as the single
state agent for purchasing health services.
(2) On and after January 1, 1995, at least the following state-purchased health services programs shall be merged into a single,
community-rated risk pool: Health benefits for groups of employees of
school districts and educational service districts that ((voluntarily))
purchase health benefits as provided in RCW ((41.05.011))
28A.400.350(1)(b); health benefits for state employees; health benefits
for eligible retired or disabled school employees not eligible for
parts A and B of medicare; and health benefits for eligible state
retirees not eligible for parts A and B of medicare.
(3) At a minimum, and regardless of other legislative enactments,
the state health services purchasing agent shall:
(a) Require that a public agency that provides subsidies for a
substantial portion of services now covered under the basic health plan
use uniform eligibility processes, insofar as may be possible, and
ensure that multiple eligibility determinations are not required;
(b) Require that a health care provider or a health care facility
that receives funds from a public program provide care to state
residents receiving a state subsidy who may wish to receive care from
them, and that an insuring entity that receives funds from a public
program accept enrollment from state residents receiving a state
subsidy who may wish to enroll with them;
(c) Strive to integrate purchasing for all publicly sponsored
health services in order to maximize the cost control potential and
promote the most efficient methods of financing and coordinating
services;
(d) Consult regularly with the governor, the legislature, and state
agency directors whose operations are affected by the implementation of
this section; and
(e) Ensure the control of benefit costs under managed competition
by adopting rules to prevent employers from entering into an agreement
with employees or employee organizations when the agreement would
result in increased utilization in public employees' benefits board
plans or reduce the expected savings of managed competition.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.050 and 2007 c 114 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every: (a) Department, division, or separate agency of state
government; (b) county, municipal, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivisions; and (c) tribal governments
as are covered by this chapter, shall provide contributions to
insurance and health care plans for its employees and their dependents,
the content of such plans to be determined by the authority.
Contributions, paid by the county, the municipality, other political
subdivision, or a tribal government for their employees, shall include
an amount determined by the authority to pay such administrative
expenses of the authority as are necessary to administer the plans for
employees of those groups, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(2) If the authority at any time determines that the participation
of a county, municipal, other political subdivision, or a tribal
government covered under this chapter adversely impacts insurance rates
for state employees, the authority shall implement limitations on the
participation of additional county, municipal, other political
subdivisions, or a tribal government.
(3) The contributions of any: (a) Department, division, or
separate agency of the state government; (b) county, municipal, or
other political subdivisions; and (c) any tribal government as are
covered by this chapter, shall be set by the authority, subject to the
approval of the governor for availability of funds as specifically
appropriated by the legislature for that purpose. Insurance and health
care contributions for ferry employees shall be governed by RCW
47.64.270.
(4)(a) Beginning September 1, 2003, the authority shall collect
from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the composite rate charged to state
agencies, plus an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and
family size as would be charged to state employees((, for groups of
district employees enrolled in authority plans as of January 1, 2003.
However, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the insurance benefit allocations provided
in section 504, chapter 518, Laws of 2005, plus any additional funding
provided by the legislature for school employee health benefits, plus
an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and family size as
would be charged to state employees, for groups of district employees
enrolled in authority plans as of July 1, 2005.
(b) For all groups of district employees enrolling in authority
plans for the first time after September 1, 2003, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district an amount equal to the
composite rate charged to state agencies, plus an amount equal to the
employee premiums by plan and by family size as would be charged to
state employees, only if the authority determines that this method of
billing the districts will not result in a material difference between
revenues from districts and expenditures made by the authority on
behalf of districts and their employees.
(c) If the authority determines at any time that the conditions in
(b) of this subsection cannot be met, the authority shall offer
enrollment to additional groups of district employees on a tiered rate
structure until such time as the authority determines there would be no
material difference between revenues and expenditures under a composite
rate structure for all district employees enrolled in authority plans.
(d) The authority may charge districts a one-time set-up fee for
employee groups enrolling in authority plans for the first time)). The
authority may collect these amounts in accordance with the district
fiscal year.
(((e))) (b) For the purposes of this subsection((:
(i))), "district" means school district and educational service
district((; and
(ii) "Tiered rates" means the amounts the authority must pay to
insuring entities by plan and by family size.
(f) Notwithstanding this subsection and RCW 41.05.065(3), the
authority may allow districts enrolled on a tiered rate structure prior
to September 1, 2002, to continue participation based on the same rate
structure and under the same conditions and eligibility criteria)).
(5) The authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of
the employer contribution to the governor and the director of financial
management for inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the
legislature.

--- END ---