BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other power and authority conferred to a city
that is located in a county having a population of more than one
million five hundred thousand, a city legislative authority may provide
or contract for supplemental transportation improvements to meet
mobility needs within the city's boundaries. For purposes of this
section, a "supplemental transportation improvement" or "supplemental
improvement" means any project, work, or undertaking to provide or
contract for public transit service in addition to any existing or
planned public transportation service provided by public transportation
agencies and systems serving the city. The supplemental authority
provided to the city legislative authority under this section is
subject to the following requirements:
(1) Prior to taking any action to provide or contract for
supplemental transportation improvements permitted under this section,
the legislative authority of the city shall conduct a public hearing at
the time and place specified in a notice published at least once, not
less than ten days before the hearing, in a newspaper of general
circulation within the proposed district. The notice must specify the
supplemental facilities or services to be provided or contracted for by
the city, and must include estimated capital, operating, and
maintenance costs. The legislative authority of the city shall hear
objections from any person affected by the proposed supplemental
improvements.
(2) Following the hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, if the city legislative authority finds that the proposed
supplemental transportation improvements are in the public interest,
the legislative authority shall adopt an ordinance providing for the
supplemental improvements and provide or contract for the supplemental
improvements.
(3) For purposes of providing or contracting for the proposed
supplemental transportation improvements, the legislative authority of
the city may contract with private providers and nonprofit
organizations, and may form public-private partnerships. Such
contracts and partnerships must require that transit services be
coordinated with other public transportation agencies and systems
serving the area and border jurisdictions.
(4) The legislative authorities of cities that are participating
jurisdictions in a transportation benefit district, as provided under
chapter 36.73 RCW, may petition the transportation benefit district for
partial or full funding of supplemental transportation improvements as
prescribed under section 3 of this act.
(5) Supplemental transportation improvements must be consistent
with the city's comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.73.015 and 2006 c 311 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "District" means a transportation benefit district created
under this chapter.
(2) "City" means a city or town.
(3) "Transportation improvement" means a project contained in the
transportation plan of the state or a regional transportation planning
organization. A project may include investment in new or existing
highways of statewide significance, principal arterials of regional
significance, high capacity transportation, public transportation, and
other transportation projects and programs of regional or statewide
significance including transportation demand management. Projects may
also include the operation, preservation, and maintenance of these
facilities or programs.
(4) "Supplemental transportation improvement" or "supplemental
improvement" means any project, work, or undertaking to provide public
transit service, in addition to a district's existing or planned voter-approved transportation improvements, proposed by a participating city
member of the district under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In districts comprised of more than one member city, the
legislative authorities of any member city that is located in a county
having a population of more than one million five hundred thousand may
petition the district to provide supplemental transportation
improvements.
(2) Upon receipt of a petition as provided in subsection (1) of
this section for supplemental transportation improvements that are to
be fully funded by the petitioner city, including ongoing operating and
maintenance costs, the district must:
(a) Conduct a public hearing, and provide notice and opportunity
for public comment consistent with the requirements of RCW
36.73.050(1); and
(b) Following the hearing, if a majority of the district's
governing board determines that the proposed supplemental
transportation improvements are in the public interest, the district
shall adopt an ordinance providing for the incorporation of the
supplemental improvements into any existing services. The supplemental
transportation improvements must be in addition to existing services
provided by the district. The district shall enter into agreements
with the petitioner city or identified service providers to coordinate
existing services with the supplemental improvements.
(3) Upon receipt of a petition as provided in subsection (1) of
this section for supplemental transportation improvements proposed to
be partially or fully funded by the district, the district must:
(a) Conduct a public hearing, and provide notice and opportunity
for public comment consistent with the requirements of RCW
36.73.050(1); and
(b) Following the hearing, submit a proposition to the voters at
the next special or general election for approval by a majority of the
voters in the district. The proposition must specify the supplemental
transportation improvements to be provided and must estimate the
capital, maintenance, and operating costs to be funded by the district.
(4) If a proposition to incorporate supplemental transportation
improvements is approved by the voters as provided under subsection (3)
of this section, the district shall adopt an ordinance providing for
the incorporation of the supplemental improvements into any existing
services provided by the district. The supplemental improvements must
be in addition to existing services. The district shall enter into
agreements with the petitioner city or identified service providers to
coordinate existing services with the supplemental improvements.
(5) A supplemental transportation improvement must be consistent
with the petitioner city's comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(6) Unless otherwise agreed to by the petitioner city or by a
majority of the district's governing board, upon adoption of an
ordinance under subsection (2) or (4) of this section, the district
shall maintain its existing transit service levels in locations where
supplemental transportation improvements are provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.58 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislative authority of a city provides or contracts for
supplemental transportation improvements, as described in section 1 of
this act or under chapter 36.73 RCW, a metropolitan municipal
corporation serving the city or border jurisdictions shall coordinate
its services with the supplemental transportation improvements to
maximize efficiencies in public transportation services within and
across service boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislative authority of a city provides or contracts for
supplemental transportation improvements, as described in section 1 of
this act or under chapter 36.73 RCW, a public transportation benefit
area serving the city or border jurisdictions shall coordinate its
services with the supplemental transportation improvements to maximize
efficiencies in public transportation services within and across
service boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislative authority of a city provides or contracts for
supplemental transportation improvements, as described in section 1 of
this act or under chapter 36.73 RCW, a regional transit authority
serving the city or border jurisdictions shall coordinate its services
with the supplemental transportation improvements to maximize
efficiencies in public transportation services within and across
service boundaries.

--- END ---