BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington needs
to provide additional resources for the preparation of teachers for
children with blindness and visual impairments. The legislature
further finds that Portland State University has a nationally
recognized program for teachers of children with visual impairments and
that a collaborative partnership between Portland State University and
Washington State University-Vancouver would help address the critical
need for teachers of the blind and visually impaired in Washington.
The legislature intends to provide a vision impairments/orientation and
mobility coordinator to be housed at Washington State University-Vancouver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Washington State University shall establish the position of vision
impairments/orientation and mobility coordinator to be housed at
Washington State University-Vancouver. The coordinator shall:
(1) Recruit Washington students for preparation as teachers for
children who are blind or visually impaired;
(2) Develop partnerships with school districts with Washington
schools that provide services to children who are blind or visually
impaired;
(3) Supervise enrolled students and coordinate experiences with
mentor teachers;
(4) Coordinate and instruct in the orientation and mobility summer
curriculum as an adjunct faculty;
(5) Serve as a liaison between Portland State University and
Washington State University-Vancouver; and
(6) Seek grants and independent funding sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2010, from the general fund to Washington State
University for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---