BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that improving the
health of the people of Washington is a paramount goal of state health
policy, and embraces the vision to make Washington the healthiest state
in the nation. The legislature further finds that the factors and
actions that create health include but are not limited to health
coverage and access to medical care. The legislature finds that the
state must also invest in social determinants of health and stimulate
greater personal health actions by individuals and families. The
legislature recognizes that it is a shared responsibility among people,
government, and the private sectors to assure personal health promotion
and that an opportunity for promoting this lies with Washington's
private businesses and nonprofit organizations.
The legislature further finds that many Washington businesses,
particularly larger employers, already offer and find great value in
employee wellness programs for their employees. Surveys, and the
experience of many Washingtonians with events and programs such as the
annual governor's health bowl, find that employees also desire and find
value with sound employee wellness programs and events. The
legislature also finds that there are major barriers to the adoption
and use of employee wellness programs across all of Washington's
businesses and organizations, particularly among small business and
not-for-profit organizations, which have limited resources, including
time, to adopt and manage these programs.
The legislature intends to encourage the growth of workplace-based
wellness programs by providing incentives for the adoption of employee
wellness programs by small businesses. In providing these incentives,
the legislature hopes to encourage all employers to provide health
coverage to employees and dependents, but also ensure that all
employers have an opportunity to adopt employee wellness programs for
the use of their employees to promote wellness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Level 1 qualified employee wellness program" means a qualified
employee wellness program certified by the department of health as
meeting the criteria for level 1 qualified employee wellness programs
established by the department.
(3) "Level 2 qualified employee wellness program" means a qualified
employee wellness program certified by the department of health as
meeting the criteria for level 2 qualified employee wellness programs
established by the department.
(4) "Nonprofit organization" means a nonprofit corporation
organized under chapter 24.03 RCW or a tax exempt organization under
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code.
(5) "Qualified employee wellness program" means an employee
wellness program certified by the department of health as meeting all
the criteria established by the department for level 1 or level 2
qualified employee wellness programs.
(6) "Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, and that
has fifty or fewer employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The small business employee wellness
program established by this act is to be administered by the department
of health. The department must develop criteria and a process for
certifying qualified employee wellness programs. In developing the
criteria, the department should consider the importance of encouraging
organizations and employees to initiate employee wellness programs.
Furthermore, organizations are encouraged to make every effort to
include free or low-cost offerings that achieve the essential
objectives of health promotion among employees. It is recommended that
the department consult with recognized experts in the development of
these criteria, including the University of Washington, and the
Washington health foundation.
(2) The criteria for level 1 qualified employee wellness programs
must include providing a structure, incentives, and other programmatic
elements aimed at the increase in positive health behaviors by
employees, such as physical activity, better nutrition, sleep,
hydration, stress management and other accepted healthy living factors.
(3) The criteria for level 2 qualified employee wellness programs
must include the elements of a level 1 qualified employee wellness
program but also incorporate incentives to assure that employees use
proven preventive clinical care services, based on the recommendations
of the United States clinical preventive services task force.
(4) Each small business or nonprofit organization eligible for the
credit provided in section 4 of this act must maintain records of the
results and effectiveness of the qualified employee wellness program
that is the basis of earning the credit provided in section 4 of this
act and provide this information, subject to confidentiality for
individual participants, to the department upon request.
(5) The department must issue an annual report on the amount of
credits claimed by businesses and nonprofit organizations under section
4 of this act and the effectiveness of the credit in encouraging
effective employee wellness. The report is due by . . . of the
calendar year immediately following the end of the year covered by the
report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A small business or a nonprofit organization may claim a
credit against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the costs
of implementing a qualified employee wellness program.
(b) The maximum lifetime credit that may be earned under this
section for each small business or nonprofit organization is five
thousand dollars.
(c)(i) Small businesses or nonprofit organizations adopting a level
1 qualified employee wellness program may claim a credit of up to two
thousand five hundred dollars for the costs associated with
implementing the program.
(ii) Small businesses or nonprofit organizations adopting a level
2 qualified employee wellness program may claim a credit of up to five
thousand dollars for the costs associated with implementing the
program.
(2) Credit may not be claimed under this section for the cost
incurred by the small businesses' or nonprofit organizations' own
employees for organizing and managing the development and
implementation of a qualified employee wellness program.
(3) No application is necessary for this credit. Persons claiming
a credit under this section must maintain records necessary to verify
the eligibility for the credit under this section and the costs of
implementing the qualified employee wellness program.
(4) Credit under this section is earned when costs are incurred for
implementing a qualified employee wellness program. Credit may be
claimed for tax reporting periods due on or after the credit is earned.
Credit under this section may be carried over until used. Refunds may
not be granted in the place of a credit. No credit may be earned under
this section for costs incurred before the effective date of this act.
(5) Credits under this section may only be claimed on returns filed
with the department of revenue in an electronic format as provided or
approved by the department. However, the department may waive the
electronic filing requirement in this subsection for good cause shown.
(6) To assist the department of health in completing the annual
reports required in section 3 of this act, the department of revenue
must annually provide the department of health with statistics on the
amount of credit claimed under this section and the number of persons
claiming the credit. This subsection does not allow the disclosure of
return or tax information protected from disclosure under RCW
82.32.330.
(7) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---