BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.87.010 and 2003 c 143 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter, except where a different
interpretation is required by the context:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Owner" means any person having title to or control of a
conveyance, as guardian, trustee, lessee, or otherwise((;)).
(2) "Conveyance" means an elevator, escalator, dumbwaiter, belt
manlift, automobile parking elevator, moving walk, and other elevating
devices, as defined in this section((;)).
(3) "Existing installations" means an installation defined as an
"installation, existing" in this chapter or in rules adopted under this
chapter((;)).
(4) "Elevator" means a hoisting or lowering machine equipped with
a car or platform that moves in guides and serves two or more floors or
landings of a building or structure;
(a) "Passenger elevator" means an elevator (i) on which passengers
are permitted to ride and (ii) that may be used to carry freight or
materials when the load carried does not exceed the capacity of the
elevator;
(b) "Freight elevator" means an elevator (i) used primarily for
carrying freight and (ii) on which only the operator, the persons
necessary for loading and unloading, and other employees approved by
the department are permitted to ride;
(c) "Sidewalk elevator" means a freight elevator that: (i)
Operates between a sidewalk or other area outside the building and
floor levels inside the building below the outside area, (ii) does not
have a landing opening into the building at its upper limit of travel,
and (iii) is not used to carry automobiles;
(d) "Hand elevator" means an elevator utilizing manual energy to
move the car;
(e) "Inclined elevator" means an elevator that travels at an angle
of inclination of seventy degrees or less from the horizontal;
(f) "Multideck elevator" means an elevator having two or more
compartments located one immediately above the other;
(g) "Observation elevator" means an elevator designed to permit
exterior viewing by passengers while the car is traveling;
(h) "Power elevator" means an elevator utilizing energy other than
gravitational or manual to move the car;
(i) "Electric elevator" means an elevator where the energy is
applied by means of an electric driving machine;
(j) "Hydraulic elevator" means an elevator where the energy is
applied by means of a liquid under pressure in a cylinder equipped with
a plunger or piston;
(k) "Direct-plunger hydraulic elevator" means a hydraulic elevator
having a plunger or cylinder directly attached to the car frame or
platform;
(l) "Electro-hydraulic elevator" means a direct-plunger elevator
where liquid is pumped under pressure directly into the cylinder by a
pump driven by an electric motor;
(m) "Maintained-pressure hydraulic elevator" means a direct-plunger
elevator where liquid under pressure is available at all times for
transfer into the cylinder;
(n) "Roped hydraulic elevator" means a hydraulic elevator having
its plunger or piston connected to the car with wire ropes or
indirectly coupled to the car by means of wire ropes and sheaves;
(o) "Rack and pinion elevator" means a power elevator, with or
without a counterweight, that is supported, raised, and lowered by a
motor or motors that drive a pinion or pinions on a stationary rack
mounted in the hoistway;
(p) "Screw column elevator" means a power elevator having an
uncounterweighted car that is supported, raised, and lowered by means
of a screw thread;
(q) "Rooftop elevator" means a power passenger or freight elevator
that operates between a landing at roof level and one landing below and
opens onto the exterior roof level of a building through a horizontal
opening;
(r) "Special purpose personnel elevator" means an elevator that is
limited in size, capacity, and speed, and permanently installed in
structures such as grain elevators, radio antenna, bridge towers,
underground facilities, dams, power plants, and similar structures to
provide vertical transportation of authorized personnel and their tools
and equipment only;
(s) "Workmen's construction elevator" means an elevator that is not
part of the permanent structure of a building and is used to raise and
lower workers and other persons connected with, or related to, the
building project;
(t) "Boat launching elevator" means a conveyance that serves a boat
launching structure and a beach or water surface and is used for the
carrying or handling of boats in which people ride;
(u) "Limited-use/limited-application elevator" means a power
passenger elevator where the use and application is limited by size,
capacity, speed, and rise, intended principally to provide vertical
transportation for people with physical disabilities((;)).
(5) "Escalator" means a power-driven, inclined, continuous stairway
used for raising and lowering passengers((;)).
(6) "Dumbwaiter" means a hoisting and lowering mechanism equipped
with a car (a) that moves in guides in a substantially vertical
direction, (b) the floor area of which does not exceed nine square
feet, (c) the inside height of which does not exceed four feet, (d) the
capacity of which does not exceed five hundred pounds, and (e) that is
used exclusively for carrying materials((;)).
(7) "Automobile parking elevator" means an elevator: (a) Located
in either a stationary or horizontally moving hoistway; (b) used
exclusively for parking automobiles where, during the parking process,
each automobile is moved either under its own power or by means of a
power-driven transfer device onto and off the elevator directly into
parking spaces or cubicles in line with the elevator; and (c) in which
persons are not normally stationed on any level except the receiving
level((;)).
(8) "Moving walk" means a passenger carrying device (a) on which
passengers stand or walk and (b) on which the passenger carrying
surface remains parallel to its direction of motion((;)).
(9) "Belt manlift" means a power driven endless belt provided with
steps or platforms and a hand hold for the transportation of personnel
from floor to floor((;)).
(10) "Department" means the department of labor and
industries((;)).
(11) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
representative((;)).
(12) "Inspector" means an elevator inspector of the department or
an elevator inspector of a municipality having in effect an elevator
ordinance pursuant to RCW 70.87.200((;)).
(13) "Permit" means a permit issued by the department: (a) To
perform conveyance work, other than maintenance; or (b) to operate a
conveyance((;)).
(14) "Person" means this state, a political subdivision, any public
or private corporation, any firm, or any other entity as well as an
individual((;)).
(15) "One-man capacity manlift" means a single passenger, hand-powered counterweighted device, or electric-powered device, that
travels vertically in guides and serves two or more landings((;)).
(16) "Private residence conveyance" means a conveyance installed in
or on the premises of a single-family dwelling and operated for
transporting persons or property from one elevation to another((;)).
(17) "Material hoist" means a hoist that is not a part of a
permanent structure used to raise or lower materials during
construction, alteration, or demolition. It is not applicable to the
temporary use of permanently installed personnel elevators as material
hoists((;)).
(18) "Material lift" means a lift that (a) is permanently
installed, (b) is comprised of a car or platform that moves in guides,
(c) serves two or more floors or landings, (d) travels in a vertical or
inclined position, (e) is an isolated, self-contained lift, (f) is not
part of a conveying system, and (g) is installed in a commercial or
industrial area not accessible to the general public or intended to be
operated by the general public((;)).
(19) "Casket lift" means a lift that (a) is installed at a
mortuary, (b) is designed exclusively for carrying of caskets, (c)
moves in guides in a basically vertical direction, and (d) serves two
or more floors or landings((;)).
(20) "Wheelchair lift" means a lift that travels in a vertical or
inclined direction and is designed for use by ((physically handicapped
persons;)) individuals with disabilities.
(21) "Stairway chair lift" means a lift that travels in a basically
inclined direction and is designed for use by ((physically handicapped
persons;)) individuals with disabilities.
(22) "Personnel hoist" means a hoist that is not a part of a
permanent structure, is installed inside or outside buildings during
construction, alteration, or demolition, and used to raise or lower
workers and other persons connected with, or related to, the building
project. The hoist may also be used for transportation of
materials((;)).
(23) "Advisory committee" means the elevator advisory committee as
described in this chapter((;)).
(24) "Elevator helper/apprentice" means a person who works under
the general direction of a licensed elevator mechanic. A license is
not required to be an elevator helper/apprentice((;)).
(25) "Elevator contractor" means any person, firm, or company that
possesses an elevator contractor license in accordance with this
chapter and who is engaged in the business of performing conveyance
work covered by this chapter((;)).
(26) "Elevator mechanic" means any person who possesses an elevator
mechanic license in accordance with this chapter and who is engaged in
performing conveyance work covered by this chapter((;)).
(27) "License" means a written license, duly issued by the
department, authorizing a person, firm, or company to carry on the
business of performing conveyance work or to perform conveyance work
covered by this chapter((;)).
(28) "Elevator contractor license" means a license that is issued
to an elevator contractor who has met the qualification requirements
established in RCW 70.87.240((;)).
(29) "Elevator mechanic license" means a license that is issued to
a person who has met the qualification requirements established in RCW
70.87.240((;)).
(30) "Licensee" means the elevator mechanic or elevator
contractor((;)).
(31) "Conveyance work" means the alteration, construction,
dismantling, erection, installation, maintenance, relocation, and
wiring of a conveyance((;)).
(32) "Alteration" means any change to equipment, including its
parts, components, and/or subsystems, other than maintenance, repair,
or replacement((;)).
(33) "Maintenance" means a process of routine examination,
lubrication, cleaning, servicing, and adjustment of parts, components,
and/or subsystems for the purpose of ensuring performance in accordance
with this chapter. "Maintenance" includes repair and replacement, but
not alteration((;)).
(34) "Repair" means the reconditioning or renewal of parts,
components, and/or subsystems necessary to keep equipment in compliance
with this chapter((;)).
(35) "Replacement" means the substitution of a device, component,
and/or subsystem in its entirety with a unit that is basically the same
as the original for the purpose of ensuring performance in accordance
with this chapter((;)).
(36) "Public agency" means a county, incorporated city or town,
municipal corporation, state agency, institution of higher education,
political subdivision, or other public agency and includes any
department, bureau, office, board, commission or institution of such
public entities((;)).
(37) "Platform" means a rigid surface that is maintained in a
horizontal position at all times when in use, and upon which passengers
stand or a load is carried.
(38) "Privately operated manlift" means a hand-powered
counterweighted manlift that is located on a farm that does not accept
commercial grain and that is used exclusively by the farm operator and
the farm operator's family members.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.87.120 and 2008 c 181 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall appoint and employ inspectors, as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, under the
provisions of the rules adopted by the Washington personnel resources
board in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall cause all conveyances to be inspected and tested at least once
each year. Inspectors have the right during reasonable hours to enter
into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of their
official duties, for the purpose of making any inspection or testing
any conveyance contained thereon or therein. Inspections and tests
shall conform with the rules adopted by the department. The department
shall inspect all installations before it issues any initial permit for
operation. Permits shall not be issued until the fees required by this
chapter have been paid.
(b)(i) Private residence conveyances operated exclusively for
single-family use and privately operated manlifts shall be inspected
and tested only when required under RCW 70.87.100 or as necessary for
the purposes of subsection (4) of this section and shall be exempt from
RCW 70.87.090 unless an annual inspection and operating permit are
requested by the owner.
(ii) The department may perform additional inspections of a private
residence conveyance or a privately operated manlift at the request of
the owner of the conveyance. Fees for these inspections shall be in
accordance with the schedule of fees adopted for operating permits
pursuant to RCW 70.87.030. An inspection requested under this
subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall not be performed until the required fees
have been paid.
(3) If inspection shows a conveyance to be in an unsafe condition,
the department shall issue an inspection report in writing requiring
the repairs or alterations to be made to the conveyance that are
necessary to render it safe and may also suspend or revoke a permit
pursuant to RCW 70.87.125 or order the operation of a conveyance
discontinued pursuant to RCW 70.87.145.
(a) A penalty may be assessed under RCW 70.87.185 for failure to
correct a violation within ninety days after the owner is notified in
writing of inspection results.
(b) The owner may be assessed a penalty under RCW 70.87.185 for
failure to submit official notification in writing to the department
that all corrections have been completed.
(4) The department may investigate accidents and alleged or
apparent violations of this chapter.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

--- END ---