BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
growing population and economy will put a strain on energy supplies and
threaten the ability of the state to meet its climate policy goals
unless specific steps are taken to reduce demand and utilize energy
more efficiently. Water heating for domestic and industrial use relies
almost entirely on electricity and natural gas and accounts for a
significant percentage of the state's electrical and natural gas
consumption. Solar water heating systems represent one of the largest
untapped electricity and natural gas conservation potential remaining
in Washington. The legislature finds that solar water heaters can
provide one-half or more of the hot water needs in the average home and
reduce electric or natural gas consumption with free renewable energy
from the sun.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to facilitate the
installation of solar water heating systems in homes and businesses.
Installing solar water heating systems will support energy
conservation, save thousands of dollars in home heating costs, and
preserve the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning August 1, 2009, a light and
power business or gas company may provide a rebate to its retail
customers for the costs incurred by the retail customers in installing
solar water heating systems in their home or business. The amount of
the rebate must not be more than seventy-five percent of the total
costs incurred by the customer for solar water heating systems
(2) In determining the amount of the rebate, a light and power
business or gas company must determine a tiered amount based on the
efficiency of the solar water heating system.
(3) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for rebates of more than five thousand dollars per
calendar year.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, a solar water heating system
must, at a minimum, have a solar rating and certification corporation
certification as of August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Each light and power business or gas company
may establish a grant program to assist its retail customers in
installing solar water heating systems in their home or business, to
the extent state or federal funds are appropriated specifically for
this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---