BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
protect employees who are acting in furtherance of public policy.
Current case law is in a state of disorder and a clear rule of law will
ensure equitable access within the courts. This act creates a cause of
action, separate from the common law tort of wrongful discharge,
protecting against employee termination for actions opposing employer
violations of public policy. The intended result is to encourage
employees to act to protect policy by removing the risk of employer
retaliation. Illustrative examples of activities that are protected by
this act include, but are not limited to, opposing unlawful action by
employers, attending jury duty, testifying in court, reporting crimes
to law enforcement or misconduct to regulatory agencies, voting,
claiming workers' compensation benefits, and opposing unsafe conditions
in the workplace.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.210 and 1992 c 118 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any employer, employment agency,
labor union, or other person to discharge, expel, or otherwise
discriminate against any person because he or she has opposed any
practices forbidden by this chapter, or because he or she has filed a
charge, testified, or assisted in any proceeding under this chapter, or
because he or she has engaged, or is believed to have engaged or will
engage, in activity protected by public policy. The availability of
any other right or remedy, or mechanism for protecting public policy,
does not affect the relief available under this section.
(2) It is an unfair practice for a government agency or government
manager or supervisor to retaliate against a whistleblower as defined
in chapter 42.40 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.040 and 2007 c 317 s 2 and 2007 c 187 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it
includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof.
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission.
(3) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an
employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons,
and does not include any religious or sectarian organization not
organized for private profit.
(4) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or
her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person.
(5) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for
the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning
grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual
aid or protection in connection with employment.
(6) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or
without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for
an employer.
(7) "Marital status" means the legal status of being married,
single, separated, divorced, or widowed.
(8) "National origin" includes "ancestry".
(9) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by,
any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to
accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts
directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed,
color, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, or with any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability, to be treated as not
welcome, accepted, desired, or solicited.
(10) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made
for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or
facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or
lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation
of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or
other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution.
(11) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings,
real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate
cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein.
(12) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal,
brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property,
transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the provision of
brokerage services.
(13) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof
that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a
residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered
for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure, or portion thereof.
(14) "Sex" means gender.
(15) "Sexual orientation" means heterosexuality, homosexuality,
bisexuality, and gender expression or identity. As used in this
definition, "gender expression or identity" means having or being
perceived as having a gender identity, self-image, appearance,
behavior, or expression, whether or not that gender identity, self-image, appearance, behavior, or expression is different from that
traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that person at birth.
(16) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have
been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b)
believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real
estate transaction that is about to occur.
(17) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real
estate transaction.
(18) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or
amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction.
(19) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred.
(20) "Families with children status" means one or more individuals
who have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a
parent or another person having legal custody of such individual or
individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other person having
such legal custody, with the written permission of such parent or other
person. Families with children status also applies to any person who
is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any
individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years.
(21) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or
more elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units.
(22) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts,
components, or elements of a building, including individual dwelling
units and the public and common use areas of a building.
(23) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of
assisting hearing impaired persons.
(24) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purpose of assisting or accommodating a sensory, mental, or physical
disability of a person with a disability.
(25)(a) "Disability" means the presence of a sensory, mental, or
physical impairment that:
(i) Is medically cognizable or diagnosable; or
(ii) Exists as a record or history; or
(iii) Is perceived to exist whether or not it exists in fact.
(b) A disability exists whether it is temporary or permanent,
common or uncommon, mitigated or unmitigated, or whether or not it
limits the ability to work generally or work at a particular job or
whether or not it limits any other activity within the scope of this
chapter.
(c) For purposes of this definition, "impairment" includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) Any physiological disorder, or condition, cosmetic
disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the
following body systems: Neurological, musculoskeletal, special sense
organs, respiratory, including speech organs, cardiovascular,
reproductive, digestive, genitor-urinary, hemic and lymphatic, skin,
and endocrine; or
(ii) Any mental, developmental, traumatic, or psychological
disorder, including but not limited to cognitive limitation, organic
brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning
disabilities.
(d) Only for the purposes of qualifying for reasonable
accommodation in employment, an impairment must be known or shown
through an interactive process to exist in fact and:
(i) The impairment must have a substantially limiting effect upon
the individual's ability to perform his or her job, the individual's
ability to apply or be considered for a job, or the individual's access
to equal benefits, privileges, or terms or conditions of employment; or
(ii) The employee must have put the employer on notice of the
existence of an impairment, and medical documentation must establish a
reasonable likelihood that engaging in job functions without an
accommodation would aggravate the impairment to the extent that it
would create a substantially limiting effect.
(e) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, a limitation is not
substantial if it has only a trivial effect.
(26) "Honorably discharged veteran or military status" means a
person who is:
(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.
(27)(a) "Activity protected by public policy" means:
(i) Engaging in conduct or communication, whether or not work
related, which the employee reasonably believed would further public
policy;
(ii) Refraining from engaging in conduct or communication, whether
or not work related, which the employee reasonably believed would
hinder public policy; or
(iii) Being regarded as having engaged in or intending to engage in
conduct or communication described in (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.
"Public policy" includes policies reflected in a Constitution,
statute, rule, ordinance, governmental code, executive order, judicial
decision, or standard of a licensed profession.
(b) "Activity protected by public policy" includes, but is not
limited to, the following:
(i) Reporting or opposing employer or employee behavior that
violates, or that the person reasonably believes violates, public
policy;
(ii) Performing a public duty or obligation;
(iii) Exercising a legal right or privilege; or
(iv) Acting to prevent danger to life or avoid serious injury or
illness.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.60.120 and 2007 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the functions, powers, and duties:
(1) To appoint an executive director and chief examiner, and such
investigators, examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as it
may deem necessary, fix their compensation within the limitations
provided by law, and prescribe their duties.
(2) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of all
governmental departments and agencies.
(3) To adopt, amend, and rescind suitable rules to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the
commission in connection therewith.
(4) To receive, impartially investigate, and pass upon complaints
alleging unfair practices as defined in this chapter, except that it
shall have no jurisdiction over allegations regarding activity
protected by public policy as defined in RCW 49.60.040.
(5) To issue such publications and results of investigations and
research as in its judgment will tend to promote good will and minimize
or eliminate discrimination because of sex, sexual orientation, race,
creed, color, national origin, marital status, age, honorably
discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability.
(6) To make such technical studies as are appropriate to effectuate
the purposes and policies of this chapter and to publish and distribute
the reports of such studies.
(7) To cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the
United States or other states, with other Washington state agencies,
commissions, and other government entities, and with political
subdivisions of the state of Washington and their respective human
rights agencies to carry out the purposes of this chapter. However,
the powers which may be exercised by the commission under this
subsection permit investigations and complaint dispositions only if the
investigations are designed to reveal, or the complaint deals only
with, allegations which, if proven, would constitute unfair practices
under this chapter. The commission may perform such services for these
agencies and be reimbursed therefor.
(8) To foster good relations between minority and majority
population groups of the state through seminars, conferences,
educational programs, and other intergroup relations activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is remedial in nature, is necessary
to resolve confusion in the law, and is effective as to claims filed on
or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---