BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.19.080 and 1996 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The basic child support obligation derived from the economic
table shall be allocated between the parents based on each parent's
share of the combined monthly net income.
(2) Ordinary health care expenses are included in the economic
table. Monthly health care expenses that exceed five percent of the
basic support obligation shall be considered extraordinary health care
expenses. Extraordinary health care expenses shall be shared by the
parents in the same proportion as the basic child support obligation.
(3) Day care and special child rearing expenses, such as tuition
and long-distance transportation costs to and from the parents for
visitation purposes, are not included in the economic table. These
expenses shall be shared by the parents in the same proportion as the
basic child support obligation. The parent incurring day care expenses
shall attempt to notify the obligor and the department, if the
department is enforcing the support obligation, of the day care
expenses incurred within three months of the date the obligee first
enrolls the child in a day care or within three months from the time
there has been a significant change in the amount of day care expenses
previously being paid or within three months of the day care expenses
being incurred if the day care expenses were not previously known to
the obligor. Notification may be by regular mail, in person, or any
other reasonable method. If an obligor pays court or administratively
ordered day care or special child rearing expenses that are not
actually incurred, the obligee must reimburse the obligor for the
overpayment if the overpayment amounts to at least twenty percent of
the obligor's annual day care or special child rearing expenses. The
obligor may institute an action in the superior court or file an
application for an adjudicative hearing with the department of social
and health services for reimbursement of day care and special child
rearing expense overpayments that amount to twenty percent or more of
the obligor's annual day care and special child rearing expenses. Any
ordered overpayment reimbursement shall be applied first as an offset
to child support arrearages of the obligor. If the obligor does not
have child support arrearages, the reimbursement may be in the form of
a direct reimbursement by the obligee or a credit against the obligor's
future support payments. If the reimbursement is in the form of a
credit against the obligor's future child support payments, the credit
shall be spread equally over a twelve-month period. Absent agreement
of the obligee, nothing in this section entitles an obligor to pay more
than his or her proportionate share of day care or other special child
rearing expenses in advance and then deduct the overpayment from future
support transfer payments.
(4) The court may exercise its discretion to determine the
necessity for and the reasonableness of all amounts ordered in excess
of the basic child support obligation.

--- END ---