BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.87A.010 and 2005 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
To aid general economic development and neighborhood
revitalization, and to facilitate the cooperation of merchants,
businesses, and residential property owners which assists trade,
economic viability, and liveability, the legislature hereby authorizes
all counties and all incorporated cities and towns, including
unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters:
(1) To establish((, after a petition submitted by the operators
responsible for sixty percent of the assessments by businesses and
multifamily residential or mixed-use projects within the area)) in
accordance with this chapter, parking and business improvement areas,
hereafter referred to as area or areas, for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking
facilities for the benefit of the area;
(b) Decoration of any public place in the area;
(c) Sponsorship or promotion of public events which are to take
place on or in public places in the area;
(d) Furnishing of music in any public place in the area;
(e) Providing professional management, planning, and promotion for
the area, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the area;
(f) Providing maintenance and security for common, public areas; or
(g) Providing transportation services for the benefit of the area.
(2) To levy special assessments on all businesses and multifamily
residential or mixed-use projects within the area and specially
benefited by a parking and business improvement area to pay in whole or
in part the damages or costs incurred therein as provided in this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.87A.030 and 1993 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of establishing a parking and business
improvement area, an initiation petition may be presented to the
legislative authority having jurisdiction of the area in which the
proposed parking and business improvement area is to be located or the
legislative authority may by resolution initiate a parking and business
improvement area. The initiation petition or resolution shall contain
the following:
(((1))) (a) A description of the boundaries of the proposed area;
(((2))) (b) The proposed uses and projects to which the proposed
special assessment revenues shall be put and the total estimated cost
thereof;
(((3))) (c) The estimated rate of levy of special assessment with
a proposed breakdown by class of business and multifamily residential
or mixed-use project if such classification is to be used.
((The)) (2) An initiating petition shall also contain the
signatures of the persons who operate businesses and residential
operators in the proposed area which would pay ((fifty)) at least sixty
percent of the proposed special assessments.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.87A.060 and 1993 c 429 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a hearing is held under this chapter, the legislative
authority shall hear all protests and receive evidence for or against
the proposed action. The legislative authority may continue the
hearing from time to time. Proceedings shall terminate if protest is
made by businesses and residential operators in the proposed area which
would pay ((a majority)) forty percent or more of the proposed special
assessments.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.87A.100 and 1993 c 429 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the legislative authority, following the hearing, decides to
establish the proposed area, it shall adopt an ordinance to that
effect. This ordinance shall contain the following information:
(1) The number, date and title of the resolution of intention
pursuant to which it was adopted;
(2) The time and place the hearing was held concerning the
formation of such area;
(3) The description of the boundaries of such area;
(4) A statement that the businesses and multifamily residential or
mixed-use projects in the area established by the ordinance shall be
subject to the provisions of the special assessments authorized by RCW
35.87A.010;
(5) The initial or additional rate or levy of special assessment to
be imposed with a breakdown by classification of business and
multifamily residential or mixed-use project, if such classification is
used; ((and))
(6) A statement that a parking and business improvement area has
been established((.)); and
(7) The uses to which the special assessment revenue shall be put.
Uses shall conform to the uses as declared in the initiation petition
presented pursuant to RCW 35.87A.030.

--- END ---