BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.46.130 and 2002 c 114 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Proceeds of the sale of bonds issued by the state for projects
constructed under this chapter must be deposited in the state treasury
to the credit of a special account designated for those purposes.
Those proceeds must be expended only for the purposes enumerated in
this chapter, for payment of the expense incurred in the issuance and
sale of any such bonds, and to repay the motor vehicle fund for any
sums advanced to pay the cost of surveys, location, design,
development, right-of-way, and other activities related to the
financing and construction of the bridge and its approaches. Capital
improvements or preservation may only be done with prior legislative
approval.

--- END ---