BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Following more than two years of study plus
extensive public input, and noting recent declines in ferry fleet size
and material readiness, the legislature finds that the current ferry
system is not fully meeting the service requirements of the communities
served by this network of "marine highways." The legislature also
notes that long-term resource requirements exceed current budget
projections. Accordingly, it is the explicit intent of the
legislature: To establish the levels of service that amply meet the
needs of the communities and statewide economy served by the ferry
system; to establish a framework for fleet and service modernization
that will support sustained ferry construction; to implement cost-saving efficiencies; and to upgrade organizational effectiveness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as
Washington's marine highway modernization act.

--- END ---