BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.195 and 2007 c 492 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any member of the teachers' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the
public employees' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement
system plans 2 or 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system
plans 1 or 2 who has previously established service credit in the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 may
make an irrevocable election to have such service transferred to their
current retirement system and plan subject to the following conditions:
(1) If the individual is employed by an employer in an eligible
position, as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be
filed in writing with the department no later than July 1, 1998. If
the individual is not employed by an employer in an eligible position,
as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be filed in
writing with the department no later than one year from the date they
are employed by an employer in an eligible position.
(2) An individual transferring service under this section forfeits
the rights to all benefits as a member of the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 and will be permanently
excluded from membership.
(3) Any individual choosing to transfer service under this section
will have transferred to their current retirement system and plan: (a)
All the individual's accumulated contributions; (b) an amount
sufficient to ensure that the employer contribution rate in the
individual's current system and plan will not increase due to the
transfer; and (c) all applicable months of service, as defined in RCW
41.26.030(14)(a).
(4) If an individual has withdrawn contributions from the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, the
individual may restore the contributions, together with interest as
determined by the director, and recover the service represented by the
contributions for the sole purpose of transferring service under this
section. The contributions must be restored before the transfer can
occur and the restoration must be completed within the time limitations
specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) ((Any service transferred under this section does not apply to
the eligibility requirements)) Service transferred under this section
is applicable for meeting the total service required for military
service credit as defined in RCW 41.40.170(3) ((or)) but is not
applicable for meeting the total service credit required for military
service credit under RCW 43.43.260(3). This subsection applies to
members who retired on or after January 1, 1998.
(6) If an individual does not meet the time limitations of
subsection (1) of this section, the individual may elect to restore any
withdrawn contributions and transfer service under this section by
paying the amount required under subsection (3)(b) of this section less
any employee contributions transferred.

--- END ---