BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of social and health services has grown significantly to now
encompass thirty percent of the near general fund-state operating
budget and thirty-four percent of the total operating budget. The
agency has become so large that it: (a) Is difficult to administer;
(b) does not have enough focus on critical functions such as protecting
children and other vulnerable persons; (c) does not effectively deliver
the extensive number of services and programs it is responsible for;
(d) leads to higher state costs through the inefficiencies due to the
size of the agency; and (e) is difficult to measure the performance of
the agency in meeting its goals and responsibilities. The legislature
finds that these problems are most visible in the delivery of
children's services, a functional area that the legislature continues
to address in a series of reform directives, including the
implementation of performance-based contracts and redesign the delivery
of child welfare services as a result of legislation passed in 2009.
The legislature also notes that the experience of best and promising
practices strongly points to the importance of delivering social
services on an integrated, coordinated basis and that modern
information technologies and organizational strategies suggest that
smaller functional units can perform better than large traditional
hierarchical organizations.
(2) Therefore the legislature finds that the state's overall
delivery of health and human services through the department of social
and health services and allied agencies must be substantially and
rapidly improved in several fundamental ways: (a) In order to respond
to the current severe recession and the prospect of many years of tight
revenue constraints, the cost-effectiveness of agency operations must
be immediately increased within a smaller, tightly controlled budget
cap; (b) to organize the delivery of department services around an
integrated services model which draws in all relevant agencies and
organizations including those in other agencies and at the local
service delivery level; and (c) to achieve cost control measures that
will reduce the cost of services to the state.

PART I
RESTRUCTURING OF THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1)(a) The department of social and health
services is restructured and, except as otherwise provided in this
section, its powers, duties, and functions are transferred to the
appropriate department as divided by the transition team established
under section 604 of this act. All references to the secretary or the
department of social and health services in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director of the appropriate
department, or the appropriate department, created under this act.
(b) All administrative functions relating to human resources, legal
services, information technology, procurement, accounting, auditing,
and any other administrative functions identified by the transition
team, shall be retained by the department of social and health services
to be performed for the department of economic services, the department
of medical assistance, the department of health and rehabilitative
services, and the department of children's services.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to functions transferred under
this section shall be delivered to the custody of the transition team
created under section 604 of this act to be transferred to the
appropriate department created under this act. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of social and health services in
carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be
made available to the transition team to be transferred to the
appropriate department. All funds, credits, or other assets held by
the department of social and health services in connection with the
powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the
appropriate department by the transition team.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services in connection with the powers, duties, and functions
transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the appropriate department by the
transition team.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the transition team established
under section 604 of this act to be transferred to the appropriate
department. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to their respective departments
to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without
any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and
functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
appropriate department created under this act. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the appropriate department.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

PART II
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of economic services. The
department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter, section 604 of this act, and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of economic services.
(2) "Director" means the director of economic services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in section 101 of this act, to
place the internal affairs of the department under the control of the
director in order that the director may institute therein the flexible,
alert, and intelligent management of its business that changing
contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the director's
authority is not specifically limited by law, the director has complete
charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may
create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may
employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of economic services
to the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy
director, all division directors and assistant directors, and one
confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART III
DEPARTMENT OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of medical assistance. The
department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter, section 604 of this act, and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of medical assistance.
(2) "Director" means the director of medical assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in section 101 of this act, to
place the internal affairs of the department under the control of the
director in order that the director may institute therein the flexible,
alert, and intelligent management of its business that changing
contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the director's
authority is not specifically limited by law, the director has complete
charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may
create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may
employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of medical assistance
to the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy
director, all division directors and assistant directors, and one
confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND REHABILITATIVE SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of health and rehabilitative
services. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter, section 604 of this act, and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health and rehabilitative
services.
(2) "Director" means the director of health and rehabilitative
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in section 101 of this act, to
place the internal affairs of the department under the control of the
director in order that the director may institute therein the flexible,
alert, and intelligent management of its business that changing
contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the director's
authority is not specifically limited by law, the director has complete
charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may
create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may
employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of health and
rehabilitative services to the director, the director's personal
secretary, the deputy director, all division directors and assistant
directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART V
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN'S SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of children's services. The
department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter, section 604 of this act, and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of children's services.
(2) "Director" means the director of children's services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in section 101 of this act, to
place the internal affairs of the department under the control of the
director in order that the director may institute therein the flexible,
alert, and intelligent management of its business that changing
contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the director's
authority is not specifically limited by law, the director has complete
charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may
create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may
employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of children's
services to the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy
director, all division directors and assistant directors, and one
confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 601 RCW 43.17.010 and 2009 c 565 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
commerce, (10) the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department
of revenue, (12) the department of retirement systems, (13) the
department of corrections, (14) the department of health, (15) the
department of financial institutions, (16) the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the department of early
learning, ((and)) (18) the Puget Sound partnership, (19) the department
of economic services, (20) the department of medical assistance, (21)
the department of health and rehabilitative services, and (22) the
department of children's services, which shall be charged with the
execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested
with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 602 RCW 43.17.020 and 2009 c 565 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of commerce, (10)
the director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12)
the director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections,
(14) the secretary of health, (15) the director of financial
institutions, (16) the director of the department of archaeology and
historic preservation, (17) the director of early learning, ((and))
(18) the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, (19) the
department of economic services, (20) the department of medical
assistance, (21) the department of health and rehabilitative services,
and (22) the department of children's services.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 603 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of the department
of information services, the executive director of the state investment
board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing,
the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound
partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, ((and)) each district and
each campus president of each state community college, the director of
economic services, the director of medical assistance, the director of
health and rehabilitative services, and the director of children's
services;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 (1) A realignment team shall be formed by
July 1, 2010, to direct the details of administration of this act. The
governor shall appoint representatives from the office of financial
management, the divisions of the department of social and health
services, and other agency representatives as warranted. Leadership
from each of the two major caucuses in the house of representatives and
the senate shall appoint a member to the realignment team.
(2) The realignment team shall divide the functions of the
department of social and health services that are being transferred
into the new departments under this act after the effective date of
this section.
(3) The realignment team shall fully involve the office of the
state auditor and relevant stakeholders, including local government and
community service providers. The realignment team shall consult
regularly with the chairs and ranking minority members and their
designees of the relevant policy and fiscal committees in the house of
representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 (1) The realignment team created in
section 604 of this act shall, by December 1, 2010, submit a plan and
necessary implementing legislation to the legislature for the
restructuring of the department of social and health services. During
the development of the plan, consideration shall be given to the
restructuring of the state's medical assistance programs pursuant to
chapter . . . (House Bill No. 3048), Laws of 2010. The plan shall be
designed so that the department of children's services will be
operating by July 1, 2011, and the department of economic services, the
department of medical assistance, and the department of health and
rehabilitative services will be operating by July 1, 2012.
(2) The plan shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements:
(a) Strategies for dividing the functions and responsibilities of
the department into the appropriate new agencies including a strategic
plan for each new agency created in this act that includes
implementation steps, performance measures, evaluation measures, and
methods for collaboration among programs;
(b) Recommendations for changes in existing programs and functions
of the department of social and health services; and
(c) Implementation steps necessary to bring about operation of the
new agencies.
(3) By December 1, 2011, the code reviser's office shall prepare
recommended corrective legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 Sections 201 through 207 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 Sections 301 through 307 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 Sections 401 through 407 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 Sections 501 through 507 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 Section 604 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 Sections 101, 201 through 208, 301 through
308, 401 through 408, 501 through 508, and 601 through 603 of this act
take effect July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---