BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.87.023 and 1994 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Rental car businesses must register with the department of
licensing. This registration must be renewed annually by the rental
car business.
(2) Rental cars must be titled and registered under the provisions
of chapters 46.12 and 46.16 RCW. The vehicle must be identified at the
time of application with the rental car company business number issued
by the department.
(3) Use of rental cars is restricted to the rental customer unless
otherwise provided by rule.
(4) The department may suspend or cancel the exemptions, benefits,
or privileges granted under this section to a rental car business that
violates the laws of this state relating to the operation or
registration of vehicles or rules lawfully adopted thereunder. The
department may initiate and conduct audits, investigations, and
enforcement actions as may be reasonably necessary for administering
this section.
(5) Rental car businesses must at all times have a sufficient
number of child restraint systems, as defined in RCW 46.61.687,
available to meet the reasonably expected demand by rental car
customers. The requirement for the availability of a sufficient number
of child restraint systems may be met through contractual agreements
between rental car businesses regarding the shared use of child
restraint systems, so long as the child restraint systems are provided
to rental car customers in a timely manner. If a child restraint
system has been reserved and is not available in a timely manner, as
determined by the rental car customer, but in no case less than one
hour after the arrival of the customer at the location where the
customer receives the vehicle or vehicles, (a) the customer may cancel
any reservation or other agreement for the rental of the vehicle or
vehicles, (b) any costs or penalties associated with the cancellation
are void, and (c) the customer is entitled to a full refund of any
costs associated with the rental of the vehicle or vehicles.
(6) The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
administer and enforce the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---