BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that restoration of
degraded shoreline conditions is important to the ecological function
of our waters. However, restoration projects that shift the location
of the shoreline can inadvertently create hardships for property
owners, particularly in urban areas. Hardship may occur when a
shoreline restoration project shifts shoreline management act
regulations into areas that had not previously been regulated under the
act or shifts the location of required shoreline buffers. The
legislature intends to provide relief to property owners in such cases,
while protecting the viability of shoreline restoration projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The local government may grant relief from shoreline master
program development standards and use regulations within urban growth
areas when the following apply:
(a) A shoreline restoration project causes or would cause a
landward shift in the ordinary high water mark, resulting in the
following:
(i) Land that had not been regulated under this chapter prior to
construction of the restoration project is brought under shoreline
jurisdiction; or
(ii) Additional regulatory requirements apply due to a landward
shift in required shoreline buffers or other regulations of the
applicable shoreline master program; and
(iii) Application of shoreline master program regulations would
preclude or interfere with use of the property permitted by local
development regulations, thus presenting a hardship to the project
proponent;
(b) The proposed relief meets the following criteria:
(i) The proposed relief is the minimum necessary to relieve the
hardship;
(ii) After granting the proposed relief, there is net environmental
benefit from the restoration project;
(iii) Granting the proposed relief is consistent with the
objectives of the shoreline restoration project and consistent with the
shoreline master program; and
(iv) Where a shoreline restoration project is created as mitigation
to obtain a development permit, the project proponent required to
perform the mitigation is not eligible for relief under this section;
and
(c) The application for relief must be submitted to the department
for written approval or disapproval. This review must occur during the
department's normal review of a shoreline substantial development
permit, conditional use permit, or variance. If no such permit is
required, then the department shall conduct its review when the local
government provides a copy of a complete application and all supporting
information necessary to conduct the review.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the department shall provide at least twenty-days notice to parties
that have indicated interest to the department in reviewing
applications for relief under this section, and post the notice on
their web site.
(ii) The department shall act within thirty calendar days of close
of the public notice period, or within thirty days of receipt of the
proposal from the local government if additional public notice is not
required.
(2) The public notice requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this
section do not apply if the relevant shoreline restoration project was
included in a shoreline master program or shoreline restoration plan as
defined in WAC 173-26-201, as follows:
(a) The restoration plan has been approved by the department under
applicable shoreline master program guidelines;
(b) The shoreline restoration project is specifically identified in
the shoreline master program or restoration plan or is located along a
shoreline reach identified in the shoreline master program or
restoration plan as appropriate for granting relief from shoreline
regulations; and
(c) The shoreline master program or restoration plan includes
policies addressing the nature of the relief and why, when, and how it
would be applied.
(3) A substantial development permit is not required on land within
urban growth areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 that is brought under
shoreline jurisdiction due to a shoreline restoration project creating
a landward shift in the ordinary high water mark.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Shoreline restoration project" means a project designed to
restore impaired ecological function of a shoreline.
(b) "Urban growth areas" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
36.70A.030.

--- END ---