BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of agriculture shall
adopt and maintain rules identifying the minimum proper veterinarian
care standard for a dog under twelve months of age necessary to
maximize the health of a dog under twelve months of age or minimize the
spread of diseases.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must identify:
(a) The proper vaccinations that a dog under twelve months of age
should receive;
(b) The approved process and schedule for treating a dog under
twelve months of age for worms and other parasites; and
(c) A timeline for separating a dog under twelve months of age from
its mother or litter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, any person either selling a dog under twelve months of age in
the state of Washington or selling a dog under twelve months of age
that is destined for delivery into the state of Washington must first
fully comply with the minimum proper veterinarian care standard for a
dog under twelve months of age developed by the department of
agriculture under section 1 of this act.
(2) This section applies to the person conducting the initial sale
of an individual dog under twelve months of age. However, subsequent
sellers of the individual dog under twelve months of age must provide
information as to whom provided the minimum proper veterinarian care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act does not apply to:
(1) A dog with documentation that readily indicates that the dog is
over twelve months of age at the time of sale;
(2) A dog species other than the common domesticated dog (Canis
familiaris);
(3) A dog that is not sold for money or exchanged for a good or
service; or
(4) A dog sold in accordance with section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The initial buyer of an individual dog
under twelve months of age may agree with the seller to waive the
requirements of section 2 of this act. However, to avoid liability
under this chapter, the seller must be able to demonstrate that the
buyer signed a document outlining:
(a) The responsibilities of the seller that are being waived;
(b) The minimum proper veterinarian care standards that have not
been adequately provided to the dog; and
(c) The buyer's responsibilities should the dog be resold.
(2) A buyer of a dog waiving the responsibilities of a seller under
this section that wishes to resell the dog must provide documentation
to a prospective subsequent buyer as to which responsibilities were
waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A violation of section 2 of this act is a
class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and may be enforced by:
(1) Any general authority Washington peace officer, as defined in
RCW 10.93.020; or
(2) Representatives of the department of agriculture, authorized by
the director of the department of agriculture to enforce section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of agriculture shall
provide information on their official internet web site relating to the
requirements of section 2 of this act, including a mechanism for the
reporting of sellers suspected of violating section 2 of this act.
(2) If the department of agriculture determines that any suspected
violations of section 2 of this act reported to the department may be
legitimate, it shall initiate an investigation of the report or provide
the pertinent information to the appropriate local general authority
law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter limits prosecution
for the violation of any other criminal statute, enforcement of any
other law, or the liability of the seller in related civil proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Initial rulemaking under section 1 of this
act must be completed by January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 7 of this act take effect
January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Sections 1 through 8 of this act are
each added to chapter 16.08 RCW and codified with the subchapter
heading of "minimum veterinarian care."
(2) The code reviser is directed to add a subchapter heading to
chapter 16.08 RCW entitled "dangerous dogs." RCW 16.08.010 through
16.08.100 must be included in the subchapter entitled "dangerous dogs."

--- END ---