BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) If an employer receives any proceeds
from sales of items in a vending machine used primarily by that
employer's employees, then the employer or the vending machine operator
must post a clear and conspicuous statement indicating the amount or
percentage of receipts paid to the employer.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Employer" means any person, association, partnership, or
private or public corporation, or their agents, who employ or exercise
control over wages, hours, or working conditions of one or more
employees.
(b) "Vending machine" means any coin-operated machine that sells or
provides food, tobacco, sundries, or other retail merchandise or
service.
(c) "Vending machine operator" means any person who owns, operates,
or maintains one or more vending machines in, at, or upon premises
owned or occupied by any other person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---