BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.29.021 and 2008 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010, 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of
the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050(2)(((b)(i))) (a), as applicable, and became
unemployed after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work;
or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050(2)(((b) (v))) (e) through (((x))) (j).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.030,
and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Benefits paid to an individual who qualifies for benefits under
RCW 50.20.050(2)(((b) (iv))) (d) or (((xi))) (k), as applicable, shall
not be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution
paying employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer. This subsection (3)(f)
does not apply to the calculation of contribution rates under RCW
50.29.025 for rate year 2010 and thereafter.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
or
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.06 RCW.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.29.025 and 2007 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be determined under this subsection.
(a) A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the
balance in the unemployment compensation fund as of the September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by
all employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year
preceding the rate year and reported to the department by the following
March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place
with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance
ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.
(b) The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a
percentage, shall determine which tax schedule in (e) of this
subsection shall be in effect for assigning tax rates for the rate
year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule shall
be:

Interval of the
Fund Balance Ratio
Expressed as a Percentage
Effective
Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00 to 1.39 D

0.70 to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(c) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (i) Identification number; (ii) benefit ratio;
(iii) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters immediately
preceding the computation date and reported to the department by the
cut-off date; (iv) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of
the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other
employers preceding him or her in the array; and (v) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.
(d) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty
rate classes according to the percentage intervals of cumulative
taxable payrolls set forth in (e) of this subsection: PROVIDED, That
if an employer's taxable payroll falls within two or more rate classes,
the employer and any other employer with the same benefit ratio shall
be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any portion of the
employer's taxable payroll.
(e) Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for
each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following
tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as
determined under (d) of this subsection, within the tax schedule which
is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of
Cumulative
Taxable Payrolls
Schedules of Contributions Rates
for Effective Tax Schedule

From
To
Rate
Class
AA
A
B
C
D
E
F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(f) The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in
the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class
20 for the applicable rate year, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a
contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 20 for the
applicable rate year; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than
one percent.
(2) Beginning with)) For contributions assessed for rate years 2005
through 2009, the contribution rate for each employer subject to
contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate
determined under this subsection, and the solvency surcharge determined
under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection,
the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for a rate
year by dividing the total social cost by the total taxable payroll.
The division shall be carried to the second decimal place with the
remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five hundredths or
more, in which case the second decimal place shall be rounded to the
next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be expressed as
a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (((2))) (1)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a
flat social cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the
calculation under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (((2))) (1)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except
that if the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined
by the commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least twelve months but less than fourteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent;
or
(II) At least fourteen months of unemployment benefits, the minimum
shall be five-tenths of one percent, except that, for employers in rate
class 1, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of one percent.
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an employer's array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate may
not exceed six and five-tenths percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed six
percent through rate year 2007 and may not exceed five and seven-tenths
percent for rate years 2008 and ((thereafter)) 2009:
(I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through
December 31, 2007, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114,"
"3117," "42448," or "49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is
zero.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat
social cost factor for rate year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate
the total social cost using the array calculation factor contributions
that would have been required to be paid by all employers in the
calculation period if (a) of this subsection had been in effect for the
relevant period.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) For rate years 2005, 2006, and 2007:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40; and
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount, but not more than
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) ((Beginning with)) For contributions assessed for rate years
2008 and 2009:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(C) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(I) .95 90

(II) .95 1.05 100

(III) 1.05 115

(2) For contributions assessed in rate year 2010 and thereafter,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and
the graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection,
and the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.11

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.22

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.33

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.43

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.54

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.65

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.76

0.008750 0.010000 9 0.88

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.01

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.14

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.28

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.41

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.54

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.67

0.017500 0.018750 16 1.80

0.018750 0.020000 17 1.94

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.07

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.20

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.38

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.50

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.63

0.026250 0.027500 23 2.75

0.027500 0.028750 24 2.88

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.00

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.13

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.25

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.38

0.033750 0.035000 29 3.50

0.035000 0.036250 30 3.63

0.036250 0.037500 31 3.75

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.00

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.25

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.50

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.75

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.00

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.15

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.25

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.30

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection,
the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for a rate
year by dividing the total social cost by the total taxable payroll.
The division shall be carried to the second decimal place with the
remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five hundredths or
more, in which case the second decimal place shall be rounded to the
next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be expressed as
a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least ten months but less than eleven months of unemployment
benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent; or
(II) At least eleven months but less than twelve months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(III) At least twelve months but less than thirteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be four-tenths of one percent;
or
(IV) At least thirteen months but less than fifteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be thirty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(V) At least fifteen months but less than seventeen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be twenty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(VI) At least seventeen months but less than eighteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be fifteen hundredths of one
percent; or
(VII) At least eighteen months of unemployment benefits, the
minimum shall be fifteen hundredths of one percent through rate year
2011 and shall be zero thereafter.
(ii) The graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the
array is the flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage
specified as follows for the rate class to which the employer has been
assigned in (a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an
employer's array calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost
factor rate may not exceed six percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed five
and four-tenths percent:
(A) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(B) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(C) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(D) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(E) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(F) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(G) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(H) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(I) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(J) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(K) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(L) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(iii) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(A) .95 90

(B) .95 1.05 100

(C) 1.05 115

(3) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found ((in the "Standard
Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or)) in the North American industry
classification system code.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.20.050 and 2008 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2))) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or
after January 4, 2004:
(((a))) (1) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits
beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she
has left work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in
employment covered by this title and earned wages in that employment
equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(((i))) (a) The duration of the work;
(((ii))) (b) The extent of direction and control by the employer
over the work; and
(((iii))) (c) The level of skill required for the work in light of
the individual's training and experience.
(((b))) (2) An individual has good cause and is not disqualified
from benefits under (((a))) subsection (1) of this ((subsection when))
section only under the following circumstances:
(((i))) (a) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of
bona fide work as described in (((a))) subsection (1) of this
((subsection)) section;
(((ii))) (b) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(((A))) (i) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to
preserve his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence,
by having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(((B))) (ii) The claimant terminated his or her employment status,
and is not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a
comparable or similar position;
(((iii)(A))) (c)(i) With respect to claims that have an effective
date before July 2, 2006, he or she: (((I))) (A) Left work to relocate
for the spouse's employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer:
(((1))) (I) Is outside the existing labor market area; and (((2))) (II)
is in Washington or another state that, pursuant to statute, does not
consider such an individual to have left work voluntarily without good
cause; and (((II))) (B) remained employed as long as was reasonable
prior to the move;
(((B))) (ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on
or after July 2, 2006, he or she: (((I))) (A) Left work to relocate
for the spouse's employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer,
is outside the existing labor market area; and (((II))) (B) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(((iv))) (iii) With respect to claims that have an effective date
on or after the effective date of this act, he or she left work to
relocate for the employment of a spouse or domestic partner that is
outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(d) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(((v))) (e) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by
twenty-five percent or more;
(((vi))) (f) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five percent or more;
(((vii))) (g) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused
a material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(((viii))) (h) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(((ix))) (i) The individual left work because of illegal activities
in the individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities
to the employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within
a reasonable period of time;
(((x))) (j) The individual's usual work was changed to work that
violates the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral
beliefs; or
(((xi))) (k) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship
program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training
council. Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to
the week in which the individual begins active participation in the
apprenticeship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to claims with an effective
date on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---