BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2008 c 94 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title. The board may waive the
requirement for the written agreement of exclusivity in situations
consistent with the normal marketing practices of certain products,
such as classified growths.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(7) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(8) "Board members" means the three appointed members of the liquor
control board.
(9) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(((9))) (10) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or
other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate,
fruits, nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars,
drops, or pieces.
(((10))) (11) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use,
whether by drinking or otherwise.
(((11))) (12) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells
liquor on behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor
store manager.
(((12))) (13) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the
reduced licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(((13))) (14) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((14))) (15) "Director" means the director of the liquor control
board established under this title.
(16) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((15))) (17) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((16))) (18) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((17))) (19) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((18))) (20) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((19))) (21) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(((20))) (22) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((21))) (23) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((22))) (24) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds,
having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are
kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a
place where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for
pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(((23))) (25) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((24))) (26) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((25))) (27) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((26))) (28) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((27))) (29) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((28))) (30) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((29))) (31) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((30))) (32) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((31))) (33) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((32))) (34) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((33))) (35) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((34))) (36) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((35))) (37) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((36))) (38) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((37))) (39) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((38))) (40) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((39))) (41) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((40))) (42) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((41))) (43) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((42))) (44) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(((43))) (45)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((44))) (46) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((45))) (47) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.012 and 1961 c 307 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a board, known as the "Washington state liquor
control board," consisting of three members, to be appointed by the
governor, with the consent of the senate((, who shall each be paid an
annual salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 43.03.040)). The governor may, in his or her
discretion, appoint one of the members as chair((man)) of the board,
and a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the board.
(2) Board members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250 and in addition shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
incurred while engaged in the business of the board as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.014 and 1986 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The members of the board to be appointed after December 2,
1948 shall be appointed for terms beginning January 15, 1949, and
expiring as follows: One member of the board for a term of three years
from January 15, 1949; one member of the board for a term of six years
from January 15, 1949; and one member of the board for a term of nine
years from January 15, 1949. Each of the members of the board
appointed hereunder shall hold office until his successor is appointed
and qualified. After June 11, 1986, the term that began on January 15,
1985, will end on January 15, 1989, the term beginning on January 15,
1988, will end on January 15, 1993, and the term beginning on January
15, 1991, will end on January 15, 1997. Thereafter, upon the
expiration of the term of any member appointed after June 11, 1986,
each succeeding)) Each member of the board shall be appointed ((and
hold office)) for the term of six years. In case of a vacancy, it
shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired
portion of the term in which ((said)) the vacancy occurs. No vacancy
in the membership of the board shall impair the right of the remaining
member or members to act, except as ((herein otherwise)) provided in
this section.
(2) The principal office of the board shall be at the state
capitol, and it may establish such other offices as it may deem
necessary. Meetings of the board members shall be held at least
monthly and at such other times as may be called by the chair or upon
written request to the chair of a majority of the board members.
(3) Any member of the board may be removed for inefficiency,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges
filed by the governor, who shall transmit such written charges to the
member accused and to the chief justice of the supreme court. The
chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three
judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such
tribunal shall fix the time of the hearing, which shall be public, and
the procedure for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall
be final and not subject to review by the supreme court. Removal of
any member of the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member
for reappointment.
(4) ((Each member of the board shall devote his entire time to the
duties of his office and no member of the board shall hold any other
public office.)) Before entering upon the duties of ((his)) office,
each of ((said)) the members of the board shall enter into a surety
bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state, payable to the state of Washington, to be approved by the
governor in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars conditioned upon
the faithful performance of his or her duties, and shall take and
subscribe to the oath of office prescribed for elective state officers,
which oath and bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. The
premium for ((said)) the bond shall be paid by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.020 (Liquor control board to
administer) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
There is created the office of director of the liquor control
board. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor and shall receive such salary as is determined by the
governor, but in no case may the director's salary be more than ninety
percent of the salary of the governor. The director shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the operation of the liquor control
board in accordance with the provisions of this title;
(2) Appoint a deputy and assistant directors as may be required to
carry out the functions and duties of the office. As provided in RCW
41.06.070, the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, does not
apply to assistant directors;
(3) Appoint other employees as may be necessary to perform the
duties imposed by this title and the functions and duties of the office
of director. Except as otherwise provided by subsection (2) of this
section or as specified elsewhere, the state civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW, applies to employees appointed by the director;
(4) Purchase, lease, contract, or otherwise acquire any goods,
services, and products;
(5) Approve liquor purchase orders authorized by the board;
(6) Approve licenses and permits, and enforce this title and the
board's rules relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution, and sale of liquor;
(7) Assign duties, coordinate agency operations, and establish
performance standards and timelines;
(8) Authorize expenditures of funds and approve disbursements of
excess funds from the liquor revolving fund;
(9) Confer regularly as necessary or desirable with the board
members on the operation and administration of the state liquor stores;
make available for inspection by the board, upon request, all books,
records, files, and other information and documents of the board; and
advise the board members and recommend those matters as the director
deems necessary and advisable to improve the operation and
administration of the board; and
(10) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter or as delegated by the
board.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.08.022 and 1961 ex.s. c 6 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall be the general counsel of the liquor
control board and ((he shall institute and prosecute)) shall assign
such assistants as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions and
purposes of this title, which shall include the prosecution of all
actions and proceedings which may be necessary in the enforcement and
carrying out of the provisions of this chapter and this title ((66
RCW)).
((He shall assign such assistants as may be necessary to the
exclusive duty of assisting the liquor control board in the enforcement
of Title 66 RCW.))

Sec. 7 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((board)) director, subject to board members' oversight and
subject to the provisions of this title and the rules of the board,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, contract liquor stores. In addition,
the board may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also
manufactures liquor products other than wine under a license under this
title, as a contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor
products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
contract liquor stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the
guidelines provided by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor
stores shall be subject to such additional rules and regulations
consistent with this title as the board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be
subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED, That the board shall
have no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on
licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being
provoked by such language.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.08.0501 and 1997 c 321 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
The liquor control board may adopt appropriate rules pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
((chapter 321, Laws of 1997)) this title. Final approval of all rules
is vested in the board members.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.08.150 and 2007 c 370 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The action, order, or decision of the board as to any denial of an
application for the reissuance of a permit or license or as to any
revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit or license shall
be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions
of chapter 34.05 RCW and this title.
(1) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for
the reissuance of a permit or license prior to the disposition of the
application, and if no such opportunity for a prior hearing is provided
then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be
provided the applicant.
(2) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee or
licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any permit or license
and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the
suspension of any permit or license.
(3) No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant,
permittee, or licensee.
(4) The board may summarily suspend a license or permit for a
period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing if it
finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require
emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its
order. Proceedings for revocation or other action must be promptly
instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the
summary suspension period for up to one calendar year in the event the
proceedings for revocation or other action cannot be completed during
the initial one hundred eighty day period due to actions by the
licensee or permittee. The board's enforcement division shall complete
a preliminary staff investigation of the violation before requesting an
emergency suspension by the board.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.08.166 and 2005 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((By September 1, 2005, the)) The board shall expand operations in
at least twenty state-operated retail stores to include Sundays. The
board shall select the stores that are expected to gross the most
revenues on Sunday by considering factors including, but not limited
to, population density, proximity to shopping centers, and proximity to
other businesses that are open on Sunday. The selected stores shall be
open for retail business a minimum of five hours on Sunday. In
implementing this program, if the board determines it would be
beneficial to retain a consultant to assist the board in determining
appropriate stores for the program and monitoring the results of the
program, the agency is authorized to do so. The board shall track
gross sales and expenses of the selected stores and compare them to
previous years' sales and projected sales and expenses before opening
on Sunday. The board shall also examine the sales of state and
contract liquor stores in proximity to those stores opened on Sundays
to determine whether Sunday openings ((has [have])) have reduced the
sales of other state and contract liquor stores that are not open on
Sundays. ((The board shall present this information to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by January 31, 2007.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---