BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.48.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 111 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a separate fund in the custody of
the state treasurer to be known as the OASI revolving fund. The fund
shall consist of all moneys designated for deposit in the fund. The
OASI revolving fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of this
section, including the costs of program administration. Withdrawals
from the fund ((shall)) may be made for the payment of amounts the
state may be obligated to pay or forfeit by reason of any failure of
any public agency to pay assessments on contributions or interest
assessments required under the federal-state agreement under this
chapter or federal regulations.
(2) All costs allocable to the administration of this chapter shall
be charged to and paid to the OASI revolving fund by the participating
divisions and instrumentalities of the state pro rata according to
their respective contributions.
(3) The treasurer of the state shall be ex officio treasurer and
custodian of the fund and shall administer the fund in accordance with
this chapter and the directions of the governor and shall pay all
amounts drawn upon it in accordance with this section and with the
regulations the governor may prescribe under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.48.080 and 1951 c 184 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
All costs allocable to the administration of this chapter shall be
charged to and paid to the ((general)) OASI revolving fund by the
participating divisions and instrumentalities of the state pro rata
according to their respective contributions.

--- END ---