BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06B.040 and 2006 c 116 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The education ombudsman shall treat all matters associated with the
conflict resolution process, including the identities of students,
complainants, and other individuals from whom information is acquired,
as confidential, except as necessary to enable the education ombudsman
to perform the duties of the office. Upon receipt of information that
by law is confidential or privileged, the ombudsman shall maintain the
confidentiality of such information and shall not further disclose or
disseminate the information except as provided by applicable state or
federal law.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.320 and 2005 c 274 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following ((educational)) information relating to education is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW;
(2) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units;
(3) Individually identifiable information received by the workforce
training and education coordinating board for research or evaluation
purposes; ((and))
(4) Except for public records as defined in RCW ((40.14.040))
40.14.010, any records or documents obtained by a state college,
university, library, or archive through or concerning any gift, grant,
conveyance, bequest, or devise, the terms of which restrict or regulate
public access to those records or documents; and
(5) All matters in the office of the education ombudsman associated
with the conflict resolution process, including the identities of
students, complainants, and other individuals from whom information is
acquired.

--- END ---