BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.93.170 and 2003 c 354 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement, a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative,
or an agent, officer, parent company, wholly or partially owned
subsidiary, affiliated entity, or other person controlled by or under
common control with a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, shall not:
(a) Discriminate between dealers by selling or offering to sell a
like motorsports vehicle to one dealer at a lower actual price than the
actual price offered to another dealer for the same model similarly
equipped;
(b) Discriminate between dealers by selling or offering to sell
parts or accessories to one dealer at a lower actual price than the
actual price offered to another dealer;
(c) Discriminate between dealers by using a promotion plan,
marketing plan, or other similar device that results in a lower actual
price on vehicles, parts, or accessories being charged to one dealer
over another dealer;
(d) Discriminate between dealers by adopting a method, or changing
an existing method, for the allocation, scheduling, or delivery of new
motorsports vehicles, parts, or accessories to its dealers that is not
fair, reasonable, and equitable. Upon the request of a dealer, a
manufacturer shall disclose in writing to the dealer the method by
which new motorsports vehicles, parts, and accessories are allocated,
scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the same line or make
of vehicles;
(e) Give preferential treatment to some dealers over others by
refusing or failing to deliver, in reasonable quantities and within a
reasonable time after receipt of an order, to a dealer holding a
franchise for a line or make of motorsports vehicles sold or
distributed by the manufacturer, a new vehicle, parts, or accessories,
if the vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to other
dealers, or require a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising
displays or other materials, or unreasonably require a dealer to
remodel or renovate existing facilities as a prerequisite to receiving
a model or series of vehicles;
(f) Compete with a dealer by acting in the capacity of a dealer, or
by owning, operating, or controlling, whether directly or indirectly,
a dealership in this state. It is not, however, a violation of this
subsection for:
(i) A manufacturer to own or operate a dealership for a temporary
period, not to exceed two years, during the transition from one owner
of the dealership to another where the dealership was previously owned
by a franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any qualified
independent person at a fair and reasonable price. The temporary
operation may be extended for one twelve-month period on petition of
the temporary operator to the department. The matter will be handled
as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. A dealer who is
a franchisee of the petitioning manufacturer or distributor may
intervene and participate in a proceeding under this subsection
(1)(f)(i). The temporary operator has the burden of proof to show
justification for the extension and a good faith effort to sell the
dealership to an independent person at a fair and reasonable price;
(ii) A manufacturer to own or operate a dealership in conjunction
with an independent person in a bona fide business relationship for the
purpose of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and enhancing
opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other
qualified persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership
outright, and where the independent person (A) has made a significant,
bona fide capital investment in the dealership that is subject to loss;
(B) has an ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the
dealership under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative under which he
or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer has the burden of proof of establishing
that the acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was
made within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions;
(iii) A manufacturer to own or operate a dealership in conjunction
with an independent person in a bona fide business relationship where
the independent person (A) has made a significant, bona fide capital
investment in the dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an
ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the dealership
under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer under which
he or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The ((manufacture [manufacturer])) manufacturer has the
burden of proof of establishing that the acquisition of the dealership
by the independent person was made within a reasonable period of time
and under reasonable terms and conditions. The number of dealerships
operated under this subsection (1)(f)(iii) may not exceed four percent
rounded up to the nearest whole number of a manufacturer's total of
dealer franchises in this state;
(iv) A manufacturer to own, operate, or control a dealership
trading exclusively in a single line make of the manufacturer if (A)
the manufacturer does not own, directly or indirectly, in the
aggregate, in excess of forty-five percent of the total ownership
interest in the dealership; (B) at the time the manufacturer first
acquires ownership or assumes operation or control of any such
dealership, the distance between any dealership thus owned, operated,
or controlled and the nearest dealership trading in the same line make
of vehicle and in which the manufacturer has no ownership or control
complies with the applicable provisions in the relevant market area
sections of this chapter; (C) all of the manufacturer's franchise
agreements confer rights on the dealer of that line make to develop and
operate within a defined geographic territory or area, as many
dealership facilities as the dealer and the manufacturer agree are
appropriate; and (D) the manufacturer had no more than four new
motorsports vehicle dealers of that manufacturer's line make in this
state, and at least half of those dealers owned and operated two or
more dealership facilities in the geographic territory or area covered
by their franchise agreements with the manufacturer;
(g) Compete with a dealer by owning, operating, or controlling,
whether directly or indirectly, a service facility in this state for
the repair or maintenance of motorsports vehicles under the
manufacturer's new motorsports vehicle warranty and extended warranty.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(g), however, prohibits a manufacturer
from owning or operating a service facility for the purpose of
providing or performing maintenance, repair, or service work on
motorsports vehicles that are owned by the manufacturer;
(h) Use confidential or proprietary information obtained from a
dealer to unfairly compete with the dealer without the prior written
consent of the dealer. For purposes of this subsection (1)(h),
"confidential or proprietary information" means trade secrets as
defined in RCW 19.108.010, business plans, marketing plans or
strategies, customer lists, contracts, sales data, revenues, or other
financial information;
(i) Coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require, either directly or
indirectly, a dealer to accept, buy, or order any motorsports vehicle,
part, or accessory, or any other commodity or service not voluntarily
ordered, or requested, or to buy, order, or pay anything of value for
such items in order to obtain a motorsports vehicle, part, accessory,
or other commodity that has been voluntarily ordered or requested;
(j) Coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require, either directly or
indirectly, a dealer to enter into any agreement that violates this
chapter;
(k) Require a change in capital structure or means of financing for
the dealership if the dealer at all times meets the reasonable,
written, and uniformly applied capital standards determined by the
manufacturer;
(l) Prevent or attempt to prevent a dealer from making reasonable
changes in the capital structure of a dealership or the means by which
the dealership is financed if the dealer meets the reasonable, written,
and uniformly applied capital requirements determined by the
manufacturer;
(m) Unreasonably require the dealer to change the location or
require any substantial alterations to the place of business;
(n) Condition a renewal or extension of the franchise on the
dealer's substantial renovation of the existing place of business or on
the construction, purchase, acquisition, or re-lease of a new place of
business unless written notice is first provided one hundred eighty
days before the date of renewal or extension and the manufacturer
demonstrates the reasonableness of the requested actions. The
manufacturer shall agree to supply the dealer with an adequate quantity
of motorsports vehicles, parts, and accessories to meet the sales level
necessary to support the overhead resulting from substantial
construction, acquisition, or lease of a new place of business;
(o) Coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require, either directly or
indirectly, a dealer to order or accept delivery of a motorsports
vehicle with special features, accessories, or equipment not included
in the list price of the vehicle as advertised by the manufacturer,
except items that have been voluntarily requested or ordered by the
dealer, and except items required by law;
(p) Fail to hold harmless and indemnify a dealer against losses,
including lawsuits and court costs, arising from: (i) The manufacture
or performance of a motorsports vehicle, part, or accessory if the
lawsuit involves representations by the manufacturer on the manufacture
or performance of a motorsports vehicle without negligence on the part
of the dealer; (ii) damage to merchandise in transit where the
manufacturer specifies the carrier; (iii) the manufacturer's failure to
jointly defend product liability suits concerning the motorsports
vehicle, part, or accessory provided to the dealer; or (iv) any other
act performed by the manufacturer;
(q) Unfairly prevent or attempt to prevent a dealer from receiving
reasonable compensation for the value of a motorsports vehicle;
(r) Fail to pay to a dealer, within a reasonable time after receipt
of a valid claim, a payment agreed to be made by the manufacturer on
grounds that a new motorsports vehicle, or a prior year's model, is in
the dealer's inventory at the time of introduction of new model
motorsports vehicles;
(s) Deny a dealer the right of free association with any other
dealer for any lawful purpose;
(t) Charge increased prices without having given written notice to
the dealer at least fifteen days before the effective date of the price
increases;
(u) Permit factory authorized warranty service to be performed upon
motorsports vehicles or accessories by persons other than their
franchised dealers;
(v) Require or coerce a dealer to sell, assign, or transfer a
retail sales installment contract, or require the dealer to act as an
agent for a manufacturer, in the securing of a promissory note, a
security agreement given in connection with the sale of a motorsports
vehicle, or securing of a policy of insurance for a motorsports
vehicle. The manufacturer may not condition delivery of any
motorsports vehicle, parts, or accessories upon the dealer's
assignment, sale, or other transfer of sales installment contracts to
specific finance companies;
(w) Require or coerce a dealer to grant a manufacturer a right of
first refusal or other preference to purchase the dealer's franchise or
place of business, or both;
(x) Require a dealer to pay a fee for canceling an order for new
motorsports vehicles.
(2) Subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply
to sales to a dealer: (a) For resale to a federal, state, or local
government agency; (b) where the motorsports vehicles will be sold or
donated for use in a program of driver's education; (c) where the sale
is made under a manufacturer's bona fide promotional program offering
sales incentives or rebates; (d) where the sale of parts or accessories
is under a manufacturer's bona fide quantity discount program; or (e)
where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle
discount program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a
group of fifteen or more new motorsports vehicles purchased or leased
by a dealer at one time under a single purchase or lease agreement for
use as part of a fleet, and where the dealer has been assigned a fleet
identifier code by the department.
(3) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Actual price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less
any incentive paid by the manufacturer, whether paid to the dealer or
the ultimate purchaser of the motorsports vehicle.
(b) "Control" or "controlling" means (i) the possession of, title
to, or control of ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in
a person, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary, or (ii) the possession, direct or indirect, of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of
a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, through
director control, by contract, or otherwise, except as expressly
provided under the franchise agreement.
(c) "Operate" means to manage a dealership, whether directly or
indirectly.
(d) "Own" or "ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership of
one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealership,
whether the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited
liability company member, or otherwise. To hold an ownership interest
means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership
interest, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary.
(4) A violation of this section is deemed to affect the public
interest and constitutes an unlawful and unfair practice under chapter
19.86 RCW. A person aggrieved by an alleged violation of this section
may petition the department to have the matter handled as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---