BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2010, a person or entity that contracts
with a health care provider shall comply with this section and shall
include the provisions required by this section in the contract. A
contract in existence prior to January 1, 2010, that is renewed or
renews by its terms, shall comply with this section no later than
December 31, 2010.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Category of coverage" means one of the following types of
coverage offered by a person or entity:
(i) Health maintenance organization plans;
(ii) Any commercial plan or contract that is not a health
maintenance organization plan;
(iii) Medicare;
(iv) Medicaid; or
(v) Workers' compensation.
(b) "Edit" means a practice or procedure pursuant to which one or
more adjustments are made regarding procedure codes, including the
American medical association's current procedural terminology code and
the centers for medicare and medicaid services health care common
procedure coding system that results in:
(i) Payment for some, but not all, of the codes;
(ii) Payment for a different code;
(iii) A reduced payment as a result of services provided to a
patient that are claimed under more than one code on the same service
date;
(iv) A reduced payment related to a modifier used with a procedure
code; or
(v) A reduced payment based on multiple units of the same code
billed for a single date of service.
(c) "Health care contract" or "contract" means a contract entered
into or renewed between a person or entity and a health care provider
for the delivery of health care services to others.
(d) "Health care provider" means a person licensed or certified in
this state to practice medicine, pharmacy, chiropractic, nursing,
physical therapy, podiatry, dentistry, optometry, occupational therapy,
or other healing arts. "Health care provider" also means an ambulatory
surgical center, a licensed pharmacy or provider of pharmacy services,
and a professional corporation or other corporate entity consisting of
licensed health care providers as permitted by the laws of this state.
(e)(i) "Material change" means a change to a contract that
decreases the health care provider's payment or compensation, changes
the administrative procedures in a way that may reasonably be expected
to significantly increase the provider's administrative expense,
replaces the maximum allowable cost list used with a new and different
maximum allowable cost list by a person or entity for reimbursement of
generic prescription drug claims, or adds a new category of coverage.
"Material change" does not include:
(A) A decrease in payment or compensation resulting solely from a
change in a published fee schedule upon which the payment or
compensation is based and the date of applicability is clearly
identified in the contract;
(B) A decrease in payment or compensation resulting from a change
in the fee schedule specified in a contract for pharmacy services such
as a change in a fee schedule based on average wholesale price or
maximum allowable cost;
(C) A decrease in payment or compensation that was anticipated
under the terms of the contract, if the amount and date of
applicability of the decrease is clearly identified in the contract;
(D) An administrative change that may significantly increase the
provider's administrative expense, the specific applicability of which
is clearly identified in the contract;
(E) Changes to an existing prior authorization, precertification,
notification, or referral program that do not substantially increase
the provider's administrative expense; or
(F) Changes to an edit program or to specific edits; however, the
health care provider shall be provided notice of the changes pursuant
to (e)(ii) of this subsection, and the notice shall include information
sufficient for the health care provider to determine the effect of the
changes.
(ii) If a change to the contract is administrative only and is not
a material change, the change shall be effective upon at least fifteen
days' notice to the health care provider. All other notices shall be
provided pursuant to the contract.
(f) "Person or entity" means a person or entity that has a primary
business purpose of contracting with health care providers for the
delivery of health care services.
(3)(a) Each contract shall have provided with it a summary
disclosure form disclosing, in plain language, the following:
(i) The terms governing compensation and payment;
(ii) Any category of coverage for which the health care provider is
to provide service;
(iii) The duration of the contract and how the contract may be
terminated;
(iv) The identity of the person or entity responsible for the
processing of the health care provider's claims for compensation or
payment;
(v) Any internal mechanism required by the person or entity to
resolve disputes that arise under the terms or conditions of the
contract; and
(vi) The subject and order of addenda, if any, to the contract.
(b) The summary disclosure form required (a) of this subsection
shall be for informational purposes only and shall not be a term or
condition of the contract. However, such disclosure shall reasonably
summarize the applicable contract provisions.
(c) If the contract provides for termination for cause by either
party, the contract shall state the reasons that may be used for
termination for cause, the terms of which are not unreasonable, and
when and to whom notice of termination for cause shall be provided.
(d) The person or entity shall identify any utilization review or
management, quality improvement, or similar program the person or
entity uses to review, monitor, evaluate, or assess the services
provided pursuant to a contract. The policies, procedures, or
guidelines of such program applicable to a provider shall be disclosed
upon request of the health care provider within fourteen days after the
date of the request.
(4)(a) The disclosure of payment and compensation terms pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section shall include information sufficient for
the health care provider to determine the compensation or payment for
the health care services and shall include the following:
(i) The manner of payment, such as fee-for-service, capitation, or
risk sharing;
(ii)(A) The methodology used to calculate any fee schedule, such as
relative value unit system and conversion factor, percentage of
medicare payment system, or percentage of billed charges. As
applicable, the methodology disclosure shall include the name of any
relative value system; its version, edition, or publication date; any
applicable conversion or geographic factor; and any date by which
compensation or fee schedules may be changed by such methodology if
allowed for in the contract.
(B) The fee schedule for codes reasonably expected to be billed by
the health care provider for services provided pursuant to the
contract, and, upon request, the fee schedule for other codes used by
or which may be used by the health care provider. Such fee schedule
shall include, as may be applicable, service or procedure codes such as
current procedural terminology codes or health care common procedure
coding system codes and the associated payment or compensation for each
service code.
(C) The fee schedule required in (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection may
be provided electronically.
(D) A fee schedule for the codes described by (a)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be provided when a material change related to payment
or compensation occurs. Additionally, a health care provider may
request that a written fee schedule be provided up to twice per year,
and the person or entity must provide such fee schedule promptly.
(iii) The person or entity shall state the effect of edits, if any,
on payment or compensation. A person or entity may satisfy this
requirement by providing a clearly understandable, readily available
mechanism, such as through a web site, that allows a health care
provider to determine the effect of edits on payment or compensation
before service is provided or a claim is submitted.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (4) to the
contrary, disclosure of a fee schedule or the methodology used to
calculate a fee schedule is not required:
(i) From a person or entity if the fee schedule is for a plan for
dental services, its providers include licensed dentists, the fee
schedule is based upon fees filed with the person or entity by dental
providers, and the fee schedule is revised from time to time based upon
such filings. Specific numerical parameters are not required to be
disclosed; or
(ii) If the fee schedule is for pharmacy services or drugs such as
a fee schedule based on use of national drug codes.
(5) Upon completion of processing of a claim, the person or entity
shall provide information to the health care provider stating how the
claim was adjudicated and the responsibility for any outstanding
balance of any party other than the person or entity.
(6) When a proposed contract is presented by a person or entity for
consideration by a health care provider, the person or entity shall
provide in writing or make reasonably available the information
required in subsection (4) of this section. If the information is not
disclosed in writing, it shall be disclosed in a manner that allows the
health care provider to timely evaluate the payment or compensation for
services under the proposed contract. The disclosure obligations in
this section shall not prevent a person or entity from requiring a
reasonable confidentiality agreement regarding the terms of a proposed
contract.
(7)(a) A material change to a contract shall occur only if the
person or entity provides in writing to the health care provider the
proposed change and gives ninety days' notice before the effective date
of the change. The writing shall be conspicuously entitled "notice of
material change to contract."
(b) If the health care provider objects in writing to the material
change within fifteen days and there is no resolution of the objection,
either party may terminate the contract upon written notice of
termination provided to the other party not later than sixty days
before the effective date of the material change.
(c) If the health care provider does not object to the material
change pursuant to (b) of this subsection, the change shall be
effective as specified in the notice of material change to the
contract.
(d) If a material change is the addition of a new category of
coverage and the health care provider objects, the addition shall not
be effective as to the health care provider, and the objection shall
not be a basis upon which the person or entity may terminate the
contract.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, a contract may
be modified by operation of law as required by any applicable state or
federal law or regulation, and the person or entity may disclose this
change by any reasonable means.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the
renegotiation of a contract in existence before the applicable
compliance date in this section, and any disclosure required by this
section for such contracts may be by notice to the health care
provider.
(10) A person or entity shall not assign, allow access to, sell,
rent, or give the person's or entity's rights to the health care
provider's services pursuant to the person's or entity's contract
unless he or she complies with (a) through (e) of this subsection as
follows:
(a) The third party accessing the health care provider's services
under the contract is an employer or other entity providing coverage
for health care services to its employees or members and such employer
or entity has, with the person or entity contracting with the health
care provider, a contract for the administration or processing of
claims for payment or service provided pursuant to the contract with
the health care provider;
(b) The third party accessing the health care provider's services
under the contract is an affiliate of, subsidiary of, or is under
common ownership or control with the person or entity; or, is providing
or receiving administrative services from the person or entity or an
affiliate of, or subsidiary of, or is under common ownership or control
with the person or entity;
(c) The health care contract specifically provides that it applies
to network rental arrangements and states that it is for the purpose of
assigning, allowing access to, selling, renting, or giving the person's
or entity's rights to the health care provider's services;
(d) The individuals receiving services under the health care
provider's contract are provided with appropriate identification
stating where claims should be sent and where inquiries should be
directed; and
(e) The third party accessing the health care provider's services
through the health care provider's contract is obligated to comply with
all applicable terms and conditions of the contract; except that a
self-funded plan receiving administrative services from the person or
entity or its affiliates shall be solely responsible for payment to the
provider.
(11) Except as permitted by this section, a person or entity shall
not require, as a condition of contracting, that a health care provider
waive or forego any right or benefit to which the health care provider
may be entitled under state or federal law or regulation that provides
legal protections to a person solely based on the person's status as a
health care provider providing services in this state.
(12) Upon sixty days' notice, a health care provider may decline to
provide service pursuant to a contract to new patients covered by the
person or entity. The notice shall state the reason or reasons for
this action. For the purposes of this subsection, "new patients" means
those patients who have not received services from the health care
provider in the immediately preceding three years. A patient shall not
become a "new patient" solely by changing coverage from one person or
entity to another person or entity.
(13) A term for compensation or payment shall not survive the
termination of a contract, except for a continuation of coverage
required by law or with the agreement of the health care provider.
(14) A contract shall not preclude its use or disclosure to a third
party for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this section or
enforcing other state or federal law. The third party shall be bound
by the confidentiality requirements set forth in the contract or
otherwise.
(15) In addition to the provisions of subsection (2)(e) of this
section, a contract with a duration of less than two years shall
provide to each party a right to terminate the contract without cause,
which termination shall occur with at least ninety days' written
notice. For contracts with a duration of two or more years,
termination without cause may be as specified in the contract.
(16) This section shall not apply to:
(a) An exclusive contract with a single medical group in a specific
geographic area to provide or arrange for health care services;
however, this section shall apply to contracts for health care services
between the medical group and other medical groups;
(b) A contract or agreement for the employment of a health care
provider or a contract or agreement between health care providers;
(c) A contract or arrangement entered into by a hospital or health
care facility that is licensed or certified under Title 70 RCW;
(d) A contract between a health care provider and the state or
federal government or their agencies for health care services provided
through a program for workers' compensation, medicaid, or medicare;
(e) Contracts for pharmacy benefit management, except that this
exclusion shall not apply to a contract for health care services
between a person or entity and a pharmacy, pharmacist, or professional
corporation or corporate entity consisting of pharmacies or pharmacists
as permitted by the laws of this state; or
(f) A contract or arrangement entered into by a hospital or health
care facility that is licensed or certified under Title 70 RCW, or any
outpatient service provider that has entered into a joint venture with
the hospital or is owned by the hospital or health care facility.
(17) A contract between a pharmacist or a pharmacy and a pharmacy
benefit manager shall be terminated if the federal drug enforcement
agency or other federal law enforcement agency ceases the operations of
the pharmacist or pharmacy due to alleged or actual criminal activity.
(18) Notwithstanding the applicable compliance date requirement in
subsection (1) of this section, a domestic nonprofit health plan shall
comply with this section within twelve months after the applicable
compliance date.
(19) A contract subject to this section may include an agreement
for binding arbitration.
(20)(a) With respect to the enforcement of this section, including
arbitration, there shall be available:
(i) Private rights of action at law and in equity;
(ii) Equitable relief, including injunctive relief;
(iii) Reasonable attorneys' fees when the health care provider is
the prevailing party in an action to enforce this section, except to
the extent that the violation of this section consisted of a mere
failure to make payment pursuant to a contract;
(iv) The option to introduce as persuasive authority prior
arbitration awards regarding a violation of this section.
(b) Arbitration awards related to the enforcement of this section
may be disclosed to those who have a bona fide interest in the
arbitration.
(21) No provision of this section shall be used to justify any act
or omission by a health care provider that is prohibited by any
applicable professional code of ethics or state or federal law
prohibiting discrimination against any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---