BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that the finance and project
implementation planning processes required for the state route 99 and
Alaskan Way viaduct deep bore tunnel project cannot guarantee
appropriate decisions unless key study assumptions are reasonable with
respect to the project. For the purposes of this section, the Alaskan
Way viaduct deep bore tunnel project, or tunnel project, means all
components of the project including, but not limited to, utilities
relocation, central seawall repair and replacement, transit
enhancements, and surface street improvements. To assure appropriate
finance plan and project implementation plan assumptions, an expert
review panel shall be appointed to provide independent financial and
technical review for development of a finance plan and project
implementation plan for the project described in this section.
(1) The expert review panel shall consist of five to ten members
who are recognized experts in relevant fields, such as planning,
engineering, finance, law, the environment, emerging transportation
technologies, geography, geology, and economics.
(2) The expert review panel shall be selected by the transportation
commission.
(3) The chair of the expert review panel shall be designated by the
chair of the transportation commission.
(4) The expert review panel shall, with respect to completion of
the tunnel project:
(a) Review the financing plan for the project to ensure that it
clearly identifies secured and anticipated funding sources and is
feasible and sufficient;
(b) Review the project implementation plan covering all state and
local permitting and mitigation approvals that ensure the most
expeditious and cost-effective delivery of the project; and
(c) Report its findings and recommendations on the items described
in (a) and (b) of this subsection to the joint transportation
committee, the transportation commission, the office of financial
management, and the governor by September 1, 2009.
(5) Upon receipt of the expert review panel's findings and
recommendations under subsection (4)(c) of this section, the governor
must make a finding of whether the finance plan is feasible and
sufficient to complete the project.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to delay
construction of any of the projects referenced in this section.

--- END ---