BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that active land
use permits are expiring due to a downturn on the state economy.
Considerable cost has been expended by applicants and local
jurisdictions to approve projects. Allowing these projects to expire
would make it difficult for the state to meet its housing needs in the
future and impose considerable staff costs on local governments to
perform work that has already been completed.
(2) The legislature further finds that, in the current period of
economic challenge, an extension for plat approvals will contribute to
the overall employment of the state by employing citizens of Washington
as soon as is practicable in the family wage jobs of the land
development and home building industries.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.170 and 1981 c 293 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the legislative body of the city, town or county finds
that the subdivision proposed for final plat approval conforms to all
terms of the preliminary plat approval, and that said subdivision meets
the requirements of this chapter, other applicable state laws, and any
local ordinances adopted under this chapter which were in effect at the
time of preliminary plat approval, it shall suitably inscribe and
execute its written approval on the face of the plat. The original of
said final plat shall be filed for record with the county auditor. One
reproducible copy shall be furnished to the city, town or county
engineer. One paper copy shall be filed with the county assessor.
Paper copies shall be provided to such other agencies as may be
required by ordinance. Any lots in a final plat filed for record shall
be a valid land use notwithstanding any change in zoning laws for a
period of five years from the date of filing.
(2) A subdivision located outside an urban growth area as described
in the growth management act under RCW 36.70A.110 shall be governed by
the terms of approval of the final plat, and the statutes, ordinances,
and regulations in effect at the time of approval under RCW 58.17.150
(1) and (3) for a period of five years after final plat approval unless
the legislative body finds that a change in conditions creates a
serious threat to the public health or safety in the subdivision.
(3) A subdivision located within an urban growth area as described
in the growth management act under RCW 36.70A.110 shall be governed by
the terms of approval of the final plat, and the statutes, ordinances,
and regulations in effect at the time of approval under RCW 58.17.150
(1) and (3) for a period of seven years after final plat approval
unless the legislative body finds that a change in conditions creates
a serious threat to the public health or safety in the subdivision.

Sec. 3 RCW 58.17.065 and 1974 ex.s. c 134 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each short plat and short subdivision granted pursuant to local
regulations after July 1, 1974, shall be filed with the county auditor
and shall not be deemed "approved" until so filed.
(2) Any lots in a short plat and short subdivision filed with the
county auditor shall be a valid land use notwithstanding any change in
zoning laws for a period of seven years from the date of filing. A
short plat and short subdivision shall be governed by the terms of
approval of the recorded plat, and the statutes, ordinances, and
regulations in effect at the time of filing for a period of seven years
after final plat approval unless the legislative body finds that a
change in conditions creates a serious threat to the public health or
safety in the short subdivision.

--- END ---