BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that fire
sprinkler systems in private residences may prevent catastrophic losses
of life and property, but that financial, technical, and other issues
often discourage property owners from installing these protective
systems.
It is the intent of the legislature to eradicate barriers that
prevent the voluntary installation of sprinkler systems in private
residences by promoting education regarding the effectiveness of
residential fire sprinklers, and by providing financial and regulatory
incentives to homeowners, builders, and water purveyors for voluntarily
installing the systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.160.050 and 2008 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All certificate of competency holders that desire to
continue in the fire protection sprinkler business shall annually,
prior to January 1, secure from the state director of fire protection
a renewal certificate of competency upon payment of the fee as
prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for
renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire
protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information
required by the director.
(b) Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his
or her renewal certificate of competency within sixty days after the
due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of
fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
certificate of competency that has been suspended for failure to pay
the renewal fee.
(d) A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender
his or her certificate of competency to the state director of fire
protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After
surrendering the certificate of competency, he or she shall not be
known as a certificate of competency holder and shall desist from the
practice thereof. Within two years from the time of surrender of the
certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the
required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall
return to the status of a new applicant.
(2)(a) All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors
desiring to continue to be licensed shall annually, prior to January 1,
secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal license
upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of fire
protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by
the state director of fire protection and the license holder shall
furnish the information required by the director.
(b) Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal
license within sixty days after the due date shall constitute
sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend
the license.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
license that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.
(3) The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be
prorated based upon the portion of the year such certificate of
competency or license is in effect, prior to renewal on January 1.
(4) The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from license and
certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules
and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes
authorized under this chapter and standards for fire protection and its
enforcement, with respect to all hospitals as required by RCW
70.41.080((, and)); for providing assistance in identifying fire
sprinkler system components that have been subject to either a recall
or voluntary replacement program by a manufacturer of fire sprinkler
products, a nationally recognized testing laboratory, or the federal
consumer product safety commission; and for use in developing and
publishing educational materials related to the effectiveness of
residential fire sprinklers. Assistance shall include, but is not
limited to, aiding in the identification of recalled components,
information sharing strategies aimed at ensuring the consumer is made
aware of recalls and voluntary replacement programs, and providing
training and assistance to local fire authorities, the fire sprinkler
industry, and the public. Only the state director of fire protection
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.
The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.100 and 1992 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person required to pay a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for
system improvements shall not be required to pay an impact fee under
RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for those same system improvements.
(2) A person installing a residential fire sprinkler system in a
single-family home shall not be required to pay the fire operations
portion of the impact fee. The exempted fire operations impact fee
shall not include the proportionate share related to the delivery of
emergency medical services.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.119A.180 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the department
establish water use efficiency requirements designed to ensure
efficient use of water while maintaining water system financial
viability, improving affordability of supplies, and enhancing system
reliability.
(2) The requirements of this section shall apply to all municipal
water suppliers and shall be tailored to be appropriate to system size,
forecasted system demand, and system supply characteristics.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Water use efficiency includes conservation planning
requirements, water distribution system leakage standards, and water
conservation performance reporting requirements; and
(b) "Municipal water supplier" and "municipal water supply
purposes" have the meanings provided by RCW 90.03.015.
(4) To accomplish the purposes of this section, the department
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section by December 31,
2005. The department shall:
(a) Develop conservation planning requirements that ensure
municipal water suppliers are: (i) Implementing programs to integrate
conservation with water system operation and management; and (ii)
identifying how to appropriately fund and implement conservation
activities. Requirements shall apply to the conservation element of
water system plans and small water system management programs developed
pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW. In establishing the conservation
planning requirements the department shall review the current
department conservation planning guidelines and include those elements
that are appropriate for rule. Conservation planning requirements
shall include but not be limited to:
(A) Selection of cost-effective measures to achieve a system's
water conservation objectives. Requirements shall allow the municipal
water supplier to select and schedule implementation of the best
methods for achieving its conservation objectives;
(B) Evaluation of the feasibility of adopting and implementing
water delivery rate structures that encourage water conservation;
(C) Evaluation of each system's water distribution system leakage
and, if necessary, identification of steps necessary for achieving
water distribution system leakage standards developed under (b) of this
subsection;
(D) Collection and reporting of water consumption and source
production and/or water purchase data. Data collection and reporting
requirements shall be sufficient to identify water use patterns among
utility customer classes, where applicable, and evaluate the
effectiveness of each system's conservation program. Requirements,
including reporting frequency, shall be appropriate to system size and
complexity. Reports shall be available to the public; and
(E) Establishment of minimum requirements for water demand forecast
methodologies such that demand forecasts prepared by municipal water
suppliers are sufficient for use in determining reasonably anticipated
future water needs;
(b) Develop water distribution system leakage standards to ensure
that municipal water suppliers are taking appropriate steps to reduce
water system leakage rates or are maintaining their water distribution
systems in a condition that results in leakage rates in compliance with
the standards. The standards shall include estimated additional
metering losses and demand increases due to meter upsizing required
when a residential fire sprinkler system is installed. Limits shall be
developed in terms of percentage of total water produced and/or
purchased and shall not be lower than ten percent. The department may
consider alternatives to the percentage of total water supplied where
alternatives provide a better evaluation of the water system's leakage
performance. The department shall institute a graduated system of
requirements based on levels of water system leakage. A municipal
water supplier shall select one or more control methods appropriate for
addressing leakage in its water system;
(c) Establish minimum requirements for water conservation
performance reporting to assure that municipal water suppliers are
regularly evaluating and reporting their water conservation
performance. The objective of setting conservation goals is to enhance
the efficient use of water by the water system customers. Performance
reporting shall include:
(i) Requirements that municipal water suppliers adopt and achieve
water conservation goals. The elected governing board or governing
body of the water system shall set water conservation goals for the
system. In setting water conservation goals the water supplier may
consider historic conservation performance and conservation investment,
customer base demographics, regional climate variations, forecasted
demand and system supply characteristics, system financial viability,
system reliability, and affordability of water rates. Conservation
goals shall be established by the municipal water supplier in an open
public forum;
(ii) Requirements that the municipal water supplier adopt schedules
for implementing conservation program elements and achieving
conservation goals to ensure that progress is being made toward adopted
conservation goals;
(iii) A reporting system for regular reviews of conservation
performance against adopted goals. Performance reports shall be
available to customers and the public. Requirements, including
reporting frequency, shall be appropriate to system size and
complexity;
(iv) Requirements that any system not meeting its water
conservation goals shall develop a plan for modifying its conservation
program to achieve its goals along with procedures for reporting
performance to the department;
(v) If a municipal water supplier determines that further
reductions in consumption are not reasonably achievable, it shall
identify how current consumption levels will be maintained;
(d) Adopt rules that, to the maximum extent practical, utilize
existing mechanisms and simplified procedures in order to minimize the
cost and complexity of implementation and to avoid placing unreasonable
financial burden on smaller municipal systems.
(5) The department shall establish an advisory committee to assist
the department in developing rules for water use efficiency. The
advisory committee shall include representatives from public water
system customers, environmental interest groups, business interest
groups, a representative cross-section of municipal water suppliers, a
water utility conservation professional, tribal governments, the
department of ecology, and any other members determined necessary by
the department. The department may use the water supply advisory
committee created pursuant to RCW 70.119A.160 augmented with additional
participants as necessary to comply with this subsection to assist the
department in developing rules.
(6) The department shall provide technical assistance upon request
to municipal water suppliers and local governments regarding water
conservation, which may include development of best management
practices for water conservation programs, conservation landscape
ordinances, conservation rate structures for public water systems, and
general public education programs on water conservation.
(7) To ensure compliance with this section, the department shall
establish a compliance process that incorporates a graduated approach
employing the full range of compliance mechanisms available to the
department.
(8) Prior to completion of rule making required in subsection (4)
of this section, municipal water suppliers shall continue to meet the
existing conservation requirements of the department and shall continue
to implement their current water conservation programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
A public water system is not liable for damages resulting from
shutting off water to a residential home with an installed fire
sprinkler system if the shut off is due to: (1) Routine maintenance;
(2) nonpayment by the customer; or (3) water system emergencies.

--- END ---