BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the intersection
of state route number 195 and Cheney-Spokane Road is located in a
rapidly growing area within the city of Spokane. The legislature
intends to reduce collisions due to the heavy left turn movements from
Cheney-Spokane Road onto state route number 195.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation shall design and construct a new,
separated right turn lane at the intersection of state route number 195
and Cheney-Spokane Road to improve visibility and traffic flow. The
project must include roadway excavation, earthwork, embankment
compaction, surfacing, HMA pavement, curbing, illumination, drainage,
signing, and striping.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---