BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.28A.090 and 2006 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to establish a process for
issuing firearms certificates to residents of Washington who are
otherwise qualified retired law enforcement officers under the federal
law enforcement officers safety act of 2004 (118 Stat. 865; 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 926B and 926C) for the purpose of satisfying the certification
requirements contained in ((the federal law enforcement officers safety
act of 2004 (118 Stat. 865; 18 U.S.C. Sec. 926B and 926C))) that act.
(2) A retired law enforcement officer satisfies the federal
certification requirements if he or she possesses a valid firearms
qualification certificate that:
(a) Uses the model certificate created under subsection (4) of this
section;
(b) Provides that either a law enforcement agency or an individual
or entity certified to provide firearms training acknowledges that the
bearer has been found qualified or otherwise found to meet the
standards established by the criminal justice training commission for
firearms qualification for the basic law enforcement training academy
in the state; and
(c) Complies with the time restrictions provided under subsection
(3) of this section.
(3) The firearms certificate is valid for a period of one year from
the date that the law enforcement agency or individual or entity
certified to provide firearms training determines that the bearer has
been found qualified or otherwise found to meet the standards
established by the criminal justice training commission for firearms
qualification for the basic law enforcement training academy in the
state, and the certificate shall state the date the determination was
made.
(4) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
develop a model certificate that shall serve as the required firearms
qualification certificate ((form to be used by local law enforcement
agencies when issuing firearms certificates to retired law enforcement
officers under this section)) once the certificate is valid pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section. The association shall make the model
certificate accessible on its web site. The model certificate shall
state that the retired law enforcement officer bearing the certificate
has been qualified or otherwise found to meet the standards established
by the criminal justice training commission for firearms qualification
for the basic law enforcement training academy in the state.
(((3) A retired law enforcement officer who is a resident of
Washington may apply for a firearms certificate with a local law
enforcement agency. The local law enforcement agency may issue the
firearms certificate to a retired law enforcement officer if the
officer:
(a) Has been qualified or otherwise found to meet the standards
established by the criminal justice training commission for firearms
qualifications for active law enforcement officers in the state; and
(b) Has undergone the same background check as required under RCW
9.41.070 and is not ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040
or 9.41.045.
(4) The qualification required under [subsection] (3)(a) of this
section may be performed by the local law enforcement agency or by an
individual or entity certified to provide firearms training.
(5) The firearms certificate is valid for a period of one year. An
applicant for the firearms certificate shall pay a fee of thirty-six
dollars, plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of
investigation that are passed on to the applicant. The fee shall be
distributed in the same manner as the fee for a concealed pistol
license under RCW 9.41.070.))
(5) The retired law enforcement officer is ((also)) responsible for
paying the costs of the firearms qualification required under
(([subsection] (3)(a))) subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a local law
enforcement agency to complete the certificate.

--- END ---