BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.110 and 1997 c 453 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, "manufacturer"
means every person who, either directly or by contracting with others
for the necessary labor or mechanical services, manufactures for sale
or for commercial or industrial use from his or her own materials or
ingredients any articles, substances, or commodities.
(2)(a) When the owner of equipment or facilities furnishes, or
sells to the customer prior to manufacture, all or a portion of the
materials that become a part or whole of the manufactured article, the
department shall prescribe equitable rules for determining tax
liability((: PROVIDED, That)).
(b) A person who produces aluminum master alloys is a processor for
hire rather than a manufacturer, regardless of the portion of the
aluminum provided by that person's customer((: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)). For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "aluminum master
alloy" means an alloy registered with the Aluminum Association as a
grain refiner or a hardener alloy using the American National Standards
Institute designating system H35.3.
(3) A nonresident of this state who is the owner of materials
processed for it in this state by a processor for hire shall not be
deemed to be engaged in business in this state as a manufacturer
because of the performance of such processing work for it in this
state((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(4) The owner of materials from which a nuclear fuel assembly is
made for it by a processor for hire shall not be subject to tax under
this chapter as a manufacturer of the fuel assembly.
((For the purposes of this section, "aluminum master alloy" means
an alloy registered with the Aluminum Association as a grain refiner or
a hardener alloy using the American National Standards Institute
designating system H35.3.)) (5)(a) A person who contracts with another
person to reproduce content on a tangible medium for retail or
wholesale distribution is deemed not to be engaged in business in this
state as a manufacturer with respect to such activity, regardless of
whether the reproduction work is performed for it in this state. The
person performing the reproduction work is deemed to be a processor for
hire, unless the reproduction work involves printing within the meaning
of RCW 82.04.280(1), in which case the person is taxable under RCW
82.04.280(1) in respect to the reproduction work.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (5):
(i) "Content" means text, information, data, still images, moving
images, sound recordings, and computer software. "Content" includes
both proprietary content and public domain content.
(ii) "Tangible medium" means paper, tape, film, disk, and any other
tangible vehicle used in the inscribing, storing, or recording of
content.

--- END ---