BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.015 and 1984 c 7 s 297 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to operate its ferry system under the
name: "Washington State ((Ferries)) Marine Highway System."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By January 1, 2010, the department of
transportation must change all public materials and references used by
the department in the operation of the ferry system to reflect the name
change in this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.04.250 and 2002 c 355 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section only, "assault" means an act
by a motorist that results in physical injury to an employee of the
department while engaged in highway construction or maintenance
activities along a roadway right-of-way (fence line to fence line,
landscaped areas) or in the loading and unloading of passenger vehicles
in service of the vessel as a maritime employee not covered under
chapter 51.32 RCW or engaged in those work activities as a Washington
state ((Ferries)) marine highway system terminal employee covered under
chapter 51.32 RCW.
(2) In recognition of the nature of employment in departmental
highway construction or maintenance activities and by the Washington
state ((Ferries)) marine highway system, this section provides a
supplementary program to reimburse employees of the department for some
of their costs attributable to their being the victims of assault by
motorists. This program is limited to the reimbursement provided in
this section.
(3) An employee is entitled to receive the reimbursement provided
in this section only if the secretary finds that each of the following
has occurred:
(a) A motorist has assaulted the employee who is engaged in highway
construction or maintenance along a roadway right-of-way (fence line to
fence line, landscaped areas) or service of the vessel as a maritime
employee or terminal employee engaged in the loading or unloading of
passenger vehicles and as a result the employee has sustained
demonstrated physical injuries that have required the employee to miss
one or more days of work;
(b) The assault is not attributable to any extent to the employee's
negligence, misconduct, or failure to comply with any rules or
conditions of employment; and
(c) The department of labor and industries has approved the
employee's workers' compensation application under chapter 51.32 RCW,
or for maritime employees the department of transportation risk
management office has approved maintenance and cure benefits under 46
U.S.C. Sec. 688 et seq.
(4) The reimbursement authorized under this section is as follows:
(a) The employee's accumulated sick leave days will not be reduced
for the workdays missed. The injured worker who qualifies for and
receives assault benefits will also receive full standard benefits
(vacation leave, sick leave, health insurance, etc.) as if uninjured;
(b) For an employee covered by chapter 51.32 RCW, for each workday
missed for which the employee is not eligible to receive compensation
under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee will receive the full amount of
the injured worker's net pay at the time of injury; and
(c) In respect to workdays missed for which the employee will
receive or has received compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, or under
federal maritime law benefits, including the Jones Act, for an employee
deemed a maritime employee assigned to work in service of the vessel or
a nonmaritime terminal employee covered under chapter 51.32 RCW, the
employee will be reimbursed in an amount that, when added to that
compensation, will result in the employee receiving no more than full
net pay (gross pay less mandatory and voluntary deductions) for the
workdays missed.
(5) Reimbursement under this section may not last longer than three
hundred sixty-five consecutive days after the date of the injury. No
application for assault benefits is valid nor may a claim be enforced
unless it was made within one year after the day upon which the injury
occurred.
(6) The employee is not entitled to the reimbursement provided in
subsection (4) of this section for a workday for which the secretary or
an applicable designee finds that the employee has not diligently
pursued his or her compensation remedies under chapter 51.32 RCW or
federal maritime law, including the Jones Act.
(7) The reimbursement may be made only for absences that the
secretary or an applicable designee believes are justified.
(8) While the employee is receiving reimbursement under this
section, he or she will continue to be classified as a state employee,
and the reimbursement amount is considered as salary or wages.
(9) The department shall make all reimbursement payments required
to be made to employees under this section. The payments are
considered as a salary or wage expense and must be paid by the
department in the same manner and from the same appropriations as other
salary and wage expenses for the department.
(10) Nothing in this section precludes the department from
recovering the supplemental payments authorized by this section from
the assaulting motorist, and that recovery is considered exclusive of
recovery under chapter 51.24 RCW.
(11) If the legislature revokes the reimbursement authorized under
this section or repeals this section, no affected employee is entitled
after that to receive the reimbursement as a matter of contractual
right.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.030 and 2008 c 122 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.29 or 47.46 RCW:
(a) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department of transportation shall have full charge of the planning,
analysis, and construction of all toll bridges and other toll
facilities including the Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway
system, and the operation and maintenance thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon.
(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and design of
all toll facilities. The department may conduct the planning,
analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to support the
legislature's consideration of toll authorization.
(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection
systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent
practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The
department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll
facilities within the state, including those authorized by local
authorities.
(e) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (e)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway system, in accordance with
chapter 43.19 RCW except as follows:
(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation
determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not
practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to
make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance
evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award,
a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal
request for proposals solicitation shall include a functional
description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.56.032 and 1984 c 7 s 247 are each amended to read
as follows:
All powers vested in the toll bridge authority as of September 21,
1977, relating to the acquiring, operating, extending, designing,
constructing, repairing, and maintenance of the Washington state
((ferries)) marine highway system or any part thereof and the
collecting of tolls and charges for use of its facilities, shall be
performed by the department. The commission shall determine all fares,
tolls, and other charges for its facilities and shall directly perform
all duties and exercise all powers relating to financing, refinancing,
and fiscal management of the system's bonded indebtedness in the manner
provided by law.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.56.860 and 2008 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
This subchapter applies only to all state toll bridges and other
state toll facilities, excluding the Washington state ((ferries))
marine highway system, first authorized within this state after July 1,
2008.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.60.135 and 2003 c 374 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The charter use of Washington state ferry vessels when
established route operations and normal user requirements are not
disrupted is permissible. In establishing chartering agreements,
Washington state ((Ferries)) marine highway system shall consider the
special needs of local communities and interested parties. Washington
state ((Ferries)) marine highway system shall use sound business
judgment and be sensitive to the interests of existing private
enterprises.
(2) Consistent with the policy as established in subsection (1) of
this section, the chief executive officer of the Washington state
((Ferries)) marine highway system may approve agreements for the
chartering of Washington state ferry vessels to groups or individuals,
including hazardous material transporters, in accordance with the
following:
(a) Vessels may be committed to charter only when established route
operation and normal user requirements are not disrupted or
inconvenienced. If a vessel is engaged in the transport of hazardous
materials, the transporter shall pay for all legs necessary to complete
the charter, even if the vessel is simultaneously engaged in an
operational voyage on behalf of Washington state ((Ferries)) marine
highway system.
(b) Charter rates for vessels must be established at actual vessel
operating costs plus a market-rate profit margin. Actual vessel
operating costs include, but are not limited to, all labor, fuel, and
vessel maintenance costs incurred due to the charter agreement,
including deadheading and standby.
(c) Parties chartering Washington state ferry vessels shall comply
with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations during the charter
voyage, and failure to so comply is cause for immediate termination of
the charter voyage.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.60.140 and 2003 c 374 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is empowered to operate such ferry system,
including all operations, whether intrastate or international, upon any
route or routes, and toll bridges as a revenue-producing and self-liquidating undertaking. The department has full charge of the
construction, rehabilitation, rebuilding, enlarging, improving,
operation, and maintenance of the ferry system, including toll bridges,
approaches, and roadways incidental thereto that may be authorized by
the department, including the collection of tolls and other charges for
the services and facilities of the undertaking. The department has the
exclusive right to enter into leases and contracts for use and
occupancy by other parties of the concessions and space located on the
ferries, wharves, docks, approaches, parking lots, and landings,
including the selling of commercial advertising space and licenses to
use the Washington state ((Ferries)) marine highway system trademarks,
but, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no such
leases or contracts may be entered into for more than ten years, nor
without a competitive contract process, except as otherwise provided in
this section. The competitive process shall be either an invitation
for bids in accordance with the process established by chapter 43.19
RCW, or a request for proposals in accordance with the process
established by RCW 47.56.030. All revenues from commercial
advertising, concessions, parking, leases, and contracts must be
deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account in accordance
with RCW 47.60.150.
(2) As part of a joint development agreement under which a public
or private developer constructs or installs improvements on ferry
system property, the department may lease all or part of such property
and improvements to such developers for that period of time, not to
exceed fifty-five years, or not to exceed thirty years for those areas
located within harbor areas, which the department determines is
necessary to allow the developer to make reasonable recovery on its
initial investment. Any lease entered into as provided for in this
subsection that involves state aquatic lands shall conform with the
Washington state Constitution and applicable statutory requirements as
determined by the department of natural resources. That portion of the
lease rate attributable to the state aquatic lands shall be distributed
in the same manner as other lease revenues derived from state aquatic
lands as provided in RCW 79.24.580.
(3) The department shall include in the strategic planning and
performance assessment process, as required by RCW 43.88.090, an
analysis of the compatibility of public and private partnerships with
the state ferry system's core business, and the department's efforts to
maximize nonfarebox revenues and provide benefit to the public users of
the ferry system facilities. The department shall include an
assessment of the need for an open solicitation to identify and select
possible public or private partnerships in order to maximize the value
of projects and the state's investment in current and future ferry
system operations.
(a) When the department determines that an open solicitation is
necessary, a request for proposal shall be released, consisting of an
open solicitation outlining functional specifications to be used as the
basis for selecting partnerships in the project.
(b) Any responses to the request for proposal shall be evaluated,
at a minimum, on the basis of compatibility with the state ferry
system's core business, potential to maximize nonfarebox revenue,
longevity of the possible partnership commitment, and benefit to the
public users of the ferry system facilities.
(c) If no responses are received, or those that are received are
incompatible with ferry system operations, or do not meet the criteria
stated in (b) of this subsection, the state ferry system may proceed
with state ferry system operating strategies designed to achieve state
ferry system objectives without established partnerships.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.60.145 and 1982 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An "historic ferry" is any vessel in the Washington state
((ferries)) marine highway system fleet which has been listed in the
Washington state register of historic places.
(2) When the department of transportation determines that an
historic ferry is surplus to the needs of Washington state ((ferries))
marine highway system, the department shall call for proposals from
persons who wish to acquire the historic ferry. Proposals for the
acquisition of an historic ferry shall be accepted only from persons or
organizations that (a) are a governmental entity or a nonprofit
corporation or association dedicated to the preservation of historic
properties; (b) agree to a contract approved by the state historic
preservation officer, which requires the preservation and maintenance
of the historic ferry and provides that title to the ferry reverts to
the state if the secretary of transportation determines that the
contract has been violated; and (c) demonstrate the administrative and
financial ability successfully to comply with the contract.
(3) The department shall evaluate the qualifying proposals and
shall select the proposal which is most advantageous to the state.
Factors to be considered in making the selection shall include but not
be limited to:
(a) Extent and quality of restoration;
(b) Retention of original design and use;
(c) Public access to the vessel;
(d) Provisions for historical interpretation;
(e) Monetary return to the state.
(4) If there are no qualifying proposals, an historic ferry shall
be disposed of in the manner provided by state law.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.60.170 and 1984 c 7 s 313 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 47.60.150 forbids the establishment by the
department of a Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway system
revolving fund of not to exceed six hundred thousand dollars from the
proceeds of any bonds sold under the provisions of this chapter. The
fund may be deposited by the department in such banks or financial
institutions as it may select throughout the state. RCW 43.01.050 does
not apply to the fund or any deposits therein made by the department
under this section. The department may deposit all moneys received
under this chapter in the fund. All expenses whatsoever arising in the
operations of the Puget Sound ferry system shall be paid from the fund,
if established, by check or voucher in such manner as may be prescribed
by the department.
All moneys received by the department or any employee under the
foregoing sections of this chapter, except an amount of petty cash for
each day's needs as fixed by the regulation of the department, shall
each day and as often during the day as advisable, be deposited in the
nearest authorized depositary selected by the department under this
section.
Whenever the fund exceeds six hundred thousand dollars, the
department shall forthwith transmit the excess to the state treasurer
for deposit in the trust fund established by RCW 47.60.150.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.60.290 and 2007 c 512 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall annually review fares and pricing policies
applicable to the operation of the Washington state ((ferries)) marine
highway system.
(2) Beginning in 2008, the department shall develop fare and
pricing policy proposals that must:
(a) Recognize that each travel shed is unique, and might not have
the same farebox recovery rate and the same pricing policies;
(b) Use data from the current survey conducted under RCW 47.60.286;
(c) Be developed with input from affected ferry users by public
hearing and by review with the affected ferry advisory committees, in
addition to the data gathered from the survey conducted in RCW
47.60.286;
(d) Generate the amount of revenue required by the biennial
transportation budget;
(e) Consider the impacts on users, capacity, and local communities;
and
(f) Keep fare schedules as simple as possible.
(3) While developing fare and pricing policy proposals, the
department must consider the following:
(a) Options for using pricing to level vehicle peak demand; and
(b) Options for using pricing to increase off-peak ridership.

Sec. 12 RCW 47.60.310 and 1988 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is further directed to conduct such review by
soliciting and obtaining expressions from local community groups in
order to be properly informed as to problems being experienced within
the area served by the Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway
system. In order that local representation may be established, the
department shall give prior notice of the review to the ferry advisory
committees.
(2) The legislative authorities of San Juan, Skagit, Clallam, and
Jefferson counties shall each appoint a committee to consist of five
members to serve as an advisory committee to the department or its
designated representative in such review. The legislative authorities
of other counties that contain ferry terminals shall appoint ferry
advisory committees consisting of three members for each terminal area
in each county, except for Vashon Island, which shall have one
committee, and its members shall be appointed by the Vashon/Maury
Island community council. At least one person appointed to each ferry
advisory committee shall be representative of an established ferry user
group or of frequent users of the ferry system. Each member shall
reside in the vicinity of the terminal that the advisory committee
represents.
(3) The members of the San Juan, Clallam, and Jefferson county
ferry advisory committees shall be appointed for four-year terms. The
initial terms shall commence on July 1, 1982, and end on June 30, 1986.
Any vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by
the appointing authority. At least one person appointed to the
advisory committee shall be representative of an established ferry-user
group or of frequent users of the ferry system, at least one shall be
representative of persons or firms using or depending upon the ferry
system for commerce, and one member shall be representative of a local
government planning body or its staff. Every member shall be a
resident of the county upon whose advisory committee he or she sits,
and not more than three members shall at the time of their appointment
be members of the same major political party.
(4) The members of each terminal area committee shall be appointed
for four-year terms. The initial terms of the members of each terminal
area committee shall be staggered as follows: All terms shall commence
September 1, 1988, with one member's term expiring August 31, 1990, one
member's term expiring August 31, 1991, and the remaining member's term
expiring August 31, 1992. Any vacancy shall be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term by the appointing authority. Not more
than two members of any terminal-area committee may be from the same
political party at the time of their appointment, and in a county
having more than one committee, the overall party representation shall
be as nearly equal as possible.
(5) The chairmen of the several committees constitute an executive
committee of the Washington state ferry users. The executive committee
shall meet twice each year with representatives of the marine division
of the department to review ferry system issues.
(6) The committees to be appointed by the county legislative
authorities shall serve without fee or compensation.

Sec. 13 RCW 47.60.335 and 2008 c 124 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Appropriations made for the Washington state ((ferries)) marine
highway system capital program may not be used for maintenance costs.
(2) Appropriations made for preservation projects shall be spent
only on preservation and only when warranted by asset condition, and
shall not be spent on master plans, right-of-way acquisition, or other
nonpreservation items.
(3) Systemwide and administrative capital program costs shall be
allocated to specific capital projects using a cost allocation plan
developed by the department. Systemwide and administrative capital
program costs shall be identifiable.
(4) The vessel emergency repair budget may not be used for planned
maintenance and inspections of inactive vessels.

Sec. 14 RCW 47.60.500 and 1986 c 66 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state's ferry fleet available
for mass transportation of people within the urban region of Puget
Sound is critically deficient and that substantial financial assistance
for the acquisition of new ferries is necessary if the Washington state
((ferries)) marine highway system is to continue to fulfill its role in
the Puget Sound regional urban transportation system.
(2) The department is authorized:
(a) To apply to the United States secretary of transportation for
a financial grant to assist the state to acquire urgently needed
ferries;
(b) To enter into an agreement with the United States secretary of
transportation or other duly authorized federal officials and to assent
to such conditions as may be necessary to obtain financial assistance
for the acquisition of additional ferries. In connection with the
agreement the department may pledge any moneys in the Puget Sound
capital construction account, not required for debt service, in the
motor vehicle fund or any moneys to be deposited in the account for the
purpose of paying the state's share of the cost of acquiring ferries.
To the extent of the pledge the department shall use the moneys
available in the Puget Sound capital construction account to meet the
obligations as they arise.

Sec. 15 RCW 47.60.505 and 1986 c 66 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the Puget Sound
capital construction account. All moneys hereafter deposited in said
account shall be used by the department of transportation for:
(1) Reimbursing the motor vehicle fund for all transfers therefrom
made in accordance with RCW 47.60.620; and
(2) Improving the Washington state ferry system including, but not
limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel construction, major and minor
vessel improvements, terminal construction and improvements, and
reconstruction or replacement of, and improvements to, the Hood Canal
bridge, reimbursement of the motor vehicle fund for any state funds,
other than insurance proceeds, expended therefrom for reconstruction or
replacement of and improvements to the Hood Canal bridge, pursuant to
proper appropriations: PROVIDED, That any funds accruing to the Puget
Sound capital construction account after June 30, 1979, which are not
required to reimburse the motor vehicle fund pursuant to RCW 47.60.620
as such obligations come due nor are required for capital improvements
of the Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway system pursuant to
appropriations therefor shall from time to time as shall be determined
by the department of transportation be transferred by the state
treasurer to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor
vehicle fund.
(3) The department may pledge any moneys in the Puget Sound capital
construction account or to be deposited in that account to guarantee
the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued to refund the
outstanding 1955 Washington state ferry system refunding bonds and the
1957 ferry and Hood Canal bridge revenue bonds.
The department may further pledge moneys in the Puget Sound capital
construction account to meet any sinking fund requirements or reserves
established by the department with respect to any bond issues provided
for in this section.
To the extent of any pledge authorized in this section, the
department shall use the first moneys available in the Puget Sound
capital construction account to meet such obligations as they arise,
and shall maintain a balance of not less than one million dollars in
the account for this purpose.
(4) The treasurer shall never transfer any moneys from the Puget
Sound capital construction account for use by the department for state
highway purposes so long as there is due and unpaid any obligations for
payment of principal, interest, sinking funds, or reserves as required
by any pledge of the Puget Sound capital construction account.
Whenever the department has pledged any moneys in the account for the
purposes authorized in this section, the state agrees to continue to
deposit in the Puget Sound capital construction account the motor
vehicle fuel taxes and special fuel taxes as provided in RCW 82.36.020
and 82.38.290 and further agrees that, so long as there exists any
outstanding obligations pursuant to such pledge, to continue to impose
such taxes.
(5) Funds in the Puget Sound capital construction account of the
motor vehicle fund that are not required by the department for payment
of principal or interest on bond issues or for any of the other
purposes authorized in this chapter may be invested by the department
in bonds and obligations of the nature eligible for the investment of
current state funds as provided in RCW 43.84.080.

Sec. 16 RCW 47.60.530 and 1979 c 27 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the Puget Sound
ferry operations account to the credit of which shall be deposited all
moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. All moneys deposited
in this account shall be expended pursuant to appropriations only for
reimbursement of the motor vehicle fund for any state moneys, other
than insurance proceeds, expended therefrom for alternate
transportation services instituted as a result of the destruction of
the Hood Canal bridge, and for maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway system including the Hood
Canal bridge, supplementing as required the revenues available from the
Washington state ferry system.

Sec. 17 RCW 47.60.560 and 1986 c 290 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal
construction and improvements for the Washington state ((ferries))
marine highway system, there shall be issued and sold upon the request
of the department general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
in the sum of one hundred thirty-five million dollars or such amount
thereof as may be required (together with other funds available
therefor). If the state of Washington is able to obtain matching funds
from the urban mass transportation administration or other federal
government agencies for the acquisition of passenger-only vessels
capable of operating as an integral part of the Washington state
((ferries)) marine highway system on Puget Sound and the Straits of
Juan de Fuca, a sufficient amount of the proceeds of the bonds
authorized herein shall be used to pay the state's share of the
acquisition cost of the passenger-only vessels. Upon request being
made by the department, the state finance committee shall supervise and
provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds in
accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. The bonds may be sold from time to
time in such amounts as may be necessary for the orderly progress in
constructing the ferries. The bonds shall be sold in such manner, at
such time or times, in such amounts, and at such price or prices as the
state finance committee shall determine. The state finance committee
may obtain insurance, letters of credit, or other credit facility
devices with respect to the bonds and may authorize the execution and
delivery of agreements, promissory notes, and other obligations for the
purpose of insuring the payment or enhancing the marketability of the
bonds. Promissory notes or other obligations issued under this section
shall not constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under
any constitutional or statutory indebtedness limitation if their
payment is conditioned upon the failure of the state to pay the
principal of or interest on the bonds with respect to which the
promissory notes or other obligations relate. The state finance
committee may authorize the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu
of long-term obligations for the purposes of more favorable interest
rates, lower total interest costs, and increased marketability and for
the purposes of retiring the bonds during the life of the project for
which they were issued.

Sec. 18 RCW 47.60.649 and 1998 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that there is a compelling need
for the construction of additional state ferry vessels and
corresponding terminal improvements in order to provide more capacity
and frequent service to meet the forecasted travel demands of citizens
traveling on Puget Sound ferry routes. The vessel technology required
must provide additional travel options for high growth ferry routes
through increased passenger-only ferry service.
The 1989 west corridor study evaluated cross-sound travel through
the year 2020 and identified the Southworth to Seattle and the Kingston
to Seattle passenger-only ferry routes as promising based on criteria
evaluating cost-effectiveness, time savings, physical constraints to
operation, nonduplication of current service, and ability to relieve
congestion.
Furthermore, as a result of legislative direction provided in the
1991-93 transportation budget to the state transportation commission to
evaluate and determine the location of new passenger-only ferry routes,
the commission reviewed several service alternatives, determined that
the Southworth to Seattle and Kingston to Seattle routes ranked
highest, and directed the Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway
system to proceed with the design and permitting processes for
passenger-only terminals at both Southworth and Kingston.

Sec. 19 RCW 47.60.680 and 1983 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No contract for the construction, improvement, or repair of a
ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by the Washington
state ((ferries)) marine highway system or for the repair, overhaul, or
the dry-docking of any ferry operated by Washington state ((ferries))
marine highway system may be awarded to any contractor who has not
first been prequalified to perform the work by the department of
transportation. No bid or proposal for such a contract may be received
from any contractor who has not first been prequalified to perform the
work by the department of transportation.

Sec. 20 RCW 47.60.800 and 1992 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for vessel and terminal
acquisition, construction, and major and minor improvements, including
long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state
((ferries)) marine highway system, there shall be issued and sold upon
the request of the Washington state transportation commission and
legislative appropriation a total of two hundred ten million dollars of
general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

Sec. 21 RCW 47.60.814 and 2001 c 226 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to legislative appropriation for the procurement of
vessels, the department shall issue a request for proposals to
interested parties that must include, at least, the following:
(1) Solicitation of a proposal to participate in a design and build
partnership with the department to design and construct the auto
ferries;
(2) Instructions on the prequalification process and procedures;
(3) A description of the modified request for proposals process.
Under this process, the department may modify any component of the
request for proposals, including the outline specifications, by
addendum at any time before the submittal of bids in phase three;
(4) A description of the design and build partnership process to be
used for procurement of the vessels;
(5) Outline specifications that provide the requirements for the
vessels including, but not limited to, items such as length, beam,
displacement, speed, propulsion requirements, capacities for autos and
passengers, passenger space characteristics, and crew size. The
department will produce notional line drawings depicting hull geometry
that will interface with Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway
system terminal facilities. Notional lines may be modified in phase
two, subject to approval by the department;
(6) Instructions for the development of technical proposals in
phase two, and information regarding confidentiality of technical
proposals;
(7) The vessel delivery schedule, identification of the port on
Puget Sound where delivery must take place, and the location where
acceptance trials must be held;
(8) The estimated price range for the contract;
(9) The form and amount of the required bid deposit and contract
security;
(10) A copy of the contract that will be signed by the successful
proposer;
(11) The date by which proposals in phase one must be received by
the department in order to be considered;
(12) A description of information to be submitted in the proposals
in phase one concerning each proposer's qualifications, capabilities,
and experience;
(13) A statement of the maximum number of proposers that may be
selected in phase one for development of technical proposals in phase
two;
(14) Criteria that will be used for the phase one selection of
proposers to participate in the phase two development of technical
proposals;
(15) A description of the process that will be used for the phase
three submittal and evaluation of bids, award of the contract, and
postaward administrative activities;
(16) A requirement that the contractor comply with all applicable
laws, rules, and regulations including but not limited to those
pertaining to the environment, worker health and safety, and prevailing
wages;
(17) A requirement that the vessels be constructed within the
boundaries of the state of Washington except that equipment furnished
by the state and components, products, and systems that are standard
manufactured items are not subject to the in-state requirement under
this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "constructed"
means the fabrication, by the joining together by welding or fastening
of all steel parts from which the total vessel is constructed,
including, but not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals,
bulkheads, webs, piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed"
also means the installation of all components and systems, including,
but not limited to, equipment and machinery, castings, electrical,
electronics, deck covering, lining, paint, and joiner work required by
the contract. "Constructed" also means the interconnection of all
equipment, machinery, and services, such as piping, wiring, and
ducting; and
(18) A requirement that all warranty work on the vessel must be
performed within the boundaries of the state of Washington, insofar as
practical.

Sec. 22 RCW 47.61.010 and 1984 c 7 s 338 are each amended to read
as follows:
Recognizing that the Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway
system is an integral part of the state highway system, the department
is authorized to enter into an agreement with the administrator of the
housing and home finance agency and to make application for a grant for
financial assistance for the acquisition by construction or purchase of
new vessels pursuant to the provisions of the Urban Mass Transportation
Act of 1964.

Sec. 23 RCW 49.46.010 and 2002 c 354 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of labor and industries;
(2) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of
employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on
banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to
such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of
the director;
(3) "Employ" includes to permit to work;
(4) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting
directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(5) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but
shall not include:
(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesman as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the
director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the
director of personnel pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under any state, local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(f) Any newspaper vendor or carrier;
(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate
Commerce Act;
(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or
sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or
municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative
institution;
(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ((ferries))
marine highway system operated by the department of transportation;
(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel;
(6) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of
employment in which employees are gainfully employed;
(7) "Retail or service establishment" means an establishment
seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or
services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales
or services in the particular industry.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.70.010 and 2005 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and
RCW 70.94.996 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Public agency" means any county, city, or other local
government agency or any state government agency, board, or commission.
(2) "Public transportation" means the same as "public
transportation service" as defined in RCW 36.57A.010 and includes
passenger services of the Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway
system.
(3) "Nonmotorized commuting" means commuting to and from the
workplace by an employee by walking or running or by riding a bicycle
or other device not powered by a motor.
(4) "Ride sharing" means the same as "flexible commuter ride
sharing" as defined in RCW 46.74.010, including ride sharing on
Washington state ((ferries)) marine highway system.
(5) "Car sharing" means a membership program intended to offer an
alternative to car ownership under which persons or entities that
become members are permitted to use vehicles from a fleet on an hourly
basis.
(6) "Telework" means a program where work functions that are
normally performed at a traditional workplace are instead performed by
an employee at his or her home at least one day a week for the purpose
of reducing the number of trips to the employee's workplace.
(7) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.

--- END ---