BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW, if the person committed the violation while transporting a person
under eighteen years of age.

--- END ---