BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to begin
the process of improving the recreational boating programs of the state
of Washington by quantifying the various individual program needs;
reviewing boating revenues and expenditures; developing program
standards and expectations; and providing options for increasing
administrative efficiencies. It is the intent of the legislature to
both increase opportunities for and enjoyment of recreational boating
and to reduce boating fatalities and injuries, and increase the general
safety of Washington's waterways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Within funds appropriated for this specific
purpose from the recreation resource account under RCW 79A.25.070, the
recreation and conservation office, in consultation with the Washington
state parks and recreation commission, recreational boating
stakeholders, and the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, shall:
(1) Contract for a quantification of the needs identified in the
study conducted pursuant to RCW 79A.60.680(1); and for addressing the
recommendations provided in the Washington state boaters survey
regarding safety, education, and law enforcement, conducted for the
state parks and recreation commission in 2007, and the report on
methods to achieve safer boating practices, conducted by the state
parks and recreation commission in 2003;
(2) Identify expectations and develop program standards for
recreational boating programs including, but not limited to, marine law
enforcement programs;
(3) Establish methods of determining state and local responsibility
for recreational boating programs;
(4) Establish standards for evaluating the effectiveness of
recreational boating programs;
(5) Consider various models for state management of recreational
boating programs including, but not limited to, the model provided by
the Oregon marine board;
(6) Establish a plan for standardized and specialized training and
training opportunities for local and state marine law enforcement,
including training regarding boating safety laws and boating accident
investigation;
(7) Identify best practices for the provision of safety information
and practical education to boaters in the field, including law
enforcement safety and equipment checks;
(8) Identify best practices for law enforcement on-the-water
activities including patrols, prevention, and education activities, and
search and rescue; and
(9) Review the funding and expenditures of the state's recreational
boating programs including, but not limited to, the federal safety
grant program administered through the United States coast guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) After completing the requirements
provided in section 2 of this act, and in consultation with the office
of financial management and the office of the governor, the recreation
and conservation office shall report its findings and make
recommendations for increasing efficiencies in the administration of
the state's recreational boating programs, including any potential
merger of programs and any potential transfer of programs among state
and local agencies.
(2) The recreation and conservation office shall submit a
preliminary report to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 1, 2010, and a final report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.
The report shall include suggested timelines for implementation of the
recommendations and shall state whether the recommendations require
legislative action or additional funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall designate the department of fish and wildlife
as an approved boating program. The department of fish and wildlife
shall submit its boating safety data to the commission for the purpose
of (1) obtaining increased federal matching funds and (2) permitting
the department of fish and wildlife to compete for funds administered
by the commission. The department of fish and wildlife shall not be
eligible to receive or compete for any funding collected and
distributed pursuant to RCW 88.02.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be referred to as the
recreational boating services and safety improvement act of 2009.

--- END ---