BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that agriculture
is a cornerstone of Washington's economy. Agriculture and related
industries grossed nearly twenty billion dollars and employed tens of
thousands of workers in 2007. Agricultural and food products valued at
nearly ten billion dollars were exported through the state's ports in
2007.
(2) The legislature recognizes that agriculture faces significant
challenges now and in the future. The peak harvest workforce has
fallen from sixty thousand to forty-five thousand over the past decade.
There have been significant revenue losses from crops that went
unpicked in recent years.
(3) For these reasons, the legislature intends to develop
strategies to help employers obtain a legal and stable workforce, and
to ensure that farm workers have fair and safe housing and working
conditions. In developing these strategies, the legislature further
intends to work closely with representatives of both farmers and farm
workers. The legislature intends that these strategies be designed to
protect the long-term viability of Washington's agricultural economy.

--- END ---