BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall amend the state's water quality standards
to authorize compliance schedules for discharge permits issued under
this chapter that implement a total maximum daily load, to provide that
a compliance schedule may exceed ten years only if, during the first
ten years, the entity seeking an extended compliance schedule has made
significant investments in advanced treatment technology and has
substantially reduced pollutant loading. In making this determination,
the department shall consider the nature, magnitude, and cost of point
and nonpoint pollution controls implemented by the entity seeking an
extended compliance schedule. In general, compliance schedules longer
than ten years must be unavailable to implement a total maximum daily
load that involves only point sources. Compliance schedules longer
than ten years may only be authorized for an additional five years at
a time, and the total length of any compliance schedule may not exceed
twenty years. However, compliance schedules for nonpoint sources may
exceed twenty years if corrective actions have been fully implemented
during the first ten years and significant riparian restoration, such
as planting of vegetation, is required to implement a load allocation
needed to achieve compliance and the riparian restoration cannot be
completed within twenty years.
(2) If the United States environmental protection agency
disapproves the amendment to the water quality standards necessary to
implement this section, the department shall work with the United
States environmental protection agency to develop an approved amendment
to the state water quality standards that is as consistent as possible
with the provisions of this section.

--- END ---