BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds ample
evidence of a need to redefine the program of education that is funded
by the state and delivered by school districts to better align with the
stated goal of a basic education. For practical and educational
reasons, wholesale change of the program of basic education and the
funding formulas to support it cannot occur instantaneously. At the
same time, there must be a sense of urgency and a clear commitment to
increase the resources for school districts to maintain educational
programs that give all students the opportunity to meet the state's
basic education goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 OVERSIGHT. (1) A basic education steering
committee is established to monitor and oversee the development of a
new definition of the program of basic education, including the funding
formulas and systems of educator compensation, school and district
accountability, and data necessary to support the implementation of
that program. The steering committee shall be composed of
representatives from the legislative and executive branches, as well as
school administrators and educators.
(2) The steering committee shall:
(a) Provide policy guidance for the work conducted under sections
3 through 8 of this act. Each of the entities under sections 3 through
8 of this act shall submit a preliminary report to the steering
committee by November 15, 2009, and a final report by September 1,
2010;
(b) Develop a proposal for creating an ongoing and independent
commission charged with monitoring and analyzing the relationship
between education policies and finance, implementation of programs at
the school and district level, and student achievement;
(c) Recommend to the governor and the legislature a specific
schedule for phasing-in a new program of basic education and funding
formulas so that any increased requirements occur concurrently with
increased resources for implementation; and
(d) Submit an initial report to the governor and the legislature by
January 1, 2010, and a final report by November 15, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM OF BASIC EDUCATION AND FUNDING
FORMULAS. (1) The legislature intends to redefine the program of
education that fulfills the obligations and requirements of Article IX
of the state Constitution. The program must include an instructional
program of basic education to be delivered by school districts based on
minimum instructional hours, school days, content based on the
essential academic learning requirements and graduation requirements,
and supplemental learning opportunities for students with disabilities,
underachieving students, and students whose primary language is other
than English.
(2) The legislature further intends to redesign the funding
formulas necessary to support the program of basic education, including
considering using a funding model based on prototypical schools.
(3) The office of financial management and the superintendent of
public instruction shall convene a basic education program and funding
working group with broad and inclusive representation. The working
group shall recommend a program of basic education and funding formulas
to support that program, along with a concurrent implementation
schedule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 EFFECTIVE TEACHING AND COMPENSATION. (1)
The legislature intends to establish a comprehensive system of teacher
certification and professional development that is directly aligned
with a revised system of compensation and focused on providing support
for effective teaching. The legislature further intends to provide
adequate resources for school districts to recruit and retain high
quality staff, including administrative and classified staff.
(2) The office of financial management and the professional
educator standards board shall convene an effective teaching and
compensation working group with broad and inclusive representation.
The working group shall recommend a compensation system that provides
support for effective teaching and recruitment and retention of high
quality staff, including any changes to teacher certification and
professional development necessary to align with the system. The
working group shall also recommend a schedule for implementing the new
compensation system to assure that no educator experiences any
reduction in compensation as a result of the new system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 EARLY LEARNING. (1) The legislature intends
to establish a program of early learning for at-risk children that is
part of the program of basic education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction and the department of
early learning shall convene an early learning working group with broad
and inclusive representation. The working group shall recommend a
program of early learning for at-risk children, along with a program
delivery and governance structure and funding model.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 ACCOUNTABLITITY. (1) The legislature finds
that comprehensive education finance reform and the increased
investment of public resources must be accompanied by an equally
comprehensive system of school and school district accountability. The
focus of the accountability system must be on providing assistance for
continuous improvement of student achievement in all schools and all
school districts.
(2) The state board of education shall continue development of a
comprehensive school and school district accountability system,
including identifying the resources and support mechanisms necessary to
implement the system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 LOCAL FINANCE. (1) The legislature finds
that local levy authority and levy equalization remain important
components of the overall finance system in support of the public
schools even though they are outside the state's obligation for basic
education. There must be an equitable basis for supplemental local
funding and a mechanism for property tax-poor school districts to
fairly access supplemental funding.
(2) The office of financial management and the superintendent of
public instruction shall convene a local finance working group with
broad and inclusive representation. The working group shall develop
options for a new system of supplemental school funding through local
school levies and local effort assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 EDUCATION DATA SYSTEMS. (1) It is the
legislature's intent to establish comprehensive education data systems
that monitor student progress, assure educator quality, monitor the
costs of programs, provide for financial integrity, and have the
capacity to link across these various data components by student, by
school, by district, and statewide.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction and the education
research and data center shall convene a data working group with broad
and inclusive representation. The working group shall create a needs
requirement document detailing the specific information and technical
capacity needed for comprehensive education data systems. The working
group shall also develop a proposal for a data governance structure and
identify the costs of implementing the data systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---