BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.008 and 2005 c 143 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every employing agency ((shall fully cooperate with the
authority and)) shall carry out all actions required by the authority
under this chapter including, but not limited to, those necessary for
the operation of benefit plans, education of employees, claims
administration, and ((other activities that may be required by the
authority for administration of this chapter)) appeals process.
(2) Employing agencies shall report all data relating to employees
eligible to participate in benefits or plans administered by the
authority in a format designed and communicated by the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority, or at the authority's direction, an employing
agency shall initially determine and periodically review whether an
employee is eligible for benefits pursuant to the criteria established
under this chapter.
(2) An employing agency shall inform an employee in writing whether
or not he or she is eligible for benefits when initially determined and
upon any subsequent change, including notice of the employee's right to
an appeal.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.011 and 2008 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all ((full-time and career seasonal))
employees of the state, whether or not covered by civil service;
elected and appointed officials of the executive branch of government,
including full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees;
((and includes any or all part-time and temporary employees under the
terms and conditions established under this chapter by the authority;))
justices of the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and
the superior courts; ((and)) members of the state legislature ((or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected
to office after February 20, 1970))((; and employees of state
institutions of higher education)). Pursuant to contractual agreement
with the authority, "employee" may also include((s)): (a) Employees of
a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state and
members of the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who
are elected to office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative
authority of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision
of the state seeks and receives the approval of the authority to
provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority,
as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b) employees of
employee organizations representing state civil service employees, at
the option of each such employee organization, and, effective October
1, 1995, employees of employee organizations currently pooled with
employees of school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance
benefits, at the option of each such employee organization; (c)
employees of a school district if the authority agrees to provide any
of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the
authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350; and (d) employees of a tribal
government, if the governing body of the tribal government seeks and
receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.05.021(1) (f) and (g). "Employee" does not include: Adult family
homeowners; unpaid volunteers; patients of state hospitals; inmates;
employees of the Washington state convention and trade center as
provided in RCW 41.05.110; students of institutions of higher education
as determined by their institution; and any others not expressly
defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority under this
chapter.
(7) "Seasonal employee" means an employee hired to work during a
recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and
anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.
(8) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of
higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose
appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's
academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling
statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining
agreement.
(9) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(((8))) (10) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(((9))) (11) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby
state and public employees may pay their share of group health plan
premiums with pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan
under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of
the internal revenue code.
(((10))) (12) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or
wages.
(((11))) (13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the
eligibility and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction
plan.
(((12))) (14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(((13))) (15) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(((14))) (16) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of
duty" means law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.26.030, members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as
defined in RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as
defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in
the course of employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by
the department of labor and industries.
(((15))) (17) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(((16))) (18) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or
separate agency of state government, including an institution of higher
education; a county, municipality, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivision; and a tribal government
covered by this chapter.
(((17))) (19) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government
as defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security
act of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(((18))) (20) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit
plan whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(((19))) (21) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby
state and public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a
pretax basis to participate in the dependent care assistance program,
medical flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal
revenue code.
(((20))) (22) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a
benefit plan whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary
before taxes to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as
provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26
U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.021 and 2007 c 274 s 1 and 2007 c 114 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; implement
state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for
efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased health services; and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, or a
tribal government, including providing for the participation of those
employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of
essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of
commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority; ((and))
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160 including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW
41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;
(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;
(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility
determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under
this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be
authorized by the board.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.050 and 2007 c 114 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every: (a) Department, division, or separate agency of state
government; (b) county, municipal, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivisions; and (c) tribal governments
as are covered by this chapter, shall provide contributions to
insurance and health care plans for its employees and their dependents,
the content of such plans to be determined by the authority.
Contributions, paid by the county, the municipality, other political
subdivision, or a tribal government for their employees, shall include
an amount determined by the authority to pay such administrative
expenses of the authority as are necessary to administer the plans for
employees of those groups, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(2) If the authority at any time determines that the participation
of a county, municipal, other political subdivision, or a tribal
government covered under this chapter adversely impacts insurance rates
for state employees, the authority shall implement limitations on the
participation of additional county, municipal, other political
subdivisions, or a tribal government.
(3) The contributions of any: (a) Department, division, or
separate agency of the state government; (b) county, municipal, or
other political subdivisions; and (c) any tribal government as are
covered by this chapter, shall be set by the authority, subject to the
approval of the governor for availability of funds as specifically
appropriated by the legislature for that purpose. Insurance and health
care contributions for ferry employees shall be governed by RCW
47.64.270.
(4)(a) ((Beginning September 1, 2003,)) The authority shall collect
from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the composite rate charged to state
agencies, plus an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and
family size as would be charged to state employees, for groups of
district employees enrolled in authority plans ((as of January 1, 2003.
However, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the insurance benefit allocations provided
in section 504, chapter 518, Laws of 2005, plus any additional funding
provided by the legislature for school employee health benefits, plus
an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and family size as
would be charged to state employees, for groups of district employees
enrolled in authority plans as of July 1, 2005)). The authority may
collect these amounts in accordance with the district fiscal year, as
described in RCW 28A.505.030.
(b) For all groups of district employees enrolling in authority
plans for the first time after September 1, 2003, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district an amount equal to the
composite rate charged to state agencies, plus an amount equal to the
employee premiums by plan and by family size as would be charged to
state employees, only if the authority determines that this method of
billing the districts will not result in a material difference between
revenues from districts and expenditures made by the authority on
behalf of districts and their employees. The authority may collect
these amounts in accordance with the district fiscal year, as described
in RCW 28A.505.030.
(c) If the authority determines at any time that the conditions in
(b) of this subsection cannot be met, the authority shall offer
enrollment to additional groups of district employees on a tiered rate
structure until such time as the authority determines there would be no
material difference between revenues and expenditures under a composite
rate structure for all district employees enrolled in authority plans.
(d) The authority may charge districts a one-time set-up fee for
employee groups enrolling in authority plans for the first time.
(e) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "District" means school district and educational service
district; and
(ii) "Tiered rates" means the amounts the authority must pay to
insuring entities by plan and by family size.
(f) Notwithstanding this subsection and RCW 41.05.065(((3))) (4),
the authority may allow districts enrolled on a tiered rate structure
prior to September 1, 2002, to continue participation based on the same
rate structure and under the same conditions and eligibility criteria.
(5) The authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of
the employer contribution to the governor and the director of financial
management for inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the
legislature.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.055 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The public employees' benefits board is created within the
authority. The function of the board is to design and approve
insurance benefit plans for ((state)) employees and ((school district
employees)) to establish eligibility criteria for participation in
insurance benefit plans.
(2) The board shall be composed of nine members appointed by the
governor as follows:
(a) Two representatives of state employees, one of whom shall
represent an employee union certified as exclusive representative of at
least one bargaining unit of classified employees, and one of whom is
retired, is covered by a program under the jurisdiction of the board,
and represents an organized group of retired public employees;
(b) Two representatives of school district employees, one of whom
shall represent an association of school employees and one of whom is
retired, and represents an organized group of retired school employees;
(c) Four members with experience in health benefit management and
cost containment; and
(d) The administrator.
(3) The member who represents an association of school employees
and one member appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section
shall be nonvoting members until such time that there are no less than
twelve thousand school district employee subscribers enrolled with the
authority for health care coverage.
(4) The governor shall appoint the initial members of the board to
staggered terms not to exceed four years. Members appointed thereafter
shall serve two-year terms. Members of the board shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for their
travel expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board shall prescribe rules for the
conduct of its business. The administrator shall serve as chair of the
board. Meetings of the board shall be at the call of the chair.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.05.065 and 2007 c 156 s 10 and 2007 c 114 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for ((all)) employees. In
developing these plans, the board shall consider the following
elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits; and
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities((; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans)).
(3) To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, ((employee eligibility criteria related to the number of
hours worked and the)) benefits provided to employees shall be
substantially equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan
((and eligibility criteria)) in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in
this subsection (((2)(g))) shall prohibit changes or increases in
employee point-of-service payments or employee premium payments for
benefits or the administration of a high deductible health plan in
conjunction with a health savings account. The board may establish
employee eligibility criteria which are not substantially equivalent to
employee eligibility criteria in effect on January 1, 1993.
(((3))) (4) Except if bargained for under chapter 41.80 RCW, the
board shall design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of
employee and retired employee participation and coverage, including
establishment of eligibility criteria subject to the requirements of
((RCW 41.05.066. The same terms and conditions of participation and
coverage, including eligibility criteria, shall apply to state
employees and to school district employees and educational service
district employees)) this chapter. Employer groups obtaining benefits
through contractual agreement with the authority for employees defined
in RCW 41.05.011(6) (a) through (d) may contractually agree with the
authority to benefits eligibility criteria which differs from that
determined by the board. The eligibility criteria established by the
board shall be no more restrictive than the following:
(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, an
employee is eligible for benefits from the date of employment if the
employing agency anticipates he or she will work an average of at least
eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month for
more than six consecutive months. An employee determined ineligible
for benefits at the beginning of his or her employment shall become
eligible in the following circumstances:
(i) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month and for at least eight hours in each month and whose anticipated
duration of employment is revised from less than or equal to six
consecutive months to more than six consecutive months becomes eligible
when the revision is made.
(ii) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month over a period of six consecutive months and for at least eight
hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the
first of the month following the six-month averaging period.
(b) A seasonal employee is eligible for benefits from the date of
employment if the employing agency anticipates that he or she will work
an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight
hours in each month of the season. A seasonal employee determined
ineligible at the beginning of his or her employment who works an
average of at least half-time, as defined by the board, per month over
a period of six consecutive months and at least eight hours in each of
those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the first of the month
following the six-month averaging period. A benefits-eligible seasonal
employee who works a season of less than nine months shall not be
eligible for the employer contribution during the off season, but may
continue enrollment in benefits during the off season by self-paying
for the benefits. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee who works a
season of nine months or more is eligible for the employer contribution
through the off season following each season worked.
(c) Faculty are eligible as follows:
(i) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will work
half–time or more for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are eligible for benefits from the date of employment.
Eligibility shall continue until the beginning of the first full month
of the next instructional year, unless the employment relationship is
terminated, in which case eligibility shall cease the first month
following the notice of termination or the effective date of the
termination, whichever is later.
(ii) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work for
the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are
eligible for benefits at the beginning of the second consecutive
quarter or semester of employment in which he or she is anticipated to
work, or has actually worked, half-time or more. Such an employee
shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions for
benefits if the employee works at least half-time in a quarter or
semester. Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work
for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period, but
who actually work half-time or more throughout the entire instructional
year, are eligible for summer or off-quarter coverage. Faculty who
have met the criteria of this subsection (4)(c)(ii), who work at least
two quarters of the academic year with an average academic year
workload of half-time or more for three quarters of the academic year,
and who have worked an average of half-time or more in each of the two
preceding academic years shall continue to receive uninterrupted
employer contributions for benefits if he or she works at least half-time in a quarter or semester or works two quarters of the academic
year with an average academic workload each academic year of half-time
or more for three quarters. Eligibility under this section ceases
immediately if this criteria is not met.
(iii) Faculty may establish or maintain eligibility for benefits by
working for more than one institution of higher education. When
faculty work for more than one institution of higher education, those
institutions shall prorate the employer contribution costs, or if
eligibility is reached through one institution, that institution will
pay the full employer contribution. Faculty working for more than one
institution must alert his or her employers to his or her potential
eligibility in order to establish eligibility.
(iv) The employing agency must provide written notice to faculty
who are potentially eligible for benefits under this subsection (4)(c)
of their potential eligibility.
(v) To be eligible for maintenance of benefits through averaging
under (c)(ii) of this subsection, faculty must provide written
notification to his or her employing agency or agencies of his or her
potential eligibility.
(d) A legislator is eligible for benefits on the date his or her
term begins. All other elected and full-time appointed officials of
the legislative and executive branches of state government are eligible
for benefits on the date his or her term begins or they take the oath
of office, whichever occurs first.
(e) A justice of the supreme court and judges of the court of
appeals and the superior courts become eligible for benefits on the
date he or she takes the oath of office.
(f) Except as provided in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection,
eligibility ceases for any employee the first of the month following
termination of the employment relationship.
(g) In determining eligibility under this section, the employing
agency may disregard training hours, standby hours, or temporary
changes in work hours as determined by the authority under this
section.
(h) Insurance coverage for all eligible employees begins on the
first day of the month following the date when eligibility for benefits
is established. If the date eligibility is established is the first
working day of a month, insurance coverage begins on that date.
(i) Eligibility for an employee whose work circumstances are
described by more than one of the eligibility categories in (a) through
(e) of this subsection shall be determined solely by the criteria of
the category that most closely describes the employee's work
circumstances.
(j) Except for an employee eligible for benefits under (b) or
(c)(ii) of this subsection, an employee who has established eligibility
for benefits under this section shall remain eligible for benefits each
month in which he or she is in pay status for eight or more hours, if
(i) he or she remains in a benefits-eligible position and (ii) leave
from the benefits-eligible position is approved by the employing
agency. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee is eligible for the
employer contribution in any month of his or her season in which he or
she is in pay status eight or more hours during that month.
Eligibility ends if these conditions are not met, the employment
relationship is terminated, or the employee voluntarily transfers to a
noneligible position.
(k) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Academic year" means summer, fall, winter, and spring quarters
or semesters;
(ii) "Half-time" means one-half of the full-time academic workload
as determined by each institution, except that half-time for community
and technical college faculty employees shall have the same meaning as
"part-time" under RCW 28B.50.489;
(iii) "Benefits-eligible position" shall be defined by the board.
(((4))) (5) The board may authorize premium contributions for an
employee and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the
use of cost-efficient managed health care systems. ((During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the board may only authorize premium
contributions for an employee and the employee's dependents that are
the same, regardless of an employee's status as represented or
nonrepresented by a collective bargaining unit under the personnel
system reform act of 2002. The board shall require participating
school district and educational service district employees to pay at
least the same employee premiums by plan and family size as state
employees pay.
(5))) (6) The board shall develop a health savings account option
for employees that conform to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(((6))) (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
the board shall develop a high deductible health plan to be offered in
conjunction with a health savings account developed under subsection
(((5))) (6) of this section.
(((7))) (8) Employees shall choose participation in one of the
health care benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted
to waive coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(((8))) (9) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring
entities that desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and
casualty insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The
board may approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring
entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of
Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests
of employees and the state. The board shall adopt rules setting forth
criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.
(((9))) (10) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits
board shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care
insurance plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW.
Such programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments, political subdivisions, and
tribal governments not otherwise enrolled in the public employees'
benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and
conditions established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize
the financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(11) The board may establish penalties to be imposed by the
authority when the eligibility determinations of an employing agency
fail to comply with the criteria under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 41.05.053 (Community and technical
colleges -- Part-time academic employees -- Continuous health care
eligibility -- Employer contributions) and 2007 c 302 s 2 & 2006 c 308 s
2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 An employee determined eligible for
benefits prior to January 1, 2010, shall not have his or her
eligibility terminated pursuant to the criteria established under this
act unless the termination is the result of: (1) A voluntary reduction
in work hours; or (2) the employee's employment with an agency other
than the agency by which he or she was determined eligible prior to
January 1, 2010.

--- END ---