BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2009, and each subsequent December 31st
thereafter, each housing authority created under this chapter must
provide a report to the department of community, trade, and economic
development describing how the following have been spent or otherwise
utilized:
(a) Received revenues resulting from legislation pertaining to
housing assistance programs enacted after January 1, 2002; and
(b) Received revenues for housing assistance programs in which
vouchers are a permissible use of funds.
(2) The report required under this section must exclude revenues
received for capital projects and be completed within the existing
funds of each authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2009, and each subsequent December 31st
thereafter, each county must provide a report to the department of
community, trade, and economic development describing how the following
have been spent or otherwise utilized:
(a) Received revenues resulting from legislation pertaining to
housing assistance programs enacted after January 1, 2002; and
(b) Received revenues for housing assistance programs in which
vouchers are a permissible use of funds.
(2) The report required under this section must exclude revenues
received for capital projects and be completed within the existing
funds of each county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
By July 1, 2010, and each subsequent July 1st thereafter, the
department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
house of representatives and the senate that summarizes the reports
submitted to the department under sections 1 and 2 of this act. The
report required under this section must be completed within the
existing funds of the department.

--- END ---