BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that counties
and cities, the general purpose local governments that are closest to
the people, are charged with providing numerous and diverse services to
their residents. In providing these services, counties and cities must
respond to legislative and citizen directives, and a changing, and
often challenging, financial landscape.
(2) The legislature recognizes that population growth and the
enactment and maturation of the growth management act has resulted in
many governance changes throughout the state, as annexations and
incorporations have expanded existing cities and created new
incorporated areas. These actions have been consistent with growth
management act principles that call for growth to be thoughtfully and
deliberately directed to urban areas and areas characterized by urban
growth. These actions have also been consistent with pronouncements of
the act specifying that, in general, cities are most appropriate
providers of urban governmental services, the services and facilities
that are historically and typically provided in cities.
(3) Recognizing the governance efficiencies that will result from
the annexation of urban and urbanizing areas in the state's largest
counties, the principles of fairness that will take root as rural
residents cease to bear the costs of providing urban governmental
services in unincorporated urban and urbanizing areas, and the
unprecedented financial pressures that local governments face, the
legislature intends to establish new annexation mechanisms and related
fiscal provisions that apply in counties with more than one million
five hundred thousand residents.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.415 and 2006 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any city with a population less
than four hundred thousand and which is located in a county with a
population greater than six hundred thousand that annexes an area
consistent with its comprehensive plan required by chapter 36.70A RCW,
may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the city. The tax may only be imposed by a city if:
(a) The city has commenced annexation of an area under chapter
35.13 or 35A.14 RCW having a population of at least ten thousand people
prior to January 1, ((2010)) 2012; and
(b) The city legislative authority determines by resolution or
ordinance that the projected cost to provide municipal services to the
annexation area exceeds the projected general revenue that the city
would otherwise receive from the annexation area on an annual basis.
(2) The tax authorized under this section is a credit against the
state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue
shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the city at no
cost to the city and shall remit the tax to the city as provided in RCW
82.14.060.
(3) The maximum rate of tax any city may impose under this section
shall be 0.2 percent for the total number of annexed areas the city may
annex. The rate of the tax imposed under this section is 0.1 percent
for each annexed area population that is greater than ten thousand and
less than twenty thousand. The rate of the tax imposed under this
section shall be 0.2 percent for an annexed area which the population
is greater than twenty thousand.
(4) The tax imposed by this section shall only be imposed at the
beginning of a fiscal year and shall continue for no more than ten
years from the date the tax is first imposed. Tax rate increases due
to additional annexed areas shall be effective on July 1st of the
fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the annexation occurred,
provided that notice is given to the department as set forth in
subsection (8) of this section.
(5) All revenue collected under this section shall be used solely
to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for the annexation
area.
(6) The revenues from the tax authorized in this section may not
exceed that which the city deems necessary to generate revenue equal to
the difference between the city's cost to provide, maintain, and
operate municipal services for the annexation area and the general
revenues that the cities would otherwise expect to receive from the
annexation during a year. If the revenues from the tax authorized in
this section and the revenues from the annexation area exceed the costs
to the city to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for
the annexation area during a given year, the city shall notify the
department and the tax distributions authorized in this section shall
be suspended for the remainder of the year.
(7) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the legislative authority of
a city shall adopt an ordinance that includes the following:
(a) The rate of tax under this section that shall be imposed within
the city; and
(b) The threshold amount for the first fiscal year following the
annexation and passage of the ordinance.
(8) The tax shall cease to be distributed to the city for the
remainder of the fiscal year once the threshold amount has been
reached. No later than March 1st of each year, the city shall provide
the department with a new threshold amount for the next fiscal year,
and notice of any applicable tax rate changes. Distributions of tax
under this section shall begin again on July 1st of the next fiscal
year and continue until the new threshold amount has been reached or
June 30th, whichever is sooner. Any revenue generated by the tax in
excess of the threshold amount shall belong to the state of Washington.
Any amount resulting from the threshold amount less the total fiscal
year distributions, as of June 30th, shall not be carried forward to
the next fiscal year.
(9) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Annexation area" means an area that has been annexed to a city
under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW. "Annexation area" includes all
territory described in the city resolution.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(c) "Municipal services" means those services customarily provided
to the public by city government.
(d) "Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.
(e) "Threshold amount" means the maximum amount of tax
distributions as determined by the city in accordance with subsection
(6) of this section that the department shall distribute to the city
generated from the tax imposed under this section in a fiscal year.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.26.086 and 1994 c 179 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Transportation improvement account projects selected for funding
programs after fiscal year 1995 are governed by the requirements of
this section.
The board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of
each year for the ensuing fiscal year to urban counties, cities with a
population of five thousand and over, and to transportation benefit
districts. Projects may include, but are not limited to, multi-agency
projects and arterial improvement projects in fast-growing areas. The
board shall endeavor to provide geographical diversity in selecting
improvement projects to be funded from the account.
The intent of the program is to improve mobility of people and
goods in Washington state by supporting economic development and
environmentally responsive solutions to our statewide transportation
system needs.
To be eligible to receive these funds, a project must be consistent
with the Growth Management Act, the Clean Air Act including conformity,
and the Commute Trip Reduction Law and consideration must have been
given to the project's relationship, both actual and potential, with
the statewide rail passenger program and rapid mass transit. Projects
must be consistent with any adopted high capacity transportation plan,
must consider existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels
attributable to economic development or growth and all modes of
transportation and safety, and must be partially funded by local
government or private contributions, or a combination of such
contributions. Priority consideration shall be given to those projects
with the greatest percentage of local or private contribution, or both.
A city or town located within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more may not receive funds after
January 1, 2012, if the city has not annexed any potential annexation
areas recognized in the city's comprehensive plan or related document
prior to the effective date of this act.
Within one year after board approval of an application for funding,
the lead agency shall provide written certification to the board of the
pledged local and private funding for the phase of the project
approved. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify its
funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town located within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more may not receive funds under this
chapter after January 1, 2012, if the city or town has not annexed any
potential annexation areas recognized in the city's comprehensive plan
or related document prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislative authority of a county
with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more may
impose an excise tax on the privilege of engaging in business as a
utility. The tax is equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by a rate not exceeding six percent.
(2) A tax imposed under this section only applies to the
unincorporated areas of the county. The tax must be expended only for
capital projects and services provided within the unincorporated area
of the county.
(3) A utility subject to tax under this section must add the tax to
the rates or charges it makes for utility services and separately state
the amount of tax on billings.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Cable service utility" means a person providing cable service
as defined in the federal telecommunications act of 1996.
(b) "Electrical power utility" has the same meaning as light and
power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010.
(c) "Gas utility" has the same meaning as gas distribution business
as defined in RCW 82.16.010.
(d) "Gross income of the business" is defined as provided in RCW
82.04.080.
(e) "Sewer utility" means a sewerage collection business as defined
in RCW 82.16.020.
(f) "Solid waste utility" means a solid waste collection business
as defined in RCW 82.18.010.
(g) "Telephone utility" means a person providing telecommunications
service as defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(h) "Water utility" means a water distribution business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010.
(i) "Utility" means an electrical power utility, gas utility,
telephone utility, water utility, sewer utility, solid waste utility,
or cable service utility.
(5) A county may provide exemptions for sales by utilities to
business customers, such as, manufacturing facilities, aircraft repair
facilities, industrial parks, industrial facilities, farm businesses,
and computer data centers. A county may not provide a general
exemption for sales by utilities to residential customers unless
business customers are also exempt.
(6) A county must allow a credit against the cable service utility
tax for any franchise fee paid by the cable service utility to the
county.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, a city or town
located partially or wholly within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more may impose a tax upon the gross
income or gross receipts of a water-sewer district.
(2) A city or town imposing the tax authorized under this section
may not impose a rate of tax that exceeds six percent.
(3) A city or town may impose the tax authorized under this section
only if the city has annexed a potential annexation area that has been
recognized in an ordinance or resolution adopted by the city or town
prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35A.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, a city or town
located partially or wholly within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more may impose a tax upon the gross
income or gross receipts of a water-sewer district.
(2) A city or town imposing the tax authorized under this section
may not impose a rate of tax that exceeds six percent.
(3) A city or town may impose the tax authorized under this section
only if the city has annexed a potential annexation area that has been
recognized in an ordinance or resolution adopted by the city or town
prior to the effective date of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.46.035 and 1992 c 221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s c 32 s 33
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects, park maintenance and
operation expenditures, or both funded in whole or in part from the
proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall indicate that
such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that may be
reasonably available for ((such capital projects)) these purposes.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city that plans
under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may impose an additional excise tax on each
sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the
county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at
a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price.
Any county choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(2) and any city within
such a county may only adopt an ordinance imposing the excise tax
authorized by this section if the ordinance is first authorized by a
proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district
voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
district or at a special election within the taxing district called by
the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the
voters.
(3) Revenues generated from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of
this section shall be used by such counties and cities ((solely)) for
financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan
element of a comprehensive plan, and, at the option of the city or
county, park maintenance and operation expenditures. However, revenues
(a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to
March 1, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the
original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b)
committed prior to March 1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a
project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is
completed.
(4) Revenues generated by the tax imposed by this section shall be
deposited in a separate account.
(5) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads,
highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals,
bridges, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, and
planning, construction, reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or
improvement of parks.
(6) When the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW
36.70A.340 with the secretary of state and the appropriate county or
city, the county or city's authority to impose the additional excise
tax under this section shall be temporarily rescinded until the
governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.55.050 and 2008 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state the conditions,
if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section.
(2)(a) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition
placed before the voters under this section may authorize annual
increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six
consecutive years, during which period each year's authorized maximum
legal levy shall be used as the base upon which an increased levy limit
for the succeeding year is computed, but the ballot proposition must
state the dollar rate proposed only for the first year of the
consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or a specified index
to be used for determining a limit factor, such as the consumer price
index, which need not be the same for all years, by which the regular
tax levy for the district may be increased in each of the subsequent
consecutive years. Elections for this purpose must be held at a
primary or general election. The title of each ballot measure must
state the limited purposes for which the proposed annual increases
during the specified period of up to six consecutive years shall be
used((, and funds raised under the levy shall not supplant existing
funds used for these purposes)).
(b) Funds raised by a levy under this subsection shall not supplant
existing funds used for the limited purpose specified in the ballot
title. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the
actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot
measure is approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes
lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans,
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract
provisions beyond the control of the taxing district receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures. This subsection
(2)(b) does not apply to levies approved by the voters in 2009, 2010,
and 2011.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made shall not exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot
measure under this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2011, the state auditor shall conduct a
performance audit of any county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more to specifically determine whether policy
changes and programs the county has adopted since January 1, 2009, will
effectively reduce overhead and other costs, improve services, and
streamline operations. The performance audit must identify current
deficiencies in recognized best practices in the provision of county
goods and services and how the provision of these goods and services
could be provided more efficiently and effectively. As part of the
performance audit, the auditor shall also evaluate the amount of local
and regional services provided by the county within and outside city
limits and contrast this with other large counties in Washington and
with counties of similar size in other states. The state auditor shall
use money distributed to the auditor under RCW 82.08.020(5) to pay for
the performance audit required under this section.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 5 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---