BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.40.130 and 1995 c 386 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing body of a city, while not required by legislative
mandate to do so, may, ((after July 1, 1995,)) by resolution or
ordinance for the purposes authorized under RCW 67.40.170 and
67.40.190, fix and impose a sales tax on the charge for rooms to be
used for lodging by transients in accordance with the terms of chapter
386, Laws of 1995. Such tax shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under RCW 67.40.090, but only those taxable
persons located within the boundaries of the city imposing the tax.
Until January 1, 2021, the rate of such tax imposed by a city shall be
two percent of the charge for rooms to be used for lodging by
transients. ((Any such tax imposed under this section shall not be
collected prior to January 1, 2000.)) On and after January 1, 2021, the
rate of such tax imposed by a city shall be one percent of the charge
for rooms to be used for lodging by transients. The tax authorized
under this section shall be levied and collected in the same manner as
those taxes authorized under chapter 82.14 RCW. Penalties, receipts,
abatements, refunds, and all other similar matters relating to the tax
shall be as provided in chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) The tax levied under this section shall remain in effect and
not be modified for that period for which the principal and interest
obligations of state bonds issued to finance the expansion of the state
convention and trade center under RCW 67.40.030 remain outstanding.
(3) As used in this section, the term "city" means a municipality
that has within its boundaries a convention and trade facility as
defined in RCW 67.40.020.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2030.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.40.090 and 2002 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Commencing April 1, 1982, there is imposed, and the department
of revenue shall collect, in King county a special excise tax on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on
any premises having fewer than sixty lodging units. The legislature on
behalf of the state pledges to maintain and continue this tax until the
bonds authorized by this chapter are fully redeemed, both principal and
interest.
(2) ((The rate of the tax imposed under this section shall be as
provided in this subsection.
(a) From April 1, 1982, through December 31, 1982, inclusive, the
rate shall be three percent in the city of Seattle and two percent in
King county outside the city of Seattle.
(b) From January 1, 1983, through June 30, 1988, inclusive, the
rate shall be five percent in the city of Seattle and two percent in
King county outside the city of Seattle.
(c) From July 1, 1988, through December 31, 1992, inclusive, the
rate shall be six percent in the city of Seattle and two and four-tenths percent in King county outside the city of Seattle.
(d) From January 1, 1993, and until bonds and all other borrowings
authorized under RCW 67.40.030 are retired,)) Until January 1, 2030,
the rate of tax imposed under this section shall be seven percent in
the city of Seattle and two and eight-tenths percent in King county
outside the city of Seattle. On and after January 1, 2030, the rate of
tax imposed under this section shall be six percent in the city of
Seattle and two and four-tenths percent in King county outside the city
of Seattle.
(((e) Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this subsection, on
and after the change date, the rate shall be six percent in the city of
Seattle and two and four-tenths percent in King county outside the city
of Seattle.
(f) As used in this section, "change date" means the October 1st
next occurring after certification occurs under (g) of this subsection.
(g) On August 1st of 1998 and of each year thereafter until
certification occurs under this subsection, the state treasurer shall
determine whether seventy-one and forty-three one-hundredths percent of
the revenues actually collected and deposited with the state treasurer
for the tax imposed under this section during the twelve months ending
June 30th of that year, excluding penalties and interest, exceeds the
amount actually paid in debt service during the same period for bonds
issued under RCW 67.40.030 by at least two million dollars. If so, the
state treasurer shall so certify to the department of revenue.
(3) The proceeds of the special excise tax shall be deposited as
provided in this subsection.
(a) Through June 30, 1988, inclusive, all proceeds shall be
deposited in the state convention and trade center account.
(b) From July 1, 1988, through December 31, 1992, inclusive,
eighty-three and thirty-three one-hundredths percent of the proceeds
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account.
The remainder shall be deposited in the state convention and trade
center operations account.
(c) From January 1, 1993, until the change date)) Until January 1,
2030, eighty-five and seventy-one-hundredths percent of the proceeds
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account.
The remainder shall be deposited in the state convention and trade
center operations account.
(((d) On and after the change date)) On and after January 1, 2030,
eighty-three and thirty-three one-hundredths percent of the proceeds
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account.
The remainder shall be deposited in the state convention and trade
center operations account.
(((4))) (3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed under this
section.

--- END ---