BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.180 and 2008 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section shall contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county shall be exempt from the provisions of
(a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged
for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160:
PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues, together with any
investment earnings thereon, not immediately necessary for actual
payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be used: (i) In
any county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more, for repayment either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds
or of any county fund or account from which a loan was made, the
proceeds from the bonds or loan being used to pay for constructing,
installing, improving, and equipping stadium capital improvement
projects, and to pay for any engineering, planning, financial, legal
and professional services incident to the development of such stadium
capital improvement projects, regardless of the date the debt for such
capital improvement projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county
with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more, for
repayment or refinancing of bonded indebtedness incurred prior to
January 1, 1997, for any purpose authorized by this section or relating
to stadium repairs or rehabilitation, including but not limited to the
cost of settling legal claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest
payments on short-term loans, and any other purpose for which such debt
has been incurred if the county has created a public stadium authority
to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or
(iii) in other counties, for county-owned facilities for agricultural
promotion until January 1, 2009, and thereafter for any purpose
authorized in this chapter.
A county is exempt under this subsection with respect to city
revenue or general obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if
such bonds mature before January 1, 2013. If any county located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, pledged the tax revenue
for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or general
obligation bonds, the county is exempt under this subsection with
respect to revenue or general obligation bonds issued after January 1,
2007, only if the bonds mature before January 1, 2021. Such a county
may only use funds under this subsection (2)(b) for constructing or
improving facilities authorized under this chapter, including county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion, and must perform an annual
financial audit of organizations receiving funding on the use of the
funds.
As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects"
may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility,
restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating facilities,
parking facilities and scoreboard and information system adjacent to or
within a county owned stadium, together with equipment, utilities,
accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The stadium
restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) No city within a county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more may levy the tax authorized by this section.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(c)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county ((that has
levied the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26,
1975, either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and
interest on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and
issued pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized
and issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160)) with a population of
one million five hundred thousand or more shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars shall
only be used as follows:
(i) ((Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December
31, 2000, and)) Seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December
31, 2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, heritage
and preservation programs, the arts, and the performing arts. Moneys
spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i) shall be used for the purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(i) in all parts of the county.
(ii) ((Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December
31, 2000, and)) Thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December
31, 2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more, all
revenues under this section shall be used to retire the debt on the
stadium, until the debt on the stadium is retired, and then deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060.
((On and after the date the debt on the stadium is retired, and through
December 31, 2015, all revenues under this section in a county of a
[one] million or more shall be deposited in the special account under
(f) of this subsection.))
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, ((in a county
with a population of one million or more,)) all revenues under this
section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account
under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) On and after January 1, 2021, ((at least thirty-seven and
one-half percent of)) revenues ((under this section in a county of a
[one] million or more)) shall be deposited ((in the special account
under (f) of this subsection)) by the county in a special county arts,
regional center, low-income housing, and community development fund as
provided in section 4 of this act.
(e) ((At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
shall be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(e) may be used for payment of principal and
interest on bonds issued for capital projects. Qualifying
organizations receiving moneys under this subsection (3)(e) must be
financially stable and have at least the following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(f))) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed pursuant
to (a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001, through
July 1, 2008, shall be deposited in a special account. The account may
only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of this subsection.
(((g))) (f) School districts and schools shall not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection.
(((h))) (g) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums,
heritage museums, heritage and preservation programs, the arts, and the
performing arts, and moneys distributed for tourism promotion shall be
in addition to and may not be used to replace or supplant any other
funding by the legislative body of the county.
(((i))) (h) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
class AA county shall be allocated to nonprofit organizations formed
for the express purpose of tourism promotion in the county. Such
organizations shall use moneys from the taxes to promote events in all
parts of the class AA county.
(((j))) (i) No taxes collected under this section may be used for
the operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged.
Expenditures for operation or maintenance include all expenditures
other than expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or
that directly increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of
existing fixed assets.
(((k))) (j) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt
service on bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this
section are or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service
requirements on such bonds.
(((l))) (k) If a substantial part of the operation and management
of a public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
shall be retired. This subsection (3)(((l))) (k) does not apply in
respect to a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to,
owned by, or constructed by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW or a stadium and exhibition center.
(((m))) (l) The county shall not lease a public stadium that is
financed directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged
to, or authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major
league sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of
first refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(((m))) (l) does not apply to contracts
in existence on April 1, 1986.
If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of this
subsection (3) invalid, then that invalid provision shall be null and
void and the remainder of this section is not affected. ((Section 2,
chapter 264, Laws of 2008 expires July 1, 2009.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.049 and 2008 c 264 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of any county may impose a sales and use
tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail
car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall be one percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax or rental value of the
vehicle in the case of a use tax. Proceeds of the tax shall not be
used to subsidize any professional sports team and shall be used solely
for the following purposes:
(1) Acquiring, constructing, maintaining, or operating public
sports stadium facilities;
(2) Engineering, planning, financial, legal, or professional
services incidental to public sports stadium facilities;
(3) Youth or amateur sport activities or facilities; ((or))
(4) Debt or refinancing debt issued for the purposes of subsection
(1) of this section; or
(5) For deposit into a special county arts, regional center, low-income housing, and community development fund as provided in section
4 of this act.
In a county with a population less than one million five hundred
thousand, at least seventy-five percent of the tax imposed under this
section shall be used for the purposes of subsections (1), (2), and (4)
of this section. In a county of one million five hundred thousand or
more, at least seventy-five percent of the tax imposed under this
section shall be used to retire the debt on the stadium under RCW
67.28.180(2)(b)(ii), until that debt is fully retired, and at least
seventy-five percent must be used as required under subsection (5) of
this section after the debt is fully retired.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.360 and 2008 c 86 s 104 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more may impose a special stadium
sales and use tax upon the retail sale or use within the county by
restaurants, taverns, and bars of food and beverages that are taxable
by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax
shall not exceed five-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax. The tax authorized under this subsection is in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall not be credited against any
other tax imposed upon the same taxable event. As used in this
section, "restaurant" does not include grocery stores, mini-markets, or
convenience stores. A county may not impose the tax authorized in this
subsection on or after January 1, 2016.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more may impose a special stadium
sales and use tax upon retail car rentals within the county that are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of
the tax shall not exceed two percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use
tax. The tax imposed under this subsection is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall not be credited against any other tax
imposed upon the same taxable event.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the revenue
from the taxes imposed under the authority of this section shall be
used for the purpose of principal and interest payments on bonds,
issued by the county, to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain,
equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium. Revenues from
the taxes authorized in this section may be used for design and other
preconstruction costs of the baseball stadium until bonds are issued
for the baseball stadium. The county shall issue bonds, in an amount
determined to be necessary by the public facilities district, for the
district to acquire, construct, own, and equip the baseball stadium.
The county shall have no obligation to issue bonds in an amount greater
than that which would be supported by the tax revenues under this
section, RCW 82.14.0485, and 36.38.010(4) (a) and (b). If the revenue
from the taxes imposed under the authority of this section exceeds the
amount needed for such principal and interest payments in any year, the
excess shall be used solely:
(((a))) (i) For early retirement of the bonds issued for the
baseball stadium; and
(((b))) (ii) If the revenue from the taxes imposed under this
section exceeds the amount needed for the purposes in (a)(i) of this
subsection in any year, the excess shall be placed in a contingency
fund which may only be used to pay unanticipated capital costs on the
baseball stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial construction.
(b) After the bonds issued for the construction of the baseball
stadium are retired, the revenue from the taxes imposed under the
authority of this section must be deposited by the county in a special
county arts, regional center, low-income housing, and community
development fund as provided in section 4 of this act.
(4) The proceeds of any bonds issued for the baseball stadium shall
be provided to the district.
(5) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means "baseball
stadium" as defined in RCW 82.14.0485.
(((6) The taxes imposed under this section shall expire when the
bonds issued for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired,
but not later than twenty years after the taxes are first collected.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 67.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Revenue deposited in a special county arts, regional center,
low-income housing, and community development fund, as provided in RCW
67.28.180(3)(d), 82.14.049, and 82.14.360, must be used only for
regional centers, art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums,
heritage and preservation programs, the arts, the performing arts, low-income housing, community development, and human services.
(2) The county must distribute money in the account as follows:
(a) For the years 2012 through 2015:
(i) Eight percent for art museums, cultural museums, heritage
museums, heritage and preservation programs, the arts, and the
performing arts. The distribution in this subsection (2)(a)(i) begins
in 2013;
(ii) Two and one-half percent for regional centers in the
unincorporated area and cities with a population less than four hundred
thousand;
(iii) For deposit into a reserve account: (A) Twenty percent in
2013, (B) twenty-eight percent in 2014, and (C) thirty-five percent in
2015;
(iv) One million dollars in 2012, two million dollars in 2013, and
three million dollars in 2014 and 2015, for deposit into the community
preservation and development authority account created in RCW
43.167.040;
(v) Eight million dollars each year for distributions to nonprofit
organizations or public housing authorities for affordable workforce
housing near or at transit stations;
(vi) The remainder for human services.
(b) For the years 2016 through 2020:
(i) Thirty-three percent for art museums, cultural museums,
heritage museums, heritage and preservation programs, the arts, and the
performing arts;
(ii) Ten percent for regional centers in the unincorporated area
and cities with a population less than four hundred thousand;
(iii) Three million dollars each year for deposit into the
community preservation and development authority account created in RCW
43.167.040; and
(iv) Eight million dollars each year for distributions to nonprofit
organizations or public housing authorities for affordable workforce
housing near or at transit stations.
(c) For the years 2021 and thereafter:
(i) Twenty-two percent for art museums, cultural museums, heritage
museums, heritage and preservation programs, the arts, and the
performing arts;
(ii) Twenty-five percent for regional centers in the unincorporated
area and cities with a population less than four hundred thousand;
(iii) Three million dollars each year for deposit into the
community preservation and development authority account created in RCW
43.167.040; and
(iv) The remainder for distributions to nonprofit organizations or
public housing authorities for affordable workforce housing near or at
transit stations.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "affordable workforce
housing" means housing for a single person, family, or unrelated
persons living together whose income is at or below one hundred twenty
percent of the median income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the housing is located.

--- END ---