BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.127.140 and 2000 c 175 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An in-home services agency shall provide each individual or
designated representative with a written bill of rights affirming each
individual's right to:
(a) A listing of the in-home services offered by the in-home
services agency and those being provided;
(b) The name of the individual supervising the care and the manner
in which that individual may be contacted;
(c) A description of the process for submitting and addressing
complaints;
(d) Submit complaints without retaliation and to have the complaint
addressed by the agency;
(e) Be informed of the state complaint hotline number;
(f) A statement advising the individual or representative of the
right to ongoing participation in the development of the plan of care;
(g) A statement providing that:
(i) The individual or representative is entitled to information
regarding access to the department's listing of providers and to select
any licensee to provide care, subject to the individual's reimbursement
mechanism or other relevant contractual obligations; and
(ii) The individual or representative is entitled to require, at
the individual's expense, that any employee of the licensee providing
care submit to a preemployment urine analysis drug screening test
performed according to standards adopted by the department in rules;
(h) Be treated with courtesy, respect, privacy, and freedom from
abuse and discrimination;
(i) Refuse treatment or services;
(j) Have property treated with respect;
(k) Privacy of personal information and confidentiality of health
care records;
(l) Be cared for by properly trained staff with coordination of
services;
(m) A fully itemized billing statement upon request, including the
date of each service and the charge. Licensees providing services
through a managed care plan shall not be required to provide itemized
billing statements; and
(n) Be informed about advanced directives and the agency's
responsibility to implement them.
(2) An in-home services agency shall ensure rights under this
section are implemented and updated as appropriate.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2004 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are receiving services under the
medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider, each area agency
on aging shall provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under this section to the extent of
available funding. Case management responsibilities incorporate this
oversight, and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that any individual provider who has not been
referred to a consumer by the authority established under chapter 3,
Laws of 2002 has met any training requirements established by the
department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessment and reauthorization of services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider who was referred by the authority, the area agency on aging
must notify the authority regarding its concerns; and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted for any individual
provider who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority.
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h) A clear statement indicating that a consumer receiving services
under this section has the following rights:
(i) The right to require, at the consumer's expense, that an
individual provider providing services to the consumer submit to a
preemployment urine analysis drug screening test performed according to
standards adopted by the department in rules; and
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (h)(ii)(B) of this subsection, ((a
clear statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under
this section has)) the right to waive any of the case management
services offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a
clear indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of
these services.
(((ii))) (B) The consumer's right to waive case management services
does not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority. The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

--- END ---