BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.210 and 1985 c 390 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees
to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and
dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as
follows:
One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund, and in no event shall such one-half be less than twelve dollars
and fifty cents per each resident student per quarter, and thirty-seven
dollars and fifty cents per each nonresident student per quarter to the
"University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder
thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so
credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used
exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining,
equipping, or furnishing buildings, paying debt service on bonds
including university bonds under chapter 28B.140 RCW, chapter 28B.142
RCW, or RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.335 issued for such purpose as
authorized by the legislature, and for certificates of participation
under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized
in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of
Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of
principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter
28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW
28B.20.725(5).

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.310 and 1985 c 390 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such
larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments
required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; the remainder
thereof to the Washington State University building account.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University building
account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings,
equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University
as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the
university, for paying debt service on bonds including university bonds
under chapter 28B.140 RCW, chapter 28B.142 RCW, or RCW 28B.10.300
through 28B.10.335 issued for such purpose as authorized by the
legislature, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94
RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law.
Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing
law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond
retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university,
except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as
authorized by law.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.35.370 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 49 are each amended
to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all
building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State
College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with
such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are
received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of
each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing
bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal
school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts
required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of
the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified
by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a
prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described
normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer
shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the Western Washington University
capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital
projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the
state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital
projects accounts shall be used ((exclusively)) to pay and secure the
payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued
by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as
authorized by law. If in any twelve month period it shall appear that
the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the
outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue
bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of
trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all
requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal
of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met
at all times.
(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall
be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The
Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which
accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited
in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and
expended ((exclusively)) to pay and secure the payment of the principal
of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal
school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection,
equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings
and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way,
easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for
any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law.
(3) Building fees deposited in the respective capital projects
accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under
chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.360 and 2005 c 488 s 922 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all
collected building fees of each such community and technical college
shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as
follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if
issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects
account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and
technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building
bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall
be ((exclusively)) devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month
period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board
is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and
interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall
notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so
that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the
principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be
fully met at all times.
(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is
hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the
capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended
((exclusively)) to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and
interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance,
demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets
owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the
name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto,
engineering and architectural services provided by the department of
general administration, and for the payment of principal of and
interest on any bonds issued for such purposes.
(3) Building fees deposited in the community and technical college
capital projects account may also be used for certificates of
participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

--- END ---