BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.36.060 and 2004 c 65 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Physicians or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioners
examining or attending injured workers under this title shall comply
with rules and regulations adopted by the director, and shall make such
reports as may be requested by the department or self-insurer upon the
condition or treatment of any such worker, or upon any other matters
concerning such workers in their care. Except under RCW 49.17.210 and
49.17.250, all medical information in the possession or control of any
person and relevant to the particular injury in the opinion of the
department pertaining to any worker whose injury or occupational
disease is the basis of a claim under this title shall be made
available at any stage of the proceedings to the employer, the
claimant's representative, and the department upon request, and no
person shall incur any legal liability by reason of releasing such
information.)) (1) Any time that an examining or attending physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner is contacted by the
employer, or a representative of the employer, a written report must be
generated by the person or entity initiating contact which fully
discloses all subjects discussed and responses given. This report must
be completed within five days of the meeting, and a copy must be mailed
to the worker no later than the fifth day. Failure to comply with this
section constitutes a violation of RCW 51.48.080 and the penalty must
be paid to the worker.
(2) When an attorney, vocational counselor, nurse case manager, or
other representative of the employer seeks to meet with an examining or
attending physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner
to discuss an injured worker's physical capacities, medical treatment,
permanent partial disability, ability to work, or other issues
pertaining to the claim:
(a) The attorney, vocational counselor, nurse case manager, or
other representative of the employer shall give at least seven days'
prior written notice to the worker or the worker's designated
representative;
(b) The worker and the worker's representative have the right to
attend and participate in the meeting;
(c) The party scheduling the meeting shall make reasonable efforts
to coordinate the scheduling of the appointment for the convenience of
all parties;
(d) The employer or representative of the employer, within five
days of the completion of the meeting, shall create a complete report
of the meeting, including all questions asked and information provided,
and mail a copy to the worker and the worker's designated
representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.14 RCW
to read as follows:
A self-insurer must maintain an office within the state of
Washington and a copy of all employee files.

--- END ---