BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds tobacco products are
a danger to the public with severe health consequences for its users.
As such, no tobacco product should be sold anywhere health care
services are offered or delivered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Where a limited-service health care clinic is located within a
larger retail establishment, including supermarkets, department stores,
and drug stores, the retail establishment may not sell tobacco
products.
(2) For purposes of this section, "health care clinic" means an
office or institution providing care or treatment of disease and where
a provider-patient relationship is established and meeting appropriate
standards for a health care facility.

--- END ---