BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The inspection or copying of any nonexempt
public record by persons serving criminal sentences in state, local, or
privately operated correctional facilities is prohibited under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to any other exemptions
under this chapter, including RCW 42.56.250, criminal justice
facilities and agencies are prohibited from releasing personal
information for any employee, former employee, dependent of an employee
or a former employee, or former spouse with custody of an employee or
a former employee's dependents, including:
(a) Photographs;
(b) Residential addresses;
(c) Residential telephone numbers;
(d) Personal wireless telephone numbers;
(e) Personal e-mail addresses;
(f) Social security numbers; and
(g) Dates of birth.
(2) Information exempted from disclosure under subsection (1) of
this section may be disclosed only through a court order if it is
material evidence in a pending civil or criminal action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---