BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that aircraft and
wildlife strikes are the second leading cause of injury and deaths in
the aviation industry. Therefore, it is necessary to authorize
operators of public airports, operators of private airports open to the
public, and the United States department of agriculture's animal and
plant health inspection service-wildlife services to remove or kill
wildlife, except threatened or endangered species, that are posing a
threat to human health and safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.240 and 1989 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director ((may)) shall authorize the removal or killing of
wildlife that is destroying or injuring property, ((or)) when it is
necessary for wildlife management or research, or when wildlife
endangers human health and safety in airports open to the public.
(2) Wildlife posing a threat to human health and safety may be
taken or killed in any manner, including trapping with otherwise
prohibited traps, on: (a) Property owned or controlled by an airport
operator, without a permit or license issued by the department; or (b)
in the immediate vicinity of an airport if such wildlife is posing a
threat to aircraft taking off from or landing at a public airport by an
airport operator or the United States department of agriculture's
animal and plant health inspection service-wildlife services.
(3) The director or other employees of the department shall dispose
of wildlife taken or possessed by them under this title, except
wildlife taken by airport operators or the United States department of
agriculture's animal and plant health inspection service-wildlife
services, in the manner determined by the director to be in the best
interest of the state. Wildlife taken from public airports to protect
human health and safety shall not be sold, traded, bartered, or
exchanged in any manner, and shall be disposed of in a timely manner by
the airport operator or the United States department of agriculture's
animal and plant health inspection service-wildlife services. Proceeds
from sales shall be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to
the state wildlife ((fund)) account.

--- END ---